BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.160.030 and 2000 c 171 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter shall be administered by the state director of
fire protection.
(2) The state director of fire protection shall have the authority,
and it shall be his or her duty to:
(a) Issue such administrative regulations as necessary for the
administration of this chapter;
(b)(i) Set reasonable fees for licenses, certificates, testing, and
other aspects of the administration of this chapter. However, the
license fee for fire protection sprinkler system contractors engaged
solely in the installation, inspection, maintenance, or servicing of
NFPA 13-D fire protection sprinkler systems shall not exceed one
hundred dollars, and the license fee for fire protection sprinkler
system contractors engaged solely in the installation, inspection,
maintenance, or servicing of NFPA 13-R fire protection sprinkler
systems shall not exceed three hundred dollars;
(ii) Adopt rules establishing a special category restricted to
contractors registered under chapter 18.27 RCW who install underground
systems that service fire protection sprinkler systems. The rules
shall be adopted within ninety days of March 31, 1992;
(iii) Subject to section 2 of this act, adopt rules defining
infractions under this chapter and fines to be assessed for those
infractions;
(c) Enforce the provisions of this chapter;
(d) Conduct investigations of complaints to determine if any
infractions of this chapter or the regulations developed under this
chapter have occurred;
(e) Assign a certificate number to each certificate of competency
holder; and
(f) Adopt rules necessary to implement and administer a program
which requires the affixation of a seal any time a fire protection
sprinkler system is installed, which seal shall include the certificate
number of any certificate of competency holder who installs, in whole
or in part, the fire protection sprinkler system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.160 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A fire protection sprinkler system contractor found to have
committed an infraction under this chapter as defined in rule under RCW
18.160.030(2)(b)(iii) shall be assessed a fine of not less than two
hundred dollars and not more than five thousand dollars.
(2) A fire protection sprinkler system contractor who fails to
obtain a certificate of competency under RCW 18.160.040 shall be
assessed a fine of not less than one thousand dollars and not more than
five thousand dollars.
(3) All fines collected under this section shall be deposited into
the fire protection contractor license fund.

--- END ---