BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.071 and 1994 c 218 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes that some individuals in this state are
problem or compulsive gamblers. Because the state promotes and
regulates gambling through the activities of the state lottery
commission, the Washington horse racing commission, and the Washington
state gambling commission, the state has the responsibility to continue
to provide resources for the support of services for problem and
compulsive gamblers. Therefore, at a minimum, the Washington state
gambling commission, the Washington horse racing commission, and the
state lottery commission shall jointly develop informational signs
concerning problem and compulsive gambling which include a toll-free
hot line number for problem and compulsive gamblers. The signs shall
be placed in the establishments of gambling licensees, horse racing
licensees, and lottery retailers. In addition, the Washington state
gambling commission, the Washington horse racing commission, and the
state lottery commission may also contract with other qualified
entities to provide public awareness, training, and other services to
ensure the intent of this section is fulfilled.

--- END ---