BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of health shall design a state plan for the
prevention, education, and treatment of hepatitis C by January 1, 2004.
In developing the plan, the secretary shall seek the input of:
(a) The public;
(b) Patient groups and organizations;
(c) Relevant state agencies that provide services to persons with
hepatitis C or have functions that involve hepatitis C;
(d) Local health departments;
(e) Public health and clinical laboratories;
(f) Providers of services to persons with hepatitis C;
(g) Research scientists;
(h) The University of Washington;
(i) Representatives from the pharmaceutical industry; and
(j) The Washington state medical association.
(2) The plan shall include implementation recommendations in the
following areas:
(a) Hepatitis C virus prevention and treatment strategies for
groups at risk for hepatitis C with an emphasis towards those groups
that are disproportionately affected by hepatitis C, including persons
infected with HIV, veterans, racial or ethnic minorities that suffer a
higher incidence of hepatitis C, and persons who engage in high-risk
behavior, such as intravenous drug use;
(b) Educational programs to promote public awareness about
bloodborne infections and knowledge about risk factors, the value of
early detection, screening, services, and available treatment options
for hepatitis C;
(c) Education curricula for appropriate health and health-related
providers covered by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;
(d) Training courses for persons providing hepatitis C counseling,
public health clinic staff, and any other appropriate provider, which
shall focus on disease prevention, early detection, and intervention;
(e) Capacity for voluntary hepatitis C testing programs to be
performed at facilities providing voluntary HIV testing under chapter
70.24 RCW;
(f) A comprehensive model for the prevention and management of
hepatitis C; and
(g) Sources and availability of funding to implement the plan.
(3) The secretary of health shall submit the completed state plan
to the legislature by January 1, 2004. After the initial state plan is
submitted, the department shall update the state plan biennially and
shall submit a progress report on the implementation of the plan to the
governor and make it available to other interested parties. The update
and progress reports are due December 1, 2004, and every two years
thereafter.
(4) The state plan developed pursuant to this section shall be
developed using only available federal and private sources, including
grants.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.60.172 and 1988 c 206 s 903 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person may require an individual to take an HIV test, as
defined in chapter 70.24 RCW, or hepatitis C test, as a condition of
hiring, promotion, or continued employment unless the absence of HIV or
hepatitis C infection is a bona fide occupational qualification for the
job in question.
(2) No person may discharge or fail or refuse to hire any
individual, or segregate or classify any individual in any way which
would deprive or tend to deprive that individual of employment
opportunities or adversely affect his or her status as an employee, or
otherwise discriminate against any individual with respect to
compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment on the
basis of the results of an HIV test or hepatitis C test unless the
absence of HIV or hepatitis C infection is a bona fide occupational
qualification of the job in question.
(3) The absence of HIV or hepatitis C infection as a bona fide
occupational qualification exists when performance of a particular job
can be shown to present a significant risk, as defined by the board of
health by rule, of transmitting HIV or hepatitis C infection to other
persons, and there exists no means of eliminating the risk by
restructuring the job.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, any person who is actually
infected with HIV or hepatitis C, but is not disabled as a result of
the infection, shall not be eligible for any benefits under the
affirmative action provisions of chapter 49.74 RCW solely on the basis
of such infection.
(5) Employers are immune from civil action for damages arising out
of transmission of HIV or hepatitis C to employees or to members of the
public unless such transmission occurs as a result of the employer's
gross negligence.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.60.174 and 1997 c 271 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of determining whether an unfair practice
under this chapter has occurred, claims of discrimination based on
actual or perceived HIV or hepatitis C infection shall be evaluated in
the same manner as other claims of discrimination based on sensory,
mental, or physical disability; or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to transactions
with insurance entities, health service contractors, or health
maintenance organizations subject to RCW 49.60.030(1)(e) or 49.60.178
to prohibit fair discrimination on the basis of actual HIV or actual
hepatitis C infection status when bona fide statistical differences in
risk or exposure have been substantiated.
(3) For the purposes of this chapter((,)):
(a) "HIV" means the human immunodeficiency virus, and includes all
HIV and HIV-related viruses which damage the cellular branch of the
human immune system and leave the infected person immunodeficient; and
(b) "Hepatitis C" means the hepatitis C virus of any genotype.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 50.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Credentialed health care professionals listed in RCW 18.130.040
shall be deemed to be dislocated workers for the purpose of
commissioner approval of training under RCW 50.20.043 if they are
unemployed as a result of contracting hepatitis C in the course of
employment and are unable to continue to work in their profession
because of a significant risk that such work would pose to other
persons and that risk cannot be eliminated.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, a health care
professional who was employed on a full-time basis in their profession
shall be presumed to have contracted hepatitis C in the course of
employment. This presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of the
evidence that demonstrates that the health care professional contracted
hepatitis C as a result of activities or circumstances not related to
employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 1 of this act does not create a
private right of action.

--- END ---