BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.42.005 and 1991 c 347 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington to recognize and
preserve water rights in accordance with RCW 90.03.010.
(2) The legislature finds that:
(a) The state of Washington is faced with a shortage of water with
which to meet existing and future needs, particularly during the summer
and fall months and in dry years when the demand is greatest;
(b) Consistent with RCW 90.54.180, issuance of new water rights,
voluntary water transfers, and conservation and water use efficiency
programs, including storage, ((should be the preferred)) all are
acceptable methods of addressing water uses because they can relieve
current critical water situations, provide for presently unmet needs,
and assist in meeting future water needs. Presently unmet needs or
current needs includes the water required to increase the frequency of
occurrence of base or minimum flow levels in streams of the state, the
water necessary to satisfy existing water rights, or the water
necessary to provide full supplies to existing water systems with
current supply deficiencies; ((and))
(c) The interests of the state and its citizens will be served by
developing programs and regional water resource plans, in cooperation
with local governments, federally recognized tribal governments,
appropriate federal agencies, private citizens, and the various water
users and water interests in the state, that increase the overall
ability to manage the state's waters in order to resolve conflicts and
to better satisfy both present and future needs for water; and
(d) Water banking as a function of the trust water program and as
authorized by this chapter can provide an effective means to facilitate
the voluntary transfer of water rights established through
conservation, purchase, lease, or donation, to preserve water rights
and provide water for presently unmet and future needs; and to achieve
a variety of water resource management objectives throughout the state,
including drought response, improving streamflows on a voluntary basis,
providing water mitigation, or reserving water supply for future uses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is hereby authorized to use the trust water
rights program in the Yakima river basin for water banking purposes.
(2) Water banking may be used for one or more of the following
purposes:
(a) To authorize the use of trust water rights to mitigate for
water resource impacts, future water supply needs, or any beneficial
use under chapter 90.03, 90.44, or 90.54 RCW, consistent with any terms
and conditions established by the transferor, except that return flows
from water rights authorized in whole or in part for any purpose shall
remain available as part of the Yakima basin's total water supply
available and to satisfy existing rights for other downstream uses and
users;
(b) To document transfers of water rights to and from the trust
water rights program; and
(c) To provide a source of water rights the department can make
available to third parties on a temporary or permanent basis for any
beneficial use under chapter 90.03, 90.44, or 90.54 RCW.
(3) The department shall not use water banking to:
(a) Cause detriment or injury to existing rights;
(b) Issue temporary water rights or portions thereof for new
potable uses requiring an adequate and reliable water supply under RCW
19.27.097;
(c) Administer federal project water rights, including federal
storage rights; or
(d) Allow carryover of stored water from one water year to another
water year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department, with the consent of the water right holder, may
identify trust water rights for administration for water banking
purposes, including trust water rights established before the effective
date of this section.
(2) An application to transfer a water right to the trust water
program shall be reviewed under RCW 90.03.380 at the time the water
right is transferred to the trust water program for administration for
water banking purposes, and notice of the application shall be
published by the applicant as provided under RCW 90.03.280. The
application must identify reasonably forseeable future temporary or
permanent beneficial uses for which the water right or portion thereof
may be used by a third party upon transfer from the trust water right
program. In the event the future place of use, period of use, or other
elements of the water right are not specifically identified at the time
of the transfer into the trust water program, another review under RCW
90.03.380 will be necessary at the time of a proposed transfer from the
trust water program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall transfer a water right or portion thereof
being administered for water banking purposes from the trust water
program to a third party upon occurrence of all of the following:
(a) The department receives a request for transfer of a water right
or portion thereof currently administered by the department for water
banking purposes;
(b) The request is consistent with any previous review under RCW
90.03.380 of the water right and future temporary or permanent
beneficial uses;
(c) The request is consistent with any condition, limitation, or
agreement affecting the water right, including but not limited to any
trust water right transfer agreement executed at the time the water
right was transferred to the trust water rights program; and
(d) The request is accompanied by and is consistent with an
assignment of interest or portion thereof from a person or entity
retaining an interest in the trust water right or portion thereof to
the party requesting transfer of the water right or portion thereof.
(2) The priority date of the water right or portion thereof
transferred by the department from the trust water program for water
banking purposes shall be the priority date of the underlying water
right.
(3) The department shall issue documentation for that water right
or portion thereof to the new water right holder based on the
requirements applicable to the transfer of other water rights from the
trust water rights program.
(4) The department's decision on the transfer of a water right or
portion thereof from the trust water program for water banking purposes
may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board under RCW
43.21B.230, or to a superior court conducting a general adjudication
under RCW 90.03.210.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall seek input from agricultural
organizations, federal agencies, tribal governments, local governments,
watershed groups, conservation groups, and developers on water banking,
including water banking procedures and identification of areas in
Washington state where water banking could assist in providing water
supplies for instream and out-of-stream uses. The department shall
summarize any comments received on water banking and submit a report,
including any recommendations, to the appropriate committees of the
legislature for their consideration in the subsequent legislative
session.
(2) By December 31st of every even-numbered year, the department
shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on water banking activities authorized under section 2 of this act.
The report shall:
(a) Evaluate the effectiveness of water banking in meeting the
policies and objectives of this chapter;
(b) Describe any statutory, regulatory, or other impediments to
water banking in other areas of the state; and
(c) Identify other basins or regions that may benefit from
authorization for the department to use the trust water program for
water banking purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this act shall:
(1) Cause detriment or injury to existing rights or to the
operation of the federal Yakima project to provide water for irrigation
purposes, existing water supply contracts, or existing water rights;
(2) Diminish in any way existing rights or the total water supply
available for irrigation and other purposes in the Yakima basin; or
(3) Affect or modify the authority of a court conducting a general
adjudication pursuant to RCW 90.03.210.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Nothing in this act may be construed to:
(1) Affect or modify any treaty or other federal rights of an
Indian tribe, or the rights of any federal agency or other person or
entity arising under state or federal law;
(2) Affect or modify the rights or jurisdictions of the United
States, the state of Washington, the Yakama Nation, or other person or
entity over waters of any river or stream or over any ground water
resource;
(3) Alter, amend, repeal, interpret, modify, or be in conflict with
any interstate compact made by the states;
(4) Alter, establish, or impair the respective rights of states,
the
United States, the Yakama Nation, or any other person or entity
with respect to any water or water-related right;
(5) Alter, diminish, or abridge the rights and obligations of any
federal, state, or local agency, the Yakama Nation, or other person or
entity;
(6) Affect or modify the rights of the Yakama Indian Nation or its
successors in interest to, and management and regulation of, those
water resources arising or used, within the external boundaries of the
Yakama Indian Reservation;
(7) Affect or modify the settlement agreement between the United
States and the state of Washington filed in Yakima county superior
court with regard to federal reserved water rights other than those
rights reserved by the United States for the benefit of the Yakama
Indian Nation and its members; or
(8) Affect or modify the rights of any federal, state, or local
agency, the Yakama Nation, or any other person or entity, public or
private, with respect to any unresolved and unsettled claims in any
water right adjudications, or court decisions, including State v.
Acquavella, or constitute evidence in any such proceeding in which any
water or water-related right is adjudicated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---