BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that veterans
that have been awarded the Distinguished Flying Cross risked their
lives so that we may live free. The legislature wishes to honor these
veterans by establishing the Distinguished Flying Cross license plate,
with the proceeds being used to fund educational scholarships for at-risk youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Distinguished Flying Cross license plates" means license plates
that display the symbol of the Distinguished Flying Cross.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
In cooperation with the Washington state patrol and the department
of licensing, the Northwest Chapter of the Distinguished Flying Cross
Society shall create and design, and the department shall issue, a
special license plate displaying a symbol of the Distinguished Flying
Cross that may be used in lieu of regular or personalized license
plates for motor vehicles required to display two motor vehicle license
plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon
terms and conditions established by the department. The special plates
will commemorate the recipients of the Distinguished Flying Cross and
provide for educational scholarships awarded to at-risk youth through
the Northwest Chapter of the Distinguished Flying Cross Society and
their educational foundation.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.290 and 1997 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In any case of a valid sale or transfer of the ownership of any
vehicle, the right to the certificates properly transferable therewith,
except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, and to the vehicle license plates
passes to the purchaser or transferee. It is unlawful for the holder
of such certificates, except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, or vehicle
license plates to fail, neglect, or refuse to endorse the certificates
and deliver the vehicle license plates to the purchaser or transferee.
If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed by the state or any
county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision
entitled to exemption as provided by law, or, if the vehicle is
licensed with personalized plates, amateur radio operator plates,
Congressional Medal of Honor plates, Distinguished Flying Cross plates,
disabled person plates, disabled veteran plates, prisoner of war
plates, or other special license plates issued under RCW 46.16.301 as
it existed before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997,
the vehicle license plates therefor shall be retained and may be
displayed upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of the vehicle so sold
or transferred.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee of no more than forty
dollars for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section
5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, ((in an amount calculated)) to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration
of this program. ((Until December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed
thirty-five dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations due or to
become due on January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to no
more than forty dollars.)) This fee is in addition to all other fees
required to register and license the vehicle for which the plates have
been requested. All such additional special license plate fees
collected by the department shall be deposited in the state treasury
and credited to the motor vehicle fund.
(2) ((Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application, registration, and renewal
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license
plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder
of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(((4) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(((5))) (4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(((6) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2004, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
Distinguished Flying Cross license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses. The remaining proceeds will be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying report. The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to
the Distinguished Flying Cross license plate account established under
section 6 of this act.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a Distinguished
Flying Cross license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses. The remaining proceeds will be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying report.
The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the Distinguished Flying
Cross license plate account established under section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The Distinguished Flying Cross license plate account is established
in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts, except as
provided in RCW 46.16.313 (6) and (7), from the Distinguished Flying
Cross license plates must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only to fund educational scholarships for
at-risk youth through the educational foundation of the Northwest
Chapter of the Distinguished Flying Cross Society, as authorized by the
superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the
Northwest Chapter of the Distinguished Flying Cross Society. The
account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
and no appropriation is required for expenditures.

--- END ---