BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.250 and 1981 c 181 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any health care provider as defined in RCW 7.70.020 (1) and (2)
as now existing or hereafter amended who, in good faith, files charges
or presents evidence against another member of their profession based
on the claimed incompetency or gross misconduct of such person before
a regularly constituted review committee or board of a professional
society or hospital whose duty it is to evaluate the competency and
qualifications of members of the profession, including limiting the
extent of practice of such person in a hospital or similar institution,
or before a regularly constituted committee or board of a hospital
whose duty it is to review and evaluate the quality of patient care,
shall be immune from civil action for damages arising out of such
activities. The proceedings, reports, and written records of such
committees or boards, or of a member, employee, staff person, or
investigator of such a committee or board, shall not be subject to
subpoena or discovery proceedings in any civil action, except actions
arising out of the recommendations of such committees or boards
involving the restriction or revocation of the clinical or staff
privileges of a health care provider as defined above.
(2) A coordinated quality improvement program maintained in
accordance with RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200 may share information and
documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by a coordinated quality
improvement committee or committees or boards under subsection (1) of
this section, with one or more other coordinated quality improvement
programs for the improvement of the quality of health care services
rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical
malpractice. Information and documents disclosed by one coordinated
quality improvement program to another coordinated quality improvement
program and any information and documents created or maintained as a
result of the sharing of information and documents shall not be subject
to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be respected as
required by subsection (1) of this section and by RCW 43.70.510(4) and
70.41.200(3).

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.510 and 1995 c 267 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Health care institutions and medical facilities, other than
hospitals, that are licensed by the department, professional societies
or organizations, health care service contractors, health maintenance
organizations, health carriers approved pursuant to chapter 48.43 RCW,
and any other person or entity providing health care coverage under
chapter 48.42 RCW that is subject to the jurisdiction and regulation of
any state agency or any subdivision thereof may maintain a coordinated
quality improvement program for the improvement of the quality of
health care services rendered to patients and the identification and
prevention of medical malpractice as set forth in RCW 70.41.200.
(b) All such programs shall comply with the requirements of RCW
70.41.200(1)(a), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h) as modified to
reflect the structural organization of the institution, facility,
professional societies or organizations, health care service
contractors, health maintenance organizations, health carriers, or any
other person or entity providing health care coverage under chapter
48.42 RCW that is subject to the jurisdiction and regulation of any
state agency or any subdivision thereof, unless an alternative quality
improvement program substantially equivalent to RCW 70.41.200(1)(a) is
developed. All such programs, whether complying with the requirement
set forth in RCW 70.41.200(1)(a) or in the form of an alternative
program, must be approved by the department before the discovery
limitations provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section and the
exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and subsection (5) of this section
shall apply. In reviewing plans submitted by licensed entities that
are associated with physicians' offices, the department shall ensure
that the exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and the discovery
limitations of this section are applied only to information and
documents related specifically to quality improvement activities
undertaken by the licensed entity.
(2) Health care provider groups of ((ten)) two or more providers
may maintain a coordinated quality improvement program for the
improvement of the quality of health care services rendered to patients
and the identification and prevention of medical malpractice as set
forth in RCW 70.41.200. All such programs shall comply with the
requirements of RCW 70.41.200(1)(a), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h)
as modified to reflect the structural organization of the health care
provider group. All such programs must be approved by the department
before the discovery limitations provided in subsections (3) and (4) of
this section and the exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and
subsection (5) of this section shall apply.
(3) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such
activity.
(4) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected, and maintained by a
quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or
introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was
in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the
creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents
specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to
testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or
the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee.
This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the
discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that
is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of
any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the
testimony of any person concerning the facts that form the basis for
the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal
knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil
action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or
revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges,
introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by
quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d)
in any civil action challenging the termination of a contract by a
state agency with any entity maintaining a coordinated quality
improvement program under this section if the termination was on the
basis of quality of care concerns, introduction into evidence of
information created, collected, or maintained by the quality
improvement committees of the subject entity, which may be under terms
of a protective order as specified by the court; (e) in any civil
action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or
restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any and the
reasons for the restrictions; or (f) in any civil action, discovery and
introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by
rule of the department of health to be made regarding the care and
treatment received.
(5) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee are exempt
from disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.
(6) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by a quality improvement
committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 with one or
more other coordinated quality improvement programs maintained in
accordance with this section or with RCW 70.41.200, for the improvement
of the quality of health care services rendered to patients and the
identification and prevention of medical malpractice. Information and
documents disclosed by one coordinated quality improvement program to
another coordinated quality improvement program and any information and
documents created or maintained as a result of the sharing of
information and documents shall not be subject to the discovery process
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (4) of
this section and RCW 4.24.250.
(7) The department of health shall adopt rules as are necessary to
implement this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.41.200 and 2000 c 6 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Every hospital shall maintain a coordinated quality improvement
program for the improvement of the quality of health care services
rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical
malpractice. The program shall include at least the following:
(a) The establishment of a quality improvement committee with the
responsibility to review the services rendered in the hospital, both
retrospectively and prospectively, in order to improve the quality of
medical care of patients and to prevent medical malpractice. The
committee shall oversee and coordinate the quality improvement and
medical malpractice prevention program and shall ensure that
information gathered pursuant to the program is used to review and to
revise hospital policies and procedures;
(b) A medical staff privileges sanction procedure through which
credentials, physical and mental capacity, and competence in delivering
health care services are periodically reviewed as part of an evaluation
of staff privileges;
(c) The periodic review of the credentials, physical and mental
capacity, and competence in delivering health care services of all
persons who are employed or associated with the hospital;
(d) A procedure for the prompt resolution of grievances by patients
or their representatives related to accidents, injuries, treatment, and
other events that may result in claims of medical malpractice;
(e) The maintenance and continuous collection of information
concerning the hospital's experience with negative health care outcomes
and incidents injurious to patients, patient grievances, professional
liability premiums, settlements, awards, costs incurred by the hospital
for patient injury prevention, and safety improvement activities;
(f) The maintenance of relevant and appropriate information
gathered pursuant to (a) through (e) of this subsection concerning
individual physicians within the physician's personnel or credential
file maintained by the hospital;
(g) Education programs dealing with quality improvement, patient
safety, medication errors, injury prevention, staff responsibility to
report professional misconduct, the legal aspects of patient care,
improved communication with patients, and causes of malpractice claims
for staff personnel engaged in patient care activities; and
(h) Policies to ensure compliance with the reporting requirements
of this section.
(2) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such
activity.
(3) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected, and maintained by a
quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or
introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was
in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the
creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents
specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to
testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or
the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee.
This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the
discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that
is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of
any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the
testimony of any person concerning the facts which form the basis for
the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal
knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil
action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or
revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges,
introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by
quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d)
in any civil action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were
terminated or restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed,
if any and the reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil
action, discovery and introduction into evidence of the patient's
medical records required by regulation of the department of health to
be made regarding the care and treatment received.
(4) Each quality improvement committee shall, on at least a
semiannual basis, report to the governing board of the hospital in
which the committee is located. The report shall review the quality
improvement activities conducted by the committee, and any actions
taken as a result of those activities.
(5) The department of health shall adopt such rules as are deemed
appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this section.
(6) The medical quality assurance commission or the board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery, as appropriate, may review and audit
the records of committee decisions in which a physician's privileges
are terminated or restricted. Each hospital shall produce and make
accessible to the commission or board the appropriate records and
otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall
not be subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be
respected as required by subsection (3) of this section. Failure of a
hospital to comply with this subsection is punishable by a civil
penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.
(7) The department, the joint commission on accreditation of health
care organizations, and any other accrediting organization may review
and audit the records of a quality improvement committee or peer review
committee in connection with their inspection and review of hospitals.
Information so obtained shall not be subject to the discovery process,
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section. Each hospital shall produce and make accessible to the
department the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review
and audit.
(8) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by a quality improvement
committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 with one or
more other coordinated quality improvement programs maintained in
accordance with this section or with RCW 43.70.510, for the improvement
of the quality of health care services rendered to patients and the
identification and prevention of medical malpractice. Information and
documents disclosed by one coordinated quality improvement program to
another coordinated quality improvement program and any information and
documents created or maintained as a result of the sharing of
information and documents shall not be subject to the discovery process
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section and RCW 4.24.250.
(9) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence
per se.

--- END ---