BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Domestic violence, sexual assault, and stalking are widespread
societal problems that have devastating effects for individual victims,
their children, and their communities. Victims of violence may be
forced to remain in unsafe situations because they are bound by
residential lease agreements. The legislature finds that the inability
of victims to terminate their rental agreements hinders or prevents
victims from being able to safely flee domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking. The legislature further finds that victims of
these crimes who do not have access to safe housing are more likely to
remain in or return to abusive or dangerous situations. Also, the
legislature finds that victims of these crimes are further victimized
when they are unable to obtain or retain rental housing due to their
history as a victim of these crimes. The legislature further finds
that evidence that a prospective tenant has been a victim of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking is not relevant to the decision
whether to rent to that prospective tenant.
(2) By this act, the legislature intends to increase safety for
victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, and stalking by removing
barriers to safety and offering protection against discrimination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
sections 3 through 5 of this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW
26.50.010.
(2) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW
70.125.030.
(3) "Stalking" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW 9A.46.110.
(4) "Qualified third party" means any of the following people
acting in their official capacity:
(a) Law enforcement officers;
(b) Persons subject to the provisions of chapter 18.120 RCW;
(c) Employees of a court of the state;
(d) Licensed mental health professionals or other licensed
counselors;
(e) Employees of crime victim/witness programs as defined in RCW
7.69.020 who are trained advocates for the program; and
(f) Members of the clergy as defined in RCW 26.44.020.
(5) "Household member" means a child or adult residing with the
tenant other than the perpetrator of domestic violence, stalking, or
sexual assault.
(6) "Tenant screening service provider" means any nongovernmental
agency that provides, for a fee, background information on prospective
tenants to landlords.
(7) "Credit reporting agency" has the same meaning as set forth in
RCW 19.182.010(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) If a tenant notifies the landlord in writing that he or she
or a household member was a victim of an act that constitutes a crime
of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, and either (a)(i) or
(ii) of this subsection applies, then subsection (2) of this section
applies:
(i) The tenant or the household member has a valid order for
protection under one or more of the following: Chapter 26.50 or 26.26
RCW or RCW 9A.46.040, 9A.46.050, 10.14.080, 10.99.040 (2) or (3), or
26.09.050; or
(ii) The tenant or the household member has reported the domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking to a qualified third party acting
in his or her official capacity and the qualified third party has
provided the tenant or the household member a written record of the
report signed by the qualified third party.
(b) When a copy of a valid order for protection or a written record
of a report signed by a qualified third party, as required under (a) of
this subsection, is made available to the landlord, the tenant may
terminate the rental agreement and quit the premises without further
obligation under the rental agreement or under chapter 59.12 RCW.
However, the request to terminate the rental agreement must occur
within ninety days of the reported act, event, or circumstance that
gave rise to the protective order or report to a qualified third party.
A record of the report to a qualified third party that is provided to
the tenant or household member shall consist of a document signed and
dated by the qualified third party stating: (i) That the tenant or the
household member notified him or her that he or she was a victim of an
act or acts that constitute a crime of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking; (ii) the time and date the act or acts occurred;
(iii) the location where the act or acts occurred; (iv) a brief
description of the act or acts of domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking; and (v) that the tenant or household member informed him or
her of the name of the alleged perpetrator of the act or acts. The
record of the report provided to the tenant or household member shall
not include the name of the alleged perpetrator of the act or acts of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking. The qualified third
party shall keep a copy of the record of the report and shall note on
the retained copy the name of the alleged perpetrator of the act or
acts of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking. The record of
the report to a qualified third party may be accomplished by completion
of a form provided by the qualified third party, in substantially the
following form:

(2) A tenant who terminates a rental agreement under this section
is discharged from the payment of rent for any period following the
last day of the month of the quitting date. The tenant shall remain
liable for the rent for the month in which he or she terminated the
rental agreement unless the termination is in accordance with RCW
59.18.200(1). Notwithstanding lease provisions that allow for
forfeiture of a deposit for early termination, a tenant who terminates
under this section is entitled to the return of the full deposit,
subject to RCW 59.18.020 and 59.18.280. Other tenants who are parties
to the rental agreement, except household members who are the victims
of sexual assault, stalking, or domestic violence, are not released
from their obligations under the rental agreement or other obligations
under this chapter.
(3) The provision of verification of a report under subsection
(1)(b) of this section does not waive the confidential or privileged
nature of the communication between a victim of domestic violence,
sexual assault, or stalking with a qualified third party pursuant to
RCW 5.60.060, 70.123.075, or 70.125.065. No record or evidence
obtained from such disclosure may be used in any civil, administrative,
or criminal proceeding against the victim unless a written waiver of
applicable evidentiary privilege is obtained, except that the
verification itself, and no other privileged information, under
subsection (1)(b) of this section may be used in civil proceedings
brought under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A landlord may not terminate a tenancy, fail to renew a
tenancy, or refuse to enter into a rental agreement based on the
tenant's or applicant's or a household member's status as a victim of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or based on the tenant
or applicant having terminated a rental agreement under section 2 of
this act.
(2) A landlord who refuses to enter into a rental agreement in
violation of this section may be liable to the tenant or applicant in
a civil action for damages sustained by the tenant or applicant. The
prevailing party may also recover court costs and reasonable attorneys'
fees.
(3) It is a defense to an unlawful detainer action under chapter
59.12 RCW that the action to remove the tenant and recover possession
of the premises is in violation of subsection (1) of this section.
(4) This section does not prohibit adverse housing decisions based
upon other lawful factors within the landlord's knowledge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A tenant who has obtained a court order from a court of
competent jurisdiction granting him or her possession of a dwelling
unit to the exclusion of one or more cotenants may request that a lock
be replaced or configured for a new key at the tenant's expense. The
landlord shall, if provided a copy of the order, comply with the
request and shall not provide copies of the new keys to the tenant
restrained or excluded by the court's order. This section does not
release a cotenant, other than a household member who is the victim of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, from liability or
obligations under the rental agreement.
(2) A landlord who replaces a lock or configures for a new key of
a residential housing unit in accordance with subsection (1) of this
section shall be held harmless from liability for any damages that
result directly from the lock change.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 59.18.356 (Threatening behavior -- Violation of order for protection -- Termination of agreement -- Financial
obligations) and 1992 c 38 s 7 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---