BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the
public interest that before the fluoridation of a public water system,
the customers of the public water system or the elected local public
water system governing body should make the final decision on the
addition of fluoride to the public water system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The addition of fluoridation compounds to water provided by public
water systems not adding fluoridation compounds as of the effective
date of this section shall be permitted only upon an affirmative vote
of:
(1) The public water system's customers; or
(2) The public water system's elected local governing body directly
responsible to the department of health for utility operations.

--- END ---