BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.18.070 and 1994 c 230 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A petition or motion seeking a mandatory wage assignment in an
action under RCW 26.18.040 may be filed by an obligee if the obligor
is:
(a) Subject to a support order allowing immediate income
withholding and does not have a history of timely payments of court
ordered or administratively ordered child support; or
(b) More than fifteen days past due in child support or spousal
maintenance payments in an amount equal to or greater than the
obligation payable for one month.
(2) The petition or motion shall include a sworn statement by the
obligee, stating the facts authorizing the issuance of the wage
assignment order, including:
(a) That the obligor, stating his or her name and residence, is:
(i) Subject to a support order allowing immediate income
withholding and does not have a history of timely payments of court
ordered or administratively ordered child support; or
(ii) More than fifteen days past due in child support or spousal
maintenance payments in an amount equal to or greater than the
obligation payable for one month;
(b) A description of the terms of the order requiring payment of
support or spousal maintenance, and the amount past due, if any;
(c) The name and address of the obligor's employer;
(d) That notice by personal service or any form of mail requiring
a return receipt, has been provided to the obligor at least fifteen
days prior to the obligee seeking a mandatory wage assignment, unless
the order for support or maintenance states that the obligee may seek
a mandatory wage assignment without notice to the obligor; and
(e) In cases not filed by the state, whether the obligee has
received public assistance from any source and, if the obligee has
received public assistance, that the department of social and health
services has been notified in writing of the pending action.
(3) If the court in which a mandatory wage assignment is sought
does not already have a copy of the support or maintenance order in the
court file, then the obligee shall attach a copy of the support or
maintenance order to the petition or motion seeking the wage
assignment.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.18.080 and 1987 c 435 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of a petition or motion seeking a mandatory wage
assignment that complies with RCW 26.18.070, the court shall issue a
wage assignment order, unless the obligor has a history of timely
payment of previously ordered child support. The court may enter a
wage assignment order, even if the obligor has a history of timely
payment of previously ordered support, if the obligor is subject to a
restraining order, no-contact order, or protection order with respect
to the obligee or a child of the obligee. The order shall: (a) Be
issued as provided in RCW 26.18.100 ((and including)); (b) include the
information required in RCW 26.18.090(1)((,)); (c) be directed to the
employer((,)); and ((commanding))(d) command the employer to answer the
order on the forms served with the order that comply with RCW 26.18.120
within twenty days after service of the order upon the employer.
(2) The clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the mandatory
wage assignment order, a true and correct copy of the support orders in
the court file, and a statement containing the obligee's address and
social security number shall be forwarded to the Washington state
support registry within five days of the entry of the order.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.18.100 and 1998 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The wage assignment order shall be substantially in the
following form:

The above-named obligee claims that the above-named obligor is
subject to a support order requiring immediate income withholding or is
more than fifteen days past due in either child support or spousal
maintenance payments, or both, in an amount equal to or greater than
the child support or spousal maintenance payable for one month. The
amount of the accrued child support or spousal maintenance debt as of
this date is . . . . . . dollars, the amount of arrearage payments
specified in the support or spousal maintenance order (if applicable)
is . . . . . . dollars per . . . . . ., and the amount of the current
and continuing support or spousal maintenance obligation under the
order is . . . . . . dollars per . . . . . .
You are hereby commanded to answer this order by filling in the
attached form according to the instructions, and you must mail or
deliver the original of the answer to the court, one copy to the
Washington state support registry, one copy to the obligee or obligee's
attorney, and one copy to the obligor within twenty days after service
of this wage assignment order upon you.
(2) If you possess any earnings or other remuneration for
employment due and owing to the obligor, then you shall do as follows:
(((1))) (a) Withhold from the obligor's earnings or remuneration
each month, or from each regular earnings disbursement, the lesser of:
(((a))) (i) The sum of the accrued support or spousal maintenance
debt and the current support or spousal maintenance obligation;
(((b))) (ii) The sum of the specified arrearage payment amount and
the current support or spousal maintenance obligation; or
(((c))) (iii) Fifty percent of the disposable earnings or
remuneration of the obligor.
(((2))) (b) The total amount withheld above is subject to the wage
assignment order, and all other sums may be disbursed to the obligor.
(((3))) (c) Upon receipt of this wage assignment order you shall
make immediate deductions from the obligor's earnings or remuneration
and remit to the Washington state support registry or other address
specified below the proper amounts within five working days of each
regular pay interval.
You shall continue to withhold the ordered amounts from nonexempt
earnings or remuneration of the obligor until notified by:
(((a))) (i) The court that the wage assignment has been modified or
terminated; or
(((b))) (ii) The addressee specified in the wage assignment order
under this section that the accrued child support or spousal
maintenance debt has been paid.
(3) You shall promptly notify the court and the addressee specified
in the wage assignment order under this section if and when the
employee is no longer employed by you, or if the obligor no longer
receives earnings or remuneration from you. If you no longer employ
the employee, the wage assignment order shall remain in effect until
you are no longer in possession of any earnings or remuneration owed to
the employee.
You shall deliver the withheld earnings or remuneration to the
Washington state support registry or other address stated below within
five working days of each regular pay interval.
You shall deliver a copy of this order to the obligor as soon as is
reasonably possible. This wage assignment order has priority over any
other wage assignment or garnishment, except for another wage
assignment or garnishment for child support or spousal maintenance, or
order to withhold or deliver under chapter 74.20A RCW.

WHETHER OR NOT YOU OWE ANYTHING TO THE OBLIGOR, YOUR FAILURE TO
ANSWER AS REQUIRED MAY MAKE YOU LIABLE FOR THE AMOUNT OF
SUPPORT MONEYS THAT SHOULD HAVE BEEN WITHHELD FROM THE
OBLIGOR'S EARNINGS OR SUBJECT TO CONTEMPT OF COURT.

NOTICE TO OBLIGOR: YOU HAVE A RIGHT TO REQUEST A HEARING IN THE
SUPERIOR COURT THAT ISSUED THIS WAGE ASSIGNMENT ORDER, TO REQUEST THAT
THE COURT QUASH, MODIFY, OR TERMINATE THE WAGE ASSIGNMENT ORDER.
REGARDLESS OF THE FACT THAT YOUR WAGES ARE BEING WITHHELD PURSUANT TO
THIS ORDER, YOU MAY HAVE SUSPENDED OR NOT RENEWED A PROFESSIONAL,
DRIVER'S, OR OTHER LICENSE IF YOU ACCRUE CHILD SUPPORT ARREARAGES
TOTALING MORE THAN SIX MONTHS OF CHILD SUPPORT PAYMENTS OR FAIL TO MAKE
PAYMENTS TOWARDS A SUPPORT ARREARAGE IN AN AMOUNT THAT EXCEEDS SIX
MONTHS OF PAYMENTS.

DATED THIS . . . . day of . . . ., 19. . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Obligee, Judge/Court Commissioner

or obligee's attorney

Send withheld payments to: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Sec. 4 RCW 26.18.140 and 1994 c 230 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in a
hearing to quash, modify, or terminate the wage assignment order, the
court may grant relief ((only)) upon a showing that the wage assignment
order causes extreme hardship or substantial injustice or upon a
showing that the obligor has a history of timely payments of previously
ordered support. The court shall not quash, modify, or terminate the
wage assignment order if the obligor is subject to a restraining order,
no-contact order, or protection order with respect to the obligee or a
child of the obligee. Satisfaction by the obligor of all past due
payments subsequent to the issuance of the wage assignment order is not
grounds to quash, modify, or terminate the wage assignment order. If
a wage assignment order has been in operation for twelve consecutive
months and the obligor's support or spousal maintenance obligation is
current, the court may terminate the order upon motion of the obligor
unless the obligee can show good cause as to why the wage assignment
order should remain in effect.
(2) The court may enter an order delaying, modifying, or
terminating the wage assignment order and order the obligor to make
payments directly to the obligee as provided in RCW 26.23.050(2).

Sec. 5 RCW 26.23.050 and 2001 c 42 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the division of child support is providing support
enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, or if a party is applying for
support enforcement services by signing the application form on the
bottom of the support order, the superior court shall include in all
court orders that establish or modify a support obligation:
(a) A provision that orders and directs the responsible parent to
make all support payments to the Washington state support registry;
(b) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages,
earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and
personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other
state, without further notice to the responsible parent at any time
after entry of the court order, unless:
(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that
there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and
that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or
(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
court that provides for an alternate arrangement;
(c) A statement that the receiving parent might be required to
submit an accounting of how the support is being spent to benefit the
child; and
(d) A statement that the responsible parent's privileges to obtain
and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be
renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a
support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.
As used in this subsection and subsection (3) of this section,
"good cause not to require immediate income withholding" means a
written determination of why implementing immediate wage withholding
would not be in the child's best interests and, in modification cases,
proof of a history of timely payment of previously ordered support.
(2) In all other cases not under subsection (1) of this section,
the court may order the responsible parent to make payments directly to
the person entitled to receive the payments, to the Washington state
support registry, or may order that payments be made in accordance with
an alternate arrangement agreed upon by the parties.
(a) The superior court shall include in all orders under this
subsection that establish or modify a support obligation:
(i) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages,
earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and
personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other
state, without further notice to the responsible parent at any time
after entry of the court order, unless:
(A) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that
there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and
that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or
(B) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
court that provides for an alternate arrangement; and
(ii) A statement that the receiving parent may be required to
submit an accounting of how the support is being spent to benefit the
child.
As used in this subsection, "good cause not to require immediate
income withholding" is any reason that the court finds appropriate,
and, in modification hearings, includes a finding that the obligor has
a history of timely payment of previously ordered support.
(b) The superior court may order immediate or delayed income
withholding as follows:
(i) Immediate income withholding may be ordered if the responsible
parent has earnings. If immediate income withholding is ordered under
this subsection, all support payments shall be paid to the Washington
state support registry. The superior court shall issue a mandatory
wage assignment order as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW when the
support order is signed by the court. The parent entitled to receive
the transfer payment is responsible for serving the employer with the
order and for its enforcement as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW.
(ii) If immediate income withholding is not ordered, the court
shall require that income withholding be delayed until a payment is
past due. The support order shall contain a statement that withholding
action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and
liens enforced against real and personal property under the child
support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to
the responsible parent, after a payment is past due.
(c) If a mandatory wage withholding order under chapter 26.18 RCW
is issued under this subsection and the division of child support
provides support enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, the existing
wage withholding assignment is prospectively superseded upon the
division of child support's subsequent service of an income withholding
notice.
(3) The office of administrative hearings and the department of
social and health services shall require that all support obligations
established as administrative orders include a provision which orders
and directs that the responsible parent shall make all support payments
to the Washington state support registry. All administrative orders
shall also state that the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and
maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed,
or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support
order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. All administrative orders shall
also state that withholding action may be taken against wages,
earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and
personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other
state without further notice to the responsible parent at any time
after entry of the order, unless:
(a) One of the parties demonstrates, and the presiding officer
finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income
withholding; or
(b) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
presiding officer that provides for an alternate agreement.
(4) If the support order does not include the provision ordering
and directing that all payments be made to the Washington state support
registry and a statement that withholding action may be taken against
wages, earnings, assets, or benefits if a support payment is past due
or at any time after the entry of the order, or that a parent's
licensing privileges may not be renewed, or may be suspended, the
division of child support may serve a notice on the responsible parent
stating such requirements and authorizations. Service may be by
personal service or any form of mail requiring a return receipt.
(5) Every support order shall state:
(a) The address where the support payment is to be sent;
(b) That withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings,
assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal
property under the child support statutes of this or any other state,
without further notice to the responsible parent at any time after
entry of a support order, unless:
(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that
there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding; or
(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
court that provides for an alternate arrangement;
(c) The income of the parties, if known, or that their income is
unknown and the income upon which the support award is based;
(d) The support award as a sum certain amount;
(e) The specific day or date on which the support payment is due;
(f) The names and ages of the dependent children;
(g) A provision requiring the responsible parent to keep the
Washington state support registry informed of whether he or she has
access to health insurance coverage at reasonable cost and, if so, the
health insurance policy information;
(h) That any parent owing a duty of child support shall be
obligated to provide health insurance coverage for his or her child if
coverage that can be extended to cover the child is or becomes
available to that parent through employment or is union-related as
provided under RCW 26.09.105;
(i) That if proof of health insurance coverage or proof that the
coverage is unavailable is not provided within twenty days, the obligee
or the department may seek direct enforcement of the coverage through
the obligor's employer or union without further notice to the obligor
as provided under chapter 26.18 RCW;
(j) The reasons for not ordering health insurance coverage if the
order fails to require such coverage;
(k) That the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain
a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be
suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support order as
provided in RCW 74.20A.320;
(l) That each parent must:
(i) Promptly file with the court and update as necessary the
confidential information form required by subsection (7) of this
section; and
(ii) Provide the state case registry and update as necessary the
information required by subsection (7) of this section; and
(m) That parties to administrative support orders shall provide to
the state case registry and update as necessary their residential
addresses and the address of the responsible parent's employer. The
division of child support may adopt rules that govern the collection of
parties' current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers,
dates of birth, social security numbers, the names of the children,
social security numbers of the children, dates of birth of the
children, driver's license numbers, and the names, addresses, and
telephone numbers of the parties' employers to enforce an
administrative support order. The division of child support shall not
release this information if the division of child support determines
that there is reason to believe that release of the information may
result in physical or emotional harm to the party or to the child, or
a restraining order or protective order is in effect to protect one
party from the other party.
(6) After the responsible parent has been ordered or notified to
make payments to the Washington state support registry under this
section, the responsible parent shall be fully responsible for making
all payments to the Washington state support registry and shall be
subject to payroll deduction or other income-withholding action. The
responsible parent shall not be entitled to credit against a support
obligation for any payments made to a person or agency other than to
the Washington state support registry except as provided under RCW
74.20.101. A civil action may be brought by the payor to recover
payments made to persons or agencies who have received and retained
support moneys paid contrary to the provisions of this section.
(7) All petitioners and parties to all court actions under chapters
26.09, 26.10, 26.12, 26.18, 26.21, 26.23, 26.26, and 26.27 RCW shall
complete to the best of their knowledge a verified and signed
confidential information form or equivalent that provides the parties'
current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, dates of
birth, social security numbers, driver's license numbers, and the
names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers. The
clerk of the court shall not accept petitions, except in parentage
actions initiated by the state, orders of child support, decrees of
dissolution, or paternity orders for filing in such actions unless
accompanied by the confidential information form or equivalent, or
unless the confidential information form or equivalent is already on
file with the court clerk. In lieu of or in addition to requiring the
parties to complete a separate confidential information form, the clerk
may collect the information in electronic form. The clerk of the court
shall transmit the confidential information form or its data to the
division of child support with a copy of the order of child support or
paternity order, and may provide copies of the confidential information
form or its data and any related findings, decrees, parenting plans,
orders, or other documents to the state administrative agency that
administers Title IV-A, IV-D, or IV-E of the federal social security
act. In state initiated paternity actions, the parties adjudicated the
parents of the child or children shall complete the confidential
information form or equivalent or the state's attorney of record may
complete that form to the best of the attorney's knowledge.

Sec. 6 RCW 26.23.060 and 2000 c 86 s 4 and 2000 c 29 s 1 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The division of child support may issue a notice of payroll
deduction:
(a) As authorized by a support order that contains a notice clearly
stating that child support may be collected by withholding from
earnings, wages, or benefits without further notice to the obligated
parent; or
(b) After service of a notice containing an income-withholding
provision under this chapter or chapter 74.20A RCW.
The office of support enforcement shall not issue a notice of
payroll deduction if the obligor has a history of timely payment of
previously ordered child support. The department may issue a notice of
payroll deduction, even if the obligor has a history of timely payment
of previously ordered support, if the obligor is subject to a
restraining order, no-contact order, or protection order with respect
to the obligee or a child of the obligee.
(2) The division of child support shall serve a notice of payroll
deduction upon a responsible parent's employer or upon the employment
security department for the state in possession of or owing any
benefits from the unemployment compensation fund to the responsible
parent pursuant to Title 50 RCW:
(a) In the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a
civil action;
(b) By certified mail, return receipt requested;
(c) By electronic means if there is an agreement between the
secretary and the person, firm, corporation, association, political
subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or
instrumentality of the United States to accept service by electronic
means; or
(d) By regular mail to a responsible parent's employer unless the
division of child support reasonably believes that service of process
in the manner prescribed in (a) or (b) of this subsection is required
for initiating an action to ensure employer compliance with the
withholding requirement.
(3) Service of a notice of payroll deduction upon an employer or
employment security department requires the employer or employment
security department to immediately make a mandatory payroll deduction
from the responsible parent's unpaid disposable earnings or
unemployment compensation benefits. The employer or employment
security department shall thereafter deduct each pay period the amount
stated in the notice divided by the number of pay periods per month.
The payroll deduction each pay period shall not exceed fifty percent of
the responsible parent's disposable earnings.
(4) A notice of payroll deduction for support shall have priority
over any wage assignment, garnishment, attachment, or other legal
process.
(5) The notice of payroll deduction shall be in writing and
include:
(a) The name and social security number of the responsible parent;
(b) The amount to be deducted from the responsible parent's
disposable earnings each month, or alternate amounts and frequencies as
may be necessary to facilitate processing of the payroll deduction;
(c) A statement that the total amount withheld shall not exceed
fifty percent of the responsible parent's disposable earnings;
(d) The address to which the payments are to be mailed or
delivered; and
(e) A notice to the responsible parent warning the responsible
parent that, despite the payroll deduction, the responsible parent's
privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW
74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is
not in compliance with a support order as defined in RCW 74.20A.320.
(6) An informational copy of the notice of payroll deduction shall
be mailed to the last known address of the responsible parent by
regular mail.
(7) An employer or employment security department that receives a
notice of payroll deduction shall make immediate deductions from the
responsible parent's unpaid disposable earnings and remit proper
amounts to the Washington state support registry within seven working
days of the date the earnings are payable to the responsible parent.
(8) An employer, or the employment security department, upon whom
a notice of payroll deduction is served, shall make an answer to the
division of child support within twenty days after the date of service.
The answer shall confirm compliance and institution of the payroll
deduction or explain the circumstances if no payroll deduction is in
effect. The answer shall also state whether the responsible parent is
employed by or receives earnings from the employer or receives
unemployment compensation benefits from the employment security
department, whether the employer or employment security department
anticipates paying earnings or unemployment compensation benefits and
the amount of earnings. If the responsible parent is no longer
employed, or receiving earnings from the employer, the answer shall
state the present employer's name and address, if known. If the
responsible parent is no longer receiving unemployment compensation
benefits from the employment security department, the answer shall
state the present employer's name and address, if known.
The returned answer or a payment remitted to the division of child
support by the employer constitutes proof of service of the notice of
payroll deduction in the case where the notice was served by regular
mail.
(9) The employer may deduct a processing fee from the remainder of
the responsible parent's earnings after withholding under the notice of
payroll deduction, even if the remainder is exempt under RCW 26.18.090.
The processing fee may not exceed: (a) Ten dollars for the first
disbursement made to the Washington state support registry; and (b) one
dollar for each subsequent disbursement to the registry.
(10) The notice of payroll deduction shall remain in effect until
released by the division of child support, the court enters an order
terminating the notice and approving an alternate arrangement under RCW
26.23.050, or until the employer no longer employs the responsible
parent and is no longer in possession of or owing any earnings to the
responsible parent. The employer shall promptly notify the office of
support enforcement when the employer no longer employs the parent
subject to the notice. For the employment security department, the
notice of payroll deduction shall remain in effect until released by
the division of child support or until the court enters an order
terminating the notice.
(11) The division of child support may use uniform interstate
withholding forms adopted by the United States department of health and
human services to take withholding actions under this section whether
the responsible parent is receiving earnings or unemployment
compensation in this state or in another state.

Sec. 7 RCW 26.23.100 and 1994 c 230 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The responsible parent subject to a payroll deduction pursuant
to this chapter, may file a motion in superior court to quash, modify,
or terminate the payroll deduction.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section,
the court may grant relief only upon a showing: (a) That the payroll
deduction causes extreme hardship or substantial injustice; or (b) that
the support payment was not past due under the terms of the order when
the notice of payroll deduction was served on the employer and the
obligor has a history of timely payment of previously ordered child
support. The court shall not quash, modify, or terminate the wage
assignment order if the obligor is subject to a restraining order, no-contact order, or protection order with respect to the obligee or a
child of the obligee.
(3) Satisfaction by the obligor of all past due payments subsequent
to the issuance of the notice of payroll deduction is not grounds to
quash, modify, or terminate the notice of payroll deduction.
(4) If a notice of payroll deduction has been in operation for
twelve consecutive months and the obligor's support obligation is
current, upon motion of the obligor, the court may order the office of
support enforcement to terminate the payroll deduction, unless the
obligee can show good cause as to why the payroll deduction should
remain in effect.
(5) Subsection (2) of this section shall not prevent the court from
ordering an alternative arrangement as provided under RCW 26.23.050(2).

--- END ---