BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
promote good government, foster citizen confidence in the public
sector, ensure wise use of taxpayer dollars, achieve continuity in the
provision of public services, and eliminate prolonged and costly
litigation between governmental entities by requiring public agencies
to submit to alternative dispute resolution processes rather than
filing lawsuits.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.17.330 and 1993 c 279 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a dispute arises between state agencies, agencies
shall employ ((every effort)) alternative dispute resolution processes,
including mandatory mediation and binding arbitration, to resolve the
dispute themselves without resorting to litigation. ((These efforts
shall involve alternative dispute resolution methods. If))
(2) When a dispute ((cannot be resolved by the)) arises between
agencies ((involved)), any one of the disputing agencies may request
the governor to assist in the resolution of the dispute.
The governor shall employ whatever dispute resolution methods that
the governor deems appropriate in resolving the dispute. Such methods
may include, but are not limited to, the appointment by the governor of
a mediator, acceptable to the disputing agencies, to assist in the
resolution of the dispute. The governor may also request assistance
from the attorney general to advise the mediator and the disputing
agencies.
(3) If the dispute cannot be resolved by the agencies under
subsection (2) of this section, a mediator acceptable to the disputing
agencies shall be appointed by the governor to assist in the resolution
of the dispute.
By mutual agreement, the parties may waive mediation and fact-finding and proceed with binding arbitration. The waiver shall be in
writing and be signed by the agencies involved in the dispute.
If an impasse exists fourteen days after the mediator has been
appointed, or beyond any other date mutually agreed to by the parties,
all impasse items shall be submitted to arbitration, and that
arbitration shall be final and conclusive and binding upon the agencies
involved in the dispute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---