BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.12.010 and 1994 c 198 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter,)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context requires ((a different
meaning:)) otherwise.
(1) "Governmental unit" means any county, city, town, rural county
library district, intercounty rural library district, rural partial-county library district, or island library district;
(2) "Legislative body" means the body authorized to determine the
amount of taxes to be levied in a governmental unit; in rural county
library districts, in intercounty rural library districts, and in
island library districts, the legislative body shall be the library
board ((of library trustees)) of the district;
(3) "Library" means a free public library supported in whole or in
part with money derived from taxation;
(4) "Regional library" means a free public library maintained by
two or more counties or other governmental units as provided in RCW
27.12.080;
(5) "Rural county library district" means a library serving all the
area of a county not included within the area of incorporated cities
and towns: PROVIDED, That any city or town with a population of one
hundred thousand or less at the time of annexation may be included
therein as provided in RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.390;
(6) "Intercounty rural library district" means a municipal
corporation organized to provide library service for all areas outside
of incorporated cities and towns within two or more counties:
PROVIDED, That any city or town with a population of one hundred
thousand or less at the time of annexation may be included therein as
provided in RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.390;
(7) "Island library district" means a municipal corporation
organized to provide library service for all areas outside of
incorporated cities and towns on a single island only, and not all of
the area of the county, in counties composed entirely of islands and
having a population of less than twenty-five thousand at the time the
island library district was created: PROVIDED, That any city or town
with a population of one hundred thousand or less at the time of
annexation may be included therein as provided in RCW 27.12.360 through
27.12.390; and
(8) "Rural partial-county library district" means a municipal
corporation organized to provide library service for a portion of the
unincorporated area of a county. Any city or town located in the same
county as a rural partial-county library district may annex to the
district if the city or town has a population of one hundred thousand
or less at the time of annexation.

Sec. 2 RCW 27.12.050 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
At the next general election after the board of county
commissioners has declared a rural county library district established,
((it)) the voters of the library district shall ((appoint a board of
library trustees)) elect members of a library board as provided in RCW
27.12.190 and provide funds for the establishment and maintenance of
library service for the district by making a tax levy on the property
in the district of not more than fifty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value per year sufficient for the library service as shown to
be required by the budget submitted to the board of county
commissioners by the library board ((of library trustees)), and by
making a tax levy in such further amount as shall be authorized
pursuant to RCW 27.12.222 or 84.52.052 or 84.52.056. Such levies shall
be a part of the general tax roll and shall be collected as a part of
the general taxes against the property in the district.

Sec. 3 RCW 27.12.120 and 1961 c 82 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
All property, assets, and liabilities of preexisting library
districts within the area included in an intercounty rural library
district shall pass to and be assumed by an intercounty rural library
district: PROVIDED, That where within any intercounty rural library
district heretofore or hereafter organized under the provisions of this
chapter a preexisting library district had incurred a bonded
indebtedness which was outstanding at the time of the formation of the
intercounty rural library district, such preexisting library district
shall retain its corporate existence insofar as is necessary for the
purpose until the bonded indebtedness outstanding against it on and
after the effective date of said formation has been paid in full:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That a special election may be called by the library
board ((of trustees)) of the intercounty rural library district, to be
held at the next general or special election held in the respective
counties for the purpose of affording the voters residing within the
area outside of the preexisting library district an opportunity to
assume the obligation of the bonded indebtedness of the preexisting
library district or the question may be submitted to the voters as a
separate proposition at the election on the proposal for the formation
of the intercounty rural library district.

Sec. 4 RCW 27.12.130 and 1959 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Immediately)) At the next general election following the
establishment of an intercounty rural library district the ((boards of
county commissioners)) voters of the ((counties affected)) library
district shall ((jointly appoint)) elect a library board of five or
seven ((trustees)) members for the district in accordance with RCW
27.12.190. The library board ((of trustees)) shall appoint a librarian
for the district.

Sec. 5 RCW 27.12.140 and 1947 c 75 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The library board ((of trustees)) of an intercounty rural library
district may adopt a name by which the district shall be known and
under which it shall transact all of its business.

Sec. 6 RCW 27.12.150 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
Funds for the establishment and maintenance of the library service
of the district shall be provided by the boards of county commissioners
of the respective counties by means of an annual tax levy on the
property in the district of not more than fifty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value per year. The tax levy in the several
counties shall be at a uniform rate and shall be based on a budget to
be compiled by the library board ((of trustees)) of the intercounty
rural library district who shall determine the uniform tax rate
necessary and certify their determination to the respective boards of
county commissioners.
Excess levies authorized pursuant to RCW 27.12.222 and 84.52.052 or
84.52.056 shall be at a uniform rate which uniform rate shall be
determined by the library board ((of trustees)) of the intercounty
rural library district and certified to the respective boards of county
commissioners.

Sec. 7 RCW 27.12.160 and 1947 c 75 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The library board ((of trustees)) of an intercounty rural library
district shall designate the county treasurer of one of the counties
included in the district to act as treasurer for the district. All
moneys raised for the district by taxation within the participating
counties or received by the district from any other sources shall be
paid over to ((him)) the designated county treasurer, and he or she
shall disburse the funds of the district upon warrants drawn thereon by
the auditor of the county to which he or she belongs pursuant to
vouchers approved by the trustees of the district.

Sec. 8 RCW 27.12.170 and 1947 c 75 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise specifically provided intercounty rural library
districts and the ((trustees)) library board members thereof shall have
the same powers as are prescribed by RCW 27.12.040 through 27.12.070,
for rural county library districts and shall follow the same procedures
and be subject to the same limitations as are provided therein with
respect to the contracting of indebtedness.

Sec. 9 RCW 27.12.180 and 1941 c 65 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Instead of establishing or maintaining an independent library, the
legislative body of any governmental unit authorized to maintain a
library shall have power to contract to receive library service from an
existing library, the board ((of trustees)) of which shall have
reciprocal power to contract to render the service with the consent of
the legislative body of its governmental unit. Such a contract shall
require that the existing library perform all the functions of a
library within the governmental unit wanting service. In like manner
a legislative body may contract for library service from a library not
owned by a public corporation but maintained for free public use:
PROVIDED, That such a library be subject to inspection by the state
librarian and be certified by ((him)) the state librarian as
maintaining a proper standard. Any school district may contract for
school library service from any existing library, such service to be
paid for from funds available to the school district for library
purposes.

Sec. 10 RCW 27.12.190 and 1982 c 123 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The management and control of a library shall be vested in a
library board of either five or seven ((trustees)) members as
hereinafter in this section provided. In cities and towns five
((trustees)) members shall be ((appointed by the mayor with the consent
of the legislative body)) elected by those persons who are eligible to
vote in the respective city or town elections. In counties, rural
county library districts, and island library districts, five
((trustees)) members shall be ((appointed by the board of county
commissioners)) elected by those persons who are eligible to vote in
the district. In a regional library district a board of either five or
seven ((trustees)) members shall be ((appointed by the joint action of
the legislative bodies concerned)) elected by those persons who are
eligible to vote in the district. In intercounty rural library
districts a board of either five or seven ((trustees)) members shall be
((appointed by the joint action of the boards of county commissioners
of each of the counties included in a)) elected by those persons who
are eligible to vote in the district. ((The first appointments for
boards comprised of but five trustees shall be for terms of one, two,
three, four, and five years respectively, and thereafter a trustee
shall be appointed annually to serve for five years. The first
appointments for boards comprised of seven trustees shall be for terms
of one, two, three, four, five, six, and seven years respectively, and
thereafter a trustee shall be appointed annually to serve for seven
years.)) The term of each trustee shall be four years and until his or
her successor is elected and qualified and assumes office in accordance
with RCW 29.04.170. Trustees shall be elected in odd-numbered years as
provided in RCW 29.13.020.
On a five-member board, the positions for the three members who
have the least number of years remaining in their respective terms as
of June 30, 2003, shall be open for election in 2003. The positions
for the remaining two members on the five-member board shall be open
for election in 2005. On a five-member board created after June 30,
2003, all members shall be elected at the same odd-numbered year
election, but the first terms of three of the members shall be only two
years.
On a seven-member board, the positions for the four members who
have the least number of years remaining in their respective terms as
of June 30, 2003, shall be open for election in 2003. The positions
for the remaining three members on the seven-member board shall be open
for election in 2005. On a seven-member board created after June 30,
2003, all members shall be elected at the same odd-numbered year
election, but the first terms of four of the members shall be only two
years.
No person shall be ((appointed)) elected to any library board ((of
trustees)) for more than two consecutive terms. Vacancies shall be
filled for unexpired terms as soon as possible in the manner ((in which
members of the board are regularly chosen)) provided in RCW 42.12.070.
A library ((trustee)) board member shall not receive a salary or
other compensation for services as ((trustee)) a board member, but
necessary expenses actually incurred shall be paid from the library
funds.
A library ((trustee in the case of a city or town may be removed
only by vote of the legislative body. A trustee of a county library,
a rural county library district library, or an island library district
library may be removed for just cause by the county commissioners after
a public hearing upon a written complaint stating the ground for
removal, which complaint, with a notice of the time and place of
hearing, shall have been served upon the trustee at least fifteen days
before the hearing. A trustee of an intercounty rural library district
may be removed by the joint action of the board of county commissioners
of the counties involved in the same manner as provided herein for the
removal of a trustee of a county library)) board member may be removed
only through the recall procedures provided in chapter 29.82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 27.12 RCW
to read as follows:
All elections held pursuant to RCW 27.12.190, whether general or
special, must be conducted by the county auditor of the county in which
the library is located. The expense of such an election must be paid
for out of the funds of the library.

Sec. 12 RCW 27.12.210 and 1982 c 123 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((trustees)) library board members, immediately after their
appointment or election, shall meet and organize by the election of
such officers as they deem necessary. They shall:
(1) Adopt such bylaws, rules, and regulations for their own
guidance and for the government of the library as they deem expedient;
(2) Have the supervision, care, and custody of all property of the
library, including the rooms or buildings constructed, leased, or set
apart therefor;
(3) Employ a librarian, and upon his or her recommendation employ
such other assistants as may be necessary, all in accordance with the
provisions of RCW ((27.08.010)) 27.04.055, prescribe their duties, fix
their compensation, and remove them for cause;
(4) Submit annually to the legislative body a budget containing
estimates in detail of the amount of money necessary for the library
for the ensuing year; except that in a library district the library
board ((of library trustees)) shall prepare its budget, certify the
same and deliver it to the board of county commissioners in ample time
for it to make the tax levies for the purpose of the district;
(5) Have exclusive control of the finances of the library;
(6) Accept such gifts of money or property for library purposes as
they deem expedient;
(7) Lease or purchase land for library buildings;
(8) Lease, purchase, or erect an appropriate building or buildings
for library purposes, and acquire such other property as may be needed
therefor;
(9) Purchase books, periodicals, maps, and supplies for the
library; and
(10) Do all other acts necessary for the orderly and efficient
management and control of the library.

Sec. 13 RCW 27.12.215 and 1979 ex.s. c 40 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((trustees)) members of a library board or a library district
have the authority to spend funds to recruit job candidates. The
((trustees)) members have the authority to reimburse job candidates for
reasonable and necessary travel expenses including transportation,
subsistence, and lodging.

Sec. 14 RCW 27.12.220 and 1982 c 123 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((trustees)) library board members of any rural county library
district, any island library district, or any intercounty rural library
district may include in the annual budget of such district an item for
the accumulation during such year of a specified sum of money to be
expended in a future year for the acquisition, enlargement, or
improvement of real or personal property for library purposes.

Sec. 15 RCW 27.12.240 and 1965 c 122 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
After a library shall have been established or library service
contracted for, the legislative body of the governmental unit for which
the library was established or the service engaged, shall appropriate
money annually for the support of the library. All funds for the
library, whether derived from taxation or otherwise, shall be in the
custody of the treasurer of the governmental unit, and shall be
designated by him or her in some manner for identification, and shall
not be used for any but library purposes. The library board ((of
trustees)) shall have the exclusive control of expenditures for library
purposes subject to any examination of accounts required by the state
and money shall be paid for library purposes only upon vouchers of the
board of trustees, without further audit. The board shall not make
expenditures or incur indebtedness in any year in excess of the amount
of money appropriated and/or available for library purposes.

Sec. 16 RCW 27.12.260 and 1935 c 119 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
At the close of each year the library board ((of trustees)) of
every library shall make a report to the legislative body of the
governmental unit wherein the board serves, showing the condition of
their trust during the year, the sums of money received for the library
fund from taxes and other sources, the sums of money expended and the
purposes of the expenditures, the number of books and periodicals on
hand, the number added during the year, the number retired, the number
loaned out, and such other statistics and information and such
suggestions as they deem of public interest. A copy of this report
shall be filed with the state librarian.

Sec. 17 RCW 27.12.270 and 1935 c 119 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every library established or maintained under this act shall be
free for the use of the inhabitants of the governmental unit in which
it is located, subject to such reasonable rules and regulations as the
((trustees)) board members find necessary to assure the greatest
benefit to the greatest number, except that the ((trustees)) board
members may charge a reasonable fee for the use of certain duplicate
copies of popular books.

Sec. 18 RCW 27.12.280 and 1935 c 119 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board ((of trustees)) of a library, under such rules and
regulations as it may deem necessary and upon such terms and conditions
as may be agreed upon, may allow nonresidents of the governmental unit
in which the library is situated to use the books thereof, and may make
exchanges of books with any other library, either permanently or
temporarily.

Sec. 19 RCW 27.12.285 and 1975 c 50 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that it is necessary to give the several
library boards ((of library trustees)) in this state additional powers
in order to effectuate the state's policy with regard to libraries as
set forth in RCW 27.12.020. On and after March 27, 1975, the library
board ((of library trustees)) in any county of this state, in addition
to any other powers and duties, is hereby authorized to provide library
services to Indian tribes recognized as such by the federal government
or to supplement any existing library services of such an Indian tribe.
The power granted by this section shall extend beyond the geographic
limits of the library district and the county or counties in which the
district is located.

Sec. 20 RCW 27.12.290 and 1935 c 119 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
A library board ((of library trustees)) may exclude from the use of
the library under its charge any person who willfully and persistently
violates any rule or regulation prescribed for the use of the library
or its facilities or any person whose physical condition is deemed
dangerous or offensive to other library users.

Sec. 21 RCW 27.12.300 and 1935 c 119 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The title to money or property given to or for the use or benefit
of a library shall vest in the library board ((of trustees)), to be
held and used according to the terms of the gift.

Sec. 22 RCW 27.12.305 and 1972 ex.s. c 90 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any public library, including the state library created pursuant to
chapter 27.04 RCW, shall have the authority to provide for the sale of
library materials developed by the library staff for its use but which
are of value to others such as book catalogs, books published by the
library, indexes, films, slides, book lists, and similar materials.
The library commission, library board ((of library trustees)), or
other governing authority charged with the direct control of a public
library shall determine the prices and quantities of materials to be
prepared and offered for sale. Prices shall be limited to the
publishing and preparation costs, exclusive of staff salaries and
overhead. Any moneys received from the sales of such materials shall
be placed in the appropriate library fund.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize any library
to charge any resident for a library service nor to authorize any
library to sell materials to a branch library or library which is part
of a depository library system when such materials may be distributed
free of cost to such library nor shall this section be construed to
prevent, curtail, or inhibit any free distribution programs or exchange
programs between libraries or between libraries and other agencies.

Sec. 23 RCW 27.12.320 and 1982 c 123 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
A library established or maintained under this chapter (except a
regional or a rural county library district library, an intercounty
rural library district library, or an island library district library)
may be abolished only in pursuance of a vote of the electors of the
governmental unit in which the library is located, taken in the manner
prescribed in RCW 27.12.030 for a vote upon the establishment of a
library. If a library of a city or town be abolished, the books and
other printed or written matter belonging to it shall go to the library
of the county whereof the municipality is a part, if there be a county
library, but if not, then to the state library. If a library of a
county or region be abolished, the books and other printed matter
belonging to it shall go to the state library. All other library
property shall be disposed of as the legislative body of the
governmental unit shall direct.
After a rural county library district, an island library district,
or an intercounty rural library district has been in operation for
three or more years, it may be dissolved pursuant to a majority vote of
all of the qualified electors residing outside of incorporated cities
and towns voting upon a proposition for its dissolution, at a general
election, which proposition may be placed upon the ballot at any such
election whenever a petition by ten percent or more qualified voters
residing outside of incorporated cities or towns within a rural county
library district, an island library district, or an intercounty rural
library district requesting such dissolution shall be filed with the
library board ((of trustees)) of such district not less than ninety
days prior to the holding of any such election. An island library
district may also be dissolved pursuant to RCW 27.12.450.
If a rural county library district is dissolved, the books and
other printed matter belonging to it shall go to the state library.
All other library property shall be disposed of as the legislative body
of the governmental unit shall direct. When an intercounty rural
library district is dissolved, the books, funds, and other property
thereof shall be divided among the participating counties in the most
equitable manner possible as determined by the state librarian, who
shall give consideration to such items as the original source of
property, the amount of funds raised from each county by the district,
and the ability of the counties to make further use of such property or
equipment for library purposes. Printed material which the state
librarian finds will not be used by any of the participating counties
for further library purposes shall be turned over to the state library.
When an island library district is dissolved pursuant to this
section, the books and other printed matter belonging to it shall go to
the state library. All other library property shall be disposed of as
the legislative body of the governmental unit shall direct. When an
island library district is dissolved due to the establishment of a
county library district, pursuant to RCW 27.12.450, all property,
assets, and liabilities of the preexisting island library district
within the area included in the county rural library district shall
pass to and be assumed by the county rural library district: PROVIDED,
That where within any county rural library district heretofore or
hereafter organized under the provisions of this chapter a preexisting
island library district has incurred a bonded indebtedness which was
outstanding at the time of the formation of the county rural library
district, the preexisting island library district shall retain its
corporate existence insofar as is necessary for the purpose until the
bonded indebtedness outstanding against it on and after the effective
date of the formation has been paid in full: PROVIDED FURTHER, That a
special election may be called by the library board ((of trustees)) of
the county rural library district, to be held at the next general or
special election held in the respective counties, for the purpose of
affording the voters residing within the area outside of the
preexisting island library district an opportunity to assume the
obligation of the bonded indebtedness of the preexisting island library
district or the question may be submitted to the voters as a separate
proposition at the election on the proposal for the formation of the
county rural library district.

Sec. 24 RCW 27.12.355 and 1987 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, a rural county library district,
island library district, or intercounty rural library district may
withdraw areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the library
district that previously had been withdrawn from the library district
under this section.
(2) The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the library board ((of trustees))
requesting the withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the
board, inclusion of this area within the library district will result
in a reduction of the district's tax levy rate under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or town
council approving the withdrawal, if the area is located within the
city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county legislative
authority of the county within which the area is located approving the
withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a city or town. A
withdrawal shall be effective at the end of the day on the thirty-first
day of December in the year in which the resolutions are adopted, but
for purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the
boundaries shall be established immediately upon the adoption of the
second resolution.
The authority of an area to be withdrawn from a library district as
provided under this section is in addition, and not subject, to the
provisions of RCW 27.12.380.
The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a library district
shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for the purpose of
paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the library district
existing at the time of the withdrawal.
(3) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a
library district under this section may be reannexed into the library
district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the library board ((of
trustees)) proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of a resolution
by the city or town council approving the reannexation, if the area is
located within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the
county legislative authority of the county within which the area is
located approving the reannexation, if the area is located outside of
a city or town. The reannexation shall be effective at the end of the
day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the
adoption of the second resolution occurs, but for purposes of
establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall
be established immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution.
Referendum action on the proposed reannexation may be taken by the
voters of the area proposed to be reannexed if a petition calling for
a referendum is filed with the city or town council, or county
legislative authority, within a thirty-day period after the adoption of
the second resolution, which petition has been signed by registered
voters of the area proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten
percent of the total number of the registered voters residing in that
area.
If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered
voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held
in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the reannexation
shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next special
election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs forty-five or more
days after the petitions have been validated. Approval of the ballot
proposition authorizing the reannexation by a simple majority vote
shall authorize the reannexation.

Sec. 25 RCW 27.12.360 and 1982 c 123 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any city or town with a population of one hundred thousand or less
at the time of annexation may become a part of any rural county library
district, island library district, or intercounty rural library
district lying contiguous thereto by annexation in the following
manner: The inclusion of such a city or town may be initiated by the
adoption of an ordinance by the legislative authority thereof stating
its intent to join the library district and finding that the public
interest will be served thereby. Before adoption, the ordinance shall
be submitted to the library board of the city or town for its review
and recommendations. If no library board exists in the city or town,
the state librarian shall be notified of the proposed ordinance. If
the library board ((of trustees)) of the library district concurs in
the annexation, notification thereof shall be transmitted to the
legislative authority or authorities of the counties in which the city
or town is situated.

Sec. 26 RCW 27.12.395 and 1985 c 392 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All liabilities of a city or town that is annexed to a rural
county library district or intercounty rural library district, which
liabilities were incurred for the purpose of or in the course of
acquiring, operating, or maintaining a library or libraries, may, if
provided for in the ordinance providing for annexation and in the
resolution of the district consenting to annexation, pass to and be
assumed by the rural county library district or intercounty rural
library district. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the city or town
has incurred any voted bonded indebtedness for the purpose of
acquiring, operating, or maintaining a library or libraries, and if the
indebtedness is outstanding at the time of the annexation, the voted
bonded indebtedness shall not be assumed by the annexing district.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, if the annexed
city or town has outstanding at the time of the annexation any voted
bonded indebtedness incurred for the purpose of acquiring, operating,
or maintaining a library or libraries, a special election may be called
by the library board ((of trustees)) of the rural county library
district or intercounty rural library district, to be held at the next
general or special election held in the applicable county or counties,
for the purpose of affording the voters residing within the area of the
district outside the annexed city or town an opportunity to assume the
voted bonded indebtedness of the annexed city or town upon the assent
of three-fifths of the voters.

Sec. 27 RCW 27.12.420 and 1982 c 123 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Immediately)) At the next general election following the
establishment of an island library district, the ((board of county
commissioners)) voters of the library district shall ((appoint a board
of library trustees)) elect members of a library board for the district
in accordance with RCW 27.12.190. The library board ((of trustees))
shall appoint a librarian for the district.
Funds for the establishment and maintenance of the library service
of the district shall be provided by the board of county commissioners
by means of an annual tax levy on the property in the district of not
more than fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value per year.
The tax levy shall be based on a budget to be compiled by the library
board ((of trustees)) of the island library district who shall
determine the tax rate necessary and certify their determination to the
board of county commissioners.
Excess levies authorized pursuant to RCW 27.12.222, 84.52.052, or
84.52.056 shall be at a rate determined by the library board ((of
trustees)) of the island library district and certified to the board of
county commissioners.

Sec. 28 RCW 27.12.430 and 1982 c 123 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The library board ((of trustees)) of an island library district may
adopt a name by which the district shall be known and under which it
shall transact all of its business.

Sec. 29 RCW 27.12.440 and 1982 c 123 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise specifically provided, island library districts
and the ((trustees)) library board members thereof shall have the same
powers and limitations as are prescribed by RCW 27.12.060 through
27.12.070 for rural county library districts and shall follow the same
procedures and be subject to the same limitations as are provided
therein with respect to the contracting of indebtedness.

Sec. 30 RCW 27.12.470 and 1999 c 153 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
A rural partial-county library district may be created in a portion
of the unincorporated area of a county as provided in this section if
a rural county library district, intercounty rural library district, or
island library district has not been created in the county.
The procedure to create a rural partial-county library district is
initiated by the filing of petitions with the county auditor proposing
the creation of the district that have been signed by at least ten
percent of the registered voters residing in the area proposed to be
included in the rural partial-county library district. The county
auditor shall review the petitions and certify the sufficiency or
insufficiency of the signatures to the county legislative authority.
If the petitions are certified as having sufficient valid
signatures, the county legislative authority shall hold a public
hearing on the proposed rural partial-county library district, may
adjust the boundaries of the proposed district, and may cause a ballot
proposition to be submitted to the voters of the proposed rural
partial-county library district authorizing its creation if the county
legislative authority finds that the creation of the rural partial-county library district is in the public interest. A subsequent public
hearing shall be held if additional territory is added to the proposed
rural partial-county library district by action of the county
legislative authority.
The rural partial-county library district shall be created if the
ballot proposition authorizing the creation of the district is approved
by a simple majority vote of the voters voting on the proposition.
((Immediately after)) At the next general election following creation
of the rural partial-county library district, the ((county legislative
authority shall appoint a)) voters of the library district shall elect
members of a library board ((of library trustees)) for the district as
provided under RCW 27.12.190.
Except as provided in this section, a rural partial-county library
district is subject to all the provisions of law applicable to a rural
county library district and shall have all the powers, duties, and
authorities of a rural county library district, including, but not
limited to, the authority to impose property taxes, incur debt, and
annex a city or town with a population of less than one hundred
thousand at the time of the annexation that is located in the same
county as the rural partial-county library district.
Adjacent unincorporated territory in the county may be annexed to
a rural partial-county library district in the same manner as territory
is annexed to a water-sewer district, except that an annexation is not
subject to potential review by a boundary review board.
If, at the time of creation, a rural partial-county library
district has an assessed valuation of less than fifty million dollars,
it may provide library services only by contracting for the services
through an interlocal agreement with an adjacent library district, or
an adjacent city or town that maintains its own library. If the
assessed valuation of the rural partial-county library district
subsequently reaches fifty million dollars as a result of annexation or
appreciation, the fifty million dollar limitation shall not apply.
If a ballot proposition is approved creating a rural county library
district in the county, every rural partial-county library district in
that county shall be dissolved and its assets and liabilities
transferred to the rural county library district. Where a rural
partial-county library district has annexed a city or town, the voters
of the city or town shall be allowed to vote on the proposed creation
of a rural county library district and, if created, the rural county
library district shall include each city and town that was annexed to
the rural partial-county library district.
Nothing in this section authorizes the consolidation of a rural
partial-county library district with any rural county library district;
island library district; city, county, or regional library; intercounty
library district; or other rural partial-county library district,
unless, in addition to any other requirements imposed by statute, the
boards of all library districts involved approve the consolidation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---