BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
A political subdivision may choose to comply with a requirement of
any nature imposed by the state, or any instrumentality of the state,
if the total state moneys provided to the political subdivision that
may be expended or are required to be expended by the political
subdivision to meet the requirement are not sufficient to pay for all
the costs of meeting the requirement. If these state moneys are not
sufficient, the requirement shall lose its mandatory nature and shall
become a recommendation or option for the political subdivision and a
penalty may not be imposed on the political subdivision for failing to
comply with the requirement.
For the purposes of this section, "political subdivision" includes
any political subdivision, local government, or taxing district created
under state law.

--- END ---