BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School district boards of directors shall not censor any
documents, writings, speeches, or records specified in subsection (2)
of this section relating to the founding of the United States or the
state of Washington because of religious references in these documents,
writings, speeches, or records. School district boards of directors
shall allow any teacher or administrator in any public school to read
or post in a public school building or classroom, or at a public school
event, any excerpts or portions of documents, writings, speeches, or
records specified in subsection (2) of this section relating to the
founding of the United States and the state of Washington.
(2) Documents, writings, speeches, or records relating to the
founding of the United States or the state of Washington means: The
Washington Enabling Act; the Washington Constitution; Washington
Supreme Court decisions; the Mayflower Compact; the Declaration of
Independence; the Articles of Confederation; the United States
Constitution; the Federalist Papers; United States Supreme Court
decisions; and the documents, writings, and speeches of the founding
fathers of the United States.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "founding fathers" means the
signators to the Declaration of Independence, the authorized delegates
to the Constitutional Convention, the members of the first United
States Congress, the members of the first Supreme Court, and the first
President of the United States.

--- END ---