BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 63.29 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature intends to encourage private sector involvement in
locating persons with an ownership interest in property paid or
delivered to the department under this chapter. The department is
authorized to make data available for this purpose consistent with the
requirements of the public disclosure act, chapter 42.17 RCW, and RCW
63.29.380.

Sec. 2 RCW 63.29.350 and 1983 c 179 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to seek or receive from any
person or contract with any person for any fee or compensation for
locating or purporting to locate any property which he or she knows has
been reported or paid or delivered to the department of revenue
pursuant to this chapter in excess of:
(a) Five percent of the property's value ((thereof)) returned to
such owner during the twenty-four month period beginning when the
property is paid or delivered to the department; or
(b) Twenty percent of the property's value returned to such owner
for the period beginning twenty-four months after the property is paid
or delivered to the department.
(2) Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor
and shall be fined not less than the amount of the fee or charge he or
she has sought or received or contracted for, and not more than ten
times such amount, or imprisoned for not more than thirty days, or
both.

Sec. 3 RCW 63.29.180 and 1993 c 498 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall cause a notice to be published not later
than ((September)) November 1, immediately following the report
required by RCW 63.29.170 ((at least once a week for two consecutive
weeks)) in a newspaper of general circulation in the county of this
state in which is located the last known address of any person to be
named in the notice. If no address is listed or the address is outside
this state, the notice must be published in the county in which the
holder of the property has its principal place of business within this
state.
(2) The published notice must be entitled "Notice of Names of
Persons Appearing to be Owners of Abandoned Property" and contain:
(a) The names in alphabetical order and last known address, if any,
of persons listed in the report and entitled to notice within the
county as specified in subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) A statement that information concerning the property and the
name and last known address of the holder may be obtained by any person
possessing an interest in the property by addressing an inquiry to the
department.
(3) The department is not required to disclose specific fund
amounts in the notice, except disclosure as to whether an unclaimed
fund amount is above five thousand dollars, and if below five thousand
dollars, if it is above seventy-five dollars. The department is not
required to publish in the notice any items of less than seventy-five
dollars unless the department considers their publication to be in the
public interest.
(4) Not later than September 1, immediately following the report
required by RCW 63.29.170, the department shall mail a notice to each
person whose last known address is listed in the report and who appears
to be entitled to property of the value of seventy-five dollars or more
presumed abandoned under this chapter and any beneficiary of a life or
endowment insurance policy or annuity contract for whom the department
has a last known address.
(5) The mailed notice must contain:
(a) A statement that, according to a report filed with the
department, property is being held to which the addressee appears
entitled; and
(b) The name and last known address of the person holding the
property and any necessary information regarding the changes of name
and last known address of the holder.
(6) This section is not applicable to sums payable on travelers
checks, money orders, and other written instruments presumed abandoned
under RCW 63.29.040.

--- END ---