BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that sport shooting
ranges in this state offer valuable hunter and firearm safety training,
legitimate and important forms of recreation to the general public, and
provide the opportunity for many law enforcement agencies to maintain
necessary firearms skills efficiently and at little or no cost. The
continued existence and viability of sport shooting ranges is impacted
by burdensome retroactive regulation and lawsuits, thereby potentially
threatening the availability of low-cost firearms training to some
local law enforcement agencies, as well as hunter and firearms safety
training and recreation to the general public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who
operates or uses a sport shooting range in this state is not subject to
civil liability or criminal prosecution in a matter relating to noise
or noise pollution resulting from the operation or use of the range if
the range is in compliance with any noise control laws or ordinances
that applied to the range and its operation at the time of construction
or initial operation of the range.
(b) A person who operates or uses a sport shooting range is not
subject to an action for nuisance, and a court of the state shall not
enjoin the use or operation of a range on the basis of noise or noise
pollution, if the range is in compliance with any noise control laws or
ordinances that applied to the range and its operation at the time of
construction or initial operation of the range.
(c) Rules adopted by any state department or agency for limiting
levels of noise in terms of decibel level that may occur in the outdoor
atmosphere do not apply to a sport shooting range exempted from
liability under this section.
(2) A person who acquires title to or who owns real property
adversely affected by the use of property with a permanently located
and improved sport shooting range shall not maintain a nuisance action
against the person who owns the range to restrain, enjoin, or impede
the use of the range where there has not been a substantial change in
the nature of the use of the range. This action does not prohibit
actions for negligence or recklessness in the operation of the range or
by a person using the range.
(3) A sport shooting range that is operated and is not in violation
of existing law at the time of the enactment of an ordinance must be
permitted to continue in operation even if the operation of the sport
shooting range at a later date does not conform to the new ordinance or
an amendment to an existing ordinance.
(4) Instructors of firearms safety, education, and familiarization
classes authorized by and conducted at a sport shooting range are not
subject to civil liability relating to or arising from accidents
occurring during such a class, except for accidents arising from the
instructor's gross negligence or willful misconduct.
(5) A person who participates in sport shooting at a sport shooting
range accepts the risks associated with the sport to the extent the
risks are obvious and inherent. Those risks include, but are not
limited to, injuries that may result from noise, discharge of a
projectile or shot, malfunction of sport shooting equipment not owned
by the shooting range, natural variations in terrain, surface or
subsurface snow or ice conditions, bare spots, rocks, trees, and other
forms of natural growth or debris.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this section, this section does
not prohibit a local government from regulating the location and
construction of a sport shooting range after the effective date of this
act.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) "Local government" means a county, city, or town.
(b) "Person" means an individual, proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, club, or other legal entity.
(c) "Sport shooting range" or "range" means an area designed and
operated for the use of rifles, shotguns, pistols, silhouettes, skeet,
trap, black powder, or any other similar sport shooting.

--- END ---