BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(a) Air pollution in this state is an ongoing problem that impacts
the health and safety of its residents.
(b) Ocean marine terminals often become congested with long lines
forcing trucks to idle for extended periods of time.
(c) Idling trucks emit air contaminants, including oxides of
nitrogen, carbon dioxide, and particulate matter.
(d) Many marine terminals and ports in this state are close in
proximity to residential areas and businesses frequented by the public.
(e) Owners and operators of ocean marine terminals and ports
generally do not directly own or control trucks that move containers
and other cargo to and from or transact business at the terminals.
However, due to the manner in which some terminals are operated,
including but not limited to, setting short gate hours and maintaining
systems that do not disperse truck transactions throughout the day, and
because trucks must operate within the systems established by the
owners and operators of ocean marine terminals, trucks are forced to
idle for extended periods of time and create severe congestion on
public roadways in communities at and near ocean marine terminals and
ports.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to prohibit extended idling
by trucks at ocean marine terminals and ports in order to protect the
health and safety of all Washington citizens.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature, in enacting this chapter,
to reduce only emissions of particulate matter that are caused by
trucks idling at ocean marine terminals in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Each ocean marine terminal must operate
in a manner that does not cause the engines of diesel trucks to idle or
queue for more than thirty minutes while waiting to enter an ocean
marine terminal. Accordingly, an ocean marine terminal will receive a
citation and fine of two hundred fifty dollars for every truck that
idles for more than thirty minutes while waiting to enter the ocean
marine terminal.
(2) In addition, an ocean marine terminal that takes action
intended to avoid or circumvent the requirements of this chapter or to
avoid or circumvent the reduction of emissions of particulate matter
from idling or queuing trucks is subject to a fine of seven hundred
fifty dollars per truck per violation.
(3) Actions intended to avoid or circumvent the requirements of
this chapter, include, but are not limited to:
(a) Diverting an idling truck to area highways or alternate staging
areas;
(b) Requiring a truck to idle or queue inside the gate of a marine
terminal; and
(c) Requiring or directing a truck driver to turn on and off an
engine while queuing.
(4) An action taken by an ocean marine terminal to assess or seek
reimbursement from the driver or owner of a truck for a violation of
this section is a misdemeanor.
(5) An ocean marine terminal does not violate this chapter by
causing a truck to idle for more than thirty minutes while waiting to
enter the gate into a marine terminal, if the delay is caused by:
(a) Acts of God;
(b) Labor disputes;
(c) Declared state and federal emergencies; or
(d) If the department of ecology or the state patrol finds that an
unavoidable or unforeseeable event caused trucks to idle and that the
terminal is otherwise in good faith compliance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Section 2(1) of this act does not apply
to ocean marine terminals that provide two continuous hours of
uninterrupted, fully staffed receiving and delivery gates two hours
before and after peak commuter hours each day, at least five days per
week.
(a) "Peak commuter hours" are those hours determined by the
department of ecology, in consultation with the owners and operators of
the marine terminals and any labor union that is represented at those
marine terminals.
(b) The department of ecology shall notify marine terminals of the
final determination of the "peak commuter hours."
(2) Section 2(1) of this act does not apply to ocean marine
terminals that operate fully staffed receiving and delivery gates for
seventy or more hours, five days per week.
(3) To qualify under this section, ocean marine terminals must
notify the department of ecology of the date of implementation of
subsection (2) of this section. The ocean marine terminal is subject
to this chapter until the date of implementation of subsection (2) of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department of ecology shall monitor
ocean marine terminals to ensure compliance with this chapter. The
state patrol district with geographical jurisdiction over that ocean
marine terminal is charged with enforcement of this chapter's
requirements.
(2) The department of ecology shall issue citations to the ocean
marine terminal for violations of section 2 of this act. Citations
must include the following information:
(a) Truck license plate number;
(b) Name of the marine terminal and port at which the violation
occurred; and
(c) Date and time of the violation.
(3) Failure to pay a fine under section 2 of this act, or receipt
of three or more such fines during a three-month period, is a
misdemeanor and will result in a suspension of the ocean marine
terminal's motor carrier property permit. The department of ecology
also shall forward a recommendation to the Federal Motor Carrier Safety
Administration for administrative or other action deemed necessary
against the carrier's interstate operating authority.
(4) The department of ecology shall determine the necessary level
of monitoring and enforcement commensurate with the level of the truck
idling problem at each marine terminal, and adopt such rules as are
necessary to effectuate the purpose of reducing emissions of
particulate matter from idling or queuing trucks intended by this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Nothing in this chapter relieves a
commercial driver or commercial motor carrier of any duty imposed by
state or federal law related to the safe operation of a commercial
motor vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---