BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(1) Under chapter 46.44 RCW, vehicles must meet certain gross
vehicle weight restrictions to travel on state roadways. In addition,
most states regulate the allowable gross weight on a single axle or set
of axles. In this state, the maximum allowable gross weight on a
single axle is 20,000 pounds and on a set of tandem axles is 40,000
pounds. Often, however, these axle weight limits are violated because
containers are loaded with cargo well beyond any vehicle's axle or
overall weight-bearing capacity.
(2) Transporting overweight containers on public roadways presents
significant dangers to the driver and the public. Due to the weight,
balance, and force of the load, a driver transporting an overweight or
improperly loaded container requires increased braking distance to
reach a complete stop. Moreover, a higher center of gravity coupled
with an overweight or unbalanced load increases the risk of chassis
separation and flipped rigs when a driver makes a turn.
(3) The Washington state patrol should pursue more strict
enforcement of existing state and federal laws regarding improperly
packed and unsafely loaded intermodal containers, and maximum vehicle
weight restrictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) An ocean marine terminal that receives
and dispatches intermodal containers shall implement and carry out the
intermodal container safety program, as described in this chapter.
(2) No ocean marine terminal operator may tender to, or interchange
with, a motor carrier, an intermodal container that when loaded upon a
vehicle or chassis causes the motor carrier's vehicle or chassis to
exceed this state's axle weight restrictions or the federal gross
vehicle weight restrictions. An ocean marine terminal operator
tendering to a motor carrier such a container will be fined five
hundred dollars per occurrence.
(3) No ocean marine terminal operator may tender to, or interchange
with, a motor carrier, an intermodal container that, upon inspection,
is determined to be improperly packed or unsafely loaded. An ocean
marine terminal operator tendering to a motor carrier such a container
will be fined five hundred dollars per occurrence.
(4) Nothing in this chapter is meant to supersede the federal
weight restrictions provided in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 5903. Rather, this
chapter imposes compliance with both this state's axle weight
restrictions and the federal gross vehicle weight restrictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Ocean marine terminal operators shall
weigh and inspect all containers upon the container's arrival at the
terminal. Containers that weigh less than or equal to an amount that
when loaded upon a chassis or vehicle, does not cause the chassis or
vehicle to exceed this state's axle weight restrictions, and are
determined upon inspection to be safely loaded and properly packed,
will be green-tagged and placed in an area designated for interchange
to a motor carrier. The tag will contain:
(a) The name of the person who weighed and inspected the container;
(b) The date and time that the container was weighed and inspected;
(c) The weight of the container and determination of inspection;
and
(d) Since a chassis or vehicle's weight-bearing capacity varies
depending upon the number of axles that a chassis or vehicle has, each
green tag must designate the appropriate chassis or vehicle with the
necessary number of axles, that may transport that container.
(2) The tag must be provided by the ocean marine terminal operator
and must meet specifications determined by the state patrol.
(3) If, however, a container weighs more than an amount that when
loaded upon a chassis or vehicle shall cause the chassis or vehicle to
exceed this state's axle weight restrictions, or is determined upon
inspection to be improperly packed or unsafely loaded, it must be red-tagged and transported to a facility located at the ocean marine
terminal to be unloaded and repacked until the container can be safely
operated on the public highways and falls within a weight that when
loaded upon a chassis or vehicle, the chassis or vehicle's weight is
within this state's axle weight restrictions. Alternatively, the ocean
marine terminal operator shall return the overweight container to its
original sender.
(a) The ocean marine terminal shall bear the costs of transporting
the container to the facility, and unloading and repacking the
container.
(b) To ensure both compliance and reimbursement, a container may be
embargoed until payment is received.
(4) Once a container has been unloaded and repacked, it will be
green-tagged and transported to an area designated for interchange to
a motor carrier.
(5) If an overweight, improperly packed, or unsafely loaded
container, regardless of whether it has been green- or red-tagged is
interchanged to a motor carrier, and the motor carrier has not yet left
the terminal:
(a) The driver may request that the container be reweighed or
repacked by the entity responsible for weighing and inspecting the
container under this chapter;
(b) The driver must be compensated by the ocean marine terminal at
one hundred dollars per hour for time spent transporting the container
to the unloading or repacking facility, and for locating a container
that when loaded upon the chassis or vehicle does not cause the chassis
or vehicle to exceed this state's axle weight restrictions or highway
safety rules; and
(c) Any such request, any corrective action taken, and the reason
why corrective action was not taken must be recorded in the intermodal
container maintenance file under section 4 of this act. Alternatively,
the driver may contact a law enforcement agency with regard to the
weight of the container.
(6) No driver may be threatened, coerced, or otherwise retaliated
against by an ocean marine terminal operator for requesting that a
container be reweighed or repacked or for contacting a law enforcement
agency with regard to the weight or safety of an intermodal container.
If a driver is so threatened, the driver must be protected by and
afforded all rights and remedies provided in the state whistleblower
statute, chapter 42.40 RCW. Accordingly, any person who violates this
section is subject to the penalties provided in chapter 42.40 RCW.
(7) If an overweight, improperly packed, or unsafely loaded
container is interchanged to a motor carrier, and the motor carrier has
left the terminal, the ocean marine terminal operator is responsible
for any time during which the motor carrier is detained by state
officials for violations of this chapter. The ocean marine terminal
shall pay the driver at the rate specified in the contract plus one
hundred dollars per hour for all time spent related to the infraction.
(8) A citation, summons, or complaint issued as a result of a
violation of a state axle weight violation must be issued to the ocean
marine terminal operator responsible for weighing and inspecting the
container.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Records regarding the weight and
inspection of each container entering an ocean marine terminal must be:
(a) Maintained for ninety days at the ocean marine terminal where
each container is weighed and inspected;
(b) Made available upon request by any authorized employee of the
utilities and transportation commission or the state patrol; and
(c) Made available during normal business hours to any motor
carrier or driver or the authorized representative thereof who has been
engaged to transport a container from the ocean marine terminal.
(2) Records must be kept for any container that must be unloaded
and repacked under the requirements of section 3 of this act. The
records must be:
(a) Maintained for two years at the ocean marine terminal;
(b) Made available upon request by any authorized employee of the
utilities and transportation commission or the state patrol; and
(c) Made available during normal business hours to any motor
carrier or driver or the authorized representative thereof who has been
engaged to transport a container from the ocean marine terminal.
(3) Requests made under section 3(5)(a) of this act that a
container be reweighed or repacked must be recorded in the intermodal
container safety file and maintained and made available under
subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section.
(4) All records described in this section may be kept in a computer
system if printouts of those records are provided upon request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The commercial vehicle division of the
state patrol shall conduct random, but at least annual, on-site reviews
of ocean marine terminals to determine whether the terminal is
complying with the requirements of this chapter, including but not
limited to weighing and inspecting intermodal containers; their
tagging, quarantine, and repacking; and recordkeeping requirements.
After an inspection in which the commercial vehicle division determines
that an ocean marine terminal operator has failed to comply with any of
the requirements of this chapter, the chief of the state patrol shall:
(a) Require the ocean marine terminal to comply immediately with
this chapter;
(b) Fine the ocean marine terminal operator one hundred dollars for
every day, after the day of inspection, that the terminal fails to
comply with this chapter; and
(c) After ten days of noncompliance, immediately forward a
recommendation to the utilities and transportation commission to
suspend the terminal's motor carrier property permit, and forward a
recommendation to the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration for
administrative or other action deemed necessary against the ocean
marine terminal's interstate operating authority.
(2) After twenty days of noncompliance, the utilities and
transportation commission shall revoke the ocean marine terminal's
property permit.
(3) If an inspection results in an unsatisfactory rating due to
conditions presenting an imminent danger to the public safety, the
utilities and transportation commission shall take actions under
subsections (1)(c) and (2) of this section.
(4) In addition, any state patrol officer, while in the performance
of the duties of office, may enter at any time an ocean marine terminal
to weigh and inspect any intermodal containers that have been green-tagged. If any green-tagged container that when loaded upon a vehicle
or chassis with the appropriate number of axles as specified on the
green tag causes the motor carrier's vehicle or chassis to exceed this
state's axle weight restrictions or the federal gross vehicle weight
restrictions, or is determined to be improperly packed or unsafely
loaded, the ocean marine terminal operator is subject to a fine of one
thousand dollars per overweight or unsafe container as well as any of
the penalties set forth in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The utilities and transportation commission
and the state patrol shall adopt rules necessary to effectuate the
purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Nothing in this chapter relieves a
commercial driver or commercial motor carrier of any duty imposed by
state or federal law related to the safe operation of a commercial
motor vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 81 RCW.

--- END ---