BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 As used in this chapter, the following
definitions apply:
(1) "Ocean marine terminal" means a terminal, whether public or
private, located at a port facility that engages in the loading and
unloading of the cargo of oceangoing vessels.
(2) "Intermodal chassis" or "chassis" means a trailer designed to
carry intermodal freight containers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) An ocean marine terminal that receives
and dispatches intermodal chassis shall implement and carry out the
intermodal chassis roadability inspection program, as described in this
chapter, in lieu of any inspection required by chapter 46.32 RCW for
motor carriers and vehicles.
(2) No ocean marine terminal operator may tender to, or interchange
with, a motor carrier, an intermodal chassis that fails to pass the
inspection required by this chapter and that fails to meet the
requirements set forth in federal motor carrier safety regulations of
49 C.F.R. Sec. 396. An ocean marine terminal operator tendering to, or
interchanging with, a motor carrier such equipment shall provide
certification that the chassis has passed the inspection set forth in
this chapter. An ocean marine terminal operator who violates this
section will be fined five hundred dollars per occurrence.
(3) Nothing in this chapter is meant to supersede the inspection
requirement and standard under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 396 that requires ocean
marine terminal operators to conduct annual inspections of chassis.
Rather, this chapter imposes an additional requirement that ocean
marine terminal operators inspect chassis on a routine basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Ocean marine terminal operators shall
inspect all chassis in accordance with this section before a container
is placed on the chassis, and before the chassis is released for
operation. The inspection must include, but not be limited to, brake
adjustment, an inspection of brake system components and leaks,
suspension systems, tires and wheels, vehicle connecting devices,
lights and electrical systems, and a visual inspection of the chassis
to determine that it has not been tampered with.
(2) Each inspection must be recorded on a daily roadability
inspection report that includes, but is not limited to, all of the
following:
(a) Positive identification of the intermodal chassis, including
company identification number and vehicle license plate number;
(b) Date and nature of each inspection;
(c) Signature, under penalty of perjury, of the ocean marine
terminal operator or an authorized representative that the inspection
has been performed and that the chassis is roadworthy. Individuals
performing inspections under this section must be qualified, at a
minimum, as set forth in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 396.19. Evidence of each
inspector's qualification must be retained by the ocean marine terminal
for sixty days after the inspection. No inspector may be threatened,
coerced, or otherwise retaliated against by an ocean marine terminal
operator for refusing to pass a chassis that fails an inspection, or
for designating a chassis for repair. If an inspector is so
threatened, the inspector must be protected by and afforded all rights
and remedies provided in the state whistleblower statute, chapter 42.40
RCW. Accordingly, a person who violates this section is subject to the
penalties provided in chapter 42.40 RCW;
(d) As part of the inspection, the inspector shall affix a tamper-proof green tag on a chassis that has passed inspection and a red tag
on a chassis that has failed inspection. The tag must contain the name
of the inspector and the date and time the inspection was completed and
be placed on the driver's side of the chassis next to the chassis'
identification plate. In addition, a red tag must specify the defects
that warranted the failed inspection and that require repair. The tag
must be provided by the ocean marine terminal operator and meet
specifications determined by the state patrol.
(3) Chassis must be segregated according to the tagged designation.
Green-tagged chassis must be kept in an area designated for interchange
with motor carriers. Red-tagged chassis must be transported to an on-site facility where repairs and any required maintenance may be
performed. Defects identified during an inspection of an intermodal
chassis must be repaired, and the repairs recorded on an intermodal
chassis maintenance file as described in section 4 of this act, before
the chassis is released from the control of the ocean marine terminal.
No chassis subject to this chapter may be released to a motor carrier
or operated on a public road until all defects listed during the
inspection have been corrected, the chassis passes inspection, and the
ocean marine terminal operator's authorized representative attests to
that fact and affixes a green tag on the chassis.
(4) A driver who believes that a chassis is in an unsafe operating
condition may request that the chassis be reinspected by the entity
responsible for the inspection and maintenance of the chassis under
this chapter. If such a request is made, the driver:
(a) May not be made responsible for delivery of the chassis to the
repair facility; and
(b) Must receive a green-tagged chassis without delay. If a driver
is forced to wait for one or more hours, the ocean marine terminal
operator shall compensate the driver at a rate of one hundred dollars
per hour. Such a request, any corrective action taken, or the reason
why corrective action was not taken must be recorded in the intermodal
chassis maintenance file described in section 4 of this act.
Alternatively, the driver may contact a law enforcement agency with
regard to the physical condition of the chassis.
(5) No driver may be threatened, coerced, or otherwise retaliated
against by an ocean marine terminal operator for requesting that the
intermodal chassis be reinspected or repaired or for contacting a law
enforcement agency with regard to the physical condition of a chassis.
If a commercial driver is so threatened, coerced, or retaliated
against, the driver must be protected by and afforded all rights and
remedies provided in chapter 42.40 RCW. Accordingly, a person who
violates this section is subject to the penalties provided in chapter
42.40 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Records of each inspection conducted
under this chapter must be:
(a) Maintained for ninety days at the ocean marine terminal where
each chassis is inspected;
(b) Made available upon request by any authorized employee of the
utilities and transportation commission or the state patrol; and
(c) Made available during normal business hours to any motor
carrier or driver or the authorized representative thereof who has been
engaged to transport an intermodal container on a chassis inspected
under section 3 of this act from the ocean marine terminal.
(2) Records of maintenance or repairs performed pursuant to the
inspection in section 3 of this act must be:
(a) Maintained for two years at the ocean marine terminal; and
(b) Made available upon request of the utilities and transportation
commission.
(3) Requests for reinspection must be recorded in the intermodal
chassis maintenance file and be maintained and made available in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(4) All records described in this section may be kept in a computer
system if printouts of those records may be provided upon request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The commercial vehicle safety division
of the state patrol shall conduct random, but at least annual, on-site
reviews of ocean marine terminals to determine whether the terminal is
complying with the requirements of this chapter, including but not
limited to inspection, tagging, quarantine, repair, and recordkeeping
requirements. After an inspection in which the division determines
that an ocean marine terminal operator has failed to comply with any of
the requirements of this chapter, the chief of the state patrol shall:
(a) Direct the ocean marine terminal to comply immediately with the
requirements of this chapter;
(b) Fine the ocean marine terminal one hundred dollars for every
day, after the day of inspection, that the terminal fails to comply
with the requirements of this chapter;
(c) After ten days of noncompliance, immediately forward a
recommendation to the utilities and transportation commission to
suspend the terminal's motor carrier property permit, and forward a
recommendation to the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration for
administrative or other action deemed necessary against the carrier's
interstate operating authority.
(2) After twenty days of noncompliance, the utilities and
transportation commission shall revoke the ocean marine terminal's
property permit.
(3) If an inspection results in an unsatisfactory rating due to
conditions presenting an imminent danger to the public safety, the
utilities and transportation commission shall take actions under
subsection (1)(c) or (2) of this section.
(4) A state patrol officer, while in the performance of the duties
of office, may enter upon and perform inspections at an ocean marine
terminal of green-tagged chassis that are intended to be tendered to or
interchanged with a motor carrier for use on a highway. If the officer
determines that a green-tagged chassis is unroadworthy, the ocean
marine terminal operator will be fined five hundred dollars per
occurrence.
(5) A citation issued for violation of this chapter related to the
defective condition of an intermodal chassis must be issued to the
ocean marine terminal operator responsible for the inspection and
maintenance of the chassis, if the chassis is not owned by the driver
and unless the defective condition of the chassis was caused by the
failure of the motor carrier or its driver to operate the commercial
vehicle in a safe manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Any provision in a contract between an owner
or lessee of an intermodal chassis and a driver that contains a hold-
harmless or indemnity clause concerning defects in the physical
condition of the intermodal chassis is void as against public policy.
This section does not apply to damage to the intermodal chassis caused
by the neglect or willful failure of the motor carrier or its driver to
operate the commercial vehicle in a safe manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The utilities and transportation commission
shall adopt such rules as necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Nothing in this chapter relieves a
commercial driver or commercial motor carrier of any duty imposed by
state or federal law related to the safe operation of a commercial
motor vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 81 RCW.

--- END ---