BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.800 and 2002 c 302 s 704 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any court when entering an order authorized under RCW
9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060,
26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060, 26.50.070, or 26.26.590
shall, upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence, that a party
has: Used, displayed, or threatened to use a firearm or other
dangerous weapon in a felony, or previously committed any offense that
makes him or her ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions
of RCW 9.41.040:
(a) Require the party to surrender any firearm or other dangerous
weapon;
(b) Require the party to surrender any concealed pistol license
issued under RCW 9.41.070;
(c) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a firearm or
other dangerous weapon;
(d) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a concealed
pistol license.
(2) Any court when entering an order authorized under RCW
9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060,
26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060, 26.50.070, or 26.26.590
may, upon a showing by a preponderance of the evidence but not by clear
and convincing evidence, that a party has: Used, displayed, or
threatened to use a firearm or other dangerous weapon in a felony, or
previously committed any offense that makes him or her ineligible to
possess a pistol under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040:
(a) Require the party to surrender any firearm or other dangerous
weapon;
(b) Require the party to surrender a concealed pistol license
issued under RCW 9.41.070;
(c) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a firearm or
other dangerous weapon;
(d) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a concealed
pistol license.
(3) The court may order temporary surrender of a firearm or other
dangerous weapon without notice to the other party if it finds, on the
basis of the moving affidavit or other evidence, that irreparable
injury could result if an order is not issued until the time for
response has elapsed.
(4) In addition to the provisions of subsections (1), (2), and (3)
of this section, the court may enter an order requiring a party to
comply with the provisions in subsection (1) of this section if it
finds that the possession of a firearm or other dangerous weapon by any
party presents a serious and imminent threat to public health or
safety, or to the health or safety of any individual.
(5) The requirements of subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this
section may be for a period of time less than the duration of the
order.
(6) The court may require the party to surrender any firearm or
other dangerous weapon in his or her immediate possession or control or
subject to his or her immediate possession or control to the sheriff of
the county having jurisdiction of the proceeding, the chief of police
of the municipality having jurisdiction, or to the restrained or
enjoined party's counsel or to any person designated by the court.
(7) If the respondent in any request for a temporary order under
this section is a general authority or limited authority Washington
peace officer, no temporary order issued by the court in advance of a
full hearing shall require such officer to surrender any firearm or
other weapon issued to the officer to perform his or her official
duties.

--- END ---