BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.210 and 1997 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
any public or private landowners or others in lawful possession and
control of any lands whether designated resource, rural, or urban, or
water areas, irrigation canal rights of way, or channels and lands
adjacent to such areas, canals, or channels, who allow members of the
public to use them for the purposes of outdoor recreation, which term
includes, but is not limited to, the cutting, gathering, and removing
of firewood by private persons for their personal use without
purchasing the firewood from the landowner, hunting, fishing, camping,
picnicking, swimming, hiking, bicycling, skateboarding or other
nonmotorized wheel-based activities, hanggliding, paragliding, the
riding of horses or other animals, clam digging, pleasure driving of
off-road vehicles, snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating, nature
study, winter or water sports, viewing or enjoying historical,
archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites, without charging a fee of
any kind therefor, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to
such users.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
any public or private landowner or others in lawful possession and
control of any lands whether rural or urban, or water areas, irrigation
canal rights of way, or channels and lands adjacent to such areas,
canals, or channels, who offer or allow such land to be used for
purposes of a fish or wildlife cooperative project, or allow access to
such land for cleanup of litter or other solid waste, shall not be
liable for unintentional injuries to any volunteer group or to any
other users.
(3) Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful possession
and control of the land, may charge an administrative fee of up to
twenty-five dollars for the cutting, gathering, and removing of
firewood from the land. Nothing in this section shall prevent the
liability of such a landowner or others in lawful possession and
control for injuries sustained to users by reason of a known dangerous
artificial latent condition for which warning signs have not been
conspicuously posted. Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and 4.24.210 limits or
expands in any way the doctrine of attractive nuisance. Usage by
members of the public, volunteer groups, or other users is permissive
and does not support any claim of adverse possession.
(4) For purposes of this section, a license or permit issued for
statewide use under authority of chapter ((43.51)) 79A.05 RCW((, Title
75,)) or Title 77 RCW is not a fee.

--- END ---