BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.01.080 and 1947 c 79 s .01.08 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Violation of)) Except as otherwise provided in this code, any
person violating any provision of this code is ((punishable by a fine
of)) guilty of a gross misdemeanor and will, upon conviction, be fined
not less than ten dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or ((by
imprisonment)) imprisoned for not more than one year, or both ((fine
and imprisonment)), in addition to any other penalty or forfeiture
provided herein or otherwise by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.15.020 and 1992 c 149 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An insurer ((not thereunto)) that is not authorized by the
commissioner ((shall)) may not solicit insurance business in this
state((, nor)) or transact insurance business in this state, except as
provided in this chapter.
(2)(a) ((No)) A person ((shall)) may not, in this state, represent
an unauthorized insurer except as provided in this chapter. This
((provision shall)) subsection does not apply to any adjuster or
attorney at law representing ((such)) an unauthorized insurer from time
to time in this state in his or her professional capacity.
(b) A person, other than a duly licensed surplus line broker acting
in good faith under his or her license, who makes a contract of
insurance in this state, directly or indirectly, on behalf of an
unauthorized insurer, without complying with the provisions of this
chapter, is personally liable for the performance of such contract.
(3) Each violation of subsection (2) of this section ((shall))
constitutes a separate offense punishable by a fine of not more than
twenty-five thousand dollars, and the commissioner, at the
commissioner's discretion, may order replacement of policies improperly
placed with an unauthorized insurer with policies issued by an
authorized insurer. Violations may result in suspension or revocation
of a license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "person" has the same meaning as in
RCW 48.01.070.
(2) For the purpose of this section, an act is committed in this
state if it is committed, in whole or in part, in the state of
Washington, or affects persons or property within the state and relates
to or involves an insurance contract.
(3) Any person who knowingly violates RCW 48.15.020(1) is guilty of
a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(4) Any criminal penalty imposed under this section is in addition
to, and not in lieu of, any other civil or administrative penalty or
sanction otherwise authorized under state law.
(5)(a) If the commissioner has cause to believe that any person has
violated the provisions of RCW 48.15.020(1), the commissioner may:
(i) Issue and enforce a cease and desist order in accordance with
the provisions of RCW 48.02.080; and/or
(ii) Assess a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand
dollars for each violation, after providing notice and an opportunity
for a hearing in accordance with chapters 34.05 and 48.04 RCW.
(b) Upon failure to pay a civil penalty when due, the attorney
general may bring a civil action on behalf of the commissioner to
recover the unpaid penalty. Any amounts collected by the commissioner
must be paid to the state treasurer for the account of the general
fund.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.17.060 and 1995 c 214 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((No)) A person ((shall in this state)) may not act as or hold
himself or herself out to be an agent, broker, solicitor, or adjuster
in this state unless ((then)) licensed ((therefor by this state)) by
the commissioner.
(2) ((No)) An agent, solicitor, or broker ((shall)) may not solicit
or take applications for, procure, or place for others any kind of
insurance for which he or she is not then licensed.
(3) This section ((shall)) does not apply with respect to any
person securing and forwarding information required for the purposes of
group credit life and credit disability insurance or credit casualty
insurance against loss or damage resulting from failure of debtors to
pay their obligations in connection with an extension of credit and
such other credit life and disability insurance or credit casualty
insurance against loss or damage resulting from failure of debtors to
pay their obligations as the commissioner shall determine, and where no
commission or other compensation is payable on account of the securing
and forwarding of such information. However, the reimbursement of a
creditor's actual expenses for securing and forwarding information
required for the purposes of such group insurance ((shall)) will not be
considered a commission or other compensation if such reimbursement
does not exceed three dollars per certificate issued, or in the case of
a monthly premium plan extending beyond twelve months, not to exceed
three dollars per loan transaction revision per year.
(((4) Any person violating this section shall be liable to a fine
of not to exceed five hundred dollars and imprisonment for not to
exceed six months for each instance of such violation.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "person" has the same meaning as in
RCW 48.01.070.
(2) For the purpose of this section, an act is committed in this
state if it is committed, in whole or in part, in the state of
Washington, or affects persons or property within the state and relates
to or involves an insurance contract, health care services contract, or
health maintenance agreement.
(3) Any person who knowingly violates RCW 48.17.060(1) is guilty of
a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(4) Any person who knowingly violates RCW 48.17.060(2) is guilty of
a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(5) Any criminal penalty imposed under this section is in addition
to, and not in lieu of, any other civil or administrative penalty or
sanction otherwise authorized under state law.
(6)(a) If the commissioner has cause to believe that any person has
violated the provisions of RCW 48.17.060 (1) or (2), the commissioner
may:
(i) Issue and enforce a cease and desist order in accordance with
the provisions of RCW 48.02.080;
(ii) Suspend or revoke a license; and/or
(iii) Assess a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand
dollars for each violation, after providing notice and an opportunity
for a hearing in accordance with chapters 34.05 and 48.04 RCW.
(b) Upon failure to pay a civil penalty when due, the attorney
general may bring a civil action on behalf of the commissioner to
recover the unpaid penalty. Any amounts collected by the commissioner
must be paid to the state treasurer for the account of the general
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.17 RCW
to read as follows:
Any solicitor, agent, or broker soliciting, negotiating, or
procuring an application for insurance or health care services in this
state must make a good faith effort to determine whether the entity
that is issuing the coverage is:
(1) Authorized to transact insurance or health coverage in this
state; or
(2) Conducting business through a surplus lines broker licensed
under chapter 48.15 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.44.015 and 1983 c 202 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((No)) A person ((shall)) may not in this state, by mail or
otherwise, act as or hold himself or herself out to be a health care
service contractor, as defined in RCW 48.44.010 without first being
((duly)) registered ((therefor)) with the commissioner.
(2) The issuance, sale, or offer for sale in this state of
securities of its own issue by any health care service contractor
domiciled in this state other than the memberships and bonds of a
nonprofit corporation shall be subject to the provisions of chapter
48.06 RCW relating to obtaining solicitation permits the same as if
health care service contractors were domestic insurers.
(3) Any person violating any provision of subsection (((1) or)) (2)
of this section ((shall be liable to a fine of not to exceed)) is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor and will, upon conviction, be fined not
more than one thousand dollars ((and imprisonment for not to exceed))
or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both, for each
((instance of such)) violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "person" has the same meaning as in
RCW 48.01.070.
(2) For the purpose of this section, an act is committed in this
state if it is committed, in whole or in part, in the state of
Washington, or affects persons or property within the state and relates
to or involves a health care services contract.
(3) Any person who knowingly violates RCW 48.44.015(1) is guilty of
a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(4) Any criminal penalty imposed under this section is in addition
to, and not in lieu of, any other civil or administrative penalty or
sanction otherwise authorized under state law.
(5)(a) If the commissioner has cause to believe that any person has
violated the provisions of RCW 48.44.015(1), the commissioner may:
(i) Issue and enforce a cease and desist order in accordance with
the provisions of RCW 48.02.080; and/or
(ii) Assess a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand
dollars for each violation, after providing notice and an opportunity
for a hearing in accordance with chapters 34.05 and 48.04 RCW.
(b) Upon failure to pay a civil penalty when due, the attorney
general may bring a civil action on behalf of the commissioner to
recover the unpaid penalty. Any amounts collected by the commissioner
must be paid to the state treasurer for the account of the general
fund.

Sec. 9 RCW 48.44.060 and 1947 c 268 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any person who
violates any of the provisions of this chapter ((shall be)) is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 10 RCW 48.46.027 and 1983 c 202 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((No)) A person ((shall)) may not in this state, by mail or
otherwise, act as or hold himself or herself out to be a health
maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020 without first
being ((duly)) registered ((therefor)) with the commissioner.
(2) The issuance, sale, or offer for sale in this state of
securities of its own issue by any health maintenance organization
domiciled in this state other than the memberships and bonds of a
nonprofit corporation ((shall be)) is subject to the provisions of
chapter 48.06 RCW relating to obtaining solicitation permits the same
as if health maintenance organizations were domestic insurers.
(3) Any person violating any provision of subsection (((1) or)) (2)
of this section ((shall be liable to a fine of not to exceed)) is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor and will, upon conviction, be fined not
more than one thousand dollars ((and imprisonment for not to exceed)),
or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both, for each
((instance of such)) violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "person" has the same meaning as in
RCW 48.01.070.
(2) For the purpose of this section, an act is committed in this
state if it is committed, in whole or in part, in the state of
Washington, or affects persons or property within the state and relates
to or involves a health maintenance agreement.
(3) Any person who knowingly violates RCW 48.46.027(1) is guilty of
a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(4) Any criminal penalty imposed under this section is in addition
to, and not in lieu of, any other civil or administrative penalty or
sanction otherwise authorized under state law.
(5)(a) If the commissioner has cause to believe that any person has
violated the provisions of RCW 48.46.027(1), the commissioner may:
(i) Issue and enforce a cease and desist order in accordance with
the provisions of RCW 48.02.080; and/or
(ii) Assess a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand
dollars for each violation, after providing notice and an opportunity
for a hearing in accordance with chapters 34.05 and 48.04 RCW.
(b) Upon failure to pay a civil penalty when due, the attorney
general may bring a civil action on behalf of the commissioner to
recover the unpaid penalty. Any amounts collected by the commissioner
must be paid to the state treasurer for the account of the general
fund.

Sec. 12 RCW 48.46.420 and 1990 c 119 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any health
maintenance organization which, or person who, violates any provision
of this chapter ((shall be)) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) A health maintenance organization that fails to comply with the
net worth requirements of this chapter must cure that defect in
compliance with an order of the commissioner rendered in conformity
with rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. The commissioner is
authorized to take appropriate action to assure that the continued
operation of the health maintenance organization will not be hazardous
to its enrolled participants.

Sec. 13 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2002 c 340 s 2, 2002 c 324 s 2, 2002 c
290 s 2, 2002 c 253 s 4, 2002 c 229 s 2, 2002 c 134 s 2, and 2002 c 133
s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Manufacture of methamphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over 18 and deliver heroin,
methamphetamine, a narcotic
from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
to someone under 18 (RCW
69.50.406)

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW
69.50.415)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or a
nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam
or methamphetamine, from
Schedule I-V to someone under 18
and 3 years junior (RCW
69.50.406)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver or possess with intent to
deliver methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver amphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver heroin or cocaine
(when the offender has a criminal
history in this state or any other
state that includes a sex offense or
serious violent offense or the
Washington equivalent) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession of Ephedrine or any of its
Salts or Isomers or Salts of
Isomers, Pseudoephedrine or any
of its Salts or Isomers or Salts of
Isomers, Pressurized Ammonia
Gas, or Pressurized Ammonia Gas
Solution with intent to
manufacture methamphetamine
(RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or
counterfeit) any controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Involving a minor in drug dealing
(RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver heroin or cocaine
(except when the offender has a
criminal history in this state or
any other state that includes a sex
offense or serious violent offense
or the Washington equivalent)
(RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1)(a))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule I or II (except heroin or
cocaine) or flunitrazepam from
Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Delivery of imitation controlled
substance by person eighteen or
over to person under eighteen
(RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW
9A.56.070(1))

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen
Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule III, IV, or V or
nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or
flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (section 8(3) of this act)

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (section 11(3) of this
act)

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (section 3(3) of this act)

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (section 5(3) of this
act)

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery of a material in lieu of a
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(c))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for
Controlled Substances (RCW
69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver marijuana (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess
with intent to distribute an
imitation controlled substance
(RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen
Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230)

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW
9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug
Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(b))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of controlled substance that
is either heroin or narcotics from
Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam
from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP)
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled
Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a
Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or
V or Non-narcotic from Schedule
I-V (except phencyclidine or
flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW
9A.56.070(2))

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(section 5(4) of this act)

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 14 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2002 c 340 s 2, 2002 c 324 s 2, 2002 c
290 s 7, 2002 c 253 s 4, 2002 c 229 s 2, 2002 c 134 s 2, and 2002 c 133
s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1)(a))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW
9A.56.070(1))

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen
Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (section 8(3) of this act)

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (section 11(3) of this
act)

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (section 3(3) of this act)

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (section 5(3) of this
act)

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen
Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230)

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW
9.41.040(1)(b))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW
9A.56.070(2))

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(section 5(4) of this act)

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Section 13 of this act expires July 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 14 of this act takes effect July 1,
2004.

--- END ---