BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.87.020 and 1997 c 183 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Terms used in this chapter have the meaning given to them in the
International Registration Plan (IRP), the Uniform Vehicle
Registration, Proration, and Reciprocity Agreement (Western Compact),
chapter 46.04 RCW, or as otherwise defined in this section.
Definitions given to terms by the IRP and the Western Compact, as
applicable, shall prevail unless given a different meaning in this
chapter or in rules adopted under authority of this chapter.
(1) "Apportionable vehicle" has the meaning given by the IRP,
except that it does not include vehicles with a declared gross weight
of twelve thousand pounds or less. Apportionable vehicles include
trucks, tractors, truck tractors, road tractors, and buses, each as
separate and licensable vehicles. For IRP jurisdictions that require
the registration of nonmotor vehicles, this term may include trailers,
semitrailers, and pole trailers as applicable, each as separate and
licensable vehicles.
(2) "Cab card" is a certificate of registration issued for a
vehicle by the registering jurisdiction under the Western Compact.
Under the IRP, it is a certificate of registration issued by the base
jurisdiction for a vehicle upon which is disclosed the jurisdictions
and registered gross weights in such jurisdictions for which the
vehicle is registered.
(3) "Commercial vehicle" is a term used by the Western Compact and
means any vehicle, except recreational vehicles, vehicles displaying
restricted plates, and government owned or leased vehicles, that is
operated and registered in more than one jurisdiction and is used or
maintained for the transportation of persons for hire, compensation, or
profit, or is designed, used, or maintained primarily for the
transportation of property and:
(a) Is a motor vehicle having a declared gross weight in excess of
twenty-six thousand pounds; or
(b) Is a motor vehicle having three or more axles with a declared
gross weight in excess of twelve thousand pounds; or
(c) Is a motor vehicle, trailer, pole trailer, or semitrailer used
in combination when the gross weight or declared gross weight of the
combination exceeds twenty-six thousand pounds combined gross weight.
The nonmotor vehicles mentioned are only applicable to those
jurisdictions requiring the registration of such vehicles.
Although a two-axle motor vehicle, trailer, pole trailer,
semitrailer, or any combination of such vehicles with an actual or
declared gross weight or declared combined gross weight exceeding
twelve thousand pounds but not more than twenty-six thousand is not
considered to be a commercial vehicle, at the option of the owner, such
vehicles may be considered as "commercial vehicles" for the purpose of
proportional registration. The nonmotor vehicles mentioned are only
applicable to those jurisdictions requiring the registration of such
vehicles.
Commercial vehicles include trucks, tractors, truck tractors, road
tractors, and buses. Trailers, pole trailers, and semitrailers, will
also be considered as commercial vehicles for those jurisdictions who
require registration of such vehicles.
(4) "Credentials" means cab cards, apportioned plates (for
Washington-based fleets), and validation tabs issued for proportionally
registered vehicles.
(5) "Declared combined gross weight" means the total unladen weight
of any combination of vehicles plus the weight of the maximum load to
be carried on the combination of vehicles as set by the registrant in
the application pursuant to chapter 46.44 RCW and for which
registration fees have been or are to be paid.
(6) "Declared gross weight" means the total unladen weight of any
vehicle plus the weight of the maximum load to be carried on the
vehicle as set by the registrant in the application pursuant to chapter
46.44 RCW and for which registration fees have been or are to be paid.
In the case of a bus, auto stage, or a passenger-carrying for hire
vehicle with a seating capacity of more than six, the declared gross
weight shall be determined by multiplying the average load factor of
one hundred and fifty pounds by the number of seats in the vehicle,
including the driver's seat, and add this amount to the unladen weight
of the vehicle. If the resultant gross weight is not listed in RCW
46.16.070, it will be increased to the next higher gross weight so
listed pursuant to chapter 46.44 RCW.
(7) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(8) "Fleet" means one or more commercial vehicles in the Western
Compact and one or more apportionable vehicles in the IRP.
(9) "In-jurisdiction miles" means the total miles accumulated in a
jurisdiction during the preceding year by vehicles of the fleet while
they were a part of the fleet.
(10) "IRP" means the International Registration Plan.
(11) "Jurisdiction" means and includes a state, territory or
possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the
Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, a foreign country, and a state or province
of a foreign country.
(12) "Motor carrier" means an entity engaged in the transportation
of goods or persons. The term includes a for-hire motor carrier,
private motor carrier, contract motor carrier, or exempt motor carrier.
The term includes a registrant licensed under this chapter, a motor
vehicle lessor, and a motor vehicle lessee.
(13) "Owner" means a person or business firm who holds the legal
title to a vehicle, or if a vehicle is the subject of an agreement for
its conditional sale with the right of purchase upon performance of the
conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of
possession vested in the conditional vendee, or if a vehicle is subject
to a lease, contract, or other legal arrangement vesting right of
possession or control, for security or otherwise, or if a mortgagor of
a vehicle is entitled to possession, then the owner is deemed to be the
person or business firm in whom is vested right of possession or
control.
(((13))) (14) "Preceding year" means the period of twelve
consecutive months immediately before July 1st of the year immediately
before the commencement of the registration or license year for which
apportioned registration is sought.
(((14))) (15) "Properly registered," as applied to the place of
registration under the provisions of the Western Compact, means:
(a) In the case of a commercial vehicle, the jurisdiction in which
it is registered if the commercial enterprise in which the vehicle is
used has a place of business therein, and, if the vehicle is most
frequently dispatched, garaged, serviced, maintained, operated, or
otherwise controlled in or from that place of business, and the vehicle
has been assigned to that place of business; or
(b) In the case of a commercial vehicle, the jurisdiction where,
because of an agreement or arrangement between two or more
jurisdictions, or pursuant to a declaration, the vehicle has been
registered as required by that jurisdiction.
In case of doubt or dispute as to the proper place of registration
of a commercial vehicle, the department shall make the final
determination, but in making such determination, may confer with
departments of the other jurisdictions affected.
(((15))) (16) "Prorate percentage" is the factor that is applied to
the total proratable fees and taxes to determine the apportionable or
prorate fees required for registration in a particular jurisdiction.
It is determined by dividing the in-jurisdiction miles for a particular
jurisdiction by the total miles. This term is synonymous with the term
"mileage percentage."
(((16))) (17) "Registrant" means a person, business firm, or
corporation in whose name or names a vehicle or fleet of vehicles is
registered.
(((17))) (18) "Registration year" means the twelve-month period
during which the registration plates issued by the base jurisdiction
are valid according to the laws of the base jurisdiction.
(((18))) (19) "Total miles" means the total number of miles
accumulated in all jurisdictions during the preceding year by all
vehicles of the fleet while they were a part of the fleet. Mileage
accumulated by vehicles of the fleet that did not engage in interstate
operations is not included in the fleet miles.
(((19))) (20) "Western Compact" means the Uniform Vehicle
Registration, Proration, and Reciprocity Agreement.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.87.140 and 1997 c 183 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any owner engaged in interstate operations of one or more
fleets of apportionable or commercial vehicles may, in lieu of
registration of the vehicles under chapter 46.16 RCW, register and
license the vehicles of each fleet under this chapter by filing a
proportional registration application for each fleet with the
department. The nonmotor vehicles of Washington-based fleets which are
operated in IRP jurisdictions that require registration of such
vehicles may be proportionally registered for operation in those
jurisdictions as herein provided. The application shall contain the
following information and such other information pertinent to vehicle
registration as the department may require:
(a) A description and identification of each vehicle of the fleet.
Motor vehicles and nonpower units shall be placed in separate fleets.
(b) If registering under the provisions of the IRP, the registrant
shall also indicate member jurisdictions in which registration is
desired and furnish such other information as those member
jurisdictions require.
(c) An original or renewal application shall also be accompanied by
a mileage schedule for each fleet.
(d) The USDOT number issued to the registrant and the USDOT number
of the motor carrier responsible for the safety of the vehicle, if
different.
(e) A completed Motor Carrier Identification Report (MCS-150) at
the time of fleet renewal or at the time of vehicle registration, if
required by the department.
(f) The Taxpayer Identification Number of the registrant and the
motor carrier responsible for the safety of the vehicle, if different.
(2) Each application shall, at the time and in the manner required
by the department, be supported by payment of a fee computed as
follows:
(a) Divide the in-jurisdiction miles by the total miles and carry
the answer to the nearest thousandth of a percent (three places beyond
the decimal, e.g. 10.543%). This factor is known as the prorate
percentage.
(b) Determine the total proratable fees and taxes required for each
vehicle in the fleet for which registration is requested, based on the
regular annual fees and taxes or applicable fees and taxes for the
unexpired portion of the registration year under the laws of each
jurisdiction for which fees or taxes are to be calculated.
Washington-based nonmotor vehicles shall normally be fully licensed
under the provisions of chapter 46.16 RCW. If these vehicles are being
operated in jurisdictions that require the registration of such
vehicles, the applicable vehicles may be considered as apportionable
vehicles for the purpose of registration in those jurisdictions and
this state. The prorate percentage for which registration fees and
taxes were paid to such jurisdictions may be credited toward the one
hundred percent of registration fees and taxes due this state for full
licensing. Applicable fees and taxes for vehicles of Washington-based
fleets are those prescribed under RCW 46.16.070, 46.16.085, and
82.38.075, ((and 82.44.020,)) as applicable. If, during the
registration period, the lessor of an apportioned vehicle changes and
the vehicle remains in the fleet of the registrant, the department
shall only charge those fees prescribed for the issuance of new
apportioned license plates, validation tabs, and cab card.
(c) Multiply the total, proratable fees or taxes for each motor
vehicle by the prorate percentage applicable to the desired
jurisdiction and round the results to the nearest cent. Fees and taxes
for nonmotor vehicles being prorated will be calculated as indicated in
(b) of this subsection.
(d) Add the total fees and taxes determined in (c) of this
subsection for each vehicle to the nonproratable fees required under
the laws of the jurisdiction for which fees are being calculated.
Nonproratable fees required for vehicles of Washington-based fleets are
the administrative fee required by RCW 82.38.075, if applicable, and
the vehicle transaction fee pursuant to the provisions of RCW
46.87.130.
(e) Add the total fees and taxes determined in (d) of this
subsection for each vehicle listed on the application. Assuming the
fees and taxes calculated were for Washington, this would be the amount
due and payable for the application under the provisions of the Western
Compact. Under the provisions of the IRP, the amount due and payable
for the application would be the sum of the fees and taxes referred to
in (d) of this subsection, calculated for each member jurisdiction in
which registration of the fleet is desired.
(3) All assessments for proportional registration fees are due and
payable in United States funds on the date presented or mailed to the
registrant at the address listed in the proportional registration
records of the department. The registrant may petition for
reassessment of the fees or taxes due under this section within thirty
days of the date of original service as provided for in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.87 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall refuse to register a vehicle under this
chapter if the registrant or motor carrier responsible for the safety
of the vehicle has been prohibited under federal law from operating by
the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.87 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall suspend or revoke the registration of a
vehicle registered under this chapter if the registrant or motor
carrier responsible for the safety of the vehicle has been prohibited
under federal law from operating by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety
Administration.

--- END ---