BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.79 RCW
to read as follows:
A scrap processor may provide the monthly report required in RCW
46.79.020 to the department electronically. When reported
electronically, the department's printed confirmation receipt of the
filing, as well as original ownership documents, must be maintained in
the records of the scrap processor. Records provided in this format
are exempt from the notarization and signature requirements of RCW
46.80.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.80 RCW
to read as follows:
A vehicle wrecker may provide the monthly report required in RCW
46.80.090 to the department electronically. When reported
electronically, the department's printed confirmation receipt of the
filing, as well as original ownership documents, must be maintained in
the records of the vehicle wrecker. Records provided in this format
are exempt from the notarization and signature requirements of RCW
46.80.090.

--- END ---