BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.100 and 2002 c 175 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the
power to provide for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove
statutory and other restrictions which have limited work programs in
the past. For purposes of establishing such a comprehensive program,
the legislature recommends that the department consider adopting any or
all, or any variation of, the following classes of work programs:
(1) CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES. (a) The employer model
industries in this class shall be operated and managed in total or in
part by any profit or nonprofit organization pursuant to an agreement
between the organization and the department. The organization shall
produce goods or services for sale to both the public and private
sector.
An agreement between the organization and the department must be
reviewed and approved by the correctional industries board of
directors. The review must include an analysis of the potential impact
of the proposed agreement on the Washington state business community
and labor market, and must include a public hearing. Public testimony
must be allowed at the hearing, and the board shall notify each
Washington business that has the same three-digit standard industrial
classification code as the organization seeking the agreement of the
date, time, and place of the hearing. The board may not approve an
agreement that will have an adverse economic impact on a Washington
business. For purposes of this subsection (1)(a), "Washington
business" means a person subject to chapter 82.04 RCW.
(b) The customer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed by the department to provide Washington state manufacturers
or businesses with products or services currently produced or provided
by out-of-state or foreign suppliers. The correctional industries
board of directors shall review these proposed industries before the
department contracts to provide such products or services. The review
shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the proposed
products and services on the Washington state business community and
labor market.
(c) The department of corrections shall supply appropriate security
and custody services without charge to the participating firms.
(d) Inmates who work in free venture industries shall do so at
their own choice. They shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry
is located, as determined by the director of correctional industries.
If the director cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then
the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.
(e) An inmate who is employed in the class I program of
correctional industries shall not be eligible for unemployment
compensation benefits pursuant to any of the provisions of Title 50 RCW
until released on parole or discharged.
(2) CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class
shall be state-owned and operated enterprises designed to reduce the
costs for goods and services for tax-supported agencies and for
nonprofit organizations. The industries selected for development
within this class shall, as much as possible, match the available pool
of inmate work skills and aptitudes with the work opportunities in the
free community. The industries shall be closely patterned after
private sector industries but with the objective of reducing public
support costs rather than making a profit. The products and services
of this industry, including purchased products and services necessary
for a complete product line, may be sold to public agencies, to
nonprofit organizations, and to private contractors when the goods
purchased will be ultimately used by a public agency or a nonprofit
organization. Clothing manufactured by an industry in this class may
be donated to nonprofit organizations that provide clothing free of
charge to low-income persons. Correctional industries products and
services shall be reviewed by the correctional industries board of
directors before offering such products and services for sale to
private contractors. The board of directors shall conduct a yearly
marketing review of the products and services offered under this
subsection. Such review shall include an analysis of the potential
impact of the proposed products and services on the Washington state
business community. Industries in this class shall make every effort
to eliminate the creation of surpluses. However, to avoid waste or
spoilage and consequent loss to the state, when there is no public
sector market for such goods, byproducts and surpluses of timber,
agricultural, and animal husbandry enterprises may be sold to private
persons, at private sale. Surplus byproducts and surpluses of timber,
agricultural and animal husbandry enterprises that cannot be sold to
public agencies or to private persons may be donated to nonprofit
organizations. All sales of surplus products shall be carried out in
accordance with rules prescribed by the secretary.
Security and custody services shall be provided without charge by
the department of corrections.
Inmates working in this class of industries shall do so at their
own choice and shall be paid for their work on a gratuity scale which
shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the
locality in which the industry is located and which is approved by the
director of correctional industries.
Subject to approval of the correctional industries board,
provisions of RCW 41.06.380 prohibiting contracting out work performed
by classified employees shall not apply to contracts with Washington
state businesses entered into by the department of corrections through
class II industries.
(3) CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES. Industries in
this class shall be operated by the department of corrections. They
shall be designed and managed to accomplish the following objectives:
(a) Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and
experience so that the inmate will be able to qualify for better work
both within correctional industries and the free community. It is not
intended that an inmate's work within this class of industries should
be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.
(b) Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or work
training per week.
(c) Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public support
costs.
Supervising, management, and custody staff shall be employees of
the department.
All able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are not
working in other classes of industries shall work in this class.
Except for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates in
this class shall be paid for their work in accordance with an inmate
gratuity scale. The scale shall be adopted by the secretary of
corrections.
(4) CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class
shall be operated by the department of corrections. They shall be
designed and managed to provide services in the inmate's resident
community at a reduced cost. The services shall be provided to public
agencies, to persons who are poor or infirm, or to nonprofit
organizations.
Inmates in this program shall reside in facilities owned by,
contracted for, or licensed by the department of corrections. A unit
of local government shall provide work supervision services without
charge to the state and shall pay the inmate's wage.
The department of corrections shall reimburse participating units
of local government for liability and workers compensation insurance
costs.
Inmates who work in this class of industries shall do so at their
own choice and shall receive a gratuity which shall not exceed the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry
is located.
(5) CLASS V: COMMUNITY RESTITUTION PROGRAMS. Programs in this
class shall be subject to supervision by the department of corrections.
The purpose of this class of industries is to enable an inmate, placed
on community supervision, to work off all or part of a community
restitution order as ordered by the sentencing court.
Employment shall be in a community restitution program operated by
the state, local units of government, or a nonprofit agency.
To the extent that funds are specifically made available for such
purposes, the department of corrections shall reimburse nonprofit
agencies for workers compensation insurance costs.

Sec. 2 RCW 72.09.100 and 2002 c 354 s 238 and 2002 c 175 s 49 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the
power to provide for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove
statutory and other restrictions which have limited work programs in
the past. For purposes of establishing such a comprehensive program,
the legislature recommends that the department consider adopting any or
all, or any variation of, the following classes of work programs:
(1) CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES. (a) The employer model
industries in this class shall be operated and managed in total or in
part by any profit or nonprofit organization pursuant to an agreement
between the organization and the department. The organization shall
produce goods or services for sale to both the public and private
sector.
An agreement between the organization and the department must be
reviewed and approved by the correctional industries board of
directors. The review must include an analysis of the potential impact
of the proposed agreement on the Washington state business community
and labor market, and must include a public hearing. Public testimony
must be allowed at the hearing, and the board shall notify each
Washington business that has the same three-digit standard industrial
classification code as the organization seeking the agreement of the
date, time, and place of the hearing. The board may not approve an
agreement that will have an adverse economic impact on a Washington
business. For purposes of this subsection (1)(a), "Washington
business" means a person subject to chapter 82.04 RCW.
(b) The customer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed by the department to provide Washington state manufacturers
or businesses with products or services currently produced or provided
by out-of-state or foreign suppliers. The correctional industries
board of directors shall review these proposed industries before the
department contracts to provide such products or services. The review
shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the proposed
products and services on the Washington state business community and
labor market.
(c) The department of corrections shall supply appropriate security
and custody services without charge to the participating firms.
(d) Inmates who work in free venture industries shall do so at
their own choice. They shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry
is located, as determined by the director of correctional industries.
If the director cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then
the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.
(e) An inmate who is employed in the class I program of
correctional industries shall not be eligible for unemployment
compensation benefits pursuant to any of the provisions of Title 50 RCW
until released on parole or discharged.
(2) CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class
shall be state-owned and operated enterprises designed to reduce the
costs for goods and services for tax-supported agencies and for
nonprofit organizations. The industries selected for development
within this class shall, as much as possible, match the available pool
of inmate work skills and aptitudes with the work opportunities in the
free community. The industries shall be closely patterned after
private sector industries but with the objective of reducing public
support costs rather than making a profit. The products and services
of this industry, including purchased products and services necessary
for a complete product line, may be sold to public agencies, to
nonprofit organizations, and to private contractors when the goods
purchased will be ultimately used by a public agency or a nonprofit
organization. Clothing manufactured by an industry in this class may
be donated to nonprofit organizations that provide clothing free of
charge to low-income persons. Correctional industries products and
services shall be reviewed by the correctional industries board of
directors before offering such products and services for sale to
private contractors. The board of directors shall conduct a yearly
marketing review of the products and services offered under this
subsection. Such review shall include an analysis of the potential
impact of the proposed products and services on the Washington state
business community. Industries in this class shall make every effort
to eliminate the creation of surpluses. However, to avoid waste or
spoilage and consequent loss to the state, when there is no public
sector market for such goods, byproducts and surpluses of timber,
agricultural, and animal husbandry enterprises may be sold to private
persons, at private sale. Surplus byproducts and surpluses of timber,
agricultural and animal husbandry enterprises that cannot be sold to
public agencies or to private persons may be donated to nonprofit
organizations. All sales of surplus products shall be carried out in
accordance with rules prescribed by the secretary.
Security and custody services shall be provided without charge by
the department of corrections.
Inmates working in this class of industries shall do so at their
own choice and shall be paid for their work on a gratuity scale which
shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the
locality in which the industry is located and which is approved by the
director of correctional industries.
Subject to approval of the correctional industries board,
provisions of RCW 41.06.142 shall not apply to contracts with
Washington state businesses entered into by the department of
corrections through class II industries.
(3) CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES. Industries in
this class shall be operated by the department of corrections. They
shall be designed and managed to accomplish the following objectives:
(a) Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and
experience so that the inmate will be able to qualify for better work
both within correctional industries and the free community. It is not
intended that an inmate's work within this class of industries should
be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.
(b) Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or work
training per week.
(c) Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public support
costs.
Supervising, management, and custody staff shall be employees of
the department.
All able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are not
working in other classes of industries shall work in this class.
Except for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates in
this class shall be paid for their work in accordance with an inmate
gratuity scale. The scale shall be adopted by the secretary of
corrections.
(4) CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class
shall be operated by the department of corrections. They shall be
designed and managed to provide services in the inmate's resident
community at a reduced cost. The services shall be provided to public
agencies, to persons who are poor or infirm, or to nonprofit
organizations.
Inmates in this program shall reside in facilities owned by,
contracted for, or licensed by the department of corrections. A unit
of local government shall provide work supervision services without
charge to the state and shall pay the inmate's wage.
The department of corrections shall reimburse participating units
of local government for liability and workers compensation insurance
costs.
Inmates who work in this class of industries shall do so at their
own choice and shall receive a gratuity which shall not exceed the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry
is located.
(5) CLASS V: COMMUNITY RESTITUTION PROGRAMS. Programs in this
class shall be subject to supervision by the department of corrections.
The purpose of this class of industries is to enable an inmate, placed
on community supervision, to work off all or part of a community
restitution order as ordered by the sentencing court.
Employment shall be in a community restitution program operated by
the state, local units of government, or a nonprofit agency.
To the extent that funds are specifically made available for such
purposes, the department of corrections shall reimburse nonprofit
agencies for workers compensation insurance costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2005.

--- END ---