BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.60.040 and 1999 c 164 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral
certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment project that is
located in an eligible area as defined in RCW 82.60.020.
(2) The department shall keep a running total of all deferrals
granted under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.
(((3) This section expires July 1, 2004.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 82.60.050 (Expiration of RCW 82.60.030
and 82.60.040) and 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 7, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 404, 1988 c 41
s 5, & 1985 c 232 s 10 are each repealed.

--- END ---