BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.41.020 and 1994 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Auditor" means the office of the state auditor.
(2) "Emergency" means a circumstance that if not immediately
changed may cause damage to persons or property.
(3) "Employee" means any individual employed or holding office in
any department or agency of local government.
(4) "Good faith" means a reasonable basis in fact for the
communication. "Good faith" is lacking when the employee knows or
reasonably ought to know that the report is malicious, false, or
frivolous.
(5) "Gross waste of public funds" means to spend or use funds or to
allow funds to be used without valuable result in a manner grossly
deviating from the standard of care or competence that a reasonable
person would observe in the same situation.
(6)(a) "Improper governmental action" means any action by a local
government officer or employee:
(i) That is undertaken in the performance of the officer's or
employee's official duties, whether or not the action is within the
scope of the employee's employment; and
(ii) That is in violation of any federal, state, or local law or
rule, is an abuse of authority, is of substantial and specific danger
to the public health or safety, or is a gross waste of public funds.
(b) "Improper governmental action" does not include personnel
actions including but not limited to employee grievances, complaints,
appointments, promotions, transfers, assignments, reassignments,
reinstatements, restorations, reemployments, performance evaluations,
reductions in pay, dismissals, suspensions, demotions, violations of
the local government collective bargaining and civil service laws,
alleged labor agreement violations, reprimands, or any action that may
be taken under chapter 41.08, 41.12, 41.14, 41.56, 41.59, or 53.18 RCW
or RCW 54.04.170 and 54.04.180.
(((2))) (7) "Local government" means any governmental entity other
than the state, federal agencies, or an operating system established
under chapter 43.52 RCW. It includes, but is not limited to cities,
counties, school districts, and special purpose districts.
(((3))) (8) "Retaliatory action" means: (a) Any adverse change in
a local government employee's employment status, or the terms and
conditions of employment including denial of adequate staff to perform
duties, frequent staff changes, frequent and undesirable office
changes, refusal to assign meaningful work, unwarranted and
unsubstantiated letters of reprimand or unsatisfactory performance
evaluations, demotion, transfer, reassignment, reduction in pay, denial
of promotion, suspension, dismissal, or any other disciplinary action;
or (b) hostile actions by another employee towards a local government
employee that were encouraged by a supervisor or senior manager or
official.
(((4) "Emergency" means a circumstance that if not immediately
changed may cause damage to persons or property.))
(9) "Substantial and specific danger" means a risk of serious
injury, illness, peril, or loss, to which the exposure of the public is
a gross deviation from the standard of care or competence which a
reasonable person would observe in the same situation.
(10) "Use of official authority or influence" includes taking,
directing others to take, recommending, processing, or approving any
personnel action such as an appointment, promotion, transfer,
assignment, reassignment, reinstatement, restoration, reemployment,
performance evaluation, or other disciplinary action.
(11) "Whistleblower" means an employee who in good faith reports
alleged improper governmental action to the appropriate person or
persons listed in the policy adopted pursuant to RCW 42.41.030 or to
the county prosecuting attorney and the state auditor if the local
government has failed to adopt a policy.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.41.030 and 1995 c 213 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every local government employee has the right to report to the
appropriate person or persons information concerning an alleged
improper governmental action.
(2) The governing body or chief administrative officer of each
local government shall adopt a policy on the appropriate procedures to
follow for reporting such information and shall provide information to
their employees on the policy. Local governments are encouraged to
consult with their employees on the policy.
(3) The policy shall describe the appropriate person or persons
within the local government to whom to report information and a list of
appropriate person or persons outside the local government to whom to
report. The list shall include the county prosecuting attorney and the
state auditor.
(4) Each local government shall permanently post a summary of the
procedures for reporting information on an alleged improper
governmental action and the procedures for protection against
retaliatory actions described in RCW 42.41.040 in a place where all
employees will have reasonable access to it. A copy of the summary
shall be made available to any employee upon request.
(5) A local government may require as part of its policy that,
except in the case of an emergency, before an employee provides
information of an improper governmental action to a person or an entity
who is not a public official or a person listed pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section, the employee shall submit a written report to the
local government. Where a local government has adopted such a policy
under this section, an employee who fails to make a good faith attempt
to follow the policy shall not receive the protections of this chapter.
(6) If a local government has failed to adopt a policy as required
by subsection (2) of this section, an employee may report alleged
improper government action directly to the county prosecuting attorney
((or)), who must investigate the allegation. If the prosecuting
attorney or an employee of the prosecuting attorney participated in the
alleged improper government action, an employee may report the alleged
improper government action to the state auditor, who must investigate
the allegation. The cost incurred by the state auditor in such
investigations shall be paid by the local government through the
municipal revolving account authorized in RCW 43.09.282.
(7) The employee may request that the state auditor investigate the
alleged improper governmental action if, after following the procedures
adopted by the local government or reporting the alleged improper
governmental action to the county prosecuting attorney, the employee
receives no response within sixty days of initiating those procedures
or making that report, or believes that the allegation was not
investigated with due diligence. The state auditor has discretion to
decide whether to investigate the alleged improper governmental action.
General dissatisfaction with the outcome or results of the
investigation is not sufficient reason for the state auditor to
investigate the allegation. If the state auditor does investigate the
allegation, he or she may consider the procedures provided in RCW
42.40.040 as a guide. The cost incurred by the state auditor in such
investigations shall be paid by the local government through the
municipal revolving account authorized in RCW 43.09.282.
(8) The identity of a reporting employee shall be kept confidential
to the extent possible under law, unless the employee authorizes the
disclosure of his or her identity in writing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.41 RCW
to read as follows:
An employee must make a reasonable attempt to ascertain the
correctness of the information furnished and may be subject to
disciplinary actions, including, but not limited to, suspension or
termination, for knowingly furnishing false information as determined
by the employee's appointing authority.

--- END ---