BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.20.110 and 2000 c 47 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall make or cause to be made, at least ((a
yearly)) every eighteen months, with a twelve-month average, an
inspection and investigation of all boarding homes. Every inspection
shall focus primarily on actual or potential resident outcomes, and may
include an inspection of every part of the premises and an examination
of all records (other than financial records), methods of
administration, the general and special dietary, and the stores and
methods of supply. Following such an inspection or inspections,
written notice of any violation of this law or the rules adopted
hereunder shall be given to the applicant or licensee and the
department. The department may prescribe by rule that any licensee or
applicant desiring to make specified types of alterations or additions
to its facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before
commencing such alteration, addition, or new construction, submit plans
and specifications therefor to the agencies responsible for plan
reviews for preliminary inspection and approval or recommendations with
respect to compliance with the rules and standards herein authorized.

--- END ---