BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.020 and 1986 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter the following words and phrases have the
designated meanings unless a different meaning is expressly provided or
the context otherwise clearly indicates:)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, association,
or corporation.
(2)(a) "Nonhighway vehicle" means any motorized vehicle when used
for recreation travel on trails and nonhighway roads or for recreation
cross-country travel on any one of the following or a combination
thereof: Land, water, snow, ice, marsh, swampland, and other natural
terrain. Such vehicles include but are not limited to, off-road
vehicles, two, three, or four-wheel vehicles, motorcycles, four-wheel
drive vehicles, dune buggies, amphibious vehicles, ground effects or
air cushion vehicles, and any other means of land transportation
deriving motive power from any source other than muscle or wind.
(b) Nonhighway vehicle does not include:
(((1))) (i) Any vehicle designed primarily for travel on, over, or
in the water;
(((2))) (ii) Snowmobiles or any military vehicles; or
(((3))) (iii) Any vehicle eligible for a motor vehicle fuel tax
exemption or rebate under chapter 82.36 RCW while an exemption or
rebate is claimed. This exemption includes but is not limited to farm,
construction, and logging vehicles.
(3) "Off-road vehicle" or "ORV" means any nonhighway vehicle when
used for cross-country travel on trails or on any one of the following
or a combination thereof: Land, water, snow, ice, marsh, swampland and
other natural terrain.
(4) "ORV use permit" means a permit issued for operation of an off-road vehicle under this chapter.
(5) "ORV trail" means a multiple-use corridor designated and
maintained for recreational travel by off-road vehicles that is not
normally suitable for travel by conventional two-wheel drive vehicles
and is posted or designated by the managing authority of the property
that the trail traverses as permitting ORV travel.
(6) "ORV use area" means the entire area of a parcel of land
((except for camping and approved buffer areas)) that is posted or
designated for ORV use in accordance with rules adopted by the managing
authority.
(7) "ORV recreation facility" includes ORV trails, ORV campgrounds,
and ORV use areas.
(8) "Owner" means the person other than the lienholder, having an
interest in or title to a nonhighway vehicle, and entitled to the use
or possession thereof.
(9) "Operator" means each person who operates, or is in physical
control of, any nonhighway vehicle.
(10) "Dealer" means a person, partnership, association, or
corporation engaged in the business of selling off-road vehicles at
wholesale or retail in this state.
(11) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(12) "Hunt" means any effort to kill, injure, capture, or purposely
disturb a wild animal or wild bird.
(13) "Nonhighway road" means any road owned or managed by a public
agency, or any private road for which the owner has granted a permanent
easement for public use of the road, other than a highway generally
capable of travel by a conventional two-wheel drive passenger
automobile during most of the year and in use by such vehicles and that
is not built or maintained with appropriations from the motor vehicle
fund.
(14) "Nonhighway road recreation facilities" means recreational
trails and facilities that are accessed by nonhighway roads and are
intended solely for nonmotorized recreational uses.
(15) "Highway," for the purpose of this chapter only, means the
entire width between the boundary lines of every way publicly
maintained by the state department of transportation or any county or
city when any part thereof is generally open to the use of the public
for purposes of vehicular travel as a matter of right.
(16) "Organized competitive event" means any competition,
advertised in advance through written notice to organized clubs or
published in local newspapers, sponsored by recognized clubs, and
conducted at a predetermined time and place.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.09.170 and 1995 c 166 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on the tax rate in effect January 1, 1990, less proper deductions
for refunds and costs of collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090. The
treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as follows:
(a) Forty percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for planning, maintenance, and management of ORV recreation
facilities, nonhighway roads, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities. The funds under this subsection shall be expended in
accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than five percent may be expended for information
programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than ((ten)) thirty percent and not more than fifty
percent may be expended for ORV recreation facilities;
(iii) Not more than twenty-five percent may be expended for
maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(iv) Not more than fifty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(v) Ten percent shall be transferred to the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation for grants to law enforcement agencies in those
counties where the department of natural resources maintains ORV
facilities. This amount is in addition to those distributions made by
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under (d)(i) of this
subsection;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of nonhighway roads and recreation
facilities;
(c) ((Two)) Four percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the parks and recreation
commission solely for the maintenance and management of ORV use areas
and facilities and nonhighway road recreation projects including but
not limited to campgrounds, trails, restrooms, interpretive facilities,
and signage; and
(d) ((Fifty-four)) Fifty-two and one-half percent, together with
the funds received by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation
under RCW 46.09.110, shall be credited to the nonhighway and off-road
vehicle activities program account to be administered by the committee
for planning, acquisition, development, maintenance, and management of
ORV recreation facilities and nonhighway road recreation facilities;
((ORV)) user education and information; and ((ORV)) law enforcement
programs. The funds under this subsection shall be expended in
accordance with the following limitations:
(i) ((Not more than twenty)) Fifty percent ((may)) must be expended
on facilities consistent with the results of the fuel use study
required in subsection (3) of this section for nonhighway road
recreation projects or nonhighway and ORV education, information, and
law enforcement programs under this chapter. For the purposes of this
subsection, nonhighway road recreation projects include, but are not
limited to, campgrounds, trails, restrooms, interpretive facilities,
signage, and building maintenance;
(ii) Of the amount not expended in (d)(i) of this subsection not
less than an amount equal to the funds received by the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation under RCW 46.09.110 and not more than
sixty percent may be expended for ORV recreation facilities;
(iii) Of the amount not expended in (d)(i) of this subsection not
more than ((twenty)) sixty percent may be expended for nonhighway road
recreation facilities.
(2) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2007, and updated every six years thereafter
in conjunction with updating the plan required in RCW 46.09.250, the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall contract with an
independent entity to study the source and make recommendations on the
distribution and use of funds provided to off-road vehicle and
nonhighway road recreational activities under this section. The study
must determine the relative portion of the motor vehicle fuel tax
revenues that are attributable to vehicles operating off-road or on
nonhighway roads for recreational purposes as provided in this section.
The study must include the types of vehicles and location of their use,
the types of recreational activities, the types of recreational
facilities used, and the recreational use of forest roads relative to
other, nonrecreational uses.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.09.280 and 1986 c 206 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall establish
((a committee of nonhighway road recreationists, including
representatives of organized ORV groups,)) the nonhighway and off-road
vehicle advisory committee to provide advice regarding the
administration of this chapter. The nonhighway and off-road vehicle
advisory committee consists of a proportional representation of persons
with recreational experience in areas identified in the most recent
fuel use study as required by RCW 46.09.170(3). Only representatives
of organized ORV groups may be voting members of the committee with
respect to expenditure of funds received under RCW 46.09.110.

--- END ---