BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
encourage and expand the commercial generation of electrical power from
alternative energy sources to meet the long-term energy needs of the
state. It is the further intent that incentives provided by the state
encourage free-market principles that foster technological innovation
and entrepreneurial investment in alternative energy sources. This
intent is best served by encouraging commercially viable, independent
generators of alternative energy-based electrical power to provide such
power to established utility distribution networks.
It is also the intent of the legislature that, to promote the use
of alternative energy sources for the purpose of electrical generation,
tax incentives should be provided in RCW 82.08.02567 and 82.12.02567
for the acquisition of certain machinery and equipment to all
qualifying sectors of the state economy, including industrial,
commercial, and residential.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.02567 and 2001 c 213 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment used directly in generating electricity using
((fuel cells, wind, sun, or landfill gas as the principal source of
power)) renewable resources or fuel cells, or to sales of or charges
made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such
machinery and equipment((, but only if the purchaser develops with such
machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not
less than two hundred watts of electricity and provides)). The
purchaser must provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a
form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain
a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02567:
(a) "Landfill gas" means biomass fuel of the type qualified for
federal tax credits under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 collected from a landfill.
"Landfill" means a landfill as defined under RCW 70.95.030;
(b) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities that are integral and necessary to the
generation of electricity using ((wind, sun, or landfill gas as the
principal source of power)) renewable resources or fuel cells;
(c) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (i) Hand-powered
tools; (ii) property with a useful life of less than one year; (iii)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (iv) replacement parts that do not increase
productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of
machinery and equipment; (v) buildings; or (vi) building fixtures that
are not integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that
are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building;
(d) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity ((with fuel cells or by wind energy, solar energy, or
landfill gas power)) using renewable resources or fuel cells if it
provides any part of the process that captures the energy ((of the
wind, sun, or landfill gas)), converts that energy to electricity, and
stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for entry into or
operation in parallel with electric transmission and distribution
systems;
(e) "Fuel cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates
electricity by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence
of a catalyst;
(f) "Renewable resources" means wind energy, solar energy,
hydroelectric energy, geothermal energy, landfill gas, biomass energy
based on animal waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or
field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include wood
pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as
creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome arsenic.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2009)) 2018.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.02567 and 2001 c 213 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply with respect to
machinery and equipment used directly in generating ((not less than two
hundred watts of)) electricity using ((wind, sun, or landfill gas as
the principal source of power)) renewable resources or fuel cells.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this section.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2009)) 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax under this chapter, a light and power business
may deduct from gross income amounts equal to the cost of production
from an electrical generating facility using renewable resources or
fuel cells.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in RCW
82.08.02567 apply.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2018.

--- END ---