BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08.280 and 1987 c 406 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If any person receiving public assistance has demonstrated an
inability to care for oneself or for money, the department may direct
the payment of the installments of public assistance to any responsible
person, social service agency, or corporation or to a legally appointed
guardian for his benefit. The state may contract with persons, social
service agencies, or corporations approved by the department to provide
protective payee services for a fixed amount per recipient receiving
protective payee services to cover administrative costs. The
department may by rule specify a fee to cover administrative costs.
Such fee shall not be withheld from a recipient's grant.
(2) The department shall direct the payment of the installments of
public assistance to any reasonable person, social service agency, or
corporation, if the person receiving public assistance has failed to
pay rent by the due date provided for in the rental agreement two or
more times in a twelve-month period, commencing with the date of the
first violation, after service of a three-day notice to comply or
vacate under the provisions of RCW 59.12.030(3).
(3) If the state requires the appointment of a guardian for
((this)) the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, the department
shall pay all costs and reasonable fees as fixed by the court.

--- END ---