BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95.510 and 1989 c 431 s 92 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied a ((one dollar)) seventy-five cents per tire
fee on the retail sale of new replacement vehicle tires for a period of
five years, beginning ((October 1, 1989)) on the effective date of this
act. The fee imposed in this section shall be paid by the buyer to the
seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full amount of
the fee. The fee collected from the buyer by the seller, less the ten
percent amount retained by the seller as provided in ((RCW 70.95.535))
subsection (4) of this section, shall be paid to the department of
revenue in accordance with RCW 82.32.045, and the proceeds remaining
after the deposit required by subsection (3) of this section, must be
deposited into the vehicle tire recycling account created under section
2 of this act. All other applicable provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW
have full force and application with respect to the fee imposed under
this section. The department of revenue shall administer this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "new replacement vehicle
tires" means tires that are newly manufactured for vehicle purposes and
used tires available for resale, but does not include retreaded vehicle
tires.
(3) Of the seventy-five cent fee imposed in subsection (1) of this
section, twenty-five cents must be deposited into the motor vehicle
account and must be used by the department of transportation for road
maintenance, which may incorporate the use of material derived from
scrap tires.
(4) Every person engaged in making retail sales of new replacement
vehicle tires in this state shall retain ten percent of the collected
seventy-five cent fee imposed in subsection (1) of this section. The
moneys retained may be used for costs associated with the proper
management of the waste vehicle tires by the retailer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The vehicle tire recycling account is created within the state
treasury. After the deposit of funds into the motor vehicle account as
provided for in RCW 70.95.510(3), the remaining funds received under
RCW 70.95.510(1) must be deposited in the vehicle tire recycling
account and used by the department for purposes including but not
limited to those specified in RCW 70.95.535. Expenditures from the
account may occur only after appropriation by the legislature. The
department of revenue shall deduct two percent from the funds collected
under RCW 70.95.510 for the purpose of administering and collecting the
fee from new replacement tire retailers.
(2) Moneys in the vehicle tire recycling account may be
appropriated to the department for the purposes identified in RCW
70.95.535.
(3) To provide increased accountability, by January 1st of each
year, the department shall submit a report to the legislature outlining
how the revenues deposited into the vehicle tire recycling account were
used over the previous twelve-month period. The report must include,
but is not limited to, identifying the local jurisdictions that
received grant funding, the location and description of any illegal
tire piles cleaned up, a description of any scrap tire demonstration
projects funded, and the status of the statewide tire carrier tracking
system.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.95.535 and 1989 c 431 s 93 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Every person engaged in making retail sales of new
replacement vehicle tires in this state shall retain ten percent of the
collected one dollar fee. The moneys retained may be used for costs
associated with the proper management of the waste vehicle tires by the
retailer.
(2))) The department of ecology ((will)) may administer the funds
contained in the vehicle tire recycling account for ((the)) purposes
((specified in RCW 70.95.020(5))) including, but not limited to:
(a) ((Making grants to local governments for pilot demonstration
projects for on-site shredding and recycling of tires from unauthorized
dump sites;
(b))) Grants to local government for enforcement programs;
(((c))) (b) Implementation of a public information and education
program to include posters, signs, and informational materials to be
distributed to retail tire sales and tire service outlets;
(((d))) (c) Product marketing studies for recycled tires and
alternatives to land disposal;
(d) Scrap tire demonstration projects including those implemented
by state agencies;
(e) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, statewide
unlawful tire pile cleanups and local citizen scrap tire amnesty
events;
(f) Statewide tire carrier tracking, reporting, and enforcement of
the movement of tires within this state;
(g) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to
provide for funding to state and local governments for the removal of
discarded vehicle tires from unauthorized tire dump sites;
(h) To accomplish the other purposes of RCW 70.95.020(6).
(2) Prior to spending funds from the vehicle tire recycling account
for the removal or cleanup of unlawfully disposed tires, the department
must ensure that all legal remedies and cost recovery efforts available
against the owner of the unlawfully disposed tires, or the property on
which the unlawful tire piles are located, have been exhausted. The
department should assist local jurisdictions, where appropriate, with
enforcement actions against individuals unlawfully disposing of tires.
(3)(a) Local governments that are recipients of grant funding for
enforcement programs must submit an annual report to the department for
each year the grant funding is expended, detailing the uses of the
funds and including information on what enforcement activities were
supported with the grant funds.
(b) Local governments that are recipients of grant funding for
illegal tire pile cleanups shall submit an annual report to the
department for each year the grant funding is expended. The report
must, at a minimum, identify the owners of the tire piles, the
locations of the tire piles cleaned up, how many tires were removed,
where and how the tires were disposed, and why cost recovery could not
be obtained from the owners of the tire piles. The department shall
forward this information to the legislature on an annual basis.
(4) In spending funds in the account under this section, the
department shall identify communities with the most severe problems
with waste tires and provide funds first to those communities to remove
accumulations of waste tires.
(5) It is the intent of the legislature that in spending funds from
the vehicle tire recycling account, the department will not implement
a program or otherwise spend funds that competes with private
businesses that engage in tire recycling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department of ecology shall
implement an educational campaign for a period of one year, beginning
no later than twelve months following the effective date of this act,
to inform and educate local jurisdictions and the various vehicle tire
industries who sell, dispose of, and recycle vehicle tires, on the
current laws related to vehicle tire disposal and recycling, and the
current vehicle tire recycling program administered by the department.
(2) By September 1, 2003, the department shall submit a report to
the legislature on illegal tire piles located in the state. At a
minimum, the report must include information identifying every known
illegal tire pile in the state, the city and county where each illegal
tire pile is located, the estimated number of tires in each illegal
tire pile, and the expected cost associated with cleaning up each
illegal tire pile.
(3) Moneys from the vehicle tire recycling account may be used to
fund this section.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 70.95.530 (Vehicle tire recycling
account -- Use) and 1988 c 250 s 1 & 1985 c 345 s 7 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---