BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some students
have a potential for success in postsecondary education that is not
reflected in their grades or test scores from high school. The
legislature further finds that these students may be more likely to
consider pursuing postsecondary education if there were additional
financial assistance to encourage them. Therefore it is the
legislature's intent to include in the Washington promise scholarship
program, on a pilot basis, an opportunity for principals to nominate
high school graduates who would not otherwise be eligible for a promise
scholarship but who have overcome personal or financial barriers and
show promise to succeed if given the opportunity to pursue a
postsecondary education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.119
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the graduating class of 2004 and ending with the
graduating class of 2006, each principal of a public or approved
private high school under chapter 28A.195 RCW may nominate a limited
number of students to receive a Washington promise scholarship under
this section. Nominations shall be for students who have demonstrated
strength of character in overcoming physical, personal, cultural, or
financial barriers to their educational success and give evidence of a
desire and commitment to complete a postsecondary educational program
or degree. The academic and financial eligibility criteria in RCW
28B.119.010 do not apply to students nominated under this section.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall establish a
planning committee to develop criteria for and assist with the
selection of Washington promise scholars under this section. For ease
of administration, the board may use the planning committee established
in RCW 28A.600.130 and develop similar nomination and selection
processes as those used in administering the Washington scholars
program under RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150. The board shall
collaborate with the Washington association of secondary school
principals, other state education agencies, and private education
organizations in fulfilling its responsibilities under this section.
(3) The Washington association of secondary school principals shall
submit to the higher education coordinating board the names of
graduating senior high school students who have been nominated by their
principals under this section.
(4) Each year the higher education coordinating board, with the
assistance of the planning committee in subsection (2) of this section,
shall select five graduating students residing in each legislative
district in the state from the students nominated under this section.
Selected students are eligible to receive a Washington promise
scholarship.
(5) The higher education coordinating board shall conduct an
evaluation of the scholarships granted under this section and report to
the education and higher education committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2006, with recommendations on whether to continue or revise
the eligibility for promise scholarships created in this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.119.010 and 2002 c 204 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall design the Washington
promise scholarship program based on the following parameters:
(1) Scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating from
public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW and
students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter
28A.200 RCW who meet both an academic and a financial eligibility
criteria, or who are selected to receive a scholarship under the
process in section 2 of this act.
(a) Academic eligibility criteria shall be defined as follows:
(i) Beginning with the graduating class of 2002, students
graduating from public and approved private high schools under chapter
28A.195 RCW must be in the top fifteen percent of their graduating
class, as identified by each respective high school at the completion
of the first term of the student's senior year; or
(ii) Students graduating from public high schools, approved private
high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, and students participating in
home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW must equal or
exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment test I score of twelve
hundred on their first attempt or must equal or exceed a composite
American college test score of twenty-seven on their first attempt.
(b) To meet the financial eligibility criteria, a student's family
income shall not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent of the state
median family income adjusted for family size, as determined by the
higher education coordinating board for each graduating class.
Students not meeting the eligibility requirements for the first year of
scholarship benefits may reapply for the second year of benefits, but
must still meet the income standard set by the board for the student's
graduating class.
(2) Promise scholarships are not intended to supplant any grant,
scholarship, or tax program related to postsecondary education. If the
board finds that promise scholarships supplant or reduce any grant,
scholarship, or tax program for categories of students, then the board
shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of
scholarship to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.
(3) Within available funds, each qualifying student shall receive
two consecutive annual awards, the value of each not to exceed the
full-time annual resident tuition rates charged by Washington's
community colleges. The higher education coordinating board shall
award scholarships to as many students as possible from among those
qualifying under this section.
(4) By October 15th of each year, the board shall determine the
award amount of the scholarships, after taking into consideration the
availability of funds.
(5) The scholarships may only be used for undergraduate coursework
at accredited institutions of higher education in the state of
Washington.
(6) The scholarships may be used for undergraduate coursework at
Oregon institutions of higher education that are part of the border
county higher education opportunity project in RCW 28B.80.806 when
those institutions offer programs not available at accredited
institutions of higher education in Washington state.
(7) The scholarships may be used for college-related expenses,
including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books, and
materials.
(8) The scholarships may not be awarded to any student who is
pursuing a degree in theology.
(9) The higher education coordinating board may establish
satisfactory progress standards for the continued receipt of the
promise scholarship.
(10) The higher education coordinating board shall establish the
time frame within which the student must use the scholarship.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires June 30, 2008.

--- END ---