BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to accommodate infill development and thereby realize
the goals and policies of comprehensive plans adopted according to
chapter 36.70A RCW, a city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 is
authorized by this section to establish categorical exemptions from the
requirements of this chapter. An exemption adopted under this section
applies even if it differs from the categorical exemptions adopted by
rule of the department under RCW 43.21C.110(1)(a). An exemption may be
adopted by a city or county under this section if it meets the
following criteria:
(a) It categorically exempts government action related to
development that is new residential or mixed-use development proposed
to fill in an urban growth area designated according to RCW 36.70A.110,
where current density and intensity of use in the area is lower than
called for in the goals and policies of the applicable comprehensive
plan;
(b) It does not exempt government action related to development
that would exceed the density or intensity of use called for in the
goals and policies of the applicable comprehensive plan; and
(c) The city or county's applicable comprehensive plan was
previously subjected to environmental analysis through an environmental
impact statement under the requirements of this chapter prior to
adoption.
(2) Any categorical exemption adopted by a city or county under
this section shall be subject to the rules of the department adopted
according to RCW 43.21C.110(1)(a) that provide exceptions to the use of
categorical exemptions adopted by the department.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21C.240 and 1995 c 347 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the requirements of subsection (2) of this section are
satisfied, a county, city, or town reviewing a project action ((may))
shall determine that the requirements for environmental analysis,
protection, and mitigation measures in the county, city, or town's
development regulations and comprehensive plans adopted under chapter
36.70A RCW, and in other applicable local, state, or federal laws and
rules provide adequate analysis of and mitigation for the specific
adverse environmental impacts of the project action to which the
requirements apply. Rules adopted by the department according to RCW
43.21C.110 regarding project specific impacts that may not have been
adequately addressed apply to any determination made under this
section. In these situations, in which all adverse environmental
impacts will be mitigated below the level of significance as a result
of voluntary measures by the proponent and/or regulatory requirements
of development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW or other
local, state, or federal laws, a determination of nonsignificance or a
mitigated determination of nonsignificance is the proper threshold
determination.
(2) A county, city, or town ((may)) shall make the determination
provided for in subsection (1) of this section if:
(a) In the course of project review, including any required
environmental analysis, the local government considers the specific
probable adverse environmental impacts of the proposed action and
determines that these specific impacts are adequately addressed by the
development regulations or other applicable requirements of the
comprehensive plan, subarea plan element of the comprehensive plan, or
other local, state, or federal rules or laws; and
(b) The local government bases or conditions its approval on
compliance with these requirements or mitigation measures.
(3) If a county, city, or town's comprehensive plans, subarea
plans, and development regulations adequately address a project's
probable specific adverse environmental impacts, as determined under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the county, city, or town
shall not impose additional mitigation under this chapter during
project review. Project review shall be integrated with environmental
analysis under this chapter.
(4) A comprehensive plan, subarea plan, or development regulation
shall be considered to adequately address an impact if the county,
city, or town, through the planning and environmental review process
under chapter 36.70A RCW and this chapter, has identified the specific
adverse environmental impacts and:
(a) The impacts have been avoided or otherwise mitigated; or
(b) The legislative body of the county, city, or town has
designated as acceptable certain levels of service, land use
designations, development standards, or other land use planning
required or allowed by chapter 36.70A RCW.
(5) In deciding whether a specific adverse environmental impact has
been addressed by an existing rule or law of another agency with
jurisdiction with environmental expertise with regard to a specific
environmental impact, the county, city, or town shall consult orally or
in writing with that agency and may expressly defer to that agency. In
making this deferral, the county, city, or town shall base or condition
its project approval on compliance with these other existing rules or
laws.
(6) Nothing in this section limits the authority of an agency in
its review or mitigation of a project to adopt or otherwise rely on
environmental analyses and requirements under other laws, as provided
by this chapter.
(7) This section shall apply only to a county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---