BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.379 and 2000 c 103 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the property tax exemption authorized by
Article VII, section 10 of the state Constitution should be made
available on the basis of a retired person's ability to pay property
taxes((. The legislature further finds)) and that the best measure of
a retired person's ability to pay taxes is that person's disposable
income as defined in RCW 84.36.383. The legislature further finds that
veterans with one hundred percent service-connected disabilities have
given so much to our country that they deserve property tax relief.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.36.381 and 1998 c 333 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person shall be exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a
portion of the amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and
payable in the year following the year in which a claim is filed, and
thereafter, in accordance with the following:
(1) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence
which was occupied by the person claiming the exemption as a principal
place of residence as of the time of filing: PROVIDED, That any person
who sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or her residence may
transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement residence, but no
claimant shall receive an exemption on more than one residence in any
year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That confinement of the person to a hospital
or nursing home shall not disqualify the claim of exemption if:
(a) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;
(b) The residence is occupied by a spouse and/or a person
financially dependent on the claimant for support; or
(c) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home
or hospital costs;
(2) The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time
of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the
residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the
person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, such person must own a share
therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he
or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned
by each spouse or cotenant, and any lease for life shall be deemed a
life estate;
(3) The person claiming the exemption must be sixty-one years of
age or older on December 31st of the year in which the exemption claim
is filed, or must have been, at the time of filing, retired from
regular gainful employment by reason of physical disability: PROVIDED,
That any surviving spouse of a person who was receiving an exemption at
the time of the person's death shall qualify if the surviving spouse is
fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements
of this section;
(4) Except for veterans of the armed forces of the United States
with one hundred percent service-connected disabilities, the amount
that the person shall be exempt from an obligation to pay shall be
calculated on the basis of combined disposable income, as defined in
RCW 84.36.383. If the person claiming the exemption was retired for
two months or more of the assessment year, the combined disposable
income of such person shall be calculated by multiplying the average
monthly combined disposable income of such person during the months
such person was retired by twelve. If the income of the person
claiming exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment
year by reason of the death of the person's spouse, or when other
substantial changes occur in disposable income that are likely to
continue for an indefinite period of time, the combined disposable
income of such person shall be calculated by multiplying the average
monthly combined disposable income of such person after such
occurrences by twelve. If it is necessary to estimate income to comply
with this subsection, the assessor may require confirming documentation
of such income prior to May 31 of the year following application;
(5)(a) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less or who
is a veteran of the armed forces of the United States with a one
hundred percent service-connected disability shall be exempt from all
excess property taxes; and
(b)(i) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of twenty-four thousand dollars or less
but greater than eighteen thousand dollars shall be exempt from all
regular property taxes on the greater of forty thousand dollars or
thirty-five percent of the valuation of his or her residence, but not
to exceed sixty thousand dollars of the valuation of his or her
residence; or
(ii) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a
combined disposable income of eighteen thousand dollars or less or who
is a veteran of the armed forces of the United States with a one
hundred percent service-connected disability shall be exempt from all
regular property taxes on the greater of fifty thousand dollars or
sixty percent of the valuation of his or her residence; and
(6) For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less or who
is a veteran of the armed forces of the United States with a one
hundred percent service-connected disability, the valuation of the
residence shall be the assessed value of the residence on the later of
January 1, 1995, or January 1st of the assessment year the person first
qualifies under this section. If the person subsequently fails to
qualify under this section only for one year because of high income,
this same valuation shall be used upon requalification. If the person
fails to qualify for more than one year in succession because of high
income or fails to qualify for any other reason, the valuation upon
requalification shall be the assessed value on January 1st of the
assessment year in which the person requalifies. If the person
transfers the exemption under this section to a different residence,
the valuation of the different residence shall be the assessed value of
the different residence on January 1st of the assessment year in which
the person transfers the exemption.
In no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater than
the true and fair value of the residence on January 1st of the
assessment year.
This subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to the
property in the year in which the improvements are made. Subsequent
improvements to the property shall be added to the value otherwise
determined under this subsection at their true and fair value in the
year in which they are made.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.36.383 and 1999 c 358 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the
context clearly indicates a different meaning:
(1) The term "residence" means a single family dwelling unit
whether such unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling,
including the land on which such dwelling stands not to exceed one
acre. The term shall also include a share ownership in a cooperative
housing association, corporation, or partnership if the person claiming
exemption can establish that his or her share represents the specific
unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The term
shall also include a single family dwelling situated upon lands the fee
of which is vested in the United States or any instrumentality thereof
including an Indian tribe or in the state of Washington, and
notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a
residence shall be deemed real property.
(2) The term "real property" shall also include a mobile home which
has substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its
being fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the
mobile home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed
pipe, connections with sewer, water, or other utilities. A mobile home
located on land leased by the owner of the mobile home is subject, for
tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the personal
property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.
(3) "Department" means the state department of revenue.
(4) "Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the
person claiming the exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her
spouse, and the disposable income of each cotenant occupying the
residence for the assessment year, less amounts paid by the person
claiming the exemption or his or her spouse during the assessment year
for:
(a) Drugs supplied by prescription of a medical practitioner
authorized by the laws of this state or another jurisdiction to issue
prescriptions; and
(b) The treatment or care of either person received in the home or
in a nursing home.
(5) "Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in
the federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989,
or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent
with the purpose of this section, plus all of the following items to
the extent they are not included in or have been deducted from adjusted
gross income:
(a) Capital gains, other than gain excluded from income under
section 121 of the federal internal revenue code to the extent it is
reinvested in a new principal residence;
(b) Amounts deducted for loss;
(c) Amounts deducted for depreciation;
(d) Pension and annuity receipts;
(e) Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and
medical-aid payments;
(f) Veterans benefits, other than attendant-care and medical-aid
payments, and benefits for a one hundred percent service-connected
disability;
(g) Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;
(h) Dividend receipts; and
(i) Interest received on state and municipal bonds.
(6) "Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming
the exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2004 and thereafter.

--- END ---