BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that parents have a crucial role in the
education of their children. The legislature also finds that one of
the most effective ways to increase achievement, raise attendance
rates, and improve student behavior is to strengthen partnerships
between parents and schools. The legislature intends to strengthen the
role of parents in that partnership by giving parents an opportunity to
provide a tangible reward for the extraordinary efforts of those
teachers who raise academic achievement or help students succeed in
other important facets of education.
(2) School districts may provide parent-based performance pay to
classroom teachers and educational staff associates who meet one or
more of the criteria developed by the professional educator standards
board under subsection (3) of this section. In providing the parent-based performance pay, school districts shall meet the conditions in
this subsection.
(a) Parent-based performance pay shall be provided solely from
local funds through supplemental contracts under RCW 28A.400.200.
(b) A parent council, appointed by the school principal, shall
determine the criteria used to distribute parent-based performance pay
to certificated teachers and certificated educational staff associates
in each school. The council shall consist of nine to fifteen parents
who each have at least one child enrolled in the school, do not have
any conflicts of interest, are not employees or the spouses of
employees of any school district, and are not members of any employee
bargaining unit. Members of the parent council shall serve two-year
terms and may serve a maximum of three terms.
(c) Using the one or more items from the criteria developed by the
professional educator standards board, the parent council shall select
the criteria used to determine which employees receive the performance
pay and the amount the recipients shall receive. The parent council
may select the recipients of the pay and the amount each recipient
shall receive, at the option of the parent council.
(d) Beginning with maintenance and operations levies submitted to
the voters after January 1, 2004, each school district board of
directors may reserve a minimum of twenty percent of the funds provided
by each maintenance and operation levy for parent-based performance
pay. For parent-based performance pay, the amount of the funding,
selection criteria, selection process, number of recipients, amount of
each award, timing, membership on the parent council, and all other
aspects of the pay are not subject to collective bargaining. All funds
collected for parent-based performance pay shall be used solely for
that purpose.
(3) By December 31, 2003, the professional educator standards board
shall adopt the criteria to be used by each parent council. The
criteria, created in consultation with the academic achievement and
accountability commission, shall be based on student achievement, and
at least sixty percent of the criteria shall emphasize student
achievement or improvement on objective assessment measures including
the Washington assessment of student learning. In addition, the board
shall:
(a) Biennially survey parent councils on the criteria and collect
from them information on the outcomes of the performance pay; and
(b) Review and may modify the criteria on a six-year cycle.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2002 c 353 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter,
allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section.
(2)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be
less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and
(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a masters
degree shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
masters degree and zero years of service;
(3)(a) The actual average salary paid to certificated instructional
staff shall not exceed the district's average certificated
instructional staff salary used for the state basic education
allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410.
(b) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional
staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
For purposes of this section, fringe benefits shall not include payment
for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer
contributions for old age survivors insurance, workers' compensation,
unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits under the Washington
state retirement system; or employer contributions for health benefits
in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.
(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary
and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic
education program.
(4) Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may
exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by
separate contract for additional time, additional responsibilities, or
incentives. Incentives shall include parent-based performance pay
under section 1 of this act. Supplemental contracts shall not cause
the state to incur any present or future funding obligation. With the
exception of supplemental contracts for parent-based performance pay,
supplemental contracts shall be subject to the collective bargaining
provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240,
shall not exceed one year, and if not renewed shall not constitute
adverse change in accordance with RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380.
No district may enter into a supplemental contract under this
subsection for the provision of services which are a part of the basic
education program required by Article IX, section 3 of the state
Constitution.
(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply
with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

--- END ---