BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.40.460 and 1999 c 372 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary, assistant secretary, or the secretary's designee
shall manage and administer the department's juvenile rehabilitation
responsibilities, including but not limited to the operation of all
state institutions or facilities used for juvenile rehabilitation.
The secretary or assistant secretary shall:
(1) Prepare a biennial budget request sufficient to meet the
confinement and rehabilitative needs of the juvenile rehabilitation
program, as forecast by the office of financial management;
(2) Create by rule a formal system for inmate classification. This
classification system shall consider:
(a) Public safety;
(b) Internal security and staff safety;
(c) Rehabilitative resources both within and outside the
department;
(d) An assessment of each offender's risk of sexually aggressive
behavior as provided in RCW 13.40.470; and
(e) An assessment of each offender's vulnerability to sexually
aggressive behavior as provided in RCW 13.40.470;
(3) Develop agreements with local jurisdictions to develop regional
facilities with a variety of custody levels;
(4) Adopt rules establishing effective disciplinary policies to
maintain order within institutions;
(5) Develop a comprehensive diagnostic evaluation process to be
used at intake, including but not limited to evaluation for substance
addiction or abuse, literacy, learning disabilities, fetal alcohol
syndrome or effect, attention deficit disorder, and mental health;
(6) Develop placement criteria:
(a) To avoid assigning youth who present a moderate or high risk of
sexually aggressive behavior to the same sleeping quarters as youth
assessed as vulnerable to sexual victimization under RCW
13.40.470(1)(c); and
(b) To avoid placing a juvenile offender on parole status who has
been assessed as a moderate to high risk for sexually aggressive
behavior in a department community residential program with another
child who is: (i) Dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW, or an at-risk
youth or child in need of services under chapter 13.32A RCW; and (ii)
not also a juvenile offender on parole status; ((and))
(7) Develop a plan to implement, by July 1, 1995:
(a) Substance abuse treatment programs for all state juvenile
rehabilitation facilities and institutions;
(b) Vocational education and instruction programs at all state
juvenile rehabilitation facilities and institutions; and
(c) An educational program to establish self-worth and
responsibility in juvenile offenders. This educational program shall
emphasize instruction in character-building principles such as:
Respect for self, others, and authority; victim awareness;
accountability; work ethics; good citizenship; and life skills; and
(8) Ensure that in all facilities and institutions used for
juvenile rehabilitation:
(a) Rules are developed related to custodial assaults consistent
with RCW 72.01.045; and
(b) Custodial assaults under RCW 9A.36.100 are reported to local
law enforcement.

--- END ---