BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.330 and 1998 c 321 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall
transfer into the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this section from the general fund the sum of four
million six hundred thousand dollars divided into four equal deposits
occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For each
fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the total
transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025,
forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial management in
November of the preceding year. The moneys deposited in the municipal
criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this
section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection (4)
of this section, shall be distributed to the cities of the state as
follows:
(a) Twenty percent appropriated for distribution shall be
distributed to cities with a three-year average violent crime rate for
each one thousand in population in excess of one hundred fifty percent
of the statewide three-year average violent crime rate for each one
thousand in population. The three-year average violent crime rate
shall be calculated using the violent crime rates for each of the
preceding three years from the annual reports on crime in Washington
state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs. Moneys shall be distributed under this subsection (1)(a)
ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management, but no city may receive more than one dollar per
capita. Moneys remaining undistributed under this subsection at the
end of each calendar year shall be distributed to the criminal justice
training commission to reimburse participating city law enforcement
agencies with ten or fewer full-time commissioned patrol officers the
cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic
law enforcement training, as provided in RCW 43.101.200.
(b) Sixteen percent shall be distributed to cities ratably based on
population as last determined by the office of financial management,
but no city may receive less than one thousand dollars.
The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under this subsection shall be distributed at
such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150.
Moneys distributed under this subsection shall be expended
exclusively for criminal justice purposes and shall not be used to
replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal justice purposes are
defined as activities that substantially assist the criminal justice
system, which may include circumstances where ancillary benefit to the
civil justice system occurs, and which includes domestic violence
services such as those provided by domestic violence programs,
community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020.
Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar
year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes.
Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice
purposes exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events
not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal
justice services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction
receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.
(2) In addition to the distributions under subsection (1) of this
section:
(a) ((Fourteen percent shall be distributed to cities that have
initiated innovative law enforcement strategies, including alternative
sentencing and crime prevention programs. No city may receive more
than one dollar per capita under this subsection (2)(a))) Ten percent
shall be distributed on a per capita basis to cities that contract with
another governmental agency for the majority of the city's law
enforcement services. Cities that subsequently qualify for this
distribution shall notify the department of community, trade, and
economic development by November 30th for the upcoming calendar year.
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall
provide a list of eligible cities to the state treasurer by December
31st. The state treasurer shall modify the distribution of these funds
in the following year. Cities have the responsibility to notify the
department of community, trade, and economic development of any changes
regarding these contractual relationships. Adjustments in the
distribution formula to add or delete cities may be made only for the
upcoming calendar year; no adjustments may be made retroactively.
(b) ((Twenty percent shall be distributed to cities that have
initiated programs to help at-risk children or child abuse victim
response programs. No city may receive more than fifty cents per
capita under this subsection (2)(b).
(c) Twenty percent shall be distributed to cities that have
initiated programs designed to reduce the level of domestic violence
within their jurisdictions or to provide counseling for domestic
violence victims. No city may receive more than fifty cents per capita
under this subsection (2)(c).
(d) Ten percent shall be distributed to cities that contract with
another governmental agency for a majority of the city's law
enforcement services.
Moneys distributed under this subsection shall be distributed to
those cities that submit funding requests under this subsection to the
department of community, trade, and economic development based on
criteria developed under RCW 82.14.335. Allocation of funds shall be
in proportion to the population of qualified jurisdictions, but the
distribution to a city shall not exceed the amount of funds requested.
Cities shall submit requests for program funding to the department of
community, trade, and economic development by November 1 of each year
for funding the following year. The department shall certify to the
state treasurer the cities eligible for funding under this subsection
and the amount of each allocation)) The remaining fifty-four percent
shall be distributed to cities and towns by the state treasurer on a
per capita basis. These funds shall be used for: (i) Innovative law
enforcement strategies; (ii) programs to help at-risk children or child
abuse victim response programs; and (iii) programs designed to reduce
the level of domestic violence or to provide counseling for domestic
violence victims.
The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under this subsection, less any moneys
appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of this section, shall
be distributed at the times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150. Moneys remaining undistributed under this subsection at the
end of each calendar year shall be distributed to the criminal justice
training commission to reimburse participating city law enforcement
agencies with ten or fewer full-time commissioned patrol officers the
cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic
law enforcement training, as provided in RCW 43.101.200.
If a city is found by the state auditor to have expended funds
received under this subsection in a manner that does not comply with
the criteria under which the moneys were received, the city shall be
ineligible to receive future distributions under this subsection until
the use of the moneys are justified to the satisfaction of the director
or are repaid to the state general fund. ((The director may allow
noncomplying use of moneys received under this subsection upon a
showing of hardship or other emergent need.))
(3) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the
distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals
its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the
county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or
3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located.
(4) Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the
municipal criminal justice assistance account shall be available for
appropriations for enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory
system and the continuing costs related to these enhancements. Funds
appropriated from this account for such enhancements shall not supplant
existing funds from the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.335 (Grant criteria for
distributions under RCW 82.14.330(2)) and 1995 c 399 s 213 & 1993 sp.s.
c 21 s 4 are each repealed.

--- END ---