BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A landlord may charge a tenant separately for water or
wastewater services by allocating the charges separately through a
ratio utility billing system that complies with this section.
(2) A landlord who allocates charges separately for water or
wastewater services may allocate the costs to each tenant by using one
or more of the following ratio utility billing system methods:
(a) Per tenant;
(b) Proportionately by liveable square footage;
(c) Per type of unit;
(d) Per number of water fixtures; or
(e) Any other method that fairly allocates the charges.
(3) A landlord who charges separately for water or wastewater
services must comply with the following conditions:
(a) The total charges to the tenants in a building shall not exceed
the total charges paid by the landlord for water or wastewater services
for the building plus an administrative fee for actual administrative
costs incurred by the landlord;
(b) The rental agreement shall contain a disclosure, which must be
initialed by the tenant, that notifies the tenant of the separate
billing for water and wastewater services, provides a specific
description of the ratio utility billing method used for allocating
water and wastewater charges among tenants, states the amount of any
administrative fee charged for the separate billing, and informs the
tenant of the right of access to the information specified in (d) of
this subsection;
(c) A landlord must provide each tenant in existing tenancies with
at least ninety days' notice before instituting a ratio utility billing
system. The notice shall contain the information required under (b) of
this subsection;
(d) Upon request of a tenant, the landlord shall provide a copy of
the actual utility bill for the building along with each apportioned
utility bill. Upon request of a tenant, the landlord shall also
provide past copies of actual utility bills for any period of the
tenancy for which the tenant received an apportioned utility bill.
Past copies of utility bills must be provided for the preceding two
years or from the time the current landlord acquired the building,
whichever is most recent.
(4) If a landlord fails to comply with the requirements of this
section, and the failure was not caused by the tenant, the tenant may
terminate the rental agreement by written notice under RCW 59.18.090.
In addition, a landlord who fails to comply with this section shall be
liable to the tenant in a civil action for actual damages, attorneys'
fees, and a penalty of one hundred dollars. If the court determines
that the landlord deliberately failed to comply with the requirements
of this section, the court shall impose a penalty of two hundred
dollars.

--- END ---