BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that minors often
have multiple needs and it is important to provide uniform and
compatible treatment to minors for their mental, emotional, and
physical needs. There is a need to provide uniform prevention and
treatment services for the needs of minors who are suffering from
illness or other destructive patterns of behavior such as alcohol or
drug addiction.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.96A.235 and 1998 c 296 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
Parental consent is required for inpatient chemical dependency
treatment of a minor under the age of sixteen, unless the child meets
the definition of a child in need of services in RCW 13.32A.030(((4)))
(5)(c) as determined by the department: PROVIDED, That parental
consent is required for any treatment of a minor under the age of
thirteen.
This section does not apply to petitions filed under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.96A.245 and 1998 c 296 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A parent may bring, or authorize the bringing of, his or her
minor child, age sixteen or older, to a certified treatment program and
request that a chemical dependency assessment be conducted by a
professional person to determine whether the minor is chemically
dependent and in need of inpatient treatment.
(2) The consent of the minor is not required for admission,
evaluation, and treatment if the parent brings the minor to the
program.
(3) An appropriately trained professional person may evaluate
whether the minor is chemically dependent. The evaluation shall be
completed within twenty-four hours of the time the minor was brought to
the program, unless the professional person determines that the
condition of the minor necessitates additional time for evaluation. In
no event shall a minor be held longer than seventy-two hours for
evaluation. If, in the judgment of the professional person, it is
determined it is a medical necessity for the minor to receive inpatient
treatment, the minor may be held for treatment. The facility shall
limit treatment to that which the professional person determines is
medically necessary to stabilize the minor's condition until the
evaluation has been completed. Within twenty-four hours of completion
of the evaluation, the professional person shall notify the department
if the child is held for treatment and of the date of admission.
(4) No provider is obligated to provide treatment to a minor under
the provisions of this section. No provider may admit a minor to
treatment under this section unless it is medically necessary.
(5) No minor receiving inpatient treatment under this section may
be discharged from the program based solely on his or her request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A RCW
to read as follows:
No public or private agency or governmental entity, nor officer of
a public or private agency, nor the professional person in charge, his
or her professional designee or attending staff of any such agency, nor
any public official performing functions necessary to the
administration of this chapter, nor peace officer responsible for
detaining a person under this chapter, nor any designated chemical
dependency specialist, nor treatment program, shall be civilly or
criminally liable for performing his or her duties under this chapter
with regard to the decision of whether to admit, release, or detain a
person for evaluation and treatment: PROVIDED, That such duties were
performed in good faith and without gross negligence.

--- END ---