BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.58.230 and 1971 ex.s. c 286 s 23 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any person subject to the regulatory program of this chapter who
violates any provision of this chapter or permit issued pursuant
thereto shall be liable for all damage to public or private property
arising from such violation, including the cost of restoring the
affected area to its condition prior to violation. The attorney
general or local government attorney shall bring suit for damages under
this section on behalf of the state or local governments. Private
persons shall have the right to bring suit for damages or injunctive
relief, or both, under this section on their own behalf and on the
behalf of all persons similarly situated. If liability has been
established for the cost of restoring an area affected by a violation
the court shall make provision to assure that restoration will be
accomplished within a reasonable time at the expense of the violator.
In addition to such relief, including money damages, the court in its
discretion may award attorney's fees and costs of the suit to the
prevailing party.

--- END ---