BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A party seeking a custody order shall submit, along with his or
her motion, an affidavit declaring that the child is not in the
physical custody of one of its parents or that neither parent is a
suitable custodian and setting forth facts supporting the requested
order. The party seeking custody shall give notice, along with a copy
of the affidavit, to other parties to the proceedings, who may file
opposing affidavits.
(2) The court shall deny the motion unless it finds that adequate
cause for hearing the motion is established by the affidavits, in which
case it shall set a date for hearing on an order to show cause why the
requested order should not be granted.

--- END ---