BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
exempt from business and occupation tax and to relieve from the
obligation to collect sales and use tax from certain sellers with very
limited connections to Washington. These sellers are currently
relieved from the obligation to collect sales and use tax because of
the provisions of the federal internet tax freedom act. The
legislature intends to continue to relieve these particular sellers
from that obligation in the event that the federal internet tax freedom
act is not extended. The legislature further intends that any relief
from tax obligations provided by this act expire at such time as the
United States congress grants individual states the authority to impose
sales and use tax collection duties on remote sellers, or a court of
competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not subject to review, determines
that a state can impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote
sellers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to a person making sales in
Washington if:
(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted
directly or through another person, are limited to:
(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;
(ii) The taking of orders; or
(iii) The processing of payments; and
(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on
a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not
owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned
or operated by an affiliated person. For purposes of this section,
persons are "affiliated persons" with respect to each other where one
of the persons has an ownership interest of more than five percent,
whether direct or indirect, in the other, or where an ownership
interest of more than five percent, whether direct or indirect, is held
in each of the persons by another person or by a group of other persons
which are affiliated with respect to each other.
(2) This section expires when: (a) The United States congress
grants individual states the authority to impose sales and use tax
collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is determined by a court
of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not subject to review, that a
state can impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote sellers.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.050 and 2001 c 188 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax hereby imposed shall be paid by the buyer to the
seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full amount of
the tax payable in respect to each taxable sale in accordance with the
schedule of collections adopted by the department pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 82.08.060. The tax required by this chapter, to be
collected by the seller, shall be deemed to be held in trust by the
seller until paid to the department, and any seller who appropriates or
converts the tax collected to his or her own use or to any use other
than the payment of the tax to the extent that the money required to be
collected is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed in
this chapter shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) In case any seller fails to collect the tax herein imposed or
having collected the tax, fails to pay it to the department in the
manner prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure is the result
of his or her own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond his
or her control, he or she shall, nevertheless, be personally liable to
the state for the amount of the tax, unless the seller has taken from
the buyer in good faith a properly executed resale certificate under
RCW 82.04.470 or a copy of a direct pay permit issued under RCW
82.32.087.
(3) The amount of tax, until paid by the buyer to the seller or to
the department, shall constitute a debt from the buyer to the seller
and any seller who fails or refuses to collect the tax as required with
intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to gain some
advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any buyer who
refuses to pay any tax due under this chapter shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor. The tax required by this chapter to be collected by the
seller shall be stated separately from the selling price in any sales
invoice or other instrument of sale. On all retail sales through
vending machines, the tax need not be stated separately from the
selling price or collected separately from the buyer. For purposes of
determining the tax due from the buyer to the seller and from the
seller to the department it shall be conclusively presumed that the
selling price quoted in any price list, sales document, contract or
other agreement between the parties does not include the tax imposed by
this chapter, but if the seller advertises the price as including the
tax or that the seller is paying the tax, the advertised price shall
not be considered the selling price.
(4) Where a buyer has failed to pay to the seller the tax imposed
by this chapter and the seller has not paid the amount of the tax to
the department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly
against the buyer for collection of the tax, in which case a penalty of
ten percent may be added to the amount of the tax for failure of the
buyer to pay the same to the seller, regardless of when the tax may be
collected by the department; and all of the provisions of chapter 82.32
RCW, including those relative to interest and penalties, shall apply in
addition; and, for the sole purpose of applying the various provisions
of chapter 82.32 RCW, the twenty-fifth day of the month following the
tax period in which the purchase was made shall be considered as the
due date of the tax.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if:
(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted
directly or through another person, are limited to:
(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;
(ii) The taking of orders; or
(iii) The processing of payments; and
(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on
a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not
owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned
or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same
meaning as provided in section 2 of this act.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section expires when: (a) The United
States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales
and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is
determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not
subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection
duties on remote sellers.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.040 and 2001 c 188 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person who maintains in this state a place of business or
a stock of goods, or engages in business activities within this state,
shall obtain from the department a certificate of registration, and
shall, at the time of making sales, or making transfers of either
possession or title or both, of tangible personal property for use in
this state, collect from the purchasers or transferees the tax imposed
under this chapter. For the purposes of this chapter, the phrase
"maintains in this state a place of business" shall include the
solicitation of sales and/or taking of orders by sales agents or
traveling representatives. For the purposes of this chapter, "engages
in business activity within this state" includes every activity which
is sufficient under the Constitution of the United States for this
state to require collection of tax under this chapter. The department
shall in rules specify activities which constitute engaging in business
activity within this state, and shall keep the rules current with
future court interpretations of the Constitution of the United States.
(2) Every person who engages in this state in the business of
acting as an independent selling agent for persons who do not hold a
valid certificate of registration, and who receives compensation by
reason of sales of tangible personal property of his principals made
for use in this state, shall, at the time such sales are made, collect
from the purchasers the tax imposed under this chapter, and for that
purpose shall be deemed a retailer as defined in this chapter.
(3) The tax required to be collected by this chapter shall be
deemed to be held in trust by the retailer until paid to the department
and any retailer who appropriates or converts the tax collected to his
own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax provided herein
to the extent that the money required to be collected is not available
for payment on the due date as prescribed shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor. In case any seller fails to collect the tax herein
imposed or having collected the tax, fails to pay the same to the
department in the manner prescribed, whether such failure is the result
of his own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond his control,
he shall nevertheless, be personally liable to the state for the amount
of such tax, unless the seller has taken from the buyer in good faith
a copy of a direct pay permit issued under RCW 82.32.087.
(4) Any retailer who refunds, remits, or rebates to a purchaser, or
transferee, either directly or indirectly, and by whatever means, all
or any part of the tax levied by this chapter shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if:
(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted
directly or through another person, are limited to:
(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;
(ii) The taking of orders; or
(iii) The processing of payments; and
(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on
a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not
owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned
or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same
meaning as provided in section 2 of this act.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section expires when: (a) The United
States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales
and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is
determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not
subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection
duties on remote sellers.

--- END ---