BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.26.010 and 1985 c 449 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that it is in the public
interest of the people of the state of Washington to encourage
maintenance, improvement, and preservation of privately owned historic
landmarks as the state approaches its Centennial year of 1989. To
achieve this purpose, this chapter provides special valuation for
improvements to historic property and property tax exemptions for
maintenance and repair activities.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.26.020 and 1986 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Historic property" means real property together with
improvements thereon, except property listed in a register primarily
for objects buried below ground, which is:
(a) Listed in a local register of historic places created by
comprehensive ordinance, certified by the secretary of the interior as
provided in P.L. 96-515; or
(b) Listed in the national register of historic places.
(2) "Cost" means the actual cost of rehabilitation, which cost
shall be at least twenty-five percent of the assessed valuation of the
historic property, exclusive of the assessed value attributable to the
land, prior to rehabilitation.
(3) "Special valuation" means the determination of the assessed
value of the historic property subtracting, for up to ten years, such
cost as is approved by the local review board.
(4) "State review board" means the advisory council on historic
preservation established under chapter 27.34 RCW, or any successor
agency designated by the state to act as the state historic
preservation review board under federal law.
(5) "Local review board" means a local body designated by the local
legislative authority.
(6) "Owner" means the owner of record.
(7) "Rehabilitation" is the process of returning a property to a
state of utility through repair or alteration, which makes possible an
efficient contemporary use while preserving those portions and features
of the property which are significant to its architectural and cultural
values.
(8) "Maintenance and repair activity" means the act or process of
applying measures to sustain the existing form, integrity, and
materials of an historic property. Maintenance and repair activities
include, but are not limited to, exterior cladding repair; repainting
and in-kind replacement; masonry cleaning and repointing; window, door,
porch, and chimney repair and in-kind replacement; reroofing in-kind;
and minor structural repairs. Activities also include, but are not
limited to, interior repainting; replastering; flooring repair,
refinishing and in-kind replacement; repair and replacement of plumbing
fixtures, fittings, and equipment; and repair and replacement of
lighting fixtures, electrical equipment, and heating equipment.
(9) "Maintenance and repair expenditures" means out-of-pocket
expenses incurred for maintenance and repair activity by the property
owner after January 1, 2003.
(10) "Qualified historic property" means historic property that (a)
is listed on the Washington heritage register or the national register
of historic places; (b) is residential property occupied by the owner;
and (c) has incurred expenditures for maintenance and repair activity
that exceed ten percent of the assessed value of the residential
structure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Historic property that is designated as
qualified historic property under section 5 of this act is exempt from
property taxes levied for any state purpose for the year of
designation. This exemption cannot be claimed more than once in a
five-year period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 An owner of property desiring designation as
qualified historic property under this chapter shall apply to the
assessor of the county in which the property is located upon forms
prescribed by the department of revenue and supplied by the county
assessor. Applications shall be made no later than October 1 for
exemption from taxes payable the following year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Within ten days after the filing of the
application for designation as qualified historic property in the
county assessor's office, the county assessor shall refer each
application to the local review board.
(2) The review board shall approve the application if the property:
(a) Is listed on the Washington heritage register or the national
register of historic places;
(b) Is residential property occupied by the owner;
(c) Incurs expenditures for maintenance and repair activity that
exceed ten percent of the assessed value of the residential structure;
and
(d) Complies with minimum standards of maintenance that protect
those elements which qualify the property as historically significant.
(3) The assessed value of the residential structure in the year of
application shall be used for purposes of comparing maintenance and
repair expenditures to assessed value.
(4) Maintenance and repair expenditures made after January 1, 2004,
may be used to satisfy the ten percent threshold. Expenditures which
exceed ten percent may be carried forward and used together with any
additional maintenance and repair expenditures in application for
exemption in future years. Expenditures that are used to satisfy the
ten percent requirement in one year may not be carried forward and used
in the application for exemption in future years.
(5) An application for designation as qualified historic property
shall be approved or denied by the local review board before December
31 of the calendar year in which the application is made.
(6) The local review board is authorized to examine the maintenance
and repair records of applicants.
(7) The review board shall notify the county assessor and the
applicant of the approval or denial of the application.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.26.110 and 1985 c 449 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The local legislative authority and the local review board may
request the assistance of the state historic preservation officer in
conducting special valuation and property tax exemption activities.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.26.130 and 2001 c 185 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any decision by a local review board on an application for
classification as historic property eligible for special valuation or
designation as qualified historic property may be appealed to superior
court under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598 in addition to any other
remedy at law. Any decision on the disqualification of historic
property eligible for special valuation, designation as qualified
historic property, or any other dispute, may be appealed to the county
board of equalization in accordance with RCW 84.40.038.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2005 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 3 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 84.26 RCW.

--- END ---