BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.18.010 and 1983 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purposes of this chapter are to promote ((the economic))
employment and ((social welfare)) independence of blind persons in the
state of Washington((, to relieve blind or visually handicapped persons
from the distress of poverty)) through their complete integration into
society on the basis of equality, and to encourage public acceptance of
the abilities of blind persons((, and to promote public awareness of
the causes of blindness)).

Sec. 2 RCW 74.18.020 and 1983 c 194 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means an agency of state government called the
department of services for the blind.
(2) "Director" means the director of the state agency appointed by
the governor with the consent of the senate.
(3) (("Advisory council")) "Rehabilitation council for the blind"
means the body of members appointed by the governor in accordance with
the provisions of RCW 74.18.070 to advise the state agency.
(4) "Blind person" means a person who: (a) Has no vision or whose
vision with corrective lenses is so ((defective as to prevent the
performance of ordinary activities for which eyesight is essential, or
who)) limited that the individual requires alternative methods or
skills to do efficiently those things that are ordinarily done with
sight by individuals with normal vision; (b) has an eye condition of a
progressive nature which may lead to blindness; or (c) is blind for
purposes of the business enterprise program as set forth in RCW
74.18.200 through 74.18.230 in accordance with requirements of the
Randolph-Sheppard Act of 1936.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.18.050 and 1983 c 194 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director may appoint such personnel as necessary, none of whom
shall be members of the ((advisory)) rehabilitation council for the
blind. The director and other personnel who are assigned substantial
responsibility for formulating agency policy or directing and
controlling a major administrative division, together with their
confidential secretaries, up to a maximum of six persons, shall be
exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.18.060 and 1983 c 194 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall:
(1) Serve as the sole agency of the state for contracting for and
disbursing all federal and state funds appropriated for programs
established by and within the jurisdiction of this chapter, and make
reports and render accounting as may be required;
(2) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to
carry out the purposes of this chapter;
(3) Negotiate agreements with other state agencies to provide
services ((for individuals who are both blind and otherwise disabled))
so that ((multiply handicapped persons and the elderly blind))
individuals of any age who are blind or are both blind and otherwise
disabled receive the most beneficial services.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.18.070 and 2000 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the rehabilitation council for the
blind. The rehabilitation council shall consist of the minimum number
of voting members to meet the requirements of the rehabilitation
council required under the federal rehabilitation act of 1973 as now or
hereafter amended. A majority of the voting members shall be blind
persons. Rehabilitation council members shall be residents of the
state of Washington, and shall ((represent)) be appointed in accordance
with the categories of membership specified in the federal
rehabilitation act of 1973 as now or hereafter amended. The director
of the department ((of services for the blind)) shall be an ex officio,
nonvoting member.
(2) The governor shall appoint members of the rehabilitation
council for terms of three years, except that the initial appointments
shall be as follows: (a) Three members for terms of three years; (b)
two members for terms of two years; and (c) other members for terms of
one year. Vacancies in the membership of the rehabilitation council
shall be filled by the governor for the remainder of the unexpired
term.
(3) The governor may remove members of the rehabilitation council
for cause.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.18.090 and 2000 c 57 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The rehabilitation council for the blind may:
(1) Provide counsel to the director in developing, reviewing,
making recommendations, and agreeing on the department's state plan for
vocational rehabilitation, budget requests, permanent rules concerning
services to blind ((citizens)) persons, and other major policies which
impact the quality or quantity of services for ((the)) blind persons;
(2) Undertake annual reviews with the director of the needs of
blind ((citizens)) persons, the effectiveness of the services and
priorities of the department to meet those needs, and the measures that
could be taken to improve the department's services;
(3) Annually make recommendations to the governor and the
legislature on issues related to the department ((of services for the
blind)), other state agencies, or state laws which have a significant
effect on the opportunities, services, or rights of blind ((citizens))
persons;
(4) Advise and make recommendations to the governor on the criteria
and qualifications pertinent to the selection of the director;
(5) Perform additional functions as required by the federal
rehabilitation act of 1973 as now or hereafter amended.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.18.110 and 1983 c 194 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department ((of services for the blind)) may receive, accept,
and disburse gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests from
public or private sources, in trust or otherwise, if the terms and
conditions thereof will provide services for ((the)) blind persons in
a manner consistent with the purposes of this chapter and with other
provisions of law. Any money so received shall be deposited in the
state treasury for investment or expenditure in accordance with the
conditions of its receipt.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.18.120 and 1989 c 175 s 150 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Any person aggrieved by a decision, action, or inaction of
the department or its agents may request, and shall receive from the
department, an administrative review and redetermination of that
decision, action, or inaction.
(2) After completion of an administrative review,)) An applicant or
((client aggrieved by)) eligible person who is dissatisfied with a
decision, action, or inaction ((of)) made by the department or its
agents ((may request, and shall be granted,)) regarding that person's
eligibility or department services provided to that person is entitled
to an administrative hearing. Such administrative hearings shall be
conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW by an administrative law judge.
(((3))) (2) The applicant or eligible individual may appeal final
decisions ((of)) issued following administrative hearings ((shall be
the subject of appeal)) under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.
(((4) In the event of an appeal from the final decision of an
administrative hearing in which the department has overruled the
proposed decision by an administrative law judge, the following terms
shall apply for an appeal under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598: (a)
Upon request a copy of the transcript and evidence from the
administrative hearing shall be made available without charge to the
appellant; (b) the appellant shall not be required to post bond or pay
any filing fee; and (c) an appellant receiving a favorable decision
upon appeal shall be entitled to reasonable attorney's fees and
costs.))
(3) The department shall develop rules governing other processes
for dispute resolution as required under the federal rehabilitation act
of 1973.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 74.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall investigate the conviction records,
pending charges, and disciplinary board final decisions of individuals
acting on behalf of the department who will or may have unsupervised
access to persons with significant disabilities as defined by the
federal rehabilitation act of 1973. This includes:
(a) Current employees of the department;
(b) Applicants seeking or being considered for any position with
the department; and
(c) Any service provider, contractor, student intern, volunteer, or
other individual acting on behalf of the department.
(2) The investigation shall consist of a background check as
allowed through the Washington state criminal records privacy act under
RCW 10.97.050, the Washington state patrol criminal identification
system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834, and the federal bureau of
investigation. The background check shall include a fingerprint check
using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint
card. If the applicant or service provider has had a background check
within the previous two years, the department may waive the
requirement.
(3) When necessary, applicants may be employed and service
providers may be engaged on a conditional basis pending completion of
the background check.
(4) The department shall use the information solely to determine
the character, suitability, and competence of employees, applicants,
service providers, contractors, student interns, volunteers, and other
individuals in accordance with RCW 41.06.475.
(5) The department shall adopt rules addressing procedures for
undertaking background checks which shall include, but not be limited
to, the following:
(a) The manner in which the individual will be provided access to
and review of information obtained based on the background check
required;
(b) Assurance that access to background check information shall be
limited to only those individuals processing the information at the
department;
(c) Action that shall be taken against a current employee, service
provider, contractor, student intern, or volunteer who is disqualified
from a position because of a background check not previously performed.
(6) The department shall determine who will pay costs associated
with the background check.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 74.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Personal information and records obtained and retained by the
department concerning applicants and eligible individuals are
confidential, are not subject to public disclosure, and may be released
only in accordance with law or with this provision.
(2) The department shall adopt rules and develop contract language
to safeguard the confidentiality of all personal information, including
photographs and lists of names. Rules and contract language shall
ensure that:
(a) Specific safeguards are established to protect all current and
future stored personal information;
(b) Specific safeguards and procedures are established for the
release of personal health information in accordance with the health
insurance portability and accountability act of 1996, 45 C.F.R. 160
through 45 C.F.R. 164;
(c) All applicants and eligible individuals and, as appropriate,
those individuals' representatives, service providers, cooperating
agencies, and interested persons are informed upon initial intake of
the confidentiality of personal information and the conditions for
accessing and releasing this information;
(d) All applicants or their representatives are informed about the
department's need to collect personal information and the policies
governing its use, including: (i) Identification of the authority
under which information is collected; (ii) explanation of the principal
purposes for which the department intends to use or release the
information; (iii) explanation of whether providing requested
information to the department is mandatory or voluntary and the effects
of not providing requested information; (iv) identification of those
situations in which the department requires or does not require
informed written consent of the individual before information may be
released; and (v) identification of other agencies to which information
is routinely released; and
(e) An explanation of department policies and procedures affecting
personal information will be provided at intake or on request to each
individual in that individual's native language and in an appropriate
format including but not limited to braille, audio recording,
electronic media, or large print.

Sec. 11 RCW 74.18.130 and 1983 c 194 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall provide a program of vocational rehabilitation
to assist blind persons to overcome ((vocational handicaps)) barriers
to employment and to develop skills necessary for ((self-support))
employment and ((self-care)) independence. Applicants eligible for
vocational rehabilitation services shall be blind persons ((who are
blind as defined in RCW 74.18.020 and)) who also (((1) have no vision
or limited vision which constitutes or results in a substantial
handicap to employment and (2) can reasonably be expected to benefit
from vocational rehabilitation services in terms of employability))
meet eligibility requirements as specified in the federal
rehabilitation act of 1973.

Sec. 12 RCW 74.18.140 and 1983 c 194 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department ((may provide to eligible individuals)) shall ensure
that vocational rehabilitation services((, including medical and
vocational diagnosis; vocational counseling, guidance, referral, and
placement; rehabilitation training; physical and mental restoration;
maintenance and transportation; reader services; interpreter services
for the deaf; rehabilitation teaching services; orientation and
mobility services; occupational licenses, tools, equipment, and initial
stocks and supplies; telecommunications, sensory, and other
technological aids and devices; and other goods and services which can
be reasonably expected to benefit a client in terms of employability))
in accordance with requirements under the federal rehabilitation act of
1973 are available to meet the identified requirements of each eligible
individual in preparing for, securing, retaining, or regaining an
employment outcome that is consistent with the individual's strengths,
resources, priorities, concerns, abilities, capabilities, interests,
and informed choice.

Sec. 13 RCW 74.18.150 and 1996 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may grant to eligible participants in the vocational
rehabilitation ((clients)) program equipment and materials ((not to
exceed the amount allowed by state financial policies and regulations))
in accordance with the provisions related to transfer of capital assets
as set forth by the office of financial management in the state
administrative and accounting manual, provided that the equipment or
materials are required by the ((client's)) individual's ((written
rehabilitation program)) plan for employment and are used ((by the
client or former client)) in a manner consistent therewith. The
department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 14 RCW 74.18.170 and 1983 c 194 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may establish, construct, and/or operate
rehabilitation or habilitation facilities to provide instruction in
alternative skills necessary to adjust to blindness or substantial
vision loss, to assist blind persons to develop increased confidence
and independence, or to provide other services consistent with the
purposes of this chapter. The department shall adopt rules concerning
selection criteria for participation, services, and other matters
necessary for efficient and effective operation of such facilities.

Sec. 15 RCW 74.18.180 and 1983 c 194 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department((, to the extent appropriations are made
available,)) may provide a program of independent living services for
((independent living designed to meet the current and future needs of))
blind ((individuals)) persons who ((presently cannot function
independently in their living environment, but who may benefit from
services that will enable them to maintain contact with society and
perform some tasks of daily living independently)) are not seeking
vocational rehabilitation services.
(2) Independent living services may include, but are not limited
to, instruction in adaptive skills of blindness, counseling regarding
adjustment to vision loss, and provision of adaptive devices that
enable service recipients to participate in the community and maintain
or increase their independence.

Sec. 16 RCW 74.18.200 and 1985 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply in RCW 74.18.200 through 74.18.230.
(1) "Business enterprises program" means a program operated by the
department under the federal Randolph-Sheppard Act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 107
et seq., and under this chapter in support of blind persons operating
vending businesses in public buildings.
(2) "Vending facility" means any stand, snack bar, cafeteria, or
business at which food, tobacco, sundries, or other retail merchandise
or service is sold or provided.
(3) "Vending machine" means any coin-operated machine that sells or
provides food, tobacco, sundries, or other retail merchandise or
service.
(4) "Blind person" means a person whose central visual acuity does
not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with correcting lenses or whose
visual acuity, if better than 20/200, is accompanied by a limit to the
field of vision in the better eye to such a degree that its widest
diameter subtends an angle of no greater than 20 degrees. In
determining whether an individual is blind, there shall be an
examination by a physician skilled in diseases of the eye, or by an
optometrist, whichever the individual selects.
(5) "Licensee" means a blind person licensed by the state of
Washington under the Randolph-Sheppard Act, this chapter, and the rules
issued hereunder.
(((5))) (6) "Public building" means any building and immediately
adjacent outdoor space associated directly therewith, such as a patio
or entryway, which is: (a) Owned by the state of Washington or any
political subdivision thereof or any space leased by the state of
Washington or any political subdivision thereof in any privately-owned
building; and (b) dedicated to the administrative functions of the
state or any political subdivision((: PROVIDED, That any vending
facility or vending machine)). However, this term shall not include
property under the jurisdiction and control of a local board of
education ((shall not be included)) without the consent ((and
approval)) of ((that local)) such board.
(7) "Priority" means the department has first and primary right to
operate the food service and vending facilities, including vending
machines, on federal, state, county, municipal, and other local
government property except those otherwise exempted by statute. Such
right may, at the sole discretion of the department, be waived in the
event that the department is temporarily unable to assert the priority.

Sec. 17 RCW 74.18.210 and 1983 c 194 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall maintain or cause to be maintained a business
enterprises program for blind persons to operate vending facilities in
public buildings. The purposes of the business enterprises program are
to implement the Randolph-Sheppard Act and thereby give priority to
qualified blind persons in operating vending facilities on federal
property, to make similar provisions for vending facilities in public
buildings in the state of Washington and thereby increase employment
opportunities for blind persons, and to encourage ((the)) blind persons
to become successful, independent business persons.

Sec. 18 RCW 74.18.230 and 2002 c 71 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury an account known as
the business enterprises revolving account.
(2) The net proceeds from any vending machine operation in a public
building, other than an operation managed by a licensee, shall be made
payable to the business enterprises program, which will pay only the
blind vendors' portion, at the subscriber's rate, for the purpose of
funding a plan of health insurance for blind vendors, as provided in
RCW 41.05.225. Net proceeds, for purposes of this section, means
((the)) gross ((amount received)) sales less ((the costs of the
operation, including)) state sales tax and a fair minimum return to the
vending machine owner or service provider, which return shall ((not
exceed)) be a reasonable amount to be determined by the department.
(3) All federal moneys in the business enterprises revolving
account shall be expended only for development and expansion of
locations, equipment, management services, and payments to licensees in
the business enterprises program.
(4) The business enterprises program shall be supported by the
business enterprises revolving account and by income which may accrue
to the department pursuant to the federal Randolph-Sheppard Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 74.18.160 (Vocational rehabilitation -- Orientation and
training center) and 1983 c 194 s 17; and
(2) RCW 74.18.250 (Specialized medical eye care -- Prevention of
blindness) and 1983 c 194 s 24.

--- END ---