BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.430 and 1998 c 191 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Catch record cards necessary for proper management of the state's
food fish and game fish species and shellfish resources shall be
administered under rules adopted by the commission and issued at no
charge for the initial catch record card and ten dollars for each
subsequent catch record card. A duplicate catch record costs ten
dollars and shall be available only to individuals holding a full
season license. Catch record cards issued in conjunction with a
temporary short-term license are not subject to the provisions of this
section. Charterboat operations issuing temporary short-term licenses
shall affix a charterboat stamp to each catch record card issued before
fishing commences. The funds received from the sale of catch record
cards must be deposited into the wildlife fund. The commission shall
implement this section within available resources.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.32.256 and 2002 c 222 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall by rule establish the conditions and fees for
issuance of duplicate licenses, rebates, permits, tags, and stamps
required by this chapter. The fee for duplicate licenses, rebates,
permits, tags, and stamps, except catch record cards, may not exceed
the actual cost to the department for issuing the duplicate.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.32.050 and 2000 c 107 s 266 are each amended to
read as follows:
All recreational licenses, permits, catch record cards, tags, and
stamps required by this title and raffle tickets authorized under
chapter 77.12 RCW shall be issued under the authority of the
commission. The commission shall adopt rules for the issuance of
recreational licenses, permits, catch record cards, tags, stamps, and
raffle tickets, and for the collection, payment, and handling of
license fees, terms and conditions to govern dealers, and dealers'
fees. A transaction fee on recreational ((licenses)) documents issued
through an automated licensing system may be set by the commission and
collected from licensees. The department may authorize all or part of
such fee to be paid directly to a contractor providing automated
licensing system services. Fees retained by dealers shall be uniform
throughout the state. The department shall authorize dealers to
collect and retain dealer fees of at least two dollars for purchase of
a standard hunting or fishing recreational license document, except
that the commission may set a lower dealer fee for issuance of tags or
when a licensee buys a license that involves a stamp or display card
format rather than a standard department licensing document form.

--- END ---