BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.58.107 and 1997 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of health shall charge a fee of thirteen dollars for
certified copies of records and for copies or information provided for
research, statistical, or administrative purposes, and eight dollars
for a search of the files or records when no copy is made. The
department shall prescribe by regulation fees to be paid for preparing
sealed files and for opening sealed files.
No fee may be demanded or required for furnishing certified copies
of a birth, death, fetal death, marriage, divorce, annulment, or legal
separation record for use in connection with a claim for compensation
or pension pending before the veterans administration. No fee may be
demanded or required for furnishing certified copies of a death
certificate of a sex offender for use by a law enforcement agency in
maintaining a registered sex offender data base.
The department shall keep a true and correct account of all fees
received and ((turn)) transmit the fees ((over)) to the state treasurer
on a weekly basis.
Local registrars shall charge the same fees as the state as
hereinabove provided and as prescribed by department regulation, except
that local registrars shall charge thirteen dollars for the first copy
of a death certificate and eight dollars for each additional copy of
the same death certificate when the additional copies are ordered at
the same time as the first copy. All such fees collected, except for
five dollars of each fee for the issuance of a certified copy, shall be
paid to the jurisdictional health department.
All local registrars in cities and counties shall keep a true and
correct account of all fees received under this section for the
issuance of certified copies and shall ((turn)) transmit five dollars
of the fee ((over)) to the state treasurer on or before the first day
of January, April, July, and October.
Five dollars of each fee imposed for the issuance of certified
copies, except for copies suitable for display issued under RCW
70.58.085, at both the state and local levels shall be held by the
state treasurer in the death investigations' account established by RCW
43.79.445.

--- END ---