BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The boards of trustees of the community and technical colleges,
acting independently and each on behalf of its own institution:
(1) May appoint state employed personnel as special police officers
for its own institution, which officers shall function under such
conditions and regulations as the board prescribes; and
(2) May supply appropriate badges and uniforms that identify such
special police officers. At a minimum, badges and identification cards
shall state the name of the community or technical college and the
words "Special Police." Uniform color schemes and badges may not
conflict with that of which are worn by the local police or sheriff's
department where the community or technical college is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Special police officers, as established under authority of
section 1 of this act, when appointed and duly sworn:
(a) Shall be limited authority Washington peace officers and shall
have the authority to enforce all criminal laws of the state of
Washington, including the power to arrest and issue criminal citations
for offenses, while on duty; and
(b) May only exercise such powers while on state-owned community or
technical college property and associated buildings, or if in fresh
pursuit of a person who has committed a crime on community or technical
college property pursuant to RCW 10.93.090.
(2) Such powers shall be terminated upon the removal of the
employee from appointment as a special police officer, failure to meet
annual refresher training standards, or an arrest or conviction of any
felony, crime of violence, controlled substance violation, or offense
involving moral turpitude.
(3) Special police officers shall not be authorized to utilize
firearms in the performance of their duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The board of trustees of each community or technical college
appointing special police officers shall certify that each person in
such position meets the following requirements prior to appointment.
These standards are in addition to any standards set by the department
of personnel for campus security officer:
(1) The officer must be at least twenty-one years of age at time of
appointment;
(2) The officer must undergo a state and F.B.I. criminal background
records check;
(3) The officer must submit to a urinalysis to detect the presence
of any illegal drug use;
(4) The officer must not have been convicted of a felony, crime of
violence, controlled substance violation, or offense involving moral
turpitude; and
(5) The officer must successfully complete prescribed training
prior to appointment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The appointment of any special police officer by a community or
technical college shall not limit the authority, powers, or
responsibility of any local or state law enforcement agency
jurisdiction in which that community or technical college is located.
Special police officers shall seek the assistance of such agencies when
investigating any crimes that are violent or felonious in nature.
(2) Persons arrested by a special police officer shall be
relinquished to an appropriate local or state law enforcement agency
for booking and arraignment purposes, and such special police officer
shall provide a detailed report describing the incident.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All persons employed by state-owned community and technical
colleges, and appointed as special police officers, shall successfully
complete a training program, or equivalent, approved by the Washington
state criminal justice training commission for reserve law enforcement
officers prior to exercising such powers.
(2) Special police officers shall participate in annual refresher
training as prescribed by the criminal justice training commission for
reserve law enforcement officers, or forty hours of annual, documented
training consisting of: Communications skills, criminal law, evidence
law, defensive tactics, patrol procedures, investigations, crisis
intervention, community policing/crime prevention, and first aid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
Special police officers appointed by state community and technical
colleges are not considered fully commissioned law enforcement officers
and shall not be eligible for retirement benefits under chapter 41.26
RCW in association with their work for a community or technical
college.

--- END ---