BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.32.040 and 1999 c 185 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 43.20B.720, 72.09.480, and
74.20A.260, no money paid or payable under this title shall, before the
issuance and delivery of the check or warrant, be assigned, charged, or
taken in execution, attached, garnished, or pass or be paid to any
other person by operation of law, any form of voluntary assignment, or
power of attorney. Any such assignment or charge is void unless the
transfer is to a financial institution at the request of a worker or
other beneficiary and made in accordance with RCW 51.32.045.
(2)(a) If any worker suffers (i) a permanent partial injury and
dies from some other cause than the accident which produced the injury
before he or she receives payment of the award for the permanent
partial injury or (ii) any other injury before he or she receives
payment of any monthly installment covering any period of time before
his or her death, the amount of the permanent partial disability award
or the monthly payment, or both, shall be paid to the surviving spouse
or the child or children if there is no surviving spouse. If there is
no surviving spouse and no child or children, the award or the amount
of the monthly payment shall be paid by the department or self-insurer
and distributed consistent with the terms of the decedent's will or, if
the decedent dies intestate, consistent with the terms of RCW
11.04.015.
(b) If any worker suffers an injury and dies from it before he or
she receives payment of any monthly installment covering time loss for
any period of time before his or her death, the amount of the monthly
payment shall be paid to the surviving spouse or the child or children
if there is no surviving spouse. If there is no surviving spouse and
no child or children, the amount of the monthly payment shall be paid
by the department or self-insurer and distributed consistent with the
terms of the decedent's will or, if the decedent dies intestate,
consistent with the terms of RCW 11.04.015.
(c) Any application for compensation under this subsection (2)
shall be filed with the department or self-insuring employer within one
year of the date of death. The department or self-insurer may satisfy
its responsibilities under this subsection (2) by sending any payment
due in the name of the decedent and to the last known address of the
decedent.
(3)(a) Any worker or beneficiary receiving benefits under this
title who is subsequently confined in, or who subsequently becomes
eligible for benefits under this title while confined in, any
institution under conviction and sentence shall have all payments of
the compensation canceled during the period of confinement. After
discharge from the institution, payment of benefits due afterward shall
be paid if the worker or beneficiary would, except for the provisions
of this subsection (3), otherwise be entitled to them.
(b) If any prisoner is injured in the course of his or her
employment while participating in a work or training release program
authorized by chapter 72.65 RCW and is subject to the provisions of
this title, he or she is entitled to payments under this title, subject
to the requirements of chapter 72.65 RCW, unless his or her
participation in the program has been canceled, or unless he or she is
returned to a state correctional institution, as defined in RCW
72.65.010(3), as a result of revocation of parole or new sentence.
(c) If the confined worker has any beneficiaries during the
confinement period during which benefits are canceled under (a) or (b)
of this subsection, they shall be paid directly the monthly benefits
which would have been paid to the worker for himself or herself and the
worker's beneficiaries had the worker not been confined.
(4) Any lump sum benefits to which a worker would otherwise be
entitled but for the provisions of this section shall be paid on a
monthly basis to his or her beneficiaries.

--- END ---