BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.101.005 and 1990 c 288 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that many individuals in the state of
Washington have attended college and received an associate of arts or
associate of science degree, or ((its)) the equivalent, but are
placebound.
The legislature intends to establish an educational opportunity
grant program for placebound students who have completed an associate
of arts or associate of science degree, or ((its)) the equivalent, in
an effort to increase their participation in and completion of upper-division programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.101.010 and 1990 c 288 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The educational opportunity grant program is hereby created ((as a
demonstration project)) to serve placebound financially needy students
by assisting them to obtain a baccalaureate degree at public and
private institutions of higher education ((which have the capacity to
accommodate such students within existing educational programs and
facilities)) approved for participation by the higher education
coordinating board.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.101.020 and 1990 c 288 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this chapter, "placebound" means unable to
((relocate to)) complete a college program because of family or
employment commitments, health concerns, monetary inability, or other
similar factors.
(2) To be eligible for an educational opportunity grant, applicants
must be placebound residents of the state of Washington as defined in
RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d), who: (a) Are needy students as
defined in RCW 28B.10.802(3); and ((who)) (b) have completed the
associate of arts or associate of science degree or ((its)) the
equivalent. A placebound resident is one who may be influenced by the
receipt of an enhanced student financial aid award to ((attend an
institution that has existing unused capacity rather than attend a
branch campus established pursuant to chapter 28B.45 RCW)) complete a
baccalaureate degree at an eligible institution. An eligible
placebound applicant is further defined as a person ((whose residence
is located in an area served by a branch campus who, because of family
or employment commitments, health concerns, monetary need, or other
similar factors,)) who would be unable to complete ((an upper-division)) a baccalaureate course of study but for receipt of an
educational opportunity grant.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.101.040 and 2002 c 186 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Grants may be used by eligible participants to attend any public or
private college or university in the state of Washington that is
accredited by an accrediting association recognized by rule of the
higher education coordinating board for the program and that ((has an
existing unused capacity. Grants shall not be used to attend any
branch campus or educational program established under chapter 28B.45
RCW)) complies with eligibility criteria established by rule of the
higher education coordinating board. The participant shall not be
eligible for a grant if it will be used for any programs that include
religious worship, exercise, or instruction or to pursue a degree in
theology. Each participating student may receive up to two thousand
five hundred dollars per academic year, not to exceed the student's
demonstrated financial need for the course of study. ((Resident
students as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2)(f) are not eligible for grants
under this chapter.))

--- END ---