BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.36.020 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 56 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a port district may
raise revenue by levy of an annual tax not to exceed forty-five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value against the assessed valuation
of the taxable property in such port district for general port
purposes, including the establishment of a capital improvement fund for
future capital improvements, except that any levy for the payment of
the principal and interest of the general bonded indebtedness of the
port district shall be in excess of any levy made by the port district
under the forty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
limitation. The levy shall be made and taxes collected in the manner
provided for the levy and collection of taxes in school districts of
the first class.
(2) A port district may impose a levy under subsection (1) of this
section if a ballot proposition authorizing the levy to be imposed has
been approved by a simple majority vote of voters of the district
voting on the ballot proposition at a general or special election in
the year in which the levy is first imposed. The tax may be imposed
annually for a period of up to four years. However, a port district
may continue imposing property levies under subsection (1) of this
section without obtaining voter approval, but only for the purpose of
making interest and principal payments on the general indebtedness
incurred before the effective date of this act to avoid the impairment
of a contract.

--- END ---