BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many workers do
not have access to an employment-based retirement plan. Workers who
are unable to build up pensions and savings risk living on low incomes
in their old age and are more likely to become dependent on state
services. The Washington voluntary accounts program will provide a
simple and inexpensive way for workers to save for retirement and
employers to offer an employee benefit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Program" means the Washington voluntary accounts program
created under section 3 of this act.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of retirement
systems.
(3) "Participating employee" means any workers in this state that
choose to participate in the program.
(4) "Participating employer" means any private employer, with a
place of business in this state, and with employees that have chosen to
participate in the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Washington voluntary accounts program is
created. The director may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
chapter. Sections 4 and 5 of this act may not be implemented until any
approvals from federal agencies that may be necessary, including the
favorable tax treatment of the plan, have been granted, and appropriate
funds for start-up costs of the program have been identified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Private employers shall, in cooperation
with the department, provide employees with the opportunity to
participate in the Washington voluntary accounts program, including
payroll deductions for those employees who elect to contribute to
individual retirement accounts. Each participating employer is
authorized to contract with a participating employee to defer or
otherwise contribute a portion of that employee's compensation, in
accordance with the internal revenue code or other applicable federal
laws.
(2) Participating employees may self-direct the investment of their
account balances through selection among investment options to the
extent provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The director may provide the individual retirement account
plans as the department determines to be advisable. The state
investment board, with respect to the program, shall invest the
contributions of participating employees, in accordance with federal
law, and to the extent permissible under federal law, in accordance
with RCW 43.84.150, 43.33A.140, and 41.50.780, and pursuant to
investment policy established by the state investment board for the
program. The state investment board shall provide investment options
for participants to choose from, and may establish an investment plan
for participants who choose not to self-direct their investments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The director may also provide plans,
including 401(k) plans and savings incentive match plan for employees
individual retirement account plans, that employers may elect to adopt
for the benefit of their employees, and that comply with applicable
federal laws. However, this act does not require employers to provide
plans for their employees. Those employers that elect to adopt plans
are responsible for complying with any applicable federal laws and
regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The Washington voluntary accounts
program principal account is created in the state treasury and shall be
administered in compliance with applicable federal law and as set forth
in this section. The department shall make arrangements with financial
institutions to serve as trustees or custodians of Washington voluntary
accounts as may be required or advisable to comply with applicable
federal law and to provide for the efficient implementation and
administration of the program.
(2) The contributions elected by participating employees in
accordance with sections 4 and 5 of this act shall be paid into the
Washington voluntary accounts program principal account and shall be
sufficient to cover costs of administration and staffing in addition to
such other amounts as may be determined by the director. The account
shall be used to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(3) All moneys in the Washington voluntary accounts program
principal account and the Washington voluntary accounts program
administrative account, all property and rights purchased therewith,
and all income attributable thereto, shall be held in trust by the
state investment board, as set forth under RCW 43.33A.030, for the
exclusive benefit of the Washington voluntary accounts program
participants and their beneficiaries, and, notwithstanding any other
provision of this or related acts, shall be held separate from other
types of funds to the extent required by federal law. Neither the
participating employee, nor the participant's beneficiary or
beneficiaries, nor any other designee, has any right to commute, sell,
assign, transfer, or otherwise convey the right to receive any payments
under the program. These payments and rights are nonassignable and
nontransferable. Account balances are not subject to attachment,
garnishment, or execution and are not transferable by operation of law
in event of bankruptcy or insolvency, except to the extent otherwise
required by law.
(4) The state investment board has the full power to invest moneys
in the Washington voluntary accounts program principal account and the
Washington voluntary accounts program administrative account in
accordance with RCW 43.84.150, 43.33A.140, and 41.50.770, and
cumulative investment directions received under this chapter. All
investment and operating costs of the state investment board associated
with the investment of the program assets shall be paid under RCW
43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of these expenses, one
hundred percent of all earnings from these investments shall accrue
directly to the Washington voluntary accounts program principal
account.
(5)(a) No state board, commission, or agency, or any officer,
employee, or member is liable for any loss or deficiency resulting from
participant investments selected under this chapter.
(b) The state investment board, or any officer, employee, or member
is not liable for any loss or deficiency resulting from reasonable
efforts to implement investment directions under this chapter.
(6) The Washington voluntary accounts program administrative
account is created in the state treasury. All expenses of the
department pertaining to the Washington voluntary accounts program
including staffing and administrative expenses shall be paid out of the
Washington voluntary accounts program administrative account. Any
excess balances credited to this account over administrative expenses
disbursed from this account shall be transferred to the Washington
voluntary accounts program principal account at such time and in such
amounts as may be determined by the director with the approval of the
director of financial management. Any deficiency in the Washington
voluntary accounts program administrative account caused by an excess
of administrative expenses disbursed from this account shall be
transferred to this account from the Washington voluntary accounts
program principal account.
(7)(a)(i) The director shall keep or cause to be kept full and
adequate accounts and records of the assets of each individual
participant, obligations, transactions, and affairs of the program.
The department shall account for and report on the investment of
program assets or may enter into an agreement with the state investment
board for accounting and reporting.
(ii) The director's duties related to individual participant
accounts include conducting the activities of trade instruction,
settlement activities, and direction of cash movement and related wire
transfers with the custodian bank and outside investment firms.
(iii) The director has sole responsibility for contracting with any
recordkeepers for individual participant accounts and shall manage the
performance of recordkeepers under those contracts.
(b)(i) The director's duties under (a)(ii) of this subsection do
not limit the authority of the state investment board to conduct its
responsibilities for asset management and balancing of program funds.
(ii) The state investment board has sole responsibility for
contracting with outside investment firms to provide investment
management for program funds and shall manage the performance of
investment managers under those contracts.
(c) The state treasurer shall designate and define the terms of
engagement for the custodial banks.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.33A.070 and 1981 c 3 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
No member of the state investment board is liable for the
negligence, default, or failure of any other person or other member of
the board to perform the duties of the member's office and no member of
the board shall be considered or held to be an insurer of the funds or
assets of any of the trust and retirement funds, including funds or
assets of the voluntary accounts program, nor is any nonvoting member
liable for actions performed with the exercise of reasonable diligence
within the scope of the member's authorized activities as a member of
the board.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.84.092 and 2002 c 242 s 2, 2002 c 114 s 24, and
2002 c 56 s 402 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
the federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the
public health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
regional transportation investment district account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account,
the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund,
the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the Washington voluntary accounts program
administrative account, the Washington voluntary accounts program
principal account, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation equipment
fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account,
the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

--- END ---