BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.88.030 and 1996 c 249 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person or entity may petition for the appointment of a
qualified person, trust company, national bank, or nonprofit
corporation authorized in RCW 11.88.020 as the guardian or limited
guardian of an incapacitated person. No liability for filing a
petition for guardianship or limited guardianship shall attach to a
petitioner acting in good faith and upon reasonable basis. A petition
for guardianship or limited guardianship shall state:
(a) The name, age, residence, and post office address of the
alleged incapacitated person;
(b) The nature of the alleged incapacity in accordance with RCW
11.88.010;
(c) The approximate value and description of property, including
any compensation, pension, insurance, or allowance, to which the
alleged incapacitated person may be entitled;
(d) Whether there is, in any state, a guardian or limited guardian,
or pending guardianship action for the person or estate of the alleged
incapacitated person;
(e) The residence and post office address of the person whom
petitioner asks to be appointed guardian or limited guardian;
(f) The names and addresses, and nature of the relationship, so far
as known or can be reasonably ascertained, of the persons most closely
related by blood or marriage to the alleged incapacitated person;
(g) The name and address of the person or facility having the care
and custody of the alleged incapacitated person;
(h) The reason why the appointment of a guardian or limited
guardian is sought and the interest of the petitioner in the
appointment, and whether the appointment is sought as guardian or
limited guardian of the person, the estate, or both;
(i) A description of any alternate arrangements previously made by
the alleged incapacitated person, such as trusts or powers of attorney,
including identifying any guardianship nominations contained in a power
of attorney, and why a guardianship is nevertheless necessary;
(j) The nature and degree of the alleged incapacity and the
specific areas of protection and assistance requested and the
limitation of rights requested to be included in the court's order of
appointment;
(k) The requested term of the limited guardianship to be included
in the court's order of appointment;
(l) Whether the petitioner is proposing a specific individual to
act as guardian ad litem and, if so, the individual's knowledge of or
relationship to any of the parties, and why the individual is proposed.
(2)(a) The attorney general may petition for the appointment of a
guardian or limited guardian in any case in which there is cause to
believe that a guardianship is necessary and no private party is able
and willing to petition.
(b) Prepayment of a filing fee shall not be required in any
guardianship or limited guardianship brought by the attorney general.
Payment of the filing fee shall be ordered from the estate of the
incapacitated person at the hearing on the merits of the petition,
unless in the judgment of the court, such payment would impose a
hardship upon the incapacitated person, in which case the filing shall
be waived.
(3) No filing fee shall be charged by the court for filing either
a petition for guardianship or a petition for limited guardianship if
the petition alleges that the alleged incapacitated person has total
assets of a value of less than three thousand dollars.
(4) In any petition for guardianship of the person in which the
petitioner alleges the guardian should be granted the alleged
incapacitated person's decision-making authority regarding residential
placement, the reasons for such a request must be specifically stated
in the petition pursuant to subsection (1)(h) and (j) of this section.
(5)(a) Notice that a guardianship proceeding has been commenced
shall be personally served upon the alleged incapacitated person and
the guardian ad litem along with a copy of the petition for appointment
of a guardian. Such notice shall be served not more than five court
days after the petition has been filed.
(b) Notice under this subsection shall include a clear and easily
readable statement of the legal rights of the alleged incapacitated
person that could be restricted or transferred to a guardian by a
guardianship order as well as the right to counsel of choice and to a
jury trial on the issue of incapacity. Such notice shall be in
substantially the following form and shall be in capital letters,
double-spaced, and in a type size not smaller than ten-point type:

IMPORTANT NOTICE PLEASE READ CAREFULLY

A PETITION TO HAVE A GUARDIAN APPOINTED FOR YOU HAS BEEN FILED IN THE
. . . . . . COUNTY SUPERIOR COURT BY . . . . . . IF A GUARDIAN IS
APPOINTED, YOU COULD LOSE ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING RIGHTS:
(1) TO MARRY OR DIVORCE;
(2) TO VOTE OR HOLD AN ELECTED OFFICE;
(3) TO ENTER INTO A CONTRACT OR MAKE OR REVOKE A WILL;
(4) TO APPOINT SOMEONE TO ACT ON YOUR BEHALF;
(5) TO SUE AND BE SUED OTHER THAN THROUGH A GUARDIAN;
(6) TO POSSESS A LICENSE TO DRIVE;
(7) TO BUY, SELL, OWN, MORTGAGE, OR LEASE PROPERTY;
(8) TO CONSENT TO OR REFUSE MEDICAL TREATMENT;
(9) TO DECIDE WHO SHALL PROVIDE CARE AND ASSISTANCE;
(10) TO MAKE DECISIONS REGARDING SOCIAL ASPECTS OF YOUR LIFE;
(11) TO MAKE DECISIONS REGARDING YOUR PLACE OF RESIDENCE.

UNDER THE LAW, YOU HAVE CERTAIN RIGHTS.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO BE REPRESENTED BY A LAWYER OF YOUR OWN CHOOSING.
THE COURT WILL APPOINT A LAWYER TO REPRESENT YOU IF YOU ARE UNABLE TO
PAY OR PAYMENT WOULD RESULT IN A SUBSTANTIAL HARDSHIP TO YOU.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO ASK FOR A JURY TO DECIDE WHETHER OR NOT YOU NEED
A GUARDIAN TO HELP YOU.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO BE PRESENT IN COURT AND TESTIFY WHEN THE HEARING
IS HELD TO DECIDE WHETHER OR NOT YOU NEED A GUARDIAN. IF A GUARDIAN AD
LITEM IS APPOINTED, YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO REQUEST THE COURT TO REPLACE
THAT PERSON.

(((5))) (6) All petitions filed under the provisions of this
section shall be heard within sixty days unless an extension of time is
requested by a party or the guardian ad litem within such sixty day
period and granted for good cause shown. If an extension is granted,
the court shall set a new hearing date.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.88.095 and 1995 c 297 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In determining the disposition of a petition for guardianship,
the court's order shall be based upon findings as to the capacities,
condition, and needs of the alleged incapacitated person, and shall not
be based solely upon agreements made by the parties.
(2) Every order appointing a full or limited guardian of the person
or estate shall include:
(a) Findings as to the capacities, condition, and needs of the
alleged incapacitated person;
(b) The amount of the bond, if any, or a bond review period;
(c) When the next report of the guardian is due;
(d) Whether the guardian ad litem shall continue acting as guardian
ad litem;
(e) Whether a review hearing shall be required upon the filing of
the inventory;
(f) The authority of the guardian, if any, for investment and
expenditure of the ward's estate; ((and))
(g) The authority of the guardian, if any, for exercising the
ward's preferences or decision making with regard to residence or
residential placement; and
(h) Names and addresses of those persons described in RCW
11.88.090(5)(d), if any, whom the court believes should receive copies
of further pleadings filed by the guardian with respect to the
guardianship.
(3) If the court determines that a limited guardian should be
appointed, the order shall specifically set forth the limits by either
stating exceptions to the otherwise full authority of the guardian or
by stating the specific authority of the guardian.
(4) In determining the disposition of a petition for appointment of
a guardian or limited guardian of the estate only, the court shall
consider whether the alleged incapacitated person is capable of giving
informed medical consent or of making other personal decisions and, if
not, whether a guardian or limited guardian of the person of the
alleged incapacitated person should be appointed for that purpose.
(5) Unless otherwise ordered, any powers of attorney or durable
powers of attorney shall be revoked upon appointment of a guardian or
limited guardian of the estate.
If there is an existing medical power of attorney, the court must
make a specific finding of fact regarding the continued validity of
that medical power of attorney before appointing a guardian or limited
guardian for the person.

Sec. 3 RCW 11.92.043 and 1991 c 289 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of the guardian or limited guardian of the
person:
(1) To file within three months after appointment a personal care
plan for the incapacitated person which shall include (a) an assessment
of the incapacitated person's physical, mental, and emotional needs and
of such person's ability to perform or assist in activities of daily
living, and (b) the guardian's specific plan for meeting the identified
and emerging personal care needs of the incapacitated person.
(2) To file annually or, where a guardian of the estate has been
appointed, at the time an account is required to be filed under RCW
11.92.040, a report on the status of the incapacitated person, which
shall include:
(a) The address and name of the incapacitated person and all
residential changes during the period;
(b) The services or programs which the incapacitated person
receives;
(c) The medical status of the incapacitated person;
(d) The mental status of the incapacitated person;
(e) Changes in the functional abilities of the incapacitated
person;
(f) Activities of the guardian for the period;
(g) Any recommended changes in the scope of the authority of the
guardian;
(h) The identity of any professionals who have assisted the
incapacitated person during the period.
(3) To report to the court within thirty days any substantial
change in the incapacitated person's condition, or any changes in
residence of the incapacitated person.
(4) Consistent with the powers granted by the court, to care for
and maintain the incapacitated person in the setting least restrictive
to the incapacitated person's freedom and appropriate to the
incapacitated person's personal care needs, assert the incapacitated
person's rights and best interests, and if the incapacitated person is
a minor or where otherwise appropriate, to see that the incapacitated
person receives appropriate training and education and that the
incapacitated person has the opportunity to learn a trade, occupation,
or profession.
(5) Consistent with RCW 7.70.065, to provide timely, informed
consent for health care of the incapacitated person, except in the case
of a limited guardian where such power is not expressly provided for in
the order of appointment or subsequent modifying order as provided in
RCW 11.88.125 as now or hereafter amended, the standby guardian or
standby limited guardian may provide timely, informed consent to
necessary medical procedures if the guardian or limited guardian cannot
be located within four hours after the need for such consent arises.
No guardian, limited guardian, or standby guardian may involuntarily
commit for mental health treatment, observation, or evaluation an
alleged incapacitated person who is unable or unwilling to give
informed consent to such commitment unless the procedures for
involuntary commitment set forth in chapter 71.05 or 72.23 RCW are
followed. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow a
guardian, limited guardian, or standby guardian to consent to:
(a) Therapy or other procedure which induces convulsion;
(b) Surgery solely for the purpose of psychosurgery;
(c) Other psychiatric or mental health procedures that restrict
physical freedom of movement, or the rights set forth in RCW 71.05.370.
A guardian, limited guardian, or standby guardian who believes
these procedures are necessary for the proper care and maintenance of
the incapacitated person shall petition the court for an order unless
the court has previously approved the procedure within the past thirty
days. The court may order the procedure only after an attorney is
appointed in accordance with RCW 11.88.045 if no attorney has
previously appeared, notice is given, and a hearing is held in
accordance with RCW 11.88.040.
The limitations in subsection (5) of this section are not intended
to apply to a guardian of the person who has been granted specific
authority to exercise an incapacitated person's decision making
regarding residential placement in order to obtain the services
available under Title 71A RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 11.92.190 and 1996 c 249 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
No residential treatment facility which provides nursing or other
care may detain a person within such facility against their will. Any
court order, other than an order issued in accordance with the
involuntary treatment provisions of chapters 10.77, 71.05, and 72.23
RCW, ((which purports to authorize such involuntary detention or
purports to authorize a guardian or limited guardian to consent to such
involuntary detention on behalf of an incapacitated person)) or in
accordance with the residential placement provision of RCW
11.88.095(2)(g), shall be void and of no force or effect. This section
does not apply to the detention of a minor as provided in chapter
70.96A or 71.34 RCW.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a court order
authorizing placement of an incapacitated person in a residential
treatment facility if such order is not otherwise required by law:
PROVIDED, That notice of any residential placement of an incapacitated
person shall be served, either before or after placement, by the
guardian or limited guardian on such person, the guardian ad litem of
record, and any attorney of record.

Sec. 5 1998 c 216 s 9 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
Sections ((1 and)) 5 through 8 of this act expire June 30, 2003.

Sec. 6 RCW 71A.10.060 and 1989 c 175 s 139 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever this title requires the secretary to give notice, the
secretary shall give notice to the person with a developmental
disability and, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
to at least one other person. The other person shall be the first
person known to the secretary in the following order of priority:
(a) A legal representative of the person with a developmental
disability;
(b) A parent of a person with a developmental disability who is
eighteen years of age or older;
(c) Other kin of the person with a developmental disability, with
preference to persons with the closest kinship;
(d) The Washington protection and advocacy system for the rights of
persons with developmental disabilities, appointed in compliance with
42 U.S.C. Sec. 6042; or
(e) A person who is not an employee of the department or of a
person who contracts with the department under this title who, in the
opinion of the secretary, will be concerned with the welfare of the
person.
(2) Notice to a person with a developmental disability shall be
given in a way that the person is best able to understand. This can
include reading or explaining the materials to the person.
(3) A person with a developmental disability may in writing request
the secretary to give notice only to that person. The secretary shall
comply with that direction unless the person has a guardian appointed
over his or her person, or the secretary denies the request because the
person may be at risk of losing rights if the secretary complies with
the request. The secretary shall give notice as provided in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section. On filing an application with
the secretary within thirty days of receipt of the notice, the person
who made the request has the right to an adjudicative proceeding under
RCW 71A.10.050 on the secretary's decision.
(4) The giving of notice to a person under this title does not
empower the person who is given notice to take any action or give any
consent, unless otherwise authorized by law.

Sec. 7 RCW 71A.10.070 and 1989 c 175 s 140 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever this title places on the secretary the duty to
consult, the secretary shall carry out that duty by consulting with the
person with a developmental disability and, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, with at least one other person. The
other person shall be in order of priority:
(a) A legal representative of the person with a developmental
disability;
(b) A parent of a person with a developmental disability who is
eighteen years of age or older;
(c) Other kin of the person with a developmental disability, with
preference to persons with the closest kinship;
(d) The Washington protection and advocacy system for the rights of
persons with developmental disabilities, appointed in compliance with
42 U.S.C. Sec. 6042; or
(e) Any other person who is not an employee of the department or of
a person who contracts with the department under this title who, in the
opinion of the secretary, will be concerned with the welfare of the
person.
(2) A person with a developmental disability may in writing request
the secretary to consult only with that person. The secretary shall
comply with that direction unless the person has a guardian appointed
over his or her person, or the secretary denies the request because the
person may be at risk of losing rights if the secretary complies with
the request. The secretary shall give notice as provided in RCW
71A.10.060 when a request is denied. On filing an application with the
secretary within thirty days of receipt of the notice, the person who
made the request has the right to an adjudicative proceeding under RCW
71A.10.050 on the secretary's decision.
(3) Consultation with a person under this section does not
authorize the person who is consulted to take any action or give any
consent, unless otherwise authorized by law.

--- END ---