BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a number of tax
exemptions, deductions, credits, and other preferences have outlived
their usefulness. State records show no taxpayers have claimed relief
under these tax preferences in recent years. The intent of this act is
to update and simplify the tax statutes by repealing these outdated tax
preferences.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.76.165 and 1973 c 117 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any county which owns or leases property from another governmental
agency and provides such property for area or county and district
agricultural fair purposes may apply to the director for special
assistance in carrying out necessary capital improvements to such
property and maintenance of the appurtenances thereto((, and in the
event such property and capital improvements are leased to any
organization conducting an agricultural fair pursuant to chapter 15.76
RCW and chapter 257 of the Laws of 1955, such leasehold and such leased
property shall be exempt from real and personal property taxation)).

Sec. 3 RCW 43.52.460 and 1971 ex.s. c 75 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any joint operating agency formed under this chapter shall pay in
lieu of taxes payments in the same amounts as paid by public utility
districts. Such payments shall be distributed in accordance with the
provisions applicable to public utility districts((: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That such tax shall not apply to steam generated electricity
produced by a nuclear steam powered electric generating facility
constructed or acquired by a joint operating agency and in operation
prior to May 17, 1971)).

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.050 and 2002 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible
personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:
(a) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(b) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(c) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(d) ((Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; or
(e))) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of tangible personal
property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the
performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as provided in
(a), (b), (c), or (d)((, or (e))) of this subsection following such
use. The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to
persons engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280
(2) and (7) and 82.04.290.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or
for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of coin-operated laundry facilities
when such facilities are situated in an apartment house, rooming house,
or mobile home park for the exclusive use of the tenants thereof, and
also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and shall also include the sale of services or charges
made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to
constructing, repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or
under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by
title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such
construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such
construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original
owner;
(d) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to the cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but shall not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and
all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel,
trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real
property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real
property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real property
for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same.
For the purposes of this subsection, it shall be presumed that the sale
of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous
period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real
property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property,
labor and services to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e),
and (f) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property,
labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by
such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at
retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services
may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection shall be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4) The term shall also include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property to consumers and the rental of equipment with an
operator.
(5) The term shall also include the providing of telephone service,
as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6) The term shall also include the sale of canned software other
than a sale to a person who presents a resale certificate under RCW
82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery to the end user, but
shall not include custom software or the customization of canned
software.
(7) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(8) The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state department of
fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that
the farmer owns or leases.
(9) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development.
(10) Until July 1, 2003, the term shall not include the sale of or
charge made for labor and services rendered for environmental remedial
action as defined in RCW 82.04.2635(2).

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.260 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits and vegetables, or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and
vegetables canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated by the
seller and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who
transports in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state,
the seller shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by
the department and retain the statement as a business record; and
(d) Dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in
21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including byproducts
from the manufacturing of the dairy products such as whey and casein;
or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports
in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller
shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by the
department and retain the statement as a business record.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) ((Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the assemblies multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing nuclear fuel assemblies, as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7))) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(((8))) (6) Upon every person engaging within this state in
business as an international steamship agent, international customs
house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo
charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo
agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only
international activities shall be equal to the gross income derived
from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(((9))) (7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to
taxation under this subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes
imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject
to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated
activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in
waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities
of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be
loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or
under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a
warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further
movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight
station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or
otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode
of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities
included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading,
unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the
consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode;
documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery,
checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer
of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee;
terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not
limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(((10))) (8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010;
as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(((11))) (9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an
insurance agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed
under chapter 48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with
respect to such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income
of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(((12))) (10) Upon every person engaging within this state in
business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is
operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its
political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995,
and 1.5 percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection
shall be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.08.0255 and 1998 c 176 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of((:
(a) Motor vehicle fuel used in aircraft by the manufacturer thereof
for research, development, and testing purposes; and
(b))) motor vehicle and special fuel if:
(((i))) (a) The fuel is purchased for the purpose of public
transportation and the purchaser is entitled to a refund or an
exemption under RCW 82.36.275 or 82.38.080(3); or
(((ii))) (b) The fuel is purchased by a private, nonprofit
transportation provider certified under chapter 81.66 RCW and the
purchaser is entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW 82.36.285
or 82.38.080(1)(h); or
(((iii))) (c) The fuel is taxable under chapter 82.36 or 82.38 RCW.
(2) Any person who has paid the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 on the
sale of special fuel delivered in this state shall be entitled to a
credit or refund of such tax with respect to fuel subsequently
established to have been actually transported and used outside this
state by persons engaged in interstate commerce. The tax shall be
claimed as a credit or refunded through the tax reports required under
RCW 82.38.150.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.12.0256 and 1998 c 176 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of:
(1) ((Motor vehicle fuel used in aircraft by the manufacturer
thereof for research, development, and testing purposes; and
(2))) Special fuel purchased in this state upon which a refund is
obtained as provided in RCW 82.38.180(2); and
(((3))) (2) Motor vehicle and special fuel if:
(a) The fuel is used for the purpose of public transportation and
the purchaser is entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW
82.36.275 or 82.38.080(3); or
(b) The fuel is purchased by a private, nonprofit transportation
provider certified under chapter 81.66 RCW and the purchaser is
entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW 82.36.285 or
82.38.080(1)(h); or
(c) The fuel is taxable under chapter 82.36 or 82.38 RCW:
PROVIDED, That the use of motor vehicle and special fuel upon which a
refund of the applicable fuel tax is obtained shall not be exempt under
this subsection (((3))) (2)(c), and the director of licensing shall
deduct from the amount of such tax to be refunded the amount of tax due
under this chapter and remit the same each month to the department of
revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.35.010 (Intent) and 1979 ex.s. c 191 s 1;
(2) RCW 82.35.020 (Definitions) and 1996 c 186 s 521 & 1979 ex.s.
c 191 s 2;
(3) RCW 82.35.040 (Issuance of certificate -- Limitations -- Tabulation
of costs incurred -- Administrative rules) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 2 s 3 &
1979 ex.s. c 191 s 4;
(4) RCW 82.35.050 (Credit against taxes -- Conditions -- Amount--Limitations) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 2 s 1 & 1979 ex.s. c 191 s 5;
(5) RCW 82.35.070 (Issuance of certificate or supplement and notice
of refusal to issue certificate or supplement -- Certified mail) and 1979
ex.s. c 191 s 7;
(6) RCW 82.35.080 (Revocation of certificate -- Grounds -- Continuance
of certificate -- Liability for money saved -- Technical assistance) and
1999 c 358 s 15, 1996 c 186 s 522, & 1979 ex.s. c 191 s 8;
(7) RCW 82.35.900 (Severability -- 1979 ex.s. c 191) and 1979 ex.s.
c 191 s 13;
(8) RCW 82.61.010 (Definitions) and 1995 1st sp.s. c 3 s 10, 1994
c 125 s 1, 1988 c 41 s 1, 1987 c 497 s 1, 1986 c 116 s 9, & 1985 ex.s.
c 2 s 1;
(9) RCW 82.61.030 (Tax deferral -- Eligibility) and 1987 c 497 s 3 &
1985 ex.s. c 2 s 3;
(10) RCW 82.61.050 (Issuance of tax deferral certificate) and 1985
ex.s. c 2 s 4;
(11) RCW 82.61.060 (Repayment schedule) and 1987 c 497 s 4 & 1985
ex.s. c 2 s 5;
(12) RCW 82.61.080 (Applicability of general administrative
provisions) and 1985 ex.s. c 2 s 7;
(13) RCW 82.61.090 (Applications and information subject to
disclosure) and 1987 c 49 s 2;
(14) RCW 82.61.900 (Severability -- 1987 c 497) and 1987 c 497 s 5;
(15) RCW 82.61.901 (Severability -- 1988 c 41) and 1988 c 41 s 6;
(16) RCW 48.14.029 (Premium tax credit -- New employment for
international service activities in eligible areas -- Designation of
census tracts for eligibility -- Records -- Tax due upon ineligibility--Interest assessment -- Information from employment security department)
and 1998 c 313 s 3;
(17) RCW 82.04.4329 (Deductions -- Health insurance pool members--Deficit assessments) and 1987 c 431 s 24;
(18) RCW 82.08.0276 (Exemptions -- Sales of wearing apparel for use
only as a sample for display for sale) and 1980 c 37 s 42;
(19) RCW 82.08.0295 (Exemptions -- Lease amounts and repurchase
amount for certain property under sale/leaseback agreement) and 1986 c
231 s 3;
(20) RCW 82.29A.135 (Exemption for leasehold interests in land,
buildings, machinery, etc., used to manufacture alcohol fuel--
Exceptions -- Limitations -- Claims -- Administrative rules) and 1985 c 371
s 3 & 1980 c 157 s 2;
(21) RCW 82.12.02545 (Exemption -- Use of naval aircraft training
equipment transferred due to base closure) and 1995 c 128 s 1;
(22) RCW 84.36.135 (Real and personal property of housing finance
commission) and 1983 c 161 s 26;
(23) RCW 84.56.450 (Year 2000 failure -- No interest or penalties--Payment of tax) and 1999 c 369 s 6; and
(24) RCW 84.36.300 (Stocks of merchandise, goods, wares or
material -- Aircraft parts, etc. -- When eligible for exemption) and 1973
c 149 s 2 & 1969 ex.s. c 124 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2005.

--- END ---