BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Debts due the state for the overpayment of wages to state
employees may be recovered by the employer by deductions from
subsequent wage payments as provided in section 2 of this act, or by
civil action. If the overpayment is recovered by deduction from the
employee's subsequent wages, each deduction shall not exceed: (a) Five
percent of the employee's disposable earnings in a pay period other
than the final pay period; or (b) the amount still outstanding from the
employee's disposable earnings in the final pay period. The deductions
from wages shall continue until the overpayment is fully recouped.
(2) Nothing in this act prevents: (a) An employee from making
payments in excess of the amount specified in subsection (1)(a) of this
section to an employer; or (b) an employer and employee from agreeing
to a different overpayment amount than that specified in the notice in
section 2(1) of this act or to a method other than a deduction from
wages for repayment of the overpayment amount.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When an employer determines that an employee was overpaid
wages, the employer shall provide written notice to the employee. The
notice shall include the amount of the overpayment, the basis for the
claim, a demand for payment within twenty calendar days of the date on
which the employee received the notice, and the rights of the employee
under this section.
(2) The notice may be served upon the employee in the manner
prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action, or be mailed
by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the employee at his or
her last known address.
(3) Within twenty calendar days after receiving the notice from the
employer that an overpayment has occurred, the employee may request, in
writing, that the employer review its finding that an overpayment has
occurred. The employee may choose to have the review conducted through
written submission of information challenging the overpayment or
through a face-to-face meeting with the employer. If the request is
not made within the twenty-day period as provided in this subsection,
the employee may not further challenge the overpayment and has no right
to further agency review, an adjudicative proceeding, or judicial
review.
(4) Upon receipt of an employee's written request for review of the
overpayment, the employer shall review the employee's challenge to the
overpayment. Upon completion of the review, the employer shall notify
the employee in writing of the employer's decision regarding the
employee's challenge. The notification must be sent by certified mail,
return receipt requested, to the employee at his or her last known
address.
(5) If the employee is dissatisfied with the employer's decision
regarding the employee's challenge to the overpayment, the employee may
request an adjudicative proceeding governed by the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. The employee's application for an
adjudicative proceeding must be in writing, state the basis for
contesting the overpayment notice, and include a copy of the employer's
notice of overpayment. The application must be served on and received
by the employer within twenty-eight calendar days of the employee's
receipt of the employer's decision following review of the employee's
challenge. Notwithstanding RCW 34.05.413(3), agencies may not vary the
requirements of this subsection (5) by rule or otherwise. The employee
must serve the employer by certified mail, return receipt requested.
(6) If the employee does not request an adjudicative proceeding
within the twenty-eight-day period, the amount of the overpayment
provided in the notice shall be deemed final and the employer may
proceed to recoup the overpayment as provided in this section and
section 1 of this act.
(7) Where an adjudicative proceeding has been requested, the
presiding or reviewing officer shall determine the amount, if any, of
the overpayment received by the employee.
(8) If the employee fails to attend or participate in the
adjudicative proceeding, upon a showing of valid service, the presiding
or reviewing officer may enter an administrative order declaring the
amount claimed in the notice sent to the employee after the employer's
review of the employee's challenge to the overpayment to be assessed
against the employee and subject to collection action by the state as
provided in section 1 of this act.
(9) Failure to make an application for a review by the employer as
provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section or an adjudicative
proceeding within twenty-eight calendar days of the date of receiving
notice of the employer's decision after review of the overpayment shall
result in the establishment of a final debt against the employee in the
amount asserted by the employer, which debt shall be collected as
provided in section 1 of this act.
(10) As used in this act:
(a) "Employer" means the state of Washington and any of its
agencies, institutions, boards, or commissions; and
(b) "Overpayment" means a payment of wages for a pay period that is
greater than the amount earned for a pay period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of financial management shall adopt the rules necessary
to implement this act.

--- END ---