BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the nature and
demand for centralized state government support services has evolved
considerably over the forty years since the creation of the department
of general administration. The legislature finds that sound business
models and financing mechanisms for centralized state services are
essential to ensuring competitive and fair fees and rates. The
legislature further finds that as successive mandates have been added
to the department's mission, the department's enabling statutes have
grown increasingly complex and inflexible. However, the underlying
management principles of efficiency and economies of scale, service and
stewardship, innovation, and fair pricing based on full ownership costs
remain as vital to the state as ever. The legislature declares that
reaffirming these principles is of public benefit, to ensure that state
agencies providing direct services to the public receive the most
efficient, cost-effective, and responsive support services possible.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.19.565 and 1998 c 111 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of general administration shall establish a motor
vehicle transportation service which is hereby empowered to:
(1) Provide suitable motor vehicle transportation services to any
state agency on either a temporary or permanent basis upon requisition
from a state agency and upon such demonstration of need as the
department may require;
(2) Provide motor pools for the use of state agencies located in
the Olympia ((and Seattle)) area((s)) and such additional motor pools
at other locations in the state as may be necessary to provide
economic, efficient, and effective motor vehicle transportation
services to state agencies. Such additional motor pools may be under
either the direct control of the department or under the supervision of
another state agency by agreement with the department;
(3) Establish an equitable schedule of rental and mileage charges
to agencies for motor vehicle transportation services furnished which
shall be designed to provide funds to cover replacement of vehicles,
the purchase of additional vehicles, and to recover the actual total
costs of motor pool operations including but not limited to vehicle
operation expense, depreciation expense, overhead, and nonrecoverable
collision or other damage to vehicles((. Additions to capital such as
the purchase of additional vehicles shall be budgeted and purchased
from funds appropriated for such purposes under such procedures as may
be provided by law)); and
(4) Establish guidelines, procedures, and standards for fleet
operations that other state agencies and institutions of higher
education may adopt. The guidelines, procedures, and standards shall
be consistent with and carry out the objectives of any general policies
adopted by the office of financial management under RCW 43.41.130.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.19.615 and 1998 c 105 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director of general administration shall deposit in the general
administration services account all receipts, including the initial
transfer of automobile pool capital from the highway equipment fund and
any other funds transferred, rentals or other fees and charges for
transportation services furnished, proceeds from the sale of surplus or
replaced property under the control of the supervisor of motor
transport and other income, and from which shall be paid operating
costs, including salaries and wages, administrative expense, overhead,
the cost of replacement vehicles, additional passenger vehicles
((authorized pursuant to RCW 43.19.565)), and any other expenses. ((If
it is necessary at any time for the department to request any
appropriation from the general fund or various dedicated, revolving, or
trust funds to purchase additional vehicles, any appropriation therefor
may provide that such advance shall be repaid together with reasonable
interest from surpluses of the general administration services
account.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commemorative works account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer and shall be used by the department of general
administration for the ongoing care, maintenance, and repair of
commemorative works constructed after the effective date of this act on
the state capitol grounds. Revenues to the account consist of private
donations and any other moneys appropriated to or deposited in the
account. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
necessary for expenditures.
(2) For purposes of this section, "state capitol grounds" means
buildings and land owned by the state and otherwise designated as state
capitol grounds, including the west capitol campus, the east capitol
campus, the north capitol campus, the Tumwater campus, the Lacey
campus, Sylvester Park, Centennial Park, the Old Capitol Building, and
Capitol Lake.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2002 c 322 s 5, 2002 c 204 s 7, and
2002 c 61 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
Washington state combined fund drive account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game farm alternative
account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the rural rehabilitation account, the
stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility
account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, ((and)) the children's trust fund, and the
commemorative works account. However, the earnings to be distributed
shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 43.19.605 (Motor vehicle transportation
service -- Reimbursement for property transferred -- Credits -- Accounting--Disputes) and 1998 c 105 s 11, 1989 c 57 s 6, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 167 s
11 are each repealed.

--- END ---