BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.102 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Any professional football team performing in a stadium
constructed or operated under this chapter, and any league,
association, or conference affiliated with the team, shall not deny,
based on attendance, local broadcast rights within seventy-five miles
of the stadium for a live broadcast of any event held in the stadium.
(b) The prohibition in this subsection does not apply if, seventy-two hours before the event, the percentage of seats sold for the event
is lower than the percentage of the total cost of the construction of
the stadium paid with public funds.
(2) This section is not intended to impair existing contract
rights, but shall be applied to any extension or renegotiation of an
existing contract and to any new contract between a professional
football team performing in a stadium constructed or operated under
this chapter, and any league, association, or conference or any local,
regional, or national television broadcaster, cable network, or
satellite carrier.
(3) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Section 1 of this act takes effect
ninety days after certification by the secretary of state that
substantively similar legislation has been enacted into law by at least
four additional states of the United States.
(2) If the secretary of state has not issued the certification
required by subsection (1) of this section by January 1, 2009, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---