BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.100.030 and 1999 c 165 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A public facilities district is authorized to acquire,
construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate
sports facilities, entertainment facilities, convention facilities, or
regional centers as defined in RCW 35.57.020, together with contiguous
parking facilities. For districts formed after January 1, 2000,
regional centers include: Sports and recreation facilities, other than
ski areas; entertainment facilities; or convention facilities. The
taxes that are provided for in this chapter may only be imposed for
these purposes.
(2) A public facilities district may enter into agreements under
chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint provision and operation of such
facilities and may enter into contracts under chapter 39.34 RCW where
any party to the contract provides and operates such facilities for the
other party or parties to the contract.
(3) Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit
service system, a public ((facility [facilities])) facilities district
may contract with a public or private entity for the operation or
management of its public facilities.
(4) A public facilities district is authorized to use the
supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures set forth
in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the design, construction,
reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any of its public facilities.
(5) A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for
the use of its facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts,
grants, and donations.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.57.020 and 2002 c 363 s 2 and 2002 c 218 s 25 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A public facilities district is authorized to acquire,
construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, finance, and
operate one or more regional centers. For purposes of this chapter,
"regional center" means a convention, conference, or special events
center, or any combination of facilities, and related parking
facilities, serving a regional population constructed, improved, or
rehabilitated after July 25, 1999, at a cost of at least ten million
dollars, including debt service. "Regional center" includes sports and
recreation facilities, entertainment facilities, and convention
facilities. "Regional center" also includes an existing convention,
conference, or special events center, and related parking facilities,
serving a regional population, that is improved or rehabilitated after
July 25, 1999, where the costs of improvement or rehabilitation are at
least ten million dollars, including debt service. A "special events
center" is a facility, available to the public, used for community
events, sporting events, trade shows, and artistic, musical,
theatrical, or other cultural exhibitions, presentations, or
performances. A regional center is conclusively presumed to serve a
regional population if state and local government investment in the
construction, improvement, or rehabilitation of the regional center is
equal to or greater than ten million dollars.
(2) A public facilities district may enter into contracts with any
city or town for the purpose of exercising any powers of a community
renewal agency under chapter 35.81 RCW.
(3) A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for
the use of its facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts,
grants, and donations for the purpose of a regional center.
(4) A public facilities district may impose charges, fees, and
taxes authorized in RCW 35.57.040, and use revenues derived therefrom
for the purpose of paying principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by the public facilities district to construct a regional
center.
(5) Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit
service system, a public facilities district may contract with a public
or private entity for the operation or management of its public
facilities.
(6) A public facilities district is authorized to use the
supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures set forth
in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the design, construction,
reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any regional center.
(7) A city or town in conjunction with any special agency,
authority, or other district established by a county or any other
governmental agency is authorized to use the supplemental alternative
public works contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in
connection with the design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or
alteration of any regional center funded in whole or in part by a
public facilities district.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.390 and 2002 c 363 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
governing body of a public facilities district created before July 31,
2002, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction of
a new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an existing
new regional center, before January 1, 2004, or with regard to a public
facilities district located in a county with a population over one
hundred fifty thousand that is contiguous to an international boundary,
that commences such construction before January 1, 2005, may impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
tax
is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the public facilities district. The rate of tax shall not
exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public facilities
district.
(3) No tax may be collected under this section before August 1,
2000. The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds
issued for the construction of the regional center and related parking
facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years after the
tax is first collected.
(4) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the
purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount
from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three percent of
the amount collected under this section, provided that amounts
generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 35.57
RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 36.100 RCW
shall not constitute a public or private source. For the purpose of
this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited to
cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used for
the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions from
public or private foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector
partners as part of a public and private partnership agreement
negotiated by the public facilities district.
(5) The combined total tax levied under this section shall not be
greater than 0.033 percent. If both a public facilities district
created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public facilities district
created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this section, the
tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57
RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.
(6) A public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW
is not eligible to impose the tax under this section if the legislative
authority of the county where the public facilities district is located
has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
governing body of a public facilities district created after July 1,
2003, but before June 30, 2005, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that
commences construction of a new regional center, or improvement or
rehabilitation of an existing new regional center, before January 1,
2006, may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of
this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law
and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the public facilities district. The rate of tax shall not
exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public facilities
district.
(3) No tax may be collected under this section before August 1,
2003. The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds
issued for the construction of the regional center and related parking
facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years after the
tax is first collected.
(4) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the
purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount
from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three percent of
the amount collected under this section, provided that amounts
generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 35.57
RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 36.100 RCW
shall not constitute a public or private source. For the purpose of
this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited
to,
cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development
or improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used
for the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions
from public or private foundations, or amounts attributed to private
sector partners as part of a public and private partnership agreement
negotiated by the public facilities district.
(5) The combined total tax levied under this section shall not be
greater than 0.033 percent. If both a public facilities district
created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public facilities district
created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this section, the
tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57
RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.
(6) A public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW
is not eligible to impose the tax under this section if the legislative
authority of the county where the public facilities district is located
has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

--- END ---