BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Substantial volumes of hazardous wastes, and used oil and other
recycled materials, are being accumulated and managed at facilities
located throughout Washington;
(b) Some hazardous waste management facilities, used oil
processors, and recyclers have been abandoned, shut down, or gone
bankrupt in Washington, leaving taxpayers, property owners, or former
customers with millions of dollars in clean-up costs and significant
environmental impacts; and
(c) The proper management and oversight of wastes at these
facilities is essential to prevent adverse effects to the environment
and economy and to protect public health and safety.
(2) Toward that end, the legislature determines that by December
31, 2003, the department of ecology shall, in consultation with
representatives of the waste management industry, businesses that
generate waste, financial institutions, insurance companies, local
government, environmental groups, and other interested parties, provide
a report to the appropriate standing committees of the house of
representatives and the senate containing at least the following
information and recommendations:
(a) Recommended requirements for financial assurance to
appropriately close and clean up these facilities;
(b) Recommended requirements for liability insurance to address any
unplanned sudden or nonsudden contaminant release to the environment of
these facilities;
(c) Recommend a system for authorizing off-site recycling and used
oil processing operations that are not currently subject to hazardous
waste permits; and
(d) Information on a possible fee-based system to provide adequate
funding for the department's permitting, compliance, and assistance
programs for hazardous waste facilities, including recyclers and used
oil processors.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that by July 1, 2005, all
off-site used oil and recycling activities at facilities will have
financial assurance and pollution liability insurance in place. In
developing rules to implement recommendations, the department of
ecology shall work with stakeholders to review existing state and
federal requirements and evaluate potential environmental risk.
(4) Nothing in this section applies to waste generators.

--- END ---