BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.52.185 and 1994 c 261 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Nothing in)) This chapter ((applies)) does not apply to accepted
husbandry practices used in the commercial raising or slaughtering of
livestock or poultry, or products thereof or to the use of animals in
the normal and usual course of rodeo events or to the customary use or
exhibiting of animals in normal and usual events at fairs as defined in
RCW 15.76.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington.
(b) "Director" means the director of the department of agriculture
or the director's representative.
(c) "Egg-laying facility" means any single location consisting of
one or more structures which collectively house three thousand or more
laying hens for the purpose of commercial egg production.
(d) "Laying hen" means a female chicken kept for commercial egg
production.
(e) "Producer" means any person or entity engaged in the commercial
production of eggs whose flock numbers three thousand or more laying
hens.
(2)(a) An action or inaction by a producer, or a person acting at
the direction of or on behalf of a producer, that causes the death, at
any one time, of three or more percent of the laying hens in an egg-laying facility is not an accepted husbandry practice used in the
commercial raising of poultry or products thereof and is not exempted
from this chapter.
(b) The director shall establish a program for conducting
inspections of egg-laying facilities in which three thousand or more
laying hens are kept and has the authority to conduct the inspections.
The director shall develop and maintain a list of egg-laying facilities
to be inspected from information the department receives from persons
licensed under chapter 69.25 RCW. Each egg-laying facility shall be
inspected a minimum of two times per year. To the degree practicable,
the inspections must be unannounced.
(c) The director shall conduct inspections under the program
designed to: (i) Identify instances in which, in the opinion of the
director, a violation or violations of this chapter have caused the
death of three percent or more of the laying hens in such a facility at
any one time; and (ii) conduct testing of eggs for salmonella serotype
enteritidis.
(d) The department shall employ inspectors on an as-needed basis to
conduct the inspections. The department shall not employ an inspector
who is employed by, affiliated with, a member of, or in any other way
associated with, either in the past or present, any humane society,
shelter, or animal welfare agency, or any egg farm, producer, supplier,
processor, or any other private or governmental entity associated with
egg production in the state.
(e) The director shall develop guidelines for conducting
inspections under this section. The guidelines shall include
procedures that:
(i) Ensure that inspections are conducted in a manner that allows
the inspector to determine whether the egg-laying facilities are
conforming to generally accepted poultry industry standards applicable
to laying hens;
(ii) Specify a process for conducting testing of eggs for
salmonella serotype enteritidis and a process for reporting positive
test results to the department of health, the center for disease
control, and the producer; and
(iii) Are designed to limit the risk of transference of disease
between egg-laying facilities.
(f) Producers shall pay an annual inspection fee to cover the costs
of funding the inspection program. The department shall annually
establish the fee in an amount that is necessary to cover the costs of
the inspection program. The inspection fee shall be assessed in
conjunction with the assessment under RCW 69.25.250.
(3) If the director finds evidence of an excessive mortality rate
as a result of one or more violations of this chapter, he or she shall
record evidence of the violations and report the violations to the
prosecuting attorney of the county in which the violation has occurred.
This section may not be construed as providing exclusive authority to
the director to investigate such a violation of this chapter regarding
laying hens.

--- END ---