BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.050 and 1987 c 109 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
After June 6, 1945, no withdrawal of public ground waters of the
state shall be begun, nor shall any well or other works for such
withdrawal be constructed, unless an application to appropriate such
waters has been made to the department and a permit has been granted by
it as herein provided: EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That any withdrawal of public
ground waters for stock-watering purposes, or for the watering of a
lawn or of a noncommercial garden not exceeding one-half acre in area,
or for ((single or group domestic)) residential uses in an amount not
exceeding five thousand gallons a day per residence, regardless of
whether the residence is part of a larger development, or for an
industrial purpose in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a
day, is and shall be exempt from the provisions of this section, but,
to the extent that it is regularly used beneficially, shall be entitled
to a right equal to that established by a permit issued under the
provisions of this chapter((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)).
The department from time to time may require the person or agency
making any such small withdrawal to furnish information as to the means
for and the quantity of that withdrawal((: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)).
However, at the option of the party making withdrawals of ground waters
of the state not exceeding five thousand gallons per day, applications
under this section or declarations under RCW 90.44.090 may be filed and
permits and certificates obtained in the same manner and under the same
requirements as is in this chapter provided in the case of withdrawals
in excess of five thousand gallons a day.

--- END ---