BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Rules adopted by the state board of health, the department of
health, or a local health jurisdiction, as defined in RCW 43.70.575,
regulating food or food service establishments do not apply to the
slaughter and preparation of one thousand or fewer pastured poultry
animals in a calendar year by the agricultural producer of the poultry
for the sale of the whole raw poultry by the producer directly to the
ultimate consumer at the producer's farm. The state board of health,
the department of health, or a local health jurisdiction, as defined in
RCW 43.70.575, shall not apply such rules directly or indirectly to
such an activity or sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 16.49 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to the slaughter and preparation of one
thousand or fewer pastured poultry animals in a calendar year by the
agricultural producer of the poultry for the sale of the whole raw
poultry by the producer directly to the ultimate consumer at the
producer's farm.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 69.07 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A special, temporary permit issued by the department under this
section is required for the slaughter and preparation of one thousand
or fewer pastured poultry animals in a calendar year by the
agricultural producer of the poultry for the sale of the whole raw
poultry by the producer directly to the ultimate consumer at the
producer's farm, and for such sale. Such activities shall not be
conducted without the permit. However, if the activities are conducted
under such a permit, the activities are exempted from any other
licensing requirements of this chapter.
(2)(a) The department must adopt by rule requirements for a
special, temporary permit for the activities described in subsection
(1) of this section. The requirements must be generally patterned
after those established by WAC 246-215-190 as it exists on the
effective date of this section for temporary food service
establishments, but must be tailored specifically to these slaughter,
preparation, and sale activities. The requirements must include, but
are not limited to, those for: Cooling procedures, when applicable;
sanitary facilities, equipment, and utensils; clean water; washing and
other hygienic practices; and waste and wastewater disposal.
(b) The rules must also identify the length of time such a permit
is valid. In determining the length of time, the department must take
care to ensure that it is adequate to accommodate the seasonal nature
of the permitted activities. In adopting any rule under this section,
the department must also carefully consider the economic constraints on
the regulated activity.
(3) The department shall conduct such inspections of the activities
permitted under this section as are reasonably necessary to ensure
compliance with permit requirements.
(4) The fee for a special permit issued under this section is
seventy-five dollars.

--- END ---