BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any county, city, or town planning
under chapter 36.70A RCW may initiate an annexation process for
unincorporated territory by adopting a resolution commencing
negotiations for an interlocal agreement as provided in chapter 39.34
RCW between a county and any city or town within the county. The
territory proposed for annexation must meet the following criteria:
(a) Be within the city or town urban growth area designated under RCW
36.70A.110, and (b) at least sixty percent of the boundaries of the
territory proposed for annexation must be contiguous to the annexing
city or town or one or more cities or towns.
(2) If the territory proposed for annexation has been designated in
an adopted county comprehensive plan as part of an urban growth area,
urban service area, or potential annexation area for a specific city or
town, or if the urban growth area territory proposed for annexation has
been designated in a written agreement between a city or town and a
county for annexation to a specific city or town, the designation or
designations shall receive full consideration before a city or county
may initiate the annexation process provided for in section 2 of this
act.
(3) The agreement shall describe the boundaries of the territory to
be annexed. A public hearing shall be held by each legislative body,
separately or jointly, before the agreement is executed. Each
legislative body holding a public hearing shall, separately or jointly,
publish the agreement at least once a week for two weeks before the
date of the hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation
within the territory proposed for annexation.
(4) Following adoption and execution of the agreement by both
legislative bodies, the city or town legislative body shall adopt an
ordinance providing for the annexation of the territory described in
the agreement. The legislative body shall cause notice of the proposed
effective date of the annexation, together with a description of the
property to be annexed, to be published at least once each week for two
weeks subsequent to passage of the ordinance, in one or more newspapers
of general circulation within the city and in one or more newspapers of
general circulation within the territory to be annexed. If the
annexation ordinance provides for assumption of indebtedness or
adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, the notice shall include a
statement of the requirements. Any territory to be annexed through an
ordinance adopted under this section is annexed and becomes a part of
the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance of annexation,
which date may not be fewer than forty-five days after adoption of the
ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any county planning under chapter
36.70A RCW may initiate an annexation process with the legislative body
of any other cities or towns that are contiguous to the territory
proposed for annexation in section 1 of this act if:
(a) The county legislative body initiated an annexation process as
provided in section 1 of this act; and
(b) The affected city or town legislative body adopted a responsive
resolution rejecting the proposed annexation or declined to create the
requested interlocal agreement with the county; or
(c) More than one hundred eighty days have passed since adoption of
a county resolution as provided for in section 1 of this act and the
parties have not adopted or executed an interlocal agreement providing
for the annexation of unincorporated territory. The legislative body
for either the county or an affected city or town may, however, pass a
resolution extending the negotiation period for one or more six-month
periods if a public hearing is held and findings of fact are made prior
to each extension.
(2) Any county initiating the process provided for in subsection
(1) of this section must do so by adopting a resolution commencing
negotiations for an interlocal agreement as provided in chapter 39.34
RCW between the county and any city or town within the county. The
annexation area must be within an urban growth area designated under
RCW 36.70A.110 and at least sixty percent of the boundaries of the
territory to be annexed must be contiguous to one or more cities or
towns.
(3) The agreement shall describe the boundaries of the territory to
be annexed. A public hearing shall be held by each legislative body,
separately or jointly, before the agreement is executed. Each
legislative body holding a public hearing shall, separately or jointly,
publish the agreement at least once a week for two weeks before the
date of the hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation
within the territory proposed for annexation.
(4) Following adoption and execution of the agreement by both
legislative bodies, the city or town legislative body shall adopt an
ordinance providing for the annexation. The legislative body shall
cause notice of the proposed effective date of the annexation, together
with a description of the property to be annexed, to be published at
least once each week for two weeks subsequent to passage of the
ordinance, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
city and in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
territory to be annexed. If the annexation ordinance provides for
assumption of indebtedness or adoption of a proposed zoning regulation,
the notice shall include a statement of the requirements. Any area to
be annexed through an ordinance adopted under this section is annexed
and becomes a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the
ordinance of annexation, which date may not be less than forty-five
days after adoption of the ordinance.
(5) The annexation ordinances provided for in section 1(4) of this
act and subsection (4) of this section are subject to referendum for
forty-five days after passage. Upon the filing of a timely and
sufficient referendum petition with the legislative body, signed by
qualified electors in number equal to not less than fifteen percent of
the votes cast in the last general state election in the area to be
annexed, the question of annexation shall be submitted to the voters of
the area in a general election if one is to be held within ninety days
or at a special election called for that purpose not less than forty-five days nor more than ninety days after the filing of the referendum
petition. Notice of the election shall be given as provided in RCW
35.13.080 and the election shall be conducted as provided in the
general election law. The annexation shall be deemed approved by the
voters unless a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in
opposition thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall
become a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance
of annexation.
(6) If more than one city or town adopts interlocal agreements
providing for annexation of the same unincorporated territory as
provided by this section, an election shall be held in the area to be
annexed pursuant to RCW 35.13.070 and 35.13.080. In addition to the
provisions of RCW 35.13.070 and 35.13.080, the ballot shall also
contain a separate proposition allowing voters to cast votes in favor
of annexation to any one city or town participating in an interlocal
agreement as provided by this section. If a majority of voters voting
on the proposition vote against annexation, the proposition is
defeated. If, however, a majority of voters voting in the election
approve annexation, the area shall be annexed to the city or town
receiving the highest number of votes among those cast in favor of
annexation.
(7) Costs for an election required under subsection (6) of this
section shall be borne by the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any county or code city planning under
chapter 36.70A RCW may initiate an annexation process for
unincorporated territory by adopting a resolution commencing
negotiations for an interlocal agreement as provided in chapter 39.34
RCW between a county and any code city within the county. The
territory proposed for annexation must meet the following criteria:
(a) Be within the code city urban growth area designated under RCW
36.70A.110, and (b) at least sixty percent of the boundaries of the
territory proposed for annexation must be contiguous to the annexing
code city or one or more code cities.
(2) If the territory proposed for annexation has been designated in
an adopted county comprehensive plan as part of an urban growth area,
urban service area, or potential annexation area for a specific city,
or if the urban growth area territory proposed for annexation has been
designated in a written agreement between a city and a county for
annexation to a specific city or town, the designation or designations
shall receive full consideration before a city or county may initiate
the annexation process provided for in section 4 of this act.
(3) The agreement shall describe the boundaries of the territory to
be annexed. A public hearing shall be held by each legislative body,
separately or jointly, before the agreement is executed. Each
legislative body holding a public hearing shall, separately or jointly,
publish the agreement at least once a week for two weeks before the
date of the hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation
within the territory proposed for annexation.
(4) Following adoption and execution of the agreement by both
legislative bodies, the city legislative body shall adopt an ordinance
providing for the annexation of the territory described in the
agreement. The legislative body shall cause notice of the proposed
effective date of the annexation, together with a description of the
property to be annexed, to be published at least once each week for two
weeks subsequent to passage of the ordinance, in one or more newspapers
of general circulation within the city and in one or more newspapers of
general circulation within the territory to be annexed. If the
annexation ordinance provides for assumption of indebtedness or
adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, the notice shall include a
statement of the requirements. Any territory to be annexed through an
ordinance adopted under this section is annexed and becomes a part of
the city upon the date fixed in the ordinance of annexation, which date
may not be fewer than forty-five days after adoption of the ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any county planning under chapter
36.70A RCW may initiate an annexation process with the legislative body
of any other cities or towns that are contiguous to the territory
proposed for annexation in section 3 of this act if:
(a) The county legislative body initiated an annexation process as
provided in section 3 of this act; and
(b) The affected city legislative body adopted a responsive
resolution rejecting the proposed annexation or declined to create the
requested interlocal agreement with the county; or
(c) More than one hundred eighty days have passed since adoption of
a county resolution as provided for in section 3 of this act and the
parties have not adopted or executed an interlocal agreement providing
for the annexation of unincorporated territory. The legislative body
for either the county or an affected city may, however, pass a
resolution extending the negotiation period for one or more six-month
periods if a public hearing is held and findings of fact are made prior
to each extension.
(2) Any county initiating the process provided for in subsection
(1) of this section must do so by adopting a resolution commencing
negotiations for an interlocal agreement as provided in chapter 39.34
RCW between the county and any city or town within the county. The
annexation area must be within an urban growth area designated under
RCW 36.70A.110 and at least sixty percent of the boundaries of the
territory to be annexed must be contiguous to one or more cities or
towns.
(3) The agreement shall describe the boundaries of the territory to
be annexed. A public hearing shall be held by each legislative body,
separately or jointly, before the agreement is executed. Each
legislative body holding a public hearing shall, separately or jointly,
publish the agreement at least once a week for two weeks before the
date of the hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation
within the territory proposed for annexation.
(4) Following adoption and execution of the agreement by both
legislative bodies, the city or town legislative body shall adopt an
ordinance providing for the annexation. The legislative body shall
cause notice of the proposed effective date of the annexation, together
with a description of the property to be annexed, to be published at
least once each week for two weeks subsequent to passage of the
ordinance, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
city and in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
territory to be annexed. If the annexation ordinance provides for
assumption of indebtedness or adoption of a proposed zoning regulation,
the notice shall include a statement of the requirements. Any area to
be annexed through an ordinance adopted under this section is annexed
and becomes a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the
ordinance of annexation, which date may not be less than forty-five
days after adoption of the ordinance.
(5) The annexation ordinances provided for in section 3(4) of this
act and subsection (4) of this section are subject to referendum for
forty-five days after passage. Upon the filing of a timely and
sufficient referendum petition with the legislative body, signed by
qualified electors in number equal to not less than fifteen percent of
the votes cast in the last general state election in the area to be
annexed, the question of annexation shall be submitted to the voters of
the area in a general election if one is to be held within ninety days
or at a special election called for that purpose not less than forty-five days nor more than ninety days after the filing of the referendum
petition. Notice of the election shall be given as provided in RCW
35A.14.070 and the election shall be conducted as provided in the
general election law. The annexation shall be deemed approved by the
voters unless a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in
opposition thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall
become a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance
of annexation.
(6) If more than one city or town adopts interlocal agreements
providing for annexation of the same unincorporated territory as
provided by this section, an election shall be held in the area to be
annexed pursuant to RCW 35A.14.070. In addition to the provisions of
RCW 35A.14.070, the ballot shall also contain a separate proposition
allowing voters to cast votes in favor of annexation to any one city or
town participating in an interlocal agreement as provided by this
section. If a majority of voters voting on the proposition vote
against annexation, the proposition is defeated. If, however, a
majority of voters voting in the election approve annexation, the area
shall be annexed to the city or town receiving the highest number of
votes among those cast in favor of annexation.
(7) Costs for an election required under subsection (6) of this
section shall be borne by the county.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.70A.110 and 1997 c 429 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall designate an urban growth area or areas within which
urban growth shall be encouraged and outside of which growth can occur
only if it is not urban in nature. Each city that is located in such
a county shall be included within an urban growth area. An urban
growth area may include more than a single city. An urban growth area
may include territory that is located outside of a city only if such
territory already is characterized by urban growth whether or not the
urban growth area includes a city, or is adjacent to territory already
characterized by urban growth, or is a designated new fully contained
community as defined by RCW 36.70A.350.
(2) Based upon the growth management population projection made for
the county by the office of financial management, the county and each
city within the county shall include areas and densities sufficient to
permit the urban growth that is projected to occur in the county or
city for the succeeding twenty-year period. Each urban growth area
shall permit urban densities and shall include greenbelt and open space
areas. An urban growth area determination may include a reasonable
land market supply factor and shall permit a range of urban densities
and uses. In determining this market factor, cities and counties may
consider local circumstances. Cities and counties have discretion in
their comprehensive plans to make many choices about accommodating
growth.
Within one year of July 1, 1990, each county that as of June 1,
1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, shall begin
consulting with each city located within its boundaries and each city
shall propose the location of an urban growth area. Within sixty days
of the date the county legislative authority of a county adopts its
resolution of intention or of certification by the office of financial
management, all other counties that are required or choose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall begin this consultation with each city
located within its boundaries. The county shall attempt to reach
agreement with each city on the location of an urban growth area within
which the city is located. If such an agreement is not reached with
each city located within the urban growth area, the county shall
justify in writing why it so designated the area an urban growth area.
A city may object formally with the department over the designation of
the urban growth area within which it is located. Where appropriate,
the department shall attempt to resolve the conflicts, including the
use of mediation services.
(3) Urban growth should be located first in areas already
characterized by urban growth that have adequate existing public
facility and service capacities to serve such development, second in
areas already characterized by urban growth that will be served
adequately by a combination of both existing public facilities and
services and any additional needed public facilities and services that
are provided by either public or private sources, and third in the
remaining portions of the urban growth areas. Urban growth may also be
located in designated new fully contained communities as defined by RCW
36.70A.350.
(4) In general, cities are the units of local government most
appropriate to provide urban governmental services. In general, it is
not appropriate that urban governmental services be extended to or
expanded in rural areas except in those limited circumstances shown to
be necessary to protect basic public health and safety and the
environment and when such services are financially supportable at rural
densities and do not permit urban development.
(5) On or before October 1, 1993, each county that was initially
required to plan under RCW 36.70A.040(1) shall adopt development
regulations designating interim urban growth areas under this chapter.
Within three years and three months of the date the county legislative
authority of a county adopts its resolution of intention or of
certification by the office of financial management, all other counties
that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt
development regulations designating interim urban growth areas under
this chapter. Adoption of the interim urban growth areas may only
occur after public notice; public hearing; and compliance with the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, and RCW 36.70A.110.
Such action may be appealed to the appropriate growth management
hearings board under RCW 36.70A.280. Final urban growth areas shall be
adopted at the time of comprehensive plan adoption under this chapter.
(6) Each county shall include designations of urban growth areas in
its comprehensive plan.
(7) An urban growth area designated in accordance with this section
may include within its boundaries urban service areas or potential
annexation areas designated for specific cities or towns within the
county.

--- END ---