BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that local governments
in the state of Washington face enormous challenges in the areas of
criminal justice and public health. It is the legislature's intent to
allow local governments to raise revenues in order to better protect
the health and safety of Washington state and its residents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority in a county with a population of
less than one million may submit an authorizing proposition to the
county voters and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of
persons voting, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms
of this chapter. The rate of tax under this subsection shall not
exceed three-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the case of
a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county.
(3) Money received under this section shall be shared between the
county and the cities as follows: Sixty percent shall be retained by
the county, and forty percent shall be distributed on a per capita
basis to cities in the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county unincorporated service area may impose a permanent
regular property tax levy in an amount not to exceed thirty cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value of property in the county
unincorporated service area when specifically authorized to do so by a
majority of the voters of the service area voting on a ballot
proposition authorizing the levy. A proposition authorizing the tax
levy under this section shall not be submitted by a county
unincorporated service area more than twice in any twelve-month period.
(2) If a ballot proposition approved under subsection (1) of this
section did not impose the maximum allowable levy amount authorized for
the taxing district under this section, any future increase up to the
maximum allowable levy amount must be specifically authorized by the
voters in accordance with subsection (1) of this section at a general
or special election.
(3) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the first
levy imposed under this section following the approval of the levy by
the voters under subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Any county shall have the power to
create a county unincorporated service area for any purpose specified
in the county ordinance or resolution. The county legislative
authority shall, by resolution, order an election of the voters of the
proposed county unincorporated service area to determine if the service
area shall be formed. The county legislative authority shall in their
resolution direct the county auditor to set the election to be held at
the next general election or at a special election held for such
purpose; describe the purposes of the proposed service area; and order
that notice of the election be published in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county at least twice prior to the election date.
(2) A county unincorporated service area shall be a quasi-municipal
corporation, an independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of
Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing
district" within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state
Constitution.
(3) A county unincorporated service area shall constitute a body
corporate and shall possess all the usual powers of a corporation for
public purposes including, but not limited to, the authority to hire
employees, staff, and services, to enter into contracts, to accept and
expend or use gifts, grants, and donations, and to sue and be sued as
well as all other powers that may now or hereafter be specifically
conferred by statute.
(4) The county legislative authority shall be the governing body of
a county unincorporated service area. The county treasurer shall act
as the ex officio treasurer of the county unincorporated service area.
The electors of a county unincorporated service area are all registered
voters residing within the service area.
(5) A county unincorporated service area shall consist solely of
all the unincorporated areas of the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A proposition to form a county
unincorporated service area shall be submitted to the voters of the
proposed service area. Upon approval by a majority of the voters
voting on the proposition, a county unincorporated service area shall
be established. The proposition submitted to the voters by the county
auditor on the ballot shall be in substantially the following form:

FORMATION OF COUNTY UNINCORPORATED
SERVICE AREA

Shall a county unincorporated service area be established
in the unincorporated area of the county for the purpose
of . . . . . . . . . . . . ?

Yes. . . . . . . . No. . . . . . . .

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any city or town may submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters at a general or special election
and, if the proposition is approved by the majority of qualified voters
voting on the proposition, impose an additional permanent regular
property tax levy in an amount not to exceed thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation.
(2) If a proposition approved under subsection (1) of this section
did not impose the maximum levy amount authorized in this section, any
future increase up to the maximum allowable levy amount must be
specifically authorized by the voters in accordance with subsection (1)
of this section.
(3) The additional regular property tax levy authorized in this
section is in addition to the levy authorized in RCW 84.52.043(1).

Sec. 7 RCW 84.52.010 and 2002 c 248 s 15 and 2002 c 88 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and
purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on
any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of
these sections, the assessor shall recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(1) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes, other than the rate of tax
levy provided in section 6 of this act, shall be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy shall take precedence over all other levies and
shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under section 3 of
this act, section 6 of this act, RCW 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion
of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was protected under
RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined rate of regular property tax
levies that are subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these levies
shall be reduced as follows: (a) The levies imposed under sections 3
and 6 of this act shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the
combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value
of any property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate of
regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent
limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that
is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be reduced until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; (((b))) (c) if the combined rate of
regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent
limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property, then the levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and
any portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess
of thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or shall be
eliminated; and (((c))) (d) if the combined rate of regular property
tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the thirty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under
RCW 84.52.069 shall be reduced until the combined rate no longer
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or
eliminated.
(2) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(a) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(b) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(c) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, library
districts, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the first fifty
cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for public
hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(d) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced
on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and
(f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated.
In determining whether the aggregate rate of tax levy on any
property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in that section, the
assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy, as apportioned to the
county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW 84.48.080
without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.52.043 and 1995 c 99 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as
amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal
property by the taxing districts hereafter named shall be as follows:
(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a)
The levy by the state shall not exceed three dollars and sixty cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted to the state equalized
value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state
department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support of the
common schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not exceed one dollar
and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c) the levy
by any road district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or
town shall not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county is hereby
authorized to increase its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a
rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value for general county purposes if the
total levies for both the county and any road district within the
county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as
a result of the increased county levy.
(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior
taxing districts, other than the state, shall not exceed five dollars
and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term
"junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the
state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and
public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection
shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law
by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution;
(c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW
84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical
services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable
housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105;
((and)) (f) the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that
are protected under RCW 84.52.120; and (g) levies under sections 3 and
6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 4 and 5 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

--- END ---