BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.14.130 and 1987 c 109 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When it appears to the department of ecology that a person
entitled to the use of water has not beneficially used his or her water
right or some portion thereof within the preceding fifteen years, and
it appears that said right has or may have reverted to the state
because of such nonuse, as provided by RCW 90.14.160, 90.14.170, or
90.14.180, the department of ecology shall notify such person by order:
PROVIDED, That where a company, association, district, or the United
States has filed a blanket claim under the provisions of ((RCW
90.14.060)) this chapter for the total benefits of those served by it,
the notice shall be served on such company, association, district, or
the United States and not upon any of its individual water users who
may not have used the water or some portion thereof which they were
entitled to use. The order shall contain: (((1))) (a) A description
of the water right, including the approximate location of the point of
diversion, the general description of the lands or places where such
waters were used, the water source, the amount involved, the purpose of
use, and the apparent authority upon which the right is based; (((2)))
(b) a statement that unless sufficient cause be shown on appeal the
water right will be declared relinquished; and (((3))) (c) a statement
that such order may be appealed to the pollution control hearings
board. Any person aggrieved by such an order may appeal it to the
pollution control hearings board pursuant to RCW 43.21B.310. The order
shall be served by registered or certified mail to the last known
address of the person and be posted at the point of division or
withdrawal. The order by itself shall not alter the recipient's right
to use water, if any.
(2) Relinquishment under this chapter may not occur except in
accordance with the procedure set forth in this section or in a
proceeding to determine water rights under RCW 90.03.105 through
90.03.245 or 90.44.220.
(3) For the purposes of this chapter, there is no relinquishment of
any water right or any portion of a water right for full or partial
nonuse of such a right that occurred more than fifteen years before the
date upon which relinquishment proceedings are commenced under this
section or the date upon which adjudication proceedings are commenced
under RCW 90.03.105 through 90.03.245 or 90.44.220.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.14.160 and 1981 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state
through any appropriation authorized by enactments of the legislature
prior to enactment of chapter 117, Laws of 1917, or by custom, or by
general adjudication, who abandons the same, or who voluntarily fails,
without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of said
right to divert or withdraw for any period of ((five)) fifteen
successive years after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or
portion thereof in accordance with the procedure set forth in RCW
90.14.130 or as part of adjudication proceedings commenced under RCW
90.03.105 through 90.03.245 or 90.44.220, and said right or portion
thereof shall revert to the state, and the waters affected by said
right shall become available for appropriation in accordance with RCW
90.03.250.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.14.170 and 1967 c 233 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state by
virtue of his or her ownership of land abutting a stream, lake, or
watercourse, who abandons the same, or who voluntarily fails, without
sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of said right to
withdraw or divert said water for any period of ((five)) fifteen
successive years after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or
portion thereof in accordance with the procedure set forth in RCW
90.14.130 or as part of adjudication proceedings commenced under RCW
90.03.105 through 90.03.245 or 90.44.220, and such right or portion
thereof shall revert to the state, and the waters affected by said
right shall become available for appropriation in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 90.03.250.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.14.180 and 1987 c 109 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person hereafter entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the
state through an appropriation authorized under RCW 90.03.330,
90.44.080, or 90.44.090 who abandons the same, or who voluntarily
fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of
said right to withdraw for any period of ((five)) fifteen successive
years shall relinquish such right or portion thereof in accordance with
the procedure set forth in RCW 90.14.130 or as part of adjudication
proceedings commenced under RCW 90.03.105 through 90.03.245 or
90.44.220, and such right or portion thereof shall revert to the state,
and the waters affected by said right shall become available for
appropriation in accordance with RCW 90.03.250. All certificates
hereafter issued by the department of ecology pursuant to RCW 90.03.330
shall expressly incorporate this section by reference.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.14 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purpose of determining relinquishment, the following must
be used to determine the amount of water that has been beneficially
used under a water right on an annual basis: The amount beneficially
used is the amount of water used within the limits of the right during
the year in which the greatest volume of water was used under the right
during the most current fifteen-year period.

--- END ---