BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
This section applies to rules adopted by the state board of health,
the department of health, or a local health jurisdiction, as defined in
RCW 43.70.575, regulating food or food service establishments. Such
rules do not apply to, and the state board of health, the department of
health, or a local health jurisdiction shall not apply them directly or
indirectly to, the slaughter and preparation of one thousand or fewer
chickens in a calendar year by the agricultural producer of the
chickens for the sale of the whole or cut-up raw chickens by the
producer directly to retail customers. Nor do such rules apply to, and
the state board of health, the department of health, or a local health
jurisdiction shall not apply them directly or indirectly to, such a
sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 16.49 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to the slaughter and preparation of one
thousand or fewer chickens in a calendar year by the agricultural
producer of the chickens for the sale of the whole or cut-up raw
chickens by the producer directly to retail customers, or to such a
sale.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.07.100 and 2002 c 301 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to
establishments issued a permit or licensed under the provisions of:
(((1))) (a) Chapter 69.25 RCW, the Washington wholesome eggs and
egg products act;
(((2))) (b) Chapter 69.28 RCW, the Washington state honey act;
(((3))) (c) Chapter 16.49 RCW, the meat inspection act;
(((4))) (d) Chapter 77.65 RCW, relating to the direct retail
endorsement for wild-caught seafood;
(((5))) (e) Title 66 RCW, relating to alcoholic beverage control;
and
(((6))) (f) Chapter 69.30 RCW, the sanitary control of shellfish
act. However, if any such establishments process foods not
specifically provided for in the above entitled acts, such
establishments shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:
(a) Restaurants or food service establishments; and
(b) The slaughter and preparation of one thousand or fewer chickens
in a calendar year by the agricultural producer of the chickens for the
sale of the whole or cut-up raw chickens by the producer directly to
retail customers, or to such a sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 69.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to the slaughter and preparation of one
thousand or fewer chickens in a calendar year by the agricultural
producer of the chickens for the sale of the whole or cut-up raw
chickens by the producer directly to retail customers, or to such a
sale.

--- END ---