BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 30.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, in addition to all
powers, express or implied, that a bank or trust company has under the
laws of this state, a bank or trust company shall have the powers and
authorities conferred upon a mutual savings bank under Title 32 RCW,
only if:
(1) The bank or trust company notifies the director at least thirty
days prior to the exercise of such power or authority by the bank or
trust company, unless the director waives or modifies this requirement
for notice as to the exercise of a power, authority, or category of
powers or authorities by the bank or trust company;
(2) The director finds that the exercise of such powers and
authorities by the bank or by the trust company serves the convenience
and advantage of depositors, borrowers, or the general public; and
(3) The director finds that the exercise of such powers and
authorities by the bank or by the trust company maintains the fairness
of competition and parity between banks or trust companies and mutual
savings banks.
As used in this section, "powers and authorities" include without
limitation powers and authorities in corporate governance and
operational matters.
The restrictions, limitations, and requirements applicable to
specific powers or authorities of mutual savings banks shall apply to
banks or trust companies exercising those powers or authorities
permitted under this section but only insofar as the restrictions,
limitations, and requirements relate to exercising the powers or
authorities granted banks or trust companies solely under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 30.04.215 and 1995 c 344 s 2 and 1995 c 134 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, in addition to all
powers enumerated by this title, and those necessarily implied
therefrom, a bank or trust company may engage in other business
activities that have been determined by the board of governors of the
federal reserve system or by the United States Congress to be closely
related to the business of banking, as of ((December 31, 1993)) the
effective date of this act.
(2) A bank or trust company that desires to perform an activity
that is not expressly authorized by subsection (1) of this section
shall first apply to the director for authorization to conduct such
activity. Within thirty days of the receipt of this application, the
director shall determine whether the activity is closely related to the
business of banking, whether the public convenience and advantage will
be promoted, whether the activity is apt to create an unsafe or unsound
practice by the bank or trust company and whether the applicant is
capable of performing such an activity. If the director finds the
activity to be closely related to the business of banking and the bank
or trust company is otherwise qualified, he or she shall ((forthwith))
immediately inform the applicant that the activity is authorized. If
the director determines that such activity is not closely related to
the business of banking or that the bank or trust company is not
otherwise qualified, he or she shall ((forthwith)) promptly inform the
applicant in writing. The applicant shall have the right to appeal
from an unfavorable determination in accordance with the procedures of
the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. In determining
whether a particular activity is closely related to the business of
banking, the director shall be guided by the rulings of the board of
governors of the federal reserve system and the comptroller of the
currency in making determinations in connection with the powers
exercisable by bank holding companies, and the activities performed by
other commercial banks or their holding companies.
(3) Notwithstanding any restrictions, limitations, and requirements
of law, in addition to all powers, express or implied, that a bank or
trust company has under the laws of this state, a bank or trust company
shall have the powers and authorities conferred as of August 31, 1994,
or a subsequent date not later than the effective date of this act,
upon (([a])) a federally chartered bank doing business in this state.
A bank or trust company may exercise the powers and authorities
conferred on a federally chartered bank after ((this date)) the
effective date of this act, only if the director finds that the
exercise of such powers and authorities:
(a) Serves the convenience and advantage of depositors, borrowers,
or the general public; and
(b) Maintains the fairness of competition and parity between state-chartered banks or trust companies and federally chartered banks.
As used in this section, "powers and authorities" include without
limitation powers and authorities in corporate governance and
operational matters.
The restrictions, limitations, and requirements applicable to
specific powers or authorities of federally chartered banks shall apply
to banks or trust companies exercising those powers or authorities
permitted under this subsection but only insofar as the restrictions,
limitations, and requirements relate to exercising the powers or
authorities granted banks or trust companies solely under this
subsection.
(4) Any activity which may be performed by a bank or trust company,
except the taking of deposits, may be performed by (a) a corporation or
(b) another entity approved by the director, which in either case is
owned in whole or in part by the bank or trust company.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 30.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any restrictions, limitations, requirements, or
other provisions of law, a financial institution, as defined in RCW
30.22.040(12), may charge, take, receive, or reserve interest, discount
or other points, finance charges, or other similar charges on any loan
or other extension of credit, at a rate or amount that is equal to, or
less than, the maximum rate or amount of interest, discount or other
points, finance charges, or other similar charges that national banks
located in any other state or states may charge, take, receive, or
reserve, under 12 U.S.C. Sec. 85, on loans or other extensions of
credit to residents of this state. However, this section does not
authorize any subsidiary of a bank, of a trust company, of a mutual
savings bank, of a savings and loan association, or of a credit union
to charge, take, receive, or reserve interest, discount or other
points, finance charges, or other similar charges on any loan or other
extension of credit, unless the subsidiary is itself a bank, trust
company, mutual savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit
union.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 32.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any restrictions, limitations, and requirements of
law, in addition to all powers, express or implied, that a mutual
savings bank has under the laws of this state, a mutual savings bank
shall have the powers and authorities that national banks had on the
effective date of this act.
The restrictions, limitations, and requirements applicable to
specific powers or authorities of national banks apply to mutual
savings banks exercising those powers or authorities permitted under
this section but only insofar as the restrictions, limitations, and
requirements relate to exercising the powers or authorities granted
mutual savings banks solely under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 32.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any restrictions, limitations, and requirements of
law, in addition to all powers, express or implied, that a mutual
savings bank has under the laws of this state, a mutual savings bank
shall have the powers and authorities conferred upon a national bank
after the effective date of this act, only if the director finds that
the exercise of such powers and authorities:
(1) Serves the convenience and advantage of depositors, borrowers,
or the general public; and
(2) Maintains the fairness of competition and parity between mutual
savings banks and national banks.
As used in this section, "powers and authorities" include without
limitation powers and authorities in corporate governance and
operational matters.
The restrictions, limitations, and requirements applicable to
specific powers or authorities of national banks apply to mutual
savings banks exercising those powers or authorities permitted under
this section but only insofar as the restrictions, limitations, and
requirements relate to exercising the powers or authorities granted
mutual savings banks solely under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 32.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any restrictions, limitations, and requirements of
law, in addition to all powers, express or implied, that a mutual
savings bank has under this title, a mutual savings bank has the powers
and authorities that a bank has under Title 30. As used in this
section, "powers and authorities" include without limitation powers and
authorities in corporate governance matters.
The restrictions, limitations, and requirements applicable to
specific powers or authorities of banks apply to mutual savings banks
exercising those powers or authorities permitted under this section but
only insofar as the restrictions, limitations, and requirements relate
to exercising the powers or authorities granted mutual savings banks
solely under this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 32.08.142 and 1999 c 14 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any restrictions, limitations, and requirements of
law, in addition to all powers, express or implied, that a mutual
savings bank has under the laws of this state, a mutual savings bank
shall have the powers and authorities that ((a)) any federal mutual
savings bank had on July 28, 1985, or a subsequent date not later than
((July 25, 1999)) the effective date of this act. As used in this
section, "powers and authorities" include without limitation powers and
authorities in corporate governance matters.
The restrictions, limitations, and requirements applicable to
specific powers or authorities of federal mutual savings banks shall
apply to mutual savings banks exercising those powers or authorities
permitted under this section but only insofar as the restrictions,
limitations, and requirements relate to exercising the powers or
authorities granted mutual savings banks solely under this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 32.08.146 and 1999 c 14 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
A mutual savings bank may exercise the powers and authorities
granted, after ((July 25, 1999)) the effective date of this act, to
federal mutual savings banks or their successors under federal law,
only if the director finds that the exercise of such powers and
authorities:
(1) Serves the convenience and advantage of depositors and
borrowers; and
(2) Maintains the fairness of competition and parity between state-chartered savings banks and federal savings banks or their successors
under federal law.
As used in this section, "powers and authorities" include without
limitation powers and authorities in corporate governance matters.
The restrictions, limitations, and requirements applicable to
specific powers or authorities of federal mutual savings banks or their
successors under federal law shall apply to mutual savings banks
exercising those powers or authorities permitted under this section but
only insofar as the restrictions, limitations, and requirements relate
to exercising the powers or authorities granted mutual savings banks
solely under this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 32.32.500 and 1999 c 14 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A savings bank may merge with, consolidate with, convert into,
acquire a branch or branches of, or sell its branch or branches to any
depository institution((s)) as defined in 12 U.S.C. Sec. 461 ((or)),
any financial institution chartered or authorized to do business under
the laws of any state, territory, province, or other jurisdiction of
the United States or another nation, or ((to a)) any holding company or
subsidiary ((thereof)) of such an institution, subject to the approval
of (a) the director of financial institutions if the surviving
institution is one chartered under Title 30, 31, 32, or 33 RCW, or (b)
if the surviving institution is to be a bank, savings bank, savings and
loan association, or other depository institution that is federally
chartered under the laws of the United States, the federal regulatory
authority having jurisdiction over the transaction under the applicable
laws, or (c) if the surviving institution is to be a bank, savings
bank, savings and loan association, or other depository or financial
institution that is chartered under the laws of another state or
territory of the United States, the regulatory authority having
jurisdiction over that transaction under the applicable laws, or (d) if
the surviving institution is to be a bank, savings bank, savings and
loan association, or other depository or financial institution that is
chartered under the laws of a nation other than the United States or of
a state, territory, province, or other jurisdiction of such nation, the
director of financial institutions, or (e) if the surviving institution
is to be a bank holding company or financial holding company, the
Federal Reserve Board or its successor under 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1842 (a)
and (d).
(2) In the case of a liquidation, acquisition, merger,
consolidation, or conversion of a converted savings bank, chapter 32.34
RCW shall apply.
(3) The concentration limits applicable to these transactions,
pursuant to 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u(b)(2)(C) with respect to interstate
transactions, shall be those imposed pursuant to 12 U.S.C. Sec.
1828(c)(5), as applied by the federal regulatory authority having
jurisdiction over that transaction under the applicable law, in lieu of
the concentration limits of 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u(b)(2)(B).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---