BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.76.070 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 47 s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of rendering criminal assistance in the
first degree if he or she renders criminal assistance to a person who
has committed or is being sought for murder in the first degree ((or)),
any class A felony or equivalent juvenile offense, or any felony sex
offense against any person under the age of eighteen.
(2) Rendering criminal assistance in the first degree is:
(a) A gross misdemeanor if it is established by a preponderance of
the evidence that the actor is a relative as defined in RCW 9A.76.060;
(b) A class C felony in all other cases.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.08.030 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.08.030 are
each amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Agent" means any director, officer, or employee of a
corporation, or any other person who is authorized to act on behalf of
the corporation;
(b) "Corporation" includes a joint stock association;
(c) "High managerial agent" means an officer or director of a
corporation or any other agent in a position of comparable authority
with respect to the formulation of corporate policy or the supervision
in a managerial capacity of subordinate employees.
(2) A corporation is guilty of an offense when:
(a) The conduct constituting the offense consists of an omission to
discharge a specific duty of performance imposed on corporations by
law; or
(b) The conduct constituting the offense is engaged in, authorized,
solicited, requested, commanded, ((or)) tolerated, concealed,
disguised, or covered up by the board of directors or by a high
managerial agent acting within the scope of his or her employment and
on behalf of the corporation; or
(c) The conduct constituting the offense is engaged in by an agent
of the corporation, other than a high managerial agent, while acting
within the scope of his or her employment and in behalf of the
corporation and (i) the offense is a gross misdemeanor or misdemeanor,
or (ii) the offense is one defined by a statute which clearly indicates
a legislative intent to impose such criminal liability on a
corporation.
(3) A person is criminally liable for conduct constituting an
offense which he or she performs or causes to be performed in the name
of or on behalf of a corporation to the same extent as if such conduct
were performed in his or her own name or behalf.
(4) Whenever a duty to act is imposed by law upon a corporation,
any agent of the corporation who knows he or she has or shares primary
responsibility for the discharge of the duty is criminally liable for
a reckless or, if a high managerial agent, criminally negligent
omission to perform the required act to the same extent as if the duty
were by law imposed directly upon such agent.
(5) Every corporation, whether foreign or domestic, which shall
violate any provision of RCW 9A.28.040, shall forfeit every right and
franchise to do business in this state. The attorney general shall
begin and conduct all actions and proceedings necessary to enforce the
provisions of this subsection.

--- END ---