BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Air is an essential public resource that must be preserved,
protected, and enhanced for current and future generations. Improving
air quality is a matter of statewide concern and is in the public
interest.
(2) Air pollution can have adverse health effects on many
populations in the state of Washington, particularly children. Over
four hundred thousand students in the state risk their health breathing
exhaust from riding the bus to school every day. One out of every ten
children in our state suffers from asthma. Diesel exhaust is likely to
cause lung cancer in humans, chronic and acute bronchitis in children,
asthma attacks, and respiratory illnesses.
(3) Although stringent standards established by the United States
environmental protection agency for new diesel school buses will begin
with the 2007 model year, seventy-five percent of the more than eight
thousand five hundred buses on the road now in the state will continue
to be used for the next thirteen or more years.
(4) Solutions are available to address this health risk, including
installing filters and oxidation catalysts on school bus engines to
remove harmful emissions and using cleaner fuels such as ultra-low
sulfur diesel fuel, biodiesel fuel blends, and natural gas fuel.
Installation of these devices and the use of cleaner fuels will reduce
harmful fine particle and toxic air pollutant emissions by up to ninety
percent.
(5) Money deposited in the state air quality account will be used
for, among other purposes, installing filters and catalysts on school
bus engines to reduce harmful emissions and using ultra-low sulfur fuel
and biodiesel blends on the diesel school buses currently used
throughout the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to all other fees imposed under this chapter, the
following registration fees shall be imposed at the time of initial
registration:
(a) Ten dollars for all campers, motorcycles, or trailers;
(b) Twenty dollars for all passenger cars and for hire vehicles;
(c) Thirty dollars for all trucks, motor homes, combination of
vehicles, commercial vehicles, and travel trailers.
(2) Vehicles licensed under chapter 46.87 RCW are exempt from the
fees imposed under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The proceeds from the fee imposed under subsection (1) of this
section shall be deposited in the state air quality account created
under section 3 of this act.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.105D
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The state air quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. The following money shall be deposited into the state air
quality account: (a) Money which is raised by the fee imposed under
section 2 of this act; and (b) any other money appropriated or
transferred to the account by the legislature.
(2) Money in the account may be used for any purpose allowable
under chapter 70.94 RCW, and the purposes of this chapter as it relates
to air pollution, including but not limited to the following
activities:
(a) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this chapter
as it relates to air pollution;
(b) Reducing air contaminant emissions and cleaning up air
pollution;
(c) Reducing and eliminating toxic air contaminants;
(d) Addressing and mitigating the impact of climate change;
(e) Retrofitting motor vehicles, including school buses and transit
fleets, with exhaust emission control devices;
(f) Providing funding for the differential costs of cleaner and
alternative fuels and vehicles which reduce air emissions and allow
advanced exhaust emission control devices to be used, including
ultra-low sulfur diesel fuel, biodiesel, and natural gas;
(g) Providing funding for infrastructure necessary to allow fleets
to use alternative, cleaner fuels; and
(h) Administrative and operating costs of air pollution control
authorities and, where there is no air pollution control agency, the
department, to develop and oversee the air pollution cleanup programs
identified in this section.
(3) Money deposited in the state air quality account shall be
subject to distribution as follows:
(a) Eighty percent of the funds shall be distributed to the air
pollution control authorities created under chapter 70.94 RCW. The
funds shall be distributed in direct proportion with the amount of fees
imposed under section 2 of this act that are collected within the
boundaries of each authority, however, an amount in direct proportion
with those fees collected in counties for which no air pollution
control authority exists shall be distributed to the department.
(b) Twenty percent of the money deposited in the state air quality
account shall be distributed to the department and shall be used by the
department for the following purposes:
(i) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this chapter
as it relates to air pollution;
(ii) Reducing air contaminant emissions and cleaning up air
pollution;
(iii) Reducing and eliminating toxic air contaminants;
(iv) Addressing and mitigating the impact of climate change;
(v) Retrofitting motor vehicles, including school buses and transit
fleets, with exhaust emission control devices;
(vi) Providing funding for the differential costs of cleaner and
alternative fuels and vehicles which reduce air emissions and allow
advanced exhaust emission control devices to be used, including
ultra-low sulfur diesel fuel, biodiesel, and natural gas;
(vii) Providing funding for infrastructure necessary to allow
fleets to use alternative, cleaner fuels;
(viii) Administrative and operating costs of air pollution control
authorities and, where there is no air pollution control agency, the
department, to develop and oversee the air pollution cleanup programs
identified in this section; and
(ix) Hazardous waste cleanup programs related to toxic pollution or
potential toxic pollution of land, air, or water caused by motor
vehicles in their use, recycling, storage, or destruction.
(4) Money in the state air quality account may be spent by the
department only after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 39.36.020(1), air pollution control authorities
created under this chapter may at any time contract indebtedness or
borrow money for any lawful authority purpose and may issue general
obligation bonds or other evidences of indebtedness, secured by the
pledge of one or more of the taxes, charges, or fees authorized to be
imposed or received by the authority, including, without limitation,
the state air quality account moneys to be distributed to the authority
under section 2 of this act and money received from other private or
public sources, in an amount not exceeding, together with any existing
indebtedness of the authority not authorized by the voters, one and
one-half percent of the value of the taxable property within the
boundaries of the authority; and with the assent of three-fifths of the
voters voting at an election called for that purpose, may contract
indebtedness or borrow money for authority purposes and may issue
general obligation bonds or other evidences of indebtedness provided
the total indebtedness of the authority does not exceed five percent of
the value of the taxable property. The bonds shall be issued and sold
in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW. In no circumstance shall this
debt be the obligation of the cities or counties within the boundaries
of the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect September 1, 2003.

--- END ---