BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board shall offer conditional
scholarships for full or part-time studies that may be forgiven in
exchange for teaching service in Washington's public K-12 schools.
(2) Applicants must have a declared intention to complete an
approved preparation program leading to teacher certification with an
endorsement in math, science, technology, special education, or
bilingual education or be a teacher who is seeking an additional
endorsement in math, science, technology, special education, or
bilingual education. Applicants must also be resident students as
defined by RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, except that resident students
defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2)(f) are not eligible for scholarships under
this section.
(3) Students are eligible to receive a conditional scholarship not
to exceed the amount of tuition and fees at the institution of higher
education attended by the student or resident undergraduate tuition and
fees at the University of Washington, whichever is lower. Students are
eligible to receive conditional scholarships for a maximum of five
years.
(4) When selecting scholarship recipients, the higher education
coordinating board shall give consideration to students who are
bilingual and who are able to demonstrate their dual language
proficiency by meeting a standard established by the board. The board
shall establish the standard in consultation with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction's bilingual education advisory
committee. The board may also consider the applicant's demonstrated
academic ability and commitment to serve as a teacher within the state
of Washington.
(5) Loans shall be forgiven at the rate of one year of loan for two
years of teaching service. Recipients who teach in geographic or
subject-matter shortage areas, as specified by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, may have their loans forgiven at
the rate of one year of loan for one year of teaching service.
(6) Recipients who fail to fulfill the required teaching service
shall be required to repay the conditional loan with interest. The
higher education coordinating board shall define the terms for
repayment, including applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments,
and may adopt other rules as necessary to implement this program.
(7) Appropriations, private donations, or any other funds given to
the higher education coordinating board for this program, and all
collections shall be deposited into the student loan account authorized
in RCW 28B.102.060.

--- END ---