BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Inmates currently under the custody of the department, who
participate in a state-operated work crew as provided under RCW
9.94A.725, state-operated labor camp as authorized under RCW 72.64.060,
state-operated work camp as provided in RCW 72.64.050, or provide any
state inmate labor as part of a department interlocal cooperation
agreement as provided in chapter 39.34 RCW, are prohibited from
providing services to or working on any project that is not owned by a
governmental entity or nonprofit entity.

Sec. 2 RCW 72.09.070 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 535 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created a correctional industries board of directors
which shall have the composition provided in RCW 72.09.080.
(2) Consistent with general department of corrections policies and
procedures pertaining to the general administration of correctional
facilities, the board shall establish and implement policy for
correctional industries programs, state-operated work crews provided
under RCW 9.94A.725, state-operated labor camps as authorized under RCW
72.64.060, and state-operated work camps provided in RCW 72.64.050
designed to:
(a) Offer inmates meaningful employment, work experience, and
training in vocations that are specifically designed to reduce
recidivism and thereby enhance public safety by providing opportunities
for legitimate means of livelihood upon their release from custody;
(b) Provide industries which will reduce the tax burden of
corrections and save taxpayers money through production of goods and
services for sale and use;
(c) Operate correctional work programs in an effective and
efficient manner which are as similar as possible to those provided by
the private sector;
(d) Encourage the development of and provide for selection of,
contracting for, and supervision of work programs with participating
private enterprise firms;
(e) Develop and design correctional industries work programs;
(f) Invest available funds in correctional industries enterprises
and meaningful work programs that minimize the impact on in-state jobs
and businesses.
(3) The board of directors shall at least annually review the work
performance of the director of correctional industries division with
the secretary.
(4) The director of correctional industries division shall review
and evaluate the productivity, funding, and appropriateness of all
correctional work programs and report on their effectiveness to the
board and to the secretary.
(5) The board of directors shall have the authority to identify and
establish trade advisory or apprenticeship committees to advise them on
correctional industries work programs. The secretary shall appoint the
members of the committees.
Where a labor management trade advisory and apprenticeship
committee has already been established by the department pursuant to
RCW 72.62.050 the existing committee shall also advise the board of
directors.
(6) The board shall develop a strategic yearly marketing plan that
shall be consistent with and work towards achieving the goals
established in the six-year phased expansion of class I and class II
correctional industries established in RCW 72.09.111. This marketing
plan shall be presented to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by January 17 of each calendar year until the goals set
forth in RCW 72.09.111 are achieved.

--- END ---