BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to authorize the
performance of forensic competency examinations conducted by the
department of social and health services by a single examiner in a
local jail or detention or correctional facility or out of custody for
defendants charged with misdemeanors and gross misdemeanors. A
forensic competency examination performed either in a jail or detention
or correctional facility or in an appropriate community setting by one
examiner is more cost-effective and can lead to a shorter total period
of detention. Public health, safety, and welfare are promoted when
defendants are detained in the jail or can be released to an
appropriate community setting rather than placed in a mental health
facility where vulnerable persons are being treated.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.77.060 and 2000 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever there is reason to doubt the competency of a
defendant who has been charged with a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor,
the court on its own motion or on the motion of any party shall request
the secretary to designate a qualified expert or professional person to
examine, in a local jail or detention or correctional facility or in an
appropriate community setting, and report upon the mental condition of
the defendant. The designated expert or professional person shall be
a developmental disabilities professional if the court is provided
evidence by any party that the defendant may be developmentally
disabled. The report of the results of the examination, in a local
jail or detention or correctional facility or in an appropriate
community setting, shall be submitted to the court within fifteen days
of the expert or professional person receiving the order of the court,
charging documents, and the relevant discovery materials. If
clinically necessary and requested by the designated expert or
professional person, the court may order the defendant committed to a
hospital or other suitably secure public or private mental health
facility for a period of time necessary to complete the examination,
but not to exceed fifteen days from the time of admission to the
facility.
(b) Whenever a defendant has pleaded not guilty by reason of
insanity pursuant to RCW 10.44.030, or there is reason to doubt ((his
or her)) the competency of a defendant charged with an offense other
than a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor, the court on its own motion or
on the motion of any party shall either appoint or request the
secretary to designate at least two qualified experts or professional
persons, one of whom shall be approved by the prosecuting attorney, to
examine and report upon the mental condition of the defendant. Upon
agreement of the parties, the court may designate one expert or
professional person to conduct the examination and report on the mental
condition of the defendant. At least one of the experts or
professional persons appointed shall be a developmental disabilities
professional if the court is ((advised)) provided evidence by any party
that the defendant may be developmentally disabled. For purposes of
the examination, the court may order the defendant committed to a
hospital or other suitably secure public or private mental health
facility for a period of time necessary to complete the examination,
but not to exceed fifteen days from the time of admission to the
facility.
(((b))) (c) When a defendant is ordered to be examined or committed
for inpatient examination under this subsection (1), the court may
delay granting bail until the defendant has been ((evaluated)) examined
for competency or sanity and appears before the court. Following the
((evaluation)) examination, in determining bail the court shall
consider: (i) Recommendations of the expert or professional persons
regarding the defendant's competency, sanity, or diminished capacity;
(ii) whether the defendant has a recent history of one or more violent
acts; (iii) whether the defendant has previously been acquitted by
reason of insanity or found incompetent; (iv) whether it is reasonably
likely the defendant will fail to appear for a future court hearing;
and (v) whether the defendant is a threat to public safety.
(2) The court may direct that a qualified expert or professional
person retained by or appointed for the defendant be permitted to
witness the examination authorized by subsection (1) of this section,
and that the defendant shall have access to all information obtained by
the court appointed experts or professional persons. The defendant's
expert or professional person shall have the right to file his or her
own report following the guidelines of subsection (3) or (4) of this
section. If the defendant is indigent, the court shall upon the
request of the defendant assist him or her in obtaining an expert or
professional person.
(3) The report of the examination regarding competency must include
the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the examination;
(b) A diagnosis of the mental condition of the defendant;
(c) An opinion as to competency; and
(d) An opinion as to whether the defendant should be evaluated by
a county designated mental health professional under chapter 71.05 RCW,
and an opinion as to whether the defendant is a substantial danger to
other persons, or presents a substantial likelihood of committing
criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security, unless kept under
further control by the court or other persons or institutions.
(4) The report of the examination regarding sanity shall include
the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the examination;
(b) A diagnosis of the mental condition of the defendant;
(c) ((If the defendant suffers from a mental disease or defect, or
is developmentally disabled, an opinion as to competency;
(d) If the defendant has indicated his or her intention to rely on
the defense of insanity pursuant to RCW 10.77.030,)) An opinion as to
the defendant's sanity at the time of the act;
(((e))) (d) When directed by the court, an opinion as to the
capacity of the defendant to have a particular state of mind which is
an element of the offense charged;
(((f))) (e) An opinion as to whether the defendant should be
evaluated by a county designated mental health professional under
chapter 71.05 RCW, and an opinion as to whether the defendant is a
substantial danger to other persons, or presents a substantial
likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or
security, unless kept under further control by the court or other
persons or institutions.
(((4))) (5) The secretary may execute such agreements as
appropriate and necessary to implement this section.

--- END ---