BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the shoreline
management act and the shoreline master program guidelines implementing
the policy of the shoreline management act are vital to the protection
and preservation of Washington's shorelines. The legislature
recognizes that in November 2000, the department of ecology
comprehensively updated the guidelines for the first time since 1972.
The legislature also recognizes that these guidelines were challenged
and subsequently invalidated by the shorelines hearings board. The
legislature finds that the mediation occurring among a wide range of
parties resulted in an agreement for development of new shoreline
master program guidelines for the state.
(2) The legislature recognizes that the process of developing and
amending shoreline master programs requires substantial effort and
coordination by local governments. To assist local governments in
completing this process, the legislature intends to establish a
staggered
schedule for cities and counties to develop and amend master
programs consistent with existing timelines for reviews and amendments
of comprehensive plans and development regulations. The legislature
also recognizes that several local governments have volunteered to
comply with the provisions of this act before the newly established
schedule and intends to reflect this in the schedule that is
established by RCW 90.58.080.
(3) The legislature also intends to provide reasonable and adequate
funding for grants to local governments to accomplish the task of
reviewing and revising their shoreline master programs. If the
legislature in the future does not provide funding in any one biennium
sufficient for reasonable and adequate grant funds, the legislature
acknowledges that this may result in delaying the compliance date until
the following biennium.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.58.060 and 1995 c 347 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall periodically review and adopt guidelines
consistent with RCW 90.58.020, containing the elements specified in RCW
90.58.100 for:
(a) Development of master programs for regulation of the uses of
shorelines; and
(b) Development of master programs for regulation of the uses of
shorelines of statewide significance.
(2) Before adopting or amending guidelines under this section, the
department shall provide an opportunity for public review and comment
as follows:
(a) The department shall mail copies of the proposal to all cities,
counties, and federally recognized Indian tribes, and to any other
person who has requested a copy, and shall publish the proposed
guidelines in the Washington state register. Comments shall be
submitted in writing to the department within sixty days from the date
the proposal has been published in the register.
(b) The department shall hold at least four public hearings on the
proposal in different locations throughout the state to provide a
reasonable opportunity for residents in all parts of the state to
present statements and views on the proposed guidelines. Notice of the
hearings shall be published at least once in each of the three weeks
immediately preceding the hearing in one or more newspapers of general
circulation in each county of the state. If an amendment to the
guidelines addresses an issue limited to one geographic area, the
number and location of hearings may be adjusted consistent with the
intent of this subsection to assure all parties a reasonable
opportunity to comment on the proposed amendment. The department shall
accept written comments on the proposal during the sixty-day public
comment period and for seven days after the final public hearing.
(c) At the conclusion of the public comment period, the department
shall review the comments received and modify the proposal consistent
with the provisions of this chapter. The proposal shall then be
published for adoption pursuant to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) The department may ((propose)) adopt amendments to the
guidelines not more than once each year. ((At least once every five
years)) Such amendments shall be limited to: (a) Addressing technical
or procedural issues that result from the review and adoption of master
programs under the guidelines; or (b) issues of guideline compliance
with statutory provisions. Beginning July 1, 2015, and every seven
years thereafter, the department shall conduct a review of the
guidelines pursuant to the procedures outlined in subsection (2) of
this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.58.080 and 1995 c 347 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Local governments shall develop or amend((, within twenty-four
months after the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060,))
a master program for regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state
consistent with the required elements of the guidelines adopted by the
department in accordance with the schedule established by this section.
(2)(a) Subject to the provisions of subsections (5) and (6) of this
section, each local government subject to this chapter shall develop or
amend its master program for the regulation of uses of shorelines
within its jurisdiction according to the following schedule:
(i) On or before December 1, 2005, for the city of Tacoma, the city
of Port Townsend, the city of Bellingham, the city of Everett, and
Whatcom county;
(ii) On or before December 1, 2009, for King county and the cities
within King county greater in population than ten thousand;
(iii) Except as provided by (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, on
or before December 1, 2011, for Clallam, Clark, Jefferson, King,
Kitsap, Pierce, Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the
cities within those counties;
(iv) On or before December 1, 2012, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis,
Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and Skamania counties and the cities within
those counties;
(v) On or before December 1, 2013, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas,
Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and Yakima counties and the cities within
those counties; and
(vi) On or before December 1, 2014, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia,
Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan,
Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman
counties and the cities within those counties.
(b) Nothing in this subsection (2) shall preclude a local
government from developing or amending its master program prior to the
dates established by this subsection (2).
(3)(a) Following approval by the department of a new or amended
master program, local governments required to develop or amend master
programs on or before December 1, 2009, as provided by subsection
(2)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section, shall be deemed to have complied
with the schedule established by subsection (2)(a)(iii) of this section
and shall not be required to complete master program amendments until
seven years after the applicable dates established by subsection
(2)(a)(iii) of this section. Any jurisdiction listed in subsection
(2)(a)(i) of this section that has a new or amended master program
approved by the department on or after March 1, 2002, but before the
effective date of this section, shall not be required to complete
master program amendments until seven years after the applicable date
provided by subsection (2)(a)(iii) of this section.
(b) Following approval by the department of a new or amended master
program, local governments choosing to develop or amend master programs
on or before December 1, 2009, shall be deemed to have complied with
the schedule established by subsection (2)(a)(iii) through (vi) of this
section and shall not be required to complete master program amendments
until seven years after the applicable dates established by subsection
(2)(a)(iii) through (vi) of this section.
(4) Local governments shall conduct a comprehensive review of their
master programs at least once every seven years after the applicable
dates established by subsection (2)(a)(iii) through (vi) of this
section. Following the review required by this subsection (4), local
governments shall, as necessary, revise their master programs. The
purpose of the review and revision is:
(a) To assure that the master program complies with applicable law
and guidelines in effect at the time of the review; and
(b) To assure consistency of the master program with the local
government's comprehensive plan and development regulations adopted
under chapter 36.70A RCW, if applicable, and other local requirements.
(5) Local governments are encouraged to begin the process of
developing or amending their master programs early and are eligible for
grants from the department as provided by RCW 90.58.250, subject to
available funding. Except for those local governments listed in
subsection (2)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section, the deadline for
completion of the new or amended master programs shall be two years
after the date the grant is approved by the department. Subsequent
master program review dates shall not be altered by the provisions of
this subsection.
(6)(a) Grants to local governments for developing and amending
master programs pursuant to the schedule established by this section
shall be provided at least two years before the adoption dates
specified in subsection (2) of this section. To the extent possible,
the department shall allocate grants within the amount appropriated for
such purposes to provide reasonable and adequate funding to local
governments that have indicated their intent to develop or amend master
programs during the biennium according to the schedule established by
subsection (2) of this section. Any local government that applies for
but does not receive funding to comply with the provisions of
subsection (2) of this section may delay the development or amendment
of its master program until the following biennium.
(b) Local governments with delayed compliance dates as provided in
(a) of this subsection shall be the first priority for funding in
subsequent biennia, and the development or amendment compliance
deadline for those local governments shall be two years after the date
of grant approval.
(c) Failure of the local government to apply in a timely manner for
a master program development or amendment grant in accordance with the
requirements of the department shall not be considered a delay
resulting from the provisions of (a) of this subsection.
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, all local
governments subject to the requirements of this chapter that have not
developed or amended master programs on or after March 1, 2002, shall,
no later than December 1, 2014, develop or amend their master programs
to comply with guidelines adopted by the department after January 1,
2003.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.58.250 and 1971 ex.s. c 286 s 25 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to eliminate the limits on state
funding of shoreline master program development and amendment costs.
The legislature further intends that the state will provide funding to
local governments that is reasonable and adequate to accomplish the
costs of developing and amending shoreline master programs consistent
with the schedule established by RCW 90.58.080. Except as specifically
described herein, nothing in this act is intended to alter the existing
obligation, duties, and benefits provided by this act to local
governments and the department.
(2) The department is directed to cooperate fully with local
governments in discharging their responsibilities under this chapter.
Funds shall be available for distribution to local governments on the
basis of applications for preparation of master programs and the
provisions of RCW 90.58.080(7). Such applications shall be submitted
in accordance with regulations developed by the department. The
department is authorized to make and administer grants within
appropriations authorized by the legislature to any local government
within the state for the purpose of developing a master shorelines
program.
((No grant shall be made in an amount in excess of the recipient's
contribution to the estimated cost of such program.))

--- END ---