BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the importance of
the option provided in RCW 74.13.350 for the parent of a child with
developmental disabilities to seek an out-of-home placement through a
voluntary placement agreement to obtain needed services for the child.
It is the intent of the legislature that a child with developmental
disabilities receive components of the current array of services and
supports in the family home at a level of intensity such that entry
into the voluntary placement program occurs only when necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may provide appropriate components of the currently
available services and supports array to an eligible child with
developmental disabilities at a level comparable to that provided in
the voluntary placement program, excluding the room and board component
of that program. The department shall assure that these services
assist families in keeping the child in the family home until it is
appropriate and feasible for the child to live elsewhere. The
department shall determine eligibility for services under chapter
71A.16 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.13.350 and 1998 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that parents are responsible
for the care and support of children with developmental disabilities.
The legislature recognizes that, because of the intense support
required to care for a child with developmental disabilities, the help
of an out-of-home placement may be needed. It is the intent of the
legislature that, when the sole reason for the out-of-home placement is
the child's developmental disability, such services be offered by the
department to these children and their families through a voluntary
placement agreement. In these cases, the parents shall retain legal
custody of the child.
As used in this section, "voluntary placement agreement" means a
written agreement between the department and a child's parent or legal
guardian authorizing the department to place the child in a licensed
facility. Under the terms of this agreement, the parent or legal
guardian shall retain legal custody and the department shall be
responsible for the child's placement and care. The agreement shall at
a minimum specify the legal status of the child and the rights and
obligations of the parent or legal guardian, the child, and the
department while the child is in placement. The agreement must be
signed by the child's parent or legal guardian and the department to be
in effect, except that an agreement regarding an Indian child shall not
be valid unless executed in writing before the court and filed with the
court as provided in RCW 13.34.245. Any party to a voluntary placement
agreement may terminate the agreement at any time. Upon termination of
the agreement, the child shall be returned to the care of the child's
parent or legal guardian unless the child has been taken into custody
pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or 26.44.050, placed in shelter care pursuant
to RCW 13.34.060, or placed in foster care pursuant to RCW 13.34.130.
As used in this section, "out-of-home placement" and "out-of-home
care" mean the placement of a child in a foster family home or group
care facility licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.
Whenever the department places a child in out-of-home care under a
voluntary placement pursuant to this section, the department shall have
the responsibility for the child's placement and care. The department
shall develop a permanency plan of care for the child no later than
sixty days from the date that the department assumes responsibility for
the child's placement and care. Within the first one hundred eighty
days of the placement, the department shall obtain a judicial
determination pursuant to RCW 13.04.030(1)(j) and 13.34.270 that the
placement is in the best interests of the child. If the child's out-of-home placement ends before one hundred eighty days have elapsed, no
judicial determination under RCW 13.04.030(1)(b) is required. The
permanency planning hearings shall review whether the child's best
interests are served by continued out-of-home placement and determine
the future legal status of the child.
The department shall provide for periodic administrative reviews as
required by federal law. A review may be called at any time by either
the department, the parent, or the legal guardian.
Nothing in this section shall prevent the department from filing a
dependency petition if there is reason to believe that the child is a
dependent child as defined in RCW 13.34.030.
The department shall adopt rules providing for the implementation
of chapter 386, Laws of 1997 and the transfer of responsibility for
out-of-home placements from the dependency process under chapter 13.34
RCW to the process under this chapter.
It is the intent of the legislature that the department undertake
voluntary out-of-home placement in cases where the child's
developmental disability is such that the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian is unable to provide the necessary care for the child, and
the parent, guardian, or legal custodian has determined that the child
would benefit from placement outside of the home. If the department
does not accept a voluntary placement agreement signed by the parent,
a petition may be filed and an action pursued under chapter 13.34 RCW.
The department shall inform the parent, guardian, or legal custodian in
writing of their right to civil action under chapter 13.34 RCW.
The department may, within existing resources, when requested by a
family at risk of placing their child with developmental disabilities
into out-of-home care through the voluntary placement program, provide
in-home services to that child and family to prevent the out-of-home
placement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 74.13.350 (as amended by this act) is
recodified as a section in chapter 71A.12 RCW.

--- END ---