BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.111 and 2002 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall deduct from the gross wages or gratuities
of each inmate working in correctional industries work programs, taxes
and legal financial obligations. The secretary shall develop a formula
for the distribution of offender wages and gratuities.
(a) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class I gross wages and from all others earning at least minimum wage:
(i) Five percent to the public safety and education account for the
purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court.
(b) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class II gross gratuities:
(i) Five percent to the public safety and education account for the
purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Fifteen percent to the department to contribute to the cost
of incarceration; and
(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court.
(c) The formula shall include the following minimum deduction from
class IV gross gratuities: Five percent to the department to
contribute to the cost of incarceration.
(d) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class III gratuities: Five percent for the purpose of crime victims'
compensation.
(2) An additional five percent shall be deducted from the gross
wages or gratuities of each inmate working in correctional industries
work programs if such inmate has been convicted of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030. The funds shall be deposited in the public
safety and education account for the purpose of crime victims'
compensation to be distributed to his or her victim of sexual assault.
(3) Any person sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility
of release or parole under chapter 10.95 RCW or sentenced to death
shall be exempt from the requirement under (a)(ii) or (b)(ii) of this
subsection.
(4) The department personal inmate savings account, together with
any accrued interest, shall only be available to an inmate at the time
of his or her release from confinement, unless the secretary determines
that an emergency exists for the inmate, at which time the funds can be
made available to the inmate in an amount determined by the secretary.
The management of classes I, II, and IV correctional industries may
establish an incentive payment for offender workers based on
productivity criteria. This incentive shall be paid separately from
the hourly wage/gratuity rate and shall not be subject to the specified
deduction for cost of incarceration.
(5) In the event that the offender worker's wages or gratuity is
subject to garnishment for support enforcement, the crime victims'
compensation, savings, and cost of incarceration deductions shall be
calculated on the net wages after taxes, legal financial obligations,
and garnishment.
(((2))) (6) The department shall explore other methods of
recovering a portion of the cost of the inmate's incarceration and for
encouraging participation in work programs, including development of
incentive programs that offer inmates benefits and amenities paid for
only from wages earned while working in a correctional industries work
program.
(((3))) (7) The department shall develop the necessary
administrative structure to recover inmates' wages and keep records of
the amount inmates pay for the costs of incarceration and amenities.
All funds deducted from inmate wages under subsection (1) of this
section for the purpose of contributions to the cost of incarceration
shall be deposited in a dedicated fund with the department and shall be
used only for the purpose of enhancing and maintaining correctional
industries work programs.
(((4))) (8) The expansion of inmate employment in class I and class
II correctional industries shall be implemented according to the
following schedule:
(a) Not later than June 30, 1995, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least two hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(b) Not later than June 30, 1996, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least four hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(c) Not later than June 30, 1997, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least six hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(d) Not later than June 30, 1998, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least nine hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(e) Not later than June 30, 1999, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least one thousand two hundred in the number of inmates
employed in class I or class II correctional industries work programs
above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(f) Not later than June 30, 2000, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least one thousand five hundred in the number of inmates
employed in class I or class II correctional industries work programs
above the number so employed on June 30, 1994.
(((5))) (9) It shall be in the discretion of the secretary to
apportion the inmates between class I and class II depending on
available contracts and resources.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.68.070 and 2002 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The right to benefits under this chapter and the amount thereof
will be governed insofar as is applicable by the provisions contained
in chapter 51.32 RCW except as provided in this section:
(1) The provisions contained in RCW 51.32.015, 51.32.030,
51.32.072, 51.32.073, 51.32.180, 51.32.190, and 51.32.200 are not
applicable to this chapter.
(2) Each victim injured as a result of a criminal act, including
criminal acts committed between July 1, 1981, and January 1, 1983, or
the victim's family or dependents in case of death of the victim, are
entitled to benefits in accordance with this chapter, subject to the
limitations under RCW 7.68.015. The rights, duties, responsibilities,
limitations, and procedures applicable to a worker as contained in RCW
51.32.010 are applicable to this chapter.
(3) The limitations contained in RCW 51.32.020 are applicable to
claims under this chapter. In addition thereto, no person or spouse,
child, or dependent of such person is entitled to benefits under this
chapter when the injury for which benefits are sought, was:
(a) The result of consent, provocation, or incitement by the
victim, unless an injury resulting from a criminal act caused the death
of the victim;
(b) Sustained while the crime victim was engaged in the attempt to
commit, or the commission of, a felony; or
(c) Sustained while the victim was confined in any county or city
jail, federal jail or prison or in any other federal institution, or
any state correctional institution maintained and operated by the
department of social and health services or the department of
corrections, prior to release from lawful custody; or confined or
living in any other institution maintained and operated by the
department of social and health services or the department of
corrections.
(4) The benefits established upon the death of a worker and
contained in RCW 51.32.050 shall be the benefits obtainable under this
chapter and provisions relating to payment contained in that section
shall equally apply under this chapter: PROVIDED, That benefits for
burial expenses shall not exceed the amount paid by the department in
case of the death of a worker as provided in chapter 51.32 RCW in any
claim: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if the criminal act results in the death
of a victim who was not gainfully employed at the time of the criminal
act, and who was not so employed for at least three consecutive months
of the twelve months immediately preceding the criminal act;
(a) Benefits payable to an eligible surviving spouse, where there
are no children of the victim at the time of the criminal act who have
survived the victim or where such spouse has legal custody of all of
his or her children, shall be limited to burial expenses and a lump sum
payment of seven thousand five hundred dollars without reference to
number of children, if any;
(b) Where any such spouse has legal custody of one or more but not
all of such children, then such burial expenses shall be paid, and such
spouse shall receive a lump sum payment of three thousand seven hundred
fifty dollars and any such child or children not in the legal custody
of such spouse shall receive a lump sum of three thousand seven hundred
fifty dollars to be divided equally among such child or children;
(c) If any such spouse does not have legal custody of any of the
children, the burial expenses shall be paid and the spouse shall
receive a lump sum payment of up to three thousand seven hundred fifty
dollars and any such child or children not in the legal custody of the
spouse shall receive a lump sum payment of up to three thousand seven
hundred fifty dollars to be divided equally among the child or
children;
(d) If no such spouse survives, then such burial expenses shall be
paid, and each surviving child of the victim at the time of the
criminal act shall receive a lump sum payment of three thousand seven
hundred fifty dollars up to a total of two such children and where
there are more than two such children the sum of seven thousand five
hundred dollars shall be divided equally among such children.
No other benefits may be paid or payable under these circumstances.
(5) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.060 for permanent total
disability proximately caused by the criminal act shall be the benefits
obtainable under this chapter, and provisions relating to payment
contained in that section apply under this chapter: PROVIDED, That if
a victim becomes permanently and totally disabled as a proximate result
of the criminal act and was not gainfully employed at the time of the
criminal act, the victim shall receive monthly during the period of the
disability the following percentages, where applicable, of the average
monthly wage determined as of the date of the criminal act pursuant to
RCW 51.08.018:
(a) If married at the time of the criminal act, twenty-nine percent
of the average monthly wage.
(b) If married with one child at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(c) If married with two children at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-eight percent of the average monthly wage.
(d) If married with three children at the time of the criminal act,
forty-one percent of the average monthly wage.
(e) If married with four children at the time of the criminal act,
forty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(f) If married with five or more children at the time of the
criminal act, forty-seven percent of the average monthly wage.
(g) If unmarried at the time of the criminal act, twenty-five
percent of the average monthly wage.
(h) If unmarried with one child at the time of the criminal act,
thirty percent of the average monthly wage.
(i) If unmarried with two children at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(j) If unmarried with three children at the time of the criminal
act, thirty-seven percent of the average monthly wage.
(k) If unmarried with four children at the time of the criminal
act, forty percent of the average monthly wage.
(l) If unmarried with five or more children at the time of the
criminal act, forty-three percent of the average monthly wage.
(6) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.080 for permanent partial
disability shall be the benefits obtainable under this chapter, and
provisions relating to payment contained in that section equally apply
under this chapter.
(7) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.090 for temporary total
disability shall be the benefits obtainable under this chapter, and
provisions relating to payment contained in that section apply under
this chapter: PROVIDED, That no person is eligible for temporary total
disability benefits under this chapter if such person was not gainfully
employed at the time of the criminal act, and was not so employed for
at least three consecutive months of the twelve months immediately
preceding the criminal act.
(8) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.095 for continuation of
benefits during vocational rehabilitation shall be benefits obtainable
under this chapter, and provisions relating to payment contained in
that section apply under this chapter: PROVIDED, That benefits shall
not exceed five thousand dollars for any single injury.
(9) The provisions for lump sum payment of benefits upon death or
permanent total disability as contained in RCW 51.32.130 apply under
this chapter.
(10) The provisions relating to payment of benefits to, for or on
behalf of workers contained in RCW 51.32.040, 51.32.055, 51.32.100,
51.32.110, 51.32.120, 51.32.135, 51.32.140, 51.32.150, 51.32.160, and
51.32.210 are applicable to payment of benefits to, for or on behalf of
victims under this chapter.
(11) No person or spouse, child, or dependent of such person is
entitled to benefits under this chapter where the person making a claim
for such benefits has refused to give reasonable cooperation to state
or local law enforcement agencies in their efforts to apprehend and
convict the perpetrator(s) of the criminal act which gave rise to the
claim.
(12) In addition to other benefits provided under this chapter,
victims of sexual assault are entitled to receive benefits from his or
her perpetrator or perpetrators of the criminal act that gave rise to
the claim, as provided under RCW 72.09.111(2).
(13) In addition to other benefits provided under this chapter,
victims of sexual assault are entitled to receive appropriate
counseling. Fees for such counseling shall be determined by the
department in accordance with RCW 51.04.030, subject to the limitations
of RCW 7.68.080. Counseling services may include, if determined
appropriate by the department, counseling of members of the victim's
immediate family, other than the perpetrator of the assault.
(((13))) (14) Except for medical benefits authorized under RCW
7.68.080, no more than thirty thousand dollars shall be granted as a
result of a single injury or death, except that benefits granted as the
result of total permanent disability or death shall not exceed forty
thousand dollars.
(((14))) (15) Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter and
Title 51 RCW, benefits payable for total temporary disability under
subsection (7) of this section, shall be limited to fifteen thousand
dollars.
(((15))) (16) Any person who is responsible for the victim's
injuries, or who would otherwise be unjustly enriched as a result of
the victim's injuries, shall not be a beneficiary under this chapter.
(((16))) (17) Crime victims' compensation is not available to pay
for services covered under chapter 74.09 RCW or Title XIX of the
federal social security act, except to the extent that the costs for
such services exceed service limits established by the department of
social and health services or, during the 1993-95 fiscal biennium, to
the extent necessary to provide matching funds for federal medicaid
reimbursement.
(((17))) (18) In addition to other benefits provided under this
chapter, immediate family members of a homicide victim may receive
appropriate counseling to assist in dealing with the immediate, near-term consequences of the related effects of the homicide. Fees for
counseling shall be determined by the department in accordance with RCW
51.04.030, subject to the limitations of RCW 7.68.080. Payment of
counseling benefits under this section may not be provided to the
perpetrator of the homicide. The benefits under this subsection may be
provided only with respect to homicides committed on or after July 1,
1992.
(((18))) (19) A dependent mother, father, stepmother, or
stepfather, as defined in RCW 51.08.050, who is a survivor of her or
his child's homicide, who has been requested by a law enforcement
agency or a prosecutor to assist in the judicial proceedings related to
the death of the victim, and who is not domiciled in Washington state
at the time of the request, may receive a lump-sum payment upon arrival
in this state. Total benefits under this subsection may not exceed
seven thousand five hundred dollars. If more than one dependent parent
is eligible for this benefit, the lump-sum payment of seven thousand
five hundred dollars shall be divided equally among the dependent
parents.

--- END ---