BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 23.86.080 and 1989 c 307 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Associations shall be managed by a board of not less than three
directors (which may be referred to as "trustees"). The directors
shall be elected by ((and from)) the members of the association at such
time, in such manner, and for such term of office as the bylaws may
prescribe, and shall hold office during the term for which they were
elected and until their successors are elected and qualified.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 23.86.087, any vacancy occurring in
the board of directors, and any directorship to be filled by reason of
an increase in the number of directors, may be filled by the board of
directors unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws provide
that a vacancy or directorship so created shall be filled in some other
manner. A director elected or appointed to fill a vacancy shall be
elected or appointed for the unexpired term of the predecessor in
office.

--- END ---