BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to provide
pricing flexibility in the telecommunications industry.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.04.530 and 1995 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) ((Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,)) The
following do not apply to a local exchange company that serves less
than two percent of the access lines in the state of Washington: RCW
80.04.080, 80.04.300 through 80.04.330, and, except for RCW 80.08.140,
chapters 80.08, 80.12, and 80.16 RCW.
(b) ((Nothing in this subsection (1) shall affect the commission's
authority over the rates, service, accounts, valuations, estimates, or
determinations of costs, as well as the authority to determine whether
any expenditure is fair, reasonable, and commensurate with the service,
material, supplies, or equipment received.
(c))) For purposes of this subsection, the number of access lines
served by a local exchange company includes the number of access lines
served in this state by any affiliate of that local exchange company.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, RCW
80.04.110 through 80.04.130, 80.04.150, 80.36.110, 80.36.140, and
80.36.150 do not apply to existing, new, and revised tariff schedules,
contracts and charges, and rules and regulations, except for such
tariffs, or portions of tariffs, that set forth access rates charged to
other telecommunications companies for origination and termination of
interexchange toll traffic, filed with the commission by a local
exchange company that serves less than two percent of the access lines
in the state of Washington. Nor shall RCW 80.36.080 be construed to
authorize the commission to investigate the rates, tolls, contracts and
charges, and rules and regulations of a local exchange company for
which an exemption is provided under this subsection.
(3) Upon petition of the local exchange company or upon petition of
ten percent of the then current access line subscribers, or five
hundred subscribers, whichever is the lesser, of any local exchange
company:
(a) Filed with the commission not less than ten days before the
proposed effective date of new or revised tariff schedules, the
commission may impose the procedures of RCW 80.04.110 through
80.04.130, 80.04.150, 80.36.110, 80.36.140, and 80.36.150, or any part
thereof, to any such new or revised tariff schedules of the local
exchange company for which an exemption is provided pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section.
(b) After notice and hearing and a finding that such action is
required by the public interest, the commission may revoke any
exemption granted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, or any
part thereof, or impose reasonable conditions on the continued exercise
of any such exemption.
(4) Any local exchange company for which an exemption is provided
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall notify its affected
customers of any rate increase for local exchange services, except
access service, at least forty-five days before the proposed effective
date of the increase.
(5) Any local exchange company for which an exemption is provided
under this section shall not be required to file reports or data with
the commission, except each such company shall file with the commission
an annual report that consists of its annual balance sheet and results
of operations, both presented on a Washington state jurisdictional
basis. This requirement may be satisfied by the filing of information
or reports and underlying studies filed with exchange carrier entities
or regulatory agencies if the jurisdictionally separated results of
operations for Washington state can be obtained from the information or
reports. This subsection shall not be applied to exempt a local
exchange company from an obligation to respond to data requests in an
adjudicative proceeding in which it is a party.
(((3))) (6) The commission may, in response to customer complaints
or on its own motion and after notice and hearing, establish additional
reporting requirements for a specific local exchange company.

--- END ---