BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Until January 1, ((1999)) 2004, every employer shall pay to
each of his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years
wages at a rate of not less than ((four dollars and ninety cents))
seven dollars and one cent per hour.
(2) ((Beginning January 1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than five dollars and
seventy cents per hour.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than six dollars and
fifty cents per hour.
(4)(a))) Beginning on January 1, ((2001, and each following January
1st as set forth under (b) of this subsection)) 2004, every employer
shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the age of
eighteen years and who does not work primarily in a rural county as
defined in RCW 43.160.020 wages at a rate of not less than the ((amount
established under (b) of this subsection.
(b) On September 30, 2000, and on each following September 30th,
the department of labor and industries shall calculate an adjusted
minimum wage rate to maintain employee purchasing power by increasing
the current year's minimum wage rate by the rate of inflation. The
adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the nearest cent
using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical
workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months prior to
each September 1st as calculated by the United States department of
labor. Each adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under this
subsection (4)(b) takes effect on the following January 1st)) urban
adjusted minimum wage rate calculated as set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.
(3) Beginning on January 1, 2004, every employer shall pay to each
of his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years and
who works primarily in a rural county as defined in RCW 43.160.020
wages at a rate of not less than the rural adjusted minimum wage rate
calculated as set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) On September 30th of each year, the department of labor and
industries shall calculate to the nearest cent urban and rural adjusted
minimum wage rates using the consumer price indices specified in this
subsection for the twelve months prior to each September 1st as
calculated by the United States department of labor. For the urban
adjusted minimum wage rate, the department shall use the national
consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers, CPI-W, in United States cities or a successor index. For the rural
adjusted minimum wage rate, the department shall use the national
consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers, CPI-W, in class D areas or a successor index. The adjusted minimum wage
rates calculated under this subsection take effect on January 1st of
the following year.
(5) The director shall by regulation establish the minimum wage for
employees under the age of eighteen years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---