BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Pacific
Northwest benefits from having more than seventy percent of its
electricity derive from a renewable resource, water. Other regions of
the country are far more dependent on thermal power generation fueled
by coal, nuclear fission, natural gas, and oil. These other regions
can demonstrably benefit, in terms of reduced environmental degradation
and reliance on foreign sources of fossil fuels, by acquiring solar,
wind, biomass, hydroelectric, geothermal, landfill gas, and
hydrogen-based generation resources. Washington can also benefit from
diversifying its electrical generation resources, including
conventional and renewable technologies; this is a trend that has
already begun. The state's new generation resources will become more
diversified than they are presently.
The legislature also finds that as the economy and population of
the state grows the need for additional generation resources, including
conservation, increases as well. But the potential for greatly
expanding hydroelectric capacity is limited mostly to upgrading
existing facilities. That means other forms of electricity generation
technologies will be acquired by utilities. Decisions made in this
regard will be individualized because of the unique aspects of the
electric industry in the state.
Retail electric customers in this state are served by a variety of
utilities. Many of them, notably the smaller ones, are full
requirements customers of the Bonneville power administration, but
others derive a portion of their power supply from resources they own.
The largest municipal utilities obtain most of their electricity from
their hydroelectric facilities. Some public utility districts generate
all of their electrical supply from their own hydroelectric plants,
while others own or contract for supply from gas-fired combined cycle
combustion turbines, a nuclear plant, a landfill gas facility, a wind
development, a small solar project, and small hydroelectric
installations. Similarly, each investor-owned utility has unique
generation attributes, with varying degrees of reliance on
hydroelectric and thermal generation resources. Historically, the
utilities in the state have acquired generation resources that best
comport with their load requirements and least-cost considerations.
That tradition has helped to maintain retail electricity prices that
have been among the lowest in the nation.
The legislature further finds that utilities in the state and
region, as well as their customers, have experienced hardship because
of a recent drought that severely reduced hydroelectric energy
production and unprecedented wholesale electricity prices. A report by
the United States energy information administration shows that
Washington, which once had the second lowest electricity rates in the
nation, now has the eighteenth highest rates. That situation may
worsen, as the Bonneville power administration has warned that it may
soon need to further increase electricity prices for its utility
customers.
The ability of utilities to plan and prepare for their future
demand requirements will be critical in determining what will happen to
future electricity rates for consumers. The availability of low-cost
capital to many utilities and independent power producers has been
limited, as commercial lenders and financial markets view the electric
industry with skepticism. This has hampered development of generation
resources, with one apparent exception.
Washington and Oregon host the largest wind power project in the
world; its owner reportedly has plans to expand it. Other smaller wind
developments have been completed in recent years, and two additional
large projects are being planned in Kittitas county. Soon the state
may have nearly six hundred megawatts of total installed generating
capacity of wind power, worth approximately two hundred average
megawatts of energy. Wind power construction is growing steadily and
retail electric consumers, judging from the subscriptions to green
rates offered by large utilities as a matter of law, are receptive to
buying wind power. Nevertheless, the operational characteristics and
economics associated with wind generation, as well as certain
regulatory policies, may hinder continued expansion of wind generation
development.
Therefore, the legislature declares that there is a need to examine
the viability and feasibility of wind generation by identifying and
assessing the operational, economic, and regulatory obstacles to its
growth and utilization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint task force on renewable
resource development is created to consist of the following four
members:
(a) Two members from the house of representatives from diverse
geographic locations, one each from the two largest political caucuses,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(b) Two members of the senate from diverse geographic locations,
one each from the two largest political caucuses, appointed by the
majority leader of the senate.
(2) The task force shall be cochaired by one senator and one
representative appointed by the senate majority leader and the speaker
of the house of representatives, respectively.
(3) The cochairs may appoint advisory committees of nonvoting
advisors and experts to provide input on subjects of interest to the
task force. For the purposes of this subsection, "advisors and
experts" includes, but may not be limited to, representatives of:
Cities, public utility districts, rural electric cooperatives,
investor-owned utilities, counties, the utilities and transportation
commission, environmental and consumer advocacy organizations, and
generation development companies.
(4) Any findings, conclusions, or recommendations of the joint task
force must be agreed to by a majority of the legislative members;
however, minority findings, conclusions, or recommendations may be
included that are submitted by any member or group of members.
(5) The joint task force shall commence by July 1, 2003, and it
shall present a final report, including any legislative
recommendations, to the legislature no later than January 1, 2004.
(6) Staffing for the task force shall be provided by senate
committee services and the office of program research.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The joint task force on renewable
resource development shall:
(a) Identify the typical capacity factors for the following
generation technologies: Wind, hydroelectric, combined cycle
combustion turbines, nuclear, coal, solar, and biomass;
(b) Identify how capital availability may impact the development of
generation resources, including renewable resources, in the region;
(c) Evaluate the operational and financial impacts of wind
generation on the following aspects of the integrated electric grid:
(i) Transmission; (ii) operating reserve requirements; (iii) voltage
support; (iv) reliability; (v) hydroelectric generating facilities; and
(vi) utility scheduling functions such as staffing;
(d) Evaluate the impact of various levels of wind energy on
wholesale spot market price levels;
(e) Evaluate available methods and the potential for forecasting
wind generation on an hour-ahead to week-ahead basis;
(f) Evaluate the benefits, if any, of the Bonneville power
administration to coordinating the integration of wind energy into the
regional transmission grid;
(g) Evaluate how state and local siting regulations can inhibit or
delay the construction of wind generation facilities;
(h) Evaluate the potential for voluntary optional pricing programs
offered by utilities to their retail electric customers to advance the
purchase of wind generation by consumers and utilities;
(i) Evaluate how wind generation can meet or conflict with the
operational and reliability requirements of utilities in the state;
(j) Evaluate how wind generation compares with conventional
generation resources and other renewable resources in terms of output
cost, which should include, but may not be limited to: (i) The cost of
environmental permits, (ii) capital, (iii) operations and maintenance,
(iv) fuel, and (v) federal, state, and local taxes; and the value of
federal, state, and local tax credits, if any;
(k) Evaluate what conditions or requirements may factor into a
decision by utilities, for example firming, to purchase wind
generation;
(l) Evaluate the possibilities and limitations for how wind
generation can be integrated with hydroelectric generation, considering
the different characteristics of several utility hydroelectric systems
in the state; and
(m) Identify what, if any, incentives or regulatory accommodations
could be made to encourage utilities to acquire wind generation.
(2) To minimize the expense of conducting evaluations under this
section, these evaluations shall be based upon existing and readily
available data and information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires June 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---