BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the voters of
Washington state expressed their strong support for home-based long-term care services through their overwhelming approval of Initiative
Measure No. 775 in 2001. With passage of the initiative, the state has
been directed to increase the quality of state-funded long-term care
services provided to elderly and disabled persons in their own homes
through recruitment and training of in-home individual providers,
referral of qualified individual providers to seniors and persons with
disabilities seeking a provider, and stabilization of the individual
provider work force. The legislature further finds that the quality of
care our elders and people with disabilities receive is highly
dependent upon the quality and stability of the individual provider
work force, and that the demand for the services of these providers
will increase as our population ages.
(2) The legislature intends to stabilize the state-funded
individual provider work force by providing funding to implement the
collective bargaining agreement between the home care quality authority
and the exclusive bargaining representative of individual providers.
The agreement reflects the value and importance of the work done by
individual providers to support the needs of elders and people with
disabilities in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of seven million one hundred twenty-nine thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, from the general
fund--state, and the sum of six million nine hundred eighteen thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2005, from the general fund--federal to
the department of social and health services solely to increase the
wages of state-funded individual providers from the current hourly rate
of eight dollars and forty-three cents per hour to eight dollars and
ninety-three cents per hour beginning October 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of ten million six hundred four
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, from the general
fund--state, and the sum of ten million two hundred ninety-four
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2005, from the general
fund--federal to the department of social and health services solely to
provide contributions of up to four hundred dollars per month for each
eligible state-funded individual provider for health insurance coverage
pursuant to the terms of the collective bargaining agreement between
the home care quality authority and the exclusive bargaining
representative of individual providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of five million seven hundred
thirteen thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, from the general
fund--state, and the sum of five million five hundred forty-three
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2005, from the general
fund--federal to the department of social and health services solely to
provide workers' compensation benefits to state-funded individual
providers beginning October 1, 2004, through a third-party
administrator under contract with the home care quality authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The sum of one million three hundred twenty-four thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, from the general
fund--state, and the sum of one million two hundred eighty-four
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2005, from the general
fund--federal to the department of social and health services solely
for costs associated with administrative, labor, and employment
relations costs determined by the terms of the collective bargaining
agreement between the home care quality authority and the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The appropriations to the department of
social and health services in this act may be transferred among
programs within the department or to the home care quality authority to
implement the collective bargaining agreement between the home care
quality authority and the exclusive bargaining representative of
individual providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---