BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.20.010 and 2000 c 171 s 3 and 2000 c 121 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the development,
establishment, and enforcement of standards for the maintenance and
operation of boarding homes, which, in the light of advancing
knowledge, will promote safe and adequate care of the individuals
therein. It is further the intent of the legislature that boarding
homes be available to meet the needs of those for whom they care by
recognizing the capabilities of individuals to direct their self-medication or to use supervised self-medication techniques when ordered
and approved by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW
or a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW.
The legislature finds that many residents of community-based long-term care facilities are vulnerable and their health and well-being are
dependent on their caregivers. The quality, skills, and knowledge of
their caregivers are often the key to good care. The legislature finds
that the need for well-trained caregivers is growing as the state's
population ages and residents' needs increase. The legislature intends
that current training standards be enhanced.
The legislature declares that the state of Washington has a
compelling interest in protecting and promoting the health, safety, and
well-being of the vulnerable adults residing in boarding homes. The
legislature recognizes that boarding homes are a vital part of the
state's long-term care system and offer a valued and desirable setting
for care and services. It is the intent of the legislature that
residents and the public be assured through trainings, technical
assistance, and appropriate oversight and enforcement by the department
that boarding homes are safe, well-regulated facilities providing a
high quality of life and care to residents.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.20.020 and 2000 c 47 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aged person" means a person of the age sixty-five years or
more, or a person of less than sixty-five years who by reason of
infirmity requires domiciliary care.
(2) "Boarding home" means any home or other institution, however
named, which is advertised, announced, or maintained for the express or
implied purpose of providing board and domiciliary care to seven or
more aged persons not related by blood or marriage to the operator.
However, a boarding home that is licensed to provide board and
domiciliary care to three to six persons on July 1, 2000, may maintain
its boarding home license as long as it is continually licensed as a
boarding home. "Boarding home" shall not include facilities certified
as group training homes pursuant to RCW 71A.22.040, nor any home,
institution or section thereof which is otherwise licensed and
regulated under the provisions of state law providing specifically for
the licensing and regulation of such home, institution or section
thereof. Nor shall it include any independent senior housing,
independent living units in continuing care retirement communities, or
other similar living situations including those subsidized by the
department of housing and urban development. However, independent
living units that are located within the boarding home premises may be
subject to inspection, as set forth in rule by the department, if the
department determines that conditions or activities from the unit or
units may detrimentally impact the health, safety, or well-being of
residents in the boarding home.
(3) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal
successor thereof.
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(5) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(6) "Harm" means a physical, mental, or emotional injury or damage
to a resident, including from neglect or a violation of a resident's
rights. Examples of harm include, but are not limited to: Shallow
bruising, lacerations, or other injuries that can be treated with first
aid; dehydration not requiring professional intervention; yelling or
ridicule of a resident that is not repeated or part of a pattern;
leaving a resident unassisted on the toilet for an unnecessary,
prolonged period of time; leaving a resident to lie in urine or feces;
failing to assist a resident needing help with eating; transferring a
resident within the facility without prior notice; or failing to
include a resident or the resident's representative in care planning.
Incidents that cause harm may, if repeated or prolonged, result in
substantial harm.
(7) "Substantial harm" means harm that causes significant physical,
mental, or emotional suffering to a resident, or is a significant
violation of a resident's rights. Examples of substantial harm
include, but are not limited to: Deep bruising; laceration requiring
sutures; fracture; burn; dehydration or malnutrition requiring the
intervention of a licensed health care professional; retaliation
against a resident for filing a complaint with the department or the
ombudsman, such as by withholding or reducing needed care, threatening
to discharge the resident, or threatening to cut off communication with
family or friends; bruising in areas not generally exposed to trauma,
such as the head, neck, inner thigh, and anal area; any sexual assault
or suspected sexual assault; any pattern of or repeated assault or
injury between the same residents or involving the same resident; or
any injury requiring close assessment or monitoring by a licensed
health care professional.
(8) "Serious violation" means a violation cited by the department
of this chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, or other
applicable law, that causes substantial harm to a resident.
(9) "Uncorrected violation" means the department has cited the
boarding home for a violation of this chapter, the rules adopted under
this chapter, or other applicable law, and the violation is not
corrected at the time the department makes an on-site revisit,
inspection, or investigation to determine whether the violation has
been corrected.
(10) "Recurring problem" means the department has cited the
boarding home three times within a three-year period for the same or
substantially the same violation of this chapter, the rules adopted
under this chapter, or other applicable law.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.20.050 and 2001 c 193 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon receipt of an application for license, if the applicant and
the boarding home facilities meet the requirements established under
this chapter, the department shall issue a license. If there is a
failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the standards
and rules adopted pursuant thereto, the department may in its
discretion issue to an applicant for a license, or for the renewal of
a license, a provisional license which will permit the operation of the
boarding home for a period to be determined by the department, but not
to exceed twelve months, which provisional license shall not be subject
to renewal. At the time of the application for or renewal of a license
or provisional license the licensee shall pay a license fee as
established by the department under RCW 43.20B.110. All licenses
issued under the provisions of this chapter shall expire on a date to
be set by the department, but no license issued pursuant to this
chapter shall exceed twelve months in duration. However, when the
annual license renewal date of a previously licensed boarding home is
set by the department on a date less than twelve months prior to the
expiration date of a license in effect at the time of reissuance, the
license fee shall be prorated on a monthly basis and a credit be
allowed at the first renewal of a license for any period of one month
or more covered by the previous license. All applications for renewal
of a license shall be made not later than thirty days prior to the date
of expiration of the license. Each license shall be issued only for
the premises and persons named in the application, and no license shall
be transferable or assignable. Licenses shall be posted in a
conspicuous place on the licensed premises.
A licensee who receives notification of the department's initiation
of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a boarding home
license may, in lieu of appealing the department's action, surrender or
relinquish the license. The department shall not issue a new license
to or contract with the licensee, for the purposes of providing care to
vulnerable adults or children, for a period of twenty years following
the surrendering or relinquishment of the former license. The
licensing record shall indicate that the licensee relinquished or
surrendered the license, without admitting the violations, after
receiving notice of the department's initiation of a denial,
suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a license.
The department shall establish, by rule, the circumstances
requiring a change in licensee, which include, but are not limited to,
a change in ownership or control of the boarding home or licensee, a
change in the licensee's form of legal organization, such as from sole
proprietorship to partnership or corporation, and a dissolution or
merger of the licensed entity with another legal organization. The new
licensee is subject to the provisions of this chapter, the rules
adopted under this chapter, and other applicable law. In order to
ensure that the safety of residents is not compromised by a change in
licensee, the new licensee is responsible for correction of all
violations that may exist at the time of the new license, including
compliance with any plan of correction in effect immediately prior to
the change in licensee. If any person affiliated with the new licensee
was affiliated with a prior licensee at the same boarding home, then
the prior licensee's compliance and enforcement record becomes part of
the new licensee's record at the boarding home. A person is considered
affiliated with a licensee if the person is an applicant for the
boarding home license, or is listed on the license application as a
partner, officer, director, managerial employee, or owner of five
percent or more of the applying entity.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.20.110 and 2000 c 47 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall make or cause to be made at least a yearly
inspection and investigation of all boarding homes. Every inspection
shall focus primarily on actual or potential resident outcomes, and may
include an inspection of every part of the premises and an examination
of all records (other than financial records, which may be examined to
the extent relevant to verifying the ability to adequately care for
residents), methods of administration, the general and special dietary,
and the stores and methods of supply. Following such an inspection or
inspections, written notice of any violation of this law or the rules
adopted hereunder shall be given to the applicant or licensee and the
department. The department may prescribe by rule that any licensee or
applicant desiring to make specified types of alterations or additions
to its facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before
commencing such alteration, addition, or new construction, submit plans
and specifications therefor to the agencies responsible for plan
reviews for preliminary inspection and approval or recommendations with
respect to compliance with the rules and standards herein authorized.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.20.115 and 2001 c 85 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall, within available funding for this purpose,
develop and make available to boarding homes and residents a quality
improvement ((consultation)) information program using the following
principles:
(1) The system shall be resident-centered and promote privacy,
independence, dignity, choice, and a home or home-like environment for
residents consistent with chapter 70.129 RCW.
(2) The goal of the system is continuous quality improvement of the
boarding home's care and services, with the focus on resident
satisfaction and positive outcomes for residents. The quality
improvement ((consultation)) information program shall be offered to
boarding homes and resident councils or similar groups of residents, on
a voluntary basis. Based on requests for the services of the quality
improvement ((consultation)) information program, the department may
establish a process for prioritizing service availability.
(3) Boarding homes should be supported in their efforts to improve
quality and address problems, as identified by the licensee, initially
through training, ((consultation)) information, and technical
assistance. At a minimum, the department may, within available
funding, at the request of the boarding home, conduct on-site visits
and provide information over the telephone ((consultations)).
(4) To facilitate collaboration and trust between the boarding
homes and the department's quality improvement ((consultation))
information program staff, the ((consultation)) information program
staff shall not simultaneously serve as department licensors, complaint
investigators, or participate in any enforcement-related decisions,
within the region in which they perform ((consultation)) information
activities; except such staff may investigate on an emergency basis,
complaints anywhere in the state when the complaint indicates high risk
to resident health or safety. Any records or information gained as a
result of their work under the quality improvement ((consultation))
information program shall not be disclosed to or shared with
nonmanagerial department licensing or complaint investigation staff,
unless necessary to carry out duties described under chapter 74.34 RCW.
The emphasis should be on problem prevention. Nothing in this section
shall limit or interfere with the ((consultant's)) information staff's
mandated reporting duties under chapter 74.34 RCW.
(5) The department shall develop with input from interested
stakeholders a component of the quality improvement information program
to be responsive to requests for information from boarding home
resident councils and similar groups, and to provide the department
with an opportunity to hear the general concerns and questions
residents and their representatives may have. The department
information may address such topics as how to better participate in the
care planning process, aging in place principles, and summaries of
licensing standards and regulations. The quality improvement
information program shall not replace the complaint investigation or
licensing inspection processes. The resident component of the quality
improvement information program shall be funded from a reasonable
portion of the funding available for the overall program and may be
offered initially on a pilot program basis.
(6) The department shall promote the development of a training
system that is practical and relevant to the needs of residents and
staff. To improve access to training, especially for rural
communities, the training system may include, but is not limited to,
the use of satellite technology distance learning that is coordinated
through community colleges or other appropriate organizations.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.20.120 and 2000 c 47 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
All information received by the department through filed reports,
inspections, or as otherwise authorized under this chapter ((shall not
be disclosed publicly in any manner as to identify individuals or
boarding homes, except at the specific request of a member of the
public and disclosure is consistent with RCW 42.17.260(1))), or used by
the department in connection with this chapter, is a public record and
is subject to disclosure except as prohibited by RCW 42.17.260(1).

Sec. 7 RCW 18.20.125 and 2001 c 85 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Monitoring ((should)) of boarding homes through license
inspections and complaint investigations shall be outcome based and
responsive to ((resident)) the concerns and complaints ((and)) of
residents, their family members, advocates, facility staff, and others.
The department's monitoring shall be based on a clear set of health,
quality of care, and safety standards that are easily understandable
and have been made available to ((facilities. This includes that))
boarding homes, residents, and other interested parties. When
conducting ((licensing)) license inspections, the department shall
interview an appropriate percentage of residents, family members, and
advocates in addition to interviewing appropriate staff. During
license inspections, the department shall provide both the boarding
home and residents and their representatives the opportunity to provide
additional or clarifying information about concerns. The process
should be as even-handed and open as possible, with due regard for
confidentiality requirements. The department shall adopt rules setting
forth the monitoring and enforcement processes for license inspections
and complaint investigations.
(2) ((Prompt and specific enforcement remedies shall also be
implemented without delay, consistent with RCW 18.20.190, for
facilities found to have delivered care or failed to deliver care
resulting in problems that are serious, recurring, or uncorrected, or
that create a hazard that is causing or likely to cause death or
serious harm to one or more residents. These enforcement remedies may
also include, when appropriate, reasonable conditions on a license. In
the selection of remedies, the safety, health, and well-being of
residents shall be of paramount importance.
(3))) When the department finds in any inspection or investigation
that the boarding home has failed or refused to comply with the
requirements of this chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, or
other applicable law, the department shall issue a written citation and
require the boarding home to correct the violation or violations. The
department may provide technical assistance and information to the
boarding home, residents, and their representatives. Consistent with
this chapter, the department may impose enforcement actions provided
for in RCW 18.20.190, and shall impose enforcement actions when
required by this chapter. The facility's plan of correction shall not
be considered an enforcement action. In the selection of remedies by
the department, the safety, health, and well-being of residents shall
be of paramount importance. The department shall take appropriate
steps to verify correction of violations, as set forth in RCW
18.20.190.
(3) Boarding homes cited by the department in any inspection or
investigation for a serious violation, uncorrected violation, or
recurring problem shall be sanctioned with one or more of the
enforcement actions set forth in RCW 18.20.190. Enforcement actions
required under this subsection shall be imposed promptly and corrective
action implemented without delay.
(4) To the extent funding is available, the licensee,
administrator, and their staff should be screened through background
checks in a uniform and timely manner to ensure that they do not have
a criminal history that would disqualify them from working with
vulnerable adults. Employees may be provisionally hired pending the
results of the background check if they have been given three positive
references.
(((4))) (5) No licensee, administrator, or staff, or prospective
licensee, administrator, or staff, with a stipulated finding of fact,
conclusion of law, and agreed order, or finding of fact, conclusion of
law, or final order issued by a disciplining authority, a court of law,
or entered into the state registry finding him or her guilty of abuse,
neglect, exploitation, or abandonment of a minor or a vulnerable adult
as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW shall be employed in the care of and
have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.20.185 and 2001 c 193 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and maintain a toll-free
telephone number for receiving complaints regarding a facility that the
department licenses.
(2) All facilities that are licensed under this chapter shall post
in a place and manner clearly visible to residents and visitors the
department's toll-free complaint telephone number and the toll-free
number and program description of the long-term care ombudsman as
provided by RCW 43.190.050.
(3) The department shall investigate complaints if the subject of
the complaint is within its authority unless the department determines
that: (a) The complaint is intended to willfully harass a licensee or
employee of the licensee; or (b) there is no reasonable basis for
investigation; or (c) corrective action has been taken as determined by
the ombudsman or the department.
(4) The department shall refer complaints to appropriate state
agencies, law enforcement agencies, the attorney general, the long-term
care ombudsman, or other entities if the department lacks authority to
investigate or if its investigation reveals that a follow-up referral
to one or more of these entities is appropriate.
(5) The department shall adopt rules that include the following
complaint investigation protocols:
(a) Upon receipt of a complaint, the department shall make a
preliminary review of the complaint, assess the severity of the
complaint, and assign an appropriate response time. Complaints
involving imminent danger to the health, safety, or well-being of a
resident must be responded to within two days. When appropriate, the
department shall make an on-site investigation within a reasonable time
after receipt of the complaint or otherwise ensure that complaints are
responded to.
(b) The complainant must be: Promptly contacted by the department,
unless anonymous or unavailable despite several attempts by the
department, and informed of the right to discuss alleged violations
with the inspector and to provide other information the complainant
believes will assist the inspector; informed of the department's course
of action; and informed of the right to receive a written copy of the
investigation report.
(c) In conducting the investigation, the department shall interview
the complainant, unless anonymous, and shall use its best efforts to
interview the resident or residents allegedly harmed by the violations,
and, in addition to facility staff, any available independent sources
of relevant information, including if appropriate the family members of
the resident. Prior to completing the investigation, the department
shall give the complainant the opportunity to provide additional or
clarifying information.
(d) Substantiated complaints involving harm to a resident, if an
applicable law or regulation has been violated, shall be subject to one
or more of the enforcement actions provided in RCW 18.20.190 (2) and
(3). Whenever appropriate, the department ((shall)) may also give
((consultation)) information and technical assistance to the facility,
complainant, resident, and other interested parties, subject to
confidentiality restrictions.
(e) ((After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement has been imposed, the department shall make an on-site
revisit of the provider within fifteen working days from the request
for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. For violations
that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous
citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or more
residents' well-being, including violations of residents' rights, the
department shall make an on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to
ensure correction of the violation. Verification of correction of all
other violations may be made by either a department on-site revisit or
by written or photographic documentation found by the department to be
credible. This subsection does not prevent the department from
enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this
subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's authority
and duty to ensure that the provider adequately cares for residents,
including to make departmental on-site revisits as needed to ensure
that the provider protects residents, and to enforce compliance with
this chapter.
(f))) Substantiated complaints of neglect, abuse, financial
exploitation, or abandonment of residents, or suspected criminal
violations, shall also be referred by the department to the appropriate
law enforcement agencies, the attorney general, and appropriate
professional disciplining authority.
(6) The department may provide the substance of the complaint to
the licensee before the completion of the investigation by the
department unless such disclosure would reveal the identity of a
complainant, witness, or resident who chooses to remain anonymous.
Neither the substance of the complaint provided to the licensee ((or
contractor)) nor any copy of the complaint or related report published,
released, or made otherwise available shall disclose, or reasonably
lead to the disclosure of, the name, title, or identity of any
complainant, or other person mentioned in the complaint, except that
the name of the provider and the name or names of any officer,
employee, or agent of the department conducting the investigation shall
be disclosed after the investigation has been closed and the complaint
has been substantiated. The department may disclose the identity of
the complainant or any other person mentioned in the complaint if such
disclosure is requested in writing by the ((complainant)) person whose
identity is to be disclosed. Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to interfere with the obligation of the long-term care
ombudsman program to monitor the department's licensing, contract, and
complaint investigation files for long-term care facilities.
(7) The resident has the right to be free of interference,
coercion, discrimination, and reprisal from a facility in exercising
his or her rights, including the right to voice grievances about
treatment furnished or not furnished. A facility licensed under this
chapter shall not discriminate or retaliate in any manner against a
resident, employee, or any other person on the basis or for the reason
that such resident or any other person made a complaint to the
department, the attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the
long-term care ombudsman, provided information, or otherwise cooperated
with the investigation of such a complaint. Any attempt to discharge
a resident against the resident's wishes, or any type of retaliatory
treatment of a resident by whom or upon whose behalf a complaint
substantiated by the department has been made to the department, the
attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the long-term care
ombudsman, within one year of the filing of the complaint, raises a
rebuttable presumption that such action was in retaliation for the
filing of the complaint. "Retaliatory treatment" means, but is not
limited to, monitoring a resident's phone, mail, or visits; involuntary
seclusion or isolation; transferring a resident to a different room
unless requested or based upon legitimate management reasons; attempted
discharge, transfer, or retaliatory treatment of a relative of the
resident, if the relative is also a resident at the facility;
withholding, reducing, or threatening to withhold or reduce food,
services, or treatment unless agreed to by the resident or authorized
by a terminally ill resident or his or her representative pursuant to
law; or persistently delaying responses to a resident's request for
service or assistance. A facility licensed under this chapter shall
not willfully interfere with the performance of official duties by a
long-term care ombudsman. The department shall sanction and may impose
a civil penalty of not more than three thousand dollars for a violation
of this subsection. The department shall require the facility to
rectify to the extent possible the retaliatory treatment or other
violation of this subsection.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.20.190 and 2001 c 193 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the department finds that the boarding home has failed or
refused to comply with the requirements of this chapter, the rules
adopted under this chapter, or other applicable law, the department
shall issue a written citation and require the boarding home to correct
the violation or violations. In addition, the department ((of social
and health services)) is authorized to take one or more of the
enforcement actions listed in subsections (2) and (3) of this section
in any case in which the department finds that a boarding home
((provider)) has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;
(b) Operated a boarding home without a license or under a revoked
license;
(c) Knowingly, or with reason to know, made a false statement of
material fact on his or her application for license or any data
attached thereto, or in any matter under investigation by the
department; or
(d) Willfully prevented or interfered with any inspection or
investigation by the department.
(2) When authorized by subsection (1) of this section, and subject
to the further criteria in subsection (3) of this section, the
department may take one or more of the following enforcement actions:
(a) Refuse to issue a license;
(b) Impose reasonable conditions on a license, such as a directed
plan of correction within a specified time, training, and limits on the
type of clients the ((provider)) boarding home may admit or serve;
(c) Impose civil penalties of not more than one hundred dollars per
day per violation;
(d) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license; ((or))
(e) Suspend admissions to the boarding home by imposing stop
placement; or
(f) Seek an injunction under RCW 18.20.150.
(3) The department shall adopt by rule criteria for the selection
of enforcement actions. The criteria shall include, but not be limited
to, the following requirements:
(a) A reasonable condition on a license may not be the sole
enforcement action imposed by the department for a serious violation,
or for an uncorrected violation or recurring problem that harmed a
resident;
(b) A civil penalty for a serious violation, or an uncorrected
violation or recurring problem that harmed a resident, shall be not
less than one thousand dollars; a civil penalty for a violation of RCW
18.20.185(7) may be up to three thousand dollars; and the initial day
of a civil penalty for violations involving harm to a resident may be
the first day harm occurred;
(c) A stop placement shall not be imposed unless there is a
reasonable probability that harm to more than one resident will occur
or reoccur as a result of the violation or violations;
(d) A summary suspension shall not be imposed unless there is an
imminent threat that substantial harm to more than one resident will
occur as a result of a violation or violations; and
(e) The department may revoke, deny, or refuse to renew a license
when there is cause to summarily suspend the license; when there is a
current violation and the boarding home has a history of significant
noncompliance; when there is a very serious current violation, such as
significant financial problems resulting in poor care and possible
business failure; or for other good cause.
(4) When the department orders stop placement, the ((facility))
boarding home shall not admit any new resident until the stop placement
order is terminated. The department may approve readmission of a
resident to the ((facility)) boarding home from a hospital or nursing
home during the stop placement. The department shall terminate the
stop placement when: (a) The violations necessitating the stop
placement have been corrected; and (b) the ((provider)) boarding home
exhibits the capacity to maintain correction of the violations
previously found deficient. However, if upon the revisit the
department finds new violations that the department reasonably believes
will result in a new stop placement, the previous stop placement shall
remain in effect until the new stop placement is imposed.
(((4))) (5) The department shall take appropriate steps to verify
correction of violations:
(a) After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement has been imposed, the department shall make an on-site
revisit of the ((provider)) boarding home within fifteen working days
from the request for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation.
((For violations that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following
a previous citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or
more residents' well-being, including violations of residents' rights))
(b) After a department citation for a serious violation, or for an
uncorrected violation or recurring problem that harmed a resident, the
department shall make an on-site revisit to the boarding home as soon
as appropriate to ensure correction of the violation or problem.
Depending on the extent of the threatened or actual harm to residents,
the department's on-site revisit shall occur shortly after issuing the
citation or may be initiated more than fifteen working days from
notification of correction of the violation.
(c) Verification of correction of all other violations may be made
by either a department on-site revisit or by written or photographic
documentation found by the department to be credible.
(d) This ((subsection)) section does not prevent the department
from enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this
((subsection)) section shall interfere with or diminish the
department's authority and duty to ensure that the ((provider))
boarding home adequately cares for residents, ((including)) to make
((departmental)) on-site revisits as needed to ensure that the
((provider)) boarding home protects residents, and to enforce
compliance with this chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, and
other applicable law. The department shall adopt rules setting forth
the monitoring and enforcement processes for license inspections and
complaint investigations.
(((5))) (6) RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial,
revocation, suspension, or modification. Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to
department actions under this section, except that orders of the
department imposing license suspension, stop placement, or conditions
for continuation of a license are effective immediately upon notice and
shall continue pending any hearing.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.20.195 and 2001 c 193 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within available resources, the licensee or its designee has
the right to an informal dispute resolution process to dispute any
violation found or enforcement remedy imposed by the department during
a licensing inspection or complaint investigation. The purpose of the
informal dispute resolution process is to provide an opportunity for an
exchange of information that may lead to the modification, deletion, or
removal of a violation, or parts of a violation, or enforcement remedy
imposed by the department. If the dispute concerns a complaint
investigation, the complainant has the right to provide the department
with additional or clarifying information before the department reaches
a decision in the informal dispute resolution process. If the dispute
concerns a licensing inspection, the resident council or other
representatives of the residents have the right to provide the
department with additional or clarifying information before the
department reaches a decision in the informal dispute resolution
process.
(2) The informal dispute resolution process provided by the
department shall include, but is not necessarily limited to, an
opportunity for review by a department employee who did not participate
in, or oversee, the determination of the violation or enforcement
remedy under dispute. The department shall develop, or further
develop, an informal dispute resolution process consistent with this
section.
(3) A request for an informal dispute resolution shall be made to
the department within ten working days from the receipt of a written
finding of a violation or enforcement remedy. The request shall
identify the violation or violations and enforcement remedy or remedies
being disputed. The department shall convene a meeting, when possible,
within ten working days of receipt of the request for informal dispute
resolution, unless by mutual agreement a later date is agreed upon.
(4) If the department determines that a violation or enforcement
remedy should not be cited or imposed, the department shall delete the
violation or immediately rescind or modify the enforcement remedy. If
the department determines that a violation should have been cited or an
enforcement remedy imposed, the department shall add the citation and
enforcement remedy. Upon request, the department shall issue a clean
copy of the revised report, statement of deficiencies, or notice of
enforcement action.
(5) The request for informal dispute resolution does not delay the
effective date of any enforcement remedy imposed by the department,
except that civil monetary fines are not payable until the exhaustion
of any formal hearing and appeal rights provided under this chapter.
The licensee shall submit to the department, within the time period
prescribed by the department, a plan of correction to address any
undisputed violations, and including any violations that still remain
following the informal dispute resolution.

Sec. 11 RCW 70.128.010 and 2001 c 319 s 6 and 2001 c 319 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult family home" means a residential home in which a person
or persons provide personal care((,)) or special care((,)) and
room((,)) and board to more than one but not more than six adults who
are not related by blood or marriage to the person or persons providing
the services.
(2) "Provider" means any person who is licensed or required to be
licensed under this chapter to operate an adult family home. For the
purposes of this section, "person" means any individual, partnership,
corporation, association, or limited liability company.
(3) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(4) "Resident" means an adult in need of personal or special care
in an adult family home who is not related to the provider.
(5) "Adults" means persons who have attained the age of eighteen
years.
(6) "Home" means an adult family home.
(7) "Imminent danger" means serious physical harm to or death of a
resident has occurred, or there is a serious threat to resident life,
health, or safety.
(8) "Special care" means care beyond personal care as defined by
the department, in rule.
(9) "Capacity" means the maximum number of persons in need of
personal or special care permitted in an adult family home at a given
time. This number shall include related children or adults in the home
and who received special care.
(10) "Resident manager" means a person employed or designated by
the provider to manage the adult family home.
(11) "Harm" means a physical, mental, or emotional injury or damage
to a resident, including from neglect or a violation of a resident's
rights. Examples of harm include, but are not limited to: Shallow
bruising, lacerations, or other injuries that can be treated with first
aid; dehydration not requiring professional intervention; yelling or
ridicule of a resident that is not repeated or part of a pattern;
leaving a resident unassisted on the toilet for an unnecessary,
prolonged period of time; leaving a resident to lie in urine or feces;
failing to assist a resident needing help with eating; transferring a
resident within the facility without prior notice; or failing to
include a resident or the resident's representative in care planning.
Incidents that cause harm may, if repeated or prolonged, result in
substantial harm.
(12) "Substantial harm" means harm that causes significant
physical, mental, or emotional suffering to a resident, or is a
significant violation of a resident's rights. Examples of substantial
harm include, but are not limited to: Deep bruising; laceration
requiring sutures; fracture; burn; dehydration or malnutrition
requiring the intervention of a licensed health care professional;
retaliation against a resident for filing a complaint with the
department or the ombudsman, such as by withholding or reducing needed
care, threatening to discharge the resident, or threatening to cut off
communication with family or friends; bruising in areas not generally
exposed to trauma, such as the head, neck, inner thigh, and anal area;
any sexual assault or suspected sexual assault; any pattern of or
repeated assault or injury between the same residents or involving the
same resident; or any injury requiring close assessment or monitoring
by a licensed health care professional.
(13) "Serious violation" means a violation cited by the department
of this chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, or other
applicable law, that causes substantial harm to a resident.
(14) "Uncorrected violation" means the department has cited the
adult family home for a violation of this chapter, the rules adopted
under this chapter, or other applicable law, and the violation is not
corrected at the time the department makes an on-site revisit,
inspection, or investigation to determine whether the violation has
been corrected.
(15) "Recurring problem" means the department has cited the adult
family home three times within a three-year period for the same or
substantially the same violation of this chapter, the rules adopted
under this chapter, or other applicable law.

Sec. 12 RCW 70.128.060 and 2001 c 193 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An application for license shall be made to the department upon
forms provided by it and shall contain such information as the
department reasonably requires.
(2) Subject to the provisions of this section, the department shall
issue a license to an adult family home if the department finds that
the applicant and the home are in compliance with this chapter and the
rules adopted under this chapter, unless (a) the applicant or a person
affiliated with the applicant has prior violations of this chapter
relating to the adult family home subject to the application or any
other adult family home, or of any other law regulating residential
care facilities within the past five years that resulted in revocation,
suspension, or nonrenewal of a license or contract with the department;
or (b) the applicant or a person affiliated with the applicant has a
history of significant noncompliance with federal, state, or local
laws, rules, or regulations relating to the provision of care or
services to vulnerable adults or to children. A person is considered
affiliated with an applicant if the person is listed on the license
application as a partner, officer, director, resident manager, or owner
of five percent or more of the applying entity.
(3) The license fee shall be submitted with the application.
(4) The department shall serve upon the applicant a copy of the
decision granting or denying an application for a license. An
applicant shall have the right to contest denial of his or her
application for a license as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW by
requesting a hearing in writing within twenty-eight days after receipt
of the notice of denial.
(5) The department shall not issue a license to a provider if the
department finds that the provider or any partner, officer, director,
managerial employee, or owner of five percent or more if the provider
has a history of significant noncompliance with federal or state
regulations, rules, or laws in providing care or services to vulnerable
adults or to children.
(6) The department shall license an adult family home for the
maximum level of care that the adult family home may provide. The
department shall define, in rule, license levels based upon the
education, training, and caregiving experience of the licensed provider
or staff.
(7) The department shall establish, by rule, standards used to
license nonresident providers and multiple facility operators.
(8) The department shall establish, by rule, for multiple facility
operators educational standards substantially equivalent to recognized
national certification standards for residential care administrators.
(9) The license fee shall be set at fifty dollars per year for each
home. A fifty dollar processing fee shall also be charged each home
when the home is initially licensed.
(10) A provider who receives notification of the department's
initiation of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of an
adult family home license may, in lieu of appealing the department's
action, surrender or relinquish the license. The department shall not
issue a new license to or contract with the provider, for the purposes
of providing care to vulnerable adults or children, for a period of
twenty years following the surrendering or relinquishment of the former
license. The licensing record shall indicate that the provider
relinquished or surrendered the license, without admitting the
violations, after receiving notice of the department's initiation of a
denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a license.
(11) The department shall establish, by rule, the circumstances
requiring a change in the licensed provider, which include, but are not
limited to, a change in ownership or control of the adult family home
or provider, a change in the provider's form of legal organization,
such as from sole proprietorship to partnership or corporation, and a
dissolution or merger of the licensed entity with another legal
organization. The new provider is subject to the provisions of this
chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, and other applicable
law. In order to ensure that the safety of residents is not
compromised by a change in provider, the new provider is responsible
for correction of all violations that may exist at the time of the new
license, including compliance with any plan of correction in effect
immediately prior to the change in provider. If any person affiliated
with the new provider was affiliated with a prior provider at the same
adult family home, then the prior provider's compliance and enforcement
record becomes part of the new provider's record at the adult family
home.

Sec. 13 RCW 70.128.080 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 23 are each
amended to read as follows:
An adult family home shall have readily available for review by the
department, residents, and the public:
(1) Its license to operate; and
(2) A copy of each inspection and investigation report received by
the home from the department for the past three years.

Sec. 14 RCW 70.128.090 and 2001 c 319 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) During inspections of an adult family home, the department
shall have access and authority to examine areas and articles in the
home used to provide care or support to residents, including residents'
records, accounts, and the physical premises, including the buildings,
grounds, and equipment. The personal records of the provider are not
subject to department inspection nor is the separate bedroom of the
provider, not used in direct care of a client, subject to review. The
department may inspect all rooms during the initial licensing of the
home. However, during a complaint investigation, the department shall
have access to the entire premises and all pertinent records when
necessary to conduct official business. The department also shall have
the authority to interview the provider and residents of an adult
family home.
(2) Whenever an inspection or investigation is conducted, the
department shall prepare a written report that summarizes all
information obtained ((during the inspection)), and if the home is in
violation of this chapter, serve a copy of the inspection or
investigation report upon the provider at the same time as a notice of
violation. This notice shall be mailed to the provider within ten
working days of the completion of the inspection or investigation
process. If the home is not in violation of this chapter, a copy of
the ((inspection)) report shall be mailed to the provider within ten
calendar days of the inspection or investigation of the home. All
((inspection)) reports shall be made available to the public at the
department during business hours.
(3) The provider shall develop corrective measures for any
violations found by the department's inspection or investigation.
Within available resources, the department shall upon request provide
consultation and technical assistance to assist the provider in
developing effective corrective measures. The department shall include
a statement of the provider's corrective measures in the department's
inspection report.

Sec. 15 RCW 70.128.160 and 2001 c 193 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When the department finds in any inspection or investigation
that the adult family home has failed or refused to comply with the
requirements of this chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, or
other applicable law, the department shall issue a written citation and
require the adult family home to correct the violation or violations.
All written citations shall become part of the adult family home's
compliance and enforcement record. In addition, the department is
authorized to take one or more of the enforcement actions listed in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section in any case in which the
department finds that an adult family home ((provider)) has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;
(b) Operated an adult family home without a license or under a
revoked license;
(c) Knowingly or with reason to know made a false statement of
material fact on his or her application for license or any data
attached thereto, or in any matter under investigation by the
department; or
(d) Willfully prevented or interfered with any inspection or
investigation by the department.
(2) When authorized by subsection (1) of this section, and subject
to the further criteria in subsection (3) of this section, the
department may take one or more of the following actions:
(a) Refuse to issue a license;
(b) Impose reasonable conditions on a license, such as correction
within a specified time, training, and limits on the type of clients
the provider may admit or serve;
(c) Impose civil penalties of not more than one hundred dollars per
day per violation;
(d) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license; ((or))
(e) Suspend admissions to the adult family home by imposing stop
placement; or
(f) Seek an injunction under RCW 70.128.105.
(3) The department shall adopt by rule criteria for the selection
of enforcement actions. The criteria shall include, but not be limited
to, the following requirements:
(a) A reasonable condition on a license may not be the sole
enforcement action imposed by the department for a serious violation,
or for an uncorrected violation or recurring problem that harmed a
resident;
(b) A civil penalty for a serious violation, or for an uncorrected
violation or recurring problem that harmed a resident, shall not be
less than one thousand dollars; a civil penalty for a violation of RCW
74.39A.060(7) may be up to three thousand dollars; a civil penalty for
a violation of RCW 70.128.150 may be up to one thousand dollars; and
the initial day of a civil penalty for violations involving harm to a
resident may be the first day harm occurred;
(c) A stop placement shall not be imposed unless there is a
reasonable probability that harm to more than one resident will occur
or reoccur as a result of a violation or violations;
(d) A summary suspension shall not be imposed unless there is an
imminent threat that substantial harm to more than one resident will
occur as a result of a violation or violations; and
(e) The department may revoke, deny, or refuse to renew a license
when there is cause to summarily suspend the license; when there is a
current violation and the adult family home has a history of
significant noncompliance; when there is a very serious current
violation, such as significant financial problems resulting in poor
care and possible business failure; or for other good cause.
(4) When the department orders stop placement, the ((facility))
adult family home shall not admit any person until the stop placement
order is terminated. The department may approve readmission of a
resident to the ((facility)) adult family home from a hospital or
nursing home during the stop placement. The department shall terminate
the stop placement when: (a) The violations necessitating the stop
placement have been corrected; and (b) the ((provider)) adult family
home exhibits the capacity to maintain correction of the violations
previously found deficient. However, if upon the revisit the
department finds new violations that the department reasonably believes
will result in a new stop placement, the previous stop placement shall
remain in effect until the new stop placement is imposed.
(((4))) (5) The department shall take appropriate steps to verify
correction of violations:
(a) After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement has been imposed, the department shall make an on-site
revisit of the ((provider)) adult family home within fifteen working
days from the request for revisit, to ensure correction of the
violation. ((For violations that are serious or recurring or
uncorrected following a previous citation, and create actual or
threatened harm to one or more residents' well-being, including
violations of residents' rights))
(b) After a department citation for a serious violation, or for an
uncorrected violation or recurring problem that harmed a resident, the
department shall make an on-site revisit to the adult family home as
soon as appropriate to ensure correction of the violation or problem.
Depending on the extent of the threatened or actual harm to residents,
the department's on-site revisit shall occur shortly after issuing the
citation or may be initiated more than fifteen working days from
notification of correction of the violation.
(c) Verification of correction of all other violations may be made
by either a department on-site revisit or by written or photographic
documentation found by the department to be credible.
(d) This ((subsection)) section does not prevent the department
from enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this
((subsection)) section shall interfere with or diminish the
department's authority and duty to ensure that the ((provider)) adult
family home adequately cares for residents, ((including)) to make
((departmental)) on-site revisits as needed to ensure that the
((provider)) adult family home protects residents, and to enforce
compliance with this chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, and
other applicable law. The department shall adopt rules setting forth
the monitoring and enforcement processes for license inspections and
complaint investigations.
(((5))) (6) Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to department actions under
this section, except that orders of the department imposing license
suspension, stop placement, or conditions for continuation of a license
are effective immediately upon notice and shall continue in effect
pending any hearing.

Sec. 16 RCW 74.39A.009 and 1997 c 392 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult family home" means a home licensed under chapter 70.128
RCW.
(2) "Adult residential care" means services provided by a boarding
home that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a contract
with the department under RCW 74.39A.020.
(3) "Assisted living services" means services provided by a
boarding home that has a contract with the department under RCW
74.39A.010 and the resident is housed in a private apartment-like unit.
(4) "Boarding home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.20
RCW.
(5) "Cost-effective care" means care provided in a setting of an
individual's choice that is necessary to promote the most appropriate
level of physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being consistent with
client choice, in an environment that is appropriate to the care and
safety needs of the individual, and such care cannot be provided at a
lower cost in any other setting. But this in no way precludes an
individual from choosing a different residential setting to achieve his
or her desired quality of life.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Enhanced adult residential care" means services provided by a
boarding home that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a
contract with the department under RCW 74.39A.010.
(8) "Functionally disabled person" is synonymous with chronic
functionally disabled and means a person who because of a recognized
chronic physical or mental condition or disease, including chemical
dependency, is impaired to the extent of being dependent upon others
for direct care, support, supervision, or monitoring to perform
activities of daily living. "Activities of daily living", in this
context, means self-care abilities related to personal care such as
bathing, eating, using the toilet, dressing, and transfer.
Instrumental activities of daily living may also be used to assess a
person's functional abilities as they are related to the mental
capacity to perform activities in the home and the community such as
cooking, shopping, house cleaning, doing laundry, working, and managing
personal finances.
(9) "Home and community services" means adult family homes, in-home
services, and other services administered or provided by contract by
the department directly or through contract with area agencies on aging
or similar services provided by facilities and agencies licensed by the
department.
(10) "Long-term care" is synonymous with chronic care and means
care and supports delivered indefinitely, intermittently, or over a
sustained time to persons of any age disabled by chronic mental or
physical illness, disease, chemical dependency, or a medical condition
that is permanent, not reversible or curable, or is long-lasting and
severely limits their mental or physical capacity for self-care. The
use of this definition is not intended to expand the scope of services,
care, or assistance by any individuals, groups, residential care
settings, or professions unless otherwise expressed by law.
(11) "Nursing home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.51
RCW.
(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(13) "Tribally licensed boarding home" means a boarding home
licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe which home provides
services similar to boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW.
(14) "Harm" means a physical, mental, or emotional injury or damage
to a resident, including from neglect or a violation of a resident's
rights. Examples of harm include, but are not limited to: Shallow
bruising, lacerations, or other injuries that can be treated with first
aid; dehydration not requiring professional intervention; yelling or
ridicule of a resident that is not repeated or part of a pattern;
leaving a resident unassisted on the toilet for an unnecessary,
prolonged period of time; leaving a resident to lie in urine or feces;
failing to assist a resident needing help with eating; transferring a
resident within the facility without prior notice; or failing to
include a resident or the resident's representative in care planning.
Incidents that cause harm may, if repeated or prolonged, result in
substantial harm.
(15) "Substantial harm" means harm that causes significant
physical, mental, or emotional suffering to a resident, or is a
significant violation of a resident's rights. Examples of substantial
harm include, but are not limited to: Deep bruising; laceration
requiring sutures; fracture; burn; dehydration or malnutrition
requiring the intervention of a licensed health care professional;
retaliation against a resident for filing a complaint with the
department or the ombudsman, such as by withholding or reducing needed
care, threatening to discharge the resident, or threatening to cut off
communication with family or friends; bruising in areas not generally
exposed to trauma, such as the head, neck, inner thigh, and anal area;
any sexual assault or suspected sexual assault; any pattern of or
repeated assault or injury between the same residents or involving the
same resident; or any injury requiring close assessment or monitoring
by a licensed health care professional.
(16) "Serious violation" means a violation cited by the department
of this chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, or other
applicable law, that causes substantial harm to a resident.
(17) "Uncorrected violation" means the department has cited a
provider of home and community services for a violation and the
violation is not corrected at the time the department makes an on-site
revisit, inspection, or investigation to determine whether the
violation has been corrected.
(18) "Recurring problem" means the department has cited the
provider of home and community services three times within a three-year
period for the same or substantially the same violation of this
chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, or other applicable law.

Sec. 17 RCW 74.39A.050 and 2000 c 121 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department's system of monitoring, enforcement, and quality
improvement for long-term care services shall use the following
principles, consistent with applicable federal laws and regulations:
(1) The system shall be client-centered and promote privacy,
independence, dignity, choice, and a home or home-like environment for
residents and consumers consistent with chapter 392, Laws of 1997.
(2) The goal of the system is continuous quality improvement with
the focus on consumer and resident satisfaction and outcomes for
consumers and residents. ((This includes that)) When conducting
licensing or contract inspections, the department shall interview an
appropriate percentage of residents, family members, ((resident)) case
managers, and advocates in addition to interviewing providers and
staff. During licensing or contract inspections, the department shall
provide the provider and residents and their representatives the
opportunity to provide additional or clarifying information about their
concerns. The process shall be as even-handed as possible, with due
regard for confidentiality requirements.
(3) Providers should be supported in their efforts to improve
quality and address identified problems initially through training,
consultation, technical assistance, and case management.
(4) The emphasis should be on problem prevention both in monitoring
and in screening potential providers of service.
(5) Monitoring should be outcome based and responsive to
((consumer)) the concerns and complaints of residents, consumers, and
others and be based upon a clear set of health, quality of care, and
safety standards that are ((easily)) understandable and have been made
available to providers, residents, consumers, and other interested
parties.
(6) ((Prompt and specific enforcement remedies shall also be
implemented without delay, pursuant to RCW 74.39A.080, RCW 70.128.160,
chapter 18.51 RCW, or chapter 74.42 RCW, for providers found to have
delivered care or failed to deliver care resulting in problems that are
serious, recurring, or uncorrected, or that create a hazard that is
causing or likely to cause death or serious harm to one or more
residents. These enforcement remedies may also include, when
appropriate, reasonable conditions on a contract or license. In the
selection of remedies, the safety, health, and well-being of residents
shall be of paramount importance)) When the department finds in any
inspection or investigation that a long-term care facility has failed
or refused to comply with the requirements of this chapter, the rules
adopted under this chapter, the facility's licensing laws, or other
applicable laws, the department shall issue a written citation and
require the facility to correct the violation or violations. The
department may provide technical assistance and information to the
facility, residents, and their representatives. Adult family homes,
boarding homes, and nursing homes cited by the department for a serious
violation, uncorrected violation, or recurring problem shall be
sanctioned with one or more of the enforcement actions set forth in RCW
70.128.160, 74.39A.080, chapter 18.51 RCW, or chapter 74.42 RCW. The
facility's plan of correction shall not be considered an enforcement
action. In the selection of remedies by the department, the safety,
health, and well-being of residents shall be of paramount importance.
(7) To the extent funding is available, all long-term care staff
directly responsible for the care, supervision, or treatment of
vulnerable persons should be screened through background checks in a
uniform and timely manner to ensure that they do not have a criminal
history that would disqualify them from working with vulnerable
persons. Whenever a state conviction record check is required by state
law, persons may be employed or engaged as volunteers or independent
contractors on a conditional basis according to law and rules adopted
by the department.
(8) No provider or staff, or prospective provider or staff, with a
stipulated finding of fact, conclusion of law, an agreed order, or
finding of fact, conclusion of law, or final order issued by a
disciplining authority, a court of law, or entered into a state
registry finding him or her guilty of abuse, neglect, exploitation, or
abandonment of a minor or a vulnerable adult as defined in chapter
74.34 RCW shall be employed in the care of and have unsupervised access
to vulnerable adults.
(9) The department shall establish, by rule, a state registry which
contains identifying information about personal care aides identified
under this chapter who have substantiated findings of abuse, neglect,
financial exploitation, or abandonment of a vulnerable adult as defined
in RCW 74.34.020. The rule must include disclosure, disposition of
findings, notification, findings of fact, appeal rights, and fair
hearing requirements. The department shall disclose, upon request,
substantiated findings of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or
abandonment to any person so requesting this information.
(10) The department shall by rule develop training requirements for
individual providers and home care agency providers. Effective March
1, 2002, individual providers and home care agency providers must
satisfactorily complete department-approved orientation, basic
training, and continuing education within the time period specified by
the department in rule. The department shall adopt rules by March 1,
2002, for the implementation of this section based on the
recommendations of the community long-term care training and education
steering committee established in RCW 74.39A.190. The department shall
deny payment to an individual provider or a home care provider who does
not complete the training requirements within the time limit specified
by the department by rule.
(11) In an effort to improve access to training and education and
reduce costs, especially for rural communities, the coordinated system
of long-term care training and education must include the use of
innovative types of learning strategies such as internet resources,
videotapes, and distance learning using satellite technology
coordinated through community colleges or other entities, as defined by
the department.
(12) The department shall create an approval system by March 1,
2002, for those seeking to conduct department-approved training. In
the rule-making process, the department shall adopt rules based on the
recommendations of the community long-term care training and education
steering committee established in RCW 74.39A.190.
(13) The department shall establish, by rule, training, background
checks, and other quality assurance requirements for personal aides who
provide in-home services funded by medicaid personal care as described
in RCW 74.09.520, community options program entry system waiver
services as described in RCW 74.39A.030, or chore services as described
in RCW 74.39A.110 that are equivalent to requirements for individual
providers.
(14) Under existing funds the department shall establish internally
a quality improvement standards committee to monitor the development of
standards and to suggest modifications.
(15) Within existing funds, the department shall design, develop,
and implement a long-term care training program that is flexible,
relevant, and qualifies towards the requirements for a nursing
assistant certificate as established under chapter 18.88A RCW. This
subsection does not require completion of the nursing assistant
certificate training program by providers or their staff. The long-term care teaching curriculum must consist of a fundamental module, or
modules, and a range of other available relevant training modules that
provide the caregiver with appropriate options that assist in meeting
the resident's care needs. Some of the training modules may include,
but are not limited to, specific training on the special care needs of
persons with developmental disabilities, dementia, mental illness, and
the care needs of the elderly. No less than one training module must
be dedicated to workplace violence prevention. The nursing care
quality assurance commission shall work together with the department to
develop the curriculum modules. The nursing care quality assurance
commission shall direct the nursing assistant training programs to
accept some or all of the skills and competencies from the curriculum
modules towards meeting the requirements for a nursing assistant
certificate as defined in chapter 18.88A RCW. A process may be
developed to test persons completing modules from a caregiver's class
to verify that they have the transferable skills and competencies for
entry into a nursing assistant training program. The department may
review whether facilities can develop their own related long-term care
training programs. The department may develop a review process for
determining what previous experience and training may be used to waive
some or all of the mandatory training. The department of social and
health services and the nursing care quality assurance commission shall
work together to develop an implementation plan by December 12, 1998.

Sec. 18 RCW 74.39A.060 and 2001 c 193 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The aging and adult services administration of the department
shall establish and maintain a toll-free telephone number for receiving
complaints regarding a facility that the administration licenses or
with which it contracts for long-term care services.
(2) All facilities that are licensed by, or that contract with the
aging and adult services administration to provide chronic long-term
care services shall post in a place and manner clearly visible to
residents and visitors the department's toll-free complaint telephone
number and the toll-free number and program description of the long-term care ombudsman as provided by RCW 43.190.050.
(3) The aging and adult services administration shall investigate
complaints if the subject of the complaint is within its authority
unless the department determines that: (a) The complaint is intended
to willfully harass a licensee or employee of the licensee; or (b)
there is no reasonable basis for investigation; or (c) corrective
action has been taken as determined by the ombudsman or the department.
(4) The aging and adult services administration shall refer
complaints to appropriate state agencies, law enforcement agencies, the
attorney general, the long-term care ombudsman, or other entities if
the department lacks authority to investigate or if its investigation
reveals that a follow-up referral to one or more of these entities is
appropriate.
(5) The department shall adopt rules that include the following
complaint investigation protocols:
(a) Upon receipt of a complaint, the department shall make a
preliminary review of the complaint, assess the severity of the
complaint, and assign an appropriate response time. Complaints
involving imminent danger to the health, safety, or well-being of a
resident must be responded to within two days. When appropriate, the
department shall make an on-site investigation within a reasonable time
after receipt of the complaint or otherwise ensure that complaints are
responded to.
(b) The complainant must be: Promptly contacted by the department,
unless anonymous or unavailable despite several attempts by the
department, and informed of the right to discuss the alleged violations
with the inspector and to provide other information the complainant
believes will assist the inspector; informed of the department's course
of action; and informed of the right to receive a written copy of the
investigation report.
(c) In conducting the investigation, the department shall interview
the complainant, unless anonymous, and shall use its best efforts to
interview the vulnerable adult or adults allegedly harmed, and,
consistent with the protection of the vulnerable adult shall interview
facility staff, any available independent sources of relevant
information, including if appropriate the family members of the
vulnerable adult. Prior to completing the investigation, the
department shall give the complainant the opportunity to provide
additional or clarifying information.
(d) Substantiated complaints involving harm to a resident, if an
applicable law or rule has been violated, shall be subject to one or
more of the enforcement actions provided in RCW 74.39A.080 or
70.128.160. Whenever appropriate, the department ((shall)) may also
give ((consultation)) information and technical assistance to the
provider, complainant, resident, or others, consistent with
confidentiality requirements.
(e) The department shall take appropriate steps to verify
correction of violations. After a department finding of a violation
for which a stop placement has been imposed, the department shall make
an on-site revisit of the provider within fifteen working days from the
request for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. ((For
violations that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a
previous citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or more
residents' well-being, including violations of residents' rights))
After a department citation for a serious violation, or for an
uncorrected violation or recurring problem that harmed a resident or
consumer, the department shall make an on-site revisit as soon as
appropriate to ensure correction of the violation. Verification of
correction of all other violations may be made by either a department
on-site revisit or by written or photographic documentation found by
the department to be credible. This subsection does not prevent the
department from enforcing license or contract suspensions or
revocations. Nothing in this subsection shall interfere with or
diminish the department's authority and duty to ensure that the
provider adequately cares for residents, ((including)) to make
((departmental)) on-site revisits as needed to ensure that the provider
protects residents and to enforce compliance with this chapter and
other applicable law.
(f) Substantiated complaints of neglect, abuse, financial
exploitation, or abandonment of residents, or suspected criminal
violations, shall also be referred by the department to the appropriate
law enforcement agencies, the attorney general, and appropriate
professional disciplining authority.
(6) The department may provide the substance of the complaint to
the licensee or contractor before the completion of the investigation
by the department unless such disclosure would reveal the identity of
a complainant, witness, or resident who chooses to remain anonymous.
Neither the substance of the complaint provided to the licensee or
contractor nor any copy of the complaint or related report published,
released, or made otherwise available shall disclose, or reasonably
lead to the disclosure of, the name, title, or identity of any
complainant, or other person mentioned in the complaint, except that
the name of the provider and the name or names of any officer,
employee, or agent of the department conducting the investigation shall
be disclosed after the investigation has been closed and the complaint
has been substantiated. The department may disclose the identity of
the complainant or any other person mentioned in the complaint if such
disclosure is requested in writing by the ((complainant)) person whose
identity is to be disclosed. Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to interfere with the obligation of the long-term care
ombudsman program or department staff to monitor the department's
licensing, contract, and complaint investigation files for long-term
care facilities.
(7) The resident has the right to be free of interference,
coercion, discrimination, and reprisal from a facility in exercising
his or her rights, including the right to voice grievances about
treatment furnished or not furnished. A facility that provides long-term care services shall not discriminate or retaliate in any manner
against a resident, employee, or any other person on the basis or for
the reason that such resident or any other person made a complaint to
the department, the attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the
long-term care ombudsman, provided information, or otherwise cooperated
with the investigation of such a complaint. Any attempt to discharge
a resident against the resident's wishes, or any type of retaliatory
treatment of a resident by whom or upon whose behalf a complaint
substantiated by the department has been made to the department, the
attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the long-term care
ombudsman, within one year of the filing of the complaint, raises a
rebuttable presumption that such action was in retaliation for the
filing of the complaint. "Retaliatory treatment" means, but is not
limited to, monitoring a resident's phone, mail, or visits; involuntary
seclusion or isolation; transferring a resident to a different room
unless requested or based upon legitimate management reasons; attempted
discharge, transfer, or retaliatory treatment of a relative of the
resident, if the relative is also a resident at the facility;
withholding, reducing, or threatening to withhold or reduce food,
services, or treatment unless agreed to by the resident authorized by
a terminally ill resident or his or her representative pursuant to law;
or persistently delaying responses to a resident's request for service
or assistance. A facility that provides long-term care services shall
not willfully interfere with the performance of official duties by a
long-term care ombudsman. The department shall sanction and may impose
a civil penalty of not more than three thousand dollars for a violation
of this subsection. The department shall require the facility to
rectify to the extent possible the retaliatory treatment or other
violation of this subsection.

Sec. 19 RCW 74.39A.080 and 2001 c 193 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When the department finds in any inspection or investigation
that a facility providing assisted living services, adult residential
care services, or enhanced adult residential care services has failed
or refused to comply with the requirements of this chapter, the rules
adopted under this chapter, or other applicable law, the department
shall issue a written citation and require the facility to correct the
violation or violations. All written citations shall become part of
the facility's compliance and enforcement record. In addition, the
department is authorized to take one or more of the enforcement actions
listed in subsections (2) and (3) of this section in any case in which
the department finds that a ((provider of)) facility providing assisted
living services, adult residential care services, or enhanced adult
residential care services has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;
(b) Operated without a license or under a revoked license;
(c) Knowingly, or with reason to know, made a false statement of
material fact on his or her application for license or contract, or any
data attached thereto, or in any matter under investigation by the
department; or
(d) Willfully prevented or interfered with any inspection or
investigation by the department.
(2) When authorized by subsection (1) of this section, and subject
to the further criteria in subsection (3) of this section, the
department may take one or more of the following enforcement actions:
(a) Refuse to issue a contract;
(b) Impose reasonable conditions on a contract, such as a directed
plan of correction within a specified time, training, and limits on the
type of clients the ((provider)) facility may admit or serve;
(c) Impose civil penalties of not more than one hundred dollars per
day per violation;
(d) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a contract; ((or))
(e) Suspend admissions to the facility by imposing stop placement
on contracted services; or
(f) Seek an injunction under RCW 18.20.150.
(3) The department shall adopt by rule criteria for the selection
of enforcement actions. The criteria shall include, but not be limited
to, the following requirements:
(a) A reasonable condition on a contract may not be the sole
enforcement action imposed by the department for a serious violation,
or for an uncorrected violation or recurring problem that harmed a
resident;
(b) A civil penalty for a serious violation, or for an uncorrected
violation or recurring problem that harmed a resident, shall not be
less than one thousand dollars; a civil penalty for a violation of RCW
74.39A.060(7) may be up to three thousand dollars; and the initial day
of a civil penalty for violations involving harm to a resident shall be
the first day harm occurred;
(c) A stop placement shall not be imposed unless there is a
reasonable probability that harm to more than one resident will occur
or reoccur as a result of a violation or violations;
(d) A summary suspension shall not be imposed unless there is an
imminent threat that substantial harm to more than one resident will
occur as a result of a violation or violations; and
(e) The department may revoke, deny, or refuse to renew a contract
when there is cause to summarily suspend the contract; when there is a
current violation and the facility has a history of significant
noncompliance; when there is a very serious current violation, such as
significant financial problems resulting in poor care and possible
business failure; or for other good cause.
(((3))) (4) When the department orders stop placement, the facility
shall not admit any person admitted by contract until the stop
placement order is terminated. The department may approve readmission
of a resident to the facility from a hospital or nursing home during
the stop placement. The department shall terminate the stop placement
when: (a) The violations necessitating the stop placement have been
corrected; and (b) the provider exhibits the capacity to maintain
correction of the violations previously found deficient. However, if
upon the revisit the department finds new violations that the
department reasonably believes will result in a new stop placement, the
previous stop placement shall remain in effect until the new stop
placement is imposed.
(5) The department shall take appropriate steps to verify
correction of violations:
(a) After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement has been imposed, the department shall make an on-site
revisit of the ((provider)) facility within fifteen working days from
the request for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. ((For
violations that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a
previous citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or more
residents' well-being, including violations of residents' rights,))
(b) After a department citation for a serious violation, or for an
uncorrected violation or recurring problem that harmed a resident, the
department shall make an on-site revisit to the facility as soon as
appropriate to ensure correction of the violation or problem.
Depending on the extent of the threatened or actual harm to residents,
the department's on-site revisit shall occur shortly after issuing the
citation or may be initiated more than fifteen working days from
notification of correction of the violation.
(c) Verification of correction of all other violations may be made
by either a department on-site revisit or by written or photographic
documentation found by the department to be credible.
(d) This ((subsection)) section does not prevent the department
from enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this
((subsection)) section shall interfere with or diminish the
department's authority and duty to ensure that the ((provider))
facility adequately cares for residents, ((including)) to make
((departmental)) on-site revisits as needed to ensure that the
((provider)) facility protects residents, and to enforce compliance
with this chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, and other
applicable law. The department shall adopt rules setting forth the
monitoring and enforcement processes for license inspections and
complaint investigations.
(((4))) (6) Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to department actions under
this section, except that orders of the department imposing contracts
suspension, stop placement, or conditions for continuation of a
contract are effective immediately upon notice and shall continue
pending any hearing.

--- END ---