BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purposes of this act are to:
(1) Create an efficient and cost-effective industrial insurance
system for the benefit of both employers and workers by introducing
competition into the system through a choice of insurance carriers,
including a competitive state fund, from whom employers may purchase
industrial insurance;
(2) Improve the administration of the industrial insurance system
by streamlining the laws and processes to reduce cost and litigation
and to achieve both administrative efficiency and justice for injured
workers;
(3) Provide workers the benefits of safety systems developed by
both private enterprise and by government; and
(4) Improve the state's economic climate by providing the private
sector with the opportunity to engage in the industrial insurance
business under government regulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Beginning July 1, 2006, every employer,
unless otherwise exempt, must secure the payment of industrial
insurance by:
(1) Insuring and keeping insured the payment of industrial
insurance benefits as required by law with an authorized insurance
carrier or the state fund; or
(2) Qualifying and remaining qualified as a self-insurer as
permitted by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The joint select committee on industrial
insurance competition is established. The joint select committee shall
consist of the following members:
(a) Four members of the senate, two from each major caucus to be
appointed by the president of the senate; and
(b) Four members of the house of representatives, two from each
major caucus to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(2) The joint select committee shall be chaired by a judge or
retired judge to be appointed jointly by the president of the senate
and the speaker of the house of representatives. The chair shall vote
on any question before the committee only in the case of a tie among
the legislative members.
(3) The joint select committee shall develop proposed legislation
to implement sections 1 and 2 of this act and shall report its
recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2004. The
legislation shall address, at a minimum, the following requirements:
(a) Modernization of the industrial insurance system while
preserving the historical bargain entered into in 1911 between the
employers and workers of this state;
(b) Provision of benefits to injured workers in a fair and balanced
manner, taking into consideration the history of benefit levels in this
state and the cost-effectiveness of such benefits;
(c) Requirements for administrative processes and practices that
are efficient and cost-effective for both employers and workers,
including processes and practices that reduce litigation;
(d) Authorization of insurance carriers to conduct industrial
insurance business in this state, including appropriate regulatory
measures;
(e) Authorization of an independent competitive state fund to
conduct industrial insurance business in this state under the same
conditions as the private insurance carriers, unless such conditions
are not deemed to be appropriate;
(f) Authorization for employers to become self-insured, either as
individuals or groups, including appropriate regulatory measures;
(g) Provision of premium rate-setting methods that promote stable
premium rates and are the lowest necessary to maintain an effective
industrial insurance system in the state;
(h) Requirements for review of insurer and regulatory agency
decisions that promote prompt resolution of disputes, fair outcomes,
and reduced litigation;
(i) Provisions relating to maintaining the adequacy of reserves in
existence on June 30, 2006, for the benefit of injured workers whose
claims accrued on or before that date; and
(j) Provision of sufficient resources to support effective worker
industrial safety and health programs in this state.
(4)(a) The joint select committee shall use legislative facilities
and staff from senate committee services and the office of program
research, but may hire additional staff with specific technical
expertise if such expertise is necessary to carry out its mandates.
(b) The joint select committee, where feasible, may consult with
individuals from the public and private sector or ask such persons to
establish an advisory committee.
(c) The department of labor and industries and the office of the
insurance commissioner shall cooperate with the joint select committee
and each shall provide a liaison who will assist in providing
information to the joint select committee as the chair may reasonably
request.
(5) The chair of the joint select committee is entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. All expenses of the joint select committee, including
travel, shall be paid jointly by the senate and the house of
representatives.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 51.04.010 (Declaration of police power -- Jurisdiction of
courts abolished) and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 1, 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 1, & 1961
c 23 s 51.04.010;
(2) RCW 51.04.020 (Powers and duties) and 2000 c 5 s 14, 1994 c 164
s 24, 1977 c 75 s 77, 1963 c 29 s 1, & 1961 c 23 s 51.04.020;
(3) RCW 51.04.030 (Medical aid -- Rules -- Maximum fees -- Records and
bill payment) and 1998 c 230 s 1, 1997 c 325 s 2, & 1994 c 164 s 25;
(4) RCW 51.04.040 (Subpoena power of director -- Enforcement by
superior court) and 1987 c 316 s 1, 1986 c 200 s 9, 1977 ex.s. c 323 s
1, & 1961 c 23 s 51.04.040;
(5) RCW 51.04.050 (Physician's testimony not privileged) and 1961
c 23 s 51.04.050;
(6) RCW 51.04.060 (No evasion of benefits or burdens) and 1977
ex.s. c 350 s 3 & 1961 c 23 s 51.04.060;
(7) RCW 51.04.070 (Minor worker is sui juris -- Guardianship expense)
and 1980 c 14 s 2;
(8) RCW 51.04.080 (Sending notices, orders, warrants to claimants)
and 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 2 & 1961 c 23 s 51.04.080;
(9) RCW 51.04.082 (Notices and orders -- Mail or personal service)
and 1986 c 9 s 2;
(10) RCW 51.04.085 (Transmission of amounts payable) and 1977 ex.s.
c 323 s 26;
(11) RCW 51.04.090 (Effect of adjudication of applicability) and
1977 ex.s. c 350 s 5 & 1961 c 23 s 51.04.090;
(12) RCW 51.04.100 (Statutes of limitation saved) and 1977 ex.s. c
350 s 6 & 1961 c 23 s 51.04.100;
(13) RCW 51.04.105 (Continuation of medical aid contracts) and 1977
ex.s. c 323 s 25;
(14) RCW 51.04.110 (Workers' compensation advisory committee) and
1982 c 109 s 2 & 1980 c 14 s 3;
(15) RCW 51.04.120 (Certificate of coverage required -- Contents) and
1986 c 9 s 1;
(16) RCW 51.04.130 (Industrial insurance coverage for Hanford
workers -- Special agreements) and 1997 c 109 s 1 & 1951 c 144 s 1;
(17) RCW 51.04.140 (Year 2000 failure -- No interest or penalties for
failure to pay premium) and 1999 c 369 s 4;
(18) RCW 51.08.010 (Meaning of words) and 1961 c 23 s 51.08.010;
(19) RCW 51.08.012 ("Accredited school") and 1975 1st ex.s. c 224
s 2 & 1969 ex.s. c 77 s 3;
(20) RCW 51.08.013 ("Acting in the course of employment") and 1997
c 250 s 10, 1995 c 179 s 1, 1993 c 138 s 1, 1979 c 111 s 15, 1977 ex.s.
c 350 s 8, & 1961 c 107 s 3;
(21) RCW 51.08.014 ("Agriculture") and 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 75;
(22) RCW 51.08.015 ("Amount," "payment," "premium," "contribution,"
"assessment") and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 9, 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 3, & 1961 c
23 s 51.08.015;
(23) RCW 51.08.018 ("Average monthly wage") and 1977 ex.s. c 323 s
3 & 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 15;
(24) RCW 51.08.020 ("Beneficiary") and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 10, 1973
1st ex.s. c 154 s 91, & 1961 c 23 s 51.08.020;
(25) RCW 51.08.030 ("Child") and 1986 c 293 s 1 & 1980 c 14 s 4;
(26) RCW 51.08.040 ("Department") and 1961 c 23 s 51.08.040;
(27) RCW 51.08.050 ("Dependent") and 1997 c 325 s 6, 1977 ex.s. c
350 s 11, & 1961 c 23 s 51.08.050;
(28) RCW 51.08.060 ("Director") and 1961 c 23 s 51.08.060;
(29) RCW 51.08.070 ("Employer" -- Exception) and 1991 c 246 s 2, 1981
c 128 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 12, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 1, & 1961 c 23 s
51.08.070;
(30) RCW 51.08.095 ("Health services provider" -- "Provider") and
1986 c 200 s 12;
(31) RCW 51.08.100 ("Injury") and 1961 c 23 s 51.08.100;
(32) RCW 51.08.110 ("Invalid") and 1961 c 23 s 51.08.110;
(33) RCW 51.08.140 ("Occupational disease") and 1961 c 23 s
51.08.140;
(34) RCW 51.08.142 ("Occupational disease" -- Exclusion of mental
conditions caused by stress) and 1988 c 161 s 16;
(35) RCW 51.08.150 ("Permanent partial disability") and 1961 c 23
s 51.08.150;
(36) RCW 51.08.160 ("Permanent total disability") and 1977 ex.s. c
350 s 13 & 1961 c 23 s 51.08.160;
(37) RCW 51.08.173 ("Self-insurer") and 1983 c 174 s 1 & 1971 ex.s.
c 289 s 80;
(38) RCW 51.08.175 ("State fund" -- "State of Washington industrial
insurance fund") and 1977 ex.s. c 323 s 5, 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 5, & 1971
ex.s. c 289 s 88;
(39) RCW 51.08.177 ("Successor") and 1986 c 9 s 3;
(40) RCW 51.08.178 ("Wages" -- Monthly wages as basis of
compensation -- Computation thereof) and 1988 c 161 s 12 & 1980 c 14 s 5;
(41) RCW 51.08.180 ("Worker" -- Exceptions) and 1991 c 246 s 3, 1987
c 175 s 3, 1983 c 97 s 1, 1982 c 80 s 1, 1981 c 128 s 2, 1977 ex.s. c
350 s 15, & 1961 c 23 s 51.08.180;
(42) RCW 51.08.185 ("Employee") and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 16 & 1972
ex.s. c 43 s 4;
(43) RCW 51.08.195 (Employer and worker -- Alternative exception) and
1991 c 246 s 1;
(44) RCW 51.12.010 (Employments included -- Declaration of policy)
and 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 6, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 2, & 1961 c 23 s 51.12.010;
(45) RCW 51.12.020 (Employments excluded) and 1999 c 68 s 1 & 1997
c 314 s 18;
(46) RCW 51.12.025 (Persons working on parents' family farms--Optional exclusion from coverage) and 1996 c 8 s 1;
(47) RCW 51.12.035 (Volunteers) and 2002 c 175 s 39, 2001 c 138 s
3, 1981 c 266 s 3, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 17, 1975 1st ex.s. c 79 s 1, 1974
ex.s. c 171 s 44, & 1971 c 20 s 1;
(48) RCW 51.12.045 (Offenders performing community restitution) and
2002 c 175 s 40, 1986 c 193 s 1, 1984 c 24 s 4, & 1981 c 266 s 1;
(49) RCW 51.12.050 (Public entity work -- Partnerships with volunteer
groups and businesses for community improvement projects) and 2001 c
138 s 2, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 18, 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 8, & 1961 c 23 s
51.12.050;
(50) RCW 51.12.060 (Federal projects) and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 19 &
1961 c 23 s 51.12.060;
(51) RCW 51.12.070 (Work done by contract -- Subcontractors) and 1981
c 128 s 4, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 81, 1965 ex.s. c 20 s 1, & 1961 c 23 s
51.12.070;
(52) RCW 51.12.080 (Railway employees) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s
92, 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 9, & 1961 c 23 s 51.12.080;
(53) RCW 51.12.090 (Intrastate and interstate commerce) and 1983 c
170 s 1, 1982 c 63 s 16, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 20, 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 10,
& 1961 c 23 s 51.12.090;
(54) RCW 51.12.095 (Common carrier employees -- Owners and operators
of trucks) and 1989 c 368 s 1 & 1983 c 170 s 2;
(55) RCW 51.12.100 (Maritime occupations -- Segregation of payrolls--Common enterprise) and 1991 c 88 s 3, 1988 c 271 s 2, 1977 ex.s. c 350
s 21, 1975 1st ex.s. c 224 s 3, 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 11, & 1961 c 23 s
51.12.100;
(56) RCW 51.12.102 (Maritime workers -- Asbestos-related disease) and
1993 c 168 s 1 & 1988 c 271 s 1;
(57) RCW 51.12.110 (Elective adoption -- Withdrawal -- Cancellation)
and 1991 c 246 s 5, 1982 c 63 s 17, & 1980 c 14 s 6;
(58) RCW 51.12.120 (Extraterritorial coverage) and 1999 c 394 s 1,
1998 c 279 s 2, 1995 c 199 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 23, 1972 ex.s. c 43
s 12, & 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 82;
(59) RCW 51.12.130 (Registered apprentices or trainees) and 1988 c
140 s 1, 1987 c 185 s 31, & 1973 c 110 s 1;
(60) RCW 51.12.140 (Volunteer law enforcement officers) and 1977
ex.s. c 113 s 1;
(61) RCW 51.12.150 (Musicians and entertainers) and 1983 c 252 s 2;
(62) RCW 51.12.160 (Foreign degree-granting institutions--Employee
services in country of domicile) and 1993 c 181 s 9;
(63) RCW 51.12.170 (Student volunteers) and 1994 c 246 s 1;
(64) RCW 51.14.010 (Duty to secure payment of compensation--Options) and 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 26;
(65) RCW 51.14.020 (Qualification) and 1995 c 31 s 1, 1990 c 209 s
1, 1986 c 57 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 323 s 9, 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 16, & 1971
ex.s. c 289 s 27;
(66) RCW 51.14.030 (Certification of employer as self-insurer) and
1977 ex.s. c 323 s 10 & 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 28;
(67) RCW 51.14.040 (Surety liability -- Termination) and 1971 ex.s.
c 289 s 29;
(68) RCW 51.14.050 (Termination of status -- Notice -- Financial
requirements) and 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 30;
(69) RCW 51.14.060 (Default by self-insurer -- Authority of
director -- Liability for reimbursement) and 1986 c 57 s 2 & 1971 ex.s.
c 289 s 31;
(70) RCW 51.14.070 (Payments upon default) and 1986 c 57 s 3 & 1971
ex.s. c 289 s 36;
(71) RCW 51.14.073 (Default lien) and 1986 c 57 s 4;
(72) RCW 51.14.077 (Self-insurers' insolvency trust -- Assessments--Rules) and 1986 c 57 s 6;
(73) RCW 51.14.080 (Withdrawal of certification -- Grounds) and 1986
c 57 s 7 & 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 32;
(74) RCW 51.14.090 (Withdrawal of certification, corrective action
upon employees' petition) and 1996 c 58 s 1, 1983 c 21 s 1, & 1971
ex.s. c 289 s 33;
(75) RCW 51.14.095 (Corrective action -- Appeal) and 1983 c 21 s 2;
(76) RCW 51.14.100 (Notice of compliance to be posted -- Penalty) and
1971 ex.s. c 289 s 34;
(77) RCW 51.14.110 (Employer's duty to maintain records, furnish
information) and 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 35;
(78) RCW 51.14.120 (Copy of claim file -- Notice of protest or
appeal -- Medical report) and 2001 c 152 s 1 & 1993 c 122 s 2;
(79) RCW 51.14.130 (Request for claim resolution -- Time) and 1993 c
122 s 3;
(80) RCW 51.14.140 (Violations of disclosure or request for
resolution -- Order by director) and 1993 c 122 s 4;
(81) RCW 51.14.150 (School districts, ESDs, public hospital
districts, or hospitals as self-insurers -- Authorized -- Organization--Qualifications) and 1997 c 35 s 1, 1993 c 158 s 1, 1983 c 174 s 2, &
1982 c 191 s 7;
(82) RCW 51.14.160 (School districts, ESDs, or hospitals as self-insurers -- Rules -- Scope) and 1983 c 174 s 3 & 1982 c 191 s 8;
(83) RCW 51.16.035 (Classifications -- Premiums -- Rules) and 1999 c 7
s 8, 1989 c 49 s 1, 1980 c 129 s 4, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 24, & 1971 ex.s.
c 289 s 16;
(84) RCW 51.16.040 (Occupational diseases) and 1971 ex.s. c 289 s
83 & 1961 c 23 s 51.16.040;
(85) RCW 51.16.042 (Occupational and environmental research
facility) and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 25, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 84, & 1963 c
151 s 2;
(86) RCW 51.16.060 (Quarterly report of payrolls) and 1985 c 315 s
1 & 1981 c 260 s 13;
(87) RCW 51.16.070 (Employer's records -- Unified business
identifier -- Confidentiality) and 1997 c 54 s 3 & 1961 c 23 s 51.16.070;
(88) RCW 51.16.090 (Continuity of cost experience) and 1961 c 23 s
51.16.090;
(89) RCW 51.16.100 (Classification changes) and 1961 c 23 s
51.16.100;
(90) RCW 51.16.105 (Departmental expenses, financing) and 1994 c
164 s 26, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 27, 1973 1st ex.s. c 52 s 8, 1971 ex.s. c
289 s 86, & 1961 c 23 s 51.16.105;
(91) RCW 51.16.110 (New businesses or resumed or continued
operations) and 1991 c 88 s 4, 1977 ex.s. c 323 s 12, 1971 ex.s. c 289
s 4, & 1961 c 23 s 51.16.110;
(92) RCW 51.16.120 (Distribution of further accident cost) and 1984
c 63 s 1 & 1980 c 14 s 7;
(93) RCW 51.16.130 (Distribution of catastrophe cost) and 1972
ex.s. c 43 s 14 & 1961 c 23 s 51.16.130;
(94) RCW 51.16.140 (Premium liability of worker) and 1989 c 385 s
3, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 29, 1973 c 110 s 2, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 77, 1971
c 20 s 2, & 1961 c 23 s 51.16.140;
(95) RCW 51.16.150 (Delinquent employers -- Penalty after demand--Injunctive relief) and 1986 c 9 s 4, 1985 c 315 s 2, 1972 ex.s. c 43 s
15, & 1961 c 23 s 51.16.150;
(96) RCW 51.16.155 (Failure or refusal of employer to report or pay
premiums due -- Collection) and 1996 c 60 s 1, 1985 c 315 s 3, & 1971
ex.s. c 289 s 87;
(97) RCW 51.16.160 (Lien for payments due -- Priority -- Probate,
insolvency, etc) and 1985 c 315 s 4, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 78, & 1961 c 23
s 51.16.160;
(98) RCW 51.16.170 (Lien for premiums, assessments, contributions,
and penalties -- Priority -- In general -- Notice) and 1986 c 9 s 5 & 1961 c
23 s 51.16.170;
(99) RCW 51.16.180 (Property acquired by state on execution) and
1971 ex.s. c 289 s 79 & 1961 c 23 s 51.16.180;
(100) RCW 51.16.190 (Limitation on collection actions) and 1987 c
111 s 7, 1985 c 315 s 5, & 1977 ex.s. c 323 s 27;
(101) RCW 51.16.200 (Payment of tax by employer quitting business--Liability of successor) and 1995 c 160 s 1 & 1986 c 9 s 6;
(102) RCW 51.16.210 (Horse racing employment -- Premiums) and 1989 c
385 s 1;
(103) RCW 51.18.005 (Findings) and 1999 c 7 s 1;
(104) RCW 51.18.010 (Availability -- Rules -- Coverage period) and 1999
c 7 s 2;
(105) RCW 51.18.020 (Entrance criteria) and 1999 c 7 s 3;
(106) RCW 51.18.030 (Sponsoring entities -- New or existing
retrospective rating groups) and 1999 c 7 s 4;
(107) RCW 51.18.040 (Retrospective rating groups -- Industry and
business categories) and 1999 c 7 s 5;
(108) RCW 51.18.050 (Retrospective rating groups -- Probationary
status -- Denial of future enrollment) and 1999 c 7 s 6;
(109) RCW 51.18.060 (Retrospective rating groups -- Department
approval) and 1999 c 7 s 7;
(110) RCW 51.18.900 (Severability -- 1999 c 7) and 1999 c 7 s 10;
(111) RCW 51.24.020 (Action against employer for intentional
injury) and 1984 c 218 s 2, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 31, 1973 1st ex.s. c 154
s 94, & 1961 c 23 s 51.24.020;
(112) RCW 51.24.030 (Action against third person -- Election by
injured person or beneficiary -- Underinsured motorist insurance
coverage) and 1995 c 199 s 2, 1987 c 212 s 1701, 1986 c 58 s 1, 1984 c
218 s 3, & 1977 ex.s. c 85 s 1;
(113) RCW 51.24.035 (Immunity of design professional and employees)
and 1987 c 212 s 1801;
(114) RCW 51.24.040 (Election or recovery no bar to compensation or
benefits) and 1977 ex.s. c 85 s 2;
(115) RCW 51.24.050 (Assignment of cause of action -- Disposition of
recovered amount) and 1995 c 199 s 3, 1984 c 218 s 4, 1983 c 211 s 1,
& 1977 ex.s. c 85 s 3;
(116) RCW 51.24.060 (Distribution of amount recovered -- Lien) and
2001 c 146 s 9, 1995 c 199 s 4, 1993 c 496 s 2, 1987 c 442 s 1118, 1986
c 305 s 403, 1984 c 218 s 5, 1983 c 211 s 2, & 1977 ex.s. c 85 s 4;
(117) RCW 51.24.070 (Required election -- Procedures -- Right of
reelection) and 1984 c 218 s 6 & 1977 ex.s. c 85 s 5;
(118) RCW 51.24.080 (Notice of election or copy of complaint to
department or self-insurer -- Filing notice) and 1977 ex.s. c 85 s 6;
(119) RCW 51.24.090 (Compromise or settlement less than benefits)
and 1995 c 199 s 5, 1984 c 218 s 7, & 1977 ex.s. c 85 s 7;
(120) RCW 51.24.100 (Right to compensation not pleadable or
admissible -- Challenge to right to bring action) and 1977 ex.s. c 85 s
8;
(121) RCW 51.24.110 (Assigned cases -- Special assistant attorneys
general) and 1984 c 218 s 1;
(122) RCW 51.24.120 (Rules) and 1984 c 218 s 8;
(123) RCW 51.24.900 (Application -- 1977 ex.s. c 85) and 1977 ex.s.
c 85 s 9;
(124) RCW 51.24.902 (Application -- 1984 c 218) and 1984 c 218 s 9;
(125) RCW 51.28.010 (Notice of accident -- Notification of worker's
rights) and 2001 c 231 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 32, 1975 1st ex.s. c 224
s 4, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 5, & 1961 c 23 s 51.28.010;
(126) RCW 51.28.020 (Worker's application for compensation--Physician to aid in) and 2001 c 231 s 2, 1984 c 159 s 3, 1977 ex.s. c
350 s 33, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 38, & 1961 c 23 s 51.28.020;
(127) RCW 51.28.025 (Duty of employer to report injury or disease--Contents -- Penalty) and 1987 c 185 s 32, 1985 c 347 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s.
c 224 s 5, & 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 39;
(128) RCW 51.28.030 (Beneficiaries' application for compensation--Notification of rights) and 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 17, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 6,
& 1961 c 23 s 51.28.030;
(129) RCW 51.28.040 (Application for change in compensation) and
1977 ex.s. c 199 s 1 & 1961 c 23 s 51.28.040;
(130) RCW 51.28.050 (Time limitation for filing application or
enforcing claim for injury) and 1984 c 159 s 1 & 1961 c 23 s 51.28.050;
(131) RCW 51.28.055 (Time limitation for filing claim for
occupational disease -- Notice) and 1984 c 159 s 2, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s
34, & 1961 c 23 s 51.28.055;
(132) RCW 51.28.060 (Proof of dependency) and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 35
& 1961 c 23 s 51.28.060;
(133) RCW 51.28.070 (Claim files and records confidential) and 1990
c 209 s 2, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 36, 1975 1st ex.s. c 224 s 6, & 1961 c 23
s 51.28.070;
(134) RCW 51.28.080 (Determination of compensation for temporary
total disability -- Notification of employer) and 1985 c 338 s 2;
(135) RCW 51.28.090 (Notification of availability of basic health
plan) and 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 17;
(136) RCW 51.32.010 (Who entitled to compensation) and 1977 ex.s.
c 350 s 37, 1975 1st ex.s. c 224 s 7, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 40, & 1961 c
23 s 51.32.010;
(137) RCW 51.32.015 (Time and place of coverage -- Lunch period) and
1977 ex.s. c 350 s 38, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 41, & 1961 c 107 s 1;
(138) RCW 51.32.020 (Who not entitled to compensation) and 1995 c
160 s 2, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 39, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 42, & 1961 c 23 s
51.32.020;
(139) RCW 51.32.025 (Payments for children cease at age eighteen--Exceptions) and 1987 c 185 s 33 & 1975 1st ex.s. c 224 s 11;
(140) RCW 51.32.030 (When compensation payable to employer or
member of corporate employer) and 1980 c 14 s 8;
(141) RCW 51.32.040 (Protection of awards -- Payment after death--Time limitations for filing -- Confinement in institution) and 1999 c 185
s 1, 1996 c 47 s 1, 1995 c 160 s 3, 1987 c 75 s 7, & 1983 c 2 s 13;
(142) RCW 51.32.045 (Direct deposit of benefits) and 1982 c 109 s
11;
(143) RCW 51.32.050 (Death benefits) and 1995 c 199 s 6, 1993 c 521
s 1, 1991 c 88 s 2, 1988 c 161 s 2, 1986 c 58 s 3, 1982 c 63 s 18, 1977
ex.s. c 350 s 42, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 45 s 2, 1975 1st ex.s. c 179 s
1, 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 96, 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 19, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s
7, 1965 ex.s. c 122 s 1, 1961 c 274 s 1, & 1961 c 23 s 51.32.050;
(144) RCW 51.32.055 (Determination of permanent disabilities--Closure of claims by self-insurers) and 1997 c 416 s 1, 1994 c 97 s 1,
1988 c 161 s 13, 1986 c 55 s 1, 1981 c 326 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 43,
& 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 46;
(145) RCW 51.32.060 (Permanent total disability compensation--Personal attendant) and 1993 c 521 s 2 & 1988 c 161 s 1;
(146) RCW 51.32.067 (Permanent total disability -- Death benefit
options -- Election) and 1986 c 58 s 4;
(147) RCW 51.32.072 (Additional payments for prior pensioners--Children -- Remarriage -- Attendant) and 1987 c 185 s 34 & 1975 1st ex.s.
c 224 s 12;
(148) RCW 51.32.073 (Additional payments for prior pensioners--Premium liability of worker and employer for additional payments) and
1989 c 385 s 4 & 1980 c 14 s 9;
(149) RCW 51.32.075 (Adjustments in compensation or death benefits)
and 1988 c 161 s 7, 1983 c 203 s 1, 1982 1st ex.s. c 20 s 1, 1979 c 108
s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 202 s 2, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 286 s 2;
(150) RCW 51.32.080 (Permanent partial disability -- Specified--Unspecified, rules for classification -- Injury after permanent partial
disability) and 1993 c 520 s 1, 1988 c 161 s 6, 1986 c 58 s 2, 1982 1st
ex.s. c 20 s 2, 1979 c 104 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 46, 1972 ex.s. c 43
s 21, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 10, 1965 ex.s. c 165 s 1, 1961 c 274 s 3, &
1961 c 23 s 51.32.080;
(151) RCW 51.32.090 (Temporary total disability -- Partial
restoration of earning power -- Return to available work -- When employer
continues wages -- Limitations) and 1993 c 521 s 3, 1993 c 299 s 1, 1993
c 271 s 1, & 1988 c 161 s 4;
(152) RCW 51.32.095 (Vocational rehabilitation services -- Benefits--Priorities -- Allowable costs -- Performance criteria) and 1999 c 110 s 1;
(153) RCW 51.32.098 (Vocational rehabilitation services--Applicability) and 1985 c 339 s 4;
(154) RCW 51.32.100 (Preexisting disease) and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s
49, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 44, & 1961 c 23 s 51.32.100;
(155) RCW 51.32.110 (Medical examination -- Refusal to submit--Traveling expenses -- Pay for time lost) and 1997 c 325 s 3, 1993 c 375
s 1, & 1980 c 14 s 11;
(156) RCW 51.32.112 (Medical examination -- Standards and criteria--Special examinations by chiropractors--Compensation guidelines and
reporting criteria) and 1993 c 515 s 4 & 1988 c 114 s 2;
(157) RCW 51.32.114 (Medical examination -- Department to monitor
quality and objectivity) and 1988 c 114 s 3;
(158) RCW 51.32.120 (Further accident after lump sum payment) and
1977 ex.s. c 350 s 51 & 1961 c 23 s 51.32.120;
(159) RCW 51.32.130 (Lump sum for death or permanent total
disability) and 1961 c 23 s 51.32.130;
(160) RCW 51.32.135 (Closing of claim in pension cases -- Consent of
spouse) and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 52, 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 98, & 1961 c
23 s 51.32.135;
(161) RCW 51.32.140 (Nonresident alien beneficiary) and 1997 c 325
s 5, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 45, & 1961 c 23 s 51.32.140;
(162) RCW 51.32.150 (Lump sum to beneficiary outside state) and
1977 ex.s. c 323 s 18 & 1961 c 23 s 51.32.150;
(163) RCW 51.32.160 (Aggravation, diminution, or termination) and
1995 c 253 s 2, 1988 c 161 s 11, 1986 c 59 s 4, 1973 1st ex.s. c 192 s
1, & 1961 c 23 s 51.32.160;
(164) RCW 51.32.180 (Occupational diseases -- Limitation) and 1988 c
161 s 5, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 53, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 49, & 1961 c 23 s
51.32.180;
(165) RCW 51.32.185 (Occupational diseases -- Presumption of
occupational disease for fire fighters -- Limitations -- Exception -- Rules)
and 2002 c 337 s 2 & 1987 c 515 s 2;
(166) RCW 51.32.190 (Self-insurers -- Notice of denial of claim,
reasons -- Procedure -- Powers and duties of director) and 1996 c 58 s 2,
1982 1st ex.s. c 20 s 3, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 54, 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 25,
& 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 47;
(167) RCW 51.32.195 (Self-insurers -- Information to department) and
1987 c 290 s 1;
(168) RCW 51.32.200 (Self-insurers -- Enforcement of compensation
order against) and 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 48;
(169) RCW 51.32.210 (Claims of injured workers, prompt action--Payment -- Acceptance -- Effect) and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 55 & 1972 ex.s. c
43 s 26;
(170) RCW 51.32.215 (Payment of compensation after appeal--Enforcement of order -- Penalty) and 1995 c 276 s 1;
(171) RCW 51.32.220 (Reduction in total disability compensation--Limitations -- Notice -- Waiver) and 1982 c 63 s 19, 1979 ex.s. c 231 s 1,
1979 ex.s. c 151 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 323 s 19, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 286 s
3;
(172) RCW 51.32.225 (Reduction in total disability compensation--Offset for social security retirement benefits) and 1986 c 59 s 5;
(173) RCW 51.32.230 (Recovery of overpayments) and 1979 ex.s. c 151
s 2;
(174) RCW 51.32.240 (Erroneous, fraudulent payments -- Adjustment for
self-insurer's failure to pay benefits -- Penalty -- Appeal -- Enforcement of
orders) and 2001 c 146 s 10;
(175) RCW 51.32.250 (Payment of job modification costs) and 1988 c
161 s 10, 1983 c 70 s 3, & 1982 c 63 s 13;
(176) RCW 51.32.260 (Compensation for loss or damage to personal
effects) and 1983 c 111 s 1;
(177) RCW 51.32.300 (State employee vocational rehabilitation
coordinator) and 1990 c 204 s 5;
(178) RCW 51.32.350 (Chemically related illness -- Criteria and
procedures for claims -- Claims management) and 1994 c 265 s 1;
(179) RCW 51.32.360 (Chemically related illness -- Centers for
research and clinical assessment) and 1994 c 265 s 3;
(180) RCW 51.32.370 (Chemically related illness -- Research
projects -- Implementation plan -- Funding -- Deductions from employees' pay)
and 1994 c 265 s 4;
(181) RCW 51.36.010 (Extent and duration) and 1986 c 58 s 6, 1977
ex.s. c 350 s 56, 1975 1st ex.s. c 234 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 50, 1965
ex.s. c 166 s 2, & 1961 c 23 s 51.36.010;
(182) RCW 51.36.015 (Chiropractic care and evaluation) and 1994 c
94 s 1;
(183) RCW 51.36.020 (Transportation to treatment -- Artificial
substitutes and mechanical aids -- Modifications to residences or motor
vehicles) and 1999 c 395 s 1, 1982 c 63 s 12, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 57,
1975 1st ex.s. c 224 s 14, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 51, 1965 ex.s. c 166 s 3,
& 1961 c 23 s 51.36.020;
(184) RCW 51.36.030 (First aid) and 1980 c 14 s 12;
(185) RCW 51.36.040 (Time and place of coverage -- Lunch period) and
1977 ex.s. c 350 s 59 & 1961 c 107 s 2;
(186) RCW 51.36.050 (Rehabilitation center -- Contracts with self-insurers and others) and 1979 ex.s. c 42 s 1 & 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 52;
(187) RCW 51.36.060 (Duties of attending physician -- Medical
information) and 1991 c 89 s 3, 1989 c 12 s 17, 1975 1st ex.s. c 224 s
15, & 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 53;
(188) RCW 51.36.070 (Medical examination -- Reports -- Costs) and 2001
c 152 s 2, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 60, & 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 54;
(189) RCW 51.36.080 (Payment of fees and medical charges by
department -- Interest -- Cost-effective payment methods -- Audits) and 1998
c 245 s 104, 1993 c 159 s 2, 1987 c 470 s 1, 1985 c 368 s 2, 1985 c 338
s 1, & 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 55;
(190) RCW 51.36.085 (Payment of fees and medical charges by self-insurers -- Interest) and 1993 c 159 s 3 & 1987 c 316 s 4;
(191) RCW 51.36.090 (Review of billings -- Investigation of
unauthorized services) and 1985 c 337 s 3;
(192) RCW 51.36.100 (Audits of health care providers authorized)
and 1993 c 515 s 5 & 1986 c 200 s 1;
(193) RCW 51.36.110 (Audits of health care providers -- Powers of
department) and 1994 c 154 s 312, 1993 c 515 s 6, & 1986 c 200 s 2;
(194) RCW 51.36.120 (Confidential information) and 1989 c 189 s 2;
(195) RCW 51.36.130 (False, misleading, or deceptive advertising or
representations) and 1997 c 336 s 2;
(196) RCW 51.44.010 (Accident fund) and 1961 c 23 s 51.44.010;
(197) RCW 51.44.020 (Medical aid fund) and 1961 c 23 s 51.44.020;
(198) RCW 51.44.030 (Reserve fund) and 1961 c 23 s 51.44.030;
(199) RCW 51.44.033 (Supplemental pension fund) and 1975 1st ex.s.
c 224 s 16 & 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 18;
(200) RCW 51.44.040 (Second injury fund) and 1982 c 63 s 14, 1977
ex.s. c 323 s 21, 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 27, & 1961 c 23 s 51.44.040;
(201) RCW 51.44.050 (Catastrophe injury account) and 1961 c 23 s
51.44.050;
(202) RCW 51.44.060 (Charge to accident fund for the catastrophe
injury account) and 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 28 & 1961 c 23 s 51.44.060;
(203) RCW 51.44.070 (Transfer from accident fund, accounts to
reserve fund -- Annuity values -- Self-insurers -- Penalty for delay or
refusal of reimbursement) and 1992 c 124 s 1, 1989 c 190 s 1, 1983 c
312 s 1, 1981 c 325 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 56, 1961 c 274 s 5, & 1961
c 23 s 51.44.070;
(204) RCW 51.44.080 (Reserve fund -- Transfers from state fund--Surplus -- Deficiency) and 1989 c 190 s 2, 1988 c 161 s 8, 1972 ex.s. c
43 s 29, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 57, & 1961 c 23 s 51.44.080;
(205) RCW 51.44.090 (Reserve fund record and maintenance by state
treasurer) and 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 31 & 1961 c 23 s 51.44.090;
(206) RCW 51.44.100 (Investment of accident, medical aid, reserve,
supplemental pension funds) and 1990 c 80 s 1, 1981 c 3 s 41, 1973 1st
ex.s. c 103 s 6, 1972 ex.s. c 92 s 2, 1965 ex.s. c 41 s 1, 1961 c 281
s 10, & 1961 c 23 s 51.44.100;
(207) RCW 51.44.110 (Disbursements of funds) and 1977 ex.s. c 350
s 68, 1973 c 106 s 30, & 1961 c 23 s 51.44.110;
(208) RCW 51.44.120 (Liability of state treasurer) and 1961 c 23 s
51.44.120;
(209) RCW 51.44.140 (Self-insurer deposits into reserve fund--Accounts within fund -- Surpluses and deficits) and 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 30
& 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 58;
(210) RCW 51.44.150 (Assessments upon self-insurers for
administration costs) and 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 59;
(211) RCW 51.44.160 (Interfund loans between reserve and
supplemental pension funds -- Audit) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 224 s 17 & 1971
ex.s. c 289 s 60;
(212) RCW 51.44.170 (Industrial insurance premium refund account)
and 2002 c 371 s 916, 1997 c 327 s 1, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 29, & 1990 c
204 s 2;
(213) RCW 51.48.010 (Employer's liability for penalties, injury or
disease occurring before payment of compensation secured) and 1985 c
347 s 2, 1982 c 63 s 20, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 69, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 61,
& 1961 c 23 s 51.48.010;
(214) RCW 51.48.017 (Self-insurer delaying or refusing to pay
benefits) and 1985 c 347 s 3 & 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 66;
(215) RCW 51.48.020 (Employer's false reporting or failure to
secure payment of compensation -- False information by claimants) and
1997 c 324 s 1, 1995 c 160 s 4, 1987 c 221 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 323 s 22,
1971 ex.s. c 289 s 63, & 1961 c 23 s 51.48.020;
(216) RCW 51.48.025 (Retaliation by employer prohibited--Investigation -- Remedies) and 1985 c 347 s 8;
(217) RCW 51.48.030 (Failure to keep records and make reports) and
1986 c 9 s 8, 1985 c 347 s 4, 1982 c 63 s 21, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 64, &
1961 c 23 s 51.48.030;
(218) RCW 51.48.040 (Inspection of employer's records) and 1986 c
9 s 9, 1985 c 347 s 5, & 1961 c 23 s 51.48.040;
(219) RCW 51.48.050 (Liability for illegal collections for medical
aid) and 1980 c 14 s 13;
(220) RCW 51.48.060 (Physician -- Failure to report or comply) and
1985 c 347 s 6, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 71, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 20, & 1961 c
23 s 51.48.060;
(221) RCW 51.48.080 (Violation of rules) and 1985 c 347 s 7 & 1961
c 23 s 51.48.080;
(222) RCW 51.48.090 (Collection) and 1961 c 23 s 51.48.090;
(223) RCW 51.48.100 (Waiver -- Penalty-free periods) and 1985 c 227
s 1 & 1961 c 23 s 51.48.100;
(224) RCW 51.48.103 (Engaging in business without certificate of
coverage) and 1986 c 9 s 12;
(225) RCW 51.48.105 (Failure to apply for coverage of employees--Not applicable, when) and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 73 & 1972 ex.s. c 78 s 1;
(226) RCW 51.48.110 (Decedent having no beneficiaries -- Payment into
supplemental pension fund) and 1999 c 185 s 2, 1986 c 56 s 1, & 1971
ex.s. c 289 s 65;
(227) RCW 51.48.120 (Notice of assessment for default in payments
by employer -- Issuance -- Service -- Contents) and 1995 c 160 s 5, 1986 c 9
s 10, 1985 c 315 s 6, & 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 32;
(228) RCW 51.48.131 (Notice of assessment for default in payments
by employer -- Appeal) and 1989 c 175 s 120, 1987 c 316 s 3, & 1985 c 315
s 7;
(229) RCW 51.48.140 (Notice of assessment for employer's default in
payments -- When amount becomes final -- Warrant -- Execution -- Garnishment--Fees) and 2001 c 146 s 11, 1989 c 175 s 121, 1985 c 315 s 8, & 1972
ex.s. c 43 s 34;
(230) RCW 51.48.150 (Notice of assessment for employer's default in
payments -- Notice to withhold and deliver property due employer) and
1995 c 160 s 6, 1987 c 442 s 1119, 1986 c 9 s 11, & 1972 ex.s. c 43 s
35;
(231) RCW 51.48.160 (Revocation of certificate of coverage for
failure to pay warrants or taxes) and 1986 c 9 s 13;
(232) RCW 51.48.170 (Emergency assessment and collection of taxes)
and 1986 c 9 s 14;
(233) RCW 51.48.180 (Emergency assessment and collection of taxes--Distraint and sale of property) and 1986 c 9 s 15;
(234) RCW 51.48.190 (Emergency assessment and collection of taxes--Conduct of sale) and 1986 c 9 s 16;
(235) RCW 51.48.200 (Search and seizure of property to satisfy tax
warrant or assessment -- Issuance and execution of search warrant) and
1986 c 9 s 17;
(236) RCW 51.48.210 (Delinquent taxes) and 1987 c 111 s 8 & 1986 c
9 s 18;
(237) RCW 51.48.220 (Order of execution upon property -- Procedure--Sale) and 1986 c 9 s 21;
(238) RCW 51.48.230 (Order of execution upon property -- Enforcement)
and 1986 c 9 s 22;
(239) RCW 51.48.240 (Agents and employees of department not
personally liable -- Conditions) and 1986 c 9 s 23;
(240) RCW 51.48.250 (Liability of persons wilfully obtaining
erroneous payments -- Civil penalties) and 1986 c 200 s 4;
(241) RCW 51.48.260 (Liability of persons unintentionally obtaining
erroneous payments) and 1986 c 200 s 3;
(242) RCW 51.48.270 (Criminal liability of persons making false
statements or concealing information) and 1987 c 470 s 2 & 1986 c 200
s 5;
(243) RCW 51.48.280 (Kickbacks, bribes, and rebates -- Representation
fees -- Criminal liability -- Exceptions) and 1997 c 336 s 1 & 1986 c 200
s 6;
(244) RCW 51.48.290 (Written verification by health services
providers) and 1986 c 200 s 7;
(245) RCW 51.52.010 (Board of industrial insurance appeals) and
1999 c 149 s 1, 1981 c 338 s 10, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 74, 1975-'76 2nd
ex.s. c 34 s 151, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 68, 1965 ex.s. c 165 s 3, 1961 c
307 s 8, & 1961 c 23 s 51.52.010;
(246) RCW 51.52.020 (Board -- Rule-making power) and 1961 c 23 s
51.52.020;
(247) RCW 51.52.030 (Board -- Expenses) and 1961 c 23 s 51.52.030;
(248) RCW 51.52.040 (Board -- Removal of member) and 1961 c 23 s
51.52.040;
(249) RCW 51.52.050 (Service of departmental action -- Demand for
repayment -- Reconsideration or appeal) and 1987 c 151 s 1, 1986 c 200 s
10, 1985 c 315 s 9, 1982 c 109 s 4, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 75, 1975 1st
ex.s. c 58 s 1, & 1961 c 23 s 51.52.050;
(250) RCW 51.52.060 (Notice of appeal -- Time -- Cross-appeal--Departmental options) and 1995 c 253 s 1, 1995 c 199 s 7, 1986 c 200 s
11, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 76, 1975 1st ex.s. c 58 s 2, 1963 c 148 s 1,
1961 c 274 s 8, & 1961 c 23 s 51.52.060;
(251) RCW 51.52.070 (Contents of notice -- Transmittal of record) and
1977 ex.s. c 350 s 77, 1975 1st ex.s. c 224 s 18, 1975 1st ex.s. c 58
s 3, & 1961 c 23 s 51.52.070;
(252) RCW 51.52.080 (Appeal to board denied, when) and 1971 ex.s.
c 289 s 69, 1963 c 148 s 2, & 1961 c 23 s 51.52.080;
(253) RCW 51.52.090 (Appeal to board deemed granted, when) and 1971
ex.s. c 289 s 70 & 1961 c 23 s 51.52.090;
(254) RCW 51.52.095 (Conference for disposal of matters involved in
appeal -- Mediation of disputes) and 1986 c 10 s 1, 1985 c 209 s 2, 1982
c 109 s 7, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 78, 1963 c 148 s 3, 1963 c 6 s 1, & 1961
c 23 s 51.52.095;
(255) RCW 51.52.100 (Proceedings before board -- Contempt) and 1982
c 109 s 8, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 79, 1963 c 148 s 4, & 1961 c 23 s
51.52.100;
(256) RCW 51.52.102 (Hearing the appeal -- Dismissal -- Evidence--Continuances) and 1963 c 148 s 5 & 1961 c 23 s 51.52.102;
(257) RCW 51.52.104 (Industrial appeals judge -- Recommended decision
and order -- Petition for review -- Finality of order) and 1985 c 314 s 1,
1982 c 109 s 5, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 22, & 1963 c 148 s 6;
(258) RCW 51.52.106 (Review of decision and order) and 1982 c 109
s 9, 1975 1st ex.s. c 58 s 4, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 23, 1965 ex.s. c 165
s 4, 1963 c 148 s 7, & 1961 c 23 s 51.52.106;
(259) RCW 51.52.110 (Court appeal -- Taking the appeal) and 1988 c
202 s 49, 1982 c 109 s 6, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 80, & 1973 c 40 s 1;
(260) RCW 51.52.112 (Court appeal -- Payment of taxes, penalties, and
interest required) and 1986 c 9 s 19;
(261) RCW 51.52.113 (Collection of tax or penalty may not be
enjoined) and 1986 c 9 s 20;
(262) RCW 51.52.115 (Court appeal -- Procedure at trial -- Burden of
proof) and 1961 c 23 s 51.52.115;
(263) RCW 51.52.120 (Attorney's fee before department or board--Unlawful attorney's fees) and 1990 c 15 s 1, 1982 c 63 s 22, 1977 ex.s.
c 350 s 81, 1965 ex.s. c 63 s 1, & 1961 c 23 s 51.52.120;
(264) RCW 51.52.130 (Attorney and witness fees in court appeal) and
1993 c 122 s 1, 1982 c 63 s 23, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 82, & 1961 c 23 s
51.52.130;
(265) RCW 51.52.132 (Unlawful attorney's fees) and 1965 ex.s. c 63
s 2 & 1961 c 23 s 51.52.132;
(266) RCW 51.52.135 (Worker or beneficiary entitled to interest on
award -- Rate) and 1983 c 301 s 1;
(267) RCW 51.52.140 (Rules of practice -- Duties of attorney
general -- Supreme court appeal) and 1961 c 23 s 51.52.140;
(268) RCW 51.52.150 (Costs on appeals) and 1961 c 23 s 51.52.150;
(269) RCW 51.52.160 (Publication and indexing of significant
decisions) and 1985 c 209 s 1;
(270) RCW 51.52.200 (Exception -- Employers as parties to actions
relating to compensation or assistance for victims of crimes) and 1997
c 102 s 2;
(271) RCW 51.98.010 (Continuation of existing law) and 1961 c 23 s
51.98.010;
(272) RCW 51.98.020 (Title, chapter, section headings not part of
law) and 1961 c 23 s 51.98.020;
(273) RCW 51.98.030 (Invalidity of part of title not to affect
remainder) and 1961 c 23 s 51.98.030;
(274) RCW 51.98.050 (Emergency -- 1961 c 23) and 1961 c 23 s
51.98.050;
(275) RCW 51.98.060 (Effective dates -- 1971 ex.s. c 289) and 1971
ex.s. c 289 s 90;
(276) RCW 51.98.070 (Severability -- 1971 ex.s. c 289) and 1971 ex.s.
c 289 s 91; and
(277) RCW 51.98.080 (Severability -- 1972 ex.s. c 43) and 1972 ex.s.
c 43 s 38.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

--- END ---