BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that nonprofit youth
organizations provide a variety of services for the youth of Washington
state, including many services that enable young people, especially
those facing challenging and disadvantaged circumstances, to realize
their full potential as productive, responsible, and caring citizens.
The legislature also finds that the efficiency and quality of these
services may be enhanced by the provision of safe, reliable, and sound
facilities, and that, in certain cases, it may be appropriate for the
state to assist in the development of these facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and
prioritize projects whose primary objective is to assist nonprofit
youth organizations in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating
facilities used for the delivery of nonresidential services, excluding
outdoor athletic fields.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must establish a competitive process to prioritize applications for the
assistance as follows:
(a) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications from
local governments, nonprofit organizations, and other entities, as
determined by the department of community, trade, and economic
development. The department of community, trade, and economic
development must evaluate and rank applications in consultation with a
citizen advisory committee using objective criteria. Projects must
have a major recreational component, and must have either an
educational or social service component. At a minimum, applicants must
demonstrate that the requested assistance will increase the efficiency
or quality of the services it provides to youth. The evaluation and
ranking process must also include an examination of existing assets
that applicants may apply to projects. Grant assistance under this
section may not exceed twenty-five percent of the total cost of the
project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include
cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose
of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(b) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the governor
and the legislature in the department of community, trade, and economic
development's biennial capital budget request beginning with the 2005-2007 biennium and thereafter. The list must include a description of
each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and
documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The total
amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial project
list must not exceed two million dollars. The department of community,
trade, and economic development may provide an additional alternate
project list that must not exceed five hundred thousand dollars. The
department of community, trade, and economic development may not sign
contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section
until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects.
(c) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the
department of community, trade, and economic development must include
provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the
grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the
grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant.
If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the
contract, the grantee must repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

--- END ---