BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All group disability insurance contracts and blanket disability
insurance contracts, issued or renewed on or after the effective date
of this section, must provide benefits or coverage for colorectal
cancer examinations and laboratory tests specified in the November 2002
American cancer society guidelines for colorectal cancer screening of
asymptomatic individuals. Coverage or benefits must be provided for
all colorectal screening examinations and tests that are administered
at a frequency identified in the American cancer society guidelines for
colorectal cancer, as deemed appropriate by the patient's physician
after consultation with the patient.
(2) Benefits under this section must be provided to a covered
individual who is:
(a) At least fifty years old; or
(b) Less than fifty years old and at high risk for colorectal
cancer according to current colorectal cancer screening guidelines of
the American cancer society.
(3) To encourage colorectal cancer screenings, patients and health
care providers must not be required to meet burdensome criteria or
overcome significant obstacles to secure such coverage. An individual
may not be required to pay an additional deductible or coinsurance for
testing that is greater than an annual deductible or coinsurance
established for similar benefits. If the contract does not cover a
similar benefit, a deductible or coinsurance may not be set at a level
that materially diminishes the value of the colorectal cancer benefit
required.
(4) A health insurance issuer is not required under this section to
provide for a referral to a nonparticipating health care provider,
unless the issuer does not have an appropriate health care provider
that is available and accessible to administer the screening exam and
that is a participating health care provider with respect to such
treatment.
(5) If a health insurance issuer refers an individual to a
nonparticipating health care provider pursuant to this section,
services provided pursuant to the approved screening exam or resulting
treatment, if any, must be provided at no additional cost to the
individual beyond what the individual would otherwise pay for services
received by such a participating health care provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All health benefit plans offered by health care service
contractors, issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this
section, must provide benefits or coverage for colorectal cancer
examinations and laboratory tests specified in the November 2002
American cancer society guidelines for colorectal cancer screening of
asymptomatic individuals. Coverage or benefits must be provided for
all colorectal screening examinations and tests that are administered
at a frequency identified in the American cancer society guidelines for
colorectal cancer, as deemed appropriate by the patient's physician
after consultation with the patient.
(2) Benefits under this section must be provided to a covered
individual who is:
(a) At least fifty years old; or
(b) Less than fifty years old and at high risk for colorectal
cancer according to current colorectal cancer screening guidelines of
the American cancer society.
(3) To encourage colorectal cancer screenings, patients and health
care providers must not be required to meet burdensome criteria or
overcome significant obstacles to secure such coverage. An individual
may not be required to pay an additional deductible or coinsurance for
testing that is greater than an annual deductible or coinsurance
established for similar benefits. If the group contract or individual
contract does not cover a similar benefit, a deductible or coinsurance
may not be set at a level that materially diminishes the value of the
colorectal cancer benefit required.
(4) A carrier is not required under this section to provide for a
referral to a nonparticipating health care provider, unless the carrier
does not have an appropriate health care provider that is available and
accessible to administer the screening exam and that is a participating
health care provider with respect to such treatment.
(5) If a carrier refers an individual to a nonparticipating health
care provider pursuant to this section, services provided pursuant to
the approved screening exam or resulting treatment, if any, must be
provided at no additional cost to the individual beyond what the
individual would otherwise pay for services received by such a
participating health care provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All health benefit plans offered by health maintenance
organizations, issued on or after the effective date of this section,
must provide benefits or coverage for colorectal cancer examinations
and laboratory tests specified in the November 2002 American cancer
society guidelines for colorectal cancer screening of asymptomatic
individuals. Coverage or benefits must be provided for all colorectal
screening examinations and tests that are administered at a frequency
identified in the American cancer society guidelines for colorectal
cancer, as deemed appropriate by the patient's physician after
consultation with the patient.
(2) Benefits under this section must be provided to a covered
individual who is:
(a) At least fifty years old; or
(b) Less than fifty years old and at high risk for colorectal
cancer according to current colorectal cancer screening guidelines of
the American cancer society.
(3) To encourage colorectal cancer screenings, consumers and health
maintenance organizations must not be required to meet burdensome
criteria or overcome significant obstacles to secure such coverage. A
consumer may not be required to pay an additional deductible or
coinsurance for testing that is greater than an annual deductible or
coinsurance established for similar benefits. If the health
maintenance agreement does not cover a similar benefit, a deductible or
coinsurance may not be set at a level that materially diminishes the
value of the colorectal cancer benefit required.
(4) A health maintenance organization is not required under this
section to provide for a referral to a nonparticipating health care
provider, unless the health maintenance organization does not have an
appropriate health care provider that is available and accessible to
administer the screening exam and that is a participating health care
provider with respect to such treatment.
(5) If a health maintenance organization refers a consumer to a
nonparticipating health care provider pursuant to this section,
services provided pursuant to the approved screening exam or resulting
treatment, if any, must be provided at no additional cost to the
consumer beyond what the consumer would otherwise pay for services
received by a health maintenance organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---