BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature affirms its support for:
Improving field-level cross-program collaboration and efficiency;
collecting reliable mental health cost, service, and outcome data
specific to children; revising the early periodic screening diagnosis
and treatment plan to reflect the current mental health system
structure; and identifying and promulgating the approaches used in
school districts where mental health and education systems coordinate
services and resources to provide public mental health care for
children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature supports recommendations
made in the study of the public mental health system for children
conducted by the joint legislative audit and review committee. The
legislature expects the department of social and health services and
the office of the superintendent of public instruction to work
diligently within available funds to implement these recommendations,
which include the following:
(1) The department shall identify cross-agency business operation
issues that limit the agency's ability to meet statutory intent to
coordinate existing categorical children's mental health programs and
funding;
(2) The department shall collect reliable mental health cost,
service, and outcome data specific to children. This information must
be used to identify best practices and costs of services;
(3) The department shall revise the early periodic screening
diagnosis and treatment plan to reflect current mental health system
structure;
(4) The department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall jointly identify school districts where mental health
and education systems coordinate services and resources to provide
public mental health care for children. These agencies shall work
together to share information about these approaches with other school
districts, regional support networks, and state agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In addition to any follow-up requirements
prescribed by the joint legislative audit and review committee, the
department of social and health services shall submit a report to the
legislature on the status of the implementation of the recommendations
provided in section 2 (1) through (3) of this act, which are due to be
implemented by January 2004. An electronic implementation status
report must be submitted to appropriate policy and fiscal committees of
the legislature by June 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 71.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall collect and
analyze mental health cost, service, and outcome data specific to
children. The information produced by the analysis of this data shall
be used to promote a consistent, efficient, and effective statewide
public mental health system for children.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.36.020 and 1991 c 326 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) The office of financial management shall provide the
following information to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on or before December 1, 1991, and update such information biennially
thereafter:
(a) An inventory of state and federally funded programs providing
mental health services to children in Washington state. For purposes
of the inventory, "children's mental health services" shall be broadly
construed to include services related to children's mental health
provided through education, children and family services, juvenile
justice, mental health, health care, alcohol and substance abuse, and
developmental disabilities programs, such as: The primary intervention
program; treatment foster care; the fair start program; therapeutic
child care and day treatment for children in the child protective
services system, as provided in RCW 74.14B.040; family reconciliation
services counseling, as provided in chapter 13.32A RCW; the community
mental health services act, as provided in chapter 71.24 RCW; mental
health services for minors, as provided in chapter 71.34 RCW; mental
health services provided by the medical assistance program, limited
casualty program for the medically needy and children's health program,
as provided in chapter 74.09 RCW; counseling for delinquent children,
as provided in RCW 72.05.170; mental health service provided by child
welfare services, as provided in chapter 74.13 RCW; and services to
emotionally disturbed and mentally ill children, as provided in chapter
74.14A RCW.
(b) For each program or service inventoried pursuant to (a) of this
subsection:
(i) Statutory authority;
(ii) Level and source of funding statewide and for each county and
school district in the state during the biennium ending June 30, 1991,
to the extent such information is available;
(iii) Agency administering the service statewide and description of
how administration and service delivery are organized and provided at
the regional and local level;
(iv) Programmatic or financial eligibility criteria;
(v) Characteristics of, and number of children served statewide and
in each county and school district during the biennium ending June 30,
1991, to the extent such information is available;
(vi) Number of children of color served, by race and nationality,
and number and type of minority mental health providers, by race and
nationality, in each regional support network area, to the extent such
information is available; and
(vii) Statutory changes necessary to remove categorical
restrictions in the program or service, including federal statutory or
regulatory changes.
(2))) The department of social and health services, in consultation
with the office of financial management, ((in consultation with the
department,)) shall develop a plan and criteria for the use of early
periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment services related to mental
health that includes at least the following components:
(((a))) (1) Criteria for screening and assessment of mental illness
and emotional disturbance;
(((b))) (2) Criteria for determining the appropriate level of
medically necessary services a child receives, including but not
limited to development of a multidisciplinary plan of care when
appropriate, and prior authorization for receipt of mental health
services;
(((c))) (3) Qualifications for children's mental health providers;
(((d))) (4) Other cost control mechanisms, such as managed care
arrangements and prospective or capitated payments for mental health
services; and
(((e))) (5) Mechanisms to ensure that federal medicaid matching
funds are obtained for services ((inventoried pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section)), to the greatest extent practicable.
In developing the plan, the ((office of financial management))
department of social and health services shall provide an opportunity
for comment by the major child-serving systems and regional support
networks. The plan shall be submitted to appropriate committees of the
legislature on or before December 1, ((1991)) 2003.

--- END ---