BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.225 RCW
to read as follows:
A person licensed under this chapter shall not disclose the written
acknowledgment of the disclosure statement pursuant to RCW 18.225.100,
nor any information acquired from persons consulting the individual in
a professional capacity when the information was necessary to enable
the individual to render professional services to those persons except:
(1) With the written authorization of that person or, in the case
of death or disability, the person's personal representative;
(2) If the person waives the privilege by bringing charges against
the person licensed under this chapter;
(3) In response to a subpoena from the secretary. The secretary
may subpoena only records related to a complaint or report under RCW
18.130.050;
(4) As required under chapter 26.44 or 74.34 RCW or RCW 71.05.250;
or
(5) To any individual if the person licensed under this chapter
reasonably believes that disclosure will avoid or minimize an imminent
danger to the health or safety of the individual or any other
individual; however, there is no obligation on the part of the provider
to so disclose.

--- END ---