BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS. The legislature finds that the
implementation of a single easy to use telephone number, 211, for
public access to information and referral for health and human services
and information about access to services after a natural or nonnatural
disaster will benefit the citizens of the state of Washington by
providing easier access to available health and human services, by
reducing inefficiencies in connecting people with the desired service
providers, and by reducing duplication of efforts. The legislature
further finds in a time of reduced resources for providing health and
human services that establishing a cost-effective means to continue to
provide information to the public about available services is
important. The legislature further finds that an integrated statewide
system of local information and referral service providers will build
upon an already existing network of experienced service providers
without the necessity of creating a new agency, department, or system
to provide 211 services. The legislature further finds that no funds
should be appropriated by the legislature to a 211 system under this
act without receiving documentation that a 211 system will provide
savings to the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 211 SYSTEM. 211 is created as the official
state dialing code for public access to information and referral for
health and human services and information about access to services
after a natural or nonnatural disaster.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(2) "WIN 211" means the Washington information network 211, a
501(c)(3) corporation incorporated in the state of Washington.
(3) "Approved 211 service provider" means a public or nonprofit
agency or organization designated by WIN 211 to provide 211 services.
(4) "211 service area" means an area of the state of Washington
identified by WIN 211 as an area in which an approved 211 service
provider will provide 211 services.
(5) "211" means the abbreviated dialing code assigned by the
federal communications commission on July 21, 2000, for consumer access
to community information and referral services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 NEW INFORMATION SERVICES. Before a state
agency or department that provides health and human services
establishes a new public information telephone line or hotline, the
state agency or department shall consult with WIN 211 about using the
211 system to provide public access to the information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 211 SERVICES. Only a service provider
approved by WIN 211 may provide 211 telephone services. WIN 211 shall
approve 211 service providers, after considering the following:
(1) The ability of the proposed 211 service provider to meet the
national 211 standards recommended by the alliance of information and
referral systems and adopted by the national 211 collaborative on May
5, 2000;
(2) The financial stability and health of the proposed 211 service
provider;
(3) The community support for the proposed 211 service provider;
(4) The relationships with other information and referral services;
and
(5) Such other criteria as WIN 211 deems appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 211 ACCOUNT. The 211 account is created in
the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. The 211 account shall include any funding for this
purpose appropriated by the legislature, private contributions, and all
other sources. Expenditures from the 211 account shall be used only
for the implementation and support of the 211 system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 USE OF MONEYS FOR PROJECTS AND ACTIVITIES IN
SUPPORT OF 211--ELIGIBLE ACTIVITIES. (1) WIN 211 shall study, design,
implement, and support a statewide 211 system.
(2) Activities eligible for assistance from the 211 account
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Creating a structure for a statewide 211 resources data base
that will meet the alliance for information and referral systems
standards for information and referral systems data bases and that will
be integrated with local resources data bases maintained by approved
211 service providers;
(b) Developing a statewide resources data base for the 211 system;
(c) Maintaining public information available from state agencies,
departments, and programs that provide health and human services for
access by 211 service providers;
(d) Providing grants to approved 211 service providers for the
design, development, and implementation of 211 for its 211 service
area;
(e) Providing grants to approved 211 service providers to enable
211 service providers to provide 211 service on an ongoing basis; and
(f) Providing grants to approved 211 service providers to enable
the provision of 211 services on a twenty-four-hour per day seven-day
a week basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 REPORTING. WIN 211 shall provide an annual
report to the legislature and the department beginning July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
chapter are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---