BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Public bodies may use a job order contract for public works
projects when:
(a) A public body has made a determination that the use of job
order contracts will benefit the public by providing an effective means
of reducing the total lead-time and cost for public works projects or
repair required at public facilities through the use of unit price
books and work orders by eliminating time-consuming, costly aspects of
the traditional public works process, which require separate
contracting actions for each small project;
(b) The work order to be issued for a particular project does not
exceed two hundred thousand dollars;
(c) Less than twenty percent of the dollar value of the work order
consists of items of work not contained in the unit price book; and
(d) At least eighty percent of the job order contract must be
subcontracted to entities other than the job order contractor.
(2) Public bodies shall award job order contracts through a
competitive process utilizing public requests for proposals. Public
bodies shall make an effort to solicit proposals from a certified
minority or certified woman-owned contractor to the extent permitted by
the Washington state civil rights act, RCW 49.60.400. The public body
shall publish, at least once in a legal newspaper of general
circulation published in or as near as possible to that part of the
county in which the public works will be done, a request for proposals
for job order contracts and the availability and location of the
request for proposal documents. The public body shall ensure that the
request for proposal documents at a minimum includes:
(a) A detailed description of the scope of the job order contract
including performance, technical requirements and specifications,
functional and operational elements, minimum and maximum work order
amounts, duration of the contract, and options to extend the job order
contract;
(b) The reasons for using job order contracts;
(c) A description of the qualifications required of the proposer;
(d) The identity of the specific unit price book to be used;
(e) The minimum contracted amount committed to the selected job
order contractor;
(f) A description of the process the public body will use to
evaluate qualifications and proposals, including evaluation factors and
the relative weight of factors. The public body shall ensure that
evaluation factors include, but are not limited to, proposal price and
the ability of the proposer to perform the job order contract. In
evaluating the ability of the proposer to perform the job order
contract, the public body may consider: The ability of the
professional personnel who will work on the job order contract; past
performance on similar contracts; ability to meet time and budget
requirements; ability to provide a performance and payment bond for the
job order contract; recent, current, and projected work loads of the
proposer; location; and the concept of the proposal;
(g) The form of the contract to be awarded;
(h) The method for pricing renewals of or extensions to the job
order contract;
(i) A notice that the proposals are subject to the provisions of
RCW 39.10.100; and
(j) Other information relevant to the project.
(3) A public body shall establish a committee to evaluate the
proposals. After the committee has selected the most qualified
finalists, the finalists shall submit final proposals, including sealed
bids based upon the identified unit price book. Such bids may be in
the form of coefficient markups from listed price book costs. The
public body shall award the contract to the firm submitting the highest
scored final proposal using the evaluation factors and the relative
weight of factors published in the public request for proposals.
(4) The public body shall provide a protest period of at least ten
business days following the day of the announcement of the apparent
successful proposal to allow a protester to file a detailed statement
of the grounds of the protest. The public body shall promptly make a
determination on the merits of the protest and provide to all proposers
a written decision of denial or acceptance of the protest. The public
body shall not execute the contract until two business days following
the public body's decision on the protest.
(5) The public body shall issue no work orders until it has
approved, in consultation with the office of minority and women's
business enterprises or the equivalent local agency, a plan prepared by
the job order contractor that equitably spreads certified women and
minority business enterprise subcontracting opportunities, to the
extent permitted by the Washington state civil rights act, RCW
49.60.400, among the various subcontract disciplines.
(6) Job order contracts may be executed for an initial contract
term of not to exceed two years, with the option of extending or
renewing the job order contract for one year. All extensions or
renewals must be priced as provided in the request for proposals. The
extension or renewal must be mutually agreed to by the public body and
the job order contractor.
(7) The maximum total dollar amount that may be awarded under a job
order contract shall not exceed three million dollars in the first year
of the job order contract, five million dollars over the first two
years of the job order contract, and, if extended or renewed, eight
million dollars over the three years of the job order contract.
(8) For each job order contract, public bodies shall not issue more
than two work orders equal to or greater than one hundred fifty
thousand dollars in a twelve-month contract performance period.
(9) All work orders issued for the same project shall be treated as
a single work order for purposes of the one hundred fifty thousand
dollar limit on work orders in subsection (8) of this section and the
two hundred thousand dollar limit on work orders in subsection (1)(b)
of this section.
(10) Any new permanent, enclosed building space constructed under
a work order shall not exceed two thousand gross square feet.
(11) Each public body may have no more than two job order contracts
in effect at any one time.
(12) For purposes of chapters 39.08, 39.76, and 60.28 RCW, each
work order issued shall be treated as a separate contract.
(13) The requirements of RCW 39.30.060 do not apply to requests for
proposals for job order contracts.
(14) Job order contractors shall pay prevailing wages for all work
that would otherwise be subject to the requirements of chapter 39.12
RCW. Prevailing wages for a job order contract most be determined as
of the time of the execution of the job order contract and any
extension or renewal.
(15) If, in the initial contract term, the public body, at no fault
of the job order contractor, fails to issue the minimum amount of work
orders stated in the public request for proposals, the public body
shall pay the contractor an amount equal to the difference between the
minimum work order amount and the actual total of the work orders
issued multiplied by an appropriate percentage for overhead and profit
contained in the general conditions for Washington state facility
construction. This will be the contractor's sole remedy.
(16) All job order contracts awarded under this section must be
executed before July 1, 2007, however the job order contract may be
extended or renewed as provided for in this section.
(17) For purposes of this section, "public body" includes any
school district.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.10.020 and 2001 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Alternative public works contracting procedure" means the
design-build and the general contractor/construction manager
contracting procedures authorized in RCW 39.10.051 and 39.10.061,
respectively.
(2) "Public body" means the state department of general
administration; the University of Washington; Washington State
University; every city with a population greater than seventy thousand
and any public authority chartered by such city under RCW 35.21.730
through 35.21.755 and specifically authorized as provided in RCW
39.10.120(4); every county with a population greater than four hundred
fifty thousand; every port district with total revenues greater than
fifteen million dollars per year; every public utility district with
revenues from energy sales greater than twenty-three million dollars
per year; and those school districts proposing projects that are
considered and approved by the school district project review board
under RCW 39.10.115.
(3) "Public works project" means any work for a public body within
the definition of the term public work in RCW 39.04.010.
(4) "Job order contract" means a contract between a public body or
any school district and a registered or licensed contractor in which
the contractor agrees to a fixed period, indefinite quantity delivery
order contract which provides for the use of negotiated, definitive
work orders for public works as defined in RCW 39.04.010.
(5) "Job order contractor" means a registered or licensed
contractor awarded a job order contract.
(6) "Unit price book" means a book containing specific prices,
based on generally accepted industry standards and information, where
available, for various items of work to be performed by the job order
contractor. The prices may include: All the costs of materials;
labor; equipment; overhead, including bonding costs; and profit for
performing the items of work.
(7) "Work order" means an order issued for a definite scope of work
to be performed pursuant to a job order contract.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.08.030 and 1989 c 58 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The bond mentioned in RCW 39.08.010 shall be in an amount equal
to the full contract price agreed to be paid for such work or
improvement, except under subsection (2) of this section, and shall be
to the state of Washington, except as otherwise provided in RCW
39.08.100, and except in cases of cities and towns, in which cases such
municipalities may by general ordinance fix and determine the amount of
such bond and to whom such bond shall run: PROVIDED, The same shall
not be for a less amount than twenty-five percent of the contract price
of any such improvement, and may designate that the same shall be
payable to such city, and not to the state of Washington, and all such
persons mentioned in RCW 39.08.010 shall have a right of action in his,
her, or their own name or names on such bond for work done by such
laborers or mechanics, and for materials furnished or provisions and
goods supplied and furnished in the prosecution of such work, or the
making of such improvements: PROVIDED, That such persons shall not
have any right of action on such bond for any sum whatever, unless
within thirty days from and after the completion of the contract with
an acceptance of the work by the affirmative action of the board,
council, commission, trustees, officer, or body acting for the state,
county or municipality, or other public body, city, town or district,
the laborer, mechanic or subcontractor, or materialman, or person
claiming to have supplied materials, provisions or goods for the
prosecution of such work, or the making of such improvement, shall
present to and file with such board, council, commission, trustees or
body acting for the state, county or municipality, or other public
body, city, town or district, a notice in writing in substance as
follows:

Such notice shall be signed by the person or corporation making the
claim or giving the notice, and said notice, after being presented and
filed, shall be a public record open to inspection by any person, and
in any suit or action brought against such surety or sureties by any
such person or corporation to recover for any of the items hereinbefore
specified, the claimant shall be entitled to recover in addition to all
other costs, attorney's fees in such sum as the court shall adjudge
reasonable: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no attorney's fees shall be
allowed in any suit or action brought or instituted before the
expiration of thirty days following the date of filing of the notice
hereinbefore mentioned: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any city may avail
itself of the provisions of RCW 39.08.010 through 39.08.030,
notwithstanding any charter provisions in conflict herewith: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That any city or town may impose any other or further
conditions and obligations in such bond as may be deemed necessary for
its proper protection in the fulfillment of the terms of the contract
secured thereby, and not in conflict herewith.
(2) Under the job order contracting procedure described in section
1 of this act, bonds will be in an amount not less than the dollar
value of all open work orders.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.30.060 and 2002 c 163 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every invitation to bid on a prime contract that is expected to
cost one million dollars or more for the construction, alteration, or
repair of any public building or public work of the state or a state
agency or municipality as defined under RCW 39.04.010 or an institution
of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016 shall require each
prime contract bidder to submit as part of the bid, or within one hour
after the published bid submittal time, the names of the subcontractors
with whom the bidder, if awarded the contract, will subcontract for
performance of the work of: HVAC (heating, ventilation, and air
conditioning); plumbing as described in chapter 18.106 RCW; and
electrical as described in chapter 19.28 RCW, or to name itself for the
work. The prime contract bidder shall not list more than one
subcontractor for each category of work identified, unless
subcontractors vary with bid alternates, in which case the prime
contract bidder must indicate which subcontractor will be used for
which alternate. Failure of the prime contract bidder to submit as
part of the bid the names of such subcontractors or to name itself to
perform such work or the naming of two or more subcontractors to
perform the same work shall render the prime contract bidder's bid
nonresponsive and, therefore, void.
(2) Substitution of a listed subcontractor in furtherance of bid
shopping or bid peddling before or after the award of the prime
contract is prohibited and the originally listed subcontractor is
entitled to recover monetary damages from the prime contract bidder who
executed a contract with the public entity and the substituted
subcontractor but not from the public entity inviting the bid. It is
the original subcontractor's burden to prove by a preponderance of the
evidence that bid shopping or bid peddling occurred. Substitution of
a listed subcontractor may be made by the prime contractor for the
following reasons:
(a) Refusal of the listed subcontractor to sign a contract with the
prime contractor;
(b) Bankruptcy or insolvency of the listed subcontractor;
(c) Inability of the listed subcontractor to perform the
requirements of the proposed contract or the project;
(d) Inability of the listed subcontractor to obtain the necessary
license, bonding, insurance, or other statutory requirements to perform
the work detailed in the contract; or
(e) The listed subcontractor is barred from participating in the
project as a result of a court order or summary judgment.
(3) The requirement of this section to name the prime contract
bidder's proposed HVAC, plumbing, and electrical subcontractors applies
only to proposed HVAC, plumbing, and electrical subcontractors who will
contract directly with the prime contract bidder submitting the bid to
the public entity.
(4) This section does not apply to job order contract requests for
proposals under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Job order contracts under section 1 of this act must pay prevailing
wages for all work that would otherwise be subject to the requirements
of this chapter. Prevailing wages for a job order contract must be
determined as of the time the job order contract and any extension or
renewal is executed.

Sec. 6 RCW 60.28.011 and 2000 c 185 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Public improvement contracts shall provide, and public bodies
shall reserve, a contract retainage not to exceed five percent of the
moneys earned by the contractor as a trust fund for the protection and
payment of: (a) The claims of any person arising under the contract;
and (b) the state with respect to taxes imposed pursuant to Title 82
RCW which may be due from such contractor.
(2) Every person performing labor or furnishing supplies toward the
completion of a public improvement contract shall have a lien upon
moneys reserved by a public body under the provisions of a public
improvement contract. However, the notice of the lien of the claimant
shall be given within forty-five days of completion of the contract
work, and in the manner provided in RCW 39.08.030.
(3) The contractor at any time may request the contract retainage
be reduced to one hundred percent of the value of the work remaining on
the project.
(a) After completion of all contract work other than landscaping,
the contractor may request that the public body release and pay in full
the amounts retained during the performance of the contract, and sixty
days thereafter the public body must release and pay in full the
amounts retained (other than continuing retention of five percent of
the moneys earned for landscaping) subject to the provisions of
chapters 39.12 and 60.28 RCW.
(b) Sixty days after completion of all contract work the public
body must release and pay in full the amounts retained during the
performance of the contract subject to the provisions of chapters 39.12
and 60.28 RCW.
(4) The moneys reserved by a public body under the provisions of a
public improvement contract, at the option of the contractor, shall be:
(a) Retained in a fund by the public body;
(b) Deposited by the public body in an interest bearing account in
a bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan association. Interest
on moneys reserved by a public body under the provision of a public
improvement contract shall be paid to the contractor;
(c) Placed in escrow with a bank or trust company by the public
body. When the moneys reserved are placed in escrow, the public body
shall issue a check representing the sum of the moneys reserved payable
to the bank or trust company and the contractor jointly. This check
shall be converted into bonds and securities chosen by the contractor
and approved by the public body and the bonds and securities shall be
held in escrow. Interest on the bonds and securities shall be paid to
the contractor as the interest accrues.
(5) The contractor or subcontractor may withhold payment of not
more than five percent from the moneys earned by any subcontractor or
sub-subcontractor or supplier contracted with by the contractor to
provide labor, materials, or equipment to the public project. Whenever
the contractor or subcontractor reserves funds earned by a
subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier, the contractor or
subcontractor shall pay interest to the subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier at a rate equal to that received by the
contractor or subcontractor from reserved funds.
(6) A contractor may submit a bond for all or any portion of the
contract retainage in a form acceptable to the public body and from a
bonding company meeting standards established by the public body. The
public body shall accept a bond meeting these requirements unless the
public body can demonstrate good cause for refusing to accept it. This
bond and any proceeds therefrom are subject to all claims and liens and
in the same manner and priority as set forth for retained percentages
in this chapter. The public body shall release the bonded portion of
the retained funds to the contractor within thirty days of accepting
the bond from the contractor. Whenever a public body accepts a bond in
lieu of retained funds from a contractor, the contractor shall accept
like bonds from any subcontractors or suppliers from which the
contractor has retained funds. The contractor shall then release the
funds retained from the subcontractor or supplier to the subcontractor
or supplier within thirty days of accepting the bond from the
subcontractor or supplier.
(7) If the public body administering a contract, after a
substantial portion of the work has been completed, finds that an
unreasonable delay will occur in the completion of the remaining
portion of the contract for any reason not the result of a breach
thereof, it may, if the contractor agrees, delete from the contract the
remaining work and accept as final the improvement at the stage of
completion then attained and make payment in proportion to the amount
of the work accomplished and in this case any amounts retained and
accumulated under this section shall be held for a period of sixty days
following the completion. In the event that the work is terminated
before final completion as provided in this section, the public body
may thereafter enter into a new contract with the same contractor to
perform the remaining work or improvement for an amount equal to or
less than the cost of the remaining work as was provided for in the
original contract without advertisement or bid. The provisions of this
chapter are exclusive and shall supersede all provisions and
regulations in conflict herewith.
(8) Whenever the department of transportation has contracted for
the construction of two or more ferry vessels, sixty days after
completion of all contract work on each ferry vessel, the department
must release and pay in full the amounts retained in connection with
the construction of the vessel subject to the provisions of RCW
60.28.020 and chapter 39.12 RCW. However, the department of
transportation may at its discretion condition the release of funds
retained in connection with the completed ferry upon the contractor
delivering a good and sufficient bond with two or more sureties, or
with a surety company, in the amount of the retained funds to be
released to the contractor, conditioned that no taxes shall be
certified or claims filed for work on the ferry after a period of sixty
days following completion of the ferry; and if taxes are certified or
claims filed, recovery may be had on the bond by the department of
revenue and the materialmen and laborers filing claims.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
reservation by a public body for any purpose from the moneys earned by
a contractor by fulfilling its responsibilities under public
improvement contracts is prohibited.
(10) Contracts on projects funded in whole or in part by farmers
home administration and subject to farmers home administration
regulations are not subject to subsections (1) through (9) of this
section.
(11) This subsection applies only to a public body that has
contracted for the construction of a facility using the general
contractor/construction manager procedure, as defined under RCW
((39.10.060)) 39.10.061. If the work performed by a subcontractor on
the project has been completed within the first half of the time
provided in the general contractor/construction manager contract for
completing the work, the public body may accept the completion of the
subcontract. The public body must give public notice of this
acceptance. After a forty-five day period for giving notice of liens,
and compliance with the retainage release procedures in RCW 60.28.021,
the public body may release that portion of the retained funds
associated with the subcontract. Claims against the retained funds
after the forty-five day period are not valid.
(12) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Contract retainage" means an amount reserved by a public body
from the moneys earned by a person under a public improvement contract.
(b) "Person" means a person or persons, mechanic, subcontractor, or
materialperson who performs labor or provides materials for a public
improvement contract, and any other person who supplies the person with
provisions or supplies for the carrying on of a public improvement
contract.
(c) "Public body" means the state, or a county, city, town,
district, board, or other public body.
(d) "Public improvement contract" means a contract for public
improvements or work, other than for professional services, or a work
order as defined in section 1 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.10.902 and 2002 c 46 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2007:
(1) RCW 39.10.010 and 1994 c 132 s 1;
(2) RCW 39.10.020 and 2003 c ... s 2 (section 2 of this act), 2001
c 328 s 1, 2000 c 209 s 1, 1997 c 376 s 1, & 1994 c 132 s 2;
(3) RCW 39.10.030 and 1997 c 376 s 2 & 1994 c 132 s 3;
(4) RCW 39.10.040 and 1994 c 132 s 4;
(5) RCW 39.10.051 and 2002 c 46 s 1 & 2001 c 328 s 2;
(6) RCW 39.10.061 and 2002 c 46 s 2 & 2001 c 328 s 3;
(7) RCW 39.10.065 and 1997 c 376 s 5;
(8) RCW 39.10.067 and 2002 c 46 s 3 & 2000 c 209 s 3;
(9) RCW 39.10.070 and 1994 c 132 s 7;
(10) RCW 39.10.080 and 1994 c 132 s 8;
(11) RCW 39.10.090 and 1994 c 132 s 9;
(12) RCW 39.10.100 and 1994 c 132 s 10;
(13) RCW 39.10.115 and 2001 c 328 s 4 & 2000 c 209 s 4;
(14) RCW 39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13; ((and))
(15) RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14; and
(16) RCW 39.10.-- and 2003 c ... s 1 (section 1 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2007:
RCW 39.12.-- and 2003 c . . . s 5 (section 5 of this act).

--- END ---