BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.88.110 and 1997 c 96 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section sets forth the expenditure programs and the allotment
and reserve procedures to be followed by the executive branch for
public funds.
(1) Allotments of an appropriation for any fiscal period shall
conform to the terms, limits, or conditions of the appropriation.
(2) The director of financial management shall provide all agencies
with a complete set of operating and capital instructions for preparing
a statement of proposed expenditures at least thirty days before the
beginning of a fiscal period. The set of instructions need not include
specific appropriation amounts for the agency.
(3) Within forty-five days after the beginning of the fiscal period
or within forty-five days after the governor signs the omnibus biennial
appropriations act, whichever is later, all agencies shall submit to
the governor a statement of proposed expenditures at such times and in
such form as may be required by the governor.
(4) The office of financial management shall develop a method for
monitoring capital appropriations and expenditures that will capture at
least the following elements:
(a) Appropriations made for capital projects including
transportation projects;
(b) Estimates of total project costs including past, current,
ensuing, and future biennial costs;
(c) Comparisons of actual costs to estimated costs;
(d) Comparisons of estimated construction start and completion
dates with actual dates;
(e) Documentation of fund shifts between projects.
This data may be incorporated into the existing accounting system
or into a separate project management system, as deemed appropriate by
the office of financial management. The office of financial management
must make an annual report of significant cost overruns or underruns to
the legislative fiscal committees as required by RCW 43.88.145 and
43.88.160.
(5) The office of financial management shall publish agency annual
maintenance summary reports beginning in October 1997. State agencies
shall submit a separate report for each major campus or site, as
defined by the office of financial management. Reports shall be
prepared in a format prescribed by the office of financial management
and shall include, but not be limited to: Information describing the
number, size, and condition of state-owned facilities; facility
maintenance, repair, and operating expenses paid from the state
operating and capital budgets, including maintenance staffing levels;
the condition of major infrastructure systems; and maintenance
management initiatives undertaken by the agency over the prior year.
Agencies shall submit their annual maintenance summary reports to the
office of financial management by September 1st each year.
(6) The office of financial management, prior to approving
allotments for major capital construction projects valued over five
million dollars, shall institute procedures for reviewing such projects
at the predesign stage that will reduce long-term costs and increase
facility efficiency. The procedures shall include, but not be limited
to, the following elements:
(a) Evaluation of facility program requirements and consistency
with long-range plans;
(b) Utilization of a system of cost, quality, and performance
standards to compare major capital construction projects; and
(c) A requirement to incorporate value-engineering analysis and
constructability review into the project schedule.
(7) No expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered into for
such major capital construction projects including, without exception,
land acquisition, site development, predesign, design, construction,
and equipment acquisition and installation, until the allotment of the
funds to be expended has been approved by the office of financial
management. This limitation does not prohibit the continuation of
expenditures and obligations into the succeeding biennium for projects
for which allotments have been approved in the immediate prior
biennium.
(8) If at any time during the fiscal period the governor projects
a cash deficit in a particular fund or account as defined by RCW
43.88.050, the governor shall make across-the-board reductions in
allotments for that particular fund or account so as to prevent a cash
deficit, unless the legislature has directed the liquidation of the
cash deficit over one or more fiscal periods. Except for the
legislative and judicial branches and other agencies headed by elective
officials, the governor shall review the statement of proposed
operating expenditures for reasonableness and conformance with
legislative intent. Once the governor approves the statements of
proposed operating expenditures, further revisions shall be made only
at the beginning of the second fiscal year and must be initiated by the
governor. However, changes in appropriation level authorized by the
legislature, changes required by across-the-board reductions mandated
by the governor, changes caused by executive increases to spending
authority, and changes caused by executive decreases to spending
authority for failure to comply with the provisions of chapter 36.70A
RCW may require additional revisions. Revisions shall not be made
retroactively. Revisions caused by executive increases to spending
authority shall not be made after June 30, 1987. However, the governor
may assign to a reserve status any portion of an agency appropriation
withheld as part of across-the-board reductions made by the governor
and any portion of an agency appropriation conditioned on a contingent
event by the appropriations act. The governor may remove these amounts
from reserve status if the across-the-board reductions are subsequently
modified or if the contingent event occurs. The director of financial
management shall enter approved statements of proposed expenditures
into the state budgeting, accounting, and reporting system within
forty-five days after receipt of the proposed statements from the
agencies. If an agency or the director of financial management is
unable to meet these requirements, the director of financial management
shall provide a timely explanation in writing to the legislative fiscal
committees.
(9) It is expressly provided that all agencies shall be required to
maintain accounting records and to report thereon in the manner
prescribed in this chapter and under the regulations issued pursuant to
this chapter. Within ninety days of the end of the fiscal year, all
agencies shall submit to the director of financial management their
final adjustments to close their books for the fiscal year. Prior to
submitting fiscal data, written or oral, to committees of the
legislature, it is the responsibility of the agency submitting the data
to reconcile it with the budget and accounting data reported by the
agency to the director of financial management.
(10) The director of financial management shall monitor agency
operating expenditures against the approved statement of proposed
expenditures and shall provide the legislature with quarterly
explanations of major variances.
(11) The director of financial management may exempt certain public
funds from the allotment controls established under this chapter if it
is not practical or necessary to allot the funds. Allotment control
exemptions expire at the end of the fiscal biennium for which they are
granted. The director of financial management shall report any
exemptions granted under this subsection to the legislative fiscal
committees.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.88.145 and 1994 c 219 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The capital appropriations act may authorize the governor,
through the director of financial management, to transfer the
appropriation authority for a capital project that is in excess of the
amount required for the completion of the project to another capital
project for which the appropriation is insufficient.
(((a))) (b) No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity or
change the intended use of the project beyond that intended by the
legislature in making the appropriation.
(((b))) (c) The transfer may be effected only between capital
projects within a specific department, commission, agency, or
institution of higher education and only between capital projects that
are funded from the same fund or account.
(((c))) (d) The transfer may be effected only if the project from
which the transfer of funds is made is substantially complete and there
are funds remaining, or bids have been let on the project from which
the transfer of funds is made and it appears to a substantial certainty
that the project can be completed within the biennium for less than the
amount appropriated.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the legislature intends that
each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the
governor's budget document, unless the legislative history demonstrates
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
(3)(a) If there is no project for which the appropriation is
insufficient under subsection (1) of this section, the excess
appropriation authority may be transferred by the office of financial
management to the agency's infrastructure savings appropriation in the
capital budget. Transfers of funds to an agency's infrastructure
savings appropriation are subject to review and approval by the office
of financial management. Expenditures from an infrastructure savings
appropriation are limited to projects that have a primary purpose to
correct infrastructure deficiencies or conditions that: (i) Adversely
affect the ability to utilize the infrastructure for its current
programmatic use; (ii) reduce the life expectancy of the
infrastructure; or (iii) increase the operating costs of the
infrastructure for its current programmatic use. Eligible
infrastructure projects may include structures and surface
improvements, site amenities, utility systems outside building
footprints and natural environmental changes or requirements as part of
an environmental regulation, a declaration of emergency for an
infrastructure issue in conformance with RCW 43.88.250, or
infrastructure planning as part of a facility master plan.
(b) In approving transfers in excess of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars to an infrastructure savings appropriation, the office of
financial management shall ensure that excess appropriation authority
resulting at the end of a project is from project management efforts
and not the result of advantageous bidding climate, scope reduction, or
overestimation of initial project budget. Excess appropriation
authority resulting from advantageous bids, scope reduction, or
overestimation of initial project budget must be transferred to the
common school construction account.
(c) Remaining excess appropriation authority must be equally
divided between the agency and the common school construction account.
(d) If an agency does not have an infrastructure savings
appropriation, an excess appropriation authority must be transferred to
the common school construction account if there is no other project in
need of the money.
(e) This subsection (3) applies to projects financed through the
proceeds of general obligation bonds whose debt service is included in
the calculation of the statutory debt limit and projects financed
through the education construction account. For all other projects,
any excess appropriation authority may not be transferred to the
infrastructure savings appropriation and lapses at the end of the
biennium in which the excess appropriation authority arises.
(4) The office of financial management shall revise the allotment
authorization for projects affected by this section.
(5) The office of financial management shall notify the legislative
fiscal committees of the senate and the house of representatives at
least thirty days before any transfer is effected under this section
except emergency projects or any transfer under two hundred fifty
thousand dollars, and shall prepare a report to such committees listing
all completed transfers at the close of each ((fiscal)) calendar year.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.88.160 and 2002 c 260 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section sets forth the major fiscal duties and
responsibilities of officers and agencies of the executive branch. The
regulations issued by the governor pursuant to this chapter shall
provide for a comprehensive, orderly basis for fiscal management and
control, including efficient accounting and reporting therefor, for the
executive branch of the state government and may include, in addition,
such requirements as will generally promote more efficient public
management in the state.
(1) Governor; director of financial management. The governor,
through the director of financial management, shall devise and
supervise a modern and complete accounting system for each agency to
the end that all revenues, expenditures, receipts, disbursements,
resources, and obligations of the state shall be properly and
systematically accounted for. The accounting system shall include the
development of accurate, timely records and reports of all financial
affairs of the state. The system shall also provide for central
accounts in the office of financial management at the level of detail
deemed necessary by the director to perform central financial
management. The director of financial management shall adopt and
periodically update an accounting procedures manual. Any agency
maintaining its own accounting and reporting system shall comply with
the updated accounting procedures manual and the rules of the director
adopted under this chapter. An agency may receive a waiver from
complying with this requirement if the waiver is approved by the
director. Waivers expire at the end of the fiscal biennium for which
they are granted. The director shall forward notice of waivers granted
to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The director of
financial management may require such financial, statistical, and other
reports as the director deems necessary from all agencies covering any
period.
(2) Except as provided in chapter 43.88C RCW, the director of
financial management is responsible for quarterly reporting of primary
operating budget drivers such as applicable workloads, caseload
estimates, and appropriate unit cost data. These reports shall be
transmitted to the legislative fiscal committees or by electronic means
to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.
Quarterly reports shall include actual monthly data and the variance
between actual and estimated data to date. The reports shall also
include estimates of these items for the remainder of the budget
period.
(3) The director of financial management shall report at least
annually to the appropriate legislative committees regarding the status
of all appropriated capital projects, including transportation
projects, showing significant cost overruns or underruns. For the
purposes of this section, significant cost overruns or underruns are
those in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars. If funds are
shifted from one project to another, the office of financial management
shall also reflect this in the annual variance report. Once a project
is complete, the report shall provide a final summary showing estimated
start and completion dates of each project phase compared to actual
dates, estimated costs of each project phase compared to actual costs,
and whether or not there are any outstanding liabilities or unsettled
claims at the time of completion. Agencies shall incorporate the
requirements of this report into their project management reports
including reports to the office of financial management.
(4) In addition, the director of financial management, as agent of
the governor, shall:
(a) Develop and maintain a system of internal controls and internal
audits comprising methods and procedures to be adopted by each agency
that will safeguard its assets, check the accuracy and reliability of
its accounting data, promote operational efficiency, and encourage
adherence to prescribed managerial policies for accounting and
financial controls. The system developed by the director shall include
criteria for determining the scope and comprehensiveness of internal
controls required by classes of agencies, depending on the level of
resources at risk.
Each agency head or authorized designee shall be assigned the
responsibility and authority for establishing and maintaining internal
audits following the standards of internal auditing of the institute of
internal auditors;
(b) Make surveys and analyses of agencies with the object of
determining better methods and increased effectiveness in the use of
manpower and materials; and the director shall authorize expenditures
for employee training to the end that the state may benefit from
training facilities made available to state employees;
(c) Establish policies for allowing the contracting of child care
services;
(d) Report to the governor with regard to duplication of effort or
lack of coordination among agencies;
(e) Review any pay and classification plans, and changes
thereunder, developed by any agency for their fiscal impact: PROVIDED,
That none of the provisions of this subsection shall affect merit
systems of personnel management now existing or hereafter established
by statute relating to the fixing of qualifications requirements for
recruitment, appointment, or promotion of employees of any agency. The
director shall advise and confer with agencies including appropriate
standing committees of the legislature as may be designated by the
speaker of the house and the president of the senate regarding the
fiscal impact of such plans and may amend or alter the plans, except
that for the following agencies no amendment or alteration of the plans
may be made without the approval of the agency concerned: Agencies
headed by elective officials;
(f) Fix the number and classes of positions or authorized employee
years of employment for each agency and during the fiscal period amend
the determinations previously fixed by the director except that the
director shall not be empowered to fix the number or the classes for
the following: Agencies headed by elective officials;
(g) Adopt rules to effectuate provisions contained in (a) through
(f) of this subsection.
(5) The treasurer shall:
(a) Receive, keep, and disburse all public funds of the state not
expressly required by law to be received, kept, and disbursed by some
other persons: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not apply to those
public funds of the institutions of higher learning which are not
subject to appropriation;
(b) Receive, disburse, or transfer public funds under the
treasurer's supervision or custody;
(c) Keep a correct and current account of all moneys received and
disbursed by the treasurer, classified by fund or account;
(d) Coordinate agencies' acceptance and use of credit cards and
other payment methods, if the agencies have received authorization
under RCW 43.41.180;
(e) Perform such other duties as may be required by law or by
regulations issued pursuant to this law.
It shall be unlawful for the treasurer to disburse public funds in
the treasury except upon forms or by alternative means duly prescribed
by the director of financial management. These forms or alternative
means shall provide for authentication and certification by the agency
head or the agency head's designee that the services have been rendered
or the materials have been furnished; or, in the case of loans or
grants, that the loans or grants are authorized by law; or, in the case
of payments for periodic maintenance services to be performed on state
owned equipment, that a written contract for such periodic maintenance
services is currently in effect; and the treasurer shall not be liable
under the treasurer's surety bond for erroneous or improper payments so
made. When services are lawfully paid for in advance of full
performance by any private individual or business entity other than
equipment maintenance providers or as provided for by RCW 42.24.035,
such individual or entity other than central stores rendering such
services shall make a cash deposit or furnish surety bond coverage to
the state as shall be fixed in an amount by law, or if not fixed by
law, then in such amounts as shall be fixed by the director of the
department of general administration but in no case shall such required
cash deposit or surety bond be less than an amount which will fully
indemnify the state against any and all losses on account of breach of
promise to fully perform such services. No payments shall be made in
advance for any equipment maintenance services to be performed more
than twelve months after such payment. Any such bond so furnished
shall be conditioned that the person, firm or corporation receiving the
advance payment will apply it toward performance of the contract. The
responsibility for recovery of erroneous or improper payments made
under this section shall lie with the agency head or the agency head's
designee in accordance with regulations issued pursuant to this
chapter. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a public
body to advance funds to a private service provider pursuant to a grant
or loan before services have been rendered or material furnished.
(6) The state auditor shall:
(a) Report to the legislature the results of current post audits
that have been made of the financial transactions of each agency; to
this end the auditor may, in the auditor's discretion, examine the
books and accounts of any agency, official, or employee charged with
the receipt, custody, or safekeeping of public funds. Where feasible
in conducting examinations, the auditor shall utilize data and findings
from the internal control system prescribed by the office of financial
management. The current post audit of each agency may include a
section on recommendations to the legislature as provided in (c) of
this subsection.
(b) Give information to the legislature, whenever required, upon
any subject relating to the financial affairs of the state.
(c) Make the auditor's official report on or before the thirty-first of December which precedes the meeting of the legislature. The
report shall be for the last complete fiscal period and shall include
determinations as to whether agencies, in making expenditures, complied
with the laws of this state. The state auditor is authorized to
perform or participate in performance verifications and performance
audits as expressly authorized by the legislature in the omnibus
biennial appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan
approved by the joint legislative audit and review committee. The
state auditor, upon completing an audit for legal and financial
compliance under chapter 43.09 RCW or a performance verification, may
report to the joint legislative audit and review committee or other
appropriate committees of the legislature, in a manner prescribed by
the joint legislative audit and review committee, on facts relating to
the management or performance of governmental programs where such facts
are discovered incidental to the legal and financial audit or
performance verification. The auditor may make such a report to a
legislative committee only if the auditor has determined that the
agency has been given an opportunity and has failed to resolve the
management or performance issues raised by the auditor. If the auditor
makes a report to a legislative committee, the agency may submit to the
committee a response to the report. This subsection (6) shall not be
construed to authorize the auditor to allocate other than de minimis
resources to performance audits except as expressly authorized in the
appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan. The results
of a performance audit conducted by the state auditor that has been
requested by the joint legislative audit and review committee must only
be transmitted to the joint legislative audit and review committee.
(d) Be empowered to take exception to specific expenditures that
have been incurred by any agency or to take exception to other
practices related in any way to the agency's financial transactions and
to cause such exceptions to be made a matter of public record,
including disclosure to the agency concerned and to the director of
financial management. It shall be the duty of the director of
financial management to cause corrective action to be taken within six
months, such action to include, as appropriate, the withholding of
funds as provided in RCW 43.88.110. The director of financial
management shall annually report by December 31st the status of audit
resolution to the appropriate committees of the legislature, the state
auditor, and the attorney general. The director of financial
management shall include in the audit resolution report actions taken
as a result of an audit including, but not limited to, types of
personnel actions, costs and types of litigation, and value of recouped
goods or services.
(e) Promptly report any irregularities to the attorney general.
(f) Investigate improper governmental activity under chapter 42.40
RCW.
(7) The joint legislative audit and review committee may:
(a) Make post audits of the financial transactions of any agency
and management surveys and program reviews as provided for in chapter
44.28 RCW as well as performance audits and program evaluations. To
this end the joint committee may in its discretion examine the books,
accounts, and other records of any agency, official, or employee.
(b) Give information to the legislature or any legislative
committee whenever required upon any subject relating to the
performance and management of state agencies.
(c) Make a report to the legislature which shall include at least
the following:
(i) Determinations as to the extent to which agencies in making
expenditures have complied with the will of the legislature and in this
connection, may take exception to specific expenditures or financial
practices of any agencies; and
(ii) Such plans as it deems expedient for the support of the
state's credit, for lessening expenditures, for promoting frugality and
economy in agency affairs, and generally for an improved level of
fiscal management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---