BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
lead poisoning prevention act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that:
(1) Nearly one million American children may have levels of lead in
their blood in excess of ten micrograms per deciliter. Unless
prevented or treated, elevated blood lead levels in egregious cases may
result in impairment of the ability to think, concentrate, and learn;
(2) A significant cause of lead poisoning in children is the
ingestion of lead particles from deteriorating or abraded lead-based
paint from older, poorly maintained residences;
(3) The health and development of these children and many others
are endangered by chipping or peeling lead-based paint or excessive
amounts of lead-contaminated dust in poorly maintained homes;
(4) Ninety percent of lead-based paint still remaining in occupied
housing exists in units built before 1960, with the remainder in units
built before 1978;
(5) The dangers posed by lead-based paint can be substantially
reduced and largely eliminated by taking measures to prevent paint
deterioration and limiting children's exposure to paint chips and lead
dust;
(6) The deterioration of lead-based paint in older residences
results in increased expenses each year for the state in the form of
special education and other education expenses, medical care for
lead-poisoned children, and expenditures for delinquent youth and
others needing special supervision;
(7) Older housing units remain an important part of this state's
housing stock, particularly for those of modest or limited incomes;
(8) The existing system of enforcing housing codes has proven
ineffective in inducing widespread lead-based paint hazard abatement,
mitigation, and control;
(9) The financial incentives currently in place have not proven
sufficient to motivate landlords and other property owners to undertake
widespread and effective lead-based paint hazard abatement, mitigation,
and control;
(10) Insurance coverage generally is not available to landlords or
other property owners to protect them against potentially ruinous legal
actions brought on behalf of lead-poisoned children;
(11) The possibility of liability exposure among landlords has led
many to abandon older properties or to place them in shell corporations
in order to avoid personal liability; and
(12) Knowledge of lead-based paint hazards, their control,
mitigation, abatement, and risk avoidance is not sufficiently
widespread, especially outside urban areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 To promote the elimination of childhood lead
poisoning, it is the purpose of this chapter to:
(1) Substantially reduce, and eventually eliminate, the incidence
of childhood lead poisoning;
(2) Increase the supply of affordable rental housing in which
measures have been taken to reduce substantially the risk of childhood
lead poisoning;
(3) Make enforcement of lead hazard control standards more certain
and more effective;
(4) Improve public awareness of lead safety issues and educate both
property owners and tenants about practices that can reduce the
incidence of lead poisoning;
(5) Provide protection from potentially ruinous tort actions for
those landlords who undertake specified lead hazard reduction measures;
(6) Assure the availability and affordability of liability
insurance protection to those landlords and other owners who undertake
specified lead hazard reduction measures;
(7) Mandate the testing of children likely to suffer the
consequences of lead poisoning so that prompt diagnosis and treatment,
as well as the prevention of harm, are possible;
(8) Provide a mechanism to facilitate prompt payment of medical and
rehabilitation expenses and relocation costs for those remaining
individuals who are affected by childhood lead poisoning; and
(9) Define the scope of authority of state agencies and departments
for lead hazard control, mitigation, education, and insurance
availability, and to provide for the coordination of these efforts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Abatement" means any set of measures designed to permanently
eliminate lead-based paint or lead-based paint hazards. "Abatement"
includes the removal of lead-based paint and dust-lead hazards, the
permanent enclosure or encapsulation of lead-based paint, the
replacement of components or fixtures painted with lead-based paint,
and the removal or permanent covering of soil-based hazards.
(2) "Affected property" means a room or group of rooms within a
property constructed before 1978 that form a single independent
habitable dwelling unit for occupation by one or more individuals that
has living facilities with permanent provisions for living, sleeping,
eating, cooking, and sanitation. "Affected property" does not include:
(a) An area not used for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, or
sanitation, such as an unfinished basement;
(b) A unit within a hotel, motel, or similar seasonal or transient
facility unless the unit is occupied by one or more persons at risk for
a period exceeding thirty days;
(c) An area that is secured and inaccessible to occupants; or
(d) A unit that is not offered for rent.
"Affected property" excludes any property owned or operated by a
unit of federal, state, or local government, or any public,
quasi-public, or municipal corporation, if the property is subject to
lead standards that are equal to, or more stringent than, the
requirements for lead-safe status under section 6 of this act.
(3) "Change in occupancy" means a change of tenant in an affected
property in which the property is vacated and possession is either
surrendered to the owner or abandoned.
(4) "Chewable surface" means an interior or exterior surface
painted with lead-based paint that a child under the age of six can
mouth or chew. Hard metal substrates and other materials that cannot
be dented by the bite of a child under the age of six are not
considered chewable.
(5) "Containment" means the physical measures taken to ensure that
dust and debris created or released during lead-based paint hazard
reduction are not spread, blown, or tracked from inside to outside of
the worksite.
(6) "Deteriorated paint" means any interior or exterior paint or
other coating that is peeling, chipping, chalking, or cracking, or any
paint or coating located on an interior or exterior surface or fixture
that is otherwise damaged or separated from the substrate.
(7) "Director" means the director of lead paint poisoning
prevention.
(8) "Dust-lead hazard" means surface dust in a residential dwelling
or a facility occupied by a person at risk that contains a mass per
area concentration of lead equal to or exceeding forty micrograms per
square foot on floors or two hundred fifty micrograms per square foot
interior windowsills based on wipe samples.
(9) "Dwelling unit" means:
(a) A single-family dwelling, including attached structures such as
porches and stoops; or
(b) A housing unit in a structure that contains more than one
separate housing unit, and in which each unit is used or occupied, or
intended to be used or occupied, in whole or in part, as the home or
separate living quarters of one or more persons.
(10) "Elevated blood lead" means a quantity of lead in whole venous
blood, expressed in micrograms per deciliter, that exceeds fifteen
micrograms per deciliter or such other level as may be specifically
provided in this chapter.
(11) "Encapsulation" means the application of a covering or coating
that acts as a barrier between the lead-based paint and the environment
and that relies for its durability on adhesion between the encapsulant
and the painted surface, and on the integrity of the existing bonds
between paint layers and between the paint and the substrate.
Encapsulation may be used as a method of abatement if it is designed
and performed so as to be permanent.
(12) "Exterior surfaces" means:
(a) All fences and porches that are part of an affected property;
(b) All outside surfaces of an affected property that are
accessible to a child under the age of six and that:
(i) Are attached to the outside of an affected property; or
(ii) Consist of other buildings that are part of the affected
property; and
(c) All painted surfaces in stairways, hallways, entrance areas,
recreation areas, laundry areas, and garages within a multifamily
rental dwelling unit that are common to individual dwelling units and
are accessible to a child under the age of six.
(13) "Friction surface" means an interior or exterior surface that
is subject to abrasion or friction, including, but not limited to,
certain window, floor, and stair surfaces.
(14) "Hazard reduction" means measures designed to reduce or
eliminate human exposure to lead-based hazards through methods
including interim controls or abatement or a combination of the two.
(15) "High efficiency particle air vacuum" means a device capable
of filtering out particles of 0.3 microns or greater from a body of air
at an efficiency of 99.97 percent or greater.
(16) "Impact surface" means an interior or exterior surface that is
subject to damage from the impact of repeated sudden force, such as
certain parts of door frames.
(17) "Inspection" means a comprehensive investigation to determine
the presence of lead-based paint hazards and the provision of a report
explaining the results of the investigation.
(18) "Interim controls" means a set of measures designed to reduce
temporarily human exposure to lead-based paint hazards. "Interim
controls" include, but are not limited to, repairs, painting, temporary
containment, specialized cleaning, clearance, ongoing lead-based paint
maintenance activities, and the establishment and operation of
management and resident education programs.
(19) "Interior windowsill" means a portion of the horizontal window
ledge that is protruding into the interior of a room.
(20) "Lead-based paint" means paint or other surface coatings that
contain lead equal to or exceeding 1.0 milligram per square centimeter
or 0.5 percent by weight or five thousand parts per million by weight.
(21) "Lead-based paint hazard" means paint-lead hazards and
dust-lead hazards.
(22) "Lead-contaminated dust" means dust in affected properties
that contains an area or mass concentration of lead in excess of the
lead content level determined by the director.
(23) "Director's local designee" means a municipal, county, or
other official designated by the director as responsible for assisting
the director, relevant state agencies, and relevant county and
municipal authorities, in implementing the activities specified for the
geographical area in which the affected property is located.
(24) "Owner" means a person, firm, corporation, nonprofit
organization, partnership, government, guardian, conservator, receiver,
trustee, executor, or other judicial officer, or other entity which,
alone or with others, owns, holds, or controls the freehold or
leasehold title or part of the title to property, with or without
actually possessing it. "Owner" includes a vendee who possesses the
title, but does not include a mortgagee or an owner of a reversionary
interest under a ground rent lease. "Owner" includes any authorized
agent of the owner, including a property manager or leasing agent.
(25) "Paint-lead hazard" means any one of the following:
(a) Any lead-based paint on a friction surface that is subject to
abrasion and where the dust-lead levels on the nearest horizontal
surface underneath the friction surface are equal to or greater than
the dust-lead hazard levels defined in subsection (8) of this section;
(b) Any damaged or otherwise deteriorated lead-based paint on an
impact surface that is caused by impact from a related building
material;
(c) Any chewable lead-based painted surface on which there is
evidence of teeth marks; or
(d) Any other deteriorated lead-based paint in or on the exterior
of any residential building or any facility occupied by a person at
risk.
(26) "Permanent" means an expected design life of at least twenty
years.
(27) "Person at risk" means a child under the age of six years or
a pregnant woman who resides or regularly spends at least twenty-four
hours per week in an affected property.
(28) "Relocation expenses" means all expenses necessitated by the
relocation of a tenant's household to lead-safe housing, including
moving and hauling expenses, vacuuming all upholstered furniture by a
high efficiency particle air vacuum, payment of a security deposit for
the lead-safe housing, and installation and connection of utilities and
appliances.
(29) "Soil-lead hazard" means soil on residential real property or
on property of a facility occupied by a person at risk that contains
total lead equal to or exceeding four hundred parts per million in a
play area or average of one thousand two hundred parts per million of
bare soil in the rest of the yard based on soil samples.
(30) "Tenant" means the individual named as the lessee in a lease,
rental agreement, or occupancy agreement for a dwelling unit.
(31) "Wipe sample" means a sample collected by wiping a
representative surface of known area, with lead determination conducted
by an accredited laboratory participating in the environmental lead
laboratory accreditation program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The governor shall appoint a director of
lead paint poisoning prevention who shall serve at the pleasure of the
governor. The director is responsible, subject to the authority of the
governor, for carrying out and administering all programs created under
this chapter. To the extent necessary, the director shall designate
the officers in local governments necessary to assist in carrying out
these duties. The director may contract with any agency, individual,
or group for the provision of necessary services, subject to
appropriation; and shall issue and from time to time amend the rules as
may be necessary.
(2) The director shall chair a lead poisoning prevention
coordinating council that also includes a designee of the office of
community development and the department of health.
(3) Subject to appropriation, the director, working in coordination
with the lead poisoning prevention coordinating council, shall
establish a statewide program for the prevention, screening, diagnosis,
and treatment of lead poisoning, including elimination of the sources
of poisoning, through the research, educational, epidemiologic, and
clinical activities as may be necessary.
(4) The governor shall appoint a lead poisoning prevention
commission.
(a) The duties of the commission are to:
(i) Study and collect information on the effectiveness of this
chapter in fulfilling its legislative purposes;
(ii) Make policy recommendations on achieving the legislative
purposes of this chapter;
(iii) Consult with the director and the responsible departments of
state government on the implementation of this chapter; and
(iv) Write and submit a report annually to the governor on the
results of implementing this chapter.
(b) The commission consists of fourteen members. The membership
includes:
(i) The director and the additional two members of the lead
poisoning prevention coordinating council;
(ii) One member of the senate, appointed by the president of the
senate;
(iii) One member of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives; and
(iv) Nine members appointed by the governor including:
(A) A child advocate;
(B) A health care provider;
(C) A parent of a lead-poisoned child;
(D) A representative of local government;
(E) Two owners of rental property in the state;
(F) A representative from the insurance industry that offers
premises liability coverage in the state;
(G) Either a lead hazard control professional or contractor or a
lead hazard identification professional; and
(H) One other member of the public whose experience and expertise
indicate his or her contributions to the commission will be meaningful.
(c) The terms of the members are as follows:
(i) The term of a member appointed by the governor is four years;
(ii) A member appointed by the president of the senate or the
speaker of the house of representatives serves at the pleasure of the
appointing officer;
(iii) The terms of the first members may be shortened or lengthened
so that the terms of future members are staggered;
(iv) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a
successor is appointed and qualifies; and
(v) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only
for the remainder of the term and until a successor is appointed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) An affected property must be in
compliance with the requirements of either "lead-free" status, as
defined in this section, or "lead-safe" status, as defined in this
section, on or before two years following the effective date of this
act, except as otherwise provided in this section.
(2) An owner of five or more affected properties may apply to the
director or the director's local designee for an extension of time in
which to comply with this section. The extension of time in which to
comply may be for a period of three years. The director may grant the
owner's request for an extension if the owner of the affected property:
(a) States under penalty of perjury that the affected property for
which an extension is sought is not occupied by a person at risk; and
(b) Has complied with the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section for more than fifty percent of the other affected properties
which the owner owns or in which he or she has a beneficial interest.
(3) An affected property is "lead-free" if:
(a) The affected property was constructed after 1978; or
(b) The owner of the affected property submits to the director or
the director's designee for the jurisdiction in which the property is
located an inspection report that indicates the affected property has
been tested for the presence of lead in accordance with standards and
procedures established by the rules adopted by the director and states
that:
(i) All interior surfaces of the affected property are lead-free;
and
(ii)(A) All exterior painted surfaces of the affected property that
were chipping, peeling, or flaking have been restored with
nonlead-based paint; or
(B) No exterior painted surfaces of the affected property are
chipping, peeling, or flaking.
(c) In order to maintain an exemption under this chapter, the owner
of any affected property with lead-based paint on any exterior surface
that has been certified as lead-free submits to the director or the
director's designee for the jurisdiction in which the property is
located every three years a certification, by an inspector, accredited
under section 8 of this act, stating that no exterior painted surface
of the affected property is chipping, peeling, or flaking.
(4) An affected property is "lead-safe" if the following treatments
to reduce lead-based paint hazards have been completed by an accredited
person and in compliance with the rules adopted by the director:
(a) Visual review of all exterior and interior painted surfaces;
(b) Removal and repainting of chipping, peeling, or flaking paint
on exterior and interior painted surfaces;
(c) Stabilization and repainting of any interior or exterior
painted surface which has lead-based paint hazards;
(d) Repair of any structural defect that is causing the paint to
chip, peel, or flake that the owner of the affected property has
knowledge of or, with the exercise of reasonable care, should have
knowledge of;
(e) Stripping and repainting, replacing, or encapsulating all
interior windowsills and window troughs with vinyl, metal, or any other
durable materials that render the surface smooth and cleanable;
(f) Installation of caps of vinyl, aluminum, or any other material
in a manner and under conditions approved by the director in all window
wells in order to make the window wells smooth and cleanable;
(g) Fixing the top sash of all windows in place in order to
eliminate the friction caused by movement of the top sash, except for
a treated or replacement window that is free of lead-based paint on its
friction surfaces;
(h) Rehanging all doors as necessary to prevent the rubbing
together of a lead-painted surface with another surface;
(i) Making all bare floors smooth and cleanable;
(j) Ensuring that all kitchen and bathroom floors are overlaid with
a smooth, water-resistant covering; and
(k) High efficiency particle air vacuuming and washing of the
interior of the affected property with high phosphate detergent or its
equivalent, as determined by the director.
(5)(a) Whenever an owner of an affected property intends to make
repairs or perform maintenance work that will disturb the paint on
interior surfaces of an affected property, the owner shall give any
tenant in the affected property at least forty-eight hours' written
notice. The owner shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that all
persons who are not persons at risk are not present in the area where
work is performed and that all persons at risk are removed from the
affected property when the work is performed.
(b) A tenant shall allow access to an affected property, at
reasonable times, to the owner to perform any work required under this
chapter.
(c) If a tenant must vacate an affected property for a period of
twenty-four hours or more in order to allow an owner to perform work
that will disturb the paint on interior surfaces, the owner shall pay
the reasonable expenses that the tenant incurs directly related to the
required relocation.
(d) If an owner has made all reasonable efforts to cause the tenant
to temporarily vacate an affected property in order to perform work
that will disturb the paint on interior surfaces, and the tenant
refuses to vacate the affected property, the owner is not liable for
any damages arising from the tenant's refusal to vacate.
(e) If an owner has made all reasonable efforts to gain access to
an affected property in order to perform any work required under this
chapter, and the tenant refuses to allow access, even after receiving
reasonable notice of the need for access, the owner is not liable for
any damages arising from the tenant's refusal to allow access.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1)(a) Initial inspection of each affected
property must occur on or before two years following the effective date
of the act, except as provided in section 6 of this act.
(b) Subsequent inspections must occur at intervals of not greater
than three years.
(c) The requirement for a subsequent inspection may be satisfied by
certification of the owner with the director or the director's designee
for the jurisdiction in which the property is located, under penalty of
perjury, that the tenants occupying an affected property have not
changed since the last inspection and that no one residing within the
affected property is a person at risk.
(d) If the requirement for reinspection of an affected property has
been satisfied by certification, the requirement for a reinspection is
reactivated by either a change in tenancy or the residence of a person
at risk within the affected property.
(2) The director or the director's designee shall order an
inspection of an affected property, at the expense of the owner of the
affected property, whenever the director or the director's designee,
after two years following the effective date of this act, is notified
that the affected property does not reasonably appear to comply with
either the lead-free standard or the lead-safe standard and a person at
risk resides in the affected property or spends more than twenty-four
hours per week in the affected property. An inspection required under
this subsection must be completed within ninety days after notification
of the director or the director's designee.
(3) The director or the director's designee shall order an
inspection of an affected property, at the expense of the owner of the
affected property, whenever the director or the director's designee is
notified that a person at risk who resides in the affected property or
spends more than twenty-four hours per week in the affected property
has an elevated blood lead level greater than or equal to fifteen
micrograms per deciliter. An inspection under this subsection must be
completed within fifteen days after notification of the director or the
director's designee.
(4) The inspector shall submit a verified report of the result of
the inspection to the director or the director's designee, the owner,
and the tenant, if any, of the affected property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A person may not act as a contractor or
supervisor to perform the work necessary for lead-hazard abatement
unless that person is accredited by the director. The director shall
accredit for these purposes any person meeting one of the following
standards:
(a) Rules adopted by the director governing the accreditation of
individuals to engage in lead-based paint activities sufficient to
satisfy the requirements of 40 C.F.R. Sec. 745.325 (2001) or any
applicable successor;
(b) Certification by the United States environmental protection
agency to engage in lead-based paint activities under 40 C.F.R. Sec.
745.226 (2001) or any applicable successor; or
(c) Certification by a state or tribal program authorized by the
United States environmental protection agency to certify individuals
engaged in lead-based paint activities under 40 C.F.R. Sec. 745.325
(2001) or any applicable successor.
The director shall, by rule, create exceptions to the accreditation
requirement for instances where the disturbance of lead-based paint is
incidental.
(2) An inspector accredited by the director shall conduct all
inspections required by this chapter. The director shall accredit as
an inspector any individual meeting the following requirements:
(a) Rules adopted by the director governing the accreditation of
individuals eligible to conduct the inspections required by this
chapter; or
(b) Certification to conduct risk assessments by the United States
environmental protection agency under 40 C.F.R. Sec. 745.226(b) (2001)
or any applicable successor.
(3) The accreditation of contractors or supervisors of those
performing the work necessary for lead hazard abatement, and the
accreditation of those performing the inspections required by this
section, are valid for a period of three years unless the director has
probable cause to believe a person accredited under this section has
violated the terms of the accreditation or engaged in illegal or
unethical conduct related to inspections required by this chapter. The
accreditation to perform inspections may be suspended pending a hearing
under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) The director shall establish by rule a schedule of fees for the
registration of persons performing lead hazard abatement and a separate
schedule for persons performing inspections. These fees are required
to be paid at the time of initial registration and at the time of
subsequent renewal of registration, and must be sufficient to cover all
costs, including the costs of state personnel, attributable to
accreditation activities conducted under this section.
(a) Fees collected under this subsection must be placed in a
continuing, nonlapsing special account to be used for accreditation
purposes under this section.
(b) The state treasurer shall hold and the state auditor shall
account for this account.
(c) The account established under this subsection must be invested
and reinvested.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) On or before two years following the
effective date of this act, the owner of an affected property shall
register the affected property with the director or the director's
designee.
(2) The owner shall register each affected property using forms
prepared by the director, including the following information:
(a) The name and address of the owner;
(b) The address of the affected property;
(c) If applicable, the name and address of each property manager
employed by the owner to manage the affected property;
(d) The name and address of each insurance company providing
property insurance or lead hazard coverage for the affected property,
together with the policy numbers of that insurance or coverage;
(e) The name and address of a resident agent, other agent of the
owner, or contact person in the state with respect to the affected
property;
(f) The date of construction of the affected property;
(g) The date of the latest change in occupancy of the affected
property; and
(h) The latest date, if any, on which the affected property has
been certified to be in compliance with section 6 of this act, and the
name and address of the person conducting the inspection.
(3) Registration must be renewed every two years. However, owners
shall update the information contained in the owner's registration
within thirty days after any change in the registration information.
(4) The information provided by an owner under this section is open
to the public.
(5) The director shall establish by rule a schedule of fees for the
registration of affected properties, required to be paid at the time of
initial registration and at the time of subsequent renewals of
registration, sufficient to cover all costs, including the costs of
state personnel, involved with registration activities conducted under
this section.
(a) Fees collected under this subsection must be placed in a
continuing, nonlapsing special account to be used for registration
purposes under this section.
(b) The state treasurer shall hold and the state auditor shall
account for this account.
(c) The account established under this subsection must be invested
and reinvested.
(d) An owner of an affected property who fails to pay the fees
imposed under this subsection is liable for a civil penalty of triple
the cumulative amount of any and all unpaid registration fees or one
hundred fifty dollars, whichever is greater, together with all costs of
collection, including reasonable attorneys' fees. These penalties may
be collected in a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction.
Any unpaid penalty constitutes a lien against the affected property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) This section applies to all potential
bases of civil liability for alleged injury or loss to a person caused
by the ingestion of lead by a person at risk in an affected property.
However, this section does not apply to any claim in which the elevated
blood lead level of the person at risk is documented to have existed
on or before the date sixty days after the affected property where the
person at risk resides or otherwise allegedly was exposed to lead has
been certified as lead-free or lead-safe.
(2) A property owner and his or her agents and employees are immune
from civil liability to a person at risk, or his or her parent or legal
guardian, for injuries or damages resulting from the ingestion of lead
contained in an affected property if:
(a) The property has been certified as lead-free or lead-safe; and
(b) The property owner or his or her agent has made a qualified
offer as defined in this section to the person at risk, or his or her
parent or legal guardian, in a case in which the person at risk has a
documented elevated blood lead level of fifteen micrograms per
deciliter or more performed more than sixty days following
certification of the premises as lead-safe or lead-free, regardless of
whether the qualified offer has been accepted or rejected by the person
at risk, or his or her parent or legal guardian.
(3) The immunity under subsection (2) of this section does not
apply if it is shown that one of the following has occurred:
(a) The owner or his or her employee or agent obtained the
certification of lead-free or lead-safe status by fraud;
(b) The owner or his or her employee or agent violated a condition
of the certification;
(c) During renovation, remodeling, maintenance, or repair after
receiving the certificate, the owner or his or her employee or agent
created a lead-based paint hazard that was present in the affected
property at the time the person at risk either was exposed to a
lead-based paint hazard or first was tested with an elevated blood lead
level greater than fifteen micrograms per deciliter;
(d) The owner or his or her employee or agent failed to respond in
a timely manner to notification by a tenant, the director, the
director's designee, or a local health department that a lead-based
paint hazard might be present; or
(e) The lead poisoning or lead exposure was caused by a source of
lead in the affected property other than lead-based paint.
(4) A person may not bring an action against an owner of an
affected property whose property has been certified as lead-free or
lead-safe for damages arising from alleged injury or loss to a person
at risk caused by a lead-based paint hazard unless he or she documents
his or her alleged injury with a test for elevated blood levels and
presents written notice to the owner of the affected property or his or
her agent or employee of the claim and test results.
(a) If the test results show an elevated blood level of less than
fifteen micrograms per deciliter, the person at risk, or his or her
parent or legal guardian, may not recover damages from the owner of the
affected property or his or her agents or employees unless the person
at risk, or his or her parent or legal guardian, can show by clear and
convincing evidence that the person at risk's damage or injury resulted
from exposure to lead-based paint and was caused by either:
(i) Intentional acts by the owner or his or her agents or
employees; or
(ii) Actions of the owner or his or her agents or employees with
knowledge with a substantial certainty that the actions would injure
the person at risk or others similarly situated.
(b) If the test results show an elevated blood level of fifteen
micrograms per deciliter or greater, the owner of the affected property
or his or her agent or employees have the opportunity to make a
qualified offer under this section.
(c) If the concentration of lead in a whole venous blood sample of
a person at risk tested within sixty days after the person at risk
begins residence or regularly spends at least twenty-four hours per
week in an affected property that is certified as being in compliance
with section 6 of this act is equal to or greater than fifteen
micrograms per deciliter, it is presumed that the exposure to
lead-based paint occurred before a person at risk began residing or
regularly spending at least twenty-four hours per week in the affected
property.
(5)(a) A qualified offer under this section may be made to a person
at risk by the owner of the affected property, an insurer of the owner,
or an agent, employee, or attorney of the owner.
(b) To qualify for the protection of liability under this section,
a qualified offer must be made in writing and delivered by certified
mail, return receipt requested, within thirty days after the owner of
the affected property or his or her agent or employee receives notice
of the elevated blood level.
(c) A qualified offer made under this section may be accepted or
rejected by a person at risk or, if a person at risk is a minor, the
person's parent or legal guardian. If the qualified offer is not
accepted within thirty days of receipt of the qualified offer, it is
rejected. By mutual agreement, the parties may extend the period for
acceptance of the qualified offer.
(d) Subject to the exception in subsection (5) of this section,
acceptance of a qualified offer by a person at risk, or by a parent,
legal guardian, or other person authorized to respond on behalf of a
person at risk, discharges and releases all potential liability of the
offeror under (a) of this subsection, the offeror's insured or
principal, and any participating co-offeror to the person at risk and
to the parent or legal guardian of the person at risk for alleged
injury or loss caused by the lead-based paint hazard in the affected
property.
(e) An owner of an affected property or his or her agent, employee,
attorney, or anyone else acting on his or her behalf may not represent
to a person at risk, his or her parent or guardian, or anyone else
acting on his or her behalf, that an offer of settlement in an action
resulting from a lead-based paint hazard in an affected property is a
qualified offer unless the affected property has been certified as
lead-free or lead-safe and unless the offeror under (a) of this
subsection reasonably believes that the settlement offer satisfies all
requirements of this section. Any settlement resulting from a
settlement offer purporting to be a qualified offer that does not
satisfy the requirements of this section, is at the election of the
person at risk, or his or her parent or guardian or other
representative, void. Further, misrepresentation of a settlement offer
as a qualified offer when in fact the offer does not meet these
requirements may subject the offeror to criminal penalties and
professional disciplinary codes, if applicable. The statute of
limitations for an action by a person at risk with an elevated blood
level or his or her parent or legal guardian is tolled until the
misrepresentation is discovered.
(f) A copy of the qualified offer must be sent to the director.
The director shall maintain a copy of the qualified offer in the case
management file of the person at risk. In addition, the director shall
directly notify the person at risk, or in the case of a minor, the
parent or legal guardian of the minor, of state and local resources
available for lead poisoning prevention and treatment.
(g) A qualified offer mut include payment for reasonable expenses
and costs incurred by the person at risk with an elevated blood level
of fifteen micrograms per deciliter or greater for:
(i) The relocation of the household of the person at risk to a
lead-safe dwelling unit of comparable size and quality that may provide
either:
(A) The permanent relocation of the household of the affected
person at risk to lead-safe housing, including relocation expenses, a
rent subsidy, and incidental expenses; or
(B) The temporary relocation of the household of the affected
person at risk to lead-safe housing while necessary lead hazard
reduction treatments are being performed in the affected property to
make that affected property lead-safe; and
(ii) Medically necessary treatment for the affected person at risk
as determined by the treating physician or other health care provider
or case manager of the person at risk that is necessary to mitigate the
effects of lead poisoning, as defined by the department of health by
rule, and in the case of a child, until the child reaches the age of
eighteen years; and
(iii) Reasonable attorneys' fees, not to exceed the lesser of two
thousand five hundred dollars or actual time spent in the
investigation, preparation, and presentation of the claim multiplied by
an hourly rate of one hundred fifty dollars per hour.
(h) An offeror under (a) of this subsection is required to pay
reasonable expenses for the medically necessary treatments under this
section only if coverage for these treatments is not otherwise provided
by government assistance or by a health insurance plan under which the
person at risk has coverage or in which the person at risk is enrolled.
The health insurance plan does not have the right of subrogation
against the party making the qualified offer.
(i) The amounts payable under a qualified offer made under this
section are subject to the following aggregate maximum caps:
(i) Twenty-five thousand dollars for all medically necessary
treatments as provided and limited in this subsection (5); and
(ii) Ten thousand dollars for all relocation benefits as provided
and limited in this subsection (5).
All payments under a qualified offer must be paid to the provider
of the service, except that payment of incidental expenses may be paid
directly to the person at risk, or in the case of a child, to the
parent or legal guardian of the person at risk.
The payments under a qualified offer may not be considered income
or an asset of the person at risk, the parent of a person at risk who
is a child, or the legal guardian, for purposes of determining
eligibility under any state or federal entitlement program.
(j) A qualified offer must include a certification by the owner of
the affected property, under the penalties of perjury, that the owner
has complied with section 6 of this act and this section in a manner
that qualified the owner to make a qualified offer.
(k) A qualified offer may not be treated as an offer of compromise
for purposes of admissibility in evidence, notwithstanding that the
amount is not in controversy.
(l) The director may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
section.
(6)(a) An owner of an affected property, who is not in compliance
with this section during the period of residency of a person at risk,
is presumed to have failed to exercise reasonable care with respect to
lead-based paint hazards during that period in an action seeking
damages on behalf of the person at risk for alleged injury or loss
resulting from exposure to lead-based paint hazards in the affected
property. The owner has the burden of rebutting this presumption by
clear and convincing evidence.
(b) The plaintiff in an action against an owner of an affected
property under (a) of this subsection, in addition to recovering all
other legally cognizable damages, including punitive damages when
appropriate, is entitled to recover reasonable attorneys' fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, an insurer licensed by the insurance commissioner to provide
liability coverage to rental property owners may not exclude, after a
date determined by the insurance commissioner, coverage for losses or
damages caused by exposure to lead-based paint. The insurance
commissioner may not permit, authorize, or approve any exclusion for
injury or damage resulting from exposure to lead-based paint, except as
specifically provided for in this chapter, that was not in effect on
the effective date of this act, and all previously approved exclusions
terminate on or before a date determined by the insurance commissioner.
(2) All insurers issuing liability insurance policies, including
commercial lines insurance policies, personal lines insurance policies,
or any other policies, covering affected properties that are in
compliance with this chapter must offer coverage for bodily injury
caused by exposure to lead-based paint. This coverage must encompass
any and all claims made more than sixty days after certification of the
affected property as lead-free or lead-safe asserting injury resulting
from exposure to lead-based paint on the premises of an affected
property. Policy limits for this coverage must be in an amount equal
to or greater than the underlying policy limits of the applicable
policy insuring the affected property.
(a) Liability coverage under this subsection for losses or damages
caused by lead-based paint at the insured premises may be limited to
the damages defined under section 10 of this act.
(b) In order for the owner of the affected property to be eligible
for the liability coverage under this subsection, the owner may, at the
time insurance is sought, be required to present to the insurer proof
of meeting the lead-free standard or lead-safe standard in the form of
an affidavit signed by the owner or designated party that certification
has been provided under section 7 of this act and that the property has
been properly registered under section 9 of this act.
(3) This chapter does not prevent insurers from offering an
endorsement for personal or bodily injury liability coverage for
injuries resulting from exposure to lead-based paint for properties not
in compliance with section 6 of this act.
(4)(a) Rates for the coverage specified in subsection (2) of this
section must be approved by the insurance commissioner using the
following standards:
(i) Rates must not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly
discriminatory; and
(ii) In establishing rates, consideration must be given to:
(A) Past and prospective loss experience;
(B) A reasonable margin for profits and contingencies;
(C) Past and prospective expenses;
(D) Other data the commissioner chooses; and
(E) The past history of the owner with regard to lead poisoning or
any other liability or violations of ordinances or statutes relating to
the affected property or similar properties reasonably believed by the
insurer to be relevant.
(b) The insurance commissioner shall determine within two years
following the effective date of this act the availability of the
necessary liability personal or bodily injury coverage, and may if
coverage is not generally available, establish a market assistance plan
or take other measures to assure the availability of coverage that
offers a liability limit of at least three hundred thousand dollars or
shall require that coverage be made available through a joint
underwriting plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) An individual, corporation, or other
business entity, is entitled to a sales tax credit for removal of
lead-based paint or other repairs or renovations of an affected
property necessary to comply with section 6 of this act when he, she,
or it:
(a) Has the required removal of lead-based paint hazards or other
repairs or renovations performed by a contractor accredited under
section 8 of this act;
(b) Pays for the removal of lead-based paint hazards or other
repairs or renovations identified in this subsection; and
(c) Obtains written certification by an inspector, accredited under
section 8 of this act, that the required removal of lead-based paint
hazards or other repairs or renovations for the affected property has
been completed in accordance with all applicable requirements and that
the affected property can now be certified as either lead-free or
lead-safe.
(2) The tax credit in this section is available to someone who owns
and occupies his or her own dwelling unit in the same manner and to the
same extent as it is available to the owner of an affected property who
leases the premises.
(3) The tax credit is equal to the amount actually paid for the
lead-based paint hazard reduction up to a maximum of two thousand five
hundred dollars per affected property.
(4) Any amount of tax credit not used in the taxable year of
certification may be carried forward and applied to the individual's
tax liability for any one or more of the succeeding five taxable years.
The credit may not be applied until all other credits available to the
taxpayer for that taxable year have been applied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The lead-safe or lead-free property
revolving loan account is created in the state treasury. The account
consists of proceeds received from the sale of bonds under subsection
(2) of this section and any sums that the state may from time to time
appropriate, as well as donations, gifts, bequests, or otherwise from
any public or private source. Expenditures from the account may be
spent only to assist owners of residential properties in meeting the
standards for either lead-free or lead-safe certification. Moneys may
be spent only after appropriation.
(2) The state shall issue bonds in an amount specified for the
purpose of funding the lead-safe or lead-free property revolving loan
account.
(a) Any bonds issued or to be issued under this subsection are
subject to all the requirements and conditions established by the state
for the sale of bonds.
(b) The interest rate and other terms upon which bonds are issued
under this subsection may not create a prospective obligation of the
state in excess of the amount of revenues that can reasonably be
expected from the loan repayments, interests on the loans, and fees
that the state can reasonably expect to charge under this chapter.
(c) All money received from the sale of bonds must be deposited
into the lead-safe or lead-free property revolving loan account.
(3) The treasurer shall contract for the administration and
disbursement of funding. The director shall adopt rules that provide
for the orderly and equitable disbursement and repayment of funds.
(4) Funds placed in the lead-safe or lead-free property revolving
loan account must be made available, at the discretion of the director,
to the owners of affected properties or nonprofit organizations for the
purpose of bringing affected properties into compliance with section 6
of this act. An owner of a unit built before 1978 who owns and
occupies the dwelling unit is eligible for loans under this section in
the same manner, and to the same extent, as an owner of an affected
property.
(5) Loans made available under this section may be made directly,
or in cooperation with other public and private lenders, or any agency,
department, or bureau of the federal government or the state.
(6) The proceeds from the repayment of any loans made for that
purpose must be deposited in and returned to the lead-safe or lead-free
property revolving loan account to constitute a continuing revolving
fund for the purposes provided in this section.
(7) The director shall take any action necessary to obtain federal
assistance for lead hazard reduction to be used in conjunction with the
lead-safe or lead-free property revolving loan account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) Owners of affected properties who fail
to comply with section 6 of this act are in violation of state and
local building codes. The county prosecutor shall enforce civil
remedies or criminal penalties provided for by law arising out of the
failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter and may seek
injunctive relief when appropriate.
(2)(a) Any civil or criminal action by a county prosecutor to
enforce the provisions of this chapter must be reported to the
director.
(b) The director shall issue an annual report outlining
specifically the enforcement actions brought under subsection (1) of
this section, the identity of the owners of the affected properties,
the authority bringing the enforcement action, the nature of the
action, and describing the criminal penalties or civil relief.
(3) After the second written notice from the director of violations
of this chapter occurring within an affected property, or after two
criminal or civil actions under subsection (1) of this section brought
by either state or local officials to enforce this chapter arising out
of violations occurring within an affected property, unless the
violations alleged to exist are corrected, the affected property is
considered abandoned, and the attorney general and the director have
the specific power to request the court to appoint a receiver for the
property. The court may specifically authorize the receiver to apply
for loans, grants, and other forms of funding necessary to correct
lead-based paint hazards and meet the standards for lead-safe or
lead-free status, and to hold the affected property for the period of
time as the funding source may require to assure that the purposes of
the funding have been met. The costs of this receivership constitute
a lien against the property that, if not discharged by the owner upon
receipt of the receiver's demand for payment, constitutes grounds for
foreclosure proceedings instituted by the receiver to recover the
costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) A person at risk has a right, effective
two years following the effective date of this act, to housing which is
lead-free or lead-safe as outlined in this chapter.
(2) If an owner of an affected property fails to comply, a private
right of action exists that allows a person at risk or the parent or
legal guardian of a person at risk to seek injunctive relief from a
court with jurisdiction against the owner of the affected property in
the form of a court order to compel compliance with the requirements of
this chapter.
(3) A court may not grant the injunctive relief requested unless,
at least thirty days prior to the filing requesting the injunction, the
owner of the affected property has received written notice of the
violation of standards contained in section 6 of this act and has
failed to bring the affected property into compliance with the
applicable standards. This notice to the owner of the affected
property is satisfied when any of the following has occurred:
(a) A person at risk, his or her parent or legal guardian, or
attorney, has notified the owner of an affected property that the
property fails to meet the requirements for either lead-free status or
lead-safe status;
(b) A public official has notified the owner of the affected
property of violations of this chapter occurring within an affected
property; or
(c) A criminal or civil action has been brought by either state or
local enforcement officials to enforce this chapter arising out of
violations occurring within an affected property.
(4) A person who prevails in an action is entitled to an award of
the costs of the litigation and to an award of reasonable attorneys'
fees in an amount to be fixed by the court.
(5) Cases brought before the court under this section must be
granted an accelerated hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) An owner of an affected property may
not evict or take any other retaliatory action against a person at risk
or his or her parent or legal guardian in response to the actions of
the person at risk or his or her parent or legal guardian in:
(a) Providing information to the owner of the affected property,
the director, the director's designee for the jurisdiction in which
such property is located, local health officials, or local housing
officials concerning lead-based paint hazards within an affected
property or elevated blood levels of a person at risk; or
(b) Enforcing any of his or her rights under this chapter.
(2) For purposes of this section, a retaliatory action includes any
of the following actions in which the activities protected under this
section are a material factor in motivating the action:
(a) A refusal to renew a lease;
(b) Termination of a tenancy;
(c) An arbitrary rent increase or decrease in services to which the
person at risk or his or her parent or legal guardian is entitled; or
(d) Any form of constructive eviction.
(3) A person at risk or his or her parent or legal guardian subject
to an eviction or retaliatory action under this section is entitled to
the relief as may be provided by statute and any further relief deemed
just and equitable by the court, and is eligible for reasonable
attorneys' fees and costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) In order to achieve the purposes of
this chapter, a statewide, multifaceted, ongoing educational program
designed to meet the needs of tenants, property owners, health care
providers, early childhood educators, and care providers, realtors and
real estate agents, insurers and insurance agents, and local building
officials, is hereby established.
(2) The governor, in conjunction with the director and the lead
poisoning prevention coordinating council, shall sponsor a series of
public service announcements on radio, television, the World Wide Web,
and print media about the nature of lead-based paint hazards, the
importance of lead-free and lead-safe housing, and the purposes and
responsibilities set forth in this chapter. In developing and
coordinating this public information initiative the sponsors shall seek
the participation and involvement of private industry organizations,
including those involved in real estate, insurance, mortgage banking,
and pediatrics.
(3) Within one hundred twenty days following the effective date of
this act, the director, in consultation with the lead poisoning
prevention coordinating council and the lead poisoning prevention
commission, shall develop culturally and linguistically appropriate
information pamphlets regarding childhood lead poisoning, the
importance of testing for elevated blood levels, prevention of
childhood lead poisoning, treatment of childhood lead poisoning, and
when appropriate, the requirements of this chapter. It is a
requirement of this chapter that these information pamphlets be
distributed to parents or the other legal guardians of children six
years of age or younger on the following occasions:
(a) By the owner of any affected property or his or her agents or
employees at the time of the initiation of a rental agreement to a new
tenant whose household includes a person at risk or any other woman of
childbearing age;
(b) By the health care provider at the time of the child's birth
and at the time of any childhood immunization or vaccine unless it is
established that the information pamphlet has been provided previously
to the parent or legal guardian by the health care provider within the
prior twelve months; and
(c) By the owner or operator of any child care facility, preschool,
or kindergarten class on or before October 15th of the calendar year.
(4) The director, within one hundred twenty days following the
effective date of this act, shall establish guidelines and a trainer's
manual for a "Lead-Safe Housing Awareness Seminar" with a total class
time of three hours or less. The courses must be offered by
professional associations and community organizations with a training
capacity, existing accredited educational institutions, and for-profit
educational providers. All proposals must be reviewed and approved on
the criteria of seminar content and qualifications of instructors.
(5) The insurance commissioner within eighteen months after the
effective date of this act, shall:
(a) Adopt rules for and issue an advisory bulletin to all state
licensed, admitted insurers providing liability coverage for property
owners regarding their responsibilities under this chapter; and
(b) Adopt rules for and issue an advisory bulletin to all state
licensed insurance agents and brokers outlining the provisions of this
chapter and the new requirements for state licensed, admitted insurers.
(6) The department of licensing, within eighteen months after the
effective date of this act, shall:
(a) Require reasonable familiarity of the relevant portions of this
chapter for the licensure or renewal of licenses of real estate brokers
and salespersons; and
(b) Develop an educational program for real estate brokers and
salespersons regarding their duties and responsibilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) The director shall establish a program
for early identification of persons at risk with elevated blood lead
levels. This program must systematically screen children under six
years of age in the target populations identified in subsection (2) of
this section for the presence of elevated blood lead levels. Children
within the specified target populations must be screened with a blood
lead test at ages twelve and twenty-four months or at ages thirty-six
to seventy-two months if they have not previously been screened. The
director shall, after consultation with recognized professional medical
groups and other sources as he or she deems appropriate, adopt rules
establishing (a) the means by which and the intervals at which children
under six years of age are screened for lead poisoning and elevated
blood lead levels, and (b) guidelines for the medical follow-up on
children found to have elevated blood lead levels.
(2) In developing screening programs to identify persons at risk
with elevated blood lead levels, the director shall give priority to
persons within the following categories:
(a) All children enrolled in medicaid at ages twelve and
twenty-four months or at ages thirty-six to seventy-two months if they
have not previously been screened;
(b) Children under the age of six exhibiting delayed cognitive
development or other symptoms of childhood lead poisoning;
(c) Persons at risk residing in the same household, or recently
residing in the same household, as another person at risk with a blood
lead level of ten micrograms per deciliter or greater;
(d) Persons at risk residing, or who have recently resided, in
buildings or geographical areas where significant numbers of cases of
lead poisoning or elevated blood lead levels have recently been
reported;
(e) Persons at risk residing, or who have recently resided, in
affected properties contained in buildings which during the preceding
three years have been subject to enforcement actions described in
section 14 of this act, receivership actions under section 14 of this
act, or where injunctive relief has been sought under section 15 of
this act;
(f) Persons at risk residing, or who have recently resided, in
other affected properties with the same owner as another building
containing affected properties which during the preceding three years
have been subject to enforcement actions described in section 14 of
this act, receivership actions under section 14 of this act, or where
injunctive relief has been sought under section 15 of this act; and
(g) Persons at risk residing in other buildings or geographical
areas where the director reasonably determines there to be a
significant risk of affected individuals having a blood lead level of
ten micrograms per deciliter or greater.
(3) The director shall maintain comprehensive records of all
screenings conducted under this section. These records shall be
indexed geographically and by owner in order to determine the location
of areas of relatively high incidence of lead poisoning and other
elevated blood lead levels. These records, with the names of tested
individuals removed for privacy purposes, are public records.
All cases or probable cases of lead poisoning, as defined by rule
by the director, found in the course of screenings conducted under this
section shall be reported immediately to the affected individual, to
his or her parent or legal guardian if he or she is a minor, and to the
director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 1 through 18 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 64 RCW.

--- END ---