BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.16.010 and 1991 c 270 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context otherwise requires, words and phrases as used
herein shall mean:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" ((shall)) means the Washington horse racing
commission((, hereinafter created)).
(2) "Driving miles" means miles measured by the most direct route
as determined by the commission.
(3) "Parimutuel machine" ((shall)) means and includes both machines
at the track and machines at the satellite locations, that record
parimutuel bets and compute the payoff.
(4) "Person" ((shall)) means and includes individuals, firms,
corporations and associations.
(5) "Race meet" ((shall)) means and includes any exhibition of
thoroughbred, quarter horse, paint horse, appaloosa horse racing,
arabian horse racing, or standard bred harness horse racing, where the
parimutuel system is used.
(6) "Satellite extension" means a satellite facility where a class
1 racing association conducts parimutuel wagering on its live race card
and imported simulcast races.
Singular shall include the plural, and the plural shall include the
singular; and words importing one gender shall be regarded as including
all other genders.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.16.200 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 10 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A racing association licensed by the commission to conduct a
race meet may seek approval from the commission to conduct parimutuel
wagering on its program at a satellite location or locations within the
state of Washington. The sale of parimutuel pools at satellite
locations shall be conducted only during the licensee's race meet and
simultaneous to all parimutuel wagering activity conducted at the
licensee's live racing facility in the state of Washington. The
commission's authority to approve satellite wagering at a particular
location is subject to the following limitations:
(a) The commission may approve only one satellite location in each
county in the state; however, the commission may grant approval for
more than one licensee to conduct wagering at each satellite location.
A satellite location shall not be operated:
(i) Within twenty driving miles of any class 1 racing facility((.
For the purposes of this section, "driving miles" means miles measured
by the most direct route as determined by the commission)); and
(ii) Within five miles of any class 1 racing facility located east
of the crest of the Cascade mountains; and
(b) A licensee shall not conduct satellite wagering at any
satellite location within sixty driving miles of any other racing
facility conducting a live race meet.
(2) Subject to local zoning and other land use ordinances, the
commission shall be the sole judge of whether approval to conduct
wagering at a satellite location shall be granted.
(3) The licensee shall combine the parimutuel pools of the
satellite location with those of the racing facility for the purpose of
determining odds and computing payoffs. The amount wagered at the
satellite location shall be combined with the amount wagered at the
racing facility for the application of take out formulas and
distribution as provided in RCW 67.16.102, 67.16.105, 67.16.170, and
67.16.175. A satellite extension of the licensee's racing facility
shall be subject to the same application of the rules of racing as the
licensee's racing facility.
(4) Upon written application to the commission, a class 1 racing
association may be authorized to transmit simulcasts of live horse
races conducted at its racetrack to locations outside of the state of
Washington approved by the commission and in accordance with the
interstate horse racing act of 1978 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 to 3007) or
any other applicable laws. The commission may permit parimutuel pools
on the simulcast races to be combined in a common pool. A racing
association that transmits simulcasts of its races to locations outside
this state shall pay at least fifty percent of the fee that it receives
for sale of the simulcast signal to the horsemen's purse account for
its live races after first deducting the actual cost of sending the
signal out of state.
(5) Upon written application to the commission, a class 1 racing
association may be authorized to transmit simulcasts of live horse
races conducted at its racetrack to licensed racing associations
located within the state of Washington and approved by the commission
for the receipt of the simulcasts. The commission shall permit
parimutuel pools on the simulcast races to be combined in a common
pool. The fee for in-state, track-to-track simulcasts shall be five
and one-half percent of the gross parimutuel receipts generated at the
receiving location and payable to the sending racing association. A
racing association that transmits simulcasts of its races to other
licensed racing associations shall pay at least fifty percent of the
fee that it receives for the simulcast signal to the horsemen's purse
account for its live race meet after first deducting the actual cost of
sending the simulcast signal. A racing association that receives races
simulcast from class 1 racing associations within the state shall pay
at least fifty percent of its share of the parimutuel receipts to the
horsemen's purse account for its live race meet after first deducting
the purchase price and the actual direct costs of importing the race.
(6) A class 1 racing association may be allowed to import
simulcasts of horse races from out-of-state racing facilities. With
the prior approval of the commission, the class 1 racing association
may participate in an interstate common pool and may change its
commission and breakage rates to achieve a common rate with other
participants in the common pool.
(a) The class 1 racing association shall make written application
with the commission for permission to import simulcast horse races for
the purpose of parimutuel wagering. Subject to the terms of this
section, the commission is the sole authority in determining whether to
grant approval for an imported simulcast race.
(b) A licensed racing association may also be approved to import
one simulcast race of regional or national interest on each live race
day.
(c) The commission may allow simulcast races of regional or
national interest to be sent to satellite locations. The simulcasts
shall be limited to one per day except for Breeder's Cup special events
day.
(d) When open for parimutuel wagering, a class 1 racing association
which imports simulcast races shall also conduct simulcast parimutuel
wagering within its licensed racing enclosure on all races simulcast
from other class 1 racing associations within the state of Washington.
(e) The conduct of parimutuel wagering on imported simulcast races
shall be for not more than fourteen hours during any twenty-four hour
period, for not more than five days per week and only at the live
racing facility of a class 1 racing association.
(f) On any imported simulcast race, the class 1 racing association
shall pay fifty percent of its share of the parimutuel receipts to the
horsemen's purse account for its live race meet after first deducting
the purchase price of the imported race and the actual costs of
importing the race.
(7) For purposes of this section, a class 1 racing association is
defined as a licensee approved by the commission to conduct during each
twelve-month period at least forty days of live racing and satellite
extensions of the licensee's racing facility east of the crest of the
Cascade mountains. If a live race day is canceled due to reasons
directly attributable to acts of God, labor disruptions affecting live
race days but not directly involving the licensee or its employees, or
other circumstances that the commission decides are beyond the control
of the class 1 racing association, then the canceled day counts toward
the forty-day requirement. The commission may by rule increase the
number of live racing days required to maintain class 1 racing
association status or make other rules necessary to implement this
section.
(8) This section does not establish a new form of gaming in
Washington or allow expanded gaming within the state beyond what has
been previously authorized. Simulcast wagering has been allowed in
Washington before April 19, 1997. Therefore, this section does not
allow gaming of any nature or scope that was prohibited before April
19, 1997. This section is necessary to protect the Washington equine
breeding and racing industries, and in particular those sectors of
these industries that are dependent upon live horse racing. The
purpose of this section is to protect these industries from adverse
economic impacts and to promote fan attendance at class 1 racing
facilities. Therefore, imported simulcast race card programs shall not
be disseminated to any location outside the live racing facility of the
class 1 racing association and a class 1 racing association is strictly
prohibited from simulcasting imported race card programs to any
location outside its live racing facility.
(9) A licensee conducting simulcasting under this section shall
place signs in the licensee's gambling establishment under RCW
9.46.071. The informational signs concerning problem and compulsive
gambling must include a toll-free telephone number for problem and
compulsive gamblers and be developed under RCW 9.46.071.
(10) Chapter 10, Laws of 2001 1st sp. sess. does not establish a
new form of gaming in Washington or allow expanded gaming within the
state beyond what has been previously authorized. Simulcast wagering
has been allowed in Washington before August 23, 2001. Therefore, this
section does not allow gaming of any nature or scope that was
prohibited before August 23, 2001. Chapter 10, Laws of 2001 1st sp.
sess. is necessary to protect the Washington equine breeding and racing
industries, and in particular those sectors of these industries that
are dependent upon live horse racing. The purpose of chapter 10, Laws
of 2001 1st sp. sess. is to protect these industries from adverse
economic impacts and to promote fan attendance at class 1 racing
facilities. Therefore, imported simulcast race card programs shall not
be disseminated to any location outside the live racing facility of the
class 1 racing association and a class 1 racing association is strictly
prohibited from simulcasting imported race card programs to any
location outside its live racing facility.
(11) If a state or federal court makes a finding that the increase
in the number of imported simulcast races that may be authorized under
chapter 10, Laws of 2001 1st sp. sess. is an expansion of gaming beyond
that which is now allowed, chapter 10, Laws of 2001 1st sp. sess. is
null and void.
(12) If any provision of chapter 10, Laws of 2001 1st sp. sess. or
its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of chapter 10, Laws of 2001 1st sp. sess. or the application
of the provision to other persons or circumstances is also invalid.
(13) This act does not establish a new form of gaming in Washington
or allow expanded gaming within the state beyond what has been
previously authorized. Simulcast wagering has been allowed in
Washington before April 19, 1997, and satellite wagering has been
allowed since 1988. Therefore, this section does not allow gaming of
any nature or scope that was prohibited before August 23, 2001. This
act is necessary to protect the Washington equine breeding and racing
industries in eastern Washington, and in particular those sectors of
these industries that are dependent upon live horse racing. The
purpose of this act is to protect these industries from adverse
economic impacts and to promote attendance at class 1 racing
facilities. The more sparse population of eastern Washington poses
special challenges to operating a class 1 racing association in eastern
Washington. Wagering on simulcasting at satellite extensions increases
the purse at the race tracks, allowing class 1 racing associations in
eastern Washington to offer owners and breeders who race at tracks in
eastern Washington a purse similar to those offered by other racing
associations. Therefore, imported simulcast race card programs shall
not be disseminated to any location outside the live racing facility of
the class 1 racing association except for satellite extensions east of
the crest of the Cascade mountains and a class 1 racing association is
strictly prohibited from simulcasting imported race card programs to
any location outside its live racing facility except for satellite
extensions located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.
(14) If a state or federal court makes a finding that the increase
in the number of imported simulcast races that may be authorized under
this act is an expansion of gaming beyond that which is now allowed,
this act is null and void.
(15) If any provision of this act or its application to any person
or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this act or the
application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is also
invalid.

--- END ---