BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.01 RCW
to read as follows:
A dental care assistance plan offered by an insurer, as defined in
RCW 48.01.050, and any agreement for dental care benefits provided by
a health care service contractor, as "health care service contractor"
is defined in RCW 48.44.010, must pay for covered services in equal
amounts and on essentially equivalent terms for services provided by
any provider licensed to provide the services.

--- END ---