BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At the time the vehicle license plate fee imposed under RCW
46.16.237 is charged, the registered owner shall pay and the department
shall collect an additional fee of one dollar for each license plate
issued.
(2) The department shall transmit the fee imposed in this section
to the state treasurer together with a detailed report for deposit in
the motor vehicle fund. The state treasurer shall transfer the fees
imposed in this section at least once each quarter to the public safety
and education account, and the amount so deposited may be used only for
reducing the cost of traffic safety education courses under chapter
28A.220 RCW for students qualified to receive school lunches on a
reduced-cost or free basis.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.220.040 and 2000 c 115 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each school district shall be reimbursed from funds
appropriated for traffic safety education.
(a) The state superintendent shall determine the per-pupil
reimbursement amount for the traffic safety education course to be
funded by the state. Each school district offering an approved
standard traffic safety education course shall be reimbursed or granted
an amount up to the level established by the superintendent of public
instruction as may be appropriated. Each school district that does not
offer an approved standard traffic safety education course shall offer
scholarships for students qualified to receive school lunches on a
reduced-cost or free basis who enroll in a traffic safety education
course at any drivers' school licensed under chapter 46.82 RCW.
(b) The state superintendent may provide per-pupil reimbursements
to school districts only where all the traffic educators have satisfied
the continuing education requirement of RCW 28A.220.030(4).
(2) The board of directors of any school district or combination of
school districts may establish a traffic safety education fee, which
fee when imposed shall be required to be paid by any duly enrolled
student in any such school district prior to or while enrolled in a
traffic safety education course. In accordance with funding received
under section 1 of this act, the board shall set a reduced fee for
students qualified to receive school lunches on a reduced-cost or free
basis. Traffic safety education fees collected by a school district
shall be deposited with the county treasurer to the credit of such
school district, to be used to pay costs of the traffic safety
education course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act takes effect with
registrations that are due or become due November 1, 2004, or later.

--- END ---