BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.48.020 and 1997 c 324 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any employer, who knowingly misrepresents to the department
the amount of his or her payroll or employee hours upon which the
premium under this title is based, shall be liable to the state for up
to ten times the amount of the difference in premiums paid and the
amount the employer should have paid and for the reasonable expenses of
auditing his or her books and collecting such sums. Such liability may
be enforced in the name of the department.
(b) An employer is guilty of a class C felony, if:
(i) The employer, with intent to evade determination and payment of
the correct amount of the premiums, knowingly makes misrepresentations
regarding payroll or employee hours; or
(ii) The employer engages in employment covered under this title
and, with intent to evade determination and payment of the correct
amount of the premiums, knowingly fails to secure payment of
compensation under this title or knowingly fails to report the payroll
or employee hours related to that employment.
(c) Upon conviction under (b) of this subsection, the employer
shall be ordered by the court to pay the premium due and owing, a
penalty in the amount of one hundred percent of the premium due and
owing, and interest on the premium and penalty from the time the
premium was due until the date of payment. The court shall:
(i) Collect the premium and interest and transmit it to the
department of labor and industries; and
(ii) Collect the penalty and disburse it pro rata as follows: One-third to the investigative agencies involved; one-third to the
prosecuting authority; and one-third to the general fund of the county
in which the matter was prosecuted.
Payments collected under this subsection must be applied until
satisfaction of the obligation in the following order: Premium
payments; penalty; and interest.
(2)(a) Any person claiming benefits under this title, who knowingly
gives false information required in any claim or application under this
title ((shall be)) is guilty of a class B felony((, or gross
misdemeanor in accordance with the theft and anticipatory provisions of
Title 9A RCW)) if the benefits received based on false information
exceed the benefits actually due or authorized by at least one thousand
dollars; and is a class C felony if the benefits received exceed the
benefits actually due or authorized by less than one thousand dollars.
(b) Upon conviction under (a) of this subsection, in addition to
any other penalties imposed, the person shall be ordered by the court
to pay restitution to the department in the amount of the excess
benefits received, a penalty in the amount of one hundred percent of
the excess benefits received, and interest on the excess benefits and
penalty from the time the benefits were paid to the date the person
repays the benefits and penalty. The court shall:
(i) Collect the excess benefit payment and interest and transmit it
to the department; and
(ii) Collect the penalty and disburse it pro rata as follows: One-third to the investigative agencies involved; one-third to the
prosecuting authority; and one-third to the general fund of the county
in which the matter was prosecuted.
(c) Payments collected under this subsection must be applied until
satisfaction of the obligation in the following order: Excess benefit
repayment; penalty; and interest.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.48.270 and 1987 c 470 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, agency,
institution, or other legal entity, but not including an injured worker
or beneficiary, that:
(1) Knowingly makes or causes to be made any false statement or
representation of a material fact in any application for any payment
under this title; or
(2) At any time knowingly makes or causes to be made any false
statement or representation of a material fact for use in determining
rights to such payment, or knowingly falsifies, conceals, or covers up
by any trick, scheme, or device a material fact in connection with such
application or payment; or
(3) Having knowledge of the occurrence of any event affecting (a)
the initial or continued right to any payment, or (b) the initial or
continued right to any such payment of any other individual in whose
behalf he or she has applied for or is receiving such payment, conceals
or fails to disclose such event with an intent fraudulently to secure
such payment either in a greater amount or quantity than is due or when
no such payment is authorized;
((shall be)) is guilty of a class B felony if the false statements or
representations, concealments, or failures to disclose result in
payments that are more than one thousand dollars greater than what is
due or authorized, and guilty of a class C felony((: PROVIDED, That
the fine, if imposed, shall not be in an amount more than twenty-five
thousand dollars, except as authorized by RCW 9A.20.030)) if the
payments are not more than one thousand dollars greater than what is
due or authorized.

--- END ---