BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the current
system for issuing notices of certain parking infractions and for
collecting penalties for those infractions does not promote due process
for vehicle owners. Current law and practices do not require notice to
the registered owner of a vehicle when a notice of infraction is issued
to an unattended vehicle, even though it is the owner who presumptively
faces the legal consequences of the infraction. A registered owner may
be unaware of infraction notices issued for his or her vehicle until
the referral of the citations to a collection agency impairs the
owner's credit rating, which in turn affects the owner's ability to
secure employment, housing, insurance, and health care. Similarly, a
registered owner may be unaware of infraction notices until the owner
is unable to renew the license for his or her vehicle. Even where the
owner receives notice, the consequences of failing to pay promptly for
a relatively minor infraction may have a disproportionate effect on the
owner's life and livelihood.
The legislature intends to prevent harm to the financial interests
and credit ratings of vehicle owners by requiring further procedural
protections as additional steps of the citation and collection
processes.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.030 and 2002 c 279 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A law enforcement officer has the authority to issue a notice
of traffic infraction:
(a) When the infraction is committed in the officer's presence;
(b) When the officer is acting upon the request of a law
enforcement officer in whose presence the traffic infraction was
committed; or
(c) If an officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle
accident has reasonable cause to believe that the driver of a motor
vehicle involved in the accident has committed a traffic infraction.
(2) A court may issue a notice of traffic infraction upon receipt
of a written statement of the officer that there is reasonable cause to
believe that an infraction was committed.
(3) If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked,
standing, or stopped in violation of this title or an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution, the officer finding the vehicle shall take its registration
number and may take any other information displayed on the vehicle
which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to the
vehicle a notice of traffic infraction. In addition, within two
business days of the date the notice of traffic infraction was issued,
the issuing law enforcement agency shall send a notice of infraction by
first class mail to the registered owner of the vehicle at the address
on file with the department of licensing.
(4) In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle under RCW
46.55.120, upon receiving a complaint by a registered tow truck
operator that has incurred costs in removing, storing, and disposing of
an abandoned vehicle, an officer of the law enforcement agency
responsible for directing the removal of the vehicle shall send a
notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known address of the
person responsible under RCW 46.55.105. The notice must be entitled
"Littering -- Abandoned Vehicle" and give notice of the monetary penalty.
The officer shall append to the notice of infraction, on a form
prescribed by the department of licensing, a notice indicating the
amount of costs incurred as a result of removing, storing, and
disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at
auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction
will not be considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty
payable under this chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied
that the person has made restitution in the amount of the deficiency
remaining after disposal of the vehicle.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.63.060 and 1993 c 501 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A notice of traffic infraction represents a determination that
an infraction has been committed. The determination will be final
unless contested as provided in this chapter.
(2) The form for the notice of traffic infraction shall be
prescribed by rule of the supreme court and shall include the
following:
(a) A statement that the notice represents a determination that a
traffic infraction has been committed by the person named in the notice
and that the determination shall be final unless contested as provided
in this chapter;
(b) A statement that a traffic infraction is a noncriminal offense
for which imprisonment may not be imposed as a sanction; that the
penalty for a traffic infraction may include sanctions against the
person's driver's license including suspension, revocation, or denial;
that the penalty for a traffic infraction related to standing,
stopping, or parking may include nonrenewal of the vehicle license;
(c) A statement of the specific traffic infraction for which the
notice was issued;
(d) A statement of the monetary penalty established for the traffic
infraction;
(e) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for
responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options;
(f) A statement that at any hearing to contest the determination
the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the infraction was committed; and that the person may
subpoena witnesses including the officer who issued the notice of
infraction;
(g) A statement that at any hearing requested for the purpose of
explaining mitigating circumstances surrounding the commission of the
infraction the person will be deemed to have committed the infraction
and may not subpoena witnesses;
(h) A statement that the person must respond to the notice as
provided in this chapter within fifteen days or the person's driver's
license or driving privilege will be suspended by the department until
any penalties imposed pursuant to this chapter have been satisfied;
(i) A statement that failure to appear at a hearing requested for
the purpose of contesting the determination or for the purpose of
explaining mitigating circumstances will result in the suspension of
the person's driver's license or driving privilege, or in the case of
a standing, stopping, or parking violation, refusal of the department
to renew the vehicle license, until any penalties imposed pursuant to
this chapter have been satisfied;
(j) A statement, which the person shall sign, that the person
promises to respond to the notice of infraction in one of the ways
provided in this chapter;
(k) A statement that unpaid penalties may be referred to a
collection agency and reported to credit reporting bureaus;
(l) For notices of infractions for standing, stopping, or parking
violations issued under RCW 46.63.030(3), a statement that a notice of
infraction will be mailed to the registered owner of the vehicle.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.63.070 and 2000 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who receives a notice of traffic infraction shall
respond to such notice as provided in this section within the later of
fifteen days of the date of the notice or, in the case of a notice of
standing, stopping, or parking infraction issued under RCW
46.63.030(3), fifteen days from the date the notice was mailed pursuant
to that subsection.
(2) If the person determined to have committed the infraction does
not contest the determination the person shall respond by completing
the appropriate portion of the notice of infraction and submitting it,
either by mail or in person, to the court specified on the notice. A
check or money order in the amount of the penalty prescribed for the
infraction must be submitted with the response. When a response which
does not contest the determination is received, an appropriate order
shall be entered in the court's records, and a record of the response
and order shall be furnished to the department in accordance with RCW
46.20.270.
(3) If the person determined to have committed the infraction, or,
for notices issued under RCW 46.63.030(3), the registered owner of the
vehicle, wishes to contest the determination the person shall respond
by completing the portion of the notice of infraction requesting a
hearing and submitting it, either by mail or in person, to the court
specified on the notice. The court shall notify the person in writing
of the time, place, and date of the hearing, and that date shall not be
sooner than seven days from the date of the notice, except by
agreement.
(4) If the person determined to have committed the infraction, or,
for notices issued under RCW 46.63.030(3), the registered owner of the
vehicle, does not contest the determination but wishes to explain
mitigating circumstances surrounding the infraction the person shall
respond by completing the portion of the notice of infraction
requesting a hearing for that purpose and submitting it, either by mail
or in person, to the court specified on the notice. The court shall
notify the person in writing of the time, place, and date of the
hearing.
(5)(a) In hearings conducted pursuant to subsections (3) and (4) of
this section, the court may defer findings, or in a hearing to explain
mitigating circumstances may defer entry of its order, for up to one
year and impose conditions upon the defendant the court deems
appropriate. Upon deferring findings, the court may assess costs as
the court deems appropriate for administrative processing. If at the
end of the deferral period the defendant has met all conditions and has
not been determined to have committed another traffic infraction, the
court may dismiss the infraction.
(b) A person may not receive more than one deferral within a seven-year period for traffic infractions for moving violations and more than
one deferral within a seven-year period for traffic infractions for
nonmoving violations.
(6) If any person issued a notice of traffic infraction:
(a) Fails to respond to the notice of traffic infraction as
provided in subsection (2) of this section; or
(b) Fails to appear at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection
(3) or (4) of this section;
the court shall enter an appropriate order assessing the monetary
penalty prescribed for the traffic infraction and any other penalty
authorized by this chapter and shall notify the department in
accordance with RCW 46.20.270, and, for notices issued under RCW
46.63.030(3), the registered owner of the vehicle, of the failure to
respond to the notice of infraction or to appear at a requested
hearing.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.270 and 1990 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 402 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever any person is convicted of any offense for which this
title makes mandatory the suspension or revocation of the driver's
license of such person by the department, the privilege of the person
to operate a vehicle is suspended until the department takes the action
required by this chapter, and the court in which such conviction is had
shall forthwith secure the immediate forfeiture of the driver's license
of such convicted person and immediately forward such driver's license
to the department, and on failure of such convicted person to deliver
such driver's license the judge shall cause such person to be confined
for the period of such suspension or revocation or until such driver's
license is delivered to such judge: PROVIDED, That if the convicted
person testifies that he or she does not and at the time of the offense
did not have a current and valid vehicle driver's license, the judge
shall cause such person to be charged with the operation of a motor
vehicle without a current and valid driver's license and on conviction
punished as by law provided, and the department may not issue a
driver's license to such persons during the period of suspension or
revocation: PROVIDED, ALSO, That if the driver's license of such
convicted person has been lost or destroyed and such convicted person
makes an affidavit to that effect, sworn to before the judge, the
convicted person may not be so confined, but the department may not
issue or reissue a driver's license for such convicted person during
the period of such suspension or revocation: PROVIDED, That perfection
of notice of appeal shall stay the execution of sentence including the
suspension and/or revocation of the driver's license.
(2) Every court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under
this chapter, or any other act of this state or municipal ordinance
adopted by a local authority regulating the operation of motor vehicles
on highways, or any federal authority having jurisdiction over offenses
substantially the same as those set forth in Title 46 RCW which occur
on federal installations within this state, shall forward to the
department within ten days of a forfeiture of bail or collateral
deposited to secure the defendant's appearance in court, a payment of
a fine or penalty, a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt, or a finding
that any person has committed a traffic infraction an abstract of the
court record in the form prescribed by rule of the supreme court,
showing the conviction of any person or the finding that any person has
committed a traffic infraction in said court for a violation of any
said laws other than regulations governing standing, stopping, parking,
and pedestrian offenses.
(3) Every municipality having jurisdiction over offenses committed
under this chapter, or under any other act of this state or municipal
ordinance adopted by a local authority regulating the operation of
motor vehicles on highways, may forward to the department within ten
days of failure to respond, failure to pay a penalty, failure to appear
at a hearing to contest the determination that a violation of any
statute, ordinance, or regulation relating to standing, stopping, or
parking has been committed, or failure to appear at a hearing to
explain mitigating circumstances, an abstract of the citation record in
the form prescribed by rule of the department, showing the finding by
such municipality that ((two or)) more than two violations of laws
governing standing, stopping, and parking have been committed and
indicating the nature of the defendant's failure to act. Whenever a
municipality forwards such a finding to the department, it must also
send a copy of the finding by first class mail to the registered owner
of the vehicle at the address on file with the department. Such
violations may not have occurred while the vehicle is stolen from the
registered owner or is leased or rented under a bona fide commercial
vehicle lease or rental agreement between a lessor engaged in the
business of leasing vehicles and a lessee who is not the vehicle's
registered owner. The department may enter into agreements of
reciprocity with the duly authorized representatives of the states for
reporting to each other violations of laws governing standing,
stopping, and parking.
(4) For the purposes of Title 46 RCW the term "conviction" means a
final conviction in a state or municipal court or by any federal
authority having jurisdiction over offenses substantially the same as
those set forth in Title 46 RCW which occur on federal installations in
this state, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to
secure a defendant's appearance in court, the payment of a fine, a plea
of guilty, or a finding of guilt on a traffic law violation charge,
regardless of whether the imposition of sentence or sanctions are
deferred or the penalty is suspended, but not including entry into a
deferred prosecution agreement under chapter 10.05 RCW.
(5) For the purposes of Title 46 RCW the term "finding that a
traffic infraction has been committed" means a failure to respond to a
notice of infraction or a determination made by a court pursuant to
this chapter. Payment of a monetary penalty made pursuant to RCW
46.63.070(2) is deemed equivalent to such a finding.

Sec. 6 RCW 3.02.045 and 1995 c 291 s 1 and 1995 c 38 s 1 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Courts of limited jurisdiction may use collection agencies
under chapter 19.16 RCW for purposes of collecting unpaid penalties on
infractions, criminal fines, costs, assessments, civil judgments, or
forfeitures that have been imposed by the courts. Courts of limited
jurisdiction may enter into agreements with one or more attorneys or
collection agencies for collection of outstanding penalties, fines,
costs, assessments, and forfeitures. These agreements may specify the
scope of work, remuneration for services, and other charges deemed
appropriate. Such agreements may authorize collection agencies to
retain all or any portion of the interest collected on these accounts.
(2) Courts of limited jurisdiction may use credit cards or debit
cards for purposes of billing and collecting unpaid penalties, fines,
costs, assessments, and forfeitures so imposed. Courts of limited
jurisdiction may enter into agreements with one or more financial
institutions for the purpose of the collection of penalties, fines,
costs, assessments, and forfeitures. The agreements may specify
conditions, remuneration for services, and other charges deemed
appropriate.
(3) Servicing of delinquencies by collection agencies or by
collecting attorneys in which the court retains control of its
delinquencies shall not constitute assignment of debt.
(4) For purposes of this section, the term debt shall include
penalties, fines, costs, assessments, or forfeitures imposed by the
courts.
(5) The court may assess as court costs the moneys paid for
remuneration for services or charges paid to collecting attorneys, to
collection agencies, or, in the case of credit cards, to financial
institutions.
(6) For public debts that arise from a notice of infraction issued
for standing, stopping, or parking violations under RCW 46.63.030(3),
the court may not assign the debt to a collection agency unless:
(a) The debt in that jurisdiction arises from either: (i) More
than two notices of infraction; or (ii) the total original monetary
penalty or penalties for the infraction or infractions, exclusive of
additional penalties and surcharges, exceeds seventy-five dollars. The
assignment must state the number of infractions and the original
monetary penalty for each; and
(b)(i) The court sends notice by first class mail to the address of
the registered owner on file with the department of licensing informing
the owner of the existence of the debt; (ii) the court sends notice by
first class mail to the address of the registered owner on file with
the department of licensing informing the owner that the debt may be
assigned to a collection agency for collection if the debt is not paid;
and (iii) at least thirty days have elapsed from the date the notice of
infraction was mailed.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.16.500 and 1997 c 387 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Agencies, departments, taxing districts, political
subdivisions of the state, counties, and cities may retain, by written
contract, collection agencies licensed under this chapter for the
purpose of collecting public debts owed by any person, including any
restitution that is being collected on behalf of a crime victim.
(b) Any governmental entity as described in (a) of this subsection
using a collection agency may add a reasonable fee, payable by the
debtor, to the outstanding debt for the collection agency fee incurred
or to be incurred. The amount to be paid for collection services shall
be left to the agreement of the governmental entity and its collection
agency or agencies, but a contingent fee of up to fifty percent of the
first one hundred thousand dollars of the unpaid debt per account and
up to thirty-five percent of the unpaid debt over one hundred thousand
dollars per account is reasonable, and a minimum fee of the full amount
of the debt up to one hundred dollars per account is reasonable. Any
fee agreement entered into by a governmental entity is presumptively
reasonable.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, no debt
may be assigned to a collection agency unless (a) there has been an
attempt to advise the debtor (i) of the existence of the debt and (ii)
that the debt may be assigned to a collection agency for collection if
the debt is not paid, and (b) at least thirty days have elapsed from
the time notice was attempted.
(3) Collection agencies assigned debts under this section shall
have only those remedies and powers which would be available to them as
assignees of private creditors.
(4) For purposes of this section, the term debt shall include fines
and other debts, including the fee required under subsection (1)(b) of
this section.
(5) For public debts that arise from a notice of infraction issued
for standing, stopping, or parking violations under RCW 46.63.030(3),
the debt may not be assigned to a collection agency unless:
(a) The debt in that jurisdiction arises from either: (i) More
than two notices of infraction; or (ii) the total original monetary
penalty or penalties for the infraction or infractions, exclusive of
additional penalties and surcharges, exceeds seventy-five dollars. The
assignment must state the number of infractions and the original
monetary penalty for each; and
(b)(i) The governmental entity sends notice by first class mail to
the address of the registered owner on file with the department of
licensing informing the owner of the existence of the debt; (ii) the
governmental entity sends notice by first class mail to the address of
the registered owner on file with the department of licensing informing
the owner that the debt may be assigned to a collection agency for
collection if the debt is not paid; and (iii) at least thirty days have
elapsed from the date the notice of infraction was mailed.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.16.250 and 2001 c 217 s 4 and 2001 c 47 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
No licensee or employee of a licensee shall:
(1) Directly or indirectly aid or abet any unlicensed person to
engage in business as a collection agency in this state or receive
compensation from such unlicensed person: PROVIDED, That nothing in
this chapter shall prevent a licensee from accepting, as forwardee,
claims for collection from a collection agency or attorney whose place
of business is outside the state.
(2) Collect or attempt to collect a claim by the use of any means
contrary to the postal laws and regulations of the United States postal
department.
(3) Publish or post or cause to be published or posted, any list of
debtors commonly known as "bad debt lists" or threaten to do so. For
purposes of this chapter, a "bad debt list" means any list of natural
persons alleged to fail to honor their lawful debts. However, nothing
herein shall be construed to prohibit a licensee from communicating to
its customers or clients by means of a coded list, the existence of a
check dishonored because of insufficient funds, not sufficient funds or
closed account by the financial institution servicing the debtor's
checking account: PROVIDED, That the debtor's identity is not readily
apparent: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the licensee complies with the
requirements of subsection (9)(e) of this section.
(4) Have in his or her possession or make use of any badge, use a
uniform of any law enforcement agency or any simulation thereof, or
make any statements which might be construed as indicating an official
connection with any federal, state, county, or city law enforcement
agency, or any other governmental agency, while engaged in collection
agency business.
(5) Perform any act or acts, either directly or indirectly,
constituting the practice of law.
(6) Advertise for sale or threaten to advertise for sale any claim
as a means of endeavoring to enforce payment thereof or agreeing to do
so for the purpose of soliciting claims, except where the licensee has
acquired claims as an assignee for the benefit of creditors or where
the licensee is acting under court order.
(7) Use any name while engaged in the making of a demand for any
claim other than the name set forth on his, her, or its current license
issued hereunder.
(8) Give or send to any debtor or cause to be given or sent to any
debtor, any notice, letter, message, or form which represents or
implies that a claim exists unless it shall indicate in clear and
legible type:
(a) The name of the licensee and the city, street, and number at
which he is licensed to do business;
(b) The name of the original creditor to whom the debtor owed the
claim if such name is known to the licensee or employee: PROVIDED,
That upon written request of the debtor, the licensee shall make a
reasonable effort to obtain the name of such person and provide this
name to the debtor;
(c) If the notice, letter, message, or form is the first notice to
the debtor or if the licensee is attempting to collect a different
amount than indicated in his or its first notice to the debtor, an
itemization of the claim asserted must be made including:
(i) Amount owing on the original obligation at the time it was
received by the licensee for collection or by assignment;
(ii) Interest or service charge, collection costs, or late payment
charges, if any, added to the original obligation by the original
creditor, customer or assignor before it was received by the licensee
for collection, if such information is known by the licensee or
employee: PROVIDED, That upon written request of the debtor, the
licensee shall make a reasonable effort to obtain information on such
items and provide this information to the debtor;
(iii) Interest or service charge, if any, added by the licensee or
customer or assignor after the obligation was received by the licensee
for collection;
(iv) Collection costs, if any, that the licensee is attempting to
collect;
(v) Attorneys' fees, if any, that the licensee is attempting to
collect on his, her, or its behalf or on the behalf of a customer or
assignor;
(vi) Any other charge or fee that the licensee is attempting to
collect on his, her, or its own behalf or on the behalf of a customer
or assignor.
(9) Communicate or threaten to communicate, the existence of a
claim to a person other than one who might be reasonably expected to be
liable on the claim in any manner other than through proper legal
action, process, or proceedings except under the following conditions:
(a) A licensee or employee of a licensee may inform a credit
reporting bureau of the existence of a claim: PROVIDED, That if the
licensee or employee of a licensee reports a claim to a credit
reporting bureau, the licensee shall upon receipt of written notice
from the debtor that any part of the claim is disputed, forward a copy
of such written notice to the credit reporting bureau. If the claim
arises from a notice of infraction issued under RCW 46.63.030(3) and
referred to the licensee under RCW 3.02.045(6) and 19.16.500(5), the
licensee may not inform a credit reporting bureau of the existence of
a claim unless the claim referred arises from more than two notices of
infraction, or the total original monetary penalty or penalties for the
infraction or infractions, exclusive of additional penalties and
surcharges, exceeds seventy-five dollars;
(b) A licensee or employee in collecting or attempting to collect
a claim may communicate the existence of a claim to a debtor's employer
if the claim has been reduced to a judgment;
(c) A licensee or employee in collecting or attempting to collect
a claim that has not been reduced to judgment, may communicate the
existence of a claim to a debtor's employer if:
(i) The licensee or employee has notified or attempted to notify
the debtor in writing at his or her last known address or place of
employment concerning the claim and the debtor after a reasonable time
has failed to pay the claim or has failed to agree to make payments on
the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and
(ii) The debtor has not in writing to the licensee disputed any
part of the claim: PROVIDED, That the licensee or employee may only
communicate the existence of a claim which has not been reduced to
judgment to the debtor's employer once unless the debtor's employer has
agreed to additional communications.
(d) A licensee may for the purpose of locating the debtor or
locating assets of the debtor communicate the existence of a claim to
any person who might reasonably be expected to have knowledge of the
whereabouts of a debtor or the location of assets of the debtor if the
claim is reduced to judgment, or if not reduced to judgment, when:
(i) The licensee or employee has notified or attempted to notify
the debtor in writing at his or her last known address or last known
place of employment concerning the claim and the debtor after a
reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has failed to agree to
make payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and
(ii) The debtor has not in writing disputed any part of the claim.
(e) A licensee may communicate the existence of a claim to its
customers or clients if the claim is reduced to judgment, or if not
reduced to judgment, when:
(i) The licensee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in
writing at his or her last known address or last known place of
employment concerning the claim and the debtor after a reasonable time
has failed to pay the claim or has failed to agree to make payments on
the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and
(ii) The debtor has not in writing disputed any part of the claim.
(10) Threaten the debtor with impairment of his or her credit
rating if a claim is not paid.
(11) Communicate with the debtor after notification in writing from
an attorney representing such debtor that all further communications
relative to a claim should be addressed to the attorney: PROVIDED,
That if a licensee requests in writing information from an attorney
regarding such claim and the attorney does not respond within a
reasonable time, the licensee may communicate directly with the debtor
until he, she, or it again receives notification in writing that an
attorney is representing the debtor.
(12) Communicate with a debtor or anyone else in such a manner as
to harass, intimidate, threaten, or embarrass a debtor, including but
not limited to communication at an unreasonable hour, with unreasonable
frequency, by threats of force or violence, by threats of criminal
prosecution, and by use of offensive language. A communication shall
be presumed to have been made for the purposes of harassment if:
(a) It is made with a debtor or spouse in any form, manner, or
place, more than three times in a single week;
(b) It is made with a debtor at his or her place of employment more
than one time in a single week;
(c) It is made with the debtor or spouse at his or her place of
residence between the hours of 9:00 p.m. and 7:30 a.m.
(13) Communicate with the debtor through use of forms or
instruments that simulate the form or appearance of judicial process,
the form or appearance of government documents, or the simulation of a
form or appearance of a telegraphic or emergency message.
(14) Communicate with the debtor and represent or imply that the
existing obligation of the debtor may be or has been increased by the
addition of attorneys' fees, investigation fees, service fees, or any
other fees or charges when in fact such fees or charges may not legally
be added to the existing obligation of such debtor.
(15) Threaten to take any action against the debtor which the
licensee cannot legally take at the time the threat is made.
(16) Send any telegram or make any telephone calls to a debtor or
concerning a debt or for the purpose of demanding payment of a claim or
seeking information about a debtor, for which the charges are payable
by the addressee or by the person to whom the call is made.
(17) In any manner convey the impression that the licensee is
vouched for, bonded to or by, or is an instrumentality of the state of
Washington or any agency or department thereof.
(18) Collect or attempt to collect in addition to the principal
amount of a claim any sum other than allowable interest, collection
costs or handling fees expressly authorized by statute, and, in the
case of suit, ((attorney's)) attorneys' fees and taxable court costs.
A licensee may collect or attempt to collect collection costs and fees,
including contingent collection fees, as authorized by a written
agreement or contract, between the licensee's client and the debtor, in
the collection of a commercial claim. The amount charged to the debtor
for collection services shall not exceed thirty-five percent of the
commercial claim.
(19) Procure from a debtor or collect or attempt to collect on any
written note, contract, stipulation, promise or acknowledgment under
which a debtor may be required to pay any sum other than principal,
allowable interest, except as noted in subsection (18) of this section,
and, in the case of suit, ((attorney's)) attorneys' fees and taxable
court costs.
(20) Upon notification by a debtor that the debtor disputes all
debts arising from a series of dishonored checks, automated
clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit account, or other
preprinted written instruments, initiate oral contact with a debtor
more than one time in an attempt to collect from the debtor debts
arising from the identified series of dishonored checks, automated
clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit account, or other
preprinted written instruments when: (a) Within the previous one
hundred eighty days, in response to the licensee's attempt to collect
the initial debt assigned to the licensee and arising from the
identified series of dishonored checks, automated clearinghouse
transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written
instruments, the debtor in writing notified the licensee that the
debtor's checkbook or other series of preprinted written instruments
was stolen or fraudulently created; (b) the licensee has received from
the debtor a certified copy of a police report referencing the theft or
fraudulent creation of the checkbook, automated clearinghouse
transactions on a demand deposit account, or series of preprinted
written instruments; (c) in the written notification to the licensee or
in the police report, the debtor identified the financial institution
where the account was maintained, the account number, the magnetic ink
character recognition number, the full bank routing and transit number,
and the check numbers of the stolen checks, automated clearinghouse
transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written
instruments, which check numbers included the number of the check that
is the subject of the licensee's collection efforts; (d) the debtor
provides, or within the previous one hundred eighty days provided, to
the licensee a legible copy of a government-issued photo
identification, which contains the debtor's signature and which was
issued prior to the date of the theft or fraud identified in the police
report; (e) the debtor advised the licensee that the subject debt is
disputed because the identified check, automated clearinghouse
transaction on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written
instrument underlying the debt is a stolen or fraudulently created
check or instrument; and (f) information on the checks, automated
clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit account, or other
preprinted written instruments are currently in the licensee's files
that identically match the information provided by the debtor in (c) of
this subsection.
The licensee is not in violation of this subsection if the licensee
initiates oral contact with the debtor more than one time in an attempt
to collect debts arising from the identified series of dishonored
checks, automated clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit
account, or other preprinted written instruments when: (i) The
licensee acted in good faith and relied on their established practices
and procedures for batching, recording, or packeting debtor accounts,
and the licensee inadvertently initiates oral contact with the debtor
in an attempt to collect debts in the identified series subsequent to
the initial debt assigned to the licensee; (ii) the licensee is
following up on collection of a debt assigned to the licensee, and the
debtor has previously requested more information from the licensee
regarding the subject debt; (iii) the debtor has notified the licensee
that the debtor disputes only some, but not all the debts arising from
the identified series of dishonored checks, automated clearinghouse
transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written
instruments, in which case the licensee shall be allowed to initiate
oral contact with the debtor one time for each debt arising from the
series of identified checks, automated clearinghouse transactions on a
demand deposit account, or written instruments and initiate additional
oral contact for those debts that the debtor acknowledges do not arise
from stolen or fraudulently created checks or written instruments; (iv)
the oral contact is in the context of a judicial, administrative,
arbitration, mediation, or similar proceeding; or (v) the oral contact
is made for the purpose of investigating, confirming, or authenticating
the information received from the debtor, to provide additional
information to the debtor, or to request additional information from
the debtor needed by the licensee to accurately record the debtor's
information in the licensee's records.

Sec. 9 RCW 19.16.250 and 2001 c 217 s 5 and 2001 c 47 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
No licensee or employee of a licensee shall:
(1) Directly or indirectly aid or abet any unlicensed person to
engage in business as a collection agency in this state or receive
compensation from such unlicensed person: PROVIDED, That nothing in
this chapter shall prevent a licensee from accepting, as forwardee,
claims for collection from a collection agency or attorney whose place
of business is outside the state.
(2) Collect or attempt to collect a claim by the use of any means
contrary to the postal laws and regulations of the United States postal
department.
(3) Publish or post or cause to be published or posted, any list of
debtors commonly known as "bad debt lists" or threaten to do so. For
purposes of this chapter, a "bad debt list" means any list of natural
persons alleged to fail to honor their lawful debts. However, nothing
herein shall be construed to prohibit a licensee from communicating to
its customers or clients by means of a coded list, the existence of a
check dishonored because of insufficient funds, not sufficient funds or
closed account by the financial institution servicing the debtor's
checking account: PROVIDED, That the debtor's identity is not readily
apparent: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the licensee complies with the
requirements of subsection (9)(e) of this section.
(4) Have in his or her possession or make use of any badge, use a
uniform of any law enforcement agency or any simulation thereof, or
make any statements which might be construed as indicating an official
connection with any federal, state, county, or city law enforcement
agency, or any other governmental agency, while engaged in collection
agency business.
(5) Perform any act or acts, either directly or indirectly,
constituting the practice of law.
(6) Advertise for sale or threaten to advertise for sale any claim
as a means of endeavoring to enforce payment thereof or agreeing to do
so for the purpose of soliciting claims, except where the licensee has
acquired claims as an assignee for the benefit of creditors or where
the licensee is acting under court order.
(7) Use any name while engaged in the making of a demand for any
claim other than the name set forth on his, her, or its current license
issued hereunder.
(8) Give or send to any debtor or cause to be given or sent to any
debtor, any notice, letter, message, or form which represents or
implies that a claim exists unless it shall indicate in clear and
legible type:
(a) The name of the licensee and the city, street, and number at
which he or she is licensed to do business;
(b) The name of the original creditor to whom the debtor owed the
claim if such name is known to the licensee or employee: PROVIDED,
That upon written request of the debtor, the licensee shall make a
reasonable effort to obtain the name of such person and provide this
name to the debtor;
(c) If the notice, letter, message, or form is the first notice to
the debtor or if the licensee is attempting to collect a different
amount than indicated in his, her, or its first notice to the debtor,
an itemization of the claim asserted must be made including:
(i) Amount owing on the original obligation at the time it was
received by the licensee for collection or by assignment;
(ii) Interest or service charge, collection costs, or late payment
charges, if any, added to the original obligation by the original
creditor, customer or assignor before it was received by the licensee
for collection, if such information is known by the licensee or
employee: PROVIDED, That upon written request of the debtor, the
licensee shall make a reasonable effort to obtain information on such
items and provide this information to the debtor;
(iii) Interest or service charge, if any, added by the licensee or
customer or assignor after the obligation was received by the licensee
for collection;
(iv) Collection costs, if any, that the licensee is attempting to
collect;
(v) Attorneys' fees, if any, that the licensee is attempting to
collect on his, her, or its behalf or on the behalf of a customer or
assignor;
(vi) Any other charge or fee that the licensee is attempting to
collect on his, her, or its own behalf or on the behalf of a customer
or assignor.
(9) Communicate or threaten to communicate, the existence of a
claim to a person other than one who might be reasonably expected to be
liable on the claim in any manner other than through proper legal
action, process, or proceedings except under the following conditions:
(a) A licensee or employee of a licensee may inform a credit
reporting bureau of the existence of a claim: PROVIDED, That if the
licensee or employee of a licensee reports a claim to a credit
reporting bureau, the licensee shall upon receipt of written notice
from the debtor that any part of the claim is disputed, forward a copy
of such written notice to the credit reporting bureau. If the claim
arises from a notice of infraction issued under RCW 46.63.030(3) and
referred to the licensee under RCW 3.02.045(6) and 19.16.500(5), the
licensee may not inform a credit reporting bureau of the existence of
a claim unless the claim referred arises from more than two notices of
infraction, or the total original monetary penalty or penalties for the
infraction or infractions, exclusive of additional penalties and
surcharges, exceeds seventy-five dollars;
(b) A licensee or employee in collecting or attempting to collect
a claim may communicate the existence of a claim to a debtor's employer
if the claim has been reduced to a judgment;
(c) A licensee or employee in collecting or attempting to collect
a claim that has not been reduced to judgment, may communicate the
existence of a claim to a debtor's employer if:
(i) The licensee or employee has notified or attempted to notify
the debtor in writing at his or her last known address or place of
employment concerning the claim and the debtor after a reasonable time
has failed to pay the claim or has failed to agree to make payments on
the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and
(ii) The debtor has not in writing to the licensee disputed any
part of the claim: PROVIDED, That the licensee or employee may only
communicate the existence of a claim which has not been reduced to
judgment to the debtor's employer once unless the debtor's employer has
agreed to additional communications.
(d) A licensee may for the purpose of locating the debtor or
locating assets of the debtor communicate the existence of a claim to
any person who might reasonably be expected to have knowledge of the
whereabouts of a debtor or the location of assets of the debtor if the
claim is reduced to judgment, or if not reduced to judgment, when:
(i) The licensee or employee has notified or attempted to notify
the debtor in writing at his or her last known address or last known
place of employment concerning the claim and the debtor after a
reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has failed to agree to
make payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and
(ii) The debtor has not in writing disputed any part of the claim.
(e) A licensee may communicate the existence of a claim to its
customers or clients if the claim is reduced to judgment, or if not
reduced to judgment, when:
(i) The licensee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in
writing at his last known address or last known place of employment
concerning the claim and the debtor after a reasonable time has failed
to pay the claim or has failed to agree to make payments on the claim
in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and
(ii) The debtor has not in writing disputed any part of the claim.
(10) Threaten the debtor with impairment of his or her credit
rating if a claim is not paid.
(11) Communicate with the debtor after notification in writing from
an attorney representing such debtor that all further communications
relative to a claim should be addressed to the attorney: PROVIDED,
That if a licensee requests in writing information from an attorney
regarding such claim and the attorney does not respond within a
reasonable time, the licensee may communicate directly with the debtor
until he or it again receives notification in writing that an attorney
is representing the debtor.
(12) Communicate with a debtor or anyone else in such a manner as
to harass, intimidate, threaten, or embarrass a debtor, including but
not limited to communication at an unreasonable hour, with unreasonable
frequency, by threats of force or violence, by threats of criminal
prosecution, and by use of offensive language. A communication shall
be presumed to have been made for the purposes of harassment if:
(a) It is made with a debtor or spouse in any form, manner, or
place, more than three times in a single week;
(b) It is made with a debtor at his or her place of employment more
than one time in a single week;
(c) It is made with the debtor or spouse at his or her place of
residence between the hours of 9:00 p.m. and 7:30 a.m.
(13) Communicate with the debtor through use of forms or
instruments that simulate the form or appearance of judicial process,
the form or appearance of government documents, or the simulation of a
form or appearance of a telegraphic or emergency message.
(14) Communicate with the debtor and represent or imply that the
existing obligation of the debtor may be or has been increased by the
addition of attorneys' fees, investigation fees, service fees, or any
other fees or charges when in fact such fees or charges may not legally
be added to the existing obligation of such debtor.
(15) Threaten to take any action against the debtor which the
licensee cannot legally take at the time the threat is made.
(16) Send any telegram or make any telephone calls to a debtor or
concerning a debt or for the purpose of demanding payment of a claim or
seeking information about a debtor, for which the charges are payable
by the addressee or by the person to whom the call is made.
(17) In any manner convey the impression that the licensee is
vouched for, bonded to or by, or is an instrumentality of the state of
Washington or any agency or department thereof.
(18) Collect or attempt to collect in addition to the principal
amount of a claim any sum other than allowable interest, collection
costs or handling fees expressly authorized by statute, and, in the
case of suit, ((attorney's)) attorneys' fees and taxable court costs.
A licensee may collect or attempt to collect collection costs and fees,
including contingent collection fees, as authorized by a written
agreement or contract, between the licensee's client and the debtor, in
the collection of a commercial claim. The amount charged to the debtor
for collection services shall not exceed thirty-five percent of the
commercial claim.
(19) Procure from a debtor or collect or attempt to collect on any
written note, contract, stipulation, promise or acknowledgment under
which a debtor may be required to pay any sum other than principal,
allowable interest, except as noted in subsection (18) of this section,
and, in the case of suit, ((attorney's)) attorneys' fees and taxable
court costs.
(20) Upon notification by a debtor that the debtor disputes all
debts arising from a series of dishonored checks, automated
clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit account, or other
preprinted written instruments, initiate oral contact with a debtor
more than one time in an attempt to collect from the debtor debts
arising from the identified series of dishonored checks, automated
clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit account, or other
preprinted written instruments when: (a) Within the previous one
hundred eighty days, in response to the licensee's attempt to collect
the initial debt assigned to the licensee and arising from the
identified series of dishonored checks, automated clearinghouse
transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written
instruments, the debtor in writing notified the licensee that the
debtor's checkbook or other series of preprinted written instruments
was stolen or fraudulently created; (b) the licensee has received from
the debtor a certified copy of a police report referencing the theft or
fraudulent creation of the checkbook, automated clearinghouse
transactions on a demand deposit account, or series of preprinted
written instruments; (c) in the written notification to the licensee or
in the police report, the debtor identified the financial institution
where the account was maintained, the account number, the magnetic ink
character recognition number, the full bank routing and transit number,
and the check numbers of the stolen checks, automated clearinghouse
transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written
instruments, which check numbers included the number of the check that
is the subject of the licensee's collection efforts; (d) the debtor
provides, or within the previous one hundred eighty days provided, to
the licensee a legible copy of a government-issued photo
identification, which contains the debtor's signature and which was
issued prior to the date of the theft or fraud identified in the police
report; and (e) the debtor advised the licensee that the subject debt
is disputed because the identified check, automated clearinghouse
transaction on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written
instrument underlying the debt is a stolen or fraudulently created
check or instrument.
The licensee is not in violation of this subsection if the licensee
initiates oral contact with the debtor more than one time in an attempt
to collect debts arising from the identified series of dishonored
checks, automated clearinghouse transactions on a demand deposit
account, or other preprinted written instruments when: (i) The
licensee acted in good faith and relied on their established practices
and procedures for batching, recording, or packeting debtor accounts,
and the licensee inadvertently initiates oral contact with the debtor
in an attempt to collect debts in the identified series subsequent to
the initial debt assigned to the licensee; (ii) the licensee is
following up on collection of a debt assigned to the licensee, and the
debtor has previously requested more information from the licensee
regarding the subject debt; (iii) the debtor has notified the licensee
that the debtor disputes only some, but not all the debts arising from
the identified series of dishonored checks, automated clearinghouse
transactions on a demand deposit account, or other preprinted written
instruments, in which case the licensee shall be allowed to initiate
oral contact with the debtor one time for each debt arising from the
series of identified checks, automated clearinghouse transactions on a
demand deposit account, or written instruments and initiate additional
oral contact for those debts that the debtor acknowledges do not arise
from stolen or fraudulently created checks or written instruments; (iv)
the oral contact is in the context of a judicial, administrative,
arbitration, mediation, or similar proceeding; or (v) the oral contact
is made for the purpose of investigating, confirming, or authenticating
the information received from the debtor, to provide additional
information to the debtor, or to request additional information from
the debtor needed by the licensee to accurately record the debtor's
information in the licensee's records.

Sec. 10 RCW 19.16.100 and 2001 c 47 s 1 and 2001 c 43 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall
have the following meanings:
(1) "Person" includes individual, firm, partnership, trust, joint
venture, association, or corporation.
(2) "Collection agency" means and includes:
(a) Any person directly or indirectly engaged in soliciting claims
for collection, or collecting or attempting to collect claims owed or
due or asserted to be owed or due another person;
(b) Any person who directly or indirectly furnishes or attempts to
furnish, sells, or offers to sell forms represented to be a collection
system or scheme intended or calculated to be used to collect claims
even though the forms direct the debtor to make payment to the creditor
and even though the forms may be or are actually used by the creditor
himself or herself in his or her own name;
(c) Any person who in attempting to collect or in collecting his or
her own claim uses a fictitious name or any name other than his or her
own which would indicate to the debtor that a third person is
collecting or attempting to collect such claim.
(3) "Collection agency" does not mean and does not include:
(a) Any individual engaged in soliciting claims for collection, or
collecting or attempting to collect claims on behalf of a licensee
under this chapter, if said individual is an employee of the licensee;
(b) Any individual collecting or attempting to collect claims for
not more than one employer, if all the collection efforts are carried
on in the name of the employer and if the individual is an employee of
the employer;
(c) Any person whose collection activities are carried on in his,
her, or its true name and are confined and are directly related to the
operation of a business other than that of a collection agency, such as
but not limited to trust companies, savings and loan associations,
building and loan associations, abstract companies doing an escrow
business, real estate brokers, public officers acting in their official
capacities, persons acting under court order, lawyers, insurance
companies, credit unions, loan or finance companies, mortgage banks,
and banks;
(d) Any person who on behalf of another person prepares or mails
monthly or periodic statements of accounts due if all payments are made
to that other person and no other collection efforts are made by the
person preparing the statements of account;
(e) An "out-of-state collection agency" as defined in this chapter;
or
(f) Any person while acting as a debt collector for another person,
both of whom are related by common ownership or affiliated by corporate
control, if the person acting as a debt collector does so only for
persons to whom it is so related or affiliated and if the principal
business of the person is not the collection of debts.
(4) "Out-of-state collection agency" means a person whose
activities within this state are limited to collecting debts from
debtors located in this state by means of interstate communications,
including telephone, mail, or facsimile transmission, from the person's
location in another state on behalf of clients located outside of this
state, but does not include any person who is excluded from the
definition of the term "debt collector" under the federal fair debt
collection practices act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1692a(6)).
(5) "Claim" means any obligation for the payment of money or thing
of value arising out of any agreement or contract, express or implied,
and also includes public debts arising from a notice of infraction
issued under RCW 46.63.030(3) and referred to collection agencies under
RCW 19.16.500(5) and 3.02.045(6).
(6) "Statement of account" means a report setting forth only
amounts billed, invoices, credits allowed, or aged balance due.
(7) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(8) "Client" or "customer" means any person authorizing or
employing a collection agency to collect a claim.
(9) "Licensee" means any person licensed under this chapter.
(10) "Board" means the Washington state collection agency board.
(11) "Debtor" means any person owing or alleged to owe a claim.
(12) "Commercial claim" means any obligation for payment of money
or thing of value arising out of any agreement or contract, express or
implied, where the transaction which is the subject of the agreement or
contract is not primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

Sec. 11 RCW 19.182.040 and 1993 c 476 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as authorized under subsection (2) of this section, no
consumer reporting agency may make a consumer report containing any of
the following items of information:
(a) Bankruptcies that, from date of adjudication of the most recent
bankruptcy, antedate the report by more than ten years;
(b) Suits and judgments that, from date of entry, antedate the
report by more than seven years or until the governing statute of
limitations has expired, whichever is the longer period;
(c) Paid tax liens that, from date of payment, antedate the report
by more than seven years;
(d) Accounts placed for collection or charged to profit and loss
that antedate the report by more than seven years;
(e) Records of arrest, indictment, or conviction of crime that,
from date of disposition, release, or parole, antedate the report by
more than seven years;
(f) Any other adverse item of information that antedates the report
by more than seven years;
(g) Any debt that arises from a notice of infraction for standing,
stopping, or parking violations issued under RCW 46.63.030(3), unless
the debt arises from more than two notices of infraction, or the total
original monetary penalty or penalties for the infraction or
infractions, exclusive of additional penalties and surcharges, exceeds
seventy-five dollars.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section is not applicable in the case of
a consumer report to be used in connection with:
(a) A credit transaction involving, or that may reasonably be
expected to involve, a principal amount of fifty thousand dollars or
more;
(b) The underwriting of life insurance involving, or that may
reasonably be expected to involve, a face amount of fifty thousand
dollars or more; or
(c) The employment of an individual at an annual salary that
equals, or that may reasonably be expected to equal, twenty thousand
dollars or more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act applies to a notice of infraction
issued on or after July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 8 of this act expires April 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Section 9 of this act takes effect April 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Except for section 9 of this act, this act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2003.

--- END ---