BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the inability
of cities and towns to continue to utilize the petition method of
annexation established by RCW 35.13.125 through 35.13.160 and
35A.14.120 through 35A.14.150 poses a threat to the public peace,
health, and safety, and to the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions. This threat results from, without
limitation, the absence of a statutory means for municipal annexation
of property that is unoccupied, or that is occupied only by persons
ineligible to vote in city or town elections; the inability of cities
and towns to complete annexations that are necessary for orderly
implementation of plans, regulations, and ordinances relating to growth
management; and the uncertainty regarding enforceability of agreements
for municipal water and sewer service provided by cities and towns to
customers outside municipal boundaries. The legislature further finds
that this threat results from the decision of the Washington state
supreme court in Grant County Fire Protection District No. 5 v. City of
Moses Lake, 145 Wn.2d 702 (2002), holding that the petition method of
annexation authorized by RCW 35.13.125 through 35.13.160 and 35A.14.120
through 35A.14.150 is unconstitutional.
(2) The legislature intends this act to provide for a limited
method of annexation by cities and towns based on utility service or
utility agreements with property owners.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.13.180 and 1994 c 81 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) City and town ((councils of second class cities and towns))
legislative bodies may by a majority vote annex new unincorporated
territory outside the city or town limits, whether contiguous or
noncontiguous for park, cemetery, or other municipal purposes when such
territory is owned by the city or town or all of the owners of the real
property in the territory give their written consent to the annexation.
(2) City and town legislative bodies may by a majority vote annex
new unincorporated contiguous territory outside the city or town limits
where the city or town provides, or by agreement with property owners
has committed to provide, retail sewer or retail water service to at
least seventy-five percent of the territory proposed for annexation.
(3) Territory annexed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
must be within the urban growth areas established pursuant to RCW
36.70A.110, or, for jurisdictions not planning under RCW 36.70A.040,
otherwise qualified for annexation.
(4) Prior to a city or town legislative body voting on an
annexation pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the legislative
body shall fix a date for a public hearing thereon and cause notice of
the hearing to be published in one issue of a newspaper of general
circulation in the city or town. The notice shall also contain a legal
description of the territory proposed for annexation, shall be posted
in three public places within the territory proposed for annexation,
and shall specify the time and place of the hearing and invite
interested persons to appear and voice approval or disapproval of the
annexation.
(5) Following the hearing, the city or town legislative body shall
determine by ordinance whether annexation shall be made. Subject to
RCW 35.02.170, the legislative body may annex all or any portion of the
proposed area but may not include in the annexation any territory not
described in the notice. Upon passage of the ordinance a certified
copy shall be filed with the board of county commissioners of the
county in which the annexed territory is located.

Sec. 3 RCW 35A.14.300 and 1981 c 332 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Legislative bodies of code cities may by a majority vote annex
territory outside the limits of such city whether contiguous or
noncontiguous for any municipal purpose when such territory is owned by
the city.
(2) Legislative bodies of code cities may by a majority vote annex
contiguous territory outside the limits of such city where the city
provides, or by agreement with property owners has committed to
provide, retail sewer or retail water service to at least seventy-five
percent of the territory proposed for annexation.
(3) Territory annexed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
must be within the urban growth areas established pursuant to RCW
36.70A.110, or, for jurisdictions not planning under RCW 36.70A.040,
otherwise qualified for annexation.
(4) Prior to a city legislative body voting on an annexation
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the legislative body shall
fix a date for a public hearing thereon and cause notice of the hearing
to be published in one or more issues of a newspaper of general
circulation in the city. The notice shall also contain a legal
description of the territory proposed for annexation, shall be posted
in three public places within the territory proposed for annexation,
and shall specify the time and place of the hearing and invite
interested persons to appear and voice approval or disapproval of the
annexation.
(5) Following the hearing, if the city legislative body determines
to effect the annexation, they shall do so by ordinance. Subject to
RCW 35A.14.410, the ordinance may annex all or any portion of the
proposed area but may not include in the annexation any territory not
described in the notice. Upon passage of the annexation ordinance a
certified copy shall be filed with the board of county commissioners of
the county in which the annexed territory is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The method of annexation provided for in
sections 2 and 3 of this act shall be an alternative to existing
methods, not superseding any other.

Sec. 5 RCW 64.06.020 and 1996 c 301 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a transaction for the sale of residential real property, the
seller shall, unless the buyer has expressly waived the right to
receive the disclosure statement, or unless the transfer is exempt
under RCW 64.06.010, deliver to the buyer a completed real property
transfer disclosure statement in the following format and that
contains, at a minimum, the following information:

INSTRUCTIONS TO THE SELLER
Please complete the following form. Do not leave any spaces blank. If
the question clearly does not apply to the property write "NA". If the
answer is "yes" to any * items, please explain on attached sheets.
Please refer to the line number(s) of the question(s) when you provide
your explanation(s). For your protection you must date and sign each
page of this disclosure statement and each attachment. Delivery of the
disclosure statement must occur not later than five business days,
unless otherwise agreed, after mutual acceptance of a written contract
to purchase between a buyer and a seller.

NOTICE TO THE BUYER
THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES ARE MADE BY THE SELLER(S), CONCERNING THE
CONDITION OF THE PROPERTY LOCATED AT . . . . . . . . . . . .
("THE PROPERTY"), OR AS LEGALLY DESCRIBED ON ATTACHED EXHIBIT A.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN THIS FORM ARE PROVIDED BY THE SELLER ON THE
BASIS OF SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME THIS
DISCLOSURE FORM IS COMPLETED BY THE SELLER. YOU HAVE THREE BUSINESS
DAYS, UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED, FROM THE SELLER'S DELIVERY OF THIS
SELLER'S DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO RESCIND YOUR AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING
YOUR SEPARATE SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO THE SELLER,
UNLESS YOU WAIVE THIS RIGHT AT OR PRIOR TO ENTERING INTO A SALE
AGREEMENT. THE FOLLOWING ARE DISCLOSURES MADE BY THE SELLER AND ARE
NOT THE REPRESENTATIONS OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.
THIS INFORMATION IS FOR DISCLOSURE ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED TO BE A
PART OF ANY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE BUYER AND THE SELLER.

FOR A MORE COMPREHENSIVE EXAMINATION OF THE SPECIFIC CONDITION OF THIS
PROPERTY YOU ARE ADVISED TO OBTAIN AND PAY FOR THE SERVICES OF A
QUALIFIED SPECIALIST TO INSPECT THE PROPERTY ON YOUR BEHALF, FOR
EXAMPLE, ARCHITECTS, ENGINEERS, LAND SURVEYORS, PLUMBERS, ELECTRICIANS,
ROOFERS, BUILDING INSPECTORS, OR PEST AND DRY ROT INSPECTORS. THE
PROSPECTIVE BUYER AND THE OWNER MAY WISH TO OBTAIN PROFESSIONAL ADVICE
OR INSPECTIONS OF THE PROPERTY AND TO PROVIDE FOR APPROPRIATE
PROVISIONS IN A CONTRACT BETWEEN THEM WITH RESPECT TO ANY ADVICE,
INSPECTION, DEFECTS OR WARRANTIES.

Seller . . . . is/ . . . . is not occupying the property.

I. SELLER'S DISCLOSURES:

*If "Yes" attach a copy or explain. If necessary use an attached sheet.

1. TITLE

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Do you have legal authority to
sell the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Is title to the property subject
to any of the following?

(1) First right of refusal

(2) Option

(3) Lease or rental agreement

(4) Life estate?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any encroachments,
boundary agreements, or boundary
disputes?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Are there any rights of way,
easements, or access limitations
that may affect the owner's use of
the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any written
agreements for joint maintenance
of an easement or right of way?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Is there any study, survey
project, or notice that would
adversely affect the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Are there any pending or
existing assessments against the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Are there any zoning
violations, nonconforming uses, or
any unusual restrictions on the
subject property that would affect
future construction or remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *I. Is there a boundary survey for
the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *J. Are there any covenants,
conditions, or restrictions which
affect the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *K. Are there any utility service
or annexation agreements that
affect the property?

2. WATER

A. Household Water

(1) The source of the water is
[ ] Public [ ] Community
[ ] Private [ ] Shared

(2) Water source information:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *a. Are there any written
agreements for shared
water source?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *b. Is there an easement
(recorded or unrecorded)
for access to and/or
maintenance of the water
source?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *c. Are any known
problems or repairs
needed?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *d. Does the source
provide an adequate year
round supply of potable
water?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) Are there any water
treatment systems for the
property? [ ]Leased [ ]Owned

B. Irrigation

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Are there any water rights
for the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) If they exist, to your
knowledge, have the water
rights been used during the
last five-year period?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) If so, is the certificate
available?

C. Outdoor Sprinkler System

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Is there an outdoor
sprinkler system for the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) Are there any defects in
the outdoor sprinkler system?

3. SEWER/SEPTIC SYSTEM

A. The property is served by: [ ]
Public sewer main, [ ] Septic tank
system [ ] Other disposal system
(describe)

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. If the property is served by a
public or community sewer main,
is the house connected to the
main?

C. Is the property currently
subject to a sewer capacity charge?

D. If the property is connected to
a septic system:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Was a permit issued for its
construction, and was it
approved by the city or county
following its construction?

(2) When was it last pumped:

. . . . . . . . . . . . , 19. . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) Are there any defects in
the operation of the septic
system?

[ ] Don't know (4) When was it last
inspected?

. . . . . . . . . . . . , 19. . .

By Whom: . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Don't know (5) How many bedrooms was
the system approved for?

. . . . . . . . . . . . bedrooms

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Do all plumbing fixtures,
including laundry drain, go to the
septic/sewer system? If no,
explain: . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Are you aware of any changes
or repairs to the septic system?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know G. Is the septic tank system,
including the drainfield, located
entirely within the boundaries of
the property?

4. STRUCTURAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Has the roof leaked?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know If yes, has it been repaired?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Have there been any
conversions, additions, or
remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *1. If yes, were all building
permits obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *2. If yes, were all final
inspections obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know C. Do you know the age of the
house? If yes, year of original
construction:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Do you know of any settling,
slippage, or sliding of either the
house or other
structures/improvements located
on the property? If yes, explain:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Do you know of any defects
with the following: (Please check
applicable items)

□ Foundations
□ Decks
□ Exterior Walls

□ Chimneys □ Interior Walls □ Fire Alarm

□ Doors □ Windows □ Patio

□ Ceilings □ Slab Floors □ Driveways

□ Pools □ Hot Tub □ Sauna

□ Sidewalks □ Outbuildings □ Fireplaces

□ Garage Floors □ Walkways

□ Other □ Wood Stoves

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Was a pest or dry rot,
structural or "whole house"
inspection done? When and by
whom was the inspection
completed? . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Since assuming ownership,
has your property had a problem
with wood destroying organisms
and/or have there been any
problems with pest control,
infestations, or vermin?

5. SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES

If the following systems or fixtures
are included with the transfer, do
they have any existing defects:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Electrical system,
including wiring, switches,
outlets, and service

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Plumbing system,
including pipes, faucets,
fixtures, and toilets

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Hot water tank

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Garbage disposal

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Appliances

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Sump pump

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Heating and cooling
systems

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Security system
[ ] Owned [ ] Leased

*I. Other . . . . . . . . . . . .

6. COMMON INTEREST

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Is there a Home Owners'
Association? Name of Association
. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Are there regular periodic
assessments:

$. . . per [ ] Month [ ] Year
[ ] Other . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any pending special
assessments?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Are there any shared
"common areas" or any joint
maintenance agreements (facilities
such as walls, fences, landscaping,
pools, tennis courts, walkways, or
other areas co-owned in undivided
interest with others)?

7. GENERAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Is there any settling, soil,
standing water, or drainage
problems on the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Does the property contain fill
material?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Is there any material damage
to the property or any of the
structure from fire, wind, floods,
beach movements, earthquake,
expansive soils, or landslides?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. Is the property in a designated
flood plain?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any substances,
materials, or products that may be
an environmental hazard such as,
but not limited to, asbestos,
formaldehyde, radon gas, lead-based paint, fuel or chemical
storage tanks, and contaminated
soil or water on the subject
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Are there any tanks or
underground storage tanks (e.g.,
chemical, fuel, etc.) on the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Has the property ever been
used as an illegal drug
manufacturing site?

8. FULL DISCLOSURE BY
SELLERS

A. Other conditions or defects:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Are there any other material
defects affecting this property or its
value that a prospective buyer
should know about?

B. Verification:

The foregoing answers and
attached explanations (if any) are
complete and correct to the best of
my/our knowledge and I/we have
received a copy hereof. I/we
authorize all of my/our real estate
licensees, if any, to deliver a copy
of this disclosure statement to
other real estate licensees and all
prospective buyers of the property.

DATE . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .

II. BUYER'S ACKNOWLEDGMENT

A. As buyer(s), I/we acknowledge the duty to pay diligent
attention to any material defects which are known to
me/us or can be known to me/us by utilizing diligent
attention and observation.

B. Each buyer acknowledges and understands that the
disclosures set forth in this statement and in any
amendments to this statement are made only by the
seller.

C. Buyer (which term includes all persons signing the
"buyer's acceptance" portion of this disclosure
statement below) hereby acknowledges receipt of a
copy of this disclosure statement (including
attachments, if any) bearing seller's signature.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN THIS FORM ARE PROVIDED BY THE SELLER ON THE
BASIS OF SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME OF
DISCLOSURE. YOU, THE BUYER, HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS, UNLESS OTHERWISE
AGREED, FROM THE SELLER'S DELIVERY OF THIS SELLER'S DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT TO RESCIND YOUR AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING YOUR SEPARATE SIGNED
WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO THE SELLER UNLESS YOU WAIVE THIS
RIGHT OF RESCISSION.
BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS REAL PROPERTY
TRANSFER DISCLOSURE STATEMENT AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE DISCLOSURES
MADE HEREIN ARE THOSE OF THE SELLER ONLY, AND NOT OF ANY REAL ESTATE
LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.
DATE . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . . . .

(2) The real property transfer disclosure statement shall be for
disclosure only, and shall not be considered part of any written
agreement between the buyer and seller of residential real property.
The real property transfer disclosure statement shall be only a
disclosure made by the seller, and not any real estate licensee
involved in the transaction, and shall not be construed as a warranty
of any kind by the seller or any real estate licensee involved in the
transaction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---