BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29.79 RCW
to read as follows:
If an initiative to the legislature or an initiative to the people
requires public funds to be spent for its implementation, the text of
the initiative must either specify an increase in an existing state
revenue source, or provide a new tax or fee, or specify a combination
thereof, adequate to fully implement the measure. If an initiative to
the legislature or an initiative to the people repeals or restricts the
collection of an existing tax or fee, reduces the rate or amount of an
existing tax or fee, or creates or extends an exemption for an existing
tax or fee, the text of the initiative must specify how the reductions
are to be reflected in the affected budgets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary of state shall create an initiative fiscal review
committee and, after consultation with the governor and the attorney
general, appoint the members of the committee. The members must be
citizens of the United States and must be actual residents of this
state. The committee must be organized by the first day of January of
the year that the committee will review initiatives, and shall review
each initiative to the people that is certified for the ballot. The
office of the secretary of state shall provide staff support to the
committee. The committee shall hold meetings at such times, places,
and manners as the secretary of state may designate. As the state
officer with the responsibility for certifying measures to the ballot,
the secretary of state should maintain a neutral and unbiased course of
action throughout the appointment and assistance of the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The initiative fiscal review committee may consist of the
following persons as are determined to be qualified, available, and
have expertise: Two persons licensed to practice law in the state of
Washington, two persons experienced in analyzing fiscal impacts of
legislation, two persons who are professional economists, two persons
employed as professors by a recognized college or university, two
persons from recognized research organizations, and two persons who are
members of the public. A retired judge of a Washington superior court
or court of appeals or a retired justice of the Washington supreme
court may serve as an ex officio member and may cast a vote as a member
of the committee only to break a tie vote. The fact that the secretary
of state is unable to fill each position on the committee does not
prevent the committee from performing its duty under this section so
long as the secretary of state makes a good-faith effort to fill each
position with a person who is qualified and available. The secretary
of state shall ensure that the membership of the committee reflects a
fair-minded balance of perspectives.
(2) The committee shall determine, as well as possible, the short-term and long-term effects of each initiative to the people that is
certified for the general election ballot, and issue a report detailing
those effects.
(3) The members of the committee should maintain a neutral and
unbiased course of action throughout the public hearing process and
throughout the fiscal review process. The committee shall not support
or oppose an initiative, but shall fairly and objectively evaluate and
describe the fiscal impact of the initiative. Any member of the
committee who is affiliated with an initiative campaign or who is
affiliated with the subject of an initiative shall recuse himself or
herself from all activity and proceedings of the committee pertaining
to that initiative.
(4) Members of the committee may receive no compensation for their
services, but are eligible to receive a subsistence allowance and
travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 29.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The initiative fiscal review committee shall examine any
projected increase or decrease in revenues, costs, expenditures, or
indebtedness that state or local governments will experience if an
initiative to the people is approved. The committee shall consider any
disproportionate impacts that an initiative to the people will have on
public and private entities, the fiscal and economic costs of the
initiative, the costs of compliance for public and private entities,
whether the initiative affects the collection of a tax or fee used to
fund general government, and the rate or amount of a tax or fee
impacted by the initiative.
(2)(a) No later than August 31st, the committee shall issue a final
report for each certified initiative to the people. The report must
reflect the findings, conclusions, and opinions of a majority of the
members of the committee. The final report must include a brief
summary, not to exceed thirty-five words for printing on the ballot, an
extended summary, not to exceed one hundred words for printing in the
voters' pamphlet, and may include any other information that the
committee considers relevant and appropriate. The members of the
committee who do not agree with the findings, conclusions, and opinions
contained in the majority report may issue a minority report, to be
published as an addendum to the majority full report. The final report
is advisory only, and copies must be made available to members of the
public upon request.
(b) The report of the committee must be analytical, factual,
objective, impartial, and written in clear and concise language. The
information, findings, conclusions, and opinions regarding the fiscal
and economic costs and effects of the initiative must be supported with
specificity. The committee may consider the contents of fiscal impact
statements prepared by the office of financial management under RCW
29.79.075, as well as any other material provided by private or public
agencies, entities, persons, or other sources. Where appropriate, a
final report may include both estimated dollar amounts and a
description placing the estimated dollar amounts into context.

Sec. 5 RCW 29.30.081 and 1990 c 59 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On the top of each ballot there shall be printed instructions
directing the voters how to mark the ballot, including write-in votes.
After the instructions and before the offices shall be placed the
questions of adopting constitutional amendments or any other state
measure authorized by law to be submitted to the voters at that
election. A brief summary of the report of the initiative fiscal
review committee, not to exceed thirty-five words, must be placed on
the ballot beneath the ballot title.
(2) The candidate or candidates of the major political party which
received the highest number of votes from the electors of this state
for the office of president of the United States at the last
presidential election shall appear first following the appropriate
office heading, the candidate or candidates of the other major
political parties shall follow according to the votes cast for their
nominees for president at the last presidential election, and
independent candidates and the candidate or candidates of all other
parties shall follow in the order of their qualification with the
secretary of state.
(3) The names of candidates for president and vice-president for
each political party shall be grouped together with a single response
position for a voter to indicate his or her choice.
(4) All paper ballots and ballot cards shall be sequentially
numbered in such a way to permit removal of such numbers without
leaving any identifying marks on the ballot.

Sec. 6 RCW 29.79.075 and 2002 c 139 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of financial management, in consultation with the
secretary of state, the attorney general, and any other appropriate
state or local agency, shall prepare a fiscal impact statement for each
of the following state ballot measures: (1) An initiative to the
people that is certified to the ballot; (2) an initiative to the
legislature that will appear on the ballot; (3) an alternative measure
appearing on the ballot that the legislature proposes to an initiative
to the legislature; (4) a referendum bill referred to voters by the
legislature; and (5) a referendum measure appearing on the ballot.
Fiscal impact statements must be written in clear and concise language
and avoid legal and technical terms when possible, and may include
easily understood graphics.
A fiscal impact statement must describe any projected increase or
decrease in revenues, costs, expenditures, or indebtedness that the
state or local governments will experience if the ballot measure
((were)) is approved by state voters. Where appropriate, a fiscal
impact statement may include both estimated dollar amounts and a
description placing the estimated dollar amounts into context. A
fiscal impact statement must include both a summary of not to exceed
one hundred words and a more detailed statement that includes the
assumptions that were made to develop the fiscal impacts.
Fiscal impact statements must be available online from the
secretary of state's web site ((and included in the state voters'
pamphlet)).

Sec. 7 RCW 29.79.300 and 1965 c 9 s 29.79.300 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor of each county shall cause to be printed on the
official ballots for the election at which initiative and referendum
measures are to be submitted to the people for their approval or
rejection the serial numbers and ballot titles, certified by the
secretary of state, and the brief summary of the report of the
initiative fiscal review committee, not to exceed thirty-five words.
They shall appear under separate headings in the order of the serial
numbers as follows:
(1) Measures proposed for submission to the people by initiative
petition shall be under the heading, "Proposed by Initiative Petition";
(2) Bills passed by the legislature and ordered referred to the
people by referendum petition shall be under the heading, "Passed by
the Legislature and Ordered Referred by Petition";
(3) Bills passed and referred to the people by the legislature
shall be under the heading, "Proposed to the People by the
Legislature";
(4) Measures proposed to the legislature and rejected or not acted
upon shall be under the heading, "Proposed to the Legislature and
Referred to the People";
(5) Measures proposed to the legislature and alternative measures
passed by the legislature in lieu thereof shall be under the heading,
"Initiated by Petition and Alternative by Legislature."

Sec. 8 RCW 29.81.250 and 2002 c 139 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall determine the format and layout of the
voters' pamphlet. The secretary of state shall print the pamphlet in
clear, readable type on a size, quality, and weight of paper that in
the judgment of the secretary of state best serves the voters. The
pamphlet must contain a table of contents. Federal and state offices
must appear in the pamphlet in the same sequence as they appear on the
ballot. Measures and arguments must be printed in the order specified
by RCW 29.79.300.
The voters' pamphlet must provide the following information for
each statewide issue on the ballot:
(1) The legal identification of the measure by serial designation
or number;
(2) The official ballot title of the measure;
(3) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the law
as it presently exists;
(4) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the
effect of the proposed measure if it becomes law;
(5) The ((fiscal impact statement prepared under RCW 29.79.075))
extended summary of the report of the initiative fiscal review
committee, not to exceed one hundred words;
(6) The total number of votes cast for and against the measure in
the senate and house of representatives, if the measure has been passed
by the legislature;
(7) An argument advocating the voters' approval of the measure
together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;
(8) An argument advocating the voters' rejection of the measure
together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;
(9) Each argument or rebuttal statement must be followed by the
names of the committee members who submitted them, and may be followed
by a telephone number that citizens may call to obtain information on
the ballot measure;
(10) The full text of each measure.

Sec. 9 RCW 29.81.310 and 1999 c 260 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The maximum number of words for statements submitted by
candidates is as follows: State representative, one hundred words;
state senator, judge of the superior court, judge of the court of
appeals, justice of the supreme court, and all state offices voted upon
throughout the state, except that of governor, two hundred words;
president and vice-president, United States senator, United States
representative, and governor, three hundred words.
(2) Arguments written by committees under RCW ((29.81.230))
29.81.240 may not exceed two hundred fifty words in length.
(3) Rebuttal arguments written by committees may not exceed
seventy-five words in length.
(4) The extended summary of the report of the initiative fiscal
review committee may not exceed one hundred words.
(5) The secretary of state shall allocate space in the pamphlet
based on the number of candidates or nominees for each office.

Sec. 10 RCW 42.17.130 and 1979 ex.s. c 265 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
No elective official nor any employee of his office nor any person
appointed to or employed by any public office or agency may use or
authorize the use of any of the facilities of a public office or
agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign
for election of any person to any office or for the promotion of or
opposition to any ballot proposition. Facilities of public office or
agency include, but are not limited to, use of stationery, postage,
machines, and equipment, use of employees of the office or agency
during working hours, vehicles, office space, publications of the
office or agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the office
or agency: PROVIDED, That the foregoing provisions of this section
shall not apply to the following activities:
(1) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose a ballot proposition so long as (a) any required notice of
the meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition,
and (b) members of the legislative body or members of the public are
afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;
(2) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry;
(3) Activities ((which)) that are part of the normal and regular
conduct of the office or agency, including making an objective and fair
presentation of facts relevant to the impact a ballot proposition may
have on the office or agency.

Sec. 11 RCW 42.52.180 and 1995 c 397 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use
of facilities of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of
assisting a campaign for election of a person to an office or for the
promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition. Knowing
acquiescence by a person with authority to direct, control, or
influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using
public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation
of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited
to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state
employees of the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by
the agency.
(2) This section shall not apply to the following activities:
(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose a ballot proposition as long as (i) required notice of the
meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition, and
(ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public are
afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;
(b) Use of public facilities by state officers for the preparation
or delivery of objective and neutral written or verbal communications
initiated by them consisting of explanatory information on the impact
of any ballot proposition that foreseeably may affect a matter that
falls within their constitutional or statutory responsibilities;
(c) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes of this subsection,
it is not a violation of this section for an elected official to
respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to make
incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an
actual, measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards
shall adopt by rule a definition of measurable expenditure;
(((c))) (d) Activities that are part of the normal and regular
conduct of the office or agency; and
(((d))) (e) De minimis use of public facilities by statewide
elected officials and legislators incidental to the preparation or
delivery of permissible communications((, including written and verbal
communications initiated by them of their views on ballot propositions
that foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their
constitutional or statutory responsibilities)).
(3) As to state officers and employees, this section operates to
the exclusion of RCW 42.17.130.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.07.030 and 1982 c 35 s 186 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall:
(1) Keep a register of and attest the official acts of the
governor;
(2) Affix the state seal, with his attestation, to commissions,
pardons, and other public instruments to which the signature of the
governor is required, and also attestations and authentications of
certificates and other documents properly issued by the secretary;
(3) Record all articles of incorporation, deeds, or other papers
filed in the secretary of state's office;
(4) Receive and file all the official bonds of officers required to
be filed with the secretary of state;
(5) Take and file in the secretary of state's office receipts for
all books distributed by him;
(6) Create and assist the initiative fiscal review committee;
(7) Certify to the legislature the election returns for all
officers required by the Constitution to be so certified, and certify
to the governor the names of all other persons who have received at any
election the highest number of votes for any office the incumbent of
which is to be commissioned by the governor;
(((7))) (8) Furnish, on demand, to any person paying the fees
therefor, a certified copy of all or any part of any law, record, or
other instrument filed, deposited, or recorded in the secretary of
state's office;
(((8))) (9) Present to the speaker of the house of representatives,
at the beginning of each regular session of the legislature during an
odd-numbered year, a full account of all purchases made and expenses
incurred by the secretary of state on account of the state;
(((9))) (10) File in his office an impression of each and every
seal in use by any state officer;
(([(10)])) (11) Keep a record of all fees charged or received by
the secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 1 of this act takes effect January
1, 2004, if the proposed amendment to Article II, section 1 of the
state Constitution (HJR --) is validly submitted to and is approved and
ratified by the voters at a general election held in November 2003. If
the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, section 1 of this
act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---