BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that during the
2003 legislative session, the commissioner of public lands brought
forward the idea of the creation of a legacy trust in the form of House
Bill No. 1803 and Senate Bill No. 5750. The legacy trust was proposed
to serve as a new land trust, managed by the department of natural
resources, the revenue from which would be dedicated to supporting
recreational access and use on state-owned lands.
(2) The legislature concurs with the commissioner of public lands
that the demand for the use and enjoyment of public lands is extensive
and growing and that the quality of recreational experiences, safety to
the public, upkeep of trails and facilities, and protection of land
from ecological impacts may be in jeopardy.
(3) The legislature further finds that the ideas brought forward by
the commissioner of public lands, as well as other ideas for achieving
similar goals, deserves the attention of select legislators in the
interim between the 2003 and 2004 legislative sessions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A joint select committee on the legacy
trust proposal is established to consider, study, and review the legacy
trust proposal brought forward by the commissioner of public lands for
establishing a stable, long-term revenue source to support recreational
access and use on state-owned lands, and to consider any alternate
methods to achieve the same goals. One alternative for the committee
to research is any options available for obtaining federal forest land
located in Washington to be used as part of the legacy trust's land
base.
(2) The membership of the joint select committee consists of:
(a) One member from each caucus of the house of representatives,
selected by the speaker of the house or representatives, from the
membership of the agriculture and natural resources committee;
(b) One member from each caucus of the house of representatives,
selected by the speaker of the house of representatives, from the
membership of the capital budget committee;
(c) One member from each caucus of the senate, selected by the
president of the senate, from the membership of the parks, fish, and
wildlife committee;
(d) One member from each caucus of the senate, selected by the
president of the senate, from the membership of the ways and means
committee.
(3) The staff for the committee will be provided by the office of
program research and senate committee services.
(4) The committee will report to the legislature by December 31,
2003, with its recommendations in the form of draft legislation.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.01.612 and 1993 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section,
the department of natural resources shall manage and control all lands
acquired by the state by escheat or under chapter 79.66 RCW and all
lands acquired by the state by deed of sale or gift or by devise,
except such lands which are conveyed or devised to the state to be used
for a particular purpose. The department shall lease the lands in the
same manner as school lands. When the department determines to sell
the lands, they shall be initially offered for sale either at public
auction or direct sale to public agencies as provided in this chapter.
If the lands are not sold at public auction, the department may, with
approval of the board of natural resources, market the lands through
persons licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW or through other commercially
feasible means at a price not lower than the land's appraised value and
pay necessary marketing costs from the sale proceeds. Necessary
marketing costs includes reasonable costs associated with advertising
the property and paying commissions. The proceeds of the lease or sale
of all such lands shall be deposited into the appropriate fund in the
state treasury in the manner prescribed by law, except if the grantor
in any such deed or the testator in case of a devise specifies that the
proceeds of the sale or lease of such lands be devoted to a particular
purpose such proceeds shall be so applied. The department may employ
agents to rent any escheated, deeded, or devised lands, or lands
acquired under chapter 79.66 RCW, for such rental and time and in such
manner as the department directs, but the property shall not be rented
by such agent for a longer period than one year and no tenant is
entitled to compensation for any improvement which he makes on such
property. The agent shall cause repairs to be made to the property as
the department directs, and shall deduct the cost thereof, together
with such compensation and commission as the department authorizes,
from the rentals of such property and the remainder which is collected
shall be transmitted monthly to the department of natural resources.
(2) When land is acquired by the state by escheat which because of
its location or features may be suitable for park purposes, the
department shall notify the state parks and recreation commission. The
department and the commission shall jointly evaluate the land for its
suitability for park purposes, based upon the features of the land and
the need for park facilities in the vicinity. Where the department and
commission determine that such land is suitable for park purposes, it
shall be offered for transfer to the commission, or, in the event that
the commission declines to accept the land, to the local jurisdiction
providing park facilities in that area. When so offered, the payment
required by the recipient agency shall not exceed the costs incurred by
the department in managing and protecting the land since receipt by the
state.
(3) The department may review lands acquired by escheat since
January 1, 1983, for their suitability for park purposes, and apply the
evaluation and transfer procedures authorized by subsection (2) of this
section.
(4)(a) Any land that is acquired by the state between the effective
date of this act and June 30, 2004, either by gift, escheat, devise, or
grant, that is not conveyed for a particular purpose, may be held by
the department separate from any existing land trusts.
(b) If by June 30, 2004, the legislature establishes the legacy
trust pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of this act, or any other land trust
designed to provide financial support for the management of public
recreational access and use on state-owned lands, then any land held
pursuant to this subsection shall be transferred to the new land trust
and managed pursuant to legislative direction.
(c) If by June 30, 2004, the legislature does not create a new land
trust, any land held pursuant to this subsection must be managed in
accordance with subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire July
1, 2004.

--- END ---