BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.155.070 and 1995 c 77 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Special educational and training programs provided by the state and
the school districts thereof for children with disabilities ((may))
shall be extended to include children ((of preschool)) birth to three
years of age. School districts shall provide early intervention
services to all children with disabilities from birth to three years of
age. School districts shall provide these early intervention services
in partnership with county birth-to-three lead agencies and birth-to-three providers. School districts which extend such special programs
to children of preschool age shall be entitled to the regular
apportionments from state and county school funds, as provided by law,
and in addition to allocations from state excess cost funds made
available for such special services for those children with
disabilities who are given such special services. The payor of last
resort for early intervention services provided under this section
shall be the designated birth-to-three lead agency.

--- END ---