BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.34.010 and 2002 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The number of district judges to be elected in each county shall
be: Adams, two; Asotin, one; Benton, three; Chelan, two; Clallam, two;
Clark, five; Columbia, one; Cowlitz, two; Douglas, one; Ferry, one;
Franklin, one; Garfield, one; Grant, two; Grays Harbor, two; Island,
one; Jefferson, one; King, ((twenty-six)) twenty-one; Kitsap, three;
Kittitas, two; Klickitat, two; Lewis, two; Lincoln, one; Mason, one;
Okanogan, two; Pacific, two; Pend Oreille, one; Pierce, eleven; San
Juan, one; Skagit, two; Skamania, one; Snohomish, eight; Spokane, ten;
Stevens, one; Thurston, two; Wahkiakum, one; Walla Walla, two; Whatcom,
two; Whitman, one; Yakima, four. This number may be increased only as
provided in RCW 3.34.020.

--- END ---