BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Multipurpose passenger vehicle (MPV)" means a motor vehicle,
except a trailer, designed to carry ten or fewer persons that is
constructed either on a truck chassis or with special features for
occasional off-road operation.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.37.513 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 43 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) When any motor vehicle was originally equipped with bumpers or
any other collision energy absorption or attenuation system, that
system shall be maintained in good operational condition, and no person
shall remove or disconnect, and no owner shall cause or knowingly
permit the removal or disconnection of, any part of that system except
temporarily in order to make repairs, replacements, or adjustments.
(2)(a) It is unlawful to operate a passenger car, truck, or
multipurpose passenger vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of
10,000 pounds or less on a public street or highway of this state if
the vehicle has been altered or modified so that it has a bumper height
greater than that specified in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Maximum bumper heights are as follows:

Vehicle Class Front Back

Passenger Vehicles 22 inches 22 inches

Trucks and MPVs

4,500 lbs. and under GVWR: 24 inches 26 inches

4,501 lbs. to 7,500 lbs. GVWR: 27 inches 29 inches

7,401 lbs. to 10,000 lbs. GVWR: 28 inches 30 inches

Adding an additional bumper will not meet these requirements.
(c) The bumper on any vehicle so altered or modified must be:
(i) At least 4.5 inches in vertical height, centered on the
vehicle's centerline, and extend no less than the width of the
respective wheel track distances;
(ii) Attached to the vehicle in a manner equivalent to the original
manufacturer's installation;
(iii) Horizontal load bearing and attached to the vehicle frame to
effectively transfer energy when impacted.

--- END ---