BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
The legislature finds that, in order to raise student achievement
to and beyond state standards, schools and school districts need
predictable and sustainable funding that is not reduced when
achievement and improvement goals are met. The legislature also finds
that, in order to unify programs that assist struggling students while
saving time and resources, schools and districts need relief from laws
and rules that inhibit flexibility and creative problem solving. In
addition, schools and districts should have complete flexibility in the
use of state student assistance funds as long as the schools and
districts are meeting state academic and improvement goals. The
legislature further finds that, once schools and districts have these
tools, the state should hold them accountable for meeting state student
learning goals, using an accountability system that is aligned to the
accountability provisions in the federal "no child left behind act of
2001."
Therefore, the legislature intends to help schools and districts in
their efforts to raise student achievement by combining state and
federal assistance programs, removing state rules that inhibit
flexibility in those programs, and aligning the state accountability
system with the provisions in federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
The purpose of the learning assistance program in chapter 28A.165
RCW and student achievement funds under RCW 28A.505.210 is to help all
students meet or exceed the state's academic standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT PLANS AND CORRECTIVE ACTIONS. (1) When a school or
school district is identified for school improvement under state or
federal law, the school district shall:
(a) Make public the list of schools so identified;
(b) With the assistance of parents, school and district staff,
interested members of the community, and the superintendent of public
instruction, help the identified school or identified district perform
an educational audit and develop or revise an improvement plan;
(c) Approve each school's improvement plan;
(d) Offer students in the identified school or identified district
an opportunity to move to another school or district that is not so
identified, and provide transportation to the new school or district;
and
(e) Subject to funding provided for this purpose by the state or
federal government, provide supplemental services to eligible students.
(2) When a school is identified for corrective action under state
or federal law, in addition to the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, the superintendent of public instruction shall work with the
school and the school district to implement one or more of the
following actions:
(a) Provision of an outside expert adviser for the school;
(b) Public notification of the decision to put the school under
corrective action;
(c) Implementation of a new curriculum, including the provision of
professional development for teachers and paraeducators responsible for
helping students learn the curriculum;
(d) Revision of the school's internal organization;
(e) Reduction of the authority of principals and others making
decisions on the management of the identified school;
(f) Replacement of school staff; or
(g) Extension of the school day or school year.
(3) When a school district is identified for corrective action
under state or federal law, in addition to the provisions of subsection
(1) of this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall
work with the district to implement one or more of the following
actions:
(a) Deferment, withholding, or reduction of federal and nonbasic
education state funds;
(b) Implementation of a new curriculum, including the provision of
professional development for staff; or
(c) Replacement of district personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning January 1, 2004, a board of school directors may not
enter or extend any contract or agreement that prevents or inhibits the
implementation of any of the provisions of section 3 of this act for a
school or district identified for school improvement or corrective
action.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.165.030 and 1999 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 28A.165.010 through 28A.165.090.
(1) "Basic skills" means reading, mathematics, and language arts as
well as readiness activities associated with such skills.
(2) "Placement testing" means the administration of objective
measures by a school district for the purposes of diagnosing the basic
skills achievement levels, determining the basic skills areas of
greatest need, and establishing the learning assistance needs of
individual students in conformance with instructions established by the
superintendent of public instruction for such purposes.
(3) "Approved program" means a program conducted pursuant to a plan
submitted by a district and approved by the superintendent of public
instruction under RCW 28A.165.040.
(4) "Participating student" means a student in kindergarten through
grade ((nine)) twelve who scores below grade level in basic skills, as
determined by placement testing, and who is identified under RCW
28A.165.050 to receive additional services or support under an approved
program.
(5) "Basic skills tests" means ((statewide)) tests ((at the third
grade level)) established pursuant to ((RCW 28A.230.190 and eighth
grade level established pursuant to RCW 28A.230.230)) district
policies, and state and federal law.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.165.060 and 1989 c 233 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Services or activities ((which)) that may be supported under an
approved program of learning assistance shall ((include but not be
limited to:
(1) Consultant teachers to assist classroom teachers in meeting the
needs of participating students;
(2) Instructional support staff and instructional assistants to
assist classroom teachers in meeting the needs of participating
students;
(3) In-service training for classroom teachers, instructional
support staff, and instructional assistants in multicultural
differences and the identification of learning problems or in
instructional methods for teaching students with learning problems;
(4) Special instructional programs for participating students, of
sufficient size, scope, and quality to address the needs of these
students and to give reasonable promise of substantial progress toward
meeting their educational objectives;
(5) Tutoring assistance during or after school or on Saturday
provided by instructional support staff, a student tutor, teacher, or
instructional assistant;
(6) In-service training for parents of participating students; and
(7) Counseling, with an emphasis on services for elementary
students who are in need of learning assistance, provided by
instructional support staff such as school counselors, school
psychologists, school nurses, and school social workers. Pursuant to
the provisions of section 4(2) of this act, learning assistance funds
may be used to provide counseling for students who in the absence of
counseling would likely become in need of such learning assistance))
emphasize best practices and research-based activities and
instructional techniques that have been proven effective in raising
student achievement.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.165.070 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 13 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
Each school district which has established an approved program
shall be eligible, as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction, for state funds made available for the purposes of such
programs.
(1) For the ((1995-96)) 2003-04 school year and thereafter, the
superintendent of public instruction shall distribute funds
appropriated for the learning assistance program in accordance with the
biennial appropriations act. The distribution formula shall be based
upon ((an assessment of students and)) student enrollment weighted by
a poverty factor.
(2) ((The distribution of funds is for allocation purposes only.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall recommend to the
legislature a new allocation formula that uses additional elements
consistent with performance-based education and the new assessment
system developed by the commission on student learning. The
superintendent of public instruction shall develop the recommendations
for a new allocation formula not later than the 1997-98 school year,
based upon the initial implementation of the assessment system for
reading, writing, communication, and mathematics.)) School districts
are strongly encouraged to provide the schools in their districts with
stable funding from this program and to refrain from reducing funding
when achievement and improvement goals are met by a school.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.505.120 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
If a local school district fails to comply with any binding
restrictions issued by the superintendent of public instruction, the
allocation of state funds for support of the local school district may
be withheld, pending an investigation of the reason for such
noncompliance by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. Written notice of the intent to withhold state funds,
with reasons stated for this action, shall be made to the school
district by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
before any portion of the state allocation is withheld.
The superintendent of public instruction may withhold, reduce, or
defer the allocation of all or a portion of federal and nonbasic
education state funding from a school district in corrective action, as
provided in section 3(3) of this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.505.210 and 2001 c 3 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) School districts shall have the authority to decide the best
use of student achievement funds to assist students in meeting and
exceeding the new, higher academic standards in each district
consistent with the provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2001.
(((1) Student achievement funds shall be allocated for the
following uses:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators,
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school;
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection.))
(2) Annually on or before May 1st, the school district board of
directors shall meet at the time and place designated for the purpose
of a public hearing on the proposed use of these funds to improve
student achievement for the coming year. Any person may appear or by
written submission have the opportunity to comment on the proposed plan
for the use of these funds. No later than August 31st, as a part of
the process under RCW 28A.505.060, each school district shall adopt a
plan for the use of these funds for the upcoming school year.
Annually, each school district shall provide to the citizens of their
district a public accounting of the funds made available to the
district during the previous school year under chapter 3, Laws of 2001,
how the funds were used, and the progress the district has made in
increasing student achievement, as measured by required state
assessments and other assessments deemed appropriate by the district.
Copies of this report shall be provided to the superintendent of public
instruction and to the academic achievement and accountability
commission.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.655.030 and 2002 c 37 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The powers and duties of the academic achievement and
accountability commission shall include, but are not limited to the
following:
(1) For purposes of statewide accountability, the commission shall:
(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
writing, science, and mathematics by subject and grade level as the
commission deems appropriate to improve student learning, once
assessments in these subjects are required statewide. The goals shall
be consistent with student privacy protection provisions of RCW
28A.655.090(7) and shall not conflict with requirements contained in
Title I of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965,
as amended. The goals may be established for all students,
economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient
students, students with disabilities, and students from
disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic
backgrounds. The commission may establish school and school district
goals addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction
goals for students in grades seven through twelve. ((The goals shall
be in addition to any goals adopted in RCW 28A.655.050. The commission
may also revise any goal adopted in RCW 28A.655.050.)) The commission
shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before each goal is
implemented, the commission shall present the goal to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the
committees' review and comment in a time frame that will permit the
legislature to take statutory action on the goal if such action is
deemed warranted by the legislature;
(b) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the
standard on the Washington assessment of student learning and determine
student scores that identify levels of student performance below and
beyond the standard. The commission shall set such performance
standards and levels in consultation with the superintendent of public
instruction and after consideration of any recommendations that may be
developed by any advisory committees that may be established for this
purpose;
(c) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify successful
schools and school districts and recommend to the superintendent of
public instruction schools and districts to be recognized for two types
of accomplishments, student achievement and improvements in student
achievement. Recognition for improvements in student achievement shall
include consideration of one or more of the following accomplishments:
(i) An increase in the percent of students meeting standards. The
level of achievement required for recognition may be based on the
achievement goals established by the legislature under RCW 28A.655.050
and the commission under (a) of this subsection;
(ii) Positive progress on an improvement index that measures
improvement in all levels of the assessment; and
(iii) Improvements despite challenges such as high levels of
mobility, poverty, English as a second language learners, and large
numbers of students in special populations as measured by either the
percent of students meeting the standard, or the improvement index.
When determining the baseline year or years for recognizing
individual schools, the commission may use the assessment results from
the initial years the assessments were administered, if doing so with
individual schools would be appropriate;
(d) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify schools and
school districts in need of assistance and those in which significant
numbers of students persistently fail to meet state standards. In its
deliberations, the commission shall consider the use of all statewide
mandated criterion-referenced and norm-referenced standardized tests;
(e) Identify, based on state and federal criteria and available
appropriations, schools and school districts ((in which state
intervention measures will be needed and a range of appropriate
intervention strategies, beginning no earlier than June 30, 2001, and
after the legislature has authorized a set of intervention strategies.
Beginning no earlier than June 30, 2001, and after the legislature has
authorized a set of intervention strategies, at the request of the
commission,)) for school improvement and corrective action. The
superintendent shall ((intervene in)) provide assistance as identified
under section 3 of this act to the school or school district ((and take
corrective actions. This chapter does not provide additional authority
for the commission or the superintendent of public instruction to
intervene in a school or school district)) so identified;
(f) Identify performance incentive systems that have improved or
have the potential to improve student achievement;
(g) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure
fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially
with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and ((a recommendation)) recommend to the
superintendent of public instruction ((of)) any improvements needed to
the system;
(h) Annually report by December 1st to the legislature, the
governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and the state board
of education on the progress, findings, and recommendations of the
commission. The report may include recommendations of actions to help
improve student achievement;
(i) By December 1, 2000, and by December 1st annually thereafter,
report to the education committees of the house of representatives and
the senate on the progress that has been made in achieving the reading
goal under RCW 28A.655.050 and any additional goals adopted by the
commission;
(j) Coordinate its activities with the state board of education and
the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(k) Seek advice from the public and all interested educational
organizations in the conduct of its work; and
(l) Establish advisory committees, which may include persons who
are not members of the commission;
(2) Holding meetings and public hearings, which may include
regional meetings and hearings;
(3) Hiring necessary staff and determining the staff's duties and
compensation. However, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide staff support to the commission until the
commission has hired its own staff, and shall provide most of the
technical assistance and logistical support needed by the commission
thereafter. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall be the fiscal agent for the commission. The commission may
direct the office of the superintendent of public instruction to enter
into subcontracts, within the commission's resources, with school
districts, teachers, higher education faculty, state agencies, business
organizations, and other individuals and organizations to assist the
commission in its deliberations; and
(4) Receiving per diem and travel allowances as permitted under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---