BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.115 and 1985 c 218 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The courses of instruction of both the University of Washington and
Washington State University shall embrace as major lines, pharmacy,
architecture, civil engineering, ((electrical engineering,)) mechanical
engineering, chemical engineering, and forest management as
distinguished from forest products and logging engineering which are
exclusive to the University of Washington. These major lines shall be
offered and taught at said institutions only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to any amendment to RCW 28B.10.115 after
January 1, 2003, that changes the major lines of instruction exclusive
to the University of Washington or Washington State University,
including the amendments in chapter . . ., Laws of 2003 (this act).
(2) If a four-year institution requests approval under RCW
28B.80.340 of a new degree program that is the result of legislation
enacted to change the terms of RCW 28B.10.115, the higher education
coordinating board shall conduct an independent analysis using
information from a variety of sources as part of the board's review of
the proposed program, including but not limited to information
submitted by the institution. Such information shall include:
(a) Detailed evidence of why the program is justified, including
the size and scope of student, employer, and community demand for the
program;
(b) The feasibility of using existing public or private capacity
for the program and comparisons of the state cost of providing existing
and proposed capacity. Any institution that offers programs under this
section shall comply with all applicable state rules and regulations;
(c) Projected future enrollment in the program and substantiation
of the enrollment estimates; and
(d) Additional information as requested by the board regarding
demand, need, and cost-effectiveness of the program.
(3) The higher education coordinating board shall submit a complete
analysis of a proposed program under this section to the higher
education committees of the legislature before making a final
determination regarding approval of the program.

--- END ---