BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person licensed to carry a handgun in any state the laws of
which recognize and give effect in that state to a concealed pistol
license issued under the laws of the state of Washington is authorized
to carry a pistol in this state. This section applies to a license
holder from another state only while the license holder is not a
resident of this state. A license holder from another state must carry
the handgun in compliance with the laws of this state.
(2) The attorney general shall periodically publish a list of
states the laws of which recognize and give effect in that state to a
concealed pistol license issued under the laws of the state of
Washington.

--- END ---