BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The office of financial management shall
conduct a comprehensive study of the Washington education finance
system, including examination of alternative teacher compensation
models.
(2) The study shall, at a minimum:
(a) Compare Washington's common school funding system with those in
other states that are beginning to link finance systems with education
reform and expected student learning outcomes;
(b) Review the role of state and local funding and levy
equalization policies in the Washington common school finance system,
building upon the 2002 joint task force on local effort assistance
report;
(c) Design alternative common school finance systems for
Washington, with consideration of the following principles:
(i) Aligning the finance system with the policy expectations and
goals established under education reform to provide all students the
opportunity to achieve state standards;
(ii) Recognizing staffing as a key component of school district
costs, including the number of and compensation for certificated
instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified
staff;
(iii) Providing stable and predictable funding for school
districts;
(iv) Supporting local flexibility in program delivery; and
(v) Providing accountability for taxpayers focused on student
learning outcomes;
(d) Design one or more alternative compensation models that:
(i) Attract and retain high performing teachers in all Washington
schools;
(ii) Reward teachers for improving their skills and knowledge in a
manner that translates into improved student learning;
(iii) Recognize participation in teacher mentoring programs; and
(iv) Recognize different career stages for teachers and the
leadership roles they perform in schools; and
(e) Design a prekindergarten finance system to maximize school
readiness and provide smooth transitions for children into
kindergarten.
(3)(a) A twenty-three member steering committee shall direct the
office of financial management in the system review and the development
of alternatives and recommendations.
(b) The governor and the superintendent of public instruction shall
jointly appoint the following members of the steering committee: A
school board director, two school district administrators, a school
principal, two certificated instructional staff, and a classified
school employee. When making appointments, the governor and the
superintendent shall consider regional representation on the committee,
including the need for urban, rural, and suburban district
perspectives.
(c) The governor shall appoint the following members of the
steering committee: An early childhood educator, a parent, a business
executive, and three public members.
(d) The steering committee shall include the superintendent of
public instruction, or the superintendent's designee.
(e) The steering committee shall also include eight legislators:
The speaker of the house of representatives, the senate majority
leader, the house of representatives and senate minority leaders, and
one additional member appointed by each major caucus of the house of
representatives and the senate.
(f) The governor, or the governor's appointee, shall chair the
committee.
(g) Appointments to the steering committee shall be completed
within thirty days of the effective date of this section.
(h) The committee may form an executive committee, create
subcommittees, designate alternative representatives, and define other
procedures, as needed, for the operation of the committee.
(i) Legislative members of the steering committee shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 44.04.120. Other
members of the steering committee shall, and members of subcommittees
may, be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
academic achievement and accountability commission, the state board of
education, and the professional educator standards board shall provide
data and technical expertise to support the study.
(5) The office of financial management shall report initial
findings and recommendations of the committee to the legislature,
including the education and fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and the senate, by June 30, 2004. A final report shall
be provided to the education and fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and the senate by December 20, 2004.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2005.

--- END ---