BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall study the uses, options, funding, and potential funding
of low-income rent voucher programs in the state. The report must
contain information on the opportunities allowed under federal
regulations to engage in innovative programs that involve private and
public entities, including for-profit and not-for-profit. The report
must also contain a survey of other state low-income rent voucher
programs. This report is due no later than January 15, 2004, and must
include suggested legislation to implement any opportunities the state
is eligible to pursue.

--- END ---