BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 21.35.005 and 1993 c 287 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Beneficiary form" means a registration of a security that
indicates the present owner of the security and the intention of the
owner regarding the person who will become the owner of the security
upon the death of the owner, referred to as a "beneficiary."
(2) "Devisee" means any person designated in a will to receive a
disposition of real or personal property.
(3) "Heirs" means those persons, including the surviving spouse,
who are entitled under the statutes of intestate succession to the
property of a decedent.
(4) "Person" means an individual, a corporation, an organization,
or other legal entity.
(5) "Personal representative" includes executor, administrator,
successor personal representative, special administrator, and persons
who perform substantially the same function under the law governing
their status.
(6) "Property" includes both real and personal property or any
interest therein and means anything that may be the subject of
ownership.
(7) "Register," including its derivatives, means to issue a
certificate showing the ownership of a certificated security or, in the
case of an uncertificated security, to initiate or transfer an account
showing ownership of securities.
(8) "Registering entity" means a person who originates or transfers
a security title by registration, and includes a broker maintaining
security accounts for customers and a transfer agent or other person
acting for or as an issuer of securities.
(9) "Security" means a share, participation, or other interest in
property, in a business, or in an obligation of an enterprise or other
issuer, and includes a certificated security, an uncertificated
security, and a security account.
(10) "Security account" means (a) a reinvestment account associated
with a security; a securities account with a broker; a cash balance in
a brokerage account; or cash, cash equivalents, interest, earnings, or
dividends earned or declared on a security in an account, a
reinvestment account, or a brokerage account, whether or not credited
to the account before the owner's death; ((or)) (b) an investment
management or custody account with a trust company or a trust division
of a bank with trust powers, including the securities in the account;
a cash balance in the account; and cash, cash equivalents, interest,
earnings, or dividends earned or declared on a security in the account,
whether or not credited to the account before the owner's death; or (c)
a cash balance or other property held for or due to the owner of a
security as a replacement for or product of an account security,
whether or not credited to the account before the owner's death.
(11) "State" includes any state of the United States, the District
of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and any territory or
possession subject to the legislative authority of the United States.

--- END ---