BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The accuracy of a patient's medical records is of great
importance. Under no circumstance shall any health care provider,
health care facility, or health carrier alter, distort, change, or
otherwise revise the original reporting of the patient's diagnosis,
treatment, condition, or prognosis, or the record containing such
documentation except to expand or broaden the accuracy of the record
content.
(2) Amendments, corrections, clarifications, or completions to a
medical record must be dated and identified as such.
(3) The author of the original record or the author of any change
in a record shall be identified. The patient shall be notified of any
change to the record.
(4) Violations of this section are considered unprofessional
conduct and are subject to discipline under chapter 18.130 RCW.

--- END ---