BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.34.020 and 2002 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Any change in the number of full and part-time district judges
after January 1, 1992, shall be determined by the legislature after
receiving a recommendation from the supreme court. The supreme court
shall make its recommendations to the legislature based on an objective
workload analysis that takes into account available judicial resources
and the caseload activity of each court.
(2) The administrator for the courts, under the supervision of the
supreme court, may consult with the board of judicial administration
and the district and municipal court judge's association in developing
the procedures and methods of applying the objective workload analysis.
(3) For each recommended change from the number of full and part-time district judges in any county as of January 1, 1992, the
administrator for the courts, under the supervision of the supreme
court, shall complete a judicial impact note detailing any local or
state cost associated with such recommended change.
(4) If the legislature approves an increase in the base number of
district judges in any county as of January 1, 1992, such increase in
the base number of district judges and all related costs may be paid
for by the county from moneys provided under RCW 82.14.310, and any
such costs shall be deemed to be expended for criminal justice purposes
as provided in RCW 82.14.315, and such expenses shall not constitute a
supplanting of existing funding.
(5)(a) A county legislative authority that desires to change the
number of full or part-time district judges from the base number on
January 1, 1992, must first request the assistance of the supreme
court. The administrator for the courts, under the supervision of the
supreme court, shall conduct an objective workload analysis and make a
recommendation of its findings to the legislature for consideration as
provided in this section. Changes in the number of district court
judges may only be made by the legislature in a year in which the
quadrennial election for district court judges is not held.
(b) The legislative authority of any county may change a part-time
district judge position to a full-time position.

Sec. 2 RCW 3.34.100 and 1992 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
If a district judge dies, resigns, is convicted of a felony, ceases
to reside in the district, fails to serve for any reason except
temporary disability, or if his or her term of office is terminated in
any other manner, the office shall be deemed vacant. The county
legislative authority shall fill all vacancies by appointment and the
judge thus appointed shall hold office until the next general election
and until a successor is elected and qualified. However, if a vacancy
in the office of district court judge occurs and the total number of
district court judges remaining in the county is equal to or greater
than the number of district court judges authorized in RCW 3.34.010
then the position shall remain vacant. District judges shall be
granted sick leave in the same manner as other county employees. A
district judge may receive when vacating office remuneration for unused
accumulated leave and sick leave at a rate equal to one day's monetary
compensation for each full day of accrued leave and one day's monetary
compensation for each four full days of accrued sick leave, the total
remuneration for leave and sick leave not to exceed the equivalent of
thirty days' monetary compensation.

Sec. 3 RCW 3.38.020 and 1984 c 258 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
The district court districting committee shall meet at the call of
the prosecuting attorney to prepare ((a)) or amend the plan for the
districting of the county into one or more district court districts in
accordance with the provisions of chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW. The
plan shall include the following:
(1) The boundaries of each district proposed to be established;
(2) The number of judges to be elected in each district or
electoral district, if any. In determining the number of judges to be
elected, the districting committee shall consider the results of an
objective workload analysis conducted by the administrator for the
courts;
(3) The location of the central office, courtrooms and records of
each court;
(4) The other places in the district, if any, where the court shall
sit;
(5) The number and location of district court commissioners to be
authorized, if any;
(6) The departments, if any, into which each district court shall
be initially organized, including municipal departments provided for in
chapter 3.46 RCW;
(7) The name of each district; and
(8) The allocation of the time and allocation of salary of each
judge who will serve part time in a municipal department.

Sec. 4 RCW 3.38.040 and 1984 c 258 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The districting committee may meet for the purpose of amending
the districting plan at any time on call of the county legislative
authority, the chairperson of the committee or a majority of its
members. Amendments to the plan shall be submitted to the county
legislative authority not later than March 15th of each year for
adoption by the county legislative authority following the same
procedure as with the original districting plan. Amendments shall be
adopted not later than May 1st following submission by the districting
committee. Any amendment which would reduce the salary or shorten the
term of any judge shall not be effective until the next regular
election for district judge. All other amendments may be effective on
a date set by the county legislative authority.
(2) The districting committee shall meet within forty-five days of
the effective date of changes in the number of judges to be elected in
each district court district, or electoral district, if any.
Amendments to the plan concerning the number of judges to be elected in
each district court district, or electoral district, if any, shall be
submitted to the county legislative authority not later than ninety
days after the effective date of changes in RCW 3.34.010, and the
amendments shall be adopted not later than one hundred eighty days
after the effective date of changes in RCW 3.34.010.

--- END ---