BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.390 and 1993 c 2 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
One or more of the following civil remedies and sanctions may be
imposed by court order in addition to any other remedies provided by
law:
(1) If the court finds that the violation of any provision of this
chapter by any candidate or political committee probably affected the
outcome of any election, the result of said election may be held void
and a special election held within sixty days of such finding. ((Any
action to void an election shall be commenced within one year of the
date of the election in question.)) In order for an election to be
voided, the complaint that initiated an investigation conducted by or
on behalf of the commission that formed the basis of the commission's
findings must have been filed with the commission no more than six
months after the date of the election in question. If the
investigation conducted by or on behalf of the commission that formed
the basis for the commission's findings was based upon the commission's
own motion, rather than a complaint, the investigation must have been
initiated no more than six months after the date of the election in
question. It is intended that this remedy be imposed freely in all
appropriate cases to protect the right of the electorate to an informed
and knowledgeable vote.
(2) If any lobbyist or sponsor of any grass roots lobbying campaign
violates any of the provisions of this chapter, his registration may be
revoked or suspended and he may be enjoined from receiving compensation
or making expenditures for lobbying: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
imposition of such sanction shall not excuse said lobbyist from filing
statements and reports required by this chapter.
(3) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter
may be subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars
for each such violation. However, a person or entity who violates RCW
42.17.640 may be subject to a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars or
three times the amount of the contribution illegally made or accepted,
whichever is greater.
(4) Any person who fails to file a properly completed statement or
report within the time required by this chapter may be subject to a
civil penalty of ten dollars per day for each day each such delinquency
continues.
(5) Any person who fails to report a contribution or expenditure
may be subject to a civil penalty equivalent to the amount he failed to
report.
(6) The court may enjoin any person to prevent the doing of any act
herein prohibited, or to compel the performance of any act required
herein.

--- END ---