BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Recent studies suggest that research-based treatment programs,
such as aggression replacement training and functional family therapy,
used within the juvenile justice system reduces recidivism rates only
if such programs are delivered competently; and
(b) When research-based treatment programs are delivered
competently, they ultimately save the state more money than they cost
to run.
(2) Therefore, the legislature declares that:
(a) Ensuring competence within research-based treatment programs is
necessary for juveniles to receive the optimal chance at rehabilitation
and for the state to get the highest rate of return on its money;
(b) Ensuring competency within research-based treatment programs
includes, but is not limited to, finding and hiring qualified
providers, training and continually educating providers, managing and
overseeing the delivery of treatment services, and retaining quality
providers; and
(c) Effective quality control within research-based treatment
programs is vital to making these programs work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 In order to establish a specific measuring
tool that state agencies in the juvenile justice system can use to
ensure quality control and competent delivery of research-based
treatment services to youth, the Washington state institute for public
policy shall develop general criteria designed to ensure adherence to
proven practices in research-based treatment programs. For the
purposes of determining funding, the legislature may require an agency
to demonstrate how it has met the criteria. The criteria shall include
measures for ongoing and accurate monitoring and tracking of competent
treatment delivery and for continual improvement of treatment delivery.
The criteria must be developed and presented to the legislature by
January 1, 2004.

--- END ---