BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each degree-granting public or private postsecondary
educational institution that provides on-campus or group housing shall
provide information on meningococcal disease to, at a minimum, those
students or prospective students who are offered on-campus or group
housing. The information about meningococcal disease shall include:
(a) Symptoms, risks, especially as the risks relate to
circumstances of group living arrangements, and treatment; and
(b) Current recommendations from the United States centers for
disease control and prevention regarding the receipt of vaccines for
meningococcal disease and where the vaccination can be received.
(2) Each postsecondary educational institution shall place the
information on the residential housing application, contract, or
agreement that is received or agreed to by the student before taking
possession of the residence.
(3) This section shall not be construed to require the department
of health or the postsecondary educational institution to provide the
vaccination to students.
(4) The department of health shall be consulted regarding the
preparation of the information materials provided to the first-time
students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---