BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that family and
medical leave is designed to help working people fulfill both their
work and family responsibilities. The legislature also finds that,
when an individual who takes family and medical leave subsequently
becomes eligible to receive unemployment compensation, the maximum
benefits payable to the individual are decreased and the weekly benefit
amount payable to the individual may be decreased. The legislature
intends to eliminate these unintended consequences of taking family and
medical leave.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.20.170 and 1945 c 35 s 85 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, an individual who has
received an initial determination finding that he or she is potentially
entitled to receive waiting period credit or benefits shall, during the
benefit year, be given waiting period credit or be paid benefits in
accordance with such initial determination for any week with respect to
which the conditions of eligibility for such credit or benefits, as
prescribed by this title, are met, unless the individual is denied
waiting period credit or benefits under the disqualification provisions
of this title.
(b) An individual who has received an initial determination under
(a) of this subsection must be notified in writing that he or she is
entitled to a redetermination of the amount of benefits payable if he
or she has taken unpaid family and medical leave totaling six or more
weeks, whether taken consecutively or intermittently, during his or her
base year and if the claim equals less than thirty times the weekly
benefit amount. The notice must describe the method by which the
claimant may request a redetermination under this subsection. If the
notified claimant requests the redetermination, the department must
reevaluate the claimant's base year as provided in RCW 50.04.020(2)(b).
(2) All benefits shall be paid through employment offices in
accordance with such regulations as the commissioner may prescribe.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.04.020 and 1994 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) "Base year" with respect to each individual, shall mean
((either)) the first four of the last five completed calendar quarters
((or)), the last four completed calendar quarters immediately preceding
the first day of the individual's benefit year, or, if applicable under
subsection (2) of this section, an additional base year.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, for the
purposes of establishing a benefit year, the department shall initially
use the first four of the last five completed calendar quarters as the
base year. If a benefit year is not established using the first four
of the last five calendar quarters as the base year, the department
shall use the last four completed calendar quarters as the base year.
(b) If a claimant requests a redetermination under RCW
50.20.170(1)(b), the department shall evaluate an additional base year,
using the four quarters with the highest wages in the last six
completed calendar quarters. The base year, for the purposes of
establishing the claimant's benefit year, must be either the base year
initially used under (a) of this subsection or the additional base year
used under this subsection, whichever base year entitles the claimant
to the higher maximum benefits under RCW 50.20.120(1). However, any
benefit year established under this subsection may not use calendar
quarters that were previously used to establish a prior benefit year.
(3) Computations using the last four completed calendar quarters
shall be based on available wage items processed as of the close of
business on the day preceding the date of application. The department
shall promptly contact employers to request assistance in obtaining
wage information for the last completed calendar quarter if it has not
been reported at the time of initial application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Family and medical leave" means leave taken under either the
federal family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act of Feb. 5, 1993, P.L.
103-3, 107 Stat. 6) or the state family leave law, chapter 49.78 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 and 3 of this act apply to claims
that have an effective date on or after July 6, 2003.

--- END ---