BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.220 and 1993 c 371 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Satisfaction of the basic education program requirements
identified in RCW 28A.150.210 shall be considered to be implemented by
the following program:
(a) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in kindergarten at least a total instructional offering of four hundred
fifty hours. The program shall include instruction in the essential
academic learning requirements under RCW ((28A.630.885)) 28A.655.060
and such other subjects and such activities as the school district
shall determine to be appropriate for the education of the school
district's students enrolled in such program;
(b) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in grades one through twelve, at least a district-wide annual average
total instructional hour offering of one thousand hours. The state
board of education may define alternatives to classroom instructional
time for students in grades nine through twelve enrolled in alternative
learning experiences. The state board of education shall establish
rules to determine annual average instructional hours for districts
including fewer than twelve grades. The program shall include the
essential academic learning requirements under RCW ((28A.630.885))
28A.655.060 and such other subjects and such activities as the school
district shall determine to be appropriate for the education of the
school district's students enrolled in such group;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages.
(2) Nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to require individual students to attend school for any
particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.
(3)(a) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade
basic educational program shall be accessible to all students who are
five years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than
twenty-one years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred
eighty school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by
a school district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten((: PROVIDED, That effective May 1,
1979,)). A school district may schedule the last five school days of
the one hundred and eighty day school year for noninstructional
purposes in the case of students who are graduating from high school,
including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early
release from school upon the request of a student, and all such
students may be claimed as a full time equivalent student to the extent
they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260. Up to five additional days may be forgone
for graduating seniors in the event of school days canceled due to
district-wide or school emergency closures.
(b) The definitions in this subsection (3)(b) apply throughout this
subsection (3).
(i) "District-wide emergency closure" means that all school
buildings in the school district are unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible,
or inoperative due to one or more unforeseen natural events, mechanical
failures, or actions or inactions by one or more persons.
(ii) "School emergency closure" means a school in the school
district comprised of more than one school that is unsafe, unhealthy,
inaccessible, or inoperative due to one or more unforeseen natural
events, mechanical failures, or actions or inactions by one or more
persons.
(4) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

--- END ---