BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.82.090 and 1995 c 291 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Financial obligations imposed in a judgment for an offense
committed on or after the effective date of this act shall bear
interest from the date of the judgment until payment, at the rate
((applicable to civil judgments)) of four percent.
(2) Financial obligations imposed in a judgment for an offense
committed prior to the effective date of this act shall bear interest
from the effective date of this act until payment, at the rate of four
percent. Nothing in this subsection shall affect any interest accrued
on the obligations at a rate other than four percent prior to the
effective date of this act.
(3) All nonrestitution interest retained by the court shall be
split twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the
public safety and education account as provided in RCW 43.08.250,
twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial
information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five
percent to the county current expense fund, and twenty-five percent to
the county current expense fund to fund local courts.

--- END ---