BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.02.020 and 1991 c 360 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Fire protection districts for the provision of fire prevention
services, fire suppression services, emergency medical services, and
for the protection of life and property in areas outside of cities and
towns, except where the cities and towns have been annexed into a fire
protection district or where the district is continuing service
pursuant to RCW 35.02.202, are authorized to be established as provided
in this title.
(2) In addition to other services authorized under this section,
fire protection districts that share a common border with Canada and
are surrounded on three sides by water, may also establish or
participate in the provision of health clinic services.

--- END ---