BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(1) Thousands of citizens in the state have disabilities, including
blindness or visual impairment, that prevent them from using
conventional print material.
(2) Governmental and nonprofit organizations provide access to
reading material by specialized means, including books and magazines
prepared in braille, audio, and large-type formats.
(3) Access to time-sensitive or local or regional publications, or
both, is not feasible to produce through these traditional means and
formats.
(4) Lack of direct and prompt access to information included in
newspapers, magazines, newsletters, schedules, announcements, and other
time-sensitive materials limits educational opportunities, literacy,
and full participation in society by people with print disabilities.
(5) Creation and storage of information by computer results in
electronic files used for publishing and distribution.
(6) The use of high-speed computer and telecommunications
technology combined with customized software provides a practical and
cost-effective means to convert electronic text-based information,
including daily newspapers, into synthetic speech suitable for
statewide distribution by telephone.
(7) Telephonic distribution of time-sensitive information,
including daily newspapers, will enhance the state's current efforts to
meet the needs of blind and disabled citizens for access to information
which is otherwise available in print, thereby reducing isolation and
supporting full integration and equal access for such individuals.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.18.020 and 1983 c 194 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means an agency of state government called the
department of services for the blind.
(2) "Director" means the director of the ((state agency))
department of services for the blind. The director is appointed by the
governor with the consent of the senate.
(3) "Advisory council" means the body of members appointed by the
governor to advise the state agency.
(4) "Blind" means a person who has no vision or whose vision with
corrective lenses is so defective as to prevent the performance of
ordinary activities for which eyesight is essential, or who has an eye
condition of a progressive nature which may lead to blindness.
(5) "Telephonic reading service" means audio information provided
by telephone, including the acquisition and distribution of daily
newspapers and other information of local, state, or national interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The director shall provide access to a telephonic reading
service for blind and disabled persons.
(b) The director shall establish criteria for eligibility for blind
and disabled persons who may receive the telephonic reading services.
The criteria may be based upon the eligibility criteria for persons who
receive services established by the national library service for the
blind and physically handicapped of the library of congress.
(2) The director may enter into contracts or other agreements that
he or she determines to be appropriate to provide telephonic reading
services pursuant to this section.
(3) The director may expand the type and scope of materials
available on the telephonic reading service in order to meet the local,
regional, or foreign language needs of blind or visually impaired
residents of this state. The director may also expand the scope of
services and availability of telephonic reading services by current
methods and technologies that may be developed. The director may
inform current and potential patrons of the availability of telephonic
reading services through appropriate means, including, but not limited
to, direct mailings, direct telephonic contact, and public service
announcements.
(4) The director may expend moneys from the business enterprises
revolving account accrued from vending machine sales in state and local
government buildings, as well as donations and grants, for the purpose
of supporting the cost of activities described in this section.

--- END ---