BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.68.080 and 1961 c 12 s 46.68.080 are each amended
to read as follows:
All motor vehicle license fees and all motor vehicle fuel tax
directly or indirectly paid by the residents of those counties composed
entirely of islands and which have neither a fixed physical connection
with the mainland nor any state highways on any of the islands of which
they are composed, shall be paid into the ((motor vehicle fund of the
state of Washington and shall monthly, as they accrue, and after
deducting therefrom the expenses of issuing such licenses and the cost
of collecting such motor vehicle fuel tax, be paid to the county
treasurer of each such county to be by him disbursed as hereinafter
provided)) Puget Sound ferry operations account and be used to fund the
ferry service provided to those islands.
One-half of all motor vehicle license fees and motor vehicle fuel
tax directly or indirectly paid by the residents of those counties
composed entirely of islands and which have either a fixed physical
connection with the mainland or state highways on any of the islands of
which they are composed, shall be paid into the ((motor vehicle fund of
the state of Washington and shall monthly, as they accrue, and after
deducting therefrom the expenses of issuing such licenses and the cost
of collecting such motor vehicle fuel tax, be paid to the county
treasurer of each such county to be by him disbursed as hereinafter
provided)) Puget Sound ferry operations account and be used to fund the
ferry service provided to those islands.
((All funds paid to the county treasurer of the counties of either
class above referred to as in this section provided, shall be by such
county treasurer distributed and credited to the several road districts
of each such county and paid to the city treasurer of each incorporated
city and town within each such county, in the direct proportion that
the assessed valuation of each such road district and incorporated city
and town shall bear to the total assessed valuation of each such
county.
The amount of motor vehicle fuel tax paid by the residents of those
counties composed entirely of islands shall, for the purposes of this
section, be that percentage of the total amount of motor vehicle fuel
tax collected in the state that the motor vehicle license fees paid by
the residents of counties composed entirely of islands bears to the
total motor vehicle license fees paid by the residents of the state.))

Sec. 2 RCW 82.38.080 and 1998 c 176 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((There is)) The use of fuel for the following purposes is
fully exempted from the tax imposed by this chapter((, the use of fuel
for)):
(a) Street and highway construction and maintenance purposes in
motor vehicles owned and operated by the state of Washington, or any
county or municipality;
(b) Publicly owned fire fighting equipment;
(c) Special mobile equipment as defined in RCW 46.04.552;
(d) Power pumping units or other power take-off equipment of any
motor vehicle which is accurately measured by metering devices that
have been specifically approved by the department or which is
established by any of the following formulae:
(i) Pumping propane, or fuel or heating oils or milk picked up from
a farm or dairy farm storage tank by a power take-off unit on a
delivery truck, at a rate determined by the department: PROVIDED, That
claimant when presenting his or her claim to the department in
accordance with this chapter, shall provide to the claim, invoices of
propane, or fuel or heating oil delivered, or such other appropriate
information as may be required by the department to substantiate his or
her claim;
(ii) Operating a power take-off unit on a cement mixer truck or a
load compactor on a garbage truck at the rate of twenty-five percent of
the total gallons of fuel used in such a truck; or
(iii) The department is authorized to establish by rule additional
formulae for determining fuel usage when operating other types of
equipment by means of power take-off units when direct measurement of
the fuel used is not feasible. The department is also authorized to
adopt rules regarding the usage of on board computers for the
production of records required by this chapter;
(e) Motor vehicles owned and operated by the United States
government;
(f) Heating purposes;
(g) ((Moving a motor vehicle on a public highway between two pieces
of private property when said moving is incidental to the primary use
of the motor vehicle)) Ferry service owned and operated by the state of
Washington;
(h) Transportation services for persons with special transportation
needs by a private, nonprofit transportation provider regulated under
chapter 81.66 RCW;
(i) Vehicle refrigeration units, mixing units, or other equipment
powered by separate motors from separate fuel tanks; and
(j) The operation of a motor vehicle as a part of or incidental to
logging operations upon a highway under federal jurisdiction within the
boundaries of a federal area if the federal government requires a fee
for the privilege of operating the motor vehicle upon the highway, the
proceeds of which are reserved for constructing or maintaining roads in
the federal area, or requires maintenance or construction work to be
performed on the highway for the privilege of operating the motor
vehicle on the highway.
(2) There is exempted from the tax imposed by this chapter the
removal or entry of special fuel under the following circumstances and
conditions:
(a) If it is the removal from a terminal or refinery of, or the
entry or sale of, a special fuel if all of the following apply:
(i) The person otherwise liable for the tax is a licensee other
than a dyed special fuel user or international fuel tax agreement
licensee;
(ii) For a removal from a terminal, the terminal is a licensed
terminal; and
(iii) The special fuel satisfies the dyeing and marking
requirements of this chapter;
(b) If it is an entry or removal from a terminal or refinery of
taxable special fuel transferred to a refinery or terminal and the
persons involved, including the terminal operator, are licensed; and
(c)(i) If it is a special fuel that, under contract of sale, is
shipped to a point outside this state by a supplier by means of any of
the following:
(A) Facilities operated by the supplier;
(B) Delivery by the supplier to a carrier, customs broker, or
forwarding agent, whether hired by the purchaser or not, for shipment
to the out-of-state point;
(C) Delivery by the supplier to a vessel clearing from port of this
state for a port outside this state and actually exported from this
state in the vessel.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (2)(c):
(A) "Carrier" means a person or firm engaged in the business of
transporting for compensation property owned by other persons, and
includes both common and contract carriers; and
(B) "Forwarding agent" means a person or firm engaged in the
business of preparing property for shipment or arranging for its
shipment.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, every
urban passenger transportation system and carriers as defined by
chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW shall be exempt from the provisions of
this chapter requiring the payment of special fuel taxes. For the
purposes of this section "urban passenger transportation system" means
every transportation system, publicly or privately owned, having as its
principal source of revenue the income from transporting persons for
compensation by means of motor vehicles and/or trackless trolleys, each
having a seating capacity for over fifteen persons over prescribed
routes in such a manner that the routes of such motor vehicles and/or
trackless trolleys, either alone or in conjunction with routes of other
such motor vehicles and/or trackless trolleys subject to routing by the
same transportation system, shall not extend for a distance exceeding
twenty-five road miles beyond the corporate limits of the county in
which the original starting points of such motor vehicles are located:
PROVIDED, That no refunds or credits shall be granted on special fuel
used by any urban transportation vehicle or vehicle operated pursuant
to chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW on any trip where any portion of said
trip is more than twenty-five road miles beyond the corporate limits of
the county in which said trip originated.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.0255 and 1998 c 176 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of:
(a) Motor vehicle fuel used in aircraft by the manufacturer thereof
for research, development, and testing purposes; and
(b) Motor vehicle and special fuel if:
(i) The fuel is purchased for the purpose of public transportation
and the purchaser is entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW
82.36.275 or 82.38.080(3); or
(ii) The fuel is purchased by a private, nonprofit transportation
provider certified under chapter 81.66 RCW and the purchaser is
entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW 82.36.285 or
82.38.080(1)(h); or
(iii) The fuel is taxable under chapter 82.36 or 82.38 RCW; or
(iv) The fuel is purchased and used by the Washington state
ferries.
(2) Any person who has paid the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 on the
sale of special fuel delivered in this state shall be entitled to a
credit or refund of such tax with respect to fuel subsequently
established to have been actually transported and used outside this
state by persons engaged in interstate commerce. The tax shall be
claimed as a credit or refunded through the tax reports required under
RCW 82.38.150.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Sales tax revenue generated from motor vehicle leases must be
deposited into the multimodal transportation account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.36.029 (Deductions -- Handling losses -- Reports) and 1998
c 176 s 10; and
(2) 1998 c 115 s 5 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect August 1, 2003.

--- END ---