BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that recent increases
in property and liability insurance premiums experienced by some
nonprofit organizations have the potential to negatively impact the
ability of these organizations to continue to offer the level of
service they provide in our communities. The legislature finds that
nonprofit organizations are distinct from private for-profit
businesses. By their very nature, nonprofit organizations are formed
for purposes other than generating a profit, and are restricted from
distributing any part of the organization's income to its directors or
officers. Because of these characteristics, nonprofit organizations
provide a unique public good to the residents in our state.
The legislature finds that in order to sustain the financial
viability of nonprofit organizations, they should be provided with
alternative options for insuring against risks. The legislature
further finds that local government entities and nonprofit
organizations share the common goal of providing services beneficial to
the public interest. The legislature finds that allowing nonprofit
organizations and local government entities to pool risk in self-insurance risk pools may be of mutual benefit for both types of
entities. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to allow
nonprofit organizations to form or participate in self-insurance risk
pools with other nonprofit organizations or with local government
entities where authority for such risk pooling arrangements does not
currently exist in state or federal law.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.62.021 and 2002 c 332 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Local government entity" or "entity" means every unit of local
government, both general purpose and special purpose, and includes, but
is not limited to, counties, cities, towns, port districts, public
utility districts, water-sewer districts, school districts, fire
protection districts, irrigation districts, metropolitan municipal
corporations, conservation districts, and other political subdivisions,
governmental subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal
corporations.
(2) "Risk assumption" means a decision to absorb the entity's
financial exposure to a risk of loss without the creation of a formal
program of advance funding of anticipated losses.
(3) "Self-insurance" means a formal program of advance funding and
management of entity financial exposure to a risk of loss that is not
transferred through the purchase of an insurance policy or contract.
(4) "Health and welfare benefits" means a plan or program
established by a local government entity or entities for the purpose of
providing its employees and their dependents, and in the case of school
districts, its district employees, students, directors, or any of their
dependents, with health care, accident, disability, death, and salary
protection benefits.
(5) "Property and liability risks" includes the risk of property
damage or loss sustained by a local government entity and the risk of
claims arising from the tortious or negligent conduct or any error or
omission of the local government entity, its officers, employees,
agents, or volunteers as a result of which a claim may be made against
the local government entity.
(6) "State risk manager" means the risk manager of the risk
management division within the office of financial management.
(7) "Nonprofit corporation" or "corporation" has the same meaning
as defined in RCW 24.03.005(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.62 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A nonprofit corporation may form or join a self-insurance risk
pool with one or more nonprofit corporations or with a local government
entity or entities for property and liability risks.
(2) A nonprofit corporation that participates in or forms a self-insurance risk pool with one or more nonprofit corporations or with a
local government entity or entities, as provided in subsection (1) of
this section, is subject to the same rules and regulations that apply
to a local government entity or entities under this chapter.
(3) This section does not apply to a nonprofit corporation that:
(a) Individually self-insures for property and liability risks;
(b) Participates in a risk pooling arrangement, including a risk
retention group or a risk purchasing group, regulated under chapter
48.92 RCW, or is a captive insurer authorized in its state of domicile;
or
(c) Is a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW or an entity
owned, operated, controlled by, or affiliated with such a hospital that
participates in a self-insurance risk pool or other risk pooling
arrangement, unless the self-insurance pool or other risk pooling
arrangement for property and liability risks includes a local
government entity.

--- END ---