BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that investment in effective prevention and
early intervention services: (1) Produces immediate and long-term
improvements for children and families; and (2) avoids future public
costs in education, child welfare, substance abuse, health, and mental
health treatment, law enforcement and the courts, and juvenile and
adult corrections. The legislature further finds that state agencies
receiving funds for prevention and early intervention services should
contract for or operate services that have a strong likelihood of
achieving expected outcomes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The children's administration in the department of social and
health services shall identify and implement criteria for funding
prevention and early intervention services and programs that are either
state-operated or contracted. The criteria must require that funded
programs, at a minimum: (a) Define clear, measurable outcomes; (b)
identify research that may be applicable; (c) identify anticipated
cost-effectiveness; (d) describe broad community involvement, support,
and partnerships; and (e) provide data related to program outcomes.
(2) The children's administration shall collect and analyze the
program data and make the data and the analysis available for public
review.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "prevention and early
intervention services and programs" shall include, but not be limited
to, the following or their successors:
(a) Alternate response system;
(b) Family reconciliation services;
(c) Family preservation services;
(d) Intensive family preservation services;
(e) Continuum of care;
(f) Community public health and safety networks;
(g) Parent trust programs; and
(h) Public health nurse early intervention program.
(4) The children's administration shall incorporate the funding
criteria into contracts and operating procedures within existing
resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this act shall be construed to create:
(1) An entitlement to services;
(2) Judicial authority to order the provision of services to any
person or family if the services are unavailable or unsuitable, or the
child or family is not eligible for such services; or
(3) A private right of action or claim on the part of any
individual, entity, or agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature encourages other administrations within the
department of social and health services and other state agencies
funding prevention and early intervention services to identify and
implement the funding criteria provided in section 2 of this act.

--- END ---