BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that financial fraud
and crimes against financial institutions and merchants are increasing
exponentially in Washington state. Until recently, these crimes cost
businesses and consumers thousands of dollars in losses. They now cost
millions of dollars. The legislature further finds that noncredit
losses to financial institutions, and credit card, debit card, and
check fraud against merchants impose danger to consumers and their
financial privacy, and burden law enforcement and public prosecutors
with crimes that are difficult to detect and prosecute. The growth in
financial fraud also provides opportunities for organized crime and
terrorist organizations, and undermines the stability and reliability
of financial and other businesses upon which commerce and the economy
rely.
The legislature intends to enable financial institutions and
merchants, to the extent permitted by federal law, to exchange
information for the purpose of preventing, detecting, deterring, and
assisting in the prosecution of financial fraud, bank robbery, money
laundering, and other financial crimes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Designated employees" means security personnel of a financial
institution or merchant designated by it to participate in a fraud
alert network.
(2) "Financial crimes" means fraud, false representation, scams,
swindles, forgery, unlawful issuance of checks, drafts, funds
transfers, and payment instructions, identity theft, robbery, theft,
tax evasion, embezzlement, money laundering, and other financial
related crimes.
(3) "Financial institution" means: (a) Any person doing business
under the laws of any state or the United States relating to commercial
banks, bank holding companies, financial holding companies, savings
banks, savings and loan associations, trust companies, or credit
unions; (b) any office of an international banking corporation, branch
of a foreign bank, or corporation organized pursuant to the Bank
Service Corporation Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1861-1867) or a corporation
organized under the Edge Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 611-633); (c)
subsidiaries, affiliates, service corporations of the persons in (a)
and (b) of this subsection; (d) third-party service providers that
provide servicing, processing, account maintenance, or security for the
persons in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection; or (e) any group,
organization, or association of the persons in (a) through (c) of this
subsection, including, without limitation, the Washington bankers
association, the American bankers association, and other associations
of banks, savings institutions, and/or credit unions, whether inside or
outside the state of Washington.
(4) "Fraud alert network" means a program established by and among
financial institutions and/or merchants for the purpose of preventing,
detecting, deterring, and assisting in the prosecution of financial
crimes, including a program in which information is shared by means of
electronic posting.
(5) "Electronic posting" means the use of a web site or other form
of electronic communication used to display information gathered in
connection with a fraud alert network.
(6) "Merchant" means a person engaged in the business of selling,
leasing, or distributing goods or services, or an association or
cooperative organization of such persons.
(7) "Participant" means a financial institution or merchant that
participates in a fraud alert network.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) This chapter provides immunity from
liability for financial institutions and merchants who participate in
a fraud alert network and who comply with the provisions of this
chapter and the standards of use set forth in this subsection, as
follows:
(a) Access to the fraud alert network is private, and limited to
financial institutions and/or merchants;
(b) The sole purpose of the fraud alert network is to share
information among financial institutions, merchants, and/or law
enforcement for the preventing, detecting, deterring, and assisting in
the prosecution of financial crimes;
(c) Information furnished to the fraud alert network consists of:
(i) Descriptions of recent actual or suspected financial crimes
perpetrated against or coming to the attention of the participant
furnishing the information; (ii) descriptions, photographs, images,
reproductions, fingerprints, identifying features, traits, habits,
background, or other data related to identifying the person, persons,
or groups suspected of committing, aiding, or abetting financial
crimes; (iii) identifying information regarding methods of operation,
devices, tricks, or schemes used by persons suspected of financial
crimes; (iv) descriptions, photographs, images, or reproductions of
writings, communications, checks, and personal identification used in
connection with suspected financial crimes; (v) descriptions,
photographs, images, or reproductions of vehicles, license plates,
weapons, devices, or other things used in connection with suspected
financial crimes; (vi) cautionary statements regarding suspects, for
example a statement that a suspect is armed and dangerous; and (vii)
other information that will allow participants to identify financial
crimes, to identify persons suspected in connection with financial
crimes, or to assist in the apprehension of persons suspected of
financial crimes;
(d) Information posted shall be accessible only to designated
employees, and the distribution of information shall be limited to
those employees, attorneys, and agents of financial institutions or
merchants who have job-related duties relevant to the use of such
information in connection with preventing, detecting, deterring, and
assisting in the prosecution of financial crimes;
(e) The fraud alert network has procedures reasonably calculated to
ensure the security of the information obtained;
(f) Users of the fraud alert network are informed that the
information obtained may not be used to evaluate and make decisions
about routine applications for loans, lines of credit, and credit
cards; and
(g) Information furnished pursuant to the fraud alert network is
limited to statements of fact that the person furnishing the
information reasonably believes to be true. However, in exigent
circumstances, information may be furnished without such reasonable
belief if the circumstances creating an emergency are described, and
cautionary advice is provided regarding the limited knowledge of the
person furnishing the information.
(2) Washington law governs the operation of a fraud alert network.
Participation in the fraud alert network in accordance with subsection
(1) of this section, whether through furnishing, posting, publishing,
or using information in connection thereto, shall provide immunity from
civil liability and from liability for criminal libel and slander under
the laws and rules of the state of Washington and its political
subdivisions and, to the extent the conflicts of law rules of any other
jurisdiction refer to the law of the state of Washington, under the
laws and rules of such other jurisdiction and its political
subdivisions.
(3) Any financial institution or merchant that makes a voluntary
disclosure of any possible violation of law or regulation to a federal,
state, or local government or agency in connection with information
obtained from a fraud alert network is immune from civil liability for
such disclosure or for any failure to provide notice of such disclosure
to the person who is the subject of or identified in the disclosure,
under the laws and rules of the state of Washington and its political
subdivisions and, to the extent the conflicts of law rules of any other
jurisdiction refer to the law of the state of Washington, under the
laws and rules of such other jurisdiction and its political
subdivisions, and under any contract or other legally enforceable
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The immunity of section 3 of this act shall
not apply to any participant that:
(1) Knowingly provides false information to the fraud alert
network;
(2) Fails to maintain review procedures reasonably intended to
remove or correct outdated, incomplete, or erroneous information
furnished by it to the fraud alert network;
(3) Fails to maintain procedures reasonably intended to ensure that
information obtained from the fraud alert network will be provided only
to employees, attorneys, or agents who have job-related duties relevant
to the use of such information;
(4) Uses information obtained from the fraud alert network to
evaluate and make decisions about routine applications for loans, lines
of credit, and credit cards;
(5) Uses information for a purpose other than preventing,
detecting, deterring, and assisting in the prosecution of financial
crimes;
(6) Uses, reproduces, distributes, publishes, or communicates any
information obtained from the fraud alert network for a commercial
purpose, such as for advertising or marketing; or
(7) Provides, sells, or resells access to the fraud alert network
to a person not entitled to such information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) It is the intent of this chapter to
encourage the sharing of information consistent with federal law.
(2) A fraud alert network is intended to protect against or prevent
actual or potential fraud, unauthorized transactions, claims, or other
liability, and is intended to be exempt from privacy disclosure
requirements of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999.
(3) It is intended that the Washington fair credit reporting act,
chapter 19.182 RCW, does not apply to a fraud alert network. However,
if it is determined that the federal fair credit reporting act applies
to a fraud alert network, the Washington fair credit reporting act
shall likewise be applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This chapter shall be broadly construed to
encourage the sharing of information by financial institutions,
merchants, and law enforcement for the prevention and prosecution of
financial fraud.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Information shared pursuant to a fraud alert
network is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act may be known and cited as the
financial fraud alert act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 30 RCW.

--- END ---