BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.0921 and 1990 c 210 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a misdemeanor for any person:
(((1))) (a) To display or cause or permit to be displayed or have
in his or her possession any fictitious or fraudulently altered
driver's license or identicard;
(((2))) (b) To lend his or her driver's license or identicard to
any other person or knowingly permit the use thereof by another;
(((3))) (c) To display or represent as one's own any driver's
license or identicard not issued to him or her;
(((4))) (d) Willfully to fail or refuse to surrender to the
department upon its lawful demand any driver's license or identicard
which has been suspended, revoked or canceled;
(((5))) (e) To use a false or fictitious name in any application
for a driver's license or identicard or to knowingly make a false
statement or to knowingly conceal a material fact or otherwise commit
a fraud in any such application;
(((6))) (f) To permit any unlawful use of a driver's license or
identicard issued to him or her.
(2) It is a class C felony for any person to sell or deliver a
stolen driver's license or identicard.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to manufacture, sell, or deliver
a forged, fictitious, counterfeit, fraudulently altered, or unlawfully
issued driver's license or identicard, or to manufacture, sell, or
deliver a blank driver's license or identicard except under the
direction of the department. A violation of this subsection is:
(a) A class C felony if committed (i) for financial gain or (ii)
with intent to commit forgery, theft, or identity theft; or
(b) A gross misdemeanor if the conduct does not violate (a) of this
subsection.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, it is a
misdemeanor for any person under the age of twenty-one to manufacture
or deliver fewer than four forged, fictitious, counterfeit, or
fraudulently altered driver's licenses or identicards for the sole
purpose of misrepresenting a person's age.
(5) In a proceeding under subsection (2), (3), or (4) of this
section that is related to an identity theft under RCW 9.35.020, the
crime will be considered to have been committed in any locality where
the person whose means of identification or financial information was
appropriated resides, or in which any part of the offense took place,
regardless of whether the defendant was ever actually in that locality.

--- END ---