BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to contact persons issued
credentials under this title for the purpose of requesting permission
to collect his or her name, profession, and contact information as a
possible volunteer in the event of a bioterrorism incident, natural
disaster, public health emergency, or other emergency or disaster, as
defined in RCW 38.52.010, that requires the services of health care
providers.
(2) The department shall maintain a record of all volunteers who
provide information under subsection (1) of this section. Upon
request, the department shall provide the record of volunteers to:
(a) Local health departments;
(b) State agencies engaged in public health emergency planning and
response, including the state military department;
(c) Agencies of other states responsible for public health
emergency planning and response; and
(d) The centers for disease control and prevention.

--- END ---