BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that thousands of
patients are injured each year in the United States as a result of
medical errors, and that a more comprehensive approach than looking
only at the fault of individual practitioners is needed to effectively
reduce the incidence of medical errors in our health care system.
Incentives should be available to encourage health care providers and
facilities to engage in proven patient safety and medical error
reduction efforts. Federal agencies and other national organizations
have identified numerous evidence-based practices to improve patient
safety. Investments in these proven and other comparable strategies
can reduce medical errors, and thereby potentially reduce the frequency
and severity of medical malpractice claims. Through credits against
medical malpractice coverage premiums paid by health care providers who
have undertaken proven medical error reduction strategies, the
legislature intends to positively influence the safety and quality of
care provided in Washington state's health care system and to reduce
the frequency and severity of malpractice claims.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As part of its coordinated quality improvement program under
RCW 70.41.200 or 43.70.510, any hospital or medical facility that is
licensed by the department, any ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or
surgical facility licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, or any incorporated
group or partnership of physicians, advanced registered nurse
practitioners, osteopathic physicians, or other health care providers
licensed by the department may make application to the department for
approval of a program or programs that have been proven to result in
the reduction of serious medical errors and to enhance patient safety.
(2) The department, in consultation with the office of the
insurance commissioner, shall develop and adopt criteria in rule for
approval of medical error reduction programs. In developing criteria,
the department shall rely heavily upon evidence-based practices to
improve patient safety that have been identified and recommended by
governmental and private organizations, including but not limited to:
(a) The federal agency for healthcare quality and research;
(b) The federal institute of medicine;
(c) The joint commission on accreditation of healthcare
organizations; and
(d) The national quality forum.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.19 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning January 1, 2004, as part of any rate filing under RCW
48.19.040 submitted to the commissioner, insurers shall file with the
commissioner a credit against the rate or rates applicable for medical
malpractice coverage for physicians, hospitals, other health care
professionals, or other health care facilities to reflect the
initiation of a medical error reduction program or programs that have
been approved by the department of health under section 2 of this act.
The commissioner, in consultation with the department of health, shall
adopt rules setting the amount of the credit. A physician, hospital,
other health care professional, or other health care facility shall
receive a credit against the rate or rates applicable to their medical
malpractice insurance, consistent with the level of such discount set
in rule by the commissioner. In developing rules under this section,
the commissioner may consider whether, and the extent to which, the
types of programs approved under section 2 of this act are otherwise
covered under a program of risk management offered by the insurer.

--- END ---