BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares:
(1) There is a severe shortage of health care personnel in
Washington state;
(2) The shortage contributes to increased costs in health care and
threatens the ability of the health care system to provide adequate and
accessible services;
(3) The current shortage of health care personnel is structural
rather than the cyclical shortages of the past, and this is due to
demographic changes that will increase demand for health care services;
(4) An increasing proportion of the population will reach
retirement age, and an increasing proportion of health care personnel
will also reach retirement age; and
(5) There should be continuing collaboration among health care work
force stakeholders to address the shortage of health care personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall:
(1) Facilitate ongoing collaboration among stakeholders in order to
address the health care personnel shortage;
(2) In collaboration with stakeholders, establish and maintain a
state strategic plan for ensuring an adequate supply of health care
personnel that safeguards the ability of the health care delivery
system in Washington state to provide quality, accessible health care
to residents of Washington; and
(3) Report to the governor and legislature by December 31, 2003,
and annually thereafter, on progress on the state plan and make
additional recommendations as necessary.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.115.070 and 1991 c 332 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
After June 1, 1992, the department, in consultation with the board
and the department of social and health services, shall:
(1) Determine eligible credentialed health care professions for the
purposes of the loan repayment and scholarship program authorized by
this chapter. Eligibility shall be based upon an assessment that
determines that there is a shortage or insufficient availability of a
credentialed profession so as to jeopardize patient care and pose a
threat to the public health and safety. The department shall consider
the relative degree of shortages among professions when determining
eligibility. ((This determination shall be based upon health
professional shortage needs identified in the health personnel resource
plan authorized by RCW 28B.125.010.)) The department may add or remove
professions from eligibility based upon the determination that a
profession is no longer in shortage ((as determined by the health
personnel resource plan)). Should a profession no longer be eligible,
participants or eligible students who have received scholarships shall
be eligible to continue to receive scholarships or loan repayments
until they are no longer eligible or until their service obligation has
been completed;
(2) Determine health professional shortage areas for each of the
eligible credentialed health care professions.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.115.090 and 1991 c 332 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board may grant loan repayment and scholarship awards to
eligible participants from the funds appropriated for this purpose, or
from any private or public funds given to the board for this purpose.
Participants are ineligible to receive loan repayment if they have
received a scholarship from programs authorized under this chapter or
chapter ((28B.104 or)) 70.180 RCW or are ineligible to receive a
scholarship if they have received loan repayment authorized under this
chapter or chapter ((18.150)) 28B.115 RCW.
(2) Funds appropriated for the program, including reasonable
administrative costs, may be used by the board for the purposes of loan
repayments or scholarships. The board shall annually establish the
total amount of funding to be awarded for loan repayments and
scholarships and such allocations shall be established based upon the
best utilization of funding for that year ((and based upon the health
personnel resource plan authorized in RCW 28B.125.010)).
(3) One portion of the funding appropriated for the program shall
be used by the board as a recruitment incentive for communities
participating in the community-based recruitment and retention program
as authorized by chapter 70.185 RCW; one portion of the funding shall
be used by the board as a recruitment incentive for recruitment
activities in state-operated institutions, county public health
departments and districts, county human service agencies, federal and
state contracted community health clinics, and other health care
facilities, such as rural hospitals that have been identified by the
department, as providing substantial amounts of charity care or
publicly subsidized health care; one portion of the funding shall be
used by the board for all other awards. The board shall determine the
amount of total funding to be distributed between the three portions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.125.005 (Intent) and 1991 c 332 s 4;
(2) RCW 28B.125.010 (Statewide health personnel resource plan -- Committee) and 1998 c 245 s 15, 1993 c 492 s 270, & 1991 c 332 s 5;
(3) RCW 28B.125.020 (Institutional plans -- Implementation) and 1991
sp.s. c 27 s 1; and
(4) RCW 28B.125.030 (New training programs) and 1993 c 323 s 5.

--- END ---