BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.52 RCW
to read as follows:
A city or district may contract to purchase from an operating
agency electric power and energy required for its present or future
requirements. Except for natural gas fueled thermal electric
generating projects, the contract may include the purchase of the
capability of one or more specified projects to produce electricity in
addition to the actual output of the projects. The contract may
provide that the city or district must make the payments required by
the contract whether or not a project is completed, operable, or
operating and notwithstanding the suspension, interruption,
interference, reduction, or curtailment of the output of a project or
the power and energy contracted for. The contract may also provide
that payments under the contract are not subject to reduction, whether
by offset or otherwise, and shall not be conditioned upon the
performance or nonperformance of the operating agency or a city or
district under the contract or other instrument.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
A district may contract to purchase from a joint operating agency
electric power and energy required for its present or future
requirements. Except for natural gas fueled thermal electric
generating projects, the contract may include the purchase of the
capability of one or more specified projects to produce electricity in
addition to the actual output of the projects. The contract may
provide that the district must make the payments required by the
contract whether or not a project is completed, operable, or operating
and notwithstanding the suspension, interruption, interference,
reduction, or curtailment of the output of a project or the power and
energy contracted for. The contract may also provide that payments
under the contract are not subject to reduction, whether by offset or
otherwise, and shall not be conditioned upon the performance or
nonperformance of the joint operating agency or a city, town, or
district under the contract or other instrument.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW
to read as follows:
A city or town may contract to purchase from a joint operating
agency electric power and energy required for its present or future
requirements. Except for natural gas fueled thermal electric
generating projects, the contract may include the purchase of the
capability of one or more specified projects to produce electricity in
addition to the actual output of the projects. The contract may
provide that the city or town must make the payments required by the
contract whether or not a project is completed, operable, or operating
and notwithstanding the suspension, interruption, interference,
reduction, or curtailment of the output of a project or the power and
energy contracted for. The contract may also provide that payments
under the contract are not subject to reduction, whether by offset or
otherwise, and shall not be conditioned upon the performance or
nonperformance of the joint operating agency or a city, town, or public
utility district under the contract or other instrument.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.22 RCW
to read as follows:
A city of the first class may contract to purchase from a joint
operating agency electric power and energy required for its present or
future requirements. Except for natural gas fueled thermal electric
generating projects, the contract may include the purchase of the
capability of one or more specified projects to produce electricity in
addition to the actual output of the projects. The contract may
provide that the city must make the payments required by the contract
whether or not a project is completed, operable, or operating and
notwithstanding the suspension, interruption, interference, reduction,
or curtailment of the output of a project or the power and energy
contracted for. The contract may also provide that payments under the
contract are not subject to reduction, whether by offset or otherwise,
and shall not be conditioned upon the performance or nonperformance of
the joint operating agency or a city, town, or public utility district
under the contract or other instrument.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 35.23 RCW
to read as follows:
A city of the second class may contract to purchase from a joint
operating agency electric power and energy required for its present or
future requirements. Except for natural gas fueled thermal electric
generating projects, the contract may include the purchase of the
capability of one or more specified projects to produce electricity in
addition to the actual output of the projects. The contract may
provide that the city must make the payments required by the contract
whether or not a project is completed, operable, or operating and
notwithstanding the suspension, interruption, interference, reduction,
or curtailment of the output of a project or the power and energy
contracted for. The contract may also provide that payments under the
contract are not subject to reduction, whether by offset or otherwise,
and shall not be conditioned upon the performance or nonperformance of
the joint operating agency or a city, town, or public utility district
under the contract or other instrument.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35.27 RCW
to read as follows:
A town may contract to purchase from a joint operating agency
electric power and energy required for its present or future
requirements. Except for natural gas fueled thermal electric
generating projects, the contract may include the purchase of the
capability of one or more specified projects to produce electricity in
addition to the actual output of the projects. The contract may
provide that the town must make the payments required by the contract
whether or not a project is completed, operable, or operating and
notwithstanding the suspension, interruption, interference, reduction,
or curtailment of the output of a project or the power and energy
contracted for. The contract may also provide that payments under the
contract are not subject to reduction, whether by offset or otherwise,
and shall not be conditioned upon the performance or nonperformance of
the joint operating agency or a city, town, or public utility district
under the contract or other instrument.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 35A.80 RCW
to read as follows:
A code city may contract to purchase from a joint operating agency
electric power and energy required for its present or future
requirements. Except for natural gas fueled thermal electric
generating projects, the contract may include the purchase of the
capability of one or more specified projects to produce electricity in
addition to the actual output of the projects. The contract may
provide that the code city must make the payments required by the
contract whether or not a project is completed, operable, or operating
and notwithstanding the suspension, interruption, interference,
reduction, or curtailment of the output of a project or the power and
energy contracted for. The contract may also provide that payments
under the contract are not subject to reduction, whether by offset or
otherwise, and shall not be conditioned upon the performance or
nonperformance of the joint operating agency or a city, town, or public
utility district under the contract or other instrument.

--- END ---