BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.225.090 and 2001 c 251 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue a license to any applicant who
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that the applicant
meets the following education and experience requirements for the
applicant's practice area.
(a) Licensed social work classifications:
(i) Licensed advanced social worker:
(A) Graduation from a master's or doctorate social work educational
program accredited by the council on social work education and approved
by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;
(B) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(C) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of three thousand two
hundred hours with ninety hours of supervision by a licensed
independent clinical social worker or a licensed advanced social worker
who has been licensed or certified for at least two years. Of those
hours, fifty hours must include direct supervision by a licensed
advanced social worker or licensed independent clinical social worker;
the other forty hours may be with an equally qualified licensed mental
health practitioner. Forty hours must be in one-to-one supervision and
fifty hours may be in one-to-one supervision or group supervision.
Distance supervision is limited to forty supervision hours. Eight
hundred hours must be in direct client contact; and
(D) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(ii) Licensed independent clinical social worker:
(A) Graduation from a master's or doctorate level social work
educational program accredited by the council on social work education
and approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized
standards;
(B) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(C) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of four thousand hours
of experience, of which one thousand hours must be direct client
contact, over a three-year period supervised by a licensed independent
clinical social worker who has been licensed or certified for at least
five years and who has had at least one year of experience in
supervising the clinical social work practice of others, with
supervision of at least one hundred thirty hours by a licensed mental
health practitioner. Of the total supervision, seventy hours must be
with an independent clinical social worker meeting the qualifications
under this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(C); the other sixty hours may be with
an equally qualified licensed mental health practitioner. Sixty hours
must be in one-to-one supervision and seventy hours may be in one-to-one supervision or group supervision. Distance supervision is limited
to sixty supervision hours; and
(D) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(b) Licensed mental health counselor:
(i) Graduation from a master's or doctoral level educational
program in mental health counseling or a related discipline from a
college or university approved by the secretary based upon nationally
recognized standards;
(ii) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(iii) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of thirty-six months
full-time counseling or three thousand hours of postgraduate mental
health counseling under the supervision of a qualified licensed mental
health counselor in an approved setting. The three thousand hours of
required experience includes a minimum of one hundred hours spent in
immediate supervision with the qualified licensed mental health
counselor, and includes a minimum of one thousand two hundred hours of
direct counseling with individuals, couples, families, or groups; and
(iv) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(c) Licensed marriage and family therapist:
(i) Graduation from a master's degree or doctoral degree
educational program in marriage and family therapy or graduation from
an educational program in an allied field equivalent to a master's
degree or doctoral degree in marriage and family therapy approved by
the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;
(ii) Successful passage of an approved examination;
(iii) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of two calendar years
of full-time marriage and family therapy. Of the total supervision,
one hundred hours must be with a licensed marriage and family therapist
with at least five years' clinical experience; the other one hundred
hours may be with an equally qualified licensed mental health
practitioner. Total experience requirements include:
(A) A minimum of three thousand hours of experience, one thousand
hours of which must be direct client contact; at least five hundred
hours must be gained in diagnosing and treating couples and families;
plus
(B) At least two hundred hours of qualified supervision with a
supervisor. At least one hundred of the two hundred hours must be one-on-one supervision, and the remaining hours may be in one-on-one or
group supervision.
Applicants who have completed a master's program accredited by the
commission on accreditation for marriage and family therapy education
of the American association for marriage and family therapy may be
credited with five hundred hours of direct client contact and one
hundred hours of formal meetings with an approved supervisor; and
(iv) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(2) The department shall establish by rule what constitutes
adequate proof of meeting the criteria.
(3) In addition, applicants shall be subject to the grounds for
denial of a license or issuance of a conditional license under chapter
18.130 RCW.

--- END ---