BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.32.0351 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 204 are each amended
to read as follows:
The Washington state dental quality assurance commission is
established, consisting of ((fourteen)) sixteen members each appointed
by the governor to a four-year term. No member may serve more than two
consecutive full terms. In appointing the initial members of the
commission, it is the intent of the legislature that, to the extent
possible, members of the previous boards and committees regulating
these professions be appointed to the commission. Members of the
commission hold office until their successors are appointed. The
governor may appoint members of the initial commission to staggered
terms of from one to four years. Thereafter, all members shall be
appointed to full four-year terms. Twelve members of the commission
must be dentists, two members must be dental hygienists, and two
members must be public members.

--- END ---