BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.32.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following practices, acts, and operations are excepted from the
operation of the provisions of this chapter:
(1) The rendering of dental relief in emergency cases in the
practice of his or her profession by a physician or surgeon, licensed
as such and registered under the laws of this state, unless the
physician or surgeon undertakes to or does reproduce lost parts of the
human teeth in the mouth or to restore or to replace in the human mouth
lost or missing teeth;
(2) The practice of dentistry in the discharge of official duties
by dentists in the United States federal services on federal
reservations, including but not limited to the armed services, coast
guard, public health service, veterans' bureau, or bureau of Indian
affairs;
(3) Dental schools or colleges approved under RCW 18.32.040, and
the practice of dentistry by students in Washington state dental
schools or colleges approved by the commission, when acting under the
direction and supervision of Washington state-licensed dental school
faculty;
(4) The practice of dentistry by licensed dentists of other states
or countries while appearing as clinicians at meetings of the
Washington state dental association, or component parts thereof, or at
meetings sanctioned by them, or other groups approved by the
commission;
(5) The use of roentgen and other rays for making radiographs or
similar records of dental or oral tissues, under the supervision of a
licensed dentist or physician;
(6) The making, repairing, altering, or supplying of artificial
restorations, substitutions, appliances, or materials for the
correction of disease, loss, deformity, malposition, dislocation,
fracture, injury to the jaws, teeth, lips, gums, cheeks, palate, or
associated tissues or parts; providing the same are made, repaired,
altered, or supplied pursuant to the written instructions and order of
a licensed dentist which may be accompanied by casts, models, or
impressions furnished by the dentist, and the prescriptions shall be
retained and filed for a period of not less than three years and shall
be available to and subject to the examination of the secretary or the
secretary's authorized representatives;
(7) The removal of deposits and stains from the surfaces of the
teeth, the application of topical preventative or prophylactic agents,
and the polishing and smoothing of restorations, when performed or
prescribed by a dental hygienist licensed under the laws of this state;
(8) A qualified and licensed physician and surgeon or osteopathic
physician and surgeon extracting teeth or performing oral surgery
pursuant to the scope of practice under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW;
(9) The performing of dental operations or services by persons not
licensed under this chapter when performed under the supervision of a
licensed dentist: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That such nonlicensed person shall
in no event perform the following dental operations or services unless
permitted to be performed by the person under this chapter or chapters
18.29, 18.57, 18.71, and 18.79 RCW as it applies to registered nurses
and advanced registered nurse practitioners:
(a) Any removal of or addition to the hard or soft tissue of the
oral cavity, except that a licensed dentist may allow a nonlicensed
person, under the dentist's close supervision, to place restorations
into the cavity prepared by the dentist, and thereafter to carve,
contour, and adjust contacts and occlusion of the restoration, if the
nonlicensed person meets the minimum training for such acts as provided
by rule by the dental quality assurance commission concerning this
subject or, as an alternative to such training, if the nonlicensed
person meets the credential criteria required by rule;
(b) Any diagnosis of or prescription for treatment of disease,
pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, or physical condition of the human
teeth or jaws, or adjacent structure;
(c) Any administration of general or injected local anaesthetic of
any nature in connection with a dental operation, including intravenous
sedation;
(d) Any oral prophylaxis;
(e) The taking of any impressions of the teeth or jaw or the
relationships of the teeth or jaws, for the purpose of fabricating any
intra-oral restoration, appliance, or prosthesis, except that in
addition to the authority stated in subsection (6) of this section, a
licensed dentist may allow a nonlicensed person to do these acts under
the dentist's close supervision if the nonlicensed person meets the
minimum training for such acts as required by rules adopted by the
dental quality assurance commission concerning this subject or, as an
alternative to such training, if the nonlicensed person meets the
credential criteria that is adopted by rule.

--- END ---