BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing intensive inpatient or recovery house residential treatment
services for chemical dependency, certified by the department of social
and health services, for which payment from the United States or any
instrumentality thereof or from the state of Washington or any
municipal corporation or political subdivision thereof is received as
compensation for or to support those services; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross
income from such services multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(2) If the persons described in subsection (1) of this section
receive income from sources other than those described in subsection
(1) of this section or provide services other than those named in
subsection (1) of this section, that income and those services are
subject to tax as otherwise provided in this chapter.

--- END ---