BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.95.435 and 2002 c 175 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420
violates any condition or requirement of community custody, the board
may transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement status to
serve up to the remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any
period actually spent in community custody or in detention awaiting
disposition of an alleged violation and subject to the limitations of
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Following the hearing specified in subsection (3) of this
section, the board may impose sanctions such as work release, home
detention with electronic monitoring, work crew, community restitution,
inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling
sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any
other sanctions available in the community, or may suspend or revoke
the release to community custody whenever an offender released by the
board under RCW 9.95.420 violates any condition or requirement of
community custody.
(3) If an offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 is
accused of violating any condition or requirement of community custody,
he or she is entitled to a hearing before the board or a designee of
the board prior to the imposition of sanctions. The hearing shall be
considered as offender disciplinary proceedings and shall not be
subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall develop hearing
procedures and a structure of graduated sanctions consistent with the
hearing procedures and graduated sanctions developed pursuant to RCW
9.94A.737. The board may suspend the offender's release to community
custody and confine the offender in a correctional institution owned,
operated by, or operated under contract with the state prior to the
hearing unless the offender has been arrested and confined for a new
criminal offense.
(4) The hearing procedures required under subsection (3) of this
section shall be developed by rule and include the following:
(a) Hearings shall be conducted by members or designees of the
board unless the board enters into an agreement with the department to
use the hearing officers established under RCW 9.94A.737;
(b) The board shall provide the offender with written notice of the
violation, the evidence relied upon, and the reasons the particular
sanction was imposed. The notice shall include a statement of the
rights specified in this subsection, and the offender's right to file
a personal restraint petition under court rules after the final
decision of the board;
(c) The hearing shall be held unless waived by the offender, and
shall be electronically recorded. For offenders not in total
confinement, the hearing shall be held within ((fifteen working))
thirty days of service of notice of the violation, but not less than
twenty-four hours after notice of the violation. For offenders in
total confinement, the hearing shall be held within ((five working))
thirty days of service of notice of the violation, but not less than
twenty-four hours after notice of the violation;
(d) The offender shall have the right to: (i) Be present at the
hearing; (ii) have the assistance of a person qualified to assist the
offender in the hearing, appointed by the hearing examiner if the
offender has a language or communications barrier; (iii) testify or
remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary evidence;
(v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and (vi) be represented
by counsel if revocation of the release to community custody upon a
finding of violation is a ((possible)) probable sanction for the
violation; and
(e) The sanction shall take effect if affirmed by the hearing
examiner. Within seven days after the hearing examiner's decision, the
offender may appeal the decision to a panel of three reviewing
examiners designated by the chair of the board or by the chair's
designee. The sanction shall be reversed or modified if a majority of
the panel finds that the sanction was not reasonably related to any of
the following: (i) The crime of conviction; (ii) the violation
committed; (iii) the offender's risk of reoffending; or (iv) the safety
of the community.
(5) For purposes of this section, no finding of a violation of
conditions may be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

--- END ---