BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that with information
doubling every seven to ten years, Washington's educational communities
are reaching out to the digital realm in increasing numbers to help
educate students. In order to fully engage today's students beyond the
use of textbooks and traditional classroom instruction, educators can
benefit by having increased access to the emerging technologies in
education.
The legislature also finds there is a strong statewide demand among
students, parents, and educators for online learning, including a
demand for a variety of courses and digital tools and resources.
Students and parents want the flexibility and choice afforded by
quality online learning opportunities that are media rich, interactive,
and responsive.
The legislature further finds that Washington has a strong
foundation upon which to build. The state's K-20 network connects each
of our school districts with high-speed data, video, and internet
services. Washington is home to some of the world's leading technology
companies and research institutions, and many of the state's teachers,
schools, districts, colleges, universities, and public, private, and
nonprofit programs are applying digital technology to educational
endeavors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
The Washington digital learning commons shall establish a statewide
web-based clearinghouse, through public and private partnership, that
shall serve as the central point of information, reference, and review
of online learning programs and resources available in Washington. The
clearinghouse shall provide links to the various digital providers and
shall incorporate a reference grid comparing the various
characteristics of each online learning program. Digital providers
shall submit descriptions of their program offerings, including
teaching and learning tools, digital resources, timelines, assessments,
and instructor support.
The web-based clearinghouse shall be designed and managed to
achieve the following objectives:
(1) Make more online resources available to teachers;
(2) Provide students with tools and resources to actively improve
and enrich their educational experiences;
(3) Offer parents and families access to tools and resources that
will facilitate more direct involvement in their children's education;
and
(4) Avoid expensive and duplicative efforts by creating and
connecting through our existing infrastructure and community assets, a
statewide clearinghouse of high quality online programs, information,
and tools.

--- END ---