BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.230 and 1992 c 7 s 41 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall furnish to all persons making satisfactory
application for vehicle license as provided by law, two identical
vehicle license number plates each containing the vehicle license
number to be displayed on such vehicle as by law required: PROVIDED,
That if the vehicle to be licensed is a trailer, semitrailer or
motorcycle only one vehicle license number plate shall be issued for
each thereof. The number and plate shall be of such size and color and
shall contain such symbols indicative of the registration period for
which the same is issued and of the state of Washington, as shall be
determined and prescribed by the director. Any vehicle license number
plate or plates issued to a dealer shall contain thereon a sufficient
and satisfactory indication that such plates have been issued to a
dealer in vehicles. All vehicle license number plates may be obtained
by the director from the metal working plant of a state correctional
facility or from any source in accordance with existing state of
Washington purchasing procedures.
(2) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, the
director may, in his discretion and under such rules and regulations as
he may prescribe, adopt a type of vehicle license number plates whereby
the same shall be used as long as legible on the vehicle for which
issued, with provision for tabs or emblems to be attached thereto or
elsewhere on the vehicle to signify renewals, in which event the term
"vehicle license number plate" as used in any enactment shall be deemed
to include in addition to such plate the tab or emblem signifying
renewal except when such plate contains the designation of the current
year without reference to any tab or emblem. Renewals shall be
effected by the issuance and display of such tab or emblem.
(3) The department shall implement a flat, digitally printed
license plate system that must be used to manufacture all license
plates issued under this chapter. This system must be in place and
operational by July 1, 2004, and the system must be used to produce all
license plates issued under this chapter no later than July 1, 2011.
(4) The department shall solicit a request for proposal for
implementing a flat, digitally printed license plate system. The
department must report back to the legislature by December 1, 2003, on
the results of the request for proposal process, which must, at a
minimum, inform the legislature on who responded to the request for
proposal, the specifications of each proposal and the associated costs,
and the department's recommendation on which proposal is preferred,
accompanied with a proposed phased-in implementation plan that will
meet the implementation deadline of July 1, 2011, as set forth in
subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.233 and 2000 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for those license plates issued under RCW 46.16.305(1)
before January 1, 1987, under RCW 46.16.305(3), and to commercial
vehicles with a gross weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds,
effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1,
2001, all vehicle license plates must be issued on a standard
background, as designated by the department.
(2) Additionally, to ensure maximum legibility and reflectivity,
the department shall periodically provide for the replacement of
license plates, except for commercial vehicles with a gross weight in
excess of twenty-six thousand pounds. Frequency of replacement shall
be established in accordance with empirical studies documenting the
longevity of the reflective materials used to make license plates.
(3) In providing for the periodic replacement of license plates,
the department shall offer vehicle owners the option of retaining their
current license plate numbers. The department shall charge a retention
fee of twenty dollars if this option is exercised by a vehicle owner.
Revenue generated from the retention fee will be deposited into the
steel electric ferry replacement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The steel electric ferry replacement account is created in the
motor vehicle fund. All moneys deposited in the account are subject to
the following conditions:
(a) All funds will be used by the department of transportation for
replacing the steel electric class of ferries, including the design,
construction, and financing of a new class of ferry.
(b) The department of transportation will use these funds to
maximize the benefit to the taxpayer.
(c) The department of transportation will pursue all financing
opportunities available in order to make the best use of these funds.
(d) Use of these funds must adhere to the legislative intent of
chapter 226, Laws of 2001.
(2) The treasurer shall never transfer any moneys from the steel
electric ferry replacement account for use by the department of
transportation for state highway purposes so long as there is due and
unpaid obligations for payment of principal, interest, sinking funds,
or reserves as required by any pledge of the steel electric ferry
replacement account.

--- END ---