BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that thousands of
patients are injured each year in the United States as a result of
medical errors, and that a more comprehensive approach than looking
only at the fault of individual practitioners is needed to effectively
reduce the incidence of medical errors in our health care system.
Incentives should be available to encourage health care providers,
facilities, and health carriers to engage in proven patient safety and
medical error reduction efforts. Investments in proven strategies can
reduce medical errors, and thereby potentially reduce the need for
disciplinary actions against licensed health care professionals and
facilities, and the frequency and severity of medical malpractice
claims. By authorizing contributions to fund proven patient safety and
medical error reduction strategies through a patient safety program,
the
legislature intends to positively influence the safety and quality
of care provided in Washington state's health care system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
An injured claimant who receives a settlement or judgment in any
action for damages based upon injuries resulting from health care may
contribute a portion of that settlement or judgment to the department
of health for deposit into the patient safety account established in
section 5 of this act for the patient safety activities authorized in
section 3 of this act. Proceeds of the contributions will be
distributed by the department of health in the form of grants, loans,
or other appropriate arrangements to support strategies that have been
proven to reduce medical errors and enhance patient safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceeds from the contributions authorized in section 2 of this act
shall be administered by the department of health, in consultation with
established patient safety coalitions. Upon receipt of at least one
hundred thousand dollars in contributions under section 2 of this act
or grants or other funds under section 4 of this act, patient safety
proceeds will be distributed in the form of grants, loans, or other
appropriate arrangements to support strategies that have been proven to
reduce medical errors and enhance patient safety. In developing
criteria for the award of grants, loans, or other funding arrangements
under this section, the department shall:
(1) Consult with established patient safety coalitions and health
care workers engaged in direct patient care activities; and
(2) Rely heavily upon evidence-based practices that have been shown
to improve patient safety and have been identified and recommended by
governmental and private organizations, including but not limited to:
(a) The federal agency for health care quality and research;
(b) The federal institute of medicine;
(c) The joint commission on accreditation of health care
organizations; and
(d) The national quality forum.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new
section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary may solicit and accept grants or other funds from
public and private sources to support patient safety and medical error
reduction efforts under this act. Any grants or funds received may be
used to enhance these activities as long as program standards
established by the secretary are maintained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The patient safety account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from contributions authorized in section 2 of
this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the purposes of this act. Only the
secretary or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
By December 1, 2006, the department shall report the following
information to the governor and the health policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature:
(1) The amount of contributions deposited to date in the patient
safety account;
(2) The criteria for distribution of grants and loans under this
act; and
(3) A description of the medical error reduction and patient safety
grants and loans distributed to date, including their desired
objectives, activities, timelines, and any available information on
outcomes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The patient safety program shall be terminated December 31, 2008,
as provided in section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new
section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective December 31, 2009:
(1) Section 2 of this act;
(2) Section 3 of this act;
(3) Section 4 of this act;
(4) Section 5 of this act; and
(5) Section 6 of this act.

--- END ---