BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The effects of poor dietary habits established in youth will
carry with children into adulthood. Obesity, diabetes, osteoporosis,
and heart disease are just some of the long-term effects of poor eating
habits.
(2) Fewer than twenty-five percent of high school age children in
Washington eat five or more servings of fruits and vegetables every day
as recommended. Teens are not eating adequate amounts of iron,
calcium, riboflavin, thiamin, and vitamins A and C. Most teen diets
lack appropriate levels of grains, fruits, vegetables, and dairy
products.
(3) Obesity rates in Washington state have doubled over the last
ten years. At least twenty percent of children are obese or at grave
risk for becoming obese. Poor dietary habits can increase the risk of
obesity, osteoporosis, cardiovascular disease, and type 2 diabetes.
(4) More than a third of high school children do not engage in
vigorous daily physical activity. The physical activity habits that
are established in youth determine activity levels in adulthood and
complement healthy diets toward reducing obesity and disease.
(5) Public schools must set an example for children by promoting
healthy eating at school meals, healthy options in their choices of
competitive foods, and opportunities for physical activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The department, with the assistance of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall develop statewide
recommendations for local school boards to follow when determining the
nutritional content of meals served in public schools, the content of
course curricula regarding nutrition, policies concerning competitive
foods available to students, and policies related to increasing student
physical activity. The recommendations must be based on current
nutritional science that has been demonstrated to help students control
excessive weight and weight gain, avoid unsafe weight loss practices,
foster healthy eating habits, and avoid diseases that can be caused by
unsafe dietary habits. The recommendations must be tailored to address
the different health needs and associated peer pressure influences of
students in elementary school, middle school, and high school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Every board of school directors shall develop a nutritional
integrity policy that addresses the principles contained in the
district's nutrition education curriculum and the recommendations of
the department of health and the United States department of
agriculture on healthy dietary practices into the district's meal
program and competitive food policy. The nutritional integrity policy
shall focus on helping students control excessive weight and weight
gain, avoid unsafe weight loss practices, foster healthy eating habits,
exercise regularly, and avoid diseases that can be caused by unsafe
dietary habits. The policy must be tailored to address the different
health needs and associated peer pressure influences of students in
elementary school, middle school, and high school.
(2) If competitive foods are made available in schools, the
nutritional integrity policy must require that no less than an equal
number of foods that qualify as healthy under the standards of the
district's nutrition education curriculum and the recommendations of
the department of health and United States department of agriculture
are available compared to foods that do not meet those standards. The
policy must provide for standards governing the appropriate time and
location of competitive foods so that they do not interfere with meal
schedules. Pricing structures for foods that do not meet the
district's nutritional standards for health must be reviewed so that
healthy competitive foods are a feasible alternative.
(3) The nutritional integrity policy must be reviewed and revised,
as appropriate, every two years.
(4) Parents must be provided an opportunity to review the
nutritional integrity policy and comment on its development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
The department of health and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall develop model policies for the measurement of
the body mass index of students that school districts may elect to
follow.

--- END ---