BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that providing
access to appropriate assistive technology for children and adults with
disabilities, including seniors with age-related conditions such as
vision and hearing loss, is a matter of public interest. Access to
such technology can play a vital role in achieving high quality of
life. Investments in assistive technology also are cost-effective
because they reduce the risk of secondary injuries, make it possible
for people to live at home rather than in long-term care, and provide
a foundation for success in education and employment, thereby reducing
the high rates of unemployment and poverty experienced by Washington
residents with disabilities.
(2) The legislature also finds that current public and private
funding sources are inadequate, or not suited, to meet the assistive
technology needs of many sectors of the population and that it is
necessary for the state to establish a program to create alternative
financing arrangements to help individuals with disabilities acquire
the assistive technology they need to achieve their potential in
education, employment, independent living, transportation, recreation,
and community life. Access to such technology can play a vital role in
achieving high quality of life.
(3) The legislature further finds that many small businesses and
nonprofit organizations do not have the financial resources they need
to make their places of business and business activities accessible to
and usable by clients and employees with disabilities. Many small
businesses and nonprofit entities also lack the financing they need to
acquire the assistive devices and services that enable them to hire and
retain employees with disabilities. Low interest loans and other
alternative financing arrangements are needed to help small businesses,
nonprofits, and other qualified entities purchase the assistive devices
and services and make the program and building access modifications
needed to fully include individuals with disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The disabilities access linked deposit
lending program is created. The program will be administered by the
department of community, trade, and economic development. The director
shall contract with other public and private entities and undertake all
other activities necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Access modifications" means modifications to facilities,
programs, and buildings, including residential and nonresidential
buildings, to improve access and use by individuals with disabilities.
(2) "Assistive technology" means any item, piece of equipment, or
device that enables an individual with a disability to improve his or
her functional capabilities, independence, or quality of life, and any
service that directly assists an individual with a disability in the
selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology device.
(3) "Individual with a disability" means an individual with a
physical, mental, or sensory disability within the meaning of chapter
49.60 RCW.
(4) "Qualifying borrowers" means nonprofit community development
financial institutions that provide low interest loans for purchases of
assistive technology and access modifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Funds made available under this chapter
may be used to make low interest loans to, and equity equivalent
investments in, community development financial institutions that
provide financing and related services for purchases of assistive
technology and access modifications. As used in this chapter,
qualifying loans are loans that:
(a) Have terms that do not exceed ten years;
(b) Are made to qualified borrowers;
(c) Are made where the interest rate on the loan to the qualified
borrower does not exceed an interest rate that is two hundred basis
points below the interest rate the qualified public depositary would
charge for a loan for a similar purpose and a similar term; and
(d) Are made where the points or fees charged at loan closing do
not exceed one percent of the loan amount.
(2) In setting interest rates of time certificates of deposits, the
state treasurer shall offer rates so that a two hundred basis point
preference will be given to the qualified public depositary. In no
case shall the state treasurer give a preference where the effective
interest rates on the time certificates of deposits are less than two
percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The state treasurer shall establish a linked
deposit program for investment of deposits into qualified public
depositaries. As a condition of participating in the program,
qualified public depositaries must make qualifying loans as provided in
section 4 of this act. The state treasurer may purchase a certificate
of deposit that is equal to the amount of the qualifying loan made by
the qualified public depositary or may purchase a certificate of
deposit that is equal to the aggregate amount of two or more qualifying
loans made by one or more qualified public depositaries.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.86A.030 and 1993 c 512 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Funds held in public depositaries not as demand deposits as
provided in RCW 43.86A.020 and 43.86A.030, shall be available for a
time certificate of deposit investment program according to the
following formula: The state treasurer shall apportion to all
participating depositaries an amount equal to five percent of the three
year average mean of general state revenues as certified in accordance
with Article VIII, section 1(b) of the state Constitution, or fifty
percent of the total surplus treasury investment availability,
whichever is less. Within thirty days after certification, those funds
determined to be available according to this formula for the time
certificate of deposit investment program shall be deposited in
qualified public depositaries. These deposits shall be allocated among
the participating depositaries on a basis to be determined by the state
treasurer.
(2) The state treasurer may use up to fifty million dollars per
year of all funds available under this section for the purposes of RCW
43.86A.060 and up to an additional two million five hundred thousand
dollars per year of all funds available under this section for the
purposes of chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 and 7 of this act)
above the amount of funds available for the purposes of RCW 43.86A.060.
The amounts made available to these public depositaries shall be equal
to the amounts of outstanding loans made under RCW 43.86A.060 and
chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 and 7 of this act).
(3) The formula so devised shall be a matter of public record
giving consideration to, but not limited to deposits, assets, loans,
capital structure, investments or some combination of these factors.
However, if in the judgment of the state treasurer the amount of
allocation for certificates of deposit as determined by this section
will impair the cash flow needs of the state treasury, the state
treasurer may adjust the amount of the allocation accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The state and those acting as its agents are
not liable in any manner for payment of the principal or interest on
qualifying loans made under this chapter. Any delay in payments or
defaults on the part of the borrower does not in any manner affect the
deposit agreement between the qualified public depositary and the state
treasurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 5 and 7 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---