BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that sober living
homes are like a single-family residence in many respects and should be
afforded the same treatment as a single-family residence for most
purposes. The legislature does, however, recognize that sober living
homes differ from most single-family residences in some respects. A
sober living home offers housing to several unrelated persons within
the same residential building. The very nature of the residence, that
of housing several individuals, will likely cause the home to differ
from most homes in the community in which the home is located. The
increased traffic flow to and from the home is one example of how such
a home may be different from others in the community.
Washington state does not currently regulate the establishment of
sober living homes in Washington. Due to the lack of regulation, there
is no means of monitoring to ensure that the homes meet any standards
for safety or compliance with state and local laws.
The state of Washington has a compelling interest in regulating
sober living homes in the state to ensure the homes comply with all
state and local laws governing building, fire, safety, health code as
well as zoning standards, and traffic regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(2) "Resident" means a person who receives room or board, or both,
from a sober living home.
(3) "Sober living home" means a home that provides room or board,
or both, and that requires residents to abstain from using alcohol or
illicit drugs but does not provide or require participation in any
recovery maintenance activities, does not require supervision, and does
not maintain case management files as a condition of residency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall adopt rules and
standards with respect to sober living homes to be licensed under this
chapter to carry out the purposes and requirements of this chapter. In
developing rules and standards, the department shall recognize the
residential family-like nature of sober living homes and not develop
rules and standards which by their complexity serve as an overly
restrictive barrier to the development of the sober living homes in the
state. Procedures and forms established by the department shall be
developed so they are easy to understand and comply with. Paper work
requirements shall be minimal. Easy to understand materials shall be
developed for sober living homes explaining licensing requirements and
procedures.
(2) In developing the rules and standards, the department shall
consult with all divisions and administrations within the department
serving populations living in sober living homes, including the
division of alcohol and substance abuse.
(3) Except where provided otherwise, chapter 34.05 RCW shall govern
all department rule-making and adjudicative activities under this
chapter.
(4) After July 1, 2004, no person shall operate, maintain, or
reside in a sober living home in this state without a license under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Notwithstanding the existence or use of any
other remedy, the department may, in the manner provided by law, upon
the advice of the attorney general who shall represent the department
in the proceedings, maintain an action in the name of the state for an
injunction, civil penalty, or other process against a person to
restrain or prevent the operation or maintenance of a sober living home
without a license under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An application for a license shall be
made to the department upon forms provided by it and shall contain such
information as the department reasonably requires.
(2)(a) Upon receipt of an application for a license, the department
shall make public notification in the local community of the proposed
site.
(b) Notifications required under this section shall be provided to
the following:
(i) Appropriate school districts, private schools, and local
chambers of commerce within three hundred feet of the proposed site or
sites; and
(ii) In writing to all residents and/or property owners within
three hundred feet of the proposed site or sites.
(3) The department shall issue a license to a sober living home if
the department finds that the home is in compliance with this chapter
and the rules adopted under this chapter.
(4) The license fee shall be submitted with the application.
(5) The license fee shall be set at fifty dollars per year for each
home. A fifty dollar processing fee shall also be charged each home
when the home is initially licensed.
(6) The department shall serve upon the home a copy of the decision
granting or denying an application for a license. A sober living home
shall have the right to contest denial of the application for a license
as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW by requesting a hearing in writing
within twenty-eight days after receipt of the notice of denial.
(7) A license shall remain valid unless voluntarily surrendered,
suspended, or revoked in accordance with this chapter.
(8)(a) The department has the authority to immediately suspend a
license if it finds that conditions there constitute an imminent danger
to residents.
(b) The department may commence an action in superior court to
enjoin the operation of a sober living home if it finds that conditions
there constitute an imminent danger to residents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Sober living homes shall be maintained
internally and externally in good repair and condition. Such homes
shall have safe and functioning systems for heating, cooling, hot and
cold water, electricity, plumbing, garbage disposal, sewage, cooking,
laundry, artificial and natural light, ventilation, and any other
feature of the home as required by state and local regulations,
statutes, or ordinances.
(2) Each sober living home shall meet applicable local licensing,
zoning, building, and housing codes, and state and local fire safety
regulations as they pertain to a single-family residence. It is the
responsibility of the home to check with local authorities to ensure
all local codes are met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---