BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Head injuries in children cost the residents of Washington
state both in terms of human suffering and financial costs. Head
injuries are the leading cause of death to children ages five to nine.
Over a lifetime, a severe head injury can cost over four million five
hundred thousand dollars and have long-term effects on the person's
quality of life.
(2) Nationally, over four hundred thousand children are admitted to
emergency departments every year for injuries related to bicycle
accidents. Almost half of serious injuries caused by bicycle accidents
result in traumatic brain injuries. Of the six hundred cyclists under
fourteen years old who die from bicycle-related accidents, head
injuries are the leading cause of death.
(3) Bicycles are a primary form of transportation and recreation
for many children, which leads to children ages five to fourteen
spending fifty percent more time riding bicycles than adult cyclists.
The large amount of time spent riding bicycles increases the likelihood
that these children will suffer an accident. Many head injuries to
children involved in bicycle accidents are easily avoidable through the
use of properly fitting helmets. Bicycle helmets can reduce the risk
of serious head injury by eighty-five percent and brain injury by
eighty-eight percent.
(4) Most bicycle accidents occur on bike paths, in parks, or in
driveways and do not involve contact with automobiles. Other
nonmotorized wheeled vehicles such as in-line skates, roller skates,
skateboards, and scooters use these facilities and can also benefit
from the use of helmets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person under sixteen years old may operate or ride upon a
bicycle, nonmotorized scooter, or skateboard, nor wear in-line skates
or roller skates on a highway, bicycle path, or a sidewalk, unless he
or she is wearing a properly fitted and fastened protective helmet.
(2) The Washington state patrol shall make available on their web
site and upon request by mail a list of manufacturers of protective
helmets that meet the standards of either the American Society for
Testing and Materials or the United States Consumer Product Safety
Commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 5.40 RCW
to read as follows:
Failure to wear a bicycle helmet does not constitute fault, nor may
such failure be admissible as evidence of the fault of any entity in
any civil action.

--- END ---