BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The Washington economy of the future can provide unparalleled
opportunity while maintaining Washington's traditional values if this
state pursues the future with clarity of purpose and perseverance;
(2) The Washington economy is in the midst of a massive transition
created by technological changes, global competition, and new
production practices;
(3) In order to maintain employment opportunities, increase income
levels, reduce poverty, and generate the public revenues needed to
provide public services, Washington must increasingly rely on an
economy that adds value to its natural resources and provides a diverse
mix of products;
(4) A Washington progress board is needed to:
(a) Encourage the discussion and understanding of critical global
and national economic trends that will affect the Washington economy in
the coming decades;
(b) Formulate and submit to Washingtonians a strategy that
describes and explains a vision for Washington's economic progress over
the next twenty to thirty years; and
(c) Submit to the legislature, for enactment, goals for
Washington's progress, including measurable indicators of the
achievement of those goals, as provided for in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington progress board is created, consisting of the
governor, nine members appointed by the governor, and the director of
the department of general administration, who shall be a nonvoting ex
officio member.
(2)(a) Of the initial appointed members, four shall serve for terms
ending January 31, 2005, and five shall serve for terms ending January
31, 2007. Except for initial appointments, the terms of appointed
members shall be four years. Members may be reappointed.
(b)(i) Members of the board shall be representative of the ethnic,
cultural, social, and economic diversity of the people of Washington.
(ii) Five of the appointed members of the board shall be residents
of different congressional districts in the state.
(c) Members of the board are entitled to travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(3) The governor shall serve as chair of the board and may appoint
an executive officer for the board for a term and with such duties and
powers as the board determines to be necessary or appropriate.
(4) A majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum for
the transaction of business.
(5) The board shall meet together as a board as the board
determines necessary at times and places specified by call of the chair
or a majority of the members of the board.
(6) The department of community, trade, and economic development,
office of community development, shall provide clerical, technical, and
management personnel to the board to serve as the board's staff.
(7)(a) The board shall develop a strategy that addresses the
economic, social, cultural, environmental, and other needs and
aspirations of the people of Washington. The strategy shall address
issues that the board determines are necessary and appropriate to
Washington's future. Such issues shall include:
(i) Education and work force;
(ii) Public and private cooperation;
(iii) Environmental quality;
(iv) Infrastructure;
(v) Funding and taxation;
(vi) Organizational excellence; and
(vii) Such other issues as the board, by majority vote, adds to the
strategy.
(b) When developing the strategy, the board shall hold public
hearings, public meetings, and workshops as needed to ensure the
participation of a broad cross section of Washington's population. The
board shall publicize the public hearings, public meetings, and
workshops in each city in which they are held and shall allow
interested residents and other individuals to appear and be heard by
the board.
(c) After considering any written comments and public testimony
relating to the proposed strategy, the board shall revise the strategy
as it considers necessary or appropriate. The board, by a vote of a
majority of its members, shall approve and adopt a final strategy. The
board shall submit, in addition to its adopted strategy, a summary and
digest of comments and public testimony and its response, if any, to
those comments. The adopted strategy shall be submitted to the
legislature not later than December 1, 2009, and every six years
thereafter.
(8) As a part of the strategy adopted under subsection (7) of this
section, the board shall also adopt a recommended implementation plan.
The plan shall include recommendations for statutory or other changes
the board considers appropriate, modifications in public fiscal and
spending policies, including the allocation of lottery revenues, and
also recommendations for implementing actions to be carried out by
local governments, businesses, private citizens, and other
organizations.
(9)(a) The board shall, in its adopted strategy, include a series
of goals for Washington's progress over the next two to three decades.
(b) Goals shall include such measurable indicators of attainment,
as the board shall determine, that show the extent to which each goal
is being achieved.
(c) Goals shall be reviewed by the legislature, which may propose
legislation that enacts the goals as recommended or that modifies,
deletes, or adds to the goals. Any goals enacted by the legislature
shall become the goals used by the board in its subsequent activities.
(d) After enactment, the board may recommend to the legislature
such modifications to the goals as it considers appropriate.
(10) The board shall prepare, at least once each biennium, a report
that describes progress toward achievement of the board's strategy,
based on the specific indicators the board adopts for measuring the
attainment of strategic goals. The report shall include an analysis of
issues and trends of strategic significance and shall propose an agenda
that identifies key steps that Washington should take over the
following two years to build for Washington's future. In developing
the report required by this section, the board shall consider the
criteria in this section.
(11) The board may adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW.

--- END ---