BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to ensure that construction projects involving the use
of fill material do not pose a threat to water quality, the department
may require that the suitability of potential fill material be
evaluated using a leaching test included in the soil clean-up rules
adopted by the department under chapter 70.105D RCW in any water
quality certification issued under section 401 of the federal clean
water act and in any administrative order issued under this chapter,
where such certification or administrative order authorizes the
placement of fill material, some or all of which will be placed in
waters of the state. Any such requirement imposed by the department in
a water quality certification or administrative order issued prior to
the effective date of this section is ratified and approved by the
legislature as a valid and reliable method for determining
concentrations of chemical constituents that can be present in fill
material without posing an unacceptable risk of violating water quality
standards, and shall be in effect as imposed by the department for all
work not completed by June 1, 2003.
(2) Nothing in this section limits, in any way, the department's
authority under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall identify the leaching tests utilized for
evaluating the potential impacts to water quality in situations where
fill material is imported. The tests may include those identified in
the soil clean-up rules adopted by the department under chapter 70.105D
RCW. Within existing resources, the department shall assess whether
this list of leaching tests provides appropriate methods for analyzing
water quality impacts for all types of projects and in all
circumstances where fill material is imported. The department shall
also identify any gaps in leaching test methodology. The department
shall report both the leaching test list and the list of test
methodology gaps to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 31, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---