BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that administrative
rules that set fees and rates can have significant effects on small
businesses, and that increasing fees and rates does not always produce
a benefit commensurate with cost of raising fees and rates, either to
the state, to businesses, or to the general public. The legislature
finds that when it specifically determines fees and rates in statutes,
then it is appropriate that state agencies adopting administrative
rules that mirror those statutes not be required to perform a
cost/benefit analysis or conduct a small business impact statement.
The legislature finds that state agencies should meet all the
requirements for adopting significant legislative rules when an agency
sets fees or rates that have not been set in statute. The legislature
finds that this reform will assure that Washington's businesses and
citizens are not burdened by fee and rate increases which are not
justified by producing significant benefits without producing
significant burdens for Washington's businesses and citizens.

Sec. 2 RCW 34.05.310 and 1995 c 403 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To meet the intent of providing greater public access to
administrative rule making and to promote consensus among interested
parties, agencies shall solicit comments from the public on a subject
of possible rule making before filing with the code reviser a notice of
proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320. The agency shall prepare a
statement of inquiry that:
(a) Identifies the specific statute or statutes authorizing the
agency to adopt rules on this subject;
(b) Discusses why rules on this subject may be needed and what they
might accomplish;
(c) Identifies other federal and state agencies that regulate this
subject, and describes the process whereby the agency would coordinate
the contemplated rule with these agencies;
(d) Discusses the process by which the rule might be developed,
including, but not limited to, negotiated rule making, pilot rule
making, or agency study;
(e) Specifies the process by which interested parties can
effectively participate in the decision to adopt a new rule and
formulation of a proposed rule before its publication.
The statement of inquiry shall be filed with the code reviser for
publication in the state register at least thirty days before the date
the agency files notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320 and
shall be sent to any party that has requested receipt of the agency's
statements of inquiry.
(2) Agencies are encouraged to develop and use new procedures for
reaching agreement among interested parties before publication of
notice and the adoption hearing on a proposed rule. Examples of new
procedures include, but are not limited to:
(a) Negotiated rule making by which representatives of an agency
and of the interests that are affected by a subject of rule making,
including, where appropriate, county and city representatives, seek to
reach consensus on the terms of the proposed rule and on the process by
which it is negotiated; and
(b) Pilot rule making which includes testing the feasibility of
complying with or administering draft new rules or draft amendments to
existing rules through the use of volunteer pilot groups in various
areas and circumstances, as provided in RCW 34.05.313 or as otherwise
provided by the agency.
(3)(a) An agency must make a determination whether negotiated rule
making, pilot rule making, or another process for generating
participation from interested parties prior to development of the rule
is appropriate.
(b) An agency must include a written justification in the rule-making file if an opportunity for interested parties to participate in
the rule-making process prior to publication of the proposed rule has
not been provided.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(b) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that
are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;
(c) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes,
rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs
other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(d) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect;
(e) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute;
(f) Rules that set or adjust fees or rates ((pursuant to
legislative standards)) to make the rules match fees or rates that are
explicitly set in statute; or
(g) Rules that adopt, amend, or repeal:
(i) A procedure, practice, or requirement relating to agency
hearings; or
(ii) A filing or related process requirement for applying to an
agency for a license or permit.

Sec. 3 RCW 34.05.328 and 1997 c 430 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency shall:
(a) Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific
objectives of the statute that the rule implements;
(b) Determine that the rule is needed to achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection, and
analyze alternatives to rule making and the consequences of not
adopting the rule;
(c) Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater
than its probable costs, taking into account both the qualitative and
quantitative benefits and costs and the specific directives of the
statute being implemented;
(d) Determine, after considering alternative versions of the rule
and the analysis required under (b) and (c) of this subsection, that
the rule being adopted is the least burdensome alternative for those
required to comply with it that will achieve the general goals and
specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection;
(e) Determine that the rule does not require those to whom it
applies to take an action that violates requirements of another federal
or state law;
(f) Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent
performance requirements on private entities than on public entities
unless required to do so by federal or state law;
(g) Determine if the rule differs from any federal regulation or
statute applicable to the same activity or subject matter and, if so,
determine that the difference is justified by the following:
(i) A state statute that explicitly allows the agency to differ
from federal standards; or
(ii) Substantial evidence that the difference is necessary to
achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of
this subsection; and
(h) Coordinate the rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with
other federal, state, and local laws applicable to the same activity or
subject matter.
(2) In making its determinations pursuant to subsection (1)(b)
through (g) of this section, the agency shall place in the rule-making
file documentation of sufficient quantity and quality so as to persuade
a reasonable person that the determinations are justified.
(3) Before adopting rules described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency shall place in the rule-making file a rule
implementation plan for rules filed under each adopting order. The
plan shall describe how the agency intends to:
(a) Implement and enforce the rule, including a description of the
resources the agency intends to use;
(b) Inform and educate affected persons about the rule;
(c) Promote and assist voluntary compliance; and
(d) Evaluate whether the rule achieves the purpose for which it was
adopted, including, to the maximum extent practicable, the use of
interim milestones to assess progress and the use of objectively
measurable outcomes.
(4) After adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section regulating the same activity or subject matter as another
provision of federal or state law, an agency shall do all of the
following:
(a) Provide to the business assistance center a list citing by
reference the other federal and state laws that regulate the same
activity or subject matter;
(b) Coordinate implementation and enforcement of the rule with the
other federal and state entities regulating the same activity or
subject matter by making every effort to do one or more of the
following:
(i) Deferring to the other entity;
(ii) Designating a lead agency; or
(iii) Entering into an agreement with the other entities specifying
how the agency and entities will coordinate implementation and
enforcement.
If the agency is unable to comply with this subsection (4)(b), the
agency shall report to the legislature pursuant to (c) of this
subsection;
(c) Report to the joint administrative rules review committee:
(i) The existence of any overlap or duplication of other federal or
state laws, any differences from federal law, and any known overlap,
duplication, or conflict with local laws; and
(ii) Make recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary
to eliminate or mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap,
duplication, or difference.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this section
applies to:
(i) Significant legislative rules of the departments of ecology,
labor and industries, health, revenue, social and health services, and
natural resources, the employment security department, the forest
practices board, the office of the insurance commissioner, and to the
legislative rules of the department of fish and wildlife implementing
chapter ((75.20)) 77.55 RCW; and
(ii) Any rule of any agency, if this section is voluntarily made
applicable to the rule by the agency, or is made applicable to the rule
by a majority vote of the joint administrative rules review committee
within forty-five days of receiving the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(i) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(ii) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that
are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;
(iii) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes,
rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs
other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(iv) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect;
(v) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute;
(vi) Rules that set or adjust fees or rates ((pursuant to
legislative standards)) to make the rules match fees or rates that are
explicitly set in statute; or
(vii) Rules of the department of social and health services
relating only to client medical or financial eligibility and rules
concerning liability for care of dependents.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) A "procedural rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals
(A) any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to any agency
hearings; (B) any filing or related process requirement for making
application to an agency for a license or permit; or (C) any policy
statement pertaining to the consistent internal operations of an
agency.
(ii) An "interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does
not subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the
agency's interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.
(iii) A "significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a
procedural or interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions
of law pursuant to delegated legislative authority, the violation of
which subjects a violator of such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B)
establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification or standard for the
issuance, suspension, or revocation of a license or permit; or (C)
adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a policy or
regulatory program.
(d) In the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an
agency shall state whether this section applies to the proposed rule
pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection, or if the agency will apply this
section voluntarily.
(6) By January 31, 1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered
year thereafter, the office of financial management, after consulting
with state agencies, counties, and cities, and business, labor, and
environmental organizations, shall report to the governor and the
legislature regarding the effects of this section on the regulatory
system in this state. The report shall document:
(a) The rules proposed to which this section applied and to the
extent possible, how compliance with this section affected the
substance of the rule, if any, that the agency ultimately adopted;
(b) The costs incurred by state agencies in complying with this
section;
(c) Any legal action maintained based upon the alleged failure of
any agency to comply with this section, the costs to the state of such
action, and the result;
(d) The extent to which this section has adversely affected the
capacity of agencies to fulfill their legislatively prescribed mission;
(e) The extent to which this section has improved the acceptability
of state rules to those regulated; and
(f) Any other information considered by the office of financial
management to be useful in evaluating the effect of this section.

--- END ---