BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.45 RCW
to read as follows:
Any city or town, when authorized by ordinance, may transfer
permanently or temporarily, money from its general fund, or from any
other municipal fund as its council shall specify in that ordinance, to
its local improvement guaranty fund or any of its local improvement
funds to be used for the purposes of these local improvement funds,
including the payment of bonds, interest coupons, warrants, or other
short-term obligations. The powers granted by this section are to be
exercised at the discretion of a council when found to be in the public
interest, but money transferred by means of these powers shall not be
pledged to the payment of any local improvement district obligations.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.45.050 and 1983 c 167 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except when bonds have been issued with a fixed maturity schedule
or with a fixed maximum annual retirement schedule as authorized in RCW
35.45.020, the city or town treasurer shall call in and pay the
principal of one or more bonds of any issue (1) in their numerical
order; or (2) where bonds are issued with an estimated redemption
schedule, in either numerical order or chronological order by maturity
and within each maturity by date of estimated redemption as determined
in the bond authorizing ordinance, whenever there is sufficient money
in any local improvement fund, against which the bonds have been
issued, over and above that which is sufficient for the payment of
interest on all unpaid bonds of that issue. The call shall be made for
publication in the city or town official newspaper in its first
publication following the date of delinquency of any installment of the
assessment or as soon thereafter as practicable. The call shall state
that bonds No. . . . . (giving the serial number or numbers of the
bonds called) will be paid on the day the next interest payments are
due and that interest on those bonds will cease upon that date.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.88.160 and 1963 c 4 s 36.88.160 are each amended to
read as follows:
All moneys collected by the treasurer upon any assessments under
this chapter shall be kept as a separate fund to be known as
". . . . . ., county road improvement district No. . . . . fund." Such
funds shall be used for no other purpose than the payment of costs and
expense of construction and improvement in such district and the
payment of interest or principal of warrants and bonds drawn or issued
upon or against said fund for said purposes. Whenever after payment of
the costs and expenses of the improvement there shall be available in
the local improvement district fund a sum, over and above the amount
necessary to meet the interest payments next accruing on outstanding
bonds, sufficient to retire one or more outstanding bonds the treasurer
shall forthwith call such bond or bonds for redemption as determined in
the bond authorizing ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---