BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.80.020 and 1999 c 153 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "State agency" means any department, agency, commission,
bureau, office, or any other entity or authority of the state
government.
(2) "Local agency" means any city and any town, county, special
district, municipal corporation, agency, port district or authority, or
political subdivision of any type, or any other entity or authority of
local government in corporate form or otherwise.
(3) "Special district" means a local unit of government, other than
a city, town, or county, authorized by law to perform a single function
or a limited number of functions, and including but not limited to,
water-sewer districts, irrigation districts, fire districts, school
districts, community college districts, hospital districts,
transportation districts, and metropolitan municipal corporations
organized under chapter 35.58 RCW.
(4) "Agency" means both state and local agencies and special
districts as defined in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section.
(5) "Architectural and engineering services" or "professional
services" means professional services, other than professional land
surveying services, rendered by any person, other than as an employee
of the agency, contracting to perform activities within the scope of
the general definition of professional practice in chapters 18.08,
18.43, or 18.96 RCW.
(6) "Person" means any individual, organization, group,
association, partnership, firm, joint venture, corporation, or any
combination thereof.
(7) "Consultant" means any person providing professional services
who is not an employee of the agency for which the services are
provided.
(8) "Application" means a completed statement of qualifications
together with a request to be considered for the award of one or more
contracts for professional services.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.80.040 and 1981 c 61 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the procurement of architectural and engineering services, the
agency shall encourage firms engaged in the lawful practice of their
profession to submit annually a statement of qualifications and
performance data. The agency shall evaluate current statements of
qualifications and performance data on file with the agency, together
with those that may be submitted by other firms regarding the proposed
project, and shall conduct discussions with one or more firms regarding
anticipated concepts and the relative utility of alternative methods of
approach for furnishing the required services and then shall select
therefrom, based upon criteria established by the agency, ((the)) firms
deemed to be ((the most highly)) qualified to provide the services
required for the proposed project. Such agency procedures and
guidelines shall include a plan to insure that minority and women-owned
firms are afforded the maximum practicable opportunity to compete for
and obtain public contracts for services. The level of participation
by minority and women-owned firms shall be consistent with their
general availability within the professional communities involved.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.80.050 and 1981 c 61 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The agency shall negotiate a contract with ((the most)) a
qualified firm for architectural and engineering services at a price
which the agency determines is fair and reasonable to the agency. In
making its determination, the agency may use fee information solicited
from firms determined to be qualified to provide services after such
designation has been made, and shall take into account the estimated
value of the services to be rendered as well as the scope, complexity,
and professional nature thereof.
(((2) If the agency is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract
with the firm selected at a price the agency determines to be fair and
reasonable, negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated
and the agency shall select other firms in accordance with RCW
39.80.040 and continue in accordance with this section until an
agreement is reached or the process is terminated.))

--- END ---