BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.70.380 and 2000 c 107 s 82 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if fewer
than one hundred seventy-five persons are eligible for Dungeness crab-coastal fishery licenses, the director may accept applications for new
licenses. Additional licenses issued may maintain a maximum of one
hundred seventy-five licenses in the Washington coastal crab fishery.
If additional licenses are to be issued, the director shall adopt rules
governing the notification, application, selection, and issuance
procedures for new Dungeness crab-coastal fishery licenses((, based on
recommendations of the advisory review board established under RCW
77.70.030)).
(2) The department must consider a license transferred to,
purchased by, or otherwise held by the federal government as a license
renewed under RCW 77.70.280. A license transferred to, purchased by,
or otherwise held by the federal government is a license under the
limit of one hundred seventy-five established by this section.

--- END ---