BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.067 and 2002 c 46 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the projects authorized in RCW 39.10.061, public
bodies may also use the general contractor/construction manager
contracting procedure for the construction of school district capital
demonstration projects, subject to the following conditions:
(1) The project must receive approval from the school district
project review board established under RCW 39.10.115.
(2) The school district project review board may not authorize more
than ((ten)) twenty demonstration projects valued over five million
dollars, of which ((at least)) no more than two demonstration projects
((must)) may be valued between five and ten million dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.10.902 and 2002 c 46 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2007:
(1) RCW 39.10.010 and 1994 c 132 s 1;
(2) RCW 39.10.020 and 2001 c 328 s 1, 2000 c 209 s 1, 1997 c 376 s
1, & 1994 c 132 s 2;
(3) RCW 39.10.030 and 1997 c 376 s 2 & 1994 c 132 s 3;
(4) RCW 39.10.040 and 1994 c 132 s 4;
(5) RCW 39.10.051 and 2002 c 46 s 1 & 2001 c 328 s 2;
(6) RCW 39.10.061 and 2002 c 46 s 2 & 2001 c 328 s 3;
(7) RCW 39.10.065 and 1997 c 376 s 5;
(8) RCW 39.10.067 and 2003 c ... s 1 (section 1 of this act), 2002
c 46 s 3, & 2000 c 209 s 3;
(9) RCW 39.10.070 and 1994 c 132 s 7;
(10) RCW 39.10.080 and 1994 c 132 s 8;
(11) RCW 39.10.090 and 1994 c 132 s 9;
(12) RCW 39.10.100 and 1994 c 132 s 10;
(13) RCW 39.10.115 and 2001 c 328 s 4 & 2000 c 209 s 4;
(14) RCW 39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13; and
(15) RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14.

--- END ---