BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21B.180 and 1994 c 253 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Judicial review of a decision of the hearings board may be
obtained only pursuant to RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598. Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, the director shall have the
same right of review ((from)) of a decision made pursuant to RCW
43.21B.110 as does any person.
(2) The director has no right of review of a hearings board
decision based on department decisions made under federal delegation of
authority and regarding certifications required by the federal clean
water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1341).

--- END ---