BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.135.025 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state shall not expend from the general fund during any
fiscal year state moneys in excess of the state expenditure limit
established under this chapter.
(2) Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW
43.135.035 or pursuant to an appropriation under RCW 43.135.045(4)(b),
the state treasurer shall not issue or redeem any check, warrant, or
voucher that will result in a state general fund expenditure for any
fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure limit established under
this chapter. A violation of this subsection constitutes a violation
of RCW 43.88.290 and shall subject the state treasurer to the penalties
provided in RCW 43.88.300.
(3) The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the
previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit increased by a
percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.
(4) For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, ((1995)) 2003, the phrase "the previous
fiscal year's state expenditure limit" means the total state
expenditures from the state general fund((, not including federal
funds,)) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1989, plus the fiscal
growth factor. ((This calculation is then computed for the state
expenditure limit for fiscal years 1992, 1993, 1994, and 1995, and as
required under RCW 43.135.035(4).))
(5) A state expenditure limit committee is established for the
purpose of determining and adjusting the state expenditure limit as
provided in this chapter. The six members of the state expenditure
limit committee are the director of financial management, the attorney
general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs and ranking
minority members of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations. All actions of
the state expenditure limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter
require an affirmative vote of at least ((three)) four members.
(6) Each November, the state expenditure limit committee shall
adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding fiscal year based on
actual expenditures and known changes in the fiscal growth factor and
then project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years. If,
by November 30th, the state expenditure limit committee has not adopted
the expenditure limit adjustment and projected expenditure limit as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney general or his
or her designee shall adjust or project the expenditure limit, as
necessary.
(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average of the sum of
inflation and population change for each of the ((prior)) three fiscal
years prior to the year for which the state expenditure limit is being
adopted.
(8) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for the United States for each fiscal year as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics.
(9) "Population change" means the percentage change in state
population for each fiscal year as reported by the office of financial
management.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.135.035 and 2002 c 33 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house, and then only if state expenditures in any fiscal year,
including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure limits
established under this chapter. ((However, during the 2001-2003
biennium, any action or combination of actions by the legislature that
raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be
taken only if approved by a majority vote of each house, and then only
if state expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue,
will not exceed the state expenditure limits established under this
chapter.))
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
((office of financial management)) state expenditure limit committee
shall adjust the state expenditure limit by the amount of additional
revenue approved by the voters under this section. This adjustment
shall not exceed the amount of revenue generated by the legislative
action during the first full fiscal year in which it is in effect. The
state expenditure limit shall be adjusted downward upon expiration or
repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
inflation and population increases?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the nature of the
emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require immediate
government action to alleviate human suffering and provide humanitarian
assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no more
than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund ((on or after January 1, 1993,)) to another
source of funding, or if moneys are transferred from the state general
fund to another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee,
acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a
transfer of money from the state general fund to another fund or
account includes any state legislative action taken after July 1, 2000,
that has the effect of reducing revenues from a particular source,
where such revenues would otherwise be deposited into the state general
fund, while increasing the revenues from that particular source to
another state or local government account. For purposes of this
section, a shift of program costs means the shift of any portion of the
program cost, including the shift of any expenditure growth in the
program. This subsection does not apply to the dedication or use of
lottery revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW
84.52.068, in support of education or education expenditures.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted to the
state general fund on or after January 1, ((2000)) 2003, from another
source of funding, ((or if moneys are transferred to the state general
fund from another fund or account,)) the state expenditure limit
committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall increase the
state expenditure limit to reflect the shift. However, the limit may
be increased for such a program cost shift only if:
(a) The legislature requires the deposit in the general fund of an
ongoing revenue source that would otherwise be deposited in the fund or
account that previously supported the program, in an amount equal to
the cost of the program shifted; and
(b) The redirection of the ongoing revenue source takes effect on
the same date that the cost of the program is shifted.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.135.035 and 2001 c 3 s 8 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s
2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house, and then only if state expenditures in any fiscal year,
including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure limits
established under this chapter.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
((office of financial management)) state expenditure limit committee
shall adjust the state expenditure limit by the amount of additional
revenue approved by the voters under this section. This adjustment
shall not exceed the amount of revenue generated by the legislative
action during the first full fiscal year in which it is in effect. The
state expenditure limit shall be adjusted downward upon expiration or
repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
inflation and population increases?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the nature of the
emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require immediate
government action to alleviate human suffering and provide humanitarian
assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no more
than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund ((on or after January 1, 1993,)) to another
source of funding, or if moneys are transferred from the state general
fund to another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee,
acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a
transfer of money from the state general fund to another fund or
account includes any state legislative action taken after July 1, 2000,
that has the effect of reducing revenues from a particular source,
where such revenues would otherwise be deposited into the state general
fund, while increasing the revenues from that particular source to
another state or local government account. For purposes of this
section, a shift of program costs means the shift of any portion of the
program cost, including the shift of any expenditure growth in the
program. This subsection does not apply to the dedication or use of
lottery revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW
84.52.068, in support of education or education expenditures.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted to the
state general fund on or after January 1, 2000, from another source of
funding, ((or if moneys are transferred to the state general fund from
another fund or account,)) the state expenditure limit committee,
acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall increase the state
expenditure limit to reflect the shift. However, the limit may be
increased for such a program cost shift only if:
(a) The legislature requires the deposit in the general fund of an
ongoing revenue source that would otherwise be deposited in the fund or
account that previously supported the program, in an amount equal to
the cost of the program shifted; and
(b) The redirection of the ongoing revenue source takes effect on
the same date that the cost of the program is shifted.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.135.045 and 2002 c 33 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit
in the emergency reserve fund all general fund -- state revenues in
excess of the state expenditure limit for that fiscal year. Deposits
shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on projections of
state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall
make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and
thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter. ((However, during the 2001-2003 biennium, the
legislature may transfer moneys from the emergency reserve fund to the
general fund only with approval of a majority of the members of each
house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation does not
cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit under
this chapter.))
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to the student achievement fund hereby
created in the state treasury and twenty-five percent to the general
fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter.
(4) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(5) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.
(((6) Earnings of the emergency reserve fund under RCW
43.84.092(4)(a) shall be transferred quarterly to the multimodal
transportation account, except for those earnings that are in excess of
thirty-five million dollars each fiscal year. Within thirty days
following any fiscal year in which earnings transferred to the
multimodal transportation account under this subsection did not total
thirty-five million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the emergency reserve fund an amount necessary to bring the total
deposited in the multimodal transportation account under this
subsection to thirty-five million dollars. The revenues to the
multimodal transportation account reflected in this subsection provide
ongoing support for the transportation programs of the state. However,
it is the intent of the legislature that any new long-term financial
support that may be subsequently provided for transportation programs
will be used to replace and supplant the revenues reflected in this
subsection, thereby allowing those revenues to be returned to the
purposes to which they were previously dedicated.))

Sec. 5 RCW 43.135.045 and 2001 c 3 s 9, 2000 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1,
and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit
in the emergency reserve fund all general fund -- state revenues in
excess of the state expenditure limit for that fiscal year. Deposits
shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on projections of
state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall
make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and
thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter.
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to the student achievement fund hereby
created in the state treasury and twenty-five percent to the general
fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter.
(4) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(5) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.
(((6) Earnings of the emergency reserve fund under RCW
43.84.092(4)(a) shall be transferred quarterly to the multimodal
transportation account, except for those earnings that are in excess of
thirty-five million dollars each fiscal year. Within thirty days
following any fiscal year in which earnings transferred to the
multimodal transportation account under this subsection did not total
thirty-five million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the emergency reserve fund an amount necessary to bring the total
deposited in the multimodal transportation account under this
subsection to thirty-five million dollars. The revenues to the
multimodal transportation account reflected in this subsection provide
ongoing support for the transportation programs of the state. However,
it is the intent of the legislature that any new long-term financial
support that may be subsequently provided for transportation programs
will be used to replace and supplant the revenues reflected in this
subsection, thereby allowing those revenues to be returned to the
purposes to which they were previously dedicated.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 and 4 of this act expire June 30,
2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for sections 3 and 5 of this act which take effect
June 30, 2003.

--- END ---