BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.040 and 1999 c 348 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the
powers and duties of the superintendent of public instruction shall be:
(1) To have supervision over all matters pertaining to the public
schools of the state;
(2) To report to the governor and the legislature such information
and data as may be required for the management and improvement of the
schools;
(3) To prepare and have printed such forms, registers, courses of
study, rules for the government of the common schools, and such other
material and books as may be necessary for the discharge of the duties
of teachers and officials charged with the administration of the laws
relating to the common schools, and to distribute the same to
educational service district superintendents;
(4) To travel, without neglecting his or her other official duties
as superintendent of public instruction, for the purpose of attending
educational meetings or conventions, of visiting schools, of consulting
educational service district superintendents or other school officials;
(5) To prepare and from time to time to revise a manual of the
Washington state common school code, copies of which shall be provided
in such numbers as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction at no cost to those public agencies within the common
school system and which shall be sold at approximate actual cost of
publication and distribution per volume to all other public and
nonpublic agencies or individuals, said manual to contain Titles 28A
and 28C RCW, rules related to the common schools, and such other matter
as the state superintendent or the state board of education shall
determine. Proceeds of the sale of such code shall be transmitted to
the public printer who shall credit the state superintendent's account
within the state printing plant revolving fund by a like amount;
(6) To act as ex officio member and the chief executive officer of
the state board of education;
(7) To file all papers, reports and public documents transmitted to
the superintendent by the school officials of the several counties or
districts of the state, each year separately. Copies of all papers
filed in the superintendent's office, and the superintendent's official
acts, may, or upon request, shall be certified by the superintendent
and attested by the superintendent's official seal, and when so
certified shall be evidence of the papers or acts so certified to;
(8) To require annually, on or before the 15th day of August, of
the president, manager, or principal of every educational institution
in this state, a report as required by the superintendent of public
instruction; and it is the duty of every president, manager or
principal, to complete and return such forms within such time as the
superintendent of public instruction shall direct;
(9) To keep in the superintendent's office a record of all teachers
receiving certificates to teach in the common schools of this state;
(10) To issue certificates as provided by law;
(11) To keep in the superintendent's office at the capital of the
state, all books and papers pertaining to the business of the
superintendent's office, and to keep and preserve in the
superintendent's office a complete record of statistics, as well as a
record of the meetings of the state board of education;
(12) With the assistance of the office of the attorney general, to
decide all points of law which may be submitted to the superintendent
in writing by any educational service district superintendent, or that
may be submitted to the superintendent by any other person, upon appeal
from the decision of any educational service district superintendent;
and the superintendent shall publish his or her rulings and decisions
from time to time for the information of school officials and teachers;
and the superintendent's decision shall be final unless set aside by a
court of competent jurisdiction;
(13) To administer oaths and affirmations in the discharge of the
superintendent's official duties;
(14) To deliver to his or her successor, at the expiration of the
superintendent's term of office, all records, books, maps, documents
and papers of whatever kind belonging to the superintendent's office or
which may have been received by the superintendent's for the use of the
superintendent's office;
(15) To administer family services and programs to promote the
state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025;
(16) To solicit and receive such gifts, grants, conveyances,
devises, and bequests of real or personal property from private
sources, and spend gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests
according to their terms, as may be made from time to time, whenever
the terms and conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the various
programs required or authorized to be carried out by the superintendent
of public instruction, however receipt of gifts, grants, conveyances,
devises, and bequests of real or personal property contingent on the
promotion, advertisement, or display of commercial products is not
permitted under this subsection; and
(17) To perform such other duties as may be required by law.

--- END ---