BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.655.060 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 20 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The Washington commission on student learning is hereby
established. The primary purposes of the commission are to identify
the knowledge and skills all public school students need to know and be
able to do based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, to
develop student assessment and school accountability systems, to review
current school district data reporting requirements and make
recommendations on what data is necessary for the purposes of
accountability and meeting state information needs, and to take other
steps necessary to develop a performance-based education system. The
commission shall include three members of the state board of education,
three members appointed by the governor before July 1, 1992, and five
members appointed no later than June 1, 1993, by the governor elected
in the November 1992 election. The governor shall appoint a chair from
the commission members, and fill any vacancies in gubernatorial
appointments that may occur. The state board of education shall fill
any vacancies of state board of education appointments that may occur.
In making the appointments, educators, business leaders, and parents
shall be represented, and nominations from statewide education,
business, and parent organizations shall be requested. Efforts shall
be made to ensure that the commission reflects the racial and ethnic
diversity of the state's K-12 student population and that the major
geographic regions in the state are represented. Appointees shall be
qualified individuals who are supportive of educational restructuring,
who have a positive record of service, and who will devote sufficient
time to the responsibilities of the commission to ensure that the
objectives of the commission are achieved.
(2) The commission shall establish advisory committees. Membership
of the advisory committees shall include, but not necessarily be
limited to, professionals from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction and the state board of education, and other state
and local educational practitioners and student assessment specialists.
(3) The commission, with the assistance of the advisory committees,
shall:
(a) Develop essential academic learning requirements based on the
student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Essential academic learning
requirements shall be developed, to the extent possible, for each of
the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall
be considered primary. Essential academic learning requirements for
RCW 28A.150.210(1), goal one, and the mathematics component of RCW
28A.150.210(2), goal two, shall be completed no later than March 1,
1995. Essential academic learning requirements that incorporate the
remainder of RCW 28A.150.210 (2), (3), and (4), goals two, three, and
four, shall be completed no later than March 1, 1996. To the maximum
extent possible, the commission shall integrate goal four and the
knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the development of the
essential academic learning requirements;
(b)(i) The commission and superintendent of public instruction
shall develop a statewide academic assessment system for use in the
elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if each
student has learned the essential academic learning requirements
identified in (a) of this subsection. The academic assessment system
shall include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures. Performance standards for
determining if a student has successfully completed an assessment shall
be determined by the commission and the superintendent of public
instruction in consultation with the advisory committees required in
subsection (2) of this section.
(ii) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not learned the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(iii)(A) Assessments measuring the essential academic learning
requirements shall be available for voluntary use by school districts
and shall be required to be administered by school districts according
to the following schedule unless the legislature takes action to delay
or prevent implementation of the assessment system and essential
academic learning requirements.

Assessments
available for
voluntary use
(School years) Assessments
required to be
administered
(School years)

Reading, Writing,
Communication, Mathematics

- Elementary school 1996-97 1997-98

- Middle school 1997-98 2000-01

- High school 1998-99 2000-01

Science

- High school 2002-03 2003-04

- Middle school 2002-03 2003-04

- Elementary school 2003-04 2004-05

Social Studies

- Elementary, middle, and
high school 2004-05 2007-08

Arts

- Middle and high school 2005-06 2008-09

- Elementary school 2005-06 2009-10

Health, Fitness

- Middle and high school 2005-06 2008-09

- Elementary school 2005-06 2009-10

(B) All of the assessments shall be developed and revised, as
necessary, by the superintendent of public instruction in consultation
with teachers, other educators, parents, and community members;
(C) The reading, writing, communication, mathematics, and science
assessments shall be administered to students by school districts in a
consistent manner during a prescribed time period in accordance with
guidelines developed by the superintendent; and scored centrally by the
superintendent or a designated contractor. Results of these
assessments shall be reported by the superintendent of public
instruction to the public when the assessments are voluntary and when
they are required to be administered;
(D) The arts and health and fitness assessments shall be designed
to be classroom or project-based so that they can be embedded in
classroom instruction; administered by school staff throughout the
regular school year; and scored at the school, district, or regional
level using consistent scoring criteria and procedures. The reporting
of results by the superintendent of public instruction shall be
required once the assessments are required to be administered. Before
the assessments are required, reporting of results by the
superintendent shall be determined on a case-by-case basis by the
superintendent;
(E)(I) The social studies assessments shall be in two parts.
Standardized assessments shall: Measure the knowledge and skills
necessary to assume the responsibilities and rights of citizens; be
administered only in the middle and high school grades; be administered
to students by school districts in a consistent manner during a
prescribed time period in accordance with guidelines developed by the
superintendent; and be scored centrally by the superintendent or a
designated contractor at the local level with oversight by the
superintendent. Results of these assessments shall be reported by the
superintendent of public instruction to the public when the assessments
are voluntary and when they are required to be administered;
(II) The social studies classroom-based assessments shall be
administered in the elementary, middle, and high school grades; be
designed to be classroom or project-based so that they can be embedded
in classroom instruction; be administered by school staff throughout
the regular school year; and be scored at the school, district, or
regional level using consistent scoring criteria and procedures. The
reporting of results by the superintendent of public instruction shall
be required once the assessments are required to be administered.
Before the assessments are required, reporting of results by the
superintendent shall be determined on a case-by-case basis by the
superintendent.
The completed assessments and assessments still in development
shall be transferred by the commission on student learning to the
superintendent of public instruction by June 30, 1999.
(iv) To the maximum extent possible, the commission and the
superintendent of public instruction shall integrate knowledge and
skill areas in development of the assessments.
Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall be
integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(v) The commission on student learning may modify the essential
academic learning requirements and the assessments, as needed, before
June 30, 1999. The superintendent of public instruction may modify the
essential academic learning requirements and the assessments, as
needed, after June 30, 1999. The commission and superintendent shall,
upon request, provide opportunities for the education committees of the
house of representatives and the senate to review the assessments and
proposed modifications to the essential academic learning requirements
before the modifications are adopted.
(vi) The commission and the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop assessments that are directly related to the essential
academic learning requirements, and are not biased toward persons with
different learning styles, racial or ethnic backgrounds, or on the
basis of gender;
(c) After a determination is made by the state board of education
that the high school assessment system has been implemented and that it
is sufficiently reliable and valid, successful completion of the high
school assessment shall lead to a certificate of mastery. The
certificate of mastery shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the student has successfully
mastered the essential academic learning requirements during his or her
educational career. The certificate of mastery shall be required for
graduation but shall not be the only requirement for graduation. The
commission shall make recommendations to the state board of education
regarding the relationship between the certificate of mastery and high
school graduation requirements. Upon achieving the certificate of
mastery, schools shall provide students with the opportunity to pursue
career and educational objectives through educational pathways that
emphasize integration of academic and vocational education.
Educational pathways may include, but are not limited to, programs such
as work-based learning, school-to-work transition, tech prep,
vocational-technical education, running start, and preparation for
technical college, community college, or university education. Any
middle school, junior high school, or high school using educational
pathways shall ensure that all participating students will continue to
have access to the courses and instruction necessary to meet admission
requirements at baccalaureate institutions. Students shall be allowed
to enter the educational pathway of their choice. Before accepting a
student into an educational pathway, the school shall inform the
student's parent of the pathway chosen, the opportunities available to
the student through the pathway, and the career objectives the student
will have exposure to while pursuing the pathway. Parents and students
dissatisfied with the opportunities available through the selected
educational pathway shall be provided with the opportunity to transfer
the student to any other pathway provided in the school. Schools may
not develop educational pathways that retain students in high school
beyond the date they are eligible to graduate, and may not require
students who transfer between pathways to complete pathway requirements
beyond the date the student is eligible to graduate;
(d) Consider methods to address the unique needs of special
education students when developing the assessments in (b) and (c) of
this subsection;
(e) Consider methods to address the unique needs of highly capable
students when developing the assessments in (b) and (c) of this
subsection;
(f) Develop recommendations on the time, support, and resources,
including technical assistance, needed by schools and school districts
to help students achieve the essential academic learning requirements.
These recommendations shall include an estimate for the legislature,
superintendent of public instruction, and governor on the expected cost
of implementing the academic assessment system;
(g) Develop recommendations for consideration by the higher
education coordinating board for adopting college and university
entrance requirements for public school students that are consistent
with the essential academic learning requirements and the certificate
of mastery;
(h) Review current school district data reporting requirements for
the purposes of accountability and meeting state information needs.
The commission on student learning shall report recommendations to the
joint select committee on education restructuring by September 15,
1996, on:
(i) What data is necessary to compare how school districts are
performing before the essential academic learning requirements and the
assessment system are implemented with how school districts are
performing after the essential academic learning requirements and the
assessment system are implemented; and
(ii) What data is necessary pertaining to school district reports
under the accountability systems developed by the commission on student
learning under this section;
(i) Recommend to the legislature, governor, state board of
education, and superintendent of public instruction:
(i) A statewide accountability system to monitor and evaluate
accurately and fairly at elementary, middle, and high schools the level
of learning occurring in individual schools and school districts with
regard to the goals included in RCW 28A.150.210 (1) through (4). The
accountability system must assess each school individually against its
own baseline, schools with similar characteristics, and schools
statewide. The system shall include school-site, school district, and
state-level accountability reports;
(ii) A school assistance program to help schools and school
districts that are having difficulty helping students meet the
essential academic learning requirements as measured by performance on
the elementary, middle school, and high school assessments;
(iii) A system to intervene in schools and school districts in
which significant numbers of students persistently fail to learn the
essential academic learning requirements or meet the standards
established for the elementary, middle school, and high school
assessments; and
(iv) An awards program to provide incentives to school staff to
help their students learn the essential academic learning requirements,
with each school being assessed individually against its own baseline,
schools with similar characteristics, and the statewide average.
Incentives shall be based on the rate of percentage change of students
achieving the essential academic learning requirements and progress on
meeting the statewide average. School staff shall determine how the
awards will be spent.
The commission shall make recommendations regarding a statewide
accountability system for reading in grades kindergarten through four
by November 1, 1997. Recommendations for an accountability system in
the other subject areas and grade levels shall be made no later than
June 30, 1999;
(j) Report annually by December 1st to the legislature, the
governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and the state board
of education on the progress, findings, and recommendations of the
commission; and
(k) Make recommendations to the legislature and take other actions
necessary or desirable to help students meet the student learning
goals.
(4) The commission shall coordinate its activities with the state
board of education and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(5) The commission shall seek advice broadly from the public and
all interested educational organizations in the conduct of its work,
including holding periodic regional public hearings.
(6) The commission shall select an entity to provide staff support
and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide administrative oversight and be the fiscal agent for the
commission. The commission may direct the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to enter into subcontracts, within the
commission's resources, with school districts, teachers, higher
education faculty, state agencies, business organizations, and other
individuals and organizations to assist the commission in its
deliberations.
(7) Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(8)(a) By September 30, 1997, the commission on student learning,
the state board of education, and the superintendent of public
instruction shall jointly present recommendations to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate regarding the
high school assessments, the certificate of mastery, and high school
graduation requirements.
In preparing recommendations, the commission on student learning
shall convene an ad hoc working group to address questions, including:
(i) What type of document shall be used to identify student
performance and achievement and how will the document be described?
(ii) Should the students be required to pass the high school
assessments in all skill and content areas, or only in select skill and
content areas, to graduate?
(iii) How will the criteria for establishing the standards for
passing scores on the assessments be determined?
(iv) What timeline should be used in phasing-in the assessments as
a graduation requirement?
(v) What options may be used in demonstrating how the results of
the assessments will be displayed in a way that is meaningful to
students, parents, institutions of higher education, and potential
employers?
(vi) Are there other or additional methods by which the assessments
could be used to identify achievement such as endorsements, standards
of proficiency, merit badges, or levels of achievement?
(vii) Should the assessments and certificate of mastery be used to
satisfy college or university entrance criteria for public school
students? If yes, how should these methods be phased-in?
(b) The ad hoc working group shall report its recommendations to
the commission on student learning, the state board of education, and
the superintendent of public instruction by June 15, 1997. The
commission shall report the ad hoc working group's recommendations to
the education committees of the house of representatives and senate by
July 15, 1997. Final recommendations of the commission on student
learning, the state board of education, and the superintendent of
public instruction shall be presented to the education committees of
the house of representatives and the senate by September 30, 1997.
(9) The Washington commission on student learning shall expire on
June 30, 1999.

--- END ---