BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.34.410 and 2002 c 323 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public offering statement shall contain the following
information:
(a) The name and address of the condominium;
(b) The name and address of the declarant;
(c) The name and address of the management company, if any;
(d) The relationship of the management company to the declarant, if
any;
(e) A list of up to the five most recent condominium projects
completed by the declarant or an affiliate of the declarant within the
past five years, including the names of the condominiums, their
addresses, and the number of existing units in each. For the purpose
of this section, a condominium is "completed" when any one unit therein
has been rented or sold;
(f) The nature of the interest being offered for sale;
(g) A brief description of the permitted uses and use restrictions
pertaining to the units and the common elements;
(h) A brief description of the restrictions, if any, on the renting
or leasing of units by the declarant or other unit owners, together
with the rights, if any, of the declarant to rent or lease at least a
majority of units;
(i) The number of existing units in the condominium and the maximum
number of units that may be added to the condominium;
(j) A list of the principal common amenities in the condominium
which materially affect the value of the condominium and those that
will or may be added to the condominium;
(k) A list of the limited common elements assigned to the units
being offered for sale;
(l) The identification of any real property not in the condominium,
the owner of which has access to any of the common elements, and a
description of the terms of such access;
(m) The identification of any real property not in the condominium
to which unit owners have access and a description of the terms of such
access;
(n) The status of construction of the units and common elements,
including estimated dates of completion if not completed;
(o) The estimated current common expense liability for the units
being offered;
(p) An estimate of any payment with respect to the common expense
liability for the units being offered which will be due at closing;
(q) The estimated current amount and purpose of any fees not
included in the common expenses and charged by the declarant or the
association for the use of any of the common elements;
(r) Any assessments which have been agreed to or are known to the
declarant and which, if not paid, may constitute a lien against any
units or common elements in favor of any governmental agency;
(s) The identification of any parts of the condominium, other than
the units, which any individual owner will have the responsibility for
maintaining;
(t) If the condominium involves a conversion condominium, the
information required by RCW 64.34.415;
(u) Whether timesharing is restricted or prohibited, and if
restricted, a general description of such restrictions;
(v) A list of all development rights reserved to the declarant and
all special declarant rights reserved to the declarant, together with
the dates such rights must terminate, and a copy of or reference by
recording number to any recorded transfer of a special declarant right;
(w) A description of any material differences in terms of
furnishings, fixtures, finishes, and equipment between any model unit
available to the purchaser at the time the agreement for sale is
executed and the unit being offered;
(x) Any liens on real property to be conveyed to the association
required to be disclosed pursuant to RCW 64.34.435(2)(b);
(y) A list of any physical hazards known to the declarant which
particularly affect the condominium or the immediate vicinity in which
the condominium is located and which are not readily ascertainable by
the purchaser;
(z) A brief description of any construction warranties to be
provided to the purchaser;
(aa) Any building code violation citations received by the
declarant in connection with the condominium which have not been
corrected;
(bb) A statement of any unsatisfied judgments or pending suits
against the association, a statement of the status of any pending suits
material to the condominium of which the declarant has actual
knowledge, and a statement of any litigation brought by an owners'
association, unit owner, or governmental entity in which the declarant
or any affiliate of the declarant has been a defendant, arising out of
the construction, sale, or administration of any condominium within the
previous five years, together with the results thereof, if known;
(cc) Any rights of first refusal to lease or purchase any unit or
any of the common elements;
(dd) The extent to which the insurance provided by the association
covers furnishings, fixtures, and equipment located in the unit;
(ee) A notice which describes a purchaser's right to cancel the
purchase agreement or extend the closing under RCW 64.34.420, including
applicable time frames and procedures;
(ff) Any reports or statements required by RCW 64.34.415 or
64.34.440(6)(a). RCW 64.34.415 shall apply to the public offering
statement of a condominium in connection with which a final certificate
of occupancy was issued more than sixty calendar months prior to the
preparation of the public offering statement whether or not the
condominium is a conversion condominium as defined in RCW
64.34.020(10);
(gg) A list of the documents which the prospective purchaser is
entitled to receive from the declarant before the rescission period
commences;
(hh) A notice which states in substantially the following form:

STATUTORY WARRANTIES:
Pursuant to RCW 64.34.445(2), the declarant warrants as follows:
(1) A unit will be in at least as good condition at the earlier of
the time of the conveyance or delivery of possession as it was at the
time of contracting, reasonable wear and tear and damage by casualty or
condemnation excepted; and
(2) A unit and the common elements in the condominium are suitable
for the ordinary uses of real estate of its type and that any
improvements made or contracted for by the declarant or dealer will be:
(a) Free from defective materials; and
(b) Constructed in accordance with sound engineering and
construction standards, and in a workmanlike manner in compliance with
all laws then applicable to such improvements. Notwithstanding
anything contained in this statement to the contrary, these warranties
may not be varied, altered, or waived. However, the declarant may
disclaim liability for specific defects or specific failures to comply
with applicable law, known by the declarant or the dealer to be in
existence at the time of the purchase and listed as required by (ii) of
this subsection.
(ii) A notice which states in substantially the following form:

ITEMS EXCLUDED FROM WARRANTY:
The following specific defects or failures to comply with
applicable law are currently known by the declarant or the dealer to be
in existence at the time of your purchase. As such, the declarant
provides no warranty as to the following items and buyer acknowledges
that no statutory warranty exists as to the following defects:
1. . . . . . . . . .
2. . . . . . . . . .

(jj) A purchaser may not rely on any representation or express
warranty unless it is contained in the public offering statement or
made in writing signed by the declarant or by any person identified in
the public offering statement as the declarant's agent;
(((ii))) (kk) A notice which states: This public offering
statement is only a summary of some of the significant aspects of
purchasing a unit in this condominium and the condominium documents are
complex, contain other important information, and create binding legal
obligations. You should consider seeking the assistance of legal
counsel;
(((jj))) (ll) Any other information and cross-references which the
declarant believes will be helpful in describing the condominium to the
recipients of the public offering statement, all of which may be
included or not included at the option of the declarant;
(((kk))) (mm) A notice that addresses compliance or noncompliance
with the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted
on December 28, 1995; and
(((ll))) (nn) A notice that is substantially in the form required
by RCW 64.50.050.
(2) The public offering statement shall include copies of each of
the following documents: The declaration, the survey map and plans,
the articles of incorporation of the association, bylaws of the
association, rules and regulations, if any, current or proposed budget
for the association, and the balance sheet of the association current
within ninety days if assessments have been collected for ninety days
or more.
If any of the foregoing documents listed in this subsection are not
available because they have not been executed, adopted, or recorded,
drafts of such documents shall be provided with the public offering
statement, and, before closing the sale of a unit, the purchaser shall
be given copies of any material changes between the draft of the
proposed documents and the final documents.
(3) The disclosures required by subsection (1)(g), (k), (s), (u),
(v), and (cc) of this section shall also contain a reference to
specific sections in the condominium documents which further explain
the information disclosed.
(4) The disclosures required by subsection (1)(ee), (((hh), (ii),
and (ll))) (jj), (kk), and (nn) of this section shall be located at the
top of the first page of the public offering statement and be typed or
printed in ten-point bold face type size.
(5) A declarant shall promptly amend the public offering statement
to reflect any material change in the information required by this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.34.450 and 1989 c 43 s 4-113 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as limited by subsection (2) of this section, implied
warranties of quality:
(a) May be excluded or modified by written agreement of the
parties; and
(b) Are excluded by written expression of disclaimer, such as "as
is," "with all faults," or other language which in common understanding
calls the buyer's attention to the exclusion of warranties.
(2) With respect to a purchaser of a unit that may be occupied for
residential use, no general disclaimer of implied warranties of quality
is effective, but a declarant and any dealer may disclaim liability
((in an instrument signed by the purchaser for a specified defect or
specified failure to comply with applicable law, if the defect or
failure entered into and became a part of the basis of the bargain))
if, the dealer or declarant fully discloses a specific defect or
specific failure to comply with applicable law, known by the declarant
or dealer to be in existence at the time of the purchase, in the public
offering statement pursuant to RCW 64.34.410(1)(ii).

--- END ---