BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.440 and 1997 c 452 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any city, town, county, or municipal corporation that is
required to develop a comprehensive plan under RCW 36.70A.040(1) is
authorized to require, after reasonable notice to the public and a
public hearing, property owners to provide their portion of reasonable
relocation assistance to low-income tenants upon the demolition,
substantial rehabilitation ((whether due to code enforcement or any
other reason)), or change of use of residential property, ((or)) upon
the removal of use restrictions in an assisted-housing development, or
any other reason not related to code enforcement. No city, town,
county, or municipal corporation may require property owners to provide
relocation assistance to low-income tenants, as defined in this
chapter, upon the demolition, substantial rehabilitation, upon the
change of use of residential property, or upon the removal of use
restrictions in an assisted-housing development, except as expressly
authorized herein or when authorized or required by state or federal
law. As used in this section, "assisted housing development" means a
multifamily rental housing development that either receives government
assistance and is defined as federally assisted housing in RCW
59.28.020, or that receives other federal, state, or local government
assistance and is subject to use restrictions.
(2) As used in this section, "low-income tenants" means tenants
whose combined total income per dwelling unit is at or below fifty
percent of the median income, adjusted for family size, in the county
where the tenants reside.
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall
adopt rules defining county median income in accordance with the
definitions promulgated by the federal department of housing and urban
development.
(3) A requirement that property owners provide relocation
assistance shall include the amounts of such assistance to be provided
to low-income tenants. In determining such amounts, the jurisdiction
imposing the requirement shall evaluate, and receive public testimony
on, what relocation expenses displaced tenants would reasonably incur
in that jurisdiction including:
(a) Actual physical moving costs and expenses;
(b) Advance payments required for moving into a new residence such
as the cost of first and last month's rent and security and damage
deposits;
(c) Utility connection fees and deposits; and
(d) Anticipated additional rent and utility costs in the residence
for one year after relocation.
(4)(a) Relocation assistance provided to low-income tenants under
this section shall not exceed two thousand dollars for each dwelling
unit displaced by actions of the property owner under subsection (1) of
this section. A city, town, county, or municipal corporation may make
future annual adjustments to the maximum amount of relocation
assistance required under this subsection in order to reflect any
changes in the housing component of the consumer price index as
published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor
statistics.
(b) The property owner's portion of any relocation assistance
provided to low-income tenants under this section shall not exceed one-half of the required relocation assistance under (a) of this subsection
in cash or services.
(c) The portion of relocation assistance not covered by the
property owner under (b) of this subsection shall be paid by the city,
town, county, or municipal corporation authorized to require relocation
assistance under subsection (1) of this section. The relocation
assistance may be paid from proceeds collected from the excise tax
imposed under RCW 82.46.010.
(5) A city, town, county, or municipal corporation requiring the
provision of relocation assistance under this section shall adopt
policies, procedures, or regulations to implement such requirement.
Such policies, procedures, or regulations shall include provisions for
administrative hearings to resolve disputes between tenants and
property owners relating to relocation assistance or unlawful detainer
actions during relocation, and shall require a decision within thirty
days of a request for a hearing by either a tenant or property owner.
Judicial review of an administrative hearing decision relating to
relocation assistance may be had by filing a petition, within ten days
of the decision, in the superior court in the county where the
residential property is located. Judicial review shall be confined to
the record of the administrative hearing and the court may reverse the
decision only if the administrative findings, inferences, conclusions,
or decision is:
(a) In violation of constitutional provisions;
(b) In excess of the authority or jurisdiction of the
administrative hearing officer;
(c) Made upon unlawful procedure or otherwise is contrary to law;
or
(d) Arbitrary and capricious.
(6) Any city, town, county, or municipal corporation may require
relocation assistance, under the terms of this section, for otherwise
eligible tenants whose living arrangements are exempted from the
provisions of this chapter under RCW 59.18.040(3) and if the living
arrangement is considered to be a rental or lease not defined as a
retail sale under RCW 82.04.050.
(7)(a) Persons who move from a dwelling unit prior to the
application by the owner of the dwelling unit for any governmental
permit necessary for the demolition, substantial rehabilitation, or
change of use of residential property or prior to any notification or
filing required for condominium conversion shall not be entitled to the
assistance authorized by this section.
(b) Persons who move into a dwelling unit after the application for
any necessary governmental permit or after any required condominium
conversion notification or filing shall not be entitled to the
assistance authorized by this section if such persons receive written
notice from the property owner prior to taking possession of the
dwelling unit that specifically describes the activity or condition
that may result in their temporary or permanent displacement and
advises them of their ineligibility for relocation assistance.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.80.030 and 1989 c 133 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the local governing body of a municipality finds that
one or more conditions of the character described in RCW 35.80.010
exist within its territorial limits, said governing body may adopt
ordinances relating to such dwellings, buildings, structures, or
premises. Such ordinances may provide for the following:
(a) That an "improvement board" or officer be designated or
appointed to exercise the powers assigned to such board or officer by
the ordinance as specified herein. Said board or officer may be an
existing municipal board or officer in the municipality, or may be a
separate board or officer appointed solely for the purpose of
exercising the powers assigned by said ordinance.
If a board is created, the ordinance shall specify the terms,
method of appointment, and type of membership of said board, which may
be limited, if the local governing body chooses, to public officers as
herein defined.
(b) If a board is created, a public officer, other than a member of
the improvement board, may be designated to work with the board and
carry out the duties and exercise the powers assigned to said public
officer by the ordinance.
(c) That if, after a preliminary investigation of any dwelling,
building, structure, or premises, the board or officer finds that it is
unfit for human habitation or other use, he shall cause to be served
either personally or by certified mail, with return receipt requested,
upon all persons having any interest therein, as shown upon the records
of the auditor's office of the county in which such property is
located, and shall post in a conspicuous place on such property, a
complaint stating in what respects such dwelling, building, structure,
or premises is unfit for human habitation or other use. If the
whereabouts of any of such persons is unknown and the same cannot be
ascertained by the board or officer in the exercise of reasonable
diligence, and the board or officer makes an affidavit to that effect,
then the serving of such complaint or order upon such persons may be
made either by personal service or by mailing a copy of the complaint
and order by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested,
to each such person at the address of the building involved in the
proceedings, and mailing a copy of the complaint and order by first
class mail to any address of each such person in the records of the
county assessor or the county auditor for the county where the property
is located. Such complaint shall contain a notice that a hearing will
be held before the board or officer, at a place therein fixed, not less
than ten days nor more than thirty days after the serving of said
complaint; and that all parties in interest shall be given the right to
file an answer to the complaint, to appear in person, or otherwise, and
to give testimony at the time and place in the complaint. The rules of
evidence prevailing in courts of law or equity shall not be controlling
in hearings before the board or officer. A copy of such complaint
shall also be filed with the auditor of the county in which the
dwelling, building, structure, or ((premise [premises])) premises is
located, and such filing of the complaint or order shall have the same
force and effect as other lis pendens notices provided by law.
(d) That the board or officer may determine that a dwelling,
building, structure, or premises is unfit for human habitation or other
use if it finds that conditions exist in such dwelling, building,
structure, or premises which are dangerous or injurious to the health
or safety of the occupants of such dwelling, building, structure, or
premises, the occupants of neighboring dwellings, or other residents of
such municipality. Such conditions may include the following, without
limitations: Defects therein increasing the hazards of fire or
accident; inadequate ventilation, light, or sanitary facilities,
dilapidation, disrepair, structural defects, uncleanliness,
overcrowding, or inadequate drainage. The ordinance shall state
reasonable and minimum standards covering such conditions, including
those contained in ordinances adopted in accordance with
((subdivision)) subsection (7)(a) ((herein)) of this section, to guide
the board or the public officer and the agents and employees of either,
in determining the fitness of a dwelling for human habitation, or
building, structure, or premises for other use.
(e) That the determination of whether a dwelling, building,
structure, or premises should be repaired or demolished, shall be based
on specific stated standards on (i) the degree of structural
deterioration of the dwelling, building, structure, or premises, or
(ii) the relationship that the estimated cost of repair bears to the
value of the dwelling, building, structure, or premises, with the
method of determining this value to be specified in the ordinance.
(f) That if, after the required hearing, the board or officer
determines that the dwelling is unfit for human habitation, or building
or structure or premises is unfit for other use, it shall state in
writing its findings of fact in support of such determination, and
shall issue and cause to be served upon the owner or party in interest
thereof, as is provided in ((subdivision (1)))(c) of this subsection,
and shall post in a conspicuous place on said property, an order which
(i) requires the owner or party in interest, within the time specified
in the order, to repair, alter, or improve such dwelling, building,
structure, or premises to render it fit for human habitation, or for
other use, or to vacate and close the dwelling, building, structure, or
premises, if such course of action is deemed proper on the basis of the
standards set forth as required in ((subdivision (1)))(e) of this
subsection; or (ii) requires the owner or party in interest, within the
time specified in the order, to remove or demolish such dwelling,
building, structure, or premises, if this course of action is deemed
proper on the basis of said standards. An order may also require
payment by the owner of a rental relocation allowance to qualified low-income tenants if authorized by an ordinance adopted as provided in
subsection (8) of this section. If no appeal is filed, a copy of such
order shall be filed with the auditor of the county in which the
dwelling, building, structure, or premises is located.
(g) The owner or any party in interest, within thirty days from the
date of service upon the owner and posting of an order issued by the
board under the provisions of ((subdivision)) (c) of this subsection,
may file an appeal with the appeals commission.
The local governing body of the municipality shall designate or
establish a municipal agency to serve as the appeals commission. The
local governing body shall also establish rules of procedure adequate
to assure a prompt and thorough review of matters submitted to the
appeals commission, and such rules of procedure shall include the
following, without being limited thereto: (i) All matters submitted to
the appeals commission must be resolved by the commission within sixty
days from the date of filing therewith and (ii) a transcript of the
findings of fact of the appeals commission shall be made available to
the owner or other party in interest upon demand.
The findings and orders of the appeals commission shall be reported
in the same manner and shall bear the same legal consequences as if
issued by the board, and shall be subject to review only in the manner
and to the extent provided in ((subdivision)) subsection (2) of this
section.
If the owner or party in interest, following exhaustion of his
rights to appeal, fails to comply with the final order to repair,
alter, improve, vacate, close, remove, or demolish the dwelling,
building, structure, or premises, the board or officer may direct or
cause such dwelling, building, structure, or premises to be repaired,
altered, improved, vacated, and closed, removed, or demolished.
(h) That the amount of the cost of such repairs, alterations or
improvements; or vacating and closing; or removal or demolition by the
board or officer, shall be assessed against the real property upon
which such cost was incurred unless such amount is previously paid.
Upon certification to him by the treasurer of the municipality in cases
arising out of the city or town or by the county improvement board or
officer, in cases arising out of the county, of the assessment amount
being due and owing, the county treasurer shall enter the amount of
such assessment upon the tax rolls against the property for the current
year and the same shall become a part of the general taxes for that
year to be collected at the same time and with interest at such rates
and in such manner as provided for in RCW 84.56.020, as now or
hereafter amended, for delinquent taxes, and when collected to be
deposited to the credit of the general fund of the municipality. If
the dwelling, building, structure, or premises is removed or demolished
by the board or officer, the board or officer shall, if possible, sell
the materials of such dwelling, building, structure, (([or])) or
premises in accordance with procedures set forth in said ordinance, and
shall credit the proceeds of such sale against the cost of the removal
or demolition and if there be any balance remaining, it shall be paid
to the parties entitled thereto, as determined by the board or officer,
after deducting the costs incident thereto.
The assessment shall constitute a lien against the property which
shall be of equal rank with state, county and municipal taxes.
(2) Any person affected by an order issued by the appeals
commission pursuant to ((subdivision)) subsection (1)(f) ((hereof)) of
this section may, within thirty days after the posting and service of
the order, petition to the superior court for an injunction restraining
the public officer or members of the board from carrying out the
provisions of the order. In all such proceedings the court is
authorized to affirm, reverse, or modify the order and such trial shall
be heard de novo.
(3) An ordinance adopted by the local governing body of the
municipality may authorize the board or officer to exercise such powers
as may be necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the
purposes and provisions of this section. These powers shall include
the following in addition to others herein granted: (a)(i) To
determine which dwellings within the municipality are unfit for human
habitation; (ii) to determine which buildings, structures, or premises
are unfit for other use; (b) to administer oaths and affirmations,
examine witnesses and receive evidence; and (c) to investigate the
dwelling and other property conditions in the municipality or county
and to enter upon premises for the purpose of making examinations when
the board or officer has reasonable ground for believing they are unfit
for human habitation, or for other use: PROVIDED, That such entries
shall be made in such manner as to cause the least possible
inconvenience to the persons in possession, and to obtain an order for
this purpose after submitting evidence in support of an application
which is adequate to justify such an order from a court of competent
jurisdiction in the event entry is denied or resisted.
(4) The local governing body of any municipality adopting an
ordinance pursuant to this chapter may appropriate the necessary funds
to administer such ordinance.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate or
impair the powers of the courts or of any department of any
municipality to enforce any provisions of its charter or its ordinances
or regulations, nor to prevent or punish violations thereof; and the
powers conferred by this section shall be in addition and supplemental
to the powers conferred by any other law.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or limit
in any way the power of the municipality to define and declare
nuisances and to cause their removal or abatement, by summary
proceedings or otherwise.
(7) Any municipality may (by ordinance adopted by its governing
body) (a) prescribe minimum standards for the use and occupancy of
dwellings throughout the municipality, or county, (b) prescribe minimum
standards for the use or occupancy of any building, structure, or
premises used for any other purpose, (c) prevent the use or occupancy
of any dwelling, building, structure, or premises, which is injurious
to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare, and (d) prescribe
punishment for the violation of any provision of such ordinance.
(8)(a) Any municipality that has adopted an ordinance under
subsection (7)(c) of this section may also adopt an ordinance requiring
a property owner to pay reasonable relocation assistance to low-income
tenants who are prevented from using or occupying the property owner's
dwelling, building, structure, or premises by an order of the
municipality issued: (i) Pursuant to its code and/or ordinances; and
(ii) as a result of the property being declared substandard as that
term is defined in section 1001 of the uniform housing code of 1997 or
as amended. As used in this subsection, "low-income tenants" means
tenants whose combined total income per dwelling unit is at or below
fifty percent of the median income, adjusted for family size, in the
county where the tenants reside.
(b) A requirement that property owners provide relocation
assistance shall include the amounts of such assistance to be provided
to low-income tenants. In determining such amounts, the jurisdiction
imposing the requirement shall evaluate, and receive public testimony
on, what relocation expenses displaced tenants would reasonably incur
in that jurisdiction including:
(i) Actual physical moving costs and expenses;
(ii) Advance payments required for moving into a new residence such
as the cost of first and last month's rent and security and damage
deposits;
(iii) Utility connection fees and deposits; and
(iv) Anticipated additional rent and utility costs in the residence
for one year after relocation.
(c) Relocation assistance provided to low-income tenants under this
section shall not exceed two thousand dollars for each dwelling unit
from which tenants are displaced as a result of a municipality's
enforcement of its code or ordinances. A municipality may make future
annual adjustments to the maximum amount of relocation assistance
required under this subsection in order to reflect any changes in the
housing component of the consumer price index as published by the
United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics.
(d) A municipality that adopts an ordinance requiring the payment
of relocation assistance under this section shall adopt policies,
procedures, or regulations to implement such requirement.
(i) Such policies, procedures, or regulations may, among other
things:
(A) Include a deadline by which the relocation assistance shall be
paid;
(B) Provide that a property owner who fails to pay relocation
assistance by such deadline shall be assessed a per-day monetary
penalty for each day the relocation assistance is late;
(C) Provide that relocation assistance that is not paid by the
deadline shall accrue interest at the maximum rate allowed by law;
(D) Require that, in the event that legal action is required by the
municipality to collect relocation assistance, penalty, and/or interest
required under (d)(i)(A) and (E) of this subsection, the property owner
shall pay the city, town, county, or municipal corporation's actual
attorneys' fees and expenses incurred in the legal action; and
(E) Provide that the municipality may, in addition to other legal
remedies, assess any unpaid relocation assistance, penalties, and/or
interest against the property in the manner provided in subsection
(1)(h) of this section.
(ii) Such policies, procedures, or regulations shall include
provisions for administrative hearings to resolve disputes between
tenants and property owners relating to relocation assistance or
unlawful detainer actions during relocation, and shall require a
decision within thirty days of a request for a hearing by either a
tenant or property owner.
(e) If a property owner fails to pay relocation assistance by the
deadline required by an order issued by a board or officer, the
municipality may institute a legal action in the municipal court or
county district court, as applicable, to collect the relocation
assistance and/or any delinquent penalties or interest required by the
municipality's policies, rules, or regulations adopted under (d) of
this subsection.
(f) If a municipality prevails in any legal action instituted under
(e) of this subsection, the court shall award the prevailing party its
reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses incurred in prosecuting or
defending any legal action instituted under (e) of this subsection if
required by policies, rules, or regulations of the municipality adopted
under (d) of this subsection.

--- END ---