BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 SHORT TITLE. This act shall be known as the
building Washington's future act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 INTENT. The state's institutions of higher
education are a vital component of the future economic prosperity of
our state. In order to ensure that Washington continues to be able to
provide a highly qualified work force that can attract businesses and
support the economic vitality of the state, it is the intent of this
bond act to provide new money for capital projects to help fulfill
higher education needs across the state.
This new source of funding for the critical capital needs of the
state's institutions of higher education furthers the mission of higher
education and is intended to enhance the abilities of those
institutions, over the next ten years, to fulfill their critical roles
in maintaining and stimulating the state's economy.
It is the intent of the legislature that this new source of funding
not displace funding levels for the capital and operating budgets of
the institutions of higher education. It is instead intended that the
new funding will allow the institutions, over the next five biennia, to
use the current level of capital funding to provide for many of those
urgent preservation, replacement, and maintenance needs that have been
deferred due to lack of capital funding. This approach is designed to
maintain or improve the current infrastructure of our institutions of
higher education, and simultaneously to provide new instruction and
research capacity to serve the increasing number of traditional
college-aged students and those adults returning to college to update
skills or retrain so that they can meet the demands of Washington's
changing work force.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Bonds" means bonds, notes, commercial paper, certificates of
indebtedness, or other evidences of indebtedness of the state issued
under this chapter.
(2) "General capital facilities funding" means, in any particular
biennium, the sum, exclusive of any Washington's future bonds, of: (a)
All appropriations of proceeds of new bonds issued for capital
facilities purposes; and (b) all new appropriations for the education
construction account within the state's capital budget.
Reappropriations shall not be included in this calculation.
(3) "Higher education capital facilities funding" means, in any
particular biennium, the sum of all appropriations of general capital
facilities funding as defined in subsection (2) of this section,
including bond proceeds and nonbond proceeds, for capital projects or
facilities for the institutions of higher education.
(4) "Washington's future bonds" means all or any portion of the
general obligation bonds authorized in section 4 of this act.
(5) "Community and technical colleges" means the community colleges
and technical colleges as defined by RCW 28B.50.030.
(6) "Governing board" means the board of regents of any state
research university, the board of trustees of any regional university,
and, for any community college and technical college, the state board
for community and technical colleges.
(7) "Regional universities" means Western Washington University at
Bellingham, Central Washington University at Ellensburg, Eastern
Washington University at Cheney, and The Evergreen State College.
(8) "State research universities" means the University of
Washington and Washington State University.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 WASHINGTON'S FUTURE BONDS AUTHORIZED. (1)
For the purpose of providing needed capital improvements consisting of
the predesign, design, acquisition, construction, modification,
renovation, expansion, equipping, and other improvement of state
buildings and facilities for the institutions of higher education, the
state finance committee is authorized, under the conditions in section
6 of this act, to issue general obligation bonds of the state of
Washington in the sum of one billion seven hundred seventeen million
five hundred thousand dollars, or so much thereof as may be required,
to finance all or a part of the cost of these projects and all costs
incidental thereto. The bonds issued under the authority of this
section shall be known as Washington's future bonds.
(2) Bonds authorized in this section shall be sold in the manner,
at the time or times, in amounts, and at such prices as the state
finance committee shall determine.
(3) No bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale
without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale
of the bonds into one or more of the subaccounts created by this
chapter for the fulfillment of capital needs of the institutions of
higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 BOND ISSUANCE--INTENT. It is the intent of
the legislature that the proceeds of new bonds authorized in this
chapter will be appropriated in phases over five biennia, beginning
with the 2003-2005 biennium, to provide additional funding for capital
projects and facilities of the institutions of higher education above
historical levels of funding. The legislature further intends that, in
each such biennium, and in addition to the Washington's future bonds,
the higher education capital facilities funding will be at least equal
to forty-eight percent of the general capital facilities funding, that
fifty-one percent of the higher education capital facilities funding
will be allocated to the state research universities or the regional
universities, and that forty-nine percent will be allocated to the
state board for community and technical colleges.
This chapter is not intended to limit the legislature's ability to
appropriate bond proceeds if the full amount authorized in this chapter
has not been appropriated after five biennia, and the authorization to
issue bonds contained in this chapter does not expire until the full
authorization has been appropriated and issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 TERMS AND COVENANTS. (1) The state finance
committee is authorized to prescribe the form, terms, conditions, and
covenants of the bonds provided for in this chapter, the time or times
of sale of all or any portion of them, and the conditions and manner of
their sale and issuance.
(2) Bonds issued under this chapter shall state that they are a
general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full
faith and credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof
and the interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to
pay the principal and interest as the same shall become due.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 PROCEEDS. (1) The proceeds from the sale of
the bonds authorized in section 4 of this act shall be deposited in the
higher education construction account in the state treasury created in
RCW 28B.14D.040. Upon future legislative appropriation, the proceeds
shall be transferred to four subaccounts hereby created in the higher
education construction account, as follows:
(a) Not to exceed seven hundred seventy-two million seven hundred
thousand dollars to the community and technical colleges construction
subaccount;
(b) Not to exceed three hundred nineteen million dollars to the
state research university branch campuses construction subaccount;
(c) Not to exceed two hundred three million dollars to the regional
universities construction subaccount; and
(d) Not to exceed four hundred twenty-two million five hundred
thousand dollars to the state research universities construction
subaccount.
(2) Proceeds in excess of any subaccount's total allocation may be
transferred to the appropriate subaccount on a project-by-project
basis, as long as each subaccount's initial allocation of the total
bond authorization is preserved.
(3) The proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes in
section 4 of this act and for the payment of the expenses incurred in
connection with the sale and issuance of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 PROJECTS--DESCRIPTION. (1)(a) The proceeds
deposited in the community and technical colleges subaccount shall be
applied, subject to legislative appropriation, to community and
technical college projects, including but not limited to the predesign,
design, acquisition, construction, modification, renovation, expansion,
replacement, equipping, or other improvement of any of the following
projects in the 2003-2005 biennium. However, the state board for
community and technical colleges may recommend future biennium projects
to include predesign, design, acquisition, construction, modification,
renovation, expansion, replacement, and equipping, or improvements:
(i) At Bellingham Technical College, a welding and auto collision
program facility;
(ii) At Skagit Valley College, a science facility;
(iii) At Edmonds Community College, basic skills instructional labs
and computer labs;
(iv) At Edmonds Community College, classroom and office space at
Mountlake Terrace Hall;
(v) At Everett Community College, visual and performing arts
facilities;
(vi) At Everett Community College, an undergraduate educational
center that may include classrooms and/or office space;
(vii) At Grays Harbor College, an instructional facility that may
include classrooms, science labs, and/or computer labs;
(viii) At South Puget Sound Community College, a science facility;
(ix) At Peninsula Community College, a science and technology
facility;
(x) At Bellevue Community College, a science and technology
facility;
(xi) At Cascadia Community College, a center for the arts,
technology, and global interaction;
(xii) At Cascadia Community College, south access to state route
522;
(xiii) At Green River Community College, a science facility;
(xiv) At Highline Community College, an allied health facility;
(xv) At Lake Washington Technical College, the East and West
facilities;
(xvi) At Renton Technical College, facilities for the auto
technology and boilermaker training program;
(xvii) At Seattle Central Community College, facilities for the
consolidation of student services and other administrative offices;
(xviii) At Seattle Central Community College, a learning resource
center;
(xix) At South Seattle Community College, pastry and baking program
facilities;
(xx) At South Seattle Community College, facilities for basic
skills instruction and continuing education;
(xxi) At Spokane Community College, a science facility;
(xxii) At Spokane Falls Community College, general classroom
facilities;
(xxiii) At Bates Technical College, a south campus learning
resource center and vocational training facility;
(xxiv) At Pierce Fort Steilacoom Community College, a science and
technology facility;
(xxv) At Pierce Puyallup Community College, an allied health and
communications arts facility;
(xxvi) At Tacoma Community College, a multimedia facility;
(xxvii) At Tacoma Community College, a science facility;
(xxviii) At Walla Walla Community College, basic skills
instructional labs and computer labs;
(xxix) At Walla Walla Community College, a health science facility;
(xxx) At Clark College, the east county satellite, including
classrooms, science, and computer labs;
(xxxi) At Lower Columbia College, an allied health facility;
(xxxii) At Lower Columbia College, facilities for fine arts
instruction; and
(xxxiii) At Wenatchee Community College, a higher education center.
(b) The proceeds deposited in the state research university branch
campuses construction subaccount shall be applied, subject to
legislative appropriation, to state research university branch campus
projects, including but not limited to the predesign, design,
acquisition, construction, modification, renovation, expansion,
replacement, equipping, or other improvement of:
(i) The University of Washington Bothell branch campus;
(ii) The University of Washington Tacoma branch campus;
(iii) Additional University of Washington branch campus expansions
at either Bothell or Tacoma;
(iv) Facilities for nursing at the Washington State University
Spokane Riverpoint campus;
(v) The Washington State University Prosser research facility;
(vi) A Washington State University Tri-Cities bioproducts and
sciences facility;
(vii) A Washington State University Tri-Cities Columbia Basin
College campus classroom facility;
(viii) A Washington State University Vancouver business and
education facility; and
(ix) A Washington State University Vancouver student services
center.
(c) The proceeds deposited in the regional universities
construction subaccount shall be applied, subject to legislative
appropriation, to regional university projects, including but not
limited to the predesign, design, acquisition, construction,
modification, renovation, expansion, replacement, equipping, or other
improvement of:
(i) At Western Washington University, an academic instruction
center;
(ii) At The Evergreen State College, the Daniel J. Evans academic
library facility;
(iii) At Central Washington University, the Des Moines Center at
Highline Community College;
(iv) At Eastern Washington University, Cheney Hall;
(v) At Eastern Washington University, a senior hall;
(vi) At Western Washington University, Hargreaves Hall;
(vii) At Eastern Washington University, Showalter Hall;
(viii) At Central Washington University, the Wenatchee Center at
Wenatchee Valley Community College;
(ix) At Central Washington University, Dean Hall;
(x) At Central Washington University, the Hogue technology
facility; and
(xi) At Central Washington University, a music facility.
(d) The proceeds deposited in the state research universities
construction subaccount shall be applied, subject to legislative
appropriation, to state research university projects, including but not
limited to the predesign, design, acquisition, construction,
modification, renovation, expansion, replacement, equipping, or other
improvement of:
(i) At the University of Washington, Gould Hall;
(ii) At the University of Washington, a life sciences facility;
(iii) At the University of Washington, three to six facilities that
will provide new capacity for instruction and research programs where
a portion of the capital costs of the projects will be provided by
private or federal funds;
(iv) At the Washington State University, a biotechnology and life
sciences facility;
(v) At the Washington State University, various infrastructure
improvements;
(vi) At the Washington State University, the Johnson Hall plant
biosciences facility; and
(vii) At the Washington State University, a biomedical sciences
facility.
(2) Each biennium, the governing board of each institution of
higher education that desires to receive proceeds of bonds issued under
this chapter shall submit to the office of financial management, as
part of its capital budget submission, a request for funding consistent
with the office of financial management's budget instructions.
(3)(a) An institution receiving an allocation of bond proceeds may
use those funds only for a project for which the institution submitted
a funding request under this section and for which the funds have been
appropriated. However, if the governing board of an institution of
higher education or the state board for community and technical
colleges determines that a revision of its project list is necessary in
order to meet institutional priorities or to respond to changing
circumstances, the board may submit a request for such change or
changes to the office of financial management consistent with
subsection (2) of this section.
(b) If supplemental funds from any public or private source become
available to pay for a portion of a project described in this section,
the governing board of the institution may include in its capital
budget a request for bond proceeds for the expansion of the project, if
necessary, or for an alternative project or projects. The amount of
such a request shall not exceed the amount replaced by supplemental
funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 PAYMENT PROCEDURES. (1) The debt-limit
general fund bond retirement account shall be used for the payment of
the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in this chapter.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in this chapter.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued under this chapter, the state treasurer
shall withdraw from any general state revenues received in the state
treasury and deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement
account an amount equal to the amount certified by the state finance
committee to be due on the payment date.
(4) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 BONDS--LEGAL INVESTMENT FOR PUBLIC FUNDS.
The bonds authorized by this chapter shall constitute a legal
investment for all state funds or for funds under state control and all
funds of municipal corporations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 ADDITIONAL METHODS OF PAYING DEBT SERVICE
AUTHORIZED. The legislature may provide additional means for raising
moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds
authorized under this chapter, and section 9 of this act shall not be
deemed to provide an exclusive method for payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 CHAPTER SUPPLEMENTAL. This chapter
provides a complete, additional, and alternative method for
accomplishing the purposes of this chapter and is supplemental and
additional to powers conferred by other laws. The issuance of bonds
and refunding bonds under this chapter need not comply with the
requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds. The
issuance of bonds under this chapter shall not be deemed to be the only
method to fund the projects described in section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---