BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the focus of
transfer between institutions of higher education has been on students'
accumulation of credits, where courses necessary for entry to each
successive level of higher education have been individually identified
and vary by institution and academic discipline. It is the
legislature's intent to begin a process that will change the focus of
transfer to defining and recognizing student competencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The higher education coordinating board,
in consultation with the state board for community and technical
colleges and the council of presidents, shall recruit and select
institutions of higher education to participate in a pilot project to
define transfer standards in selected academic disciplines on the basis
of student competencies. Participants shall include one public four-year institution of higher education, two or more community or
technical colleges that regularly transfer a substantial number of
students to that four-year institution, and one or more private career
colleges that prepare students in the academic disciplines selected
under the pilot project. Such colleges shall be accredited and
licensed under chapter 28C.10 RCW.
(2) The pilot project participants shall identify several academic
disciplines to form the basis of the project and develop a work plan,
timelines, and expected products for the project, which shall be
presented by the higher education coordinating board in a preliminary
report to the higher education committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2004.
(3) Under the pilot project, participants shall develop standards,
definitions, and procedures for quality assurance for a transfer system
based on student competencies. It is the legislature's intent that
under such a system, four-year institutions of higher education, in
collaboration with two-year institutions of higher education, define
the knowledge, skills, and abilities students should possess in order
to enter an upper division program in a particular academic discipline.
The two and four-year institutions providing lower division preparation
for such an upper division program are responsible for certifying that
a student meets the expected standards, but have flexibility to
determine how to assess whether the student has obtained the necessary
knowledge, skills, and abilities. Such assessments need not be based
on completion of particular courses or accumulation of credits.
(4) The pilot project participants may request assistance in their
work from the higher education coordinating board, the state board for
community and technical colleges, or the council of presidents. The
pilot project participants and the higher education coordinating board
shall structure the work of the project in such a way that development
costs for the project are absorbed within existing institution and
agency budgets.
(5) In collaboration with the higher education coordinating board,
the pilot project participants shall report to the higher education
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005, on the progress and
status of the pilot project. The report shall identify any barriers
encountered by the project and make recommendations for next steps in
developing a competency-based transfer system for higher education.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2006.

--- END ---