BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.56.250 and 1986 c 305 s 301 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Economic damages" means objectively verifiable monetary
losses, including medical expenses, loss of earnings, burial costs,
loss of use of property, cost of replacement or repair, cost of
obtaining substitute domestic services, loss of employment, and loss of
business or employment opportunities.
(b) "Noneconomic damages" means subjective, nonmonetary losses,
including, but not limited to pain, suffering, inconvenience, mental
anguish, disability or disfigurement incurred by the injured party,
emotional distress, loss of society and companionship, loss of
consortium, injury to reputation and humiliation, and destruction of
the parent-child relationship.
(((c) "Bodily injury" means physical injury, sickness, or disease,
including death.
(d) "Average annual wage" means the average annual wage in the
state of Washington as determined under RCW 50.04.355.))
(2) ((In no action seeking damages for personal injury or death may
a claimant recover a judgment for noneconomic damages exceeding an
amount determined by multiplying 0.43 by the average annual wage and by
the life expectancy of the person incurring noneconomic damages, as the
life expectancy is determined by the life expectancy tables adopted by
the insurance commissioner. For purposes of determining the maximum
amount allowable for noneconomic damages, a claimant's life expectancy
shall not be less than fifteen years. The limitation contained in this
subsection applies to all claims for noneconomic damages made by a
claimant who incurred bodily injury. Claims for loss of consortium,
loss of society and companionship, destruction of the parent-child
relationship, and all other derivative claims asserted by persons who
did not sustain bodily injury are to be included within the limitation
on claims for noneconomic damages arising from the same bodily
injury.)) (a) In an action for damages for injury or death occurring
as a result of the provision of health care, the amount of noneconomic
damages awarded to the claimant shall not exceed four hundred thousand
dollars. July 1st of each year beginning July 1, 2005, the
administrator for the courts shall adjust the amount specified in this
subsection for inflation in accordance with the method established in
RCW 2.12.037. The administrator for the courts shall publish the
adjusted figure in the Washington state register.
(b) The limitation on noneconomic damages in (a) of this subsection
does not apply in an action in which the acts or omissions of a
defendant were reckless, willful, or wanton.
(c) In an action involving more than one defendant where the
noneconomic damage award exceeds four hundred thousand dollars as
allowed under (b) of this subsection, the responsibility for damages of
a defendant whose acts or omissions were not reckless, willful, or
wanton shall be determined as though the noneconomic damage award were
four hundred thousand dollars.
(3) If a case is tried to a jury, the jury shall not be informed of
the limitation contained in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect if the proposed
amendment to Article I, section 21 of the state Constitution limiting
noneconomic damages in actions involving provision of health care is
validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the
next general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and
ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---