BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.95.030 and 1993 c 479 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any
person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree murder shall
be sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility of release or
parole. A person sentenced to life imprisonment under this section
shall not have that sentence suspended, deferred, or commuted by any
judicial officer and the indeterminate sentence review board or its
successor may not parole such prisoner nor reduce the period of
confinement in any manner whatsoever including but not limited to any
sort of good-time calculation. The department of social and health
services or its successor or any executive official may not permit such
prisoner to participate in any sort of release or furlough program.
(2) If, pursuant to a special sentencing proceeding held under RCW
10.95.050, the trier of fact finds that there are not sufficient
mitigating circumstances to merit leniency, the sentence shall be
death. In no case, however, shall a person be sentenced to death if at
the time the crime was committed, the person was mentally retarded ((at
the time the crime was committed,)) under the definition of mental
retardation set forth in (a) of this subsection, mentally ill as
defined in RCW 71.05.020 and 71.24.025, or had a developmental
disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020. A diagnosis of mental
retardation, mental illness, or developmentally disabled shall be
documented by a licensed psychiatrist or licensed psychologist
designated by the court, who is an expert in the diagnosis and
evaluation of mental retardation. The defense must establish mental
retardation, mental illness, or developmentally disabled by a
preponderance of the evidence and the court must make a finding as to
the existence of mental retardation.
(a) "Mentally retarded" means the individual has: (i)
Significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning; (ii)
existing concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior; and (iii)
both significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning and
deficits in adaptive behavior were manifested during the developmental
period.
(b) "General intellectual functioning" means the results obtained
by assessment with one or more of the individually administered general
intelligence tests developed for the purpose of assessing intellectual
functioning.
(c) "Significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning"
means intelligence quotient seventy or below.
(d) "Adaptive behavior" means the effectiveness or degree with
which individuals meet the standards of personal independence and
social responsibility expected for his or her age.
(e) "Developmental period" means the period of time between
conception and the eighteenth birthday.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.95.070 and 1993 c 479 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In deciding the question posed by RCW 10.95.060(4), the jury, or
the court if a jury is waived, may consider any relevant factors,
including but not limited to the following:
(1) Whether the defendant has or does not have a significant
history, either as a juvenile or an adult, of prior criminal activity;
(2) Whether the murder was committed while the defendant was under
the influence of extreme mental disturbance;
(3) Whether the victim consented to the act of murder;
(4) Whether the defendant was an accomplice to a murder committed
by another person where the defendant's participation in the murder was
relatively minor;
(5) Whether the defendant acted under duress or domination of
another person;
(6) Whether, at the time of the murder, the capacity of the
defendant to appreciate the wrongfulness of his or her conduct or to
conform his or her conduct to the requirements of law was substantially
impaired as a result of mental disease or defect. However, a person
found to be mentally retarded, mentally ill, or developmentally
disabled under RCW 10.95.030(2) may in no case be sentenced to death;
(7) Whether the age of the defendant at the time of the crime calls
for leniency; and
(8) Whether there is a likelihood that the defendant will pose a
danger to others in the future.

Sec. 3 RCW 10.95.130 and 1993 c 479 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The sentence review required by RCW 10.95.100 shall be in
addition to any appeal. The sentence review and an appeal shall be
consolidated for consideration. The defendant and the prosecuting
attorney may submit briefs within the time prescribed by the court and
present oral argument to the court.
(2) With regard to the sentence review required by chapter 138,
Laws of 1981, the supreme court of Washington shall determine:
(a) Whether there was sufficient evidence to justify the
affirmative finding to the question posed by RCW 10.95.060(4); and
(b) Whether the sentence of death is excessive or disproportionate
to the penalty imposed in similar cases, considering both the crime and
the defendant. For the purposes of this subsection, "similar cases"
means cases reported in the Washington Reports or Washington Appellate
Reports since January 1, 1965, in which the judge or jury considered
the imposition of capital punishment regardless of whether it was
imposed or executed, and cases in which reports have been filed with
the supreme court under RCW 10.95.120;
(c) Whether the sentence of death was brought about through passion
or prejudice; and
(d) Whether the defendant was mentally retarded, mentally ill, or
developmentally disabled, within the meaning of RCW 10.95.030(2).

--- END ---