BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds there has been a
significant and dramatic increase in the numbers of convicted juvenile
sex offenders released from the juvenile rehabilitation authority and
reentering the state's public schools over the past three years.
Paroled juvenile sex offenders include those offenders whose community
risk classification indicates the student is likely to reoffend, or is
highly likely to reoffend.
The legislature also finds that the presence of a convicted
juvenile sex offender in a school setting is a significant potential
risk factor for students, staff, and teachers and results in a tension
between the state's duty to provide an educational opportunity for all
students and the duty to ensure a safe and secure educational
environment for all students.
The legislature further finds that concurrent with the rise in the
numbers of juvenile sex offenders attending the state's high schools
and middle schools has been a growing awareness of the nature and
importance of comprehensive school safety planning and the duty of
schools and school districts to address all components of safety and
security within the school setting. Continuous one-on-one supervision
of a juvenile sex offender who is likely to reoffend or highly likely
to reoffend frequently may be the only adequate means of prevention
capable of securing the safety of the entire school population. The
legislature intends to provide schools and school districts with the
tools and resources necessary to maintain a safe school environment for
all students and to prevent a juvenile sex offender from reoffending
while in the school setting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.225
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a school district
board of directors may decline to admit a student who is a convicted
juvenile sex offender, unless the school district board is satisfied
that the level and method of supervision mandated in the offender's
intensive supervision program required under RCW 13.40.210 is
sufficient to maintain a safe and secure school environment for the
entire school population. A school district's review and approval of
the offender's intensive supervision program shall be limited to the
supervision of the student offender while the student is on school
property, is participating in school transportation services, or is
engaged in school activities.
(2) If, after review and approval of the offender's intensive
supervision program, a school district board of directors admits a
convicted juvenile sex offender to its schools, the school district may
request and shall be eligible for and entitled to reimbursement from
the juvenile rehabilitation authority for the actual costs incurred by
the district for the supervision of the offender.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
Any school district, including any school district officers,
employees, volunteers, or agents, acting in good faith, during the
performance and within the scope of his or her responsibilities and
duties, is immune from liability for any criminal sexual act engaged in
or caused by any juvenile sex offender who is on school property,
participating in school transportation services, or engaged in school
activities, as authorized, required, or otherwise provided for under
section 2 of this act. This section shall not apply to any act or
omission that constitutes gross negligence or willful and wanton
conduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---