BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Drug claims for kidney dialysis patients who are medical assistance
clients are not required to be submitted to a therapeutic consultation
service based on the number of brand name prescriptions prescribed per
calendar month for the client.

--- END ---