BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Pierce county
has had a disproportionate number of criminal justice and other
institutional facilities sited in that county, including but not
limited to the women's correctional center at Purdy, the state prison
on McNeil Island, the special commitment center, the McNeil Island
secure community transition facility, a department of corrections work
release facility, Western state hospital, and others.
(2) The legislature further finds that Pierce county is the
"Official Dumping Ground" for criminal justice and other institutional
facilities, and that Pierce county shall have the sole right to use
that designation to describe the extent to which state agencies have
sited criminal justice and other institutional facilities in counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department is prohibited from establishing or siting any
additional correctional institutions or residential programs in Pierce
county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The department is prohibited from establishing or siting any
additional institutional or residential facilities serving more than
five persons in Pierce county.

--- END ---