BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.20.190 and 2001 c 193 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services is authorized to
take one or more of the actions listed in subsection (2) of this
section in any case in which the department finds that a boarding home
provider has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;
(b) Operated a boarding home without a license or under a revoked
license;
(c) Knowingly, or with reason to know, made a false statement of
material fact on his or her application for license or any data
attached thereto, or in any matter under investigation by the
department; or
(d) Willfully prevented or interfered with any inspection or
investigation by the department.
(2) When authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the
department may take one or more of the following actions:
(a) Refuse to issue a license;
(b) Impose reasonable conditions on a license, such as correction
within a specified time, training, and limits on the type of clients
the provider may admit or serve;
(c) Impose civil penalties of not more than one hundred dollars per
day per violation;
(d) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license; or
(e) Suspend admissions to the boarding home by imposing stop
placement for one or more violations where significant actual harm has
occurred, or it is likely that death or significant harm will occur.
(3) When the department orders stop placement, the facility shall
not admit any new resident until the stop placement order is
terminated. The department may approve readmission of a resident to
the facility from a hospital or nursing home during the stop placement.
The department shall terminate the stop placement when: (a) The
violations necessitating the stop placement have been corrected; and
(b) the provider exhibits the capacity to maintain correction of the
violations previously found deficient. However, if upon the revisit
the department finds new violations that the department reasonably
believes will result in a new stop placement, the previous stop
placement shall remain in effect until the new stop placement is
imposed.
(4) After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement has been imposed, the department shall make an on-site
revisit of the provider within fifteen working days from the request
for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. For violations
that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous
citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or more
residents' well-being, including violations of residents' rights, the
department shall make an on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to
ensure correction of the violation. Verification of correction of all
other violations may be made by either a department on-site revisit or
by written or photographic documentation found by the department to be
credible. This subsection does not prevent the department from
enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this
subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's authority
and duty to ensure that the provider adequately cares for residents,
including to make departmental on-site revisits as needed to ensure
that the provider protects residents, and to enforce compliance with
this chapter.
(5) RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial, revocation,
suspension, or modification. Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to department
actions under this section, except that orders of the department
imposing license suspension, stop placement, or conditions for
continuation of a license are effective immediately upon notice and
shall continue pending any hearing.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.20.195 and 2001 c 193 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The licensee or its designee has the right to an informal
dispute resolution process to dispute any violation found or
enforcement remedy imposed by the department during a licensing
inspection or complaint investigation. The purpose of the informal
dispute resolution process is to provide an opportunity for an exchange
of information that may lead to the modification, deletion, or removal
of a violation, or parts of a violation, or enforcement remedy imposed
by the department.
(2) The informal dispute resolution process provided by the
department shall include, but is not necessarily limited to, an
opportunity for review by a department employee who did not participate
in, or oversee, the determination of the violation or enforcement
remedy under dispute. The department shall develop, or further
develop, an informal dispute resolution process consistent with this
section.
(3) A request for an informal dispute resolution shall be made to
the department within ten working days from the receipt of a written
finding of a violation or enforcement remedy. The request shall
identify the violation or violations and enforcement remedy or remedies
being disputed. The department shall convene a meeting, when possible,
within ten working days of receipt of the request for informal dispute
resolution, unless by mutual agreement a later date is agreed upon.
The department shall submit a written decision to the licensee or its
designee within ten working days following the conclusion of the
informal dispute resolution meeting.
(4) If the department determines that a violation or enforcement
remedy should not be cited or imposed, the department shall delete the
violation or immediately rescind or modify the enforcement remedy.
Upon request, the department shall issue a clean copy of the revised
report, statement of deficiencies, or notice of enforcement action.
(5) If, after the informal dispute resolution meeting, the
licensee, or its designee, still disagrees with the violation cited or
enforcement remedy imposed, the licensee, or its designee, may request
a formal hearing pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, within twenty-eight
calendar days following receipt of the notice of the written decision
under subsection (3) of this section.
(6) The request for informal dispute resolution does not delay the
effective date of any enforcement remedy imposed by the department,
except that civil monetary fines are not payable until the exhaustion
of any formal hearing and appeal rights provided under this chapter.
The licensee shall submit to the department, within the time period
prescribed by the department, a plan of correction to address any
undisputed violations, and including any violations that still remain
following the informal dispute resolution.

--- END ---