BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.20.010 and 2000 c 171 s 3 and 2000 c 121 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the development,
establishment, and enforcement of standards for the maintenance and
operation of boarding homes, which, in the light of advancing
knowledge, will promote safe and adequate care of the individuals
therein. It is further the intent of the legislature that boarding
homes be available to meet the needs of those for whom they care by
recognizing the capabilities of individuals to direct their self-medication or to use supervised self-medication techniques when ordered
and approved by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW
or a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW.
The legislature finds that licensed boarding homes are an essential
component of home and community-based services, and that the
noninstitutional nature of this care setting must be preserved and
protected by ensuring a regulatory structure that focuses on the actual
care and services provided to residents, consumer satisfaction, and
continuous quality improvement.
The legislature declares that the state's regulations for licensed
boarding homes must be outcome based and designed to encourage
individual dignity, autonomy, and choice and to foster affordable
residential care.
The legislature further finds that consumers should be afforded
access to affordable long-term care services in licensed boarding homes
and believes that care delivery must remain responsive to consumer
preferences, not regulatory dictated service and care levels that drive
costs and eliminate choice. Residents and consumers in licensed
boarding homes should be afforded the right to self-direct care, and
this right should be reflected in the rules governing licensed boarding
homes.
The legislature finds that many residents of community-based long-term care facilities are vulnerable and their health and well-being are
dependent on their caregivers. The quality, skills, and knowledge of
their caregivers are often the key to good care. The legislature finds
that the need for well-trained caregivers is growing as the state's
population ages and residents' needs increase. The legislature intends
that current training standards be enhanced.

--- END ---