BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.25.070 and 2000 c 11 s 73 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon expiration of the time limited by RCW 82.36.330 for claiming
of refunds of tax on marine fuel, the state of Washington shall succeed
to the right to such refunds. The director of licensing, after taking
into account past and anticipated claims for refunds from and deposits
to the marine fuel tax refund account and the costs of carrying out the
provisions of RCW 79A.25.030, shall request the state treasurer to
transfer ((monthly from the marine fuel tax refund account an amount
equal to the proportion of the moneys in the account representing the
motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 in effect on January 1,
1990, to the recreation resource account and the remainder to the motor
vehicle fund)) the remaining money to the recreation resource account.

--- END ---