BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.52.510 and 1991 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By December 31, 1998, each county, singly or in combination
with adjacent counties, shall implement district-wide, county-wide, or
multicounty-wide enhanced 911 emergency communications systems so that
enhanced 911 is available throughout the state.
(2) The county shall provide funding for ((the enhanced 911)) an
emergency services communication system as defined in RCW 82.14B.020 in
the county or district in an amount equal to the amount the maximum tax
under RCW 82.14B.030(1) would generate in the county or district or the
amount necessary to provide full funding of the system in the county or
district, whichever is less.
(3) The state enhanced 911 coordination office established by RCW
38.52.520 shall assist and facilitate enhanced 911 implementation
throughout the state.

--- END ---