BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.12.010 and 2002 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The powers of the port district shall be exercised through a
port commission consisting of three or, when permitted or required by
this title, five members. Every port district that is not coextensive
with a county having a population of five hundred thousand or more and
less than one million shall be divided into the same number of
commissioner districts as there are commissioner positions, each having
approximately equal population, unless provided otherwise under
subsection (2) of this section. Every port district with a population
of one million or more shall have five commissioners and shall be
divided into five commissioner districts, each having approximately
equal population. Where a port district with three commissioner
positions is coextensive with the boundaries of a county that has a
population of less than five hundred thousand and the county has three
county legislative authority districts, the port commissioner districts
shall be the county legislative authority districts. In other
instances where a port district is divided into commissioner districts,
the port commission shall divide the port district into commissioner
districts unless the commissioner districts have been described
pursuant to RCW 53.04.031. The commissioner districts shall be altered
as provided in chapter 53.16 RCW.
Commissioner districts shall be used as follows: (a) Only a
registered voter who resides in a commissioner district may be a
candidate for, or hold office as, a commissioner of the commissioner
district; and (b) only the voters of a commissioner district may vote
at a primary to nominate candidates for a commissioner of the
commissioner district. Voters of the entire port district may vote at
a general election to elect a person as a commissioner of the
commissioner district, except in a port district with a population of
one million or more, where only the voters of a commissioner district
may vote at a general election to elect a person as a commissioner of
the commissioner district.
(2)(a) In port districts having a population of less than one
million with five commissioners, two of the commissioner districts may
include the entire port district if approved by the voters of the
district either at the time of formation or at a subsequent port
district election at which the issue is proposed pursuant to a
resolution adopted by the board of commissioners and delivered to the
county auditor.
(b) In a port district with five commissioners, where two of the
commissioner districts include the entire port district, the port
district may be divided into five commissioner districts if proposed
pursuant to a resolution adopted by the board of commissioners or
pursuant to a petition by the voters and approved by the voters of the
district at the next general or special election occurring sixty or
more days after the adoption of the resolution. A petition proposing
such an increase must be submitted to the county auditor of the county
in which the port district is located and signed by voters of the port
district at least equal in number to ten percent of the number of
voters in the port district who voted at the last general election.
Upon approval by the voters, the commissioner district boundaries
shall be redrawn into five districts within one hundred twenty days and
submitted to the county auditor pursuant to RCW 53.16.015. The new
commissioner districts shall be numbered one through five and the three
incumbent commissioners representing the three former districts shall
represent commissioner districts one through three. The two at large
incumbent commissioners shall represent commissioner districts four and
five. If, as a result of redrawing the district boundaries more than
one of the incumbent commissioners resides in one of the new
commissioner districts, the commissioners who reside in the same
commissioner district shall determine by lot which of the numbered
commissioner districts they shall represent for the remainder of their
respective terms.

Sec. 2 RCW 53.12.021 and 1994 c 223 s 82 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any less than county-wide port district having a population of less
than one million that uses commissioner districts may cease using
commissioner districts as provided in this section.
A ballot proposition authorizing the elimination of commissioner
districts shall be submitted to the voters of a less than county-wide
port district having a population of less than one million that is
divided into commissioner districts if (1) a petition is submitted to
the port commission proposing that the port district cease using
commissioner districts, that is signed by registered voters of the port
district equal in number to at least ten percent of the number of
voters who voted at the last district general election; or (2) the port
commissioners adopt a resolution proposing that the port district cease
using commissioner districts. The port commission shall transfer the
petition or resolution immediately to the county auditor who shall,
when a petition is submitted, review the signatures and certify its
sufficiency. A ballot proposition authorizing the elimination of
commissioner districts shall be submitted at the next district general
election occurring sixty or more days after a petition with sufficient
signatures was submitted. If the ballot proposition authorizing the
port district to cease using commissioner districts is approved by a
simple majority vote, the port district shall cease using commissioner
districts at all subsequent elections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 53.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Port commissioners of port districts with populations of one
million or more who are holding office as of the effective date of this
act shall retain their positions for the remainder of their terms until
their successors are elected and qualified, and assume office in
accordance with RCW 29.04.170.
(2) The port commissioners shall divide the port district into five
commissioner districts prior to the first day of June in the year in
which the next regular election for commissioner shall be held. The
new commissioner districts shall be numbered one through five and shall
be represented by the incumbent commissioners. If, as a result of
drawing the district boundaries more than one of the incumbent
commissioners reside in one of the new commissioner districts, the
commissioners who reside in the same commissioner district shall
determine by lot which of the commissioner districts they shall
represent for the remainder of their respective terms.
(3) If additional commissioners must be elected to increase the
number of commissioners to five, the procedures of RCW 53.12.130 shall
be followed.

--- END ---