BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to all other license fees, passenger cars, travel
trailers, and motor homes are assessed a roadway improvement fee of one
and one-half cents per vehicle pound based on the vehicle curb weight.
In addition, vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 weighing less than
ten thousand pounds are assessed a roadway improvement fee of one and
one-half cents per pound based on the vehicle curb weight.
(2) The department shall collect the fee annually. The department
shall rely on vehicle curb weights as provided by vehicle manufacturers
to determine the weight of each vehicle type. The department shall
adopt rules to handle vehicles without manufacturer curb weights, such
as home-built vehicles.
(3) The revenue must be deposited into the motor vehicle account.
Two-thirds of the revenue will be used by the state exclusively for
highway improvement projects. The remainder will be divided equally
between counties and cities and distributed monthly to counties and
cities by the state treasurer. A particular county's distribution will
be based on the number of vehicles registered in that county as a
percentage of the state's total registrations, and a particular city's
distribution will be based on its population as a percentage of the
state's total population living within incorporated areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Each authorized vehicle insurer shall, on the first day of March of
each year, pay to the state treasurer through the commissioner's office
a transportation enforcement fee. The fee will be two dollars per
vehicle policy and must be included in the premiums for all motor
vehicle insurance policies and will be deposited into the
transportation enforcement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The transportation enforcement account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. All receipts from section 2 of this act must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for enforcement activities related to fuel tax evasion, auto theft, and
vehicular crime investigations by the Washington state patrol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2003.

--- END ---