BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.300 and 1997 c 13 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every board of directors, unless otherwise specially provided by
law, shall:
(1) Employ for not more than one year, and for sufficient cause
discharge all certificated and classified employees;
(2) Adopt written policies granting leaves to persons under
contracts of employment with the school district(s) in positions
requiring either certification or classified qualifications, including
but not limited to leaves for attendance at official or private
institutes and conferences and sabbatical leaves for employees in
positions requiring certification qualification, and leaves for
illness, injury, bereavement and, emergencies for both certificated and
classified employees, and with such compensation as the board of
directors prescribe: PROVIDED, That the board of directors shall adopt
written policies granting to such persons annual leave with
compensation for illness, injury and emergencies as follows:
(a) For such persons under contract with the school district for a
full year, at least ten days;
(b) For such persons under contract with the school district as
part time employees, at least that portion of ten days as the total
number of days contracted for bears to one hundred eighty days;
(c) For certificated and classified employees, annual leave with
compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies shall be granted and
accrue at a rate not to exceed twelve days per year; provisions of any
contract in force on June 12, 1980, which conflict with requirements of
this subsection shall continue in effect until contract expiration;
after expiration, any new contract executed between the parties shall
be consistent with this subsection;
(d) Compensation for leave for illness or injury actually taken
shall be the same as the compensation such person would have received
had such person not taken the leave provided in this proviso;
(e) Leave provided in this proviso not taken shall accumulate from
year to year up to a maximum of one hundred ((eighty)) ninety days for
the purposes of RCW 28A.400.210 and 28A.400.220, and for leave purposes
up to a maximum of the number of contract days agreed to in a given
contract, but not greater than one year. Such accumulated time may be
taken at any time during the school year or up to twelve days per year
may be used for the purpose of payments for unused sick leave.
(f) Sick leave heretofore accumulated under section 1, chapter 195,
Laws of 1959 (former RCW 28.58.430) and sick leave accumulated under
administrative practice of school districts prior to the effective date
of section 1, chapter 195, Laws of 1959 (former RCW 28.58.430) is
hereby declared valid, and shall be added to leave for illness or
injury accumulated under this proviso;
(g) Any leave for injury or illness accumulated up to a maximum of
forty-five days shall be creditable as service rendered for the purpose
of determining the time at which an employee is eligible to retire, if
such leave is taken it may not be compensated under the provisions of
RCW 28A.400.210 and 28A.310.490;
(h) Accumulated leave under this proviso shall be transferred to
and from one district to another, the office of superintendent of
public instruction and offices of educational service district
superintendents and boards, to and from such districts and such
offices;
(i) Leave accumulated by a person in a district prior to leaving
said district may, under rules and regulations of the board, be granted
to such person when the person returns to the employment of the
district.
When any certificated or classified employee leaves one school
district within the state and commences employment with another school
district within the state, the employee shall retain the same
seniority, leave benefits and other benefits that the employee had in
his or her previous position: PROVIDED, That classified employees who
transfer between districts after July 28, 1985, shall not retain any
seniority rights other than longevity when leaving one school district
and beginning employment with another. If the school district to which
the person transfers has a different system for computing seniority,
leave benefits, and other benefits, then the employee shall be granted
the same seniority, leave benefits and other benefits as a person in
that district who has similar occupational status and total years of
service.

--- END ---