BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action against a health care provider under this chapter,
an expert may not provide testimony at trial, or execute a certificate
of merit required under this chapter, unless the expert meets the
following criteria:
(a) Has expertise in the medical condition at issue in the action;
and
(b) At the time of the occurrence of the incident at issue in the
action, was either:
(i) Engaged in active practice in the same or similar area of
practice or specialty as the defendant; or
(ii) Teaching at an accredited medical school or an accredited or
affiliated academic or clinical training program in the same or similar
area of practice or specialty as the defendant, including instruction
regarding the particular condition at issue.
(2) Upon motion of a party, the court may waive the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section and allow an expert who does not meet
those requirements to testify at trial or execute a certificate of
merit required under this chapter if the court finds that:
(a) Extensive efforts were made by the party to locate an expert
who meets the criteria under subsection (1) of this section, but none
was willing and available to testify; and
(b) The proposed expert is qualified to be an expert witness by
virtue of the person's training, experience, and knowledge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
An expert opinion provided in the course of an action against a
health care provider under this chapter must be corroborated by
admissible evidence, such as, but not limited to, treatment or practice
protocols or guidelines developed by medical specialty organizations,
objective academic research, clinical trials or studies, or widely
accepted clinical practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In any action under this chapter, each side shall presumptively be
entitled to only two independent experts on an issue, except upon a
showing of good cause. Where there are multiple parties on a side and
the parties cannot agree as to which independent experts will be called
on an issue, the court, upon a showing of good cause, shall allow
additional experts on an issue to be called as the court deems
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In an action under this chapter, all parties shall submit a
pretrial expert report pursuant to time frames provided in court rules.
The expert report must disclose the identity of all expert witnesses
and state the nature of the opinions the expert witnesses will present
as testimony at trial. Further depositions of these expert witnesses
is prohibited. The testimony that an expert witness may present at
trial is limited in nature to the opinions disclosed to the court as
part of the pretrial expert report. The legislature respectfully
requests that the supreme court adopt rules to implement the provisions
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action against an individual health care provider under
this chapter for personal injury or wrongful death in which the injury
is alleged to have been caused by an act or omission that violates the
accepted standard of care, the plaintiff must file a certificate of
merit at the time of commencing the action.
(2) The certificate of merit must be executed by a health care
provider who meets the qualifications of an expert under section 1 of
this act. If there is more than one defendant in the action, the
person commencing the action must file a certificate of merit for each
defendant.
(3) The certificate of merit must contain a statement that the
person executing the certificate of merit believes, based on the
information known at the time of executing the certificate of merit,
that there is a reasonable probability that the defendant's conduct did
not follow the accepted standard of care required to be exercised by
the defendant.
(4) Upon motion of the plaintiff, the court may grant an additional
period of time to file the certificate of merit, not to exceed ninety
days, if the court finds there is good cause for the extension.

--- END ---