BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission must offer a training session on law enforcement
interaction with people with developmental disabilities and/or mental
illness. The training must be developed by the commission in
consultation with appropriate community, local, and state organizations
and agencies that have expertise in the area of mental illness and
developmental disability, and with appropriate consumer and family
advocate groups. In developing the course, the commission must also
examine existing courses certified by the commission that relate to
mental illness and developmental disabilities.
(2) The training must consist of classroom instruction or internet
instruction that must include, at a minimum, core instruction in all of
the following:
(a) The cause and nature of mental illnesses and developmental
disabilities;
(b) How to identify indicators of mental illness and developmental
disability and how to respond appropriately in a variety of common
situations;
(c) Conflict resolution and deescalation techniques for potentially
dangerous situations involving people with mental illness and/or a
developmental disability;
(d) Appropriate language usage when interacting with people with
mental illness and/or a developmental disability;
(e) Alternatives to lethal force when interacting with potentially
dangerous people with mental illness and/or a developmental disability;
and
(f) Community and state resources available to serve people with
mental illness and/or developmental disabilities and how these
resources can be best used by law enforcement to benefit the people
with mental illness and developmental disabilities.

--- END ---