BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Custodial interrogation" means an interrogation of a person
suspected of committing a felony that is conducted in:
(i) A sheriff's office, police station, courthouse, correctional
facility, community correctional center, detention facility, or a
state, regional, or local correctional facility; or
(ii) A place not listed in (a)(i) of this subsection if an adequate
recording device is available.
(b) "Electronic recording" means a complete and authentic recording
created by motion picture, videotape, audiotape, or digital media.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
a statement made by a defendant during a custodial interrogation is
inadmissible as evidence against the defendant in a criminal proceeding
unless:
(a) An electronic recording of the entire custodial interrogation
was created;
(b) While the electronic recording was being made and prior to
making the statement, the defendant was advised of all rights of the
defendant as required by state and federal law and the defendant
knowingly, intelligently, and voluntarily waived those rights;
(c) At the time the electronic recording was created, the recording
device being used was capable of creating an accurate recording and the
person operating the recording device was qualified to operate the
recording device;
(d) The electronic recording is not altered;
(e) All voices on the electronic recording that are material to the
custodial interrogation are identified; and
(f) The defendant was provided with a complete and accurate copy of
the electronic recording not later than twenty days before the date of
the criminal proceeding.
(3) Nothing in this section precludes the admission of a statement
made by a defendant during a custodial interrogation if:
(a) The statement was made before a grand jury;
(b) The statement was made in open court at trial or in a hearing;
(c) The custodial interrogation was conducted in another state in
compliance with the laws of that state;
(d) The custodial interrogation was conducted by a federal law
enforcement officer in compliance with the laws of the United States;
(e) The defendant refused to have the custodial interrogation
electronically recorded and the refusal was electronically recorded; or
(f) The law enforcement agency that conducted the custodial
interrogation can demonstrate through clear and convincing evidence
that the failure to create an electronic recording of the entire
custodial interrogation was the result of malfunction of the recording
device and that obtaining a replacement device was not feasible.
(4) A statement of a defendant made during an interrogation other
than a custodial interrogation is inadmissible as evidence against the
defendant in a criminal proceeding if the law enforcement agency
conducting the interrogation selected the location for the
interrogation for the purpose of avoiding the electronic recording
requirements of this section.
(5) A law enforcement agency that creates an electronic recording
of a custodial interrogation shall preserve the electronic recording
until the defendant's conviction for any offense relating to the
custodial interrogation is final and all direct and habeas appeals are
exhausted, or until the prosecution of such offense is barred by law.

--- END ---