BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the final
decision and order in Everett Shorelines Coalition v. City of Everett
and Washington State Department Of Ecology, Case No. 02-3-0009c, issued
on January 9, 2003, by the central Puget Sound growth management
hearings board was a case of first impression interpreting the addition
of the shoreline management act into the growth management act, and
that the board considered the appeal and issued its final order and
decision without the benefit of shorelines guidelines to provide
guidance on the implementation of the shoreline management act and the
adoption of shoreline master programs. The legislature further finds
that the department of ecology has proposed the adoption of new
shoreline guidelines to provide guidance to state agencies and local
governments in the implementation of the shoreline management act.
(2) This act is intended to affirm the legislature's intent that:
(a) The shoreline management act be read, interpreted, applied, and
implemented as a whole consistent with decisions of the shoreline
hearings board and Washington courts prior to the decision of the
central Puget Sound growth management hearings board in Everett
Shorelines Coalition v. City of Everett and Washington State Department
of Ecology;
(b) The goals of the growth management act, including the goals and
policies of the shoreline management act, set forth in RCW 36.70A.020
and included in RCW 36.70A.020 by RCW 36.70A.480, continue to be listed
without an order of priority; and
(c) Shorelines of statewide significance may include critical areas
as defined by RCW 36.70A.030(5), but that shorelines of statewide
significance are not critical areas simply because they are shorelines
of statewide significance.
(3) The legislature intends that upon adoption of revised
shorelines guidelines after January 1, 2003, critical areas within the
jurisdiction of the shoreline management act shall be governed by the
shoreline management act and that critical areas outside the
jurisdiction of the shoreline management act shall be governed by the
growth management act. The legislature further intends that the
quality of information currently required by the shoreline management
act to be applied to the protection of critical areas within shorelines
of the state shall not be limited or changed by the provisions of the
growth management act.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.58.030 and 2002 c 230 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the
following definitions and concepts apply:
(1) Administration:
(a) "Department" means the department of ecology;
(b) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology;
(c) "Local government" means any county, incorporated city, or town
which contains within its boundaries any lands or waters subject to
this chapter;
(d) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, organization, cooperative, public or municipal
corporation, or agency of the state or local governmental unit however
designated;
(e) "Hearing board" means the shoreline hearings board established
by this chapter.
(2) Geographical:
(a) "Extreme low tide" means the lowest line on the land reached by
a receding tide;
(b) "Ordinary high water mark" on all lakes, streams, and tidal
water is that mark that will be found by examining the bed and banks
and ascertaining where the presence and action of waters are so common
and usual, and so long continued in all ordinary years, as to mark upon
the soil a character distinct from that of the abutting upland, in
respect to vegetation as that condition exists on June 1, 1971, as it
may naturally change thereafter, or as it may change thereafter in
accordance with permits issued by a local government or the department:
PROVIDED, That in any area where the ordinary high water mark cannot be
found, the ordinary high water mark adjoining salt water shall be the
line of mean higher high tide and the ordinary high water mark
adjoining fresh water shall be the line of mean high water;
(c) "Shorelines of the state" are the total of all "shorelines" and
"shorelines of statewide significance" within the state;
(d) "Shorelines" means all of the water areas of the state,
including reservoirs, and their associated shorelands, together with
the lands underlying them; except (i) shorelines of statewide
significance; (ii) shorelines on segments of streams upstream of a
point where the mean annual flow is twenty cubic feet per second or
less and the wetlands associated with such upstream segments; and (iii)
shorelines on lakes less than twenty acres in size and wetlands
associated with such small lakes;
(e) "Shorelines of statewide significance" means the following
shorelines of the state:
(i) The area between the ordinary high water mark and the western
boundary of the state from Cape Disappointment on the south to Cape
Flattery on the north, including harbors, bays, estuaries, and inlets;
(ii) Those areas of Puget Sound and adjacent salt waters and the
Strait of Juan de Fuca between the ordinary high water mark and the
line of extreme low tide as follows:
(A) Nisqually Delta -- from DeWolf Bight to Tatsolo Point,
(B) Birch Bay -- from Point Whitehorn to Birch Point,
(C) Hood Canal -- from Tala Point to Foulweather Bluff,
(D) Skagit Bay and adjacent area -- from Brown Point to Yokeko Point,
and
(E) Padilla Bay -- from March Point to William Point;
(iii) Those areas of Puget Sound and the Strait of Juan de Fuca and
adjacent salt waters north to the Canadian line and lying seaward from
the line of extreme low tide;
(iv) Those lakes, whether natural, artificial, or a combination
thereof, with a surface acreage of one thousand acres or more measured
at the ordinary high water mark;
(v) Those natural rivers or segments thereof as follows:
(A) Any west of the crest of the Cascade range downstream of a
point where the mean annual flow is measured at one thousand cubic feet
per second or more,
(B) Any east of the crest of the Cascade range downstream of a
point where the annual flow is measured at two hundred cubic feet per
second or more, or those portions of rivers east of the crest of the
Cascade range downstream from the first three hundred square miles of
drainage area, whichever is longer;
(vi) Those shorelands associated with (i), (ii), (iv), and (v) of
this subsection (2)(e);
(f) "Shorelands" or "shoreland areas" means those lands extending
landward for two hundred feet in all directions as measured on a
horizontal plane from the ordinary high water mark; floodways and
contiguous floodplain areas landward two hundred feet from such
floodways; and all wetlands and river deltas associated with the
streams, lakes, and tidal waters which are subject to the provisions of
this chapter; the same to be designated as to location by the
department of ecology. Any county or city may determine that portion
of a one-hundred-year-flood plain to be included in its master program
as long as such portion includes, as a minimum, the floodway and the
adjacent land extending landward two hundred feet therefrom.
Shorelands shall also include any additional lands necessary for
buffers required by shoreline master programs for critical areas within
shorelines of the state;
(g) "Floodway" means those portions of the area of a river valley
lying streamward from the outer limits of a watercourse upon which
flood waters are carried during periods of flooding that occur with
reasonable regularity, although not necessarily annually, said floodway
being identified, under normal condition, by changes in surface soil
conditions or changes in types or quality of vegetative ground cover
condition. The floodway shall not include those lands that can
reasonably be expected to be protected from flood waters by flood
control devices maintained by or maintained under license from the
federal government, the state, or a political subdivision of the state;
(h) "Wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated by
surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration sufficient to
support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a prevalence
of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions.
Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar areas.
Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and
drainage ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities,
wastewater treatment facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities,
or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally
created as a result of the construction of a road, street, or highway.
Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland areas to mitigate the conversion of wetlands.
(3) Procedural terms:
(a) "Guidelines" means those standards adopted to implement the
policy of this chapter for regulation of use of the shorelines of the
state prior to adoption of master programs. Such standards shall also
provide criteria to local governments and the department in developing
master programs;
(b) "Master program" shall mean the comprehensive use plan for a
described area, and the use regulations together with maps, diagrams,
charts, or other descriptive material and text, a statement of desired
goals, and standards developed in accordance with the policies
enunciated in RCW 90.58.020;
(c) "State master program" is the cumulative total of all master
programs approved or adopted by the department of ecology;
(d) "Development" means a use consisting of the construction or
exterior alteration of structures; dredging; drilling; dumping;
filling; removal of any sand, gravel, or minerals; bulkheading; driving
of piling; placing of obstructions; or any project of a permanent or
temporary nature which interferes with the normal public use of the
surface of the waters overlying lands subject to this chapter at any
state of water level;
(e) "Substantial development" shall mean any development of which
the total cost or fair market value exceeds five thousand dollars, or
any development which materially interferes with the normal public use
of the water or shorelines of the state. The dollar threshold
established in this subsection (3)(e) must be adjusted for inflation by
the office of financial management every five years, beginning July 1,
2007, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time
period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that
year's annual average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area,
for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the
bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect. The following shall not be considered
substantial developments for the purpose of this chapter:
(i) Normal maintenance or repair of existing structures or
developments, including damage by accident, fire, or elements;
(ii) Construction of the normal protective bulkhead common to
single family residences;
(iii) Emergency construction necessary to protect property from
damage by the elements;
(iv) Construction and practices normal or necessary for farming,
irrigation, and ranching activities, including agricultural service
roads and utilities on shorelands, and the construction and maintenance
of irrigation structures including but not limited to head gates,
pumping facilities, and irrigation channels. A feedlot of any size,
all processing plants, other activities of a commercial nature,
alteration of the contour of the shorelands by leveling or filling
other than that which results from normal cultivation, shall not be
considered normal or necessary farming or ranching activities. A
feedlot shall be an enclosure or facility used or capable of being used
for feeding livestock hay, grain, silage, or other livestock feed, but
shall not include land for growing crops or vegetation for livestock
feeding and/or grazing, nor shall it include normal livestock wintering
operations;
(v) Construction or modification of navigational aids such as
channel markers and anchor buoys;
(vi) Construction on shorelands by an owner, lessee, or contract
purchaser of a single family residence for his own use or for the use
of his or her family, which residence does not exceed a height of
thirty-five feet above average grade level and which meets all
requirements of the state agency or local government having
jurisdiction thereof, other than requirements imposed pursuant to this
chapter;
(vii) Construction of a dock, including a community dock, designed
for pleasure craft only, for the private noncommercial use of the
owner, lessee, or contract purchaser of single and multiple family
residences. This exception applies if either: (A) In salt waters, the
fair market value of the dock does not exceed two thousand five hundred
dollars; or (B) in fresh waters, the fair market value of the dock does
not exceed ten thousand dollars, but if subsequent construction having
a fair market value exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars occurs
within five years of completion of the prior construction, the
subsequent construction shall be considered a substantial development
for the purpose of this chapter;
(viii) Operation, maintenance, or construction of canals,
waterways, drains, reservoirs, or other facilities that now exist or
are hereafter created or developed as a part of an irrigation system
for the primary purpose of making use of system waters, including
return flow and artificially stored ground water for the irrigation of
lands;
(ix) The marking of property lines or corners on state owned lands,
when such marking does not significantly interfere with normal public
use of the surface of the water;
(x) Operation and maintenance of any system of dikes, ditches,
drains, or other facilities existing on September 8, 1975, which were
created, developed, or utilized primarily as a part of an agricultural
drainage or diking system;
(xi) Site exploration and investigation activities that are
prerequisite to preparation of an application for development
authorization under this chapter, if:
(A) The activity does not interfere with the normal public use of
the surface waters;
(B) The activity will have no significant adverse impact on the
environment including, but not limited to, fish, wildlife, fish or
wildlife habitat, water quality, and aesthetic values;
(C) The activity does not involve the installation of a structure,
and upon completion of the activity the vegetation and land
configuration of the site are restored to conditions existing before
the activity;
(D) A private entity seeking development authorization under this
section first posts a performance bond or provides other evidence of
financial responsibility to the local jurisdiction to ensure that the
site is restored to preexisting conditions; and
(E) The activity is not subject to the permit requirements of RCW
90.58.550;
(xii) The process of removing or controlling an aquatic noxious
weed, as defined in RCW 17.26.020, through the use of an herbicide or
other treatment methods applicable to weed control that are recommended
by a final environmental impact statement published by the department
of agriculture or the department jointly with other state agencies
under chapter 43.21C RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.58.090 and 1997 c 429 s 50 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A master program, segment of a master program, or an amendment
to a master program shall become effective when approved by the
department. Within the time period provided in RCW 90.58.080, each
local government shall have submitted a master program, either totally
or by segments, for all shorelines of the state within its jurisdiction
to the department for review and approval.
(2) Upon receipt of a proposed master program or amendment, the
department shall:
(a) Provide notice to and opportunity for written comment by all
interested parties of record as a part of the local government review
process for the proposal and to all persons, groups, and agencies that
have requested in writing notice of proposed master programs or
amendments generally or for a specific area, subject matter, or issue.
The comment period shall be at least thirty days, unless the department
determines that the level of complexity or controversy involved
supports a shorter period;
(b) In the department's discretion, conduct a public hearing during
the thirty-day comment period in the jurisdiction proposing the master
program or amendment;
(c) Within fifteen days after the close of public comment, request
the local government to review the issues identified by the public,
interested parties, groups, and agencies and provide a written response
as to how the proposal addresses the identified issues;
(d) Within thirty days after receipt of the local government
response pursuant to (c) of this subsection, make written findings and
conclusions regarding the consistency of the proposal with the policy
of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines, provide a response to
the issues identified in (c) of this subsection, and either approve the
proposal as submitted, recommend specific changes necessary to make the
proposal approvable, or deny approval of the proposal in those
instances where no alteration of the proposal appears likely to be
consistent with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable
guidelines. The written findings and conclusions shall be provided to
the local government, all interested persons, parties, groups, and
agencies of record on the proposal;
(e) If the department recommends changes to the proposed master
program or amendment, within thirty days after the department mails the
written findings and conclusions to the local government, the local
government may:
(i) Agree to the proposed changes. The receipt by the department
of the written notice of agreement constitutes final action by the
department approving the amendment; or
(ii) Submit an alternative proposal. If, in the opinion of the
department, the alternative is consistent with the purpose and intent
of the changes originally submitted by the department and with this
chapter it shall approve the changes and provide written notice to all
recipients of the written findings and conclusions. If the department
determines the proposal is not consistent with the purpose and intent
of the changes proposed by the department, the department may resubmit
the proposal for public and agency review pursuant to this section or
reject the proposal.
(3) The department shall approve the segment of a master program
relating to shorelines unless it determines that the submitted segments
are not consistent with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable
guidelines.
(4) The department shall approve the segment of a master program
relating to critical areas as defined by RCW 36.70A.030(5) provided the
master program segment is consistent with shoreline guidelines revised
and adopted after January 1, 2003, and if that segment provides a level
of protection of critical areas at least equal to that provided by the
local government's critical areas ordinances adopted and thereafter
amended pursuant to RCW 36.70A.060(2).
(5) The department shall approve those segments of the master
program relating to shorelines of statewide significance only after
determining the program provides the optimum implementation of the
policy of this chapter to satisfy the statewide interest. If the
department does not approve a segment of a local government master
program relating to a shoreline of statewide significance, the
department may develop and by rule adopt an alternative to the local
government's proposal.
(((5))) (6) In the event a local government has not complied with
the requirements of RCW 90.58.070 it may thereafter upon written notice
to the department elect to adopt a master program for the shorelines
within its jurisdiction, in which event it shall comply with the
provisions established by this chapter for the adoption of a master
program for such shorelines.
Upon approval of such master program by the department it shall
supersede such master program as may have been adopted by the
department for such shorelines.
(((6))) (7) A master program or amendment to a master program takes
effect when and in such form as approved or adopted by the department.
Shoreline master programs that were adopted by the department prior to
July 22, 1995, in accordance with the provisions of this section then
in effect, shall be deemed approved by the department in accordance
with the provisions of this section that became effective on that date.
The department shall maintain a record of each master program, the
action taken on any proposal for adoption or amendment of the master
program, and any appeal of the department's action. The department's
approved document of record constitutes the official master program.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.58.190 and 1995 c 347 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The appeal of the department's decision to adopt a master
program or amendment pursuant to RCW 90.58.070(2) or 90.58.090(((4)))
(5) is governed by RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.
(2)(a) The department's decision to approve, reject, or modify a
proposed master program or amendment adopted by a local government
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be appealed to the growth
management hearings board with jurisdiction over the local government.
The appeal shall be initiated by filing a petition as provided in RCW
36.70A.250 through 36.70A.320.
(b) If the appeal to the growth management hearings board concerns
shorelines, the growth management hearings board shall review the
proposed master program or amendment solely for compliance with the
requirements of this chapter ((and chapter 36.70A RCW)), the policy of
RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines, the internal consistency
provisions of RCW 36.70A.070, 36.70A.040(4), 35.63.125, and 35A.63.105,
and chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to the adoption of master programs
and amendments under chapter 90.58 RCW.
(c) If the appeal to the growth management hearings board concerns
a shoreline of statewide significance, the board shall uphold the
decision by the department unless the board, by clear and convincing
evidence, determines that the decision of the department is
inconsistent with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable
guidelines.
(d) The appellant has the burden of proof in all appeals to the
growth management hearings board under this subsection.
(e) Any party aggrieved by a final decision of a growth management
hearings board under this subsection may appeal the decision to
superior court as provided in RCW 36.70A.300.
(3)(a) The department's decision to approve, reject, or modify a
proposed master program or master program amendment by a local
government not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be appealed to the
shorelines hearings board by filing a petition within thirty days of
the date of the department's written notice to the local government of
the department's decision to approve, reject, or modify a proposed
master program or master program amendment as provided in RCW
90.58.090(2).
(b) In an appeal relating to shorelines, the shorelines hearings
board shall review the proposed master program or master program
amendment and, after full consideration of the presentations of the
local government and the department, shall determine the validity of
the local government's master program or amendment in light of the
policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines.
(c) In an appeal relating to shorelines of statewide significance,
the shorelines hearings board shall uphold the decision by the
department unless the board determines, by clear and convincing
evidence that the decision of the department is inconsistent with the
policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines.
(d) Review by the shorelines hearings board shall be considered an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative
Procedure Act. The aggrieved local government shall have the burden of
proof in all such reviews.
(e) Whenever possible, the review by the shorelines hearings board
shall be heard within the county where the land subject to the proposed
master program or master program amendment is primarily located. The
department and any local government aggrieved by a final decision of
the hearings board may appeal the decision to superior court as
provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) A master program amendment shall become effective after the
approval of the department or after the decision of the shorelines
hearings board to uphold the master program or master program
amendment, provided that the board may remand the master program or
master program adjustment to the local government or the department for
modification prior to the final adoption of the master program or
master program amendment.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.70A.480 and 1995 c 347 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For shorelines of the state, the goals and policies of the
shoreline management act as set forth in RCW 90.58.020 are added as one
of the goals of this chapter as set forth in RCW 36.70A.020 without
creating an order of priority among the fourteen goals. The goals and
policies of a shoreline master program for a county or city approved
under chapter 90.58 RCW shall be considered an element of the county or
city's comprehensive plan. All other portions of the shoreline master
program for a county or city adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW, including
use regulations, shall be considered a part of the county or city's
development regulations.
(2) The shoreline master program shall be adopted pursuant to the
procedures of chapter 90.58 RCW rather than the goals, policies, and
procedures set forth in this chapter for the adoption of a
comprehensive plan or development regulations.
(3) The policies, goals, and provisions of chapter 90.58 RCW and
applicable guidelines shall be the sole basis for determining
compliance of a shoreline master program with this chapter except as
the shoreline master program is required to comply with the internal
consistency provisions of RCW 36.70A.070, 36.70A.040(4), 35.63.125, and
35A.63.105.
(a) As of the date the department of ecology approves a local
government's shoreline master program adopted under revised shoreline
guidelines effective after January 1, 2003, the protection of critical
areas as defined by RCW 36.70A.030(5) within shorelines of the state,
including adjacent buffer zones, shall be accomplished only through the
local government's shoreline master program and shall not be subject to
the procedural and substantive requirements of this chapter.
(b) Critical areas within shorelines of the state that have been
identified as meeting the definition of critical areas as defined by
RCW 36.70A.030(5), and that are subject to a shoreline master program
adopted under revised shoreline guidelines adopted after January 1,
2003, shall not be subject to the procedural and substantive
requirements of this chapter, provided nothing in this act is intended
to change the applicability of the provisions of this chapter to
agricultural activities as defined by RCW 90.58.065.
(c) The provisions of RCW 36.70A.172 shall not apply to the
adoption or subsequent amendment of a local government's shoreline
master program and shall not be used to determine compliance of a local
government's shoreline master program with chapter 90.58 RCW and
applicable guidelines. Nothing in this section, however, is intended
to limit or change the quality of information to be applied in
protecting critical areas within shorelines of the state, as required
by chapter 90.58 RCW and applicable guidelines.
(4) Shoreline master programs shall provide a level of protection
to critical areas located within shorelines of the state that is at
least equal to the level of protection provided to critical areas by
the local government's critical area ordinances adopted and thereafter
amended pursuant to RCW 36.70A.060(2).
(5) Shorelines of the state shall not be considered critical areas
under this chapter except to the extent that specific areas located
within shorelines of the state qualify for critical area designation
based on the definition of critical areas provided by RCW 36.70A.030(5)
and have been designated as such by a local government pursuant to RCW
36.70A.060(2).

--- END ---