BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that eighty-one
percent of students have received a credit card by the end of the first
year of college, and that the high interest rates on student credit
cards, coupled with their ease of use and a poor understanding of how
credit works, often leads to runaway and unmanageable debt. The
legislature also finds that students routinely apply for credit cards
simply to get free merchandise, but two or three years later, students
may begin to receive collection notices for credit cards they requested
but never received or used. Students in North Carolina who seek
assistance from student legal services about debt problems own an
average of four and seventy-seven one-hundredths credit cards with an
average balance of seven thousand dollars each. This amount of credit
card debt is in addition to any loans the student is obligated to pay
back after graduation. The legislature further finds that many states
have found success in regulating credit card companies' ability to
solicit business from college students by controlling the conditions of
soliciting and mandating certain behavior from the institutions of
higher education. Lawmakers in ten states have introduced legislation
to try and rein in credit card companies' solicitation of college
students and to increase students' access to educational programs about
credit and financial management. The purposes of this act are to
encourage young adults to obtain credit cards in a more responsible
manner and to keep young adults out of credit card debt. The
legislature finds that due to the first amendment rights in the United
States Constitution, this act cannot prohibit the soliciting of the
credit card companies, but will ban the administering of credit card
applications on college campuses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Institutions of higher education shall ban the administration
of credit card applications on site of a college campus and shall
encourage young adults to establish credit in a more responsible
manner.
(2) The definitions in this section apply throughout this section
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Ban" means to prohibit, not allowing without any exception,
not having any right to do so, and banishing the right of.
(b) "On site of a college campus" means on any and all property
owned by the institution of higher education itself, within any borders
of the belonging property of the institution.
(c) "Administering" means the act of handing out or giving to, or
allowing one to get a hold of an application.
(d) "Application" means any form or piece of information that
allows one to apply or sign up for a credit card, and any way and/or
means that commits a student to the credit card requirements or its
commitments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---