BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.13.020 and 2002 c 43 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All city, town, and district general elections shall be held
throughout the state of Washington on the first Tuesday following the
first Monday in November in the odd-numbered years.
This section shall not apply to:
(a) Elections for the recall of any elective public officer;
(b) Public utility districts, conservation districts, or district
elections at which the ownership of property within those districts is
a prerequisite to voting, all of which elections shall be held at the
times prescribed in the laws specifically applicable thereto;
(c) ((Consolidation proposals)) School district elections as
provided for in RCW ((28A.315.280)) 28A.315.265 and nonhigh capital
fund aid proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.540 RCW.
(2) The county auditor, as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon
request in the form of a resolution of the governing body of a city,
town, or district, presented to the auditor at least forty-five days
prior to the proposed election date((, may, if the county auditor deems
an emergency to exist,)) shall call a special election in such city,
town, or district, and for the purpose of such special election he or
she may combine, unite, or divide precincts. Except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, such a special election shall be held
on one of the following dates as decided by the governing body:
(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;
(b) The second Tuesday in March;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(d) The third Tuesday in May;
(e) The day of the primary election as specified by RCW 29.13.070;
or
(f) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter
29.19 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called under
subsection (2) of this section during the month of that primary is the
date of the presidential primary.
(4) In addition to subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this section,
a special election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be
called at any time to meet the needs resulting from fire, flood,
earthquake, or other act of God, except that no special election may be
held between the first day for candidates to file for public office and
the last day to certify the returns of the general election other than
as provided in subsection (2)(e) and (f) of this section. Such special
election shall be conducted and notice thereof given in the manner
provided by law.
(5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections.

--- END ---