BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The house criminal justice and
corrections committee and the senate judiciary committee shall study:
(a) The jurisdiction of tribal, state, and local law enforcement
officers over tribal and nontribal persons on tribal lands; and
(b) The extension of general authority peace officer powers to
tribal law enforcement officers and the effect that the extension would
have on tribal and nontribal persons, including nontribal persons
occupying land held in fee simple within the boundaries of tribal
lands.
(2) When conducting the study under subsection (1) of this section,
the house criminal justice and corrections committee and the senate
judiciary committee shall consult with the following:
(a) The twenty-nine federally recognized tribes in Washington;
(b) Tribal law enforcement;
(c) Prosecuting attorneys;
(d) Defense attorneys;
(e) Local sheriffs or police chiefs;
(f) Nontribal persons occupying land held in fee simple within the
boundaries of tribal land; and
(g) Other persons with expertise in relations between the state and
the tribes as the committees deem necessary.
(3) The house criminal justice and corrections committee and the
senate judiciary committee shall report their findings and
recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the governor
and the legislature no later than December 1, 2003.
(4) This section expires March 31, 2004.

--- END ---