BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Power wheelchair" means any self-propelled vehicle capable of
traveling no more than fifteen miles per hour, usable indoors, designed
as a mobility aid for individuals with mobility impairments, and
operated by such an individual.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.04.320 and 2002 c 247 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Motor vehicle" ((shall)) means every vehicle ((which)) that is
self-propelled and every vehicle ((which)) that is propelled by
electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated
upon rails. An electric personal assistive mobility device is not
considered a motor vehicle. A power wheelchair is not considered a
motor vehicle.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.04.330 and 2002 c 247 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle designed to travel on not more
than three wheels in contact with the ground, on which the driver rides
astride the motor unit or power train and is designed to be steered
with a handle bar, but excluding a farm tractor, a power wheelchair, an
electric personal assistive mobility device, and a moped.
The Washington state patrol may approve of and define as a
"motorcycle" a motor vehicle that fails to meet these specific
criteria, but that is essentially similar in performance and
application to motor vehicles that do meet these specific criteria.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.04.332 and 2002 c 247 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Motor-driven cycle" means every motorcycle, including every motor
scooter, with a motor that produces not to exceed five brake horsepower
(developed by a prime mover, as measured by a brake applied to the
driving shaft). A motor-driven cycle does not include a moped, a power
wheelchair, or an electric personal assistive mobility device.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.04.400 and 1990 c 241 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Pedestrian" means any person who is afoot or who is using a
wheelchair, a power wheelchair, or a means of conveyance propelled by
human power other than a bicycle.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.04.670 and 2002 c 247 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Vehicle" includes every device capable of being moved upon a
public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or property is or
may be transported or drawn upon a public highway, including bicycles.
The term does not include power wheelchairs or devices other than
bicycles moved by human or animal power or used exclusively upon
stationary rails or tracks. Mopeds shall not be considered vehicles or
motor vehicles for the purposes of chapter 46.70 RCW. Bicycles shall
not be considered vehicles for the purposes of chapter 46.12, 46.16, or
46.70 RCW. Electric personal assistive mobility devices are not
considered vehicles or motor vehicles for the purposes of chapter
46.12, 46.16, 46.29, 46.37, or 46.70 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.20.500 and 2002 c 247 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may drive a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle unless
such person has a valid driver's license specially endorsed by the
director to enable the holder to drive such vehicles.
(2) However, a person sixteen years of age or older, holding a
valid driver's license of any class issued by the state of the person's
residence, may operate a moped without taking any special examination
for the operation of a moped.
(3) No driver's license is required for operation of an electric-assisted bicycle if the operator is at least sixteen years of age.
Persons under sixteen years of age may not operate an electric-assisted
bicycle.
(4) No driver's license is required to operate an electric personal
assistive mobility device or a power wheelchair.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.04.010 and 1975 c 62 s 50 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following words and phrases, wherever used in this title, shall
have the meaning as in this section ascribed to them, unless where used
the context thereof shall clearly indicate to the contrary or unless
otherwise defined in the chapter of which they are a part:
(1) "Alley." A highway within the ordinary meaning of alley not
designated for general travel and primarily used as a means of access
to the rear of residences and business establishments;
(2) "Arterial highway." Every highway, as herein defined, or
portion thereof designated as such by proper authority;
(3) "Business district." The territory contiguous to and including
a highway, as herein defined, when within any six hundred feet along
such highway there are buildings in use for business or industrial
purposes, including but not limited to hotels, banks, or office
buildings, railroad stations, and public buildings which occupy at
least three hundred feet of frontage on one side or three hundred feet
collectively on both sides of the highway;
(4) "Center line." The line, marked or unmarked parallel to and
equidistant from the sides of a two-way traffic roadway of a highway
except where otherwise indicated by painted lines or markers;
(5) "Center of intersection." The point of intersection of the
center lines of the roadways of intersecting highways;
(6) "City street." Every highway as herein defined, or part
thereof located within the limits of incorporated cities and towns,
except alleys;
(7) "Combination of vehicles." Every combination of motor vehicle
and motor vehicle, motor vehicle and trailer, or motor vehicle and
semitrailer;
(8) "Commercial vehicle." Any vehicle the principal use of which
is the transportation of commodities, merchandise, produce, freight,
animals, or passengers for hire;
(9) "County road." Every highway as herein defined, or part
thereof, outside the limits of incorporated cities and towns and which
has not been designated as a state highway, or branch thereof;
(10) "Crosswalk." The portion of the roadway between the
intersection area and a prolongation or connection of the farthest
sidewalk line or in the event there are no sidewalks then between the
intersection area and a line ten feet therefrom, except as modified by
a marked crosswalk;
(11) "Intersection area." (a) The area embraced within the
prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, then
the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two or more highways
which join one another at, or approximately at, right angles, or the
area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways joining at
any other angle may come in conflict;
(b) Where a highway includes two roadways thirty feet or more
apart, then every crossing of each roadway of such divided highway by
an intersecting highway shall be regarded as a separate intersection.
In the event such intersecting highway also includes two roadways
thirty feet or more apart, then every crossing of two roadways of such
highways shall be regarded as a separate intersection;
(c) The junction of an alley with a street or highway shall not
constitute an intersection;
(12) "Intersection control area." The intersection area as herein
defined, together with such modification of the adjacent roadway area
as results from the arc or curb corners and together with any marked or
unmarked crosswalks adjacent to the intersection;
(13) "Laned highway." A highway the roadway of which is divided
into clearly marked lanes for vehicular traffic;
(14) "Local authorities." Every county, municipal, or other local
public board or body having authority to adopt local police regulations
under the Constitution and laws of this state;
(15) "Marked crosswalk." Any portion of a roadway distinctly
indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the
surface thereof;
(16) "Metal tire." Every tire, the bearing surface of which in
contact with the highway is wholly or partly of metal or other hard,
nonresilient material;
(17) "Motor truck." Any motor vehicle, as herein defined, designed
or used for the transportation of commodities, merchandise, produce,
freight, or animals;
(18) "Motor vehicle." Every vehicle, as herein defined, which is
in itself a self-propelled unit;
(19) "Multiple lane highway." Any highway the roadway of which is
of sufficient width to reasonably accommodate two or more separate
lanes of vehicular traffic in the same direction, each lane of which
shall be not less than the maximum legal vehicle width, and whether or
not such lanes are marked;
(20) "Operator." Every person who drives or is in actual physical
control of a vehicle as herein defined;
(21) "Peace officer." Any officer authorized by law to execute
criminal process or to make arrests for the violation of the statutes
generally or of any particular statute or statutes relative to the
highways of this state;
(22) "Pedestrian." Any person afoot or who is using a wheelchair,
power wheelchair, or a means of conveyance propelled by human power
other than a bicycle;
(23) "Person." Every natural person, firm, copartnership,
corporation, association, or organization;
(24) "Pneumatic tires." Every tire of rubber or other resilient
material designed to be inflated with compressed air to support the
load thereon;
(25) "Private road or driveway." Every way or place in private
ownership and used for travel of vehicles by the owner or those having
express or implied permission from the owner, but not by other persons;
(26) "Highway." Every way, lane, road, street, boulevard, and
every way or place in the state of Washington open as a matter of right
to public vehicular travel both inside and outside the limits of
incorporated cities and towns;
(27) "Railroad." A carrier of persons or property upon vehicles,
other than street cars, operated upon stationary rails, the route of
which is principally outside incorporated cities and towns;
(28) "Railroad sign or signal." Any sign, signal, or device
erected by authority of a public body or official or by a railroad and
intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks or the
approach of a railroad train;
(29) "Residence district." The territory contiguous to and
including the highway, as herein defined, not comprising a business
district, as herein defined, when the property on such highway for a
continuous distance of three hundred feet or more on either side
thereof is in the main improved with residences or residences and
buildings in use for business;
(30) "Roadway." The paved, improved, or proper driving portion of
a highway designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel;
(31) "Safety zone." The area or space officially set apart within
a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and which is protected
or is marked or indicated by painted marks, signs, buttons, standards,
or otherwise so as to be plainly discernible;
(32) "Sidewalk." That property between the curb lines or the
lateral lines of a roadway, as herein defined, and the adjacent
property, set aside and intended for the use of pedestrians or such
portion of private property parallel and in proximity to a highway and
dedicated to use by pedestrians;
(33) "Solid tire." Every tire of rubber or other resilient
material which does not depend upon inflation with compressed air for
the support of the load thereon;
(34) "State highway." Every highway as herein defined, or part
thereof, which has been designated as a state highway, or branch
thereof, by legislative enactment;
(35) "Street car." A vehicle other than a train, as herein
defined, for the transporting of persons or property and operated upon
stationary rails principally within incorporated cities and towns;
(36) "Traffic." Pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, vehicles,
street cars, and other conveyances either singly or together while
using any highways for purposes of travel;
(37) "Traffic control signal." Any traffic device, as herein
defined, whether manually, electrically, or mechanically operated, by
which traffic alternately is directed to stop or proceed or otherwise
controlled;
(38) "Traffic devices." All signs, signals, markings, and devices
not inconsistent with this title placed or erected by authority of a
public body or official having jurisdiction, for the purpose of
regulating, warning, or guiding traffic;
(39) "Train." A vehicle propelled by steam, electricity, or other
motive power with or without cars coupled thereto, operated upon
stationary rails, except street cars;
(40) "Vehicle." Every device capable of being moved upon a highway
and in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be
transported or drawn upon a highway, excepting devices moved by human
or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.
Words and phrases used herein in the past, present, or future tense
shall include the past, present, and future tenses; words and phrases
used herein in the masculine, feminine, or neuter gender shall include
the masculine, feminine, and neuter genders; and words and phrases used
herein in the singular or plural shall include the singular and plural;
unless the context thereof shall indicate to the contrary.

--- END ---