BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.111 and 2002 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall deduct from the gross wages or gratuities
of each inmate working in correctional industries work programs, taxes
and legal financial obligations. The secretary shall develop a formula
for the distribution of offender wages and gratuities.
(a) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class I gross wages and from all others earning at least minimum wage:
(i) Five percent to the public safety and education account for the
purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court.
(b) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class II gross gratuities:
(i) Five percent to the public safety and education account for the
purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Fifteen percent to the department to contribute to the cost
of incarceration; and
(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court.
(c) The formula shall include the following minimum deduction from
class IV gross gratuities: Five percent to the department to
contribute to the cost of incarceration.
(d) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class III gratuities: Five percent for the purpose of crime victims'
compensation.
(2) With the exception of any inmate working in a class I industry,
an additional five percent shall be deducted from the gross wages or
gratuities of each inmate working in correctional industries work
programs if such inmate has been convicted of a sex offense as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030. The funds shall be deposited in the public safety
and education account and shall be appropriated to the office of crime
victims advocacy.
(3) Any person sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility
of release or parole under chapter 10.95 RCW or sentenced to death
shall be exempt from the requirement under (a)(ii) or (b)(ii) of this
subsection.
(4) The department personal inmate savings account, together with
any accrued interest, shall only be available to an inmate at the time
of his or her release from confinement, unless the secretary determines
that an emergency exists for the inmate, at which time the funds can be
made available to the inmate in an amount determined by the secretary.
The management of classes I, II, and IV correctional industries may
establish an incentive payment for offender workers based on
productivity criteria. This incentive shall be paid separately from
the hourly wage/gratuity rate and shall not be subject to the specified
deduction for cost of incarceration.
(5) In the event that the offender worker's wages or gratuity is
subject to garnishment for support enforcement, the crime victims'
compensation, savings, and cost of incarceration deductions shall be
calculated on the net wages after taxes, legal financial obligations,
and garnishment.
(((2))) (6) The department shall explore other methods of
recovering a portion of the cost of the inmate's incarceration and for
encouraging participation in work programs, including development of
incentive programs that offer inmates benefits and amenities paid for
only from wages earned while working in a correctional industries work
program.
(((3))) (7) The department shall develop the necessary
administrative structure to recover inmates' wages and keep records of
the amount inmates pay for the costs of incarceration and amenities.
All funds deducted from inmate wages under subsection (1) of this
section for the purpose of contributions to the cost of incarceration
shall be deposited in a dedicated fund with the department and shall be
used only for the purpose of enhancing and maintaining correctional
industries work programs.
(((4))) (8) The expansion of inmate employment in class I and class
II correctional industries shall be implemented according to the
following schedule:
(a) Not later than June 30, 1995, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least two hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(b) Not later than June 30, 1996, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least four hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(c) Not later than June 30, 1997, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least six hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(d) Not later than June 30, 1998, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least nine hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(e) Not later than June 30, 1999, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least one thousand two hundred in the number of inmates
employed in class I or class II correctional industries work programs
above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(f) Not later than June 30, 2000, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least one thousand five hundred in the number of inmates
employed in class I or class II correctional industries work programs
above the number so employed on June 30, 1994.
(((5))) (9) It shall be in the discretion of the secretary to
apportion the inmates between class I and class II depending on
available contracts and resources.

--- END ---