BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory committee" means the electronics advisory committee
created in section 5 of this act.
(2) "Collective recovery plan" means a plan in which more than one
manufacturer has agreed to participate. A collective recovery plan
must represent the plan for all brands of electronic products
manufactured by the participating manufacturers.
(3) "Computer peripherals" means printers, keyboards, mice,
scanners, speakers, cables, or other accessories that are primarily
designed to be attached to a personal computer.
(4) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(6) "Electronic products" means all televisions, computer monitors,
laptop computers, central processing units, handheld computers,
cellular phones, and computer peripherals.
(7) "Electronic waste" means electronic products that have been
discarded by its owner, or that has been otherwise entered into the
solid waste stream.
(8) "End of life fee" means a fee charged to the last consumer to
use an electronic product, designed primarily for financing the
implementation of a plan required by this chapter.
(9) "Environment" includes all of the state's natural resources,
including land, air, water resources, and plant and animal species, and
the habitat upon which they depend.
(10) "Environmentally friendly products" means electronic products
with lower impacts on the environment throughout its life cycle.
"Environmentally friendly products" includes products with fewer toxic
constituents, that use fewer toxic chemicals in the manufacturing
process, that contain recycled or remanufactured parts, that are
designed for easy disassembly and recycling, that are easy to upgrade
or reuse, and that are designed for a longer life.
(11) "Front end financing" means costs recovered at the time of
sale, either internalized into the final sale price, or specifically
itemized and added to the final sale price.
(12) "Hazardous electronic waste" means electronic equipment,
components, constituent subunits, or materials from which the subunits
are made, that contain concentrations of toxic materials exceeding the
regulatory levels established in Title 40 C.F.R. part 261.24 as it
existed on the effective date of this act, using the toxic
characteristic leaching procedure.
(13) "Orphan waste" means electronic waste that was manufactured
by, or bears the brand of, a manufacturer that is no longer in
business.
(14) "Manufacturer" means any person who, as of the effective date
of this act: (a) Manufactures and sells electronic equipment under its
own brand; (b) manufactures and sells electronic equipment without
affixing a brand; or (c) resells equipment produced by other suppliers
under its own brand and label. The term "manufacturer" applies
regardless of the selling technique used, including distance
communication.
(15) "Plan" or "plans" means both the electronic waste recovery and
recycling plan required under section 2 of this act that are filed by
individual manufacturers and collective recovery plans.
(16) "Processed" means the removal and separation from electronics,
and the management according to existing state and federal regulations,
of batteries, printed circuit boards, toner and ink cartridges,
plastics containing brominated flame retardants, cathode ray tubes,
liquid crystal displays of a surface greater than one hundred square
centimeters, mercury-containing devices, copper wiring, lead solder,
and external electrical cables.
(17) "Recycling" means the use of previously manufactured materials
including metals, glass, and plastics, as feedstock in the
manufacturing of new products. "Recycling" does not include energy
recovery or energy generation by means of combusting electronic waste
with or without other waste.
(18) "Reuse" means any operation by which electronic waste or
components of electronic waste are used for the same purposes for which
they were originally created, including the continued use of the
equipment or components of the equipment that are returned to
collection points, recyclers, or manufacturers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Except as provided in this section,
every manufacturer must develop, submit to the department, implement,
and finance the implementation of a plan for the collection and the
recycling or reuse of sixty-five percent, by weight, of all electronic
waste from its own products each year. The plan must provide and
promote convenient, strategically located fixed collection sites to
serve urban and rural populations throughout the state. Collection
sites may include electronics recyclers and repair shops, recyclers of
other commodities, reuse organizations, municipal recycling centers,
retailers, or other suitable locations. Rural areas without commercial
centers, unincorporated communities, or areas with widely dispersed
population may be served by collections at the nearest commercial
centers where electronics are sold or by mail-back systems.
(2) A manufacturer may satisfy the plan requirements of this
chapter by agreeing to participate in a collective recovery plan with
other manufacturers. The collective recovery plan must meet the same
standards and requirements of the plans submitted by individual
manufacturers.
(3) All plans required by this chapter must include, at a minimum:
(a) A description of the collection system, including the methods
of convenient collection;
(b) A public education element to inform the public about the
collection system, including details about meeting all consumer
notification and labeling requirements;
(c) Details for implementing and financing the collection,
recovery, recycling, and reuse of all electronic products sold by that
manufacturer in the state;
(d) Documentation of the willingness of all necessary parties to
implement the agreement, including the parties that will participate in
the collection, treatment, recovery, reuse, and recycling of the
electronic products;
(e) Assurances that the system, and all necessary parties, will
operate in compliance with local, state, and federal waste management
rules and regulations;
(f) Descriptions of the performance measures that will be used and
reported by the manufacturer to demonstrate that the plan is meeting
the required recovery and recycling rates for its own brand of
electronic products at end of life, as well as other measures of the
plan's effectiveness;
(g) Descriptions of additional or alternative actions that will be
taken if performance measures are not met;
(h) Details for financing the manufacturer's proportional share of
orphan waste;
(i) Ideas for the creation of economic incentives for the design of
environmentally friendly products; and
(j) Annual sales data on the number and type of electronic products
sold by the manufacturer in Washington over the ten years preceding the
filing of the plan for televisions, and five years preceding the filing
of the plan for computers, cell phones, and other electronic products.
(4) The manufacturers are responsible for all of the costs
associated with the development and implementation of the plans. These
costs include cost for collection and public education and outreach.
If the costs are passed on to consumers, it must be done so with front
end financing, and not with an end of life fee. No funds shall be
collected, managed, or generated by a state governmental entity.
(5) Manufacturers must finance the management of orphan waste. The
costs of managing such waste shall be shared proportionally by the
manufacturers respective to the manufacturer's market share, by
electronic product type, at the time that the waste management costs
are incurred. The proportional share of the responsibility for orphan
waste may be adjusted on an annual basis by the department, in
consultation with the advisory committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All plans required by this chapter must
be submitted to the department and the advisory committee by September
30, 2004, and reviewed by the department by December 31, 2004, with
implementation by manufacturers beginning by June 30, 2005. The
department and advisory committee shall evaluate plans based on the
plan's sufficiency in light of all of the required elements. The
advisory committee shall develop a means for scoring initial
submissions and providing feedback to manufacturers for integration
into final plans.
(2) After June 30, 2005, a manufacturer must have a plan that is
approved by the department before that manufacturer is able to sell an
electronic product in Washington.
(3) If a manufacturer with an approved plan fails to meet the
recovery and recycling goals of the plan, the department may require
the manufacturer to implement additional procedures, including the
additional or alternative actions identified in the manufacturer's
plan. If the additional procedures fail to accomplish the recovery
goal, the department may prohibit the manufacturer from selling
electronic products in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) All manufacturers must submit an initial
report to the advisory committee by December 31, 2005, and each
December 31st thereafter. The reports must contain, at a minimum:
(a) The quantities of electronic products sold by that manufacturer
in the state during the previous year;
(b) The weight of the electronic waste recovered in the previous
year;
(c) The weight of recovered electronic waste that is reused;
(d) The weight of recovered electronic waste that is recycled;
(e) Progress reports towards making more environmentally friendly
products;
(f) The results of any performance measures included in the plan;
(g) Identification of the end markets for collected electronic
waste;
(h) Educational and promotional efforts that will be undertaken;
and
(i) Any other information deemed necessary by the department.
(2) The advisory committee and the department must review all
reports and provide a notice of adequate compliance or deficiency to
manufacturers within six months.
(3) All reports submitted to the department and the advisory
committee must be available to the general public through the internet.
However, the manufacturer submitting the report may indicate which
portions, if any, it considers proprietary and, if the department
concurs that the information meets state legal requirements for
confidentiality, those sections of the report shall not be made public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The electronics advisory committee is
created to oversee the electronic recovery and recycling program. The
advisory committee shall receive plans, review annual reports submitted
pursuant to section 4 of this act, and report annually to the
department and the legislature on recommended adjustments to recycling
and recovery goals, products that are required to be covered with a
plan, and any regulatory changes.
(2) The advisory committee must be composed of eleven members, all
appointed by the governor. Two members must be representatives of
manufacturers, two members must be representatives of electronics
recyclers or processors, two members must be representatives of
environmental or public interest organizations, two members must be
representatives of local government, including at least one local
government located east of the crest of the Cascades, and three members
must be at-large citizen members with no qualification criteria.
(3) Members of the advisory committee shall serve four-year
renewable terms.
(4) Members of the advisory committee serve as volunteers, and are
not eligible for compensation.
(5) Staff to the advisory committee must be provided by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Manufacturers shall phase out the use of
lead, mercury, beryllium, cadmium, hexavalent chromium, brominated
flame retardants, and polyvinyl chloride in electronic products by
January 1, 2007. Phased-out substances must be replaced by more
environmentally friendly substances. Additional substances and phase
out dates may be adopted in rule by the department at the
recommendation of the advisory committee.
(2) The department, in consultation with the advisory committee,
may grant a limited-term exemption from the phase out requirements of
this section if a manufacturer sufficiently demonstrates that it is
technically impossible to find an alternative to a particular
substance. Upon the granting of an exemption, the department must
assign an expiration date for the exemption that ensures the
manufacturer will invest in research and development to identify an
appropriate alternative. An exemption can be rescinded by the
department if it becomes possible to execute the phase out before the
assigned expiration of the exemption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 By June 30, 2005, all electronic products
sold in Washington must bear a clear label, or be packaged with
informational materials, provided by the manufacturer, that provides
the consumer or end user with information relating to the following:
(1) The hazardous materials contained in the electronic product and
its parts and subparts;
(2) The restrictions relating to the disposal of electronic
products in landfills, incinerators, and other means that are not a
part of the manufacturer's approved plans; and
(3) A toll-free phone number or internet site where consumers can
obtain information and instructions concerning the safe disposition of
the electronic product through the manufacturer's plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Every plan required by this chapter must
include a consumer education element. The consumer education element
must be designed to ensure that the users of electronic products
understand:
(a) The prohibition on disposal of electronic waste by any means
other than as listed in the manufacturer's plan;
(b) The electronic waste return and collection systems that are
available;
(c) The potential effects on the environment and human health that
could result from the presence and improper disposal of hazardous
substances contained in electronic equipment;
(d) The consumer's role in contributing to the reuse, recycling,
and other forms of electronic waste recovery.
(2)(a) All manufacturers must demonstrate through independent
polling that at least eighty-five percent public awareness has been
achieved for each of that manufacturer's covered electronic products
within two years following a plan's implementation. Manufacturers may
satisfy this subsection by collectively undertaking demonstrations of
public awareness as long as the polling instrument is designed to
identify the public awareness of a majority of the manufacturer's plans
or a majority of the electronic products.
(b) The design, protocols, and implementation of the public opinion
polling required by this subsection must be approved by the advisory
committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Every plan required by this chapter must
include a provision for facilitating the correct and environmentally
sound treatment of electronic waste. Manufacturers must demonstrate
adequate measures to provide information to recyclers and processors
about their electronic products. Within one year of the introduction
of a new electronic product, the manufacturer must provide new
information to recyclers and processors regarding the end of life
treatment of the new product, including directions for disassembly,
information about material content, and safety concerns.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 No plan required under this chapter may
include the use of prison labor unless the manufacturer can demonstrate
that:
(1) They provide all occupational safety, health, and environmental
protections required of private enterprise, nonprison labor operations;
and
(2) Prison labor does not unfairly compete with private sector
operations by providing a hidden subsidy not available to a private
recycling infrastructure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The legislature finds that exporting
electronic waste to other nations with environmental standards that are
less stringent than the United States does not safely remove that waste
from the global environment. Therefore, all plans submitted pursuant
to this chapter are encouraged to prohibit the export of hazardous
electronic waste to foreign countries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 All persons processing electronic waste as
part of an approved plan must protect the health and safety of their
employees and contractors by, at a minimum, providing evidence of
compliance with all state and federal occupational health and safety
laws and regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Manufacturers or an organization of
manufacturers that participate in a collective recovery plan under this
chapter shall not be found liable or guilty under any state rule of
trade or commerce for any activities required by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The department of general administration
shall establish purchasing and procurement policies that require the
vendors of electronic products sold to the state to take back the
electronic waste when the equipment becomes obsolete, is discarded, or
is otherwise removed from service. Purchasing and procurement policies
must also establish a preference for electronic products that meet
environmental performance standards relating to the reduction or
elimination of hazardous materials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If a national system for the collection and
recycling of electronic products or orphan waste that meets the same or
similar standards as this chapter is implemented, the department must
notify the appropriate committees of the legislature and provide a
recommendation as to whether the state should allow the national
agreements or requirements to preempt this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Nothing in this chapter restricts the
ability of a manufacturer, importer, or domestic distributor from
transporting electronic products through the state, or storing
electronic products in the state for later distribution outside of the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The department may adopt rules to implement
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW
to read as follows:
Unprocessed electronic products and hazardous electronic waste, as
those terms are defined in section 1 of this act, shall not be disposed
of in landfills, incinerators, and other municipal solid waste disposal
systems after January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Sections 1 through 17 and 19 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---