BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Covered establishment" means any industrial or commercial
facility or part thereof that employs, or has employed within the
preceding twelve months, seventy-five or more persons.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Employee" means a person who, under the usual common law rules
applicable in determining the employer-employee relationship, has had
the status of an employee for at least six months of the twelve months
preceding the date on which notice is required.
(4) "Employer" means any employer who directly or indirectly owns
and operates a covered establishment. A parent corporation is an
employer as to any covered establishment directly owned and operated by
its corporate subsidiary.
(5) "Layoff" means a separation from employment for lack of funds
or lack of work.
(6) "Mass layoff" means a layoff during any thirty-day period of
fifty or more employees at either a covered establishment or at one or
more parts of a covered establishment.
(7) "Relocation" means the removal of all or substantially all of
the industrial or commercial operations in a covered establishment to
a different location one hundred miles or more away.
(8) "Termination" means the cessation or substantial cessation of
industrial or commercial operations in a covered establishment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) An employer may not order a mass layoff,
relocation, or termination at a covered establishment unless, sixty
days before the order takes effect, the employer gives written notice
of the order to the following:
(a) The employees of the covered establishment affected by the
order;
(b) The employment security department, the local workforce
development council, and the chief elected official of each city and
county government within which the termination, relocation, or mass
layoff occurs; and
(c) The legislature through the offices of the chief clerk of the
house of representatives and the secretary of the senate.
(2) An employer required to give notice of any mass layoff,
relocation, or termination under this chapter shall include in its
notice the elements specified by the department in rule. In order to
ensure that appropriate public services are made available to employers
and affected employees, the elements of the notice must include the
number of affected positions, the number of affected positions being
relocated or outsourced to a different location one hundred miles or
more away, and the job titles and wages of the affected positions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An employer is not required to comply
with the notice requirement contained in section 2(1) of this act if
the department determines that all of the following conditions exist:
(a) As of the time that notice would have been required, the
employer was actively seeking capital or business;
(b) The capital or business sought, if obtained, would have enabled
the employer to avoid or postpone the relocation or termination; and
(c) The employer reasonably and in good faith believed that giving
the notice required by section 2(1) of this act would have precluded
the employer from obtaining the needed capital or business.
(2) The department may not determine that the employer was actively
seeking capital or business under subsection (1) of this section unless
the employer provides the department with both of the following:
(a) A written record consisting of all documents relevant to the
determination of whether the employer was actively seeking capital or
business, as specified by the department; and
(b) An affidavit verifying the contents of the documents contained
in the record.
(3) The affidavit provided to the department pursuant to subsection
(2)(b) of this section shall contain a declaration signed under penalty
of perjury stating that the affidavit and the contents of the documents
contained in the record submitted pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this
section are true and correct.
(4) An employer is not required to comply with the notice
requirement contained in section 2(1) of this act if a mass layoff,
relocation, or termination is necessitated by a physical calamity or
act of war.
(5) An employer is not required to comply with the notice
requirement contained in section 2(1) of this act if a mass layoff,
relocation, or termination is the result of the completion of a
construction project, and the affected employees were hired with the
understanding that their employment was limited to the duration of the
construction project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An employer who fails to give notice as
required by section 2(1)(a) of this act before ordering a mass layoff,
relocation, or termination is liable to each employee entitled to
notice who lost his or her employment for:
(a) The value of wages at the average regular rate of compensation
received by the employee during the last three years of his or her
employment, or the employee's final rate of compensation, whichever is
higher; and
(b) The value of any benefits to which the employee would have been
entitled had his or her employment not been lost, including, but not
limited to: (i) The value of any pension, profit sharing, stock bonus,
stock purchase, and stock option plans; and (ii) the cost of any
medical expenses incurred by the employee that would have been covered
under an employee benefit plan.
(2) Liability under this section is calculated for the period of
the employer's violation, up to a maximum of sixty days, or one-half
the number of days that the employee was employed by the employer,
whichever period is smaller.
(3) The amount of an employer's liability under subsection (1) of
this section is reduced by the following:
(a) Any wages, except vacation moneys accrued prior to the period
of the employer's violation, paid by the employer to the employee
during the period of the employer's violation;
(b) Any voluntary and unconditional payments made by the employer
to the employee that were not required to satisfy any legal obligation;
and
(c) Any payments by the employer to a third party or trustee, such
as premiums for health benefits or payments to a defined contribution
pension plan, on behalf of and attributable to the employee for the
period of the violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An employer who fails to give notice as
required by section 2(1)(b) of this act is subject to a civil penalty
of not more than ten dollars per employee entitled to notice for each
day of the employer's violation. The employer is not subject to a
civil penalty under this section, however, if the employer pays to all
applicable employees the amounts for which the employer is liable under
section 4 of this act within three weeks from the date the employer
orders the mass layoff, relocation, or termination.
(2) Any civil penalties collected under this section shall be paid
into the unemployment trust fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department shall administer and
investigate violations of this chapter. In any investigation or
proceeding under this chapter, the director of the department has, in
addition to all other powers granted by law, the authority to examine
the books and records of an employer.
(2) The department shall adopt rules necessary to carry out this
act. The rules specifying the content of the notice required under
section 2 of this act shall be consistent with the rules specifying the
content of the notice required under the federal worker adjustment and
retraining act, 29 U.S.C. 2101 et seq.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A person, including a local government
or an employee representative, seeking to establish liability against
an employer may bring a civil action on behalf of the person, other
persons similarly situated, or both, in any court of competent
jurisdiction.
(2) If the court determines that an employer conducted a reasonable
investigation in good faith, and had reasonable grounds to believe that
its conduct was not a violation of this act, the court may reduce the
amount of any penalty imposed against the employer under this act.
(3) The court may award reasonable attorneys' fees as part of costs
to any plaintiff who prevails in a civil action brought under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Payments to a person under section 4 of this act may not be
construed as wages or used to deny or reduce benefits under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---