BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.370 and 1999 c 353 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for new buildings, major remodels, and major repair
projects, as defined in subsection (2) of this section, the contractor
shall use lives which reflect the estimated actual useful life of the
asset and which shall be no shorter than guideline lives as established
by the department. Lives shall be measured from the date on which the
assets were first used in the medical care program or from the date of
the most recent arm's-length acquisition of the asset, whichever is
more recent. In cases where RCW 74.46.360(6)(a) does apply, the
shortest life that may be used for buildings is the remaining useful
life under the prior contract. In all cases, lives shall be extended
to reflect periods, if any, when assets were not used in or as a
facility.
(2) Effective July 1, 1997, for asset acquisitions and new
facilities, major remodels, and major repair projects that begin
operations on or after July 1, 1997, the department shall use the most
current edition of Estimated Useful Lives of Depreciable Hospital
Assets, or as it may be renamed, published by the American Hospital
Publishing, Inc., an American hospital association company, for
determining the useful life of new buildings, major remodels, and major
repair projects, however, the shortest life that may be used for new
buildings receiving certificate of need approval or certificate of need
exemptions under chapter 70.38 RCW on or after July 1, 1999, is forty
years. The shortest life that may be used for new buildings receiving
certificate of need approval or certificate of need exemptions under
chapter 70.38 RCW on or after July 1, 2003, is thirty years. New
buildings, major remodels, and major repair projects include those
projects that meet or exceed the expenditure minimum established by the
department of health pursuant to chapter 70.38 RCW.
(3) Building improvements, other than major remodels and major
repairs, shall be depreciated over the remaining useful life of the
building, as modified by the improvement.
(4) Improvements to leased property which are the responsibility of
the contractor under the terms of the lease shall be depreciated over
the useful life of the improvement.
(5) A contractor may change the estimate of an asset's useful life
to a longer life for purposes of depreciation.
(6) For new or replacement building construction or for major
renovations, either of which receives certificate of need approval or
certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW on or after July
1, 1999, the number of years used to depreciate fixed equipment shall
be the same number of years as the life of the building to which it is
affixed.

--- END ---