BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) This chapter dictates the approval,
licensing, and playing of electronic scratch ticket games. The
legislature declares that the following groups may use the types of
electronic scratch ticket games, devices, and player terminals
authorized under this chapter: (a) Bona fide charitable or nonprofit
organizations conducting bingo games, raffles, amusement games, fund-raising events, punch boards, pull-tabs, and electronic scratch ticket
games; (b) persons, associations, or organizations operating a business
primarily engaged in the selling of food or drink for consumption on
the premises to conduct social card games and punch boards, pull-tabs,
and electronic scratch ticket games; (c) phase II house-banked card
rooms operating at least five house-banked card tables; and (d) class
1 horse racing facilities in operation for at least one year under
chapter 67.16 RCW.
(2) The legislature further declares that electronic scratch
tickets are a legal form of gambling in the state of Washington. This
chapter is intended to grant specific authority to the commission to
regulate, within its existing powers, electronic scratch ticket
gambling by private enterprise as narrowly defined within this chapter.
In addition, any game approved under RCW 9.46.360 is authorized to the
same extent and in the same manner as electronic scratch tickets are
regulated under this chapter. The legislature finds this chapter will
assist in job creation and retention. The legislature further finds
that this chapter is necessary for the immediate preservation of public
health and safety and the support of state government and its existing
public institutions as it is intended to generate revenue appropriated
in the 2003-2005 biennium. The state faces a more than two billion
dollar deficit from recession, slow economic recovery, and soaring
health care costs. Programs dependent upon the additional revenue
forecasted under this chapter provide for the health, education, and
welfare of the citizens of the state of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.46.010 and 1996 c 101 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The public policy of the state of Washington on gambling is to keep
the criminal element out of gambling and to promote the social welfare
of the people by limiting the nature and scope of gambling activities
and by strict regulation and control.
It is hereby declared to be the policy of the legislature,
recognizing the close relationship between professional gambling and
organized crime, to restrain all persons from seeking profit from
professional gambling activities in this state; to restrain all persons
from patronizing such professional gambling activities; to safeguard
the public against the evils induced by common gamblers and common
gambling houses engaged in professional gambling; and at the same time,
both to preserve the freedom of the press and to avoid restricting
participation by individuals in activities and social pastimes, which
activities and social pastimes are more for amusement rather than for
profit, do not maliciously affect the public, and do not breach the
peace.
The legislature further declares that the raising of funds for the
promotion of bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations is in the
public interest as is participation in such activities and social
pastimes as are hereinafter in this chapter authorized.
The legislature further declares that the conducting of bingo,
raffles, and amusement games and the operation of punch boards, pull-tabs, electronic scratch ticket games, card games, and other social
pastimes, when conducted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and
any rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto, are hereby
authorized, as are only such lotteries for which no valuable
consideration has been paid or agreed to be paid as hereinafter in this
chapter provided.
The legislature further declares that fishing derbies shall not
constitute any form of gambling and shall not be considered as a
lottery, a raffle, or an amusement game and shall not be subject to the
provisions of this chapter or any rules ((and regulations)) adopted
hereunder.
The legislature further declares that raffles authorized by the
fish and wildlife commission involving hunting big game animals or wild
turkeys shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter or any
rules ((and regulations)) adopted hereunder, with the exception of this
section and RCW 9.46.400.
All factors incident to the activities authorized in this chapter
shall be closely controlled, and the provisions of this chapter shall
be liberally construed to achieve such end.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this chapter apply throughout this chapter and
chapter 9.-- RCW (sections 1, 4, 5, and 9 through 15 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cashless transaction system" means the method by which a
player obtains, transfers, and redeems game play credits. The cashless
transaction system permits a player to play the electronic scratch
system without inserting cash, including coins, tokens or paper
currency, into, and to win prizes without receiving cash from, the
player terminal. A cashless transaction system includes the following
components:
(a) The electronic accounting system that contains one or more of
the following: Plastic, cardboard, magnetic, or smart cards; paper;
personal identification numbers; game play credits obtained from the
exchange of cash or cash equivalents; game play credits displayed on
the player terminal that were earned as prizes from prior play and not
redeemed; and other means for effectuating play and awarding prizes
without inserting or dispensing cash into or from the terminal if all
game play credits, other than credits earned from prior play and
remaining displayed on a player terminal, must have been paid for by
cash or cash equivalent;
(b) A means of accounting for player deposits of cash or cash
equivalents and exchanges for and redemption of game play credits that
is independent of the player terminal, through a player's account, a
voucher system, or a smart card or similar device for recording
individual player data; and
(c) A means by which players can redeem unused game play credits
for cash or cash equivalents, first by depositing credits into a player
account, a voucher system, or a smart card system or similar device for
recording individual player data, and then providing a means to
exchange such credits for cash or cash equivalents. All exchanges for
cash must be through a cashier or other separate redemption system.
(2) "Central accounting and auditing computer system" means a
computer system owned and operated by the commission that provides a
secure means to monitor, receive, store, and access data, and record
critical functions and activities of the player terminals.
(3) "Central computer" means a computer that conducts random
drawings for electronic scratch ticket games and stores and dispenses
electronic scratch tickets from scratch ticket subsets that have been
loaded into it from a manufacturing computer and are maintained in a
secure manner.
(4) "Commission" means the Washington state gambling commission.
(5) "Electronic scratch ticket" means a predetermined winning or
losing outcome in electronic form. Each scratch ticket represents a
chance from among the finite set of chances that comprise an electronic
scratch ticket game set.
(6) "Electronic scratch ticket game" means:
(a) A scratch ticket lottery game, together with its respective
operating system or systems, that is played in an electronic
environment. A game has a specific set of rules including: The theme
and types of symbols used; the total number of tickets in the game; the
ratio or mix of winning and losing tickets; the prize structure,
including number and dollar value of each prize; and price of a single
ticket. The game is played by use of computer hardware and software to
manufacture, store, distribute, sell, and display scratch tickets to
players;
(b) An electronic scratch ticket game includes: The licensed
systems that are connected to an electronic central accounting and
auditing computer system within the commission's control; a cashless
transaction system; player terminals with video displays that allow
players to purchase chances and obtain game result information; a
manufacturing computer that securely creates the finite set of chances
used in the scratch ticket portion of the system; and a central
computer containing an electronic accounting system. The electronic
scratch ticket game contains preexisting scratch tickets that are
dispensed in an electronic format to players through the player
terminals on an on-demand basis.
(7) "Electronic scratch ticket game set" means a finite set of
electronic scratch tickets that is based on a template, which number
cannot be limited by commission rule, that has been designed in
accordance with a specific set of rules, including the basic
requirements of game sets and subsets, governing the structure of an
electronic scratch ticket game. Based on that template, an electronic
scratch ticket game set is created in a manufacturing computer in a
secure and verifiable electronic form before the play of an electronic
scratch ticket game. Each electronic scratch ticket game set is
uniquely identifiable, by serial number or otherwise, so that it can be
distinguished from other game sets manufactured from the same template.
(8) "Electronic scratch ticket game subset" means a defined group
of electronic scratch tickets that has been randomly selected from an
electronic scratch ticket game set and transmitted to a central
computer in a fixed order for play. Each electronic scratch ticket
game subset is uniquely identifiable from all other subsets selected
from the same game set.
(9) "Game play credits" means the method of representing value
obtained from the exchange of cash or cash equivalents, or earned as a
prize, that is used to effectuate play. Game play credits may be
redeemed for cash or a cash equivalent.
(10) "Manufacturing computer" means a computer that creates
electronic scratch ticket game sets, randomly allocates tickets into
electronic scratch ticket game subsets, and delivers them to a central
computer.
(11) "Net win" means gross wagers received by a licensee from the
operation of an electronic scratch ticket game system less the amount
paid to players for winning wagers, the actual cost of merchandise
prizes awarded, accrual of prizes for progressive jackpot contests, and
repayment of amounts used to seed guaranteed progressive jackpot
prizes.
(12) "Player terminals" means electronic computer terminals housed
in cabinets with input devices and/or video screens and with which
players play the electronic scratch ticket games. Player terminals are
not capable of playing gambling games as stand-alone devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1)(a) All electronic scratch ticket
systems, games, and player terminals approved for operation by the
commission as a tribal lottery system under tribal-state class III
gaming compacts in the state may be put into use under this chapter by:
(i) Bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations conducting bingo
games, raffles, amusement games, fund-raising events, and using punch
boards, pull-tabs, and electronic scratch ticket games; (ii) persons,
associations, or organizations operating an established business
primarily engaged in the selling of food or drink for consumption on
the premises to conduct social card games and to use punch boards,
pull-tabs, and electronic scratch ticket games; (iii) phase II house-banked card rooms operating at least five house-banked card tables; and
(iv) class 1 horse racing facilities in operation for at least one year
under chapter 67.16 RCW. All computers and player terminals and the
combination and components thereof in each system shall conform to this
chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.
(b) Electronic scratch systems, games, and player terminals not
approved for operation by the commission under tribal-state class III
gaming compacts in the state may be put to use after approval is
obtained from the commission under the requirements of this chapter and
rules adopted under this chapter.
(2) The electronic scratch ticket game consists of a finite number
of electronic scratch tickets, a certain number of which, if drawn,
entitle a player to prize awards at various levels. The scratch
tickets are designed from a template in conformity with this chapter
and are created in game sets on a manufacturing computer from which
scratch tickets are randomly selected and placed into scratch ticket
subsets. Each game set has a predetermined number of winners and
values and is designed so as to assure players of an at least seventy-five percent payback of the amounts paid in the aggregate for all
tickets in the set. As a game set's tickets are placed into subsets,
the pool of tickets available from that game set for placement into
subsets diminishes, until each ticket in the game set has been placed
into a subset.
(3)(a) Electronic scratch ticket game subsets are transmitted to
the central computer, where they are stored until dispensed
electronically on demand to player terminals. Scratch tickets are
electronically dispensed from the central computer in the order within
each subset in which the tickets were received. Players compete
against each other to draw winning tickets. As subsets are used, they
are replaced by additional subsets that have been created and delivered
to the central computer in the same manner, until the game set has been
depleted, ending that particular game. Different games based on
different game sets may be offered simultaneously through the central
computer.
(b) Each game set shall meet the following minimum requirements:
(i) Each game set shall be made up of a finite number, that cannot
be limited by rule, of electronic scratch tickets;
(ii) All scratch tickets in a particular game set shall be of the
same purchase price, not to exceed five dollars, but a single ticket
may offer more than one opportunity to win a prize on the same wager;
(iii) The payout percentage for the entire game set shall be no
less than seventy-five percent of the total purchase price of all
tickets in the set combined;
(iv) Each game set shall be assigned a unique serial number; and
(v) Each ticket shall have a specific outcome and prize level
associated with it.
(4) A central accounting and auditing computer system shall monitor
the electronic scratch ticket games and their related systems. This
central accounting and auditing computer system shall:
(a) Be controlled, owned, and operated by the commission;
(b) Be connected to electronic scratch ticket systems operated by
licensees to communicate a licensee's electronic scratch ticket game
system information; and
(c) Be for the purpose of assuring the integrity, security,
honesty, and fairness in the operation and administration of electronic
scratch ticket games.
(5) The commission shall adopt rules defining the remaining
electronic scratch ticket system operating requirements including rules
regarding internal controls, software auditing, player terminals, the
standards for random number generators, accounting, security,
reporting, storage requirements, testing, and auditing of system
operations that shall be consistent with the provisions of Appendix X
as adopted under the most current tribal-state class III gaming compact
in Washington state.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.46.0311 and 1987 c 4 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby authorizes bona fide charitable or nonprofit
organizations to conduct bingo games, raffles, amusement games, and
fund-raising events, ((and)) to ((utilize)) use punch boards ((and)),
pull-tabs, and electronic scratch ticket games under chapter 9.-- RCW
(sections 1, 4, 5, and 9 through 15 of this act), and to allow their
premises and facilities to be used by only members, their guests, and
members of a chapter or unit organized under the same state, regional,
or national charter or constitution, to play social card games
authorized by the commission, when licensed, conducted, or operated
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and rules ((and
regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.46.0325 and 1987 c 4 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby authorizes any person, association, or
organization operating an established business primarily engaged in the
selling of food or drink for consumption on the premises to conduct
social card games and to ((utilize)) use punch boards ((and)), pull-tabs, and electronic scratch ticket games under chapter 9.-- RCW
(sections 1, 4, 5, and 9 through 15 of this act) as a commercial
stimulant to such business when licensed and utilized or operated
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and rules ((and
regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.46.070 and 2002 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one
year to bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations approved by the
commission meeting the requirements of this chapter and any rules ((and
regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto permitting said organizations to
conduct bingo games, raffles, amusement games, and social card games,
to ((utilize)) use punch boards ((and)), pull-tabs, and electronic
scratch ticket games under chapter 9.-- RCW (sections 1, 4, 5, and 9
through 15 of this act) in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter and any rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto, and
to revoke or suspend said licenses for violation of any provisions of
this chapter or any rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto:
PROVIDED, That the commission shall not deny a license to an otherwise
qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to be
issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission or director shall not
issue, deny, suspend, or revoke any license because of considerations
of race, sex, creed, color, or national origin: AND PROVIDED FURTHER,
That the commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or
suspend licenses subject to final action by the commission;
(2) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one
year to any person, association, or organization operating a business
primarily engaged in the selling of items of food or drink for
consumption on the premises, approved by the commission meeting the
requirements of this chapter and any rules ((and regulations)) adopted
pursuant thereto permitting said person, association, or organization
to ((utilize)) use punch boards ((and)), pull-tabs ((and)), and
electronic scratch ticket games under chapter 9.-- RCW (sections 1, 4,
5, and 9 through 15 of this act), to conduct social card games as a
commercial stimulant in accordance with the provisions of this chapter
and any rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto, and to
revoke or suspend said licenses for violation of any provisions of this
chapter and any rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto:
PROVIDED, That the commission shall not deny a license to an otherwise
qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to be
issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may authorize the
director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final
action by the commission;
(3) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one
year to any person, association, or organization approved by the
commission meeting the requirements of this chapter and meeting the
requirements of any rules ((and regulations)) adopted by the commission
pursuant to this chapter as now or hereafter amended, permitting said
person, association, or organization to conduct or operate amusement
games in such manner and at such locations as the commission may
determine;
(4) To authorize, require, and issue, for a period not to exceed
one year, such licenses as the commission may by rule provide, to any
person, association, or organization to engage in the selling,
distributing, or otherwise supplying or in the manufacturing of devices
for use within this state for those activities authorized by this
chapter;
(5) To establish a schedule of annual license fees for carrying on
specific gambling activities upon the premises, and for such other
activities as may be licensed by the commission, which fees shall
provide to the commission not less than an amount of money adequate to
cover all costs incurred by the commission relative to licensing under
this chapter and the enforcement by the commission of the provisions of
this chapter and rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto:
PROVIDED, That all licensing fees shall be submitted with an
application therefor and such portion of said fee as the commission may
determine, based upon its cost of processing and investigation, shall
be retained by the commission upon the withdrawal or denial of any such
license application as its reasonable expense for processing the
application and investigation into the granting thereof: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That if in a particular case the basic license fee established
by the commission for a particular class of license is less than the
commission's actual expenses to investigate that particular
application, the commission may at any time charge to that applicant
such additional fees as are necessary to pay the commission for those
costs. The commission may decline to proceed with its investigation
and no license shall be issued until the commission has been fully paid
therefor by the applicant: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission
may establish fees for the furnishing by it to licensees of
identification stamps to be affixed to such devices and equipment as
required by the commission and for such other special services or
programs required or offered by the commission, the amount of each of
these fees to be not less than is adequate to offset the cost to the
commission of the stamps and of administering their dispersal to
licensees or the cost of administering such other special services,
requirements or programs;
(6) To prescribe the manner and method of payment of taxes, fees
and penalties to be paid to or collected by the commission;
(7) To require that applications for all licenses contain such
information as may be required by the commission: PROVIDED, That all
persons (a) having a managerial or ownership interest in any gambling
activity, or the building in which any gambling activity occurs, or the
equipment to be used for any gambling activity, or (b) participating as
an employee in the operation of any gambling activity, shall be listed
on the application for the license and the applicant shall certify on
the application, under oath, that the persons named on the application
are all of the persons known to have an interest in any gambling
activity, building, or equipment by the person making such application:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission shall require fingerprinting and
national criminal history background checks on any persons seeking
licenses, certifications, or permits under this chapter or of any
person holding an interest in any gambling activity, building, or
equipment to be used therefor, or of any person participating as an
employee in the operation of any gambling activity. All national
criminal history background checks shall be conducted using
fingerprints submitted to the United States department of justice-
federal bureau of investigation. The commission must establish rules
to delineate which persons named on the application are subject to
national criminal history background checks. In identifying these
persons, the commission must take into consideration the nature,
character, size, and scope of the gambling activities requested by the
persons making such applications;
(8) To require that any license holder maintain records as directed
by the commission and submit such reports as the commission may deem
necessary;
(9) To require that all income from bingo games, raffles, and
amusement games be recorded and reported as established by rule ((or
regulation)) of the commission to the extent deemed necessary by
considering the scope and character of the gambling activity in such a
manner that will disclose gross income from any gambling activity,
amounts received from each player, the nature and value of prizes, and
the fact of distributions of such prizes to the winners thereof;
(10) To regulate and establish maximum limitations on income
derived from bingo. In establishing limitations pursuant to this
subsection the commission shall take into account (i) the nature,
character, and scope of the activities of the licensee; (ii) the source
of all other income of the licensee; and (iii) the percentage or extent
to which income derived from bingo is used for charitable, as
distinguished from nonprofit, purposes. However, the commission's
powers and duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not
mandatory;
(11) To regulate and establish the type and scope of and manner of
conducting the gambling activities authorized by this chapter,
including but not limited to, the extent of wager, money, or other
thing of value which may be wagered or contributed or won by a player
in any such activities;
(12) To regulate the collection of and the accounting for the fee
which may be imposed by an organization, corporation, or person
licensed to conduct a social card game on a person desiring to become
a player in a social card game in accordance with RCW 9.46.0282;
(13) To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of county, city,
and other local or state agencies in investigating any matter within
the scope of its duties and responsibilities;
(14) In accordance with RCW 9.46.080, to adopt such rules ((and
regulations)) as are deemed necessary to carry out the purposes and
provisions of this chapter. All rules ((and regulations)) shall be
adopted pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW;
(15) To set forth for the perusal of counties, city-counties,
cities and towns, model ordinances by which any legislative authority
thereof may enter into the taxing of any gambling activity authorized
by this chapter;
(16) To establish and regulate a maximum limit on salaries or wages
which may be paid to persons employed in connection with activities
conducted by bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations and
authorized by this chapter, where payment of such persons is allowed,
and to regulate and establish maximum limits for other expenses in
connection with such authorized activities, including but not limited
to rent or lease payments. However, the commissioner's powers and
duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not mandatory.
In establishing these maximum limits the commission shall take into
account the amount of income received, or expected to be received, from
the class of activities to which the limits will apply and the amount
of money the games could generate for authorized charitable or
nonprofit purposes absent such expenses. The commission may also take
into account, in its discretion, other factors, including but not
limited to, the local prevailing wage scale and whether charitable
purposes are benefited by the activities;
(17) To authorize, require, and issue for a period not to exceed
one year such licenses or permits, for which the commission may by rule
provide, to any person to work for any operator of any gambling
activity authorized by this chapter in connection with that activity,
or any manufacturer, supplier, or distributor of devices for those
activities in connection with such business. The commission shall not
require that persons working solely as volunteers in an authorized
activity conducted by a bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit
organization, who receive no compensation of any kind for any purpose
from that organization, and who have no managerial or supervisory
responsibility in connection with that activity, be licensed to do such
work. The commission may require that licensees employing such
unlicensed volunteers submit to the commission periodically a list of
the names, addresses, and dates of birth of the volunteers. If any
volunteer is not approved by the commission, the commission may require
that the licensee not allow that person to work in connection with the
licensed activity;
(18) To publish and make available at the office of the commission
or elsewhere to anyone requesting it a list of the commission
licensees, including the name, address, type of license, and license
number of each licensee;
(19) To establish guidelines for determining what constitutes
active membership in bona fide nonprofit or charitable organizations
for the purposes of this chapter; and
(20) To perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out
the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A state tax is imposed on the net win
from the sale of all electronic scratch ticket games and is set at
twenty percent. All proceeds from taxes collected under this section
shall be deposited in an account in the custody of the state treasurer.
Five percent of the proceeds from taxes collected under this section
will be allocated for problem gaming prevention, youth education,
public awareness, training, help-line services, and to the division of
alcohol and substance abuse in the department of social and health
services for treatment.
(2) A local tax is imposed on the net win from the sale of all
electronic scratch ticket games and is set at five percent. The
legislative authority of any county, city-county, city, or town, by
local law or ordinance, and in accordance with this chapter and rules
adopted under it, may provide for the collection of taxes generated
from electronic scratch ticket games' sales or may enter into an
agreement with the state for such collection.
(3) The department of revenue shall adopt rules to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Play of all electronic scratch ticket
games is restricted to players who are twenty-one years of age or
older.
(2) Placement of player terminals for electronic scratch ticket
games shall only be allowed on premises and in areas of premises
meeting the liquor control board's requirements for barrier and signage
as contained in WAC 314-02-050(1) as it exists on the effective date of
this act and: (a) Where the entire facility is not restricted to
persons of age twenty-one; (b) in areas of the premises designated as
off-limits and restricted to persons under the age of twenty-one; or
(c) in premises designated as off-limits to persons under the age of
twenty-one in their entirety.
(3) Duties of employees who are eighteen, nineteen, and twenty
shall comply with the provisions of chapter 66.44 RCW and the rules
adopted by the liquor control board under that chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The maximum number of electronic
scratch ticket game player terminals shall be determined as of January
1, 2003, for the initial allocation and January 1st of every year
thereafter for future allocations as set forth in section 12 of this
act and is set at the number authorized at any given time based upon
the cumulative number of electronic scratch ticket game player
terminals authorized under all current tribal-state class III gaming
compacts in the state. Of this maximum number, the following
distribution is established:
(a) Fifteen percent of the player terminals to the top forty gross
receipt bingo operations conducting bingo games, raffles, amusement
games, fund-raising events, or using punch boards or pull-tabs and
licensed as of January 1, 2003, with an established maximum number of
player terminals per location as set forth in section 12 of this act;
(b) Thirty-six percent of the player terminals to phase II house-banked card rooms operating at least five house-banked card tables and
class 1 horse racing facilities in operation for at least one year with
an established maximum number of player terminals per location as set
forth in section 12 of this act; and
(c) Forty-nine percent of the player terminals to: (i) Persons,
associations, or organizations primarily engaged in the selling of food
or drink for consumption on the premises conducting social card games
and using punch boards, pull-tabs, and electronic scratch ticket games;
and (ii) bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations conducting
bingo games, raffles, amusement games, fund-raising events, or using
punch boards or pull-tabs with an established maximum number of player
terminals per location as set forth in section 12 of this act.
(2) Electronic scratch ticket licensed locations under this chapter
shall not be licensed for player terminals under more than one of the
three categories described in section 12 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1)(a) The maximum number of player
terminals per licensed location shall be as follows:
(i) To the top forty gross receipt bingo operations, one hundred
twenty-five player terminals per location;
(ii) To phase II house-banked card rooms operating at least five
house-banked card tables and class 1 horse racing facilities in
operation for at least one year, one hundred twenty-five player
terminals per location;
(iii) To persons, associations, or organizations primarily engaged
in the selling of food or drink for consumption on the premises and
bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations conducting bingo games,
raffles, amusement games, and fund-raising events other than those in
(a)(i) of this subsection as follows:

ANNUAL GROSS
GAMBLING RECEIPTS MAXIMUM NUMBER OF
PLAYER TERMINALS
ALLOWED PER
LICENSED LOCATION

$0 - 200,000 4 (All licensees in this
license class shall be
guaranteed a minimum of 4
player terminals)

$200,001 - 300,000 5

$300,001 - 400,000 6

$400,001 - 500,000 7

$500,001 - 600,000 8

$600,001 - 700,000 10

$700,001 - 800,000 12

$800,001 - 1,000,000 14

$1,000,001 - 1,250,000 16

$1,250,001 - 2,000,000 18

$2,000,001 - 2,500,000 20

$2,500,001 - 3,000,000 22

$3,000,001 and up 24

(b) For purposes of the initial allocation of player terminals
under section 11(1) (a) and (b) of this act and (a)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection, the aggregate number of player terminals eligible for
allocation shall be determined by dividing equally the number of player
terminals available under section 11(1) (a) and (b) of this act and by
the number of eligible licenses within each category.
(c) For purposes of the initial allocation of player terminals to
licensees under section 11(1)(c) of this act and (a)(iii) of this
subsection, gross gambling receipts shall be calculated and determined
by the commission using a licensee's annual gross gambling receipts for
any active years of operation in 1999 through 2002. However, licensees
who operated for partial years or less than the full four years during
this period shall have their gross gambling receipts annualized and
calculated accordingly.
(2) For purposes of player terminal allocations after the initial
January 1, 2003, allocation, the aggregate number of player terminals
eligible to be allocated to individual licensees in each category
established in section 11 of this act shall be determined by the
commission on January 1st of every year by dividing equally amongst the
applications pending for new or additional player terminals before the
commission for allocation in the ensuing year by the number of player
terminals available under this act in each of the allocation pools
created in section 11(1) of this act. Each allocation pool consists of
those player terminals not allocated in previous years, forfeited
player terminals, plus additional player terminals, if any, that become
available as a result of new tribal-state compacts or by amendments to
tribal compacts. However, licensees that become eligible for player
terminals after January 1st of any given year may be awarded player
terminals by the commission only to the extent there are player
terminals available for allocation within the particular category.
Such a licensee may not receive more than the arithmetic average of
player terminals as determined by the commission on the immediately
preceding January 1st.
(3) Within each category established under section 11(1) of this
act, no licensee can be awarded more than the arithmetic average of all
the applications divided by the number of available player terminals
available in the allocation pool. Licensees shall be prioritized
within each category established under section 11(1) of this act for
review for new or additional player terminals under this section based
upon the effective date of their underlying gambling license issued by
the commission. Electronic scratch ticket game licensees within each
category established under section 11(1) of this act may continue to
request additional player terminals subject to the maximum number of
player terminals per licensed location established in this section.
(4) Applications shall not be accepted for electronic scratch
ticket game systems by the commission until a licensee has held another
gaming license issued under prior statutory authority and issued by the
commission for a period of six months.
(5) The commission shall adopt rules applicable to circumstances
where pending applications within each category established under
section 11(1) of this act request more player terminals than are
arithmetically available for allocation.
(6) Electronic scratch ticket licenses to be issued under this
chapter shall be issued by the commission unless there exists a
specific statutory requirement that specifically mandates the
commission approve the underlying license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Video and/or electronic surveillance is not
required by electronic scratch ticket game licensees unless electronic
scratch ticket player terminals are located on premises where the
commission requires surveillance as a condition of holding any other
license issued previously by the commission. This applies to all
electronic scratch ticket game licensees and licensed premises unless
the commission makes specific written findings and conclusions
warranting a deviation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) In order to be eligible for an
electronic scratch ticket license, the commission shall, at a minimum,
require the applicant to demonstrate that the applicant, applying for
a license under this chapter, has held another gaming license issued
under prior statutory authority and issued by the commission for a
period of six months before the effective date of an electronic scratch
ticket game system license.
(2) Electronic scratch ticket licensees may lease and/or revenue-share with persons or entities, including route operators,
distributors, and manufacturers licensed by the commission to engage in
such activity. Contracts between a route operator and a licensee shall
be in writing, signed by the parties, and submitted to the commission
before the installation of player terminals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Individual licensees may electronically
interconnect the player terminals on separate licensed locations.
However, there shall be no capacity for remote access or control of any
player terminal from a remote device without written commission
approval. All communications to and from the player terminals that
constitute a wide area network system shall be encrypted for security
purposes and coverage and shall comply with the encryption scheme of
the electronic accounting system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1, 4, 5, and 9 through 15 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 9 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---