BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Only the work in the electrical construction trade that,
pursuant to the department's routine practice, was subject to
licensing, certification, or inspection and permitting requirements as
of January 1, 1998, is subject to licensing requirements under RCW
19.28.091, certification requirements under RCW 19.28.161, and
inspection and permitting requirements under RCW 19.28.101. In any
proceeding involving a question of whether particular work was subject
to licensing, certification, or inspection and permitting requirements
as of January 1, 1998, the department has the burden of establishing
its routine practice as of that date with evidence in the form of
licenses, certificates, inspection records, or permits.
(2) All work other than the work specified in subsection (1) of
this section is exempt from licensing requirements under RCW 19.28.091,
certification requirements under RCW 19.28.161, and inspection and
permitting requirements under RCW 19.28.101.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.28.006 and 2002 c 249 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter.
(1) "Administrator" means a person designated by an electrical
contractor to supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance
with the rules adopted under this chapter.
(2) "Board" means the electrical board under RCW 19.28.311.
(3) "Chapter" or "subchapter" means the subchapter, if no chapter
number is referenced.
(4) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department or the
director's designee.
(6) "Electrical construction trade" ((includes but is not limited
to)) means installing or maintaining electrical wires and equipment
that are used for light, heat, or power and installing and maintaining
remote control, signaling, power limited, or communication circuits or
systems.
(7) "Electrical contractor" means a person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity that offers to undertake, undertakes,
submits a bid for, or does the work ((of installing or maintaining
wires or equipment that convey electrical current)) in the electrical
construction trade specified in section 1 of this act.
(8) "Equipment" means any equipment or apparatus that directly
uses, conducts, insulates, or is operated by electricity but does not
mean: Plug-in appliances; or plug-in equipment as determined by the
department by rule.
(9) "Industrial control panel" means a factory-wired or user-wired
assembly of industrial control equipment such as motor controllers,
switches, relays, power supplies, computers, cathode ray tubes,
transducers, and auxiliary devices. The panel may include disconnect
means and motor branch circuit protective devices.
(10) "Journeyman electrician" means a person who has been issued a
journeyman electrician certificate of competency by the department.
(11) "Master electrician" means either a master journeyman
electrician or master specialty electrician.
(12) "Master journeyman electrician" means a person who has been
issued a master journeyman electrician certificate of competency by the
department and who may be designated by an electrical contractor to
supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with rules
adopted under this chapter.
(13) "Master specialty electrician" means a person who has been
issued a specialty electrician certificate of competency by the
department and who may be designated by an electrical contractor to
supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with rules
adopted under this chapter.
(14) "Specialty electrician" means a person who has been issued a
specialty electrician certificate of competency by the department.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.28.010 and 2001 c 211 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((All wires and equipment, and installations thereof, that
convey electric current and installations of equipment to be operated
by electric current, in, on, or about buildings or structures)) Work in
the electric construction trade as specified in section 1 of this act,
except for telephone, telegraph, radio, and television wires and
equipment, and television antenna installations, signal strength
amplifiers, and coaxial installations pertaining thereto shall be in
strict conformity with this chapter, the statutes of the state of
Washington, and the rules issued by the department, and shall be in
conformity with approved methods of construction for safety to life and
property. All wires and equipment that fall within section 90.2(b)(5)
of the National Electrical Code, 1981 edition, are exempt from the
requirements of this chapter. The regulations and articles in the
National Electrical Code, the national electrical safety code, and
other installation and safety regulations approved by the national fire
protection association, as modified or supplemented by rules issued by
the department in furtherance of safety to life and property under
authority hereby granted, shall be prima facie evidence of the approved
methods of construction. ((All)) Materials, devices, appliances, and
equipment used in ((such installations)) work in the electrical
construction trade as specified in section 1 of this act shall be of a
type that conforms to applicable standards or be indicated as
acceptable by the established standards of any electrical product
testing laboratory which is accredited by the department. Industrial
control panels, utilization equipment, and their components do not need
to be listed, labeled, or otherwise indicated as acceptable by an
accredited electrical product testing laboratory unless specifically
required by the National Electrical Code, 1993 edition.
(2) Residential buildings or structures moved into or within a
county, city, or town are not required to comply with all of the
requirements of this chapter, if the original occupancy classification
of the building or structure is not changed as a result of the move.
This subsection shall not apply to residential buildings or structures
that are substantially remodeled or rehabilitated.
(3) This chapter shall not limit the authority or power of any city
or town to enact and enforce under authority given by law, any
ordinance, rule, or regulation requiring ((an equal, higher, or
better)) the same standards of construction and ((an equal, higher, or
better standard)) of materials, devices, appliances, and equipment
((than that)) as is required by this chapter. A city or town shall
require that its electrical inspectors meet the qualifications provided
for state electrical inspectors in accordance with RCW 19.28.321. In
a city or town having ((an equal, higher, or better)) the same
standards, the installations, materials, devices, appliances, and
equipment shall be in accordance with the ordinance, rule, or
regulation of the city or town. Electrical equipment associated with
spas, hot tubs, swimming pools, and hydromassage bathtubs shall not be
offered for sale or exchange unless the electrical equipment is
certified as being in compliance with the applicable product safety
standard by bearing the certification mark of an approved electrical
products testing laboratory.
(4) Nothing in this chapter may be construed as permitting the
connection of any conductor of any electric circuit with a pipe that is
connected with or designed to be connected with a waterworks piping
system, without the consent of the person or persons legally
responsible for the operation and maintenance of the waterworks piping
system.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.28.021 and 2000 c 171 s 46 are each amended to read
as follows:
Disputes arising under RCW 19.28.010(3) regarding whether the city
or town's electrical rules, regulations, or ordinances are ((equal to))
the same as the rules adopted by the department shall be resolved by
arbitration. The department shall appoint two members of the board to
serve on the arbitration panel, and the city or town shall appoint two
persons to serve on the arbitration panel. These four persons shall
choose a fifth person to serve. If the four persons cannot agree on a
fifth person, the presiding judge of the superior court of the county
in which the city or town is located shall choose a fifth person. A
decision of the arbitration panel may be appealed to the superior court
of the county in which the city or town is located within thirty days
after the date the panel issues its final decision.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.28.041 and 2002 c 249 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity to engage in, conduct, or carry on the business of
((installing or maintaining wires or equipment to convey electric
current, or installing or maintaining equipment to be operated by
electric current as it pertains to the electrical industry,))
performing work in the electrical construction trade as specified in
section 1 of this act without having an unrevoked, unsuspended, and
unexpired electrical contractor license, issued by the department in
accordance with this chapter. All electrical contractor licenses
expire twenty-four calendar months following the day of their issue.
The department may issue an electrical contractors license for a period
of less than twenty-four months only for the purpose of equalizing the
number of electrical contractor licenses that expire each month.
Application for an electrical contractor license shall be made in
writing to the department, accompanied by the required fee. The
application shall state:
(a) The name and address of the applicant; in case of firms or
partnerships, the names of the individuals composing the firm or
partnership; in case of corporations, the names of the managing
officials thereof;
(b) The location of the place of business of the applicant and the
name under which the business is conducted;
(c) Employer social security number;
(d) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's
employees working in Washington, as follows:
(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by
the department;
(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department;
or
(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law;
(e) Employment security department number;
(f) State excise tax registration number;
(g) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (d) of this subsection if
the applicant will not employ employees in Washington, and by (e) and
(f) of this subsection; and
(h) Whether a general or specialty electrical contractor license is
sought and, if the latter, the type of specialty. Electrical
contractor specialties ((include, but)) are ((not limited to)):
Residential, pump and irrigation, limited energy system, signs,
nonresidential maintenance, ((restricted nonresidential maintenance,
appliance repair,)) and a combination specialty. A general electrical
contractor license shall grant to the holder the right to engage in,
conduct, or carry on the business of ((installing or maintaining wires
or equipment to carry electric current, and installing or maintaining
equipment, or installing or maintaining material to fasten or insulate
such wires or equipment to be operated by electric current, in the
state of Washington)) performing work in the electric construction
trade as specified in section 1 of this act. A specialty electrical
contractor license shall grant to the holder a limited right to engage
in, conduct, or carry on the business of ((installing or maintaining
wires or equipment to carry electrical current, and installing or
maintaining equipment; or installing or maintaining material to fasten
or insulate such wires or equipment to be operated by electric current
in the state of Washington as expressly allowed by the license))
performing work in the electric construction trade as specified in
section 1 of this act.
(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(d) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(3) The application for an electrical contractor license shall be
accompanied by a bond in the sum of four thousand dollars with the
state of Washington named as obligee in the bond, with good and
sufficient surety, to be approved by the department. The bond shall at
all times be kept in full force and effect, and any cancellation or
revocation thereof, or withdrawal of the surety therefrom, suspends the
license issued to the principal until a new bond has been filed and
approved as provided in this section. Upon approval of a bond, the
department shall on the next business day deposit the fee accompanying
the application in the electrical license fund and shall file the bond
in the office. The department shall upon request furnish to any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity a certified
copy of the bond upon the payment of a fee that the department shall
set by rule. The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of furnishing
the certified copy. The bond shall be conditioned that in any
installation or maintenance of wires or equipment to convey electrical
current, and equipment to be operated by electrical current, the
principal will comply with the provisions of this chapter and with any
electrical ordinance, building code, or regulation of a city or town
adopted pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3) that is in effect at the time of
entering into a contract. The bond shall be conditioned further that
the principal will pay for all labor, including employee benefits, and
material furnished or used upon the work, taxes and contributions to
the state of Washington, and all damages that may be sustained by any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity due to a
failure of the principal to make the installation or maintenance in
accordance with this chapter or any applicable ordinance, building
code, or regulation of a city or town adopted pursuant to RCW
19.28.010(3). In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the
license applicant may file with the department a cash deposit or other
negotiable security acceptable to the department. If the license
applicant has filed a cash deposit, the department shall deposit the
funds in a special trust savings account in a commercial bank, mutual
savings bank, or savings and loan association and shall pay annually to
the depositor the interest derived from the account.
(4) The department shall issue general or specialty electrical
contractor licenses to applicants meeting all of the requirements of
this chapter. The provisions of this chapter relating to the licensing
of any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
including the requirement of a bond with the state of Washington named
as obligee therein and the collection of a fee therefor, are exclusive,
and no political subdivision of the state of Washington may require or
issue any licenses or bonds or charge any fee for the same or a similar
purpose. No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
holding more than one specialty contractor license under this chapter
may be required to pay an annual fee for more than one such license or
to post more than one four thousand dollar bond, equivalent cash
deposit, or other negotiable security.
(5) To obtain a general or specialty electrical contractor license
the applicant must designate an individual who currently possesses a
valid master journeyman electrician's certificate of competency, master
specialty electrician's certificate of competency in the specialty for
which application has been made, or administrator's certificate as a
general electrical contractor administrator or as a specialty
electrical contractor administrator in the specialty for which
application has been made.
(6) Administrator certificate specialties ((include but)) are ((not
limited to)): Residential, pump and irrigation, limited energy system,
signs, nonresidential maintenance, ((restricted nonresidential
maintenance, appliance repair,)) and combination specialty. To obtain
an administrator's certificate an individual must pass an examination
as set forth in RCW 19.28.051 unless the applicant was a licensed
electrical contractor at any time during 1974. Applicants who were
electrical contractors licensed by the state of Washington at any time
during 1974 are entitled to receive a general electrical contractor
administrator's certificate without examination if the applicants apply
prior to January 1, 1984. The board of electrical examiners shall
certify to the department the names of all persons who are entitled to
either a general or specialty electrical contractor administrator's
certificate.

Sec. 6 RCW 19.28.051 and 2001 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the purpose and function of the board to establish((,
in addition to a general electrical contractors' license, such
classifications of specialty electrical contractors' licenses as it
deems appropriate with regard to individual sections pertaining to
state adopted codes in this chapter. In addition, it shall be the
purpose and function of the board to establish)) and administer written
examinations for general electrical administrators' certificates and
the various specialty electrical administrators' certificates.
Examinations shall be designed to reasonably ((insure)) ensure that
general and specialty electrical administrators' certificate holders
are competent to engage in and supervise the work covered by this
((statute)) chapter and their respective licenses. The examinations
shall include questions from the following categories to assure proper
safety and protection for the general public: (1) Safety, (2) state
electrical code, and (3) electrical theory. The department with the
consent of the board shall be permitted to enter into a contract with
a professional testing agency to develop, administer, and score these
examinations. The fee for the examination may be set by the department
in its contract with the professional testing agency. The department
may direct that the applicant pay the fee to the professional testing
agency. The fee shall cover but not exceed the costs of preparing and
administering the examination. It shall be the further purpose and
function of this board to advise the director as to the need of
additional electrical inspectors and compliance officers to be utilized
by the director on either a full-time or part-time employment basis and
to carry out the duties enumerated in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271
as well as generally advise the department on all matters relative to
RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.28.081 and 1986 c 156 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person, firm, or corporation engaging in, conducting, or
carrying on the business of ((installing wires or equipment to convey
electric current, or installing apparatus to be operated by said
current,)) performing work in the electrical construction trade as
specified in section 1 of this act shall be entitled to commence or
maintain any suit or action in any court of this state pertaining to
any such work or business, without alleging and proving that such
person, firm, or corporation held, at the time of commencing and
performing such work, an unexpired, unrevoked, and unsuspended license
issued under the provisions of this chapter; and no city or town
requiring by ordinance or regulation a permit for inspection or
installation of such electrical work, shall issue such permit to any
person, firm, or corporation not holding such license.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.28.091 and 2001 c 211 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All work other than the work specified in section 1(1) of this
act is exempt from licensing requirements under this chapter.
(2) The specific exemptions set forth in this subsection (2) are in
addition to the general exemption set forth in section 1(2) of this act
and subsection (1) of this section.
(a) No license under the provision of this chapter shall be
required from any utility or any person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity employed by a utility because of work in
connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of lines,
wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by or under the control of a
utility and used for transmission or distribution of electricity from
the source of supply to the point of contact at the premises and/or
property to be supplied and service connections and meters and other
apparatus or appliances used in the measurement of the consumption of
electricity by the customer.
(((2))) (b) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall
be required from any utility because of work in connection with the
installation, repair, or maintenance of the following:
(((a))) (i) Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment used in the
lighting of streets, alleys, ways, or public areas or squares;
(((b))) (ii) Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by a
commercial, industrial, or public institution customer that are an
integral part of a transmission or distribution system, either overhead
or underground, providing service to such customer and located outside
the building or structure: PROVIDED, That a utility does not initiate
the sale of services to perform such work;
(((c))) (iii) Lines and wires, together with ancillary apparatus,
and equipment, owned by a customer that is an independent power
producer who has entered into an agreement for the sale of electricity
to a utility and that are used in transmitting electricity from an
electrical generating unit located on premises used by such customer to
the point of interconnection with the utility's system.
(((3))) (c) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity licensed under RCW 19.28.041 may enter into a contract with a
utility for the performance of work under ((subsection (2) of this
section)) (b) of this subsection.
(((4))) (d) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall
be required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity because of the work of installing and repairing ignition or
lighting systems for motor vehicles.
(((5))) (e) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall
be required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity because of work in connection with the installation, repair, or
maintenance of wires and equipment, and installations thereof, exempted
in RCW 19.28.010.
(((6) The department may by rule exempt from licensing requirements
under this chapter)) (f) No license under the provisions of this
chapter is required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or
other entity because of work performed on premanufactured electric
power generation equipment assemblies and control gear involving the
testing, repair, modification, maintenance, or installation of
components internal to the power generation equipment, the control
gear, or the transfer switch.

Sec. 9 RCW 19.28.101 and 1996 c 241 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall cause an inspector to inspect ((all wiring,
appliances, devices, and equipment to which this chapter applies)) work
in the electrical construction trade as specified in section 1 of this
act. Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed as providing
any authority for any subdivision of government to adopt by ordinance
any provisions contained or provided for in this chapter except those
pertaining to cities and towns pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3).
(2) Upon request, electrical inspections will be made by the
department within forty-eight hours, excluding holidays, Saturdays, and
Sundays. If, upon written request, the electrical inspector fails to
make an electrical inspection within twenty-four hours, the serving
utility may immediately connect electrical power to the installation if
the necessary electrical work permit is displayed: PROVIDED, That if
the request is for an electrical inspection that relates to a mobile
home installation, the applicant shall provide proof of a current
building permit issued by the local government agency authorized to
issue such permits as a prerequisite for inspection approval or
connection of electrical power to the mobile home.
(3) Whenever the installation of any wiring, device, appliance, or
equipment is not in accordance with this chapter, or is in such a
condition as to be dangerous to life or property, the person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity owning, using, or operating
it shall be notified by the department and shall within fifteen days,
or such further reasonable time as may upon request be granted, make
such repairs and changes as are required to remove the danger to life
or property and to make it conform to this chapter. The director,
through the inspector, is hereby empowered to disconnect or order the
discontinuance of electrical service to conductors or equipment that
are found to be in a dangerous or unsafe condition and not in
accordance with this chapter. Upon making a disconnection the
inspector shall attach a notice stating that the conductors have been
found dangerous to life or property and are not in accordance with this
chapter. It is unlawful for any person to reconnect such defective
conductors or equipment without the approval of the department, and
until the conductors and equipment have been placed in a safe and
secure condition, and in a condition that complies with this chapter.
(4) The director, through the electrical inspector, has the right
during reasonable hours to enter into and upon any building or premises
in the discharge of his or her official duties for the purpose of
making any inspection or test of the installation of new construction
or altered electrical wiring, electrical devices, equipment, or
material contained in or on the buildings or premises. No electrical
wiring or equipment subject to this chapter may be concealed until it
has been approved by the inspector making the inspection. At the time
of the inspection, electrical wiring or equipment subject to this
chapter must be sufficiently accessible to permit the inspector to
employ any testing methods that will verify conformance with the
national electrical code and any other requirements of this chapter.
(5) Persons, firms, partnerships, corporations, or other entities
making electrical installations shall obtain inspection and approval
from an authorized representative of the department as required by this
chapter before requesting the electric utility to connect to the
installations. Electric utilities may connect to the installations if
approval is clearly indicated by certification of the electrical work
permit required to be affixed to each installation or by equivalent
means, except that increased or relocated services may be reconnected
immediately at the discretion of the utility before approval if an
electrical work permit is displayed. The permits shall be furnished
upon payment of the fee to the department.
(6) The director, subject to the recommendations and approval of
the board, shall set by rule a schedule of license and electrical work
permit fees that will cover the costs of administration and enforcement
of this chapter. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. No fee may be charged
for plug-in mobile homes, recreational vehicles, or portable
appliances.
(7) Nothing in this chapter shall authorize the inspection of any
wiring, appliance, device, or equipment, or installations thereof, by
any utility or by any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity employed by a utility in connection with the installation,
repair, or maintenance of lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned
by or under the control of the utility. All work covered by the
national electric code not exempted by the 1981 edition of the national
electric code 90-2(B)(5) shall be inspected by the department.

Sec. 10 RCW 19.28.141 and 2001 c 211 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of RCW 19.28.101 shall not apply:
(1) Within the corporate limits of any incorporated city or town
which has heretofore adopted and enforced or subsequently adopts and
enforces an ordinance requiring ((an equal, higher or better)) the same
standards of construction and of materials, devices, appliances and
equipment ((than)) as is required by this chapter.
(2) Within the service area of an electricity supply agency owned
and operated by a city or town which is supplying electricity and
enforcing a standard of construction and materials outside its
corporate limits at the time this act takes effect: PROVIDED, That
such city, town or agency shall henceforth enforce by inspection within
its service area outside its corporate limits the same standards of
construction and of materials, devices, appliances and equipment as is
enforced by the department of labor and industries under the authority
of this chapter: PROVIDED FURTHER, That fees charged henceforth in
connection with such enforcement shall not exceed those established in
RCW 19.28.101.
(3) Within the rights of way of state highways, provided the state
department of transportation maintains and enforces ((an equal, higher
or better)) the same standards of construction and of materials,
devices, appliances and equipment ((than)) as is required by RCW
19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361.

Sec. 11 RCW 19.28.151 and 2001 c 211 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All work other than the work specified in section 1(1) of this
act is exempt from licensing requirements under RCW 19.28.091,
certification requirements under RCW 19.28.161, and inspection and
permitting requirements under RCW 19.28.101.
(2) The specific exemptions set forth in this subsection (2) are in
addition to the general exemption set forth in section 1(2) of this act
and subsection (1) of this section. The provisions of RCW 19.28.010
through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361 shall not apply to
the work of installing, maintaining, or repairing any and all
electrical wires, apparatus, installations, or equipment used or to be
used by a telegraph company or a telephone company in the exercise of
its functions and located outdoors or in a building or buildings used
exclusively for that purpose.

Sec. 12 RCW 19.28.161 and 2002 c 249 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may engage in the electrical construction trade as
specified in section 1 of this act without having a valid master
journeyman electrician certificate of competency, journeyman
electrician certificate of competency, master specialty electrician
certificate of competency, or specialty electrician certificate of
competency issued by the department in accordance with this chapter.
Electrician certificate of competency specialties ((include, but)) are
((not limited to)): Residential, pump and irrigation, limited energy
system, signs, and nonresidential maintenance((, restricted
nonresidential maintenance, and appliance repair)).
(2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical construction trade
or who is learning the electrical construction trade may work in the
electrical construction trade if supervised by a certified master
journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty
electrician in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
in that electrician's specialty. All apprentices and individuals
learning the electrical construction trade shall obtain an electrical
training certificate from the department. The certificate shall
authorize the holder to learn the electrical construction trade while
under the direct supervision of a master journeyman electrician,
journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty. The holder of the electrical training
certificate shall renew the certificate biennially. At the time of
renewal, the holder shall provide the department with an accurate list
of the holder's employers in the electrical construction industry for
the previous biennial period and the number of hours worked for each
employer. A biennial fee shall be charged for the issuance or renewal
of the certificate. The department shall set the fee by rule. The fee
shall cover but not exceed the cost of administering and enforcing the
trainee certification and supervision requirements of this chapter.
Apprentices and individuals learning the electrical construction trade
shall have their electrical training certificates in their possession
at all times that they are performing electrical work. They shall show
their certificates to an authorized representative of the department at
the representative's request.
(3) Any person who has been issued an electrical training
certificate under this chapter may work if that person is under
supervision. Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same
job site and under the control of either a certified master journeyman
electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty. Either a certified master
journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty shall be on the
same job site as the noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each working day unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(4) The ratio of noncertified individuals to certified master
journeymen electricians, journeymen electricians, master specialty
electricians, or specialty electricians on any one job site is as
follows:
(a) When working as a specialty electrician, not more than two
noncertified individuals for every certified master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, master journeyman
electrician, or journeyman electrician, except that the ratio
requirements are one certified master specialty electrician working in
that electrician's specialty, specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, master journeyman electrician, or journeyman
electrician working as a specialty electrician to no more than four
students enrolled in and working as part of an electrical construction
program at public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit
nationally accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the work
force training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10
RCW. In meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in an
electrical construction program at a trade school, a trade school may
receive input and advice from the electrical board; and
(b) When working as a journeyman electrician, not more than one
noncertified individual for every certified master journeyman
electrician or journeyman electrician, except that the ratio
requirements shall be one certified master journeyman electrician or
journeyman electrician to no more than four students enrolled in and
working as part of an electrical construction program at public
community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the work force
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW. In
meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in an electrical
construction program at a trade school, a trade school may receive
input and advice from the electrical board.
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in an electrical construction program at
public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade schools licensed by the work force
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may
work without direct on-site supervision during the last six months of
meeting the practical experience requirements of this chapter.
(5) ((For the residential (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(a)),
pump and irrigation (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(b)(i)), sign
(as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(c)), limited energy (as specified
in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(e)(i)), nonresidential maintenance (as specified
in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(f)(i)), restricted nonresidential maintenance as
determined by the department in rule, or other new nonresidential
specialties, not including appliance repair, as determined by the
department in rule, either a master journeyman electrician, journeyman
electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's
specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's
specialty must be on the same job site as the noncertified individual
for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each working day. Other
specialties must meet the requirements specified in RCW
19.28.191(1)(f)(ii).)) When the ratio of certified electricians to
noncertified individuals on a job site is one certified electrician to
three or four noncertified individuals, the certified electrician must:
(a) Directly supervise and instruct the noncertified individuals
and the certified electrician may not directly make or engage in an
electrical installation; and
(b) Be on the same job site as the noncertified individual for a
minimum of one hundred percent of each working day.
(6) The electrical contractor shall accurately verify and attest to
the electrical trainee hours worked by electrical trainees on behalf of
the electrical contractor.

Sec. 13 RCW 19.28.191 and 2002 c 249 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the application, the department shall review
the application and determine whether the applicant is eligible to take
an examination for the master journeyman electrician, journeyman
electrician, master specialty electrician, or specialty electrician
certificate of competency.
(a) Before July 1, 2005, an applicant who possesses a valid
journeyman electrician certificate of competency in effect for the
previous four years and a valid general administrator's certificate may
apply for a master journeyman electrician certificate of competency
without examination.
(b) Before July 1, 2005, an applicant who possesses a valid
specialty electrician certificate of competency, in the specialty
applied for, for the previous two years and a valid specialty
administrator's certificate, in the specialty applied for, may apply
for a master specialty electrician certificate of competency without
examination.
(c) To be eligible to take the examination for a master journeyman
electrician certificate of competency the applicant must have possessed
a valid journeyman electrician certificate of competency for four
years.
(d) To be eligible to take the examination for a master specialty
electrician certificate of competency the applicant must have possessed
a valid specialty electrician certificate of competency, in the
specialty applied for, for two years.
(e) To be eligible to take the examination for a journeyman
certificate of competency the applicant must have:
(i) Worked in the electrical construction trade for a minimum of
eight thousand hours, of which four thousand hours shall be in
industrial or commercial electrical installation under the supervision
of a master journeyman electrician or journeyman electrician and not
more than a total of four thousand hours in all specialties under the
supervision of a master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician,
master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty,
or specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty((.
Speciality electricians with less than a four thousand hour work
experience requirement cannot credit the time required to obtain that
specialty towards qualifying to become a journeyman electrician)); or
(ii) Successfully completed an apprenticeship program approved
under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical construction trade.
(f) To be eligible to take the examination for a specialty
electrician certificate of competency the applicant must have:
(i) Worked ((in the residential (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(a)), pump and irrigation (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(b)(i)), sign (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(c)), limited
energy (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(e)(i)), nonresidential
maintenance (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(f)(i)), restricted
nonresidential maintenance as determined by the department in rule, or
other new nonresidential specialties as determined by the department in
rule)) under the supervision of a master journeyman electrician,
journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty for a minimum of four thousand hours; or
(ii) ((Worked in the appliance repair specialty as determined by
the department in rule or a specialty other than the designated
specialties in (f)(i) of this subsection for a minimum of the initial
ninety days, or longer if set by rule by the department. The initial
period must be spent under one hundred percent supervision of a master
journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty. After this
initial period, a person may take the specialty examination. If the
person passes the examination, the person may work unsupervised for the
balance of the minimum hours required for certification. A person may
not be certified as a specialty electrician in the appliance repair
specialty or in a specialty other than the designated specialities in
(f)(i) of this subsection, however, until the person has worked a
minimum of two thousand hours in that specialty, or longer if set by
rule by the department; or
(iii))) Successfully completed an approved apprenticeship program
under chapter 49.04 RCW for the applicant's specialty in the electrical
construction trade.
(g) Any applicant for a journeyman electrician certificate of
competency who has successfully completed a two-year program in the
electrical construction trade at public community or technical
colleges, or not-for-profit nationally accredited technical or trade
schools licensed by the work force training and education coordinating
board under chapter 28C.10 RCW may substitute up to two years of the
technical or trade school program for two years of work experience
under a master journeyman electrician or journeyman electrician. The
applicant shall obtain the additional two years of work experience
required in industrial or commercial electrical installation prior to
the beginning, or after the completion, of the technical school
program. Any applicant who has received training in the electrical
construction trade in the armed service of the United States may be
eligible to apply armed service work experience towards qualification
to take the examination for the journeyman electrician certificate of
competency.
(h) An applicant for a specialty electrician certificate of
competency who, after January 1, 2000, has successfully completed a
two-year program in the electrical construction trade at a public
community or technical college, or a not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade school licensed by the work force
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may
substitute up to one year of the technical or trade school program for
one year of work experience under a master journeyman electrician,
journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty. Any applicant who has received training in
the electrical construction trade in the armed services of the United
States may be eligible to apply armed service work experience towards
qualification to take the examination for an appropriate specialty
electrician certificate of competency.
(i) The department must determine whether hours of training and
experience in the armed services or school program are in the
electrical construction trade and appropriate as a substitute for hours
of work experience. The department must use the following criteria for
evaluating the equivalence of classroom electrical training programs
and work in the electrical construction trade:
(i) A two-year electrical training program must consist of three
thousand or more hours.
(ii) In a two-year electrical training program, a minimum of two
thousand four hundred hours of student/instructor contact time must be
technical electrical instruction directly related to the scope of work
of the electrical specialty. Student/instructor contact time includes
lecture and in-school lab.
(iii) The department may not allow credit for a program that
accepts more than one thousand hours transferred from another school's
program.
(iv) Electrical specialty training school programs of less than two
years will have all of the above student/instructor contact time hours
proportionately reduced. Such programs may not apply to more than
fifty percent of the work experience required to attain certification.
(v) Electrical training programs of less than two years may not be
credited towards qualification for journeyman electrician unless the
training program is used to gain qualification for a four thousand hour
electrical specialty.
(j) No other requirement for eligibility may be imposed.
(2) The department shall establish reasonable rules for the
examinations to be given applicants for certificates of competency. In
establishing the rules, the department shall consult with the board.
Upon determination that the applicant is eligible to take the
examination, the department shall so notify the applicant, indicating
the time and place for taking the examination.
(3) No noncertified individual may work unsupervised more than one
year beyond the date when the trainee would be eligible to test for a
certificate of competency if working on a full-time basis after
original application for the trainee certificate. For the purposes of
this section, full-time basis means two thousand hours.

Sec. 14 RCW 19.28.261 and 2001 c 211 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All work other than the work specified in section 1(1) of this
act is exempt from licensing and certification requirements under this
chapter.
(2) The specific exemptions set forth in this subsection (2) are in
addition to the general exemption set forth in section 1(2) of this act
and subsection (1) of this section.
(a) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed
to require that a person obtain a license or a certified electrician in
order to do electrical work at his or her residence or farm or place of
business or on other property owned by him or her unless the electrical
work is on the construction of a new building intended for rent, sale,
or lease. However, if the construction is of a new residential
building with up to four units intended for rent, sale, or lease, the
owner may receive an exemption from the requirement to obtain a license
or use a certified electrician if he or she provides a signed affidavit
to the department stating that he or she will be performing the work
and will occupy one of the units as his or her principal residence.
The owner shall apply to the department for this exemption and may only
receive an exemption once every twenty-four months. It is intended
that the owner receiving this exemption shall occupy the unit as his or
her principal residence for twenty-four months after completion of the
units.
(b) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be intended to
derogate from or dispense with the requirements of any valid electrical
code enacted by a city or town pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3), except
that no code shall require the holder of a certificate of competency to
demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain any other
license or pay any fee in order to engage in the electrical
construction trade.
(c) RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to common
carriers subject to Part I of the Interstate Commerce Act, nor to their
officers and employees.
(d) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be deemed to
apply to the installation or maintenance of telephone, telegraph,
radio, or television wires and equipment; nor to any electrical utility
or its employees in the installation, repair, and maintenance of
electrical wiring, circuits, and equipment by or for the utility, or
comprising a part of its plants, lines or systems.
(e) The licensing provisions of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271
shall not apply to:
(((1))) (i) Persons making electrical installations on their own
property or to regularly employed employees working on the premises of
their employer, unless the electrical work is on the construction of a
new building intended for rent, sale, or lease;
(((2))) (ii) Employees of an employer while the employer is
performing utility type work of the nature described in RCW 19.28.091
so long as such employees have registered in the state of Washington
with or graduated from a state-approved outside lineman apprenticeship
course that is recognized by the department and that qualifies a person
to perform such work; or
(((3))) (iii) Any work exempted under RCW 19.28.091(((6))) (2)(f).
(f) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed
to restrict the right of any householder to assist or receive
assistance from a friend, neighbor, relative or other person when none
of the individuals doing the electrical installation hold themselves
out as engaged in the trade or business of electrical installations.
(g) Nothing precludes any person who is exempt from the licensing
requirements of this chapter under this section from obtaining a
journeyman or specialty certificate of competency if they otherwise
meet the requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 15 RCW 19.28.271 and 2001 c 211 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity to employ an individual for purposes of RCW 19.28.161
through 19.28.271 who has not been issued a certificate of competency
or a training certificate. It is unlawful for any individual to engage
in the electrical construction trade ((or to maintain or install any
electrical equipment or conductors)) as specified in section 1 of this
act without having in his or her possession a certificate of competency
or a training certificate under RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271. Any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity found in
violation of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be assessed a
penalty of not less than fifty dollars or more than five hundred
dollars. The department shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for
violating RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271. An appeal may be made to
the board as is provided in RCW 19.28.131. The appeal shall be filed
within twenty days after the notice of the penalty is given to the
assessed party by certified mail, return receipt requested, sent to the
last known address of the assessed party and shall be made by filing a
written notice of appeal with the department. Any equipment maintained
or installed by any person who does not possess a certificate of
competency under RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not receive an
electrical work permit and electrical service shall not be connected or
maintained to operate the equipment. Each day that a person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity violates RCW 19.28.161
through 19.28.271 is a separate violation.
(2) A civil penalty shall be collected in a civil action brought by
the attorney general in the county wherein the alleged violation arose
at the request of the department if any of RCW 19.28.161 through
19.28.271 or any rules adopted under RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271
are violated.

Sec. 16 RCW 19.28.311 and 2000 c 238 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created an electrical board, consisting of
((fourteen)) eleven members to be appointed by the governor with the
advice of the director of labor and industries as herein provided. It
shall be the purpose and function of the board to advise the director
on all matters pertaining to the enforcement of this chapter including,
but not limited to standards of electrical ((and telecommunications))
installation, minimum inspection procedures, and the adoption of rules
pertaining to the electrical inspection division: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That no rules shall be amended or repealed until the electrical board
has first had an opportunity to consider any proposed amendments or
repeals and had an opportunity to make recommendations to the director
relative thereto. The members of the electrical board shall be
selected and appointed as follows: One member shall be an employee or
officer of a corporation or public agency generating or distributing
electric power; ((one member must be an employee or officer of a
facilities-based telecommunications service provider regulated by the
Washington state utilities and transportation commission;)) three
members shall be licensed electrical contractors: PROVIDED, That one
of these members may be a representative of a trade association in the
electrical industry; ((one member shall be a licensed
telecommunications contractor;)) one member shall be an employee, or
officer, or representative of a corporation or firm engaged in the
business of manufacturing or distributing electrical ((and
telecommunications)) materials, equipment, or devices; one member shall
be a person with knowledge of the electrical industry, not related to
the electrical industry, to represent the public; three members shall
be certified electricians; ((one member shall be a telecommunications
worker;)) one member shall be a licensed professional electrical
engineer qualified to do business in the state of Washington ((and
designated as a registered communications distribution designer)); and
one nonvoting member must be a building official from an incorporated
city or town with an electrical inspection program established under
RCW 19.28.141. The regular term of each member shall be four years:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, The original board shall be appointed on June 9,
1988, for the following terms: The first term of the member
representing a corporation or public agency generating or distributing
electric power shall serve four years; two members representing
licensed electrical contractors shall serve three years; the member
representing a manufacturer or distributor of electrical equipment or
devices shall serve three years; the member representing the public and
one member representing licensed electrical contractors shall serve two
years; the three members selected as certified electricians shall serve
for terms of one, two, and three years, respectively; the member
selected as the licensed professional electrical engineer shall serve
for one year. In appointing the original board, the governor shall
give due consideration to the value of continuity in membership from
predecessor boards. Thereafter, the governor shall appoint or
reappoint board members for terms of four years and to fill vacancies
created by the completion of the terms of the original members. When
new positions are created, the governor may appoint the initial members
to the new positions to staggered terms of one to three years. The
governor shall also fill vacancies caused by death, resignation, or
otherwise for the unexpired term of such members by appointing their
successors from the same business classification. The same procedure
shall be followed in making such subsequent appointments as is provided
for the original appointments. The board, at this first meeting shall
elect one of its members to serve as ((chairman)) chair. Any person
acting as the chief electrical inspector shall serve as secretary of
the board during his or her tenure as chief state inspector. Meetings
of the board shall be held at least quarterly in accordance with a
schedule established by the board. Each member of the board shall
receive compensation in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060 which shall be paid out of the electrical license fund, upon
vouchers approved by the director of labor and industries.

Sec. 17 RCW 19.28.341 and 2000 c 238 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department has the power, in case of serious noncompliance
with the provisions of this chapter, to revoke or suspend for such a
period as it determines, any electrical ((or telecommunications))
contractor license or electrical ((or telecommunications)) contractor
administrator certificate issued under this chapter. The department
shall notify the holder of the license or certificate of the revocation
or suspension by certified mail. A revocation or suspension is
effective twenty days after the holder receives the notice. Any
revocation or suspension is subject to review by an appeal to the
board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of a revocation or
suspension until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be
filed within twenty days after notice of the revocation or suspension
is given by certified mail sent to the address of the holder of the
license or certificate as shown on the application for the license or
certificate, and shall be effected by filing a written notice of appeal
with the department, accompanied by a certified check for two hundred
dollars, which shall be returned to the holder of the license or
certificate if the decision of the department is not sustained by the
board. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW. If the board sustains the decision of the department, the two
hundred dollars shall be applied by the department to the payment of
the per diem and expenses of the members of the board incurred in the
matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per diem and
expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund.
(2) The department shall immediately suspend the license or
certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the
suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic
upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of
social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance
with the order.

Sec. 18 RCW 19.28.361 and 2000 c 238 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing contained in this chapter will be construed to relieve from
or lessen the responsibility or liability of any person for injury or
damage to person or property caused by or resulting from any defect of
any nature in any electrical ((or telecommunications)) work performed
by said person or in any electrical ((or telecommunications)) equipment
owned, controlled, installed, operated or used by him or her; nor shall
the state of Washington, or any officer, agent, or employee thereof
incur or be held as assuming any liability by reason or in consequence
of any permission, certificate of inspection, inspection or approval
authorized herein, or issued or given as herein provided, or by reason
of consequence of any things done or acts performed pursuant to any
provision of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 19.28.301 (Application -- Subchapter heading) and 2000 c 238
s 1;
(2) RCW 19.28.400 (Definitions) and 2000 c 238 s 204;
(3) RCW 19.28.410 (Telecommunications systems installations--Subject to this subchapter) and 2000 c 238 s 205;
(4) RCW 19.28.420 (Telecommunications contractor license--Application -- Bond -- Issuance of license) and 2000 c 238 s 206;
(5) RCW 19.28.430 (Administrator's examination -- Certificate--Administrator's requirements) and 2000 c 238 s 207;
(6) RCW 19.28.440 (Examination for telecommunications
administrators' certificates) and 2000 c 238 s 208;
(7) RCW 19.28.450 (Local enforcement of subchapter -- Enforcement of
chapter) and 2000 c 238 s 209;
(8) RCW 19.28.460 (Disputes regarding local regulations--Arbitration -- Panel) and 2000 c 238 s 210;
(9) RCW 19.28.470 (Inspections -- Report -- Required repairs/changes--Accessibility of telecommunications systems) and 2000 c 238 s 211;
(10) RCW 19.28.480 (Unlawful acts -- Interpretation of chapter) and
2000 c 238 s 212;
(11) RCW 19.28.490 (Violation of chapter -- Penalty -- Appeal) and 2000
c 238 s 213;
(12) RCW 19.28.501 (Insurance/financial responsibility) and 2000 c
238 s 214;
(13) RCW 19.28.511 (Individual certification not required) and 2000
c 238 s 215;
(14) RCW 19.28.521 (Limitation of action -- Proof of valid license
required) and 2000 c 238 s 216;
(15) RCW 19.28.531 (Unlawful installation/maintenance -- Disputed
interpretation -- Board to determine methods) and 2000 c 238 s 217;
(16) RCW 19.28.541 (Entity desiring board decision -- Process) and
2000 c 238 s 218; and
(17) RCW 19.28.551 (Director's authority -- Adoption of rules) and
2000 c 238 s 219.

--- END ---