BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.34 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the public interest requires state
agencies to coordinate and collaborate whenever appropriate and to
avoid excessive or duplicative administrative costs for interagency
contracts. The legislature therefore finds it necessary to limit
indirect administrative costs charged by state agencies to administer
contracts with other state agencies.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.34.020 and 1985 c 33 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, the term "public agency" shall
mean any agency, political subdivision, or unit of local government of
this state including, but not limited to, municipal corporations, quasi
municipal corporations, special purpose districts, and local service
districts; any agency of the state government, including institutions
of higher education; any agency of the United States; any Indian tribe
recognized as such by the federal government; and any political
subdivision of another state.
The term "state" shall mean a state of the United States.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.34.130 and 1979 c 151 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by law and in subsection (3) of
this section, the full costs of a state agency incurred in providing
services or furnishing materials to or for another agency, other than
an agency of state government, under chapter 39.34 RCW or any other
statute shall be charged to the agency contracting for such services or
materials and shall be repaid and credited to the fund or appropriation
against which the expenditure originally was charged. Amounts
representing a return of expenditures from an appropriation shall be
considered as returned loans of services or of goods, supplies or other
materials furnished, and may be expended as part of the original
appropriation to which they belong without further or additional
appropriation. Such interagency transactions shall be subject to
regulation by the director of financial management, including but not
limited to provisions for the determination of costs, prevention of
interagency contract costs beyond those which are fully reimbursable,
disclosure of reimbursements in the governor's budget and such other
requirements and restrictions as will promote more economical and
efficient operations of state agencies.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, this section shall not
apply to the furnishing of materials or services by one agency to
another when other funds have been provided specifically for that
purpose pursuant to law.
(3) Except as otherwise authorized by law or the omnibus operating
appropriations act, a state agency may not charge another state agency
an administrative overhead cost in excess of ten percent to administer
a contract. This limitation does not apply to interagency contracts
solely involving specific federal grant moneys.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---