BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.060 and 1998 c 286 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040, and each city within such county, shall adopt development
regulations on or before September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation
of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated under
RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted under this subsection may not
prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel prior to their adoption
and shall remain in effect until the county or city adopts development
regulations pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure
that the use of lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral
resource lands shall not interfere with the continued use, in the
accustomed manner and in accordance with best management practices, of
these designated lands for the production of food, agricultural
products, or timber, or for the extraction of minerals. Nothing in
this chapter may be construed as preventing a county or city from
allowing agricultural lands that are not currently being used in
commercial production from being used for recreational activities,
including, but not limited to, playing fields for sports played on
grass, provided that no permanent structures are erected and no
substantial subsurface modifications are performed on the agricultural
land. "Substantial subsurface modification" under this section means
subsurface modifications, such as the placement of gravel drainage
fields, that would prevent the land from being used as agricultural
land in the future. Counties and cities shall require that all plats,
short plats, development permits, and building permits issued for
development activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands
designated as agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource
lands, contain a notice that the subject property is within or near
designated agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands
on which a variety of commercial activities may occur that are not
compatible with residential development for certain periods of limited
duration. The notice for mineral resource lands shall also inform that
an application might be made for mining-related activities, including
mining, extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting,
transporting, and recycling of minerals.
(2) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that
protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW
36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the
counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on
or before March 1, 1992.
(3) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.
(4) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban growth
areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land or
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.177 and 1997 c 429 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A county or a city may use a variety of innovative zoning
techniques in areas designated as agricultural lands of long-term
commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170. The innovative zoning
techniques should be designed to conserve agricultural lands and
encourage the agricultural economy. A county or city should encourage
nonagricultural uses to be limited to lands with poor soils or
otherwise not suitable for agricultural purposes.
(2) Innovative zoning techniques a county or city may consider
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Agricultural zoning, which limits the density of development
and restricts or prohibits nonfarm uses of agricultural land;
(b) Cluster zoning, which allows new development on one portion of
the land, leaving the remainder in agricultural or open space uses;
(c) Large lot zoning, which establishes as a minimum lot size the
amount of land necessary to achieve a successful farming practice;
(d) Quarter/quarter zoning, which permits one residential dwelling
on a one-acre minimum lot for each one-sixteenth of a section of land;
and
(e) Sliding scale zoning, which allows the number of lots for
single-family residential purposes with a minimum lot size of one acre
to increase inversely as the size of the total acreage increases.
(3) A county or city may permit agricultural lands that are not
currently being used in commercial production to be used for
recreational activities, including, but not limited to, playing fields
for sports played on grass, provided that no permanent structures are
erected and no substantial subsurface modifications are performed on
the agricultural land. "Substantial subsurface modification" under
this section means subsurface modifications, such as the placement of
gravel drainage fields, that would prevent the land from being used as
agricultural land in the future.

--- END ---