BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that geoduck clams are
a valuable resource to the citizens of the state of Washington and
proper conservation and management provides both environmental
protection and economic benefits. The legislature recognizes that
geoduck clams are a renewable resource and a valuable international
commodity. The legislature further recognizes that treaty Indian
tribes and local communities benefit from the proper management of the
geoduck resource. The legislature further finds that geoduck
management, aquaculture, and harvesting responsibilities are shared
among the treaty Indian tribes and the several state agencies including
the department of fish and wildlife, the department of natural
resources, the department of agriculture, and the department of health.
The legislature therefore finds that improving the coordination of
geoduck management activities, including geoduck aquaculture, will
improve the geoduck resource in Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.60.070 and 2000 c 107 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may not authorize a person to take geoduck clams
from state-owned lands for commercial purposes outside the harvest area
designated in a current department of natural resources geoduck
harvesting agreement issued under RCW 79.96.080. The director may not
authorize commercial harvest of geoduck clams from bottoms that are
shallower than eighteen feet below mean lower low water (0.0. ft.), or
that lie in an area bounded by the line of ordinary high tide (mean
high tide) and a line two hundred yards seaward from and parallel to
the line of ordinary high tide. This section does not apply to the
harvest of private sector cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW
15.85.020.
(2) Commercial geoduck harvesting shall be done with a hand-held,
manually operated water jet or suction device guided and controlled
from under water by a diver. Periodically, the director shall
determine the effect of each type or unit of gear upon the geoduck
population or the substrate they inhabit. The director may require
modification of the gear or stop its use if it is being operated in a
wasteful or destructive manner or if its operation may cause permanent
damage to the bottom or adjacent shellfish populations.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.70.220 and 2000 c 107 s 71 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person shall not harvest geoduck clams commercially without
a geoduck fishery license. This section does not apply to the harvest
of private sector cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW
15.85.020.
(2) Only a person harvesting geoduck clams commercially on
nonstate-owned land or a person who has entered into a geoduck
harvesting agreement with the department of natural resources under RCW
79.96.080 may hold a geoduck fishery license.
(3) A geoduck fishery license for harvest on state-owned land
authorizes no taking of geoducks outside the boundaries of the public
lands designated in the underlying harvesting agreement, or beyond the
harvest ((ceiling)) limit set in the underlying harvesting agreement.
(4) A geoduck fishery license for harvest on state-owned land
expires when the underlying geoduck harvesting agreement terminates.
(5) The director shall determine the number of geoduck fishery
licenses that may be issued for each geoduck harvesting agreement, the
number of units of gear whose use the license authorizes, and the type
of gear that may be used, subject to RCW 77.60.070. In making those
determinations, the director shall seek to conserve the geoduck
resource and prevent damage to its habitat.
(6) The holder of a geoduck fishery license and the holder's agents
and representatives shall comply with all applicable commercial diving
safety regulations adopted by the federal occupational safety and
health administration established under the federal occupational safety
and health act of 1970 as such law exists on May 8, 1979, 84 Stat. 1590
et seq.; 29 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq. A violation of those regulations
is a violation of this subsection. For the purposes of this section,
persons who dive for geoducks are "employees" as defined by the federal
occupational safety and health act. A violation of this subsection is
grounds for suspension or revocation of a geoduck fishery license
following a hearing under the procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW. The
director shall not suspend or revoke a geoduck fishery license if the
violation has been corrected within ten days of the date the license
holder receives written notice of the violation. If there is a
substantial probability that a violation of the commercial diving
standards could result in death or serious physical harm to a person
engaged in harvesting geoduck clams, the director shall suspend the
license immediately until the violation has been corrected. If the
license holder is not the operator of the harvest vessel and has
contracted with another person for the harvesting of geoducks, the
director shall not suspend or revoke the license if the license holder
terminates its business relationship with that person until compliance
with this subsection is secured.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 77.60 RCW
to read as follows:
Nonstate-owned bedlands or tidelands owned or held under contract
or deed upon which a private party is commercially harvesting or
cultivating geoduck must be surveyed by the private party and a record
of survey filed in compliance with chapter 58.09 RCW prior to harvest.
Property corners will be placed in sufficient quantity and location to
aid in relocation of the tract lines occurring or extending below
extreme low tide. Buoys on anchors must be placed intervisibly along
and at angle points on any ownership boundaries that extend below
extreme low tide, for the harvest term. The survey of privately owned
tidelands and bedlands will be established on the Washington coordinate
system in compliance with chapter 58.20 RCW and property corners
labeled with their coordinates on the record of survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall evaluate the current status of the geoduck resource in
Washington and report to the legislature by December 1, 2004. The
report must: Include an update on the current harvest trends and
policies to determine the sustainability of the geoduck harvest;
include the role of aquaculture and reseeding in geoduck management and
enforcement; and make recommendations for improving the health of the
geoduck resource while maximizing economic benefits.
(2) A task force consisting of treaty Indian tribes,
representatives from the aquaculture industry, a representative from
private shoreline property owners, a representative from the department
of fish and wildlife, a representative from the department of natural
resources, a representative from the department of health, a
representative from the department of agriculture, and a representative
from counties shall provide recommendations, to be included in the
joint legislative audit and review committee report, regarding the role
of geoduck clam aquaculture and reseeding, enforcement of geoduck
harvest on state and nonstate-owned lands, the benefits and concerns of
implementing a limited entry geoduck diver license, and the benefits
and concerns of implementing a geoduck clams fishery.

--- END ---