BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4451 and 1997 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter, as
provided in this section.
(a) For calendar year 2004, the maximum credit for a taxpayer for
a reporting period is ((thirty-five)) fifty dollars multiplied by the
number of months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW
82.32.045.
(b) For a calendar year following calendar year 2004, the maximum
credit for a reporting period is equal the maximum credit amount under
(a) of this subsection multiplied by the increase in the consumer price
index, and rounded to the nearest dollar. On September 30, 2004, and
on each following September 30th, the department shall calculate the
increase in the consumer price index using the consumer price index for
all urban consumers within the Seattle-Tacoma-Bremerton consolidated
metropolitan statistical area, or a successor index, as published by
the United States department of labor, for the preceding calendar year
compared to the index for calendar year 2002.
(2) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter is
equal to or less than the maximum credit, a credit is allowed equal to
the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter.
(3) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter exceeds
the maximum credit, a reduced credit is allowed equal to twice the
maximum credit, minus the tax otherwise due under this chapter, but not
less than zero.
(4) The department may prepare a tax credit table consisting of tax
ranges using increments of no more than five dollars and a
corresponding tax credit to be applied to those tax ranges. The table
shall be prepared in such a manner that no taxpayer will owe a greater
amount of tax by using the table than would be owed by performing the
calculation under subsections (1) through (3) of this section. A table
prepared by the department under this subsection shall be used by all
taxpayers in taking the credit provided in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---