BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
BASIC ORGANIZATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The legislature finds
that increased demands on transportation resources require increased
efficiency and effectiveness in decision making within urbanized
regions. Legislative enactments, public votes on local and state
initiatives and referenda, and the number of agencies involved in
transportation planning and delivery of services has significantly
added to the complexity of transportation programs.
The legislature further finds that coordinated planning, investment
in, and operation of transportation systems by the state and by local
governments, can help ensure an efficient, effective transportation
system that ensures mobility and addresses community needs. Improved
planning, investment, and operation can also enhance local and state
objectives for effective regional transportation strategies and
effective coordination between land use and transportation.
The legislature finds that addressing this need for better
accountability and coordinated action regarding transportation and
comprehensive planning necessitates an innovative approach. Improved
integration among transportation programs, particularly in the state's
largest metropolitan area is imperative, and will have significant
benefit to the citizens of Washington. It is therefore the policy of
the state of Washington to provide the authority for the citizens of
the central Puget Sound counties to create a single regional government
council, more directly accountable to the public, with adequate
resources to develop and encourage implementation of a comprehensive
transportation plan within the state's largest urbanized region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.
(1) "Council" means the Puget Sound regional transportation
district council created under section 105 of this act, and the
governing body of the district.
(2) "District" means the Puget Sound regional transportation
district created under section 103 of this act.
(3) "Policy advisory committee" or "committee" means the policy
advisory committee authorized in section 202 of this act.
(4) "Public transportation providers" means those agencies
providing transit services to the public including public agencies that
operate ferries, regional transit authorities, public transit agencies,
and city transportation authorities.
(5) "Puget Sound regional council" means the Puget Sound regional
council, which, as of January 1, 2004, is the organization designated
by units of general purpose local governments within the region as the
metropolitan planning organization under federal requirements and as
the regional transportation organization under chapter 47.80 RCW, or
any successor organization.
(6) "Project of regional significance" means those projects
identified by the characteristics set forth in section 201(3) and (4)
of this act.
(8) "Region" means that area within the jurisdiction of the
council.
(9) "Regional plan" or "plan" means the metropolitan transportation
plan required under federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 DISTRICT CREATED. A political subdivision
known as the Puget Sound regional transportation district is created,
subject to section 504 of this act, to consist of the counties that are
included within the regional transportation planning organization
having the largest population on January 1, 2003, known as "central
Puget Sound counties."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 COUNCILOR DISTRICTS. By May 1, 2005, the
legislative authorities of the central Puget Sound counties shall
jointly assemble and determine eight councilor districts, based on
equal populations.
The counties shall provide for the nomination and election of
district councilors at the state's September primary and November
general elections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 DISTRICT COUNCIL. (1) Creation and
powers. The district council is created as the governing body of the
Puget Sound regional transportation district. Except as provided for
in this chapter, all district powers are vested in the council.
(2) Composition. Beginning January 1, 2006, the council consists
of nine councilors, one elected at large and designated as president of
the council, and eight nominated and elected from individual districts
within the region.
(3) Initial terms of office. The terms of office of the four
councilors receiving the highest number of votes among the eight
councilors elected in 2005 end on the first Monday of 2010. The terms
of office of the other four councilors end on the first Monday of 2007.
Thereafter the term of office of councilor is four years. The first
term of the president ends the first Monday of 2010.
(4) Presiding officer, council president. The council president
presides over the council. The council president sets the council
agenda subject to general rules established by a council-adopted
ordinance. Except as provided otherwise in this chapter, the council
president appoints all members of the committees, commissions, and
boards created by the rules of the council and ordinances of the
district.
(5) Annual organizing resolution. At the first council meeting
each January the council shall adopt an annual organizing resolution
naming a deputy and establishing such committees as the council deems
necessary for the orderly conduct of council business.
(6) Council meetings. The council shall meet regularly in the area
at times and places it designates. The council shall prescribe by
ordinance the rules to govern conduct of its meetings. Except as this
chapter provides otherwise, the agreement of a majority of councilors
present and constituting a quorum is necessary to decide affirmatively
a question before the council.
(7) Quorum. A majority of councilors in office is a quorum for
council business, but fewer councilors may compel absent councilors to
attend.
(8) Record of proceedings. The council shall keep and authenticate
a record of council proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 COUNCIL FOR REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
INVESTMENT DISTRICT GOVERNANCE. Effective January 1, 2007, the members
of the council, acting ex officio and independently shall constitute
the governing body of any regional transportation investment district
located within the boundaries of the Puget Sound regional
transportation district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 DISTRICT AUDITOR. (1) Creation. The
office of district auditor is created. The auditor is elected from the
district at large for a term of four years. The auditor serves full
time and may not be employed by any other person or entity while
serving as auditor.
(2) First election; disqualification for councilor. The auditor is
first nominated and elected in the first statewide primary and general
election in 2005. During the term for which elected, and for four
years thereafter, the auditor is ineligible to hold the office of
district councilor.
(3) Duties. The auditor shall: (a) Make continuous investigations
of the operations of the district, including financial and performance
auditing and review of financial transactions, personnel, equipment,
facilities, and all other aspects of those operations; and (b) make
reports to the council of the results of any investigation with any
recommendations for remedial action. Except as provided in this
section, the auditor may not be given responsibility to perform any
executive function.

PART II
POWERS AND DUTIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 COUNCIL'S DUTIES. The council shall:
(1) Be the designated regional transportation planning organization
for its area and have, except where provided otherwise, the same duties
and obligations of those organizations as prescribed in chapter 47.80
RCW;
(2) Assume the responsibility for the metropolitan planning
function within the region under 23 U.S.C. Sec. 134 and act as the
governing body for that activity;
(3) Identify those transportation facilities and services within
the region provided by the department of transportation, cities,
counties, public transportation providers, and other publicly financed
transportation providers that serve regionally significant corridors or
are otherwise regionally significant;
(4) Prepare and adopt a plan setting forth the priorities for
investment and the allocation of resources for operating and investment
for those regionally significant transportation facilities and services
for each of those agencies enumerated in subsection (3) of this
section. The goal is an integrated systematic approach for investment
resulting in a coordinated transportation network. To carry out this
duty, the council may enter into interlocal contracts and memoranda of
understanding for the affected agencies to reimburse the council for
the costs of these planning functions;
(5) Plan, develop, and enforce standards for the coordination of
public transportation services in the region as set forth in section
204 of this act;
(6) Plan, develop, and enforce standards for the coordination of
regional traffic operations in the region as set forth in section 205
of this act;
(7) Approve in total, or disapprove all or certain elements of the
regional transportation improvement program submitted to it by the
policy advisory committee;
(8) Effective January 1, 2007, assume the role as governing
authority for any regional transportation investment district located
within the boundaries of the region;
(9) Effective January 1, 2007, assume the role as governing
authority for any regional transit authority under chapter 81.112 RCW
located within the boundaries of the region;
(10) By January 1, 2010, determine the role of the council in
governing the city transportation authority and implement the
determination;
(11) Appoint any other advisory committees it deems necessary to
carry out the intent of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 DISTRICT POLICY ADVISORY COMMITTEE. (1)
The council shall appoint a district policy advisory committee, to be
made up of local elected officials, officials of agencies that
administer or operate major modes or systems of transportation,
appropriate state officials, and other persons as determined by the
council.
(2) After appointment a vote of both a majority of the policy
advisory committee and a majority of all councilors may change the
composition of the committee at any time.
(3) The policy advisory committee shall perform the duties assigned
to it in this chapter and any other duties the council prescribes.
(4) The policy advisory committee shall adopt bylaws governing the
conduct and recording of its meetings and the terms of its members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 ADVISORY COMMITTEE DUTIES. The policy
advisory committee shall:
(1) Provide a forum for representatives from local and state units
of government to assess transportation policies and programs throughout
the region, evaluate transportation needs, and to make recommendations
to the council;
(2) Develop a recommended regional plan and a regional
transportation improvement program, to be forwarded to the council for
approval or rejection;
(3) Develop and recommend to the council the allocation of federal
funds available to the region;
(4) Review public agencies' plans for consistency under sections
204 and 205 of this act and make recommendations to the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION COORDINATION. (1)
The council shall develop standards for (a) the coordination of capital
investment, (b) service, (c) service coordination of public
transportation providers in the region, and (d) in cooperation with the
transportation commission, performance. The goal of these standards is
to maximize coordination within and among systems, use resources more
effectively, and enhance services to the public. In developing these
standards, the council shall consult with regional transit authorities,
city transportation authorities, other transit and transportation
agencies, and ferry providers operating within the region. The
standards must also address vanpool coordination, fare policies, and
transportation demand management programs.
(2) In addition to the duties under section 201 of this act, the
council shall approve each plan prepared under RCW 35.58.2795 by public
transportation providers operating in the region, if it finds that
those plans meet the standards developed under subsection (1) of this
section. If the council finds that those plans do not meet the
standards set forth in subsection (1) of this section, it shall
immediately notify the agency that prepared the plan of the reasons for
noncompliance. The plan may be amended and resubmitted to the council.
(3) If the council does not approve the plan of a public
transportation provider operating in its area of jurisdiction, that
agency's plan may not be included in the regional transportation
improvement program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 REGIONAL TRAFFIC OPERATIONS COORDINATION.

(1) The council shall develop standards for the coordination of the
traffic operations of state and local roads of regional significance.
The objective of these standards is to maximize coordination across
jurisdictional boundaries, to invest capital and operational resources
more effectively, and to improve transportation system efficiency for
the benefit of the traveling public and the movement of goods and
services. In developing these standards the council shall consult with
the state department of transportation and local traffic operations
agencies.
(2) The council shall ensure that elements of the regional
transportation improvement program include a regional traffic
operations coordination element that meets the standards under
subsection (1) of this section. This plan must include the appropriate
application of intelligent transportation systems technologies to the
freeways and regional arterials, coordination of signal timing on
regional arterials, and the coordination of operating policies on
freeways and regional arterials to ensure that the system of freeways
and regional arterials operates as an integrated network.

PART III
TECHNICAL MATTERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 TERM OF OFFICE. The term of office of an
officer elected at a general election begins the first Monday of the
year after election and continues until a successor assumes the office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 QUALIFICATIONS AND SALARIES OF ELECTED
OFFICERS. (1) Councilor. A councilor must be a qualified elector
under the Constitution of this state when his or her term of office
begins and must have resided during the preceding twelve months in the
district from which elected or appointed. When the boundaries of that
district have been apportioned or reapportioned during that period,
residency in that district for purposes of this subsection includes
residency in any former district with area in the district from which
the councilor is elected or appointed if residency is established in
the apportioned or reapportioned district within sixty days after the
apportionment or reapportionment is effective.
(2) Council president and auditor. The council president and
auditor must each be a qualified elector under the Constitution of this
state when his or her term of office begins and must have resided
during the preceding twelve months within the boundaries of the
district as they exist when the term of office begins. At the time of
election or appointment, the auditor must also hold the designation of
certified public accountant or certified internal auditor.
(3) Multiple elected offices. A district elected officer may not
be an elected officer of the state or a city, county, or special
district during his or her term of office. As used in this chapter,
special district does not include school districts.
(4) Judging elections and qualifications. The council is the judge
of the election and qualification of its members.
(5) Oath. Before assuming office an elected officer shall take an
oath or affirm that he or she will faithfully perform the duties of the
office and support the constitutions and laws of the United States and
this state and the charter and laws of the district.
(6) The salary of the council president will be equal to the salary
of members of the county legislative authority of the largest county
within the district. The salary of each other councilor will be two-thirds of the salary of the president. The salary of the auditor will
be eighty percent of the salary of the president.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 VACANCIES IN OFFICE. (1) Councilor. The
office of councilor becomes vacant upon the incumbent's: (a) Death;
(b) adjudicated incompetency; (c) recall from office; (d) failure after
election or appointment to qualify for the office within ten days after
the time for his or her term of office to begin; (e) absence from all
meetings of the council within a sixty-day period without the council's
consent; (f) ceasing to reside in the district from which elected or
appointed, except when district boundaries are reapportioned and a
councilor is assigned to a district where the councilor does not reside
and the councilor becomes a resident of the reapportioned district
within sixty days after the reapportionment is effective; (g) ceasing
to be a qualified elector under state law; (h) conviction of a felony
or conviction of a federal or state offense punishable by loss of
liberty and pertaining to his or her office; (i) resignation from
office; or (j) becoming an elected officer of the state or a city,
county, or special district.
(2) Council president and auditor. The offices of council
president or auditor become vacant in the circumstances described in
subsection (1)(a) through (d) and (g) through (j) of this section, or
if the council president or auditor ceases to reside in the area. The
office of auditor also becomes vacant if the incumbent ceases to hold
the designation of certified public accountant or certified internal
auditor.
(3) Determination of vacancy. The council is the final judge of
the existence of a vacancy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FILLING VACANCIES. A majority of
councilors holding office shall fill a vacancy by appointment within
ninety days after it occurs. The term of office of the appointee runs
from the time he or she qualifies for the office after appointment
until a successor is duly elected and qualifies for the office. If the
vacancy occurs more than twenty days before the first general election
after the beginning of the term for that office, the term of office of
the appointee runs only until the first council meeting in the year
immediately after that election. A person will be nominated and
elected for the remainder of the term at the first primary and general
election after the beginning of the term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 LIMITATIONS OF TERMS OF OFFICE. No person
may be elected councilor for more than three consecutive full terms,
not including any term or terms as council president. No person may be
elected council president for more than two consecutive full terms.

PART IV
AMENDMENTS AND MISCELLANEOUS SECTIONS
Sec. 401 RCW 35.58.2795 and 1994 c 158 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As used in this section "agency" means a municipality as
defined in RCW 35.58.272 and a regional transit authority, and within
a district as defined in section 102 of this act it means a public
transportation provider as defined in section 102 of this act.
(2) By April 1st of each year, the legislative authority of each
((municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, and each regional transit
authority)) agency shall prepare a six-year transit development plan
for that calendar year and the ensuing five years. Agencies located in
the central Puget Sound regional transportation district shall provide
resources to the Puget Sound regional transportation council to prepare
elements of those plans identified by that council. The program shall
be consistent with the comprehensive plans adopted by counties, cities,
and towns, pursuant to chapter 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW, the
inherent authority of a first class city or charter county derived from
its charter, or chapter 36.70A RCW. The program shall contain
information as to how the municipality intends to meet state and local
long-range priorities for public transportation, capital improvements,
significant operating changes planned for the system, coordinate
services with other agencies, and how the ((municipality)) agency
intends to fund program needs. The six-year plan for each
((municipality and regional transit authority shall)) agency must
specifically set forth those projects of regional significance for
inclusion in the transportation improvement program within that region.
For those agencies located within the jurisdiction of the Puget Sound
regional transportation district, the plan must address the standards
developed under sections 204 and 205 of this act for inclusion in the
transportation improvement program in that region. Each ((municipality
and regional transit authority)) agency shall file the six-year program
with the state department of transportation, the transportation
improvement board, and cities, counties, and regional planning councils
within which the municipality is located.
In developing its program, the ((municipality and the regional
transit authority)) agency shall consider those policy recommendations
affecting public transportation contained in the state transportation
policy plan approved by the state transportation commission and, where
appropriate, adopted by the legislature. The ((municipality)) agency
shall conduct one or more public hearings while developing its program
and for each annual update.

Sec. 402 RCW 35.95A.030 and 2002 c 248 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A city that undertakes to propose creation of an authority must
propose the authority by ordinance of the city legislative body. The
ordinance must:
(a) Propose the authority area and the size and method of selection
of the governing body of the authority, which governing body may be
appointed or elected, provided that officers or employees of any single
city government body may not compose a majority of the members of the
authority's governing body;
(b) Propose whether all or a specified portion of the public
monorail transportation function will be exercised by the authority;
(c) Propose an initial array of taxes to be voted upon by the
electors within the proposed authority area; and
(d) Provide for an interim governing body of the authority which
will govern the authority upon voter approval of formation of the
authority, until a permanent governing body is selected, but in no
event longer than fourteen months.
(2) An authority may also be proposed to be created by a petition
setting forth the matters described in subsection (1) of this section,
and signed by one percent of the qualified electors of the proposed
authority area.
(3) Upon approval by the qualified electors of the formation of the
city transportation authority and any proposed taxes, either by
ordinance or by petition as provided in this chapter, the governing
body of an authority, or interim governing body, as applicable, will
adopt bylaws determining, among other things, the authority's officers
and the method of their selection, and other matters the governing body
deems appropriate.
(4) The governing body of the authority is the body determined by
the regional transportation district council under section 201(10) of
this act. If the council has any part as the governing body, the vote
of each councilor, including the president, is weighted to reflect that
portion of the city transportation authority population that is within
each councilor district.

Sec. 403 RCW 36.120.090 and 2002 c 56 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Initially the governing board of a district consists of the
members of the legislative authority of each member county, acting ex
officio and independently. The secretary of transportation or the
appropriate regional administrator of the department, as named by the
secretary, shall also serve as a nonvoting member of the board. The
governing board may elect an executive board of seven members to
discharge the duties of the governing board subject to the approval of
the full governing board.
(2) Effective January 1, 2007, for a district located within a
regional transportation district, the Puget Sound regional
transportation district council is the governing board. For votes of
the council regarding board decisions, the vote of each councilor,
including the president, is weighted to reflect that portion of the
regional transportation investment district population that is within
each councilor district.
(3) Until January 1, 2007, a sixty-percent majority of the weighted
votes of the total board membership is required to submit to the
counties a modified plan under RCW 36.120.140 or any other proposal to
be submitted to the voters. Until January 1, 2007, the counties may,
with majority vote of each county legislative authority, submit a
modified plan or proposal to the voters.

Sec. 404 RCW 36.120.110 and 2002 c 56 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governing board of the district is responsible for the
execution of the voter-approved plan. The board shall:
(a) Impose taxes and fees authorized by district voters;
(b) Enter into agreements with state, local, and regional agencies
and departments as necessary to accomplish district purposes and
protect the district's investment in transportation projects;
(c) Accept gifts, grants, or other contributions of funds that will
support the purposes and programs of the district;
(d) Monitor and audit the progress and execution of transportation
projects to protect the investment of the public and annually make
public its findings;
(e) Pay for services and enter into leases and contracts, including
professional service contracts;
(f) Until January 1, 2007, hire no more than ten employees,
including a director or executive officer, a treasurer or financial
officer, a project manager or engineer, a project permit coordinator,
and clerical staff; and
(g) Exercise other powers and duties as may be reasonable to carry
out the purposes of the district.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that existing staff
resources of lead agencies be used in implementing this chapter. A
district may coordinate its activities with the department, which shall
provide services, data, and personnel to assist as desired by the
regional transportation investment district. Lead agencies for
transportation projects that are not state facilities shall also
provide staff support for the board.
(3) A district may not acquire, hold, or dispose of real property.
(4) A district may not own, operate, or maintain an ongoing
facility, road, or transportation system.
(5) A district may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, or
donations.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that administrative and
overhead costs of a regional transportation investment district be
minimized. For transportation projects costing up to fifty million
dollars, administrative and overhead costs may not exceed three percent
of the total construction and design project costs per year. For
transportation projects costing more than fifty million dollars,
administrative and overhead costs may not exceed three percent of the
first fifty million dollars in costs, plus an additional one-tenth of
one percent of each additional dollar above fifty million. These
limitations apply only to the district, and do not limit the
administration or expenditures of the department.
(7) A district may use the design-build procedure for
transportation projects developed by it. As used in this section
"design-build procedure" means a method of contracting under which the
district contracts with another party for that party to both design and
build the structures, facilities, and other items specified in the
contract. The requirements and limitations of RCW 47.20.780 and
47.20.785 do not apply to the transportation projects under this
chapter.

Sec. 405 RCW 36.120.140 and 2003 c 194 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board may modify the plan to change transportation projects
or revenue sources if:
(a) Two or more participating counties adopt a resolution to modify
the plan; and
(b) The counties submit to the voters in the district, and after
January 1, 2007, the governing board submits, a ballot measure that
redefines the scope of the plan, its projects, its schedule, its costs,
or the revenue sources. If the voters fail to approve the redefined
plan, the district shall continue to work on and complete the plan, and
the projects in it, that was originally approved by the voters. If the
voters approve the redefined plan, the district shall work on and
complete the projects under the redefined plan.
(2) The board may modify the plan to change transportation projects
within a participating county if:
(a) A majority of the board approves the change;
(b) The modifications are limited to projects within the county;
(c) The county submits to the voters in the county a ballot measure
that redefines:
(i) Projects;
(ii) Scopes of projects; or
(iii) Costs; and
(iv) The financial plan for the county;
(d) The proposed modifications maintain the equity of the plan and
((does [do])) do not increase the total level of plan expenditure for
the county.
If the voters fail to approve the modified plan, the district shall
continue to work on and complete the plan, and the projects in it, that
was originally approved by the voters. If the voters approve the
redefined plan, the district shall work on and complete the projects
under the redefined plan.
(3) If a transportation project cost exceeds its original cost by
more than twenty percent as identified in the plan:
(a) The board shall, in coordination with the county legislative
authorities, submit to the voters in the district or county a ballot
measure that redefines the scope of the transportation project, its
schedule, or its costs. If the voters fail to approve the redefined
transportation project, the district shall terminate work on that
transportation project, except that the district may take reasonable
steps to use, preserve, or connect any improvement already constructed.
The remainder of any funds that would otherwise have been expended on
the terminated transportation project must first be used to retire any
outstanding debt attributable to the plan and then may be used to
implement the remainder of the plan.
(b) Alternatively, upon adoption of a resolution by two or more
participating counties:
(i) The counties shall submit, and after January 1, 2007, the
governing board shall submit, to the voters in the district a ballot
measure that redefines the scope of the plan, its transportation
projects, its schedule, or its costs. If the voters fail to approve
the redefined plan, the district shall terminate work on that plan,
except that the district may take reasonable steps to use, preserve, or
connect any improvement already constructed. The remainder of any
funds must be used to retire any outstanding debt attributable to the
plan; or
(ii) Until January 1, 2007, the counties, and after January 1,
2007, the board may elect to have the district continue the
transportation project without submitting an additional ballot proposal
to the voters.
(4) To assure accountability to the public for the timely
construction of the transportation improvement project or projects
within cost projections, the district shall issue a report, at least
annually, to the public and copies of the report to newspapers of
record in the district. In the report, the district shall indicate the
status of transportation project costs, transportation project
expenditures, revenues, and construction schedules. The report may
also include progress towards meeting the performance criteria provided
under this chapter.

Sec. 406 RCW 47.26.080 and 1999 c 94 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created in the motor vehicle fund the urban
arterial trust account. The intent of the urban arterial trust account
program is to improve the arterial street system of the state by
improving mobility and safety while supporting an environment essential
to the quality of life of the citizens of the state of Washington. The
city hardship assistance program, as provided in RCW 47.26.164, and the
small city program, as provided for in RCW 47.26.115, are implemented
within the urban arterial trust account.
For funds apportioned to projects in counties in the Puget Sound
regional transportation district, the board shall give preference to
projects that meet the standards established under sections 204 and 205
of this act. The board shall not allocate funds, nor make payments of
the funds under RCW 47.26.260, to any county, city, or town identified
by the governor under RCW 36.70A.340.

Sec. 407 RCW 47.26.086 and 1994 c 179 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Transportation improvement account projects selected for funding
programs after fiscal year 1995 are governed by the requirements of
this section.
The board shall allocate funds from the account by June 30th of
each year for the ensuing fiscal year to urban counties, cities with a
population of five thousand and over, and to transportation benefit
districts. Projects may include, but are not limited to, multi-agency
projects and arterial improvement projects in fast-growing areas. The
board shall endeavor to provide geographical diversity in selecting
improvement projects to be funded from the account.
The intent of the program is to improve mobility of people and
goods in Washington state by supporting economic development and
environmentally responsive solutions to our statewide transportation
system needs.
To be eligible to receive these funds, a project must be consistent
with the Growth Management Act, the Clean Air Act including conformity,
and the Commute Trip Reduction Law and consideration must have been
given to the project's relationship, both actual and potential, with
the statewide rail passenger program and rapid mass transit. Projects
must be consistent with any adopted high capacity transportation plan,
must consider existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion levels
attributable to economic development or growth and all modes of
transportation and safety, and must be partially funded by local
government or private contributions, or a combination of such
contributions. For projects proposed in counties in the Puget Sound
regional transportation district, the board shall give preference to
projects that meet the standards established under sections 204 and 205
of this act. Priority consideration shall be given to those projects
with the greatest percentage of local or private contribution, or both.
Within one year after board approval of an application for funding,
the lead agency shall provide written certification to the board of the
pledged local and private funding for the phase of the project
approved. Funds allocated to an applicant that does not certify its
funding within one year after approval may be reallocated by the board.

Sec. 408 RCW 47.80.020 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 54 are each
amended to read as follows:
The legislature hereby authorizes creation of regional
transportation planning organizations within the state. Each regional
transportation planning organization shall be formed through the
voluntary association of local governments within a county, or within
geographically contiguous counties. Except as provided in section 201
of this act, each organization shall:
(1) Encompass at least one complete county;
(2) Have a population of at least one hundred thousand, or contain
a minimum of three counties; and
(3) Have as members all counties within the region, and at least
sixty percent of the cities and towns within the region representing a
minimum of seventy-five percent of the cities' and towns' population.
The state department of transportation must verify that each
regional transportation planning organization conforms with the
requirements of this section.
In urbanized areas, the regional transportation planning
organization is the same as the metropolitan planning organization
designated for federal transportation planning purposes.

Sec. 409 RCW 47.80.030 and 1998 c 171 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each regional transportation planning organization shall
develop in cooperation with the department of transportation, providers
of public transportation and high capacity transportation, ports, and
local governments within the region, adopt, and periodically update a
regional transportation plan that:
(a) Is based on a least cost planning methodology that identifies
the most cost-effective facilities, services, and programs;
(b) Identifies existing or planned transportation facilities,
services, and programs, including but not limited to major roadways
including state highways and regional arterials, transit and
nonmotorized services and facilities, multimodal and intermodal
facilities, marine ports and airports, railroads, and noncapital
programs including transportation demand management that should
function as an integrated regional transportation system, giving
emphasis to those facilities, services, and programs that exhibit one
or more of the following characteristics:
(i) Crosses member county lines;
(ii) Is or will be used by a significant number of people who live
or work outside the county in which the facility, service, or project
is located;
(iii) Significant impacts are expected to be felt in more than one
county;
(iv) Potentially adverse impacts of the facility, service, program,
or project can be better avoided or mitigated through adherence to
regional policies;
(v) Transportation needs addressed by a project have been
identified by the regional transportation planning process and the
remedy is deemed to have regional significance; and
(vi) Provides for system continuity;
(c) Establishes level of service standards for state highways and
state ferry routes, with the exception of transportation facilities of
statewide significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140. These regionally
established level of service standards for state highways and state
ferries shall be developed jointly with the department of
transportation, to encourage consistency across jurisdictions. In
establishing level of service standards for state highways and state
ferries, consideration shall be given for the necessary balance between
providing for the free interjurisdictional movement of people and goods
and the needs of local commuters using state facilities;
(d) Includes a financial plan demonstrating how the regional
transportation plan can be implemented, indicating resources from
public and private sources that are reasonably expected to be made
available to carry out the plan, and recommending any innovative
financing techniques to finance needed facilities, services, and
programs;
(e) Assesses regional development patterns, capital investment and
other measures necessary to:
(i) Ensure the preservation of the existing regional transportation
system, including requirements for operational improvements,
resurfacing, restoration, and rehabilitation of existing and future
major roadways, as well as operations, maintenance, modernization, and
rehabilitation of existing and future transit, railroad systems and
corridors, and nonmotorized facilities; and
(ii) Make the most efficient use of existing transportation
facilities to relieve vehicular congestion and maximize the mobility of
people and goods;
(f) Sets forth a proposed regional transportation approach,
including capital investments, service improvements, programs, and
transportation demand management measures to guide the development of
the integrated, multimodal regional transportation system; and
(g) Where appropriate, sets forth the relationship of high capacity
transportation providers and other public transit providers with regard
to responsibility for, and the coordination between, services and
facilities.
(2) The organization shall review the regional transportation plan
biennially for currency and forward the adopted plan along with
documentation of the biennial review to the state department of
transportation.
(3) All transportation projects, programs, and transportation
demand management measures within the region that have an impact upon
regional facilities or services must be consistent with the plan and
with the adopted regional growth and transportation strategies.
(4) In the case of a regional transportation planning organization
located in a Puget Sound regional transportation district, the plan
must be based on the guidelines and plan prepared by the Puget Sound
regional transportation council under section 201(2) and (3) of this
act. The plan must include recommendations to the department of
transportation regarding levels of service standards for highways of
statewide significance.

Sec. 410 RCW 47.80.040 and 2003 c 351 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each regional transportation planning organization other than a
Puget Sound regional transportation district shall, and a Puget Sound
regional transportation district may, create a transportation policy
board. Transportation policy boards shall provide policy advice to the
regional transportation planning organization and shall allow
representatives of major employers within the region, the department of
transportation, transit districts, port districts, and member cities,
towns, and counties within the region to participate in policy making.
Any members of the house of representatives or the state senate whose
districts are wholly or partly within the boundaries of the regional
transportation planning organization or Puget Sound regional
transportation district are considered ex officio, nonvoting policy
board members of the regional transportation planning organization.
This does not preclude legislators from becoming full-time, voting
board members.

Sec. 411 RCW 47.80.060 and 1992 c 101 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
In order to qualify for state planning funds available to regional
transportation planning organizations, the regional transportation
planning organizations containing any county with a population in
excess of one million, other than a Puget Sound regional transportation
district, shall provide voting membership on its executive board to the
state transportation commission, the state department of
transportation, and the three largest public port districts within the
region as determined by gross operating revenues. It shall further
assure that at least fifty percent of the county and city local elected
officials who serve on the executive board also serve on transit agency
boards or on a regional transit authority.

Sec. 412 RCW 81.112.040 and 1994 c 109 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
regional transit authority shall be governed by a board consisting of
representatives appointed by the county executive and confirmed by the
council or other legislative authority of each member county.
Membership shall be based on population from that portion of each
county which lies within the service area. Board members shall be
appointed initially on the basis of one for each one hundred forty-five
thousand population within the county. Such appointments shall be made
following consultation with city and town jurisdictions within the
service area. In addition, the secretary of transportation or the
secretary's designee shall serve as a member of the board and may have
voting status with approval of a majority of the other members of the
board. Only board members, not including alternates or designees, may
cast votes.
Each member of the board, except the secretary of transportation or
the secretary's designee, shall be:
(a) An elected official who serves on the legislative authority of
a city or as mayor of a city within the boundaries of the authority;
(b) On the legislative authority of the county, if fifty percent of
the population of the legislative official's district is within the
authority boundaries; or
(c) A county executive from a member county within the authority
boundaries.
When making appointments, each county executive shall ensure that
representation on the board includes an elected city official
representing the largest city in each county and assures proportional
representation from other cities, and representation from
unincorporated areas of each county within the service area. At least
one-half of all appointees from each county shall serve on the
governing authority of a public transportation system.
Members appointed from each county shall serve staggered four-year
terms. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the remainder of
the unexpired term of the position being vacated.
The governing board shall be reconstituted, with regard to the
number of representatives from each county, on a population basis,
using the official office of financial management population estimates,
five years after its initial formation and, at minimum, in the year
following each official federal census. The board membership may be
reduced, maintained, or expanded to reflect population changes but
under no circumstances may the board membership exceed twenty-five.
(2) For a regional transit authority located within a regional
transportation district, effective January 1, 2007, the Puget Sound
regional transportation district council is the governing board. For
votes of the council regarding board decisions, the vote of each
councilor, including the president, is weighted to reflect that portion
of the regional transit authority population that is within each
councilor district.
(3) Major decisions of the authority shall require a favorable vote
of two-thirds of the entire membership of the voting members or for a
regional transportation district council, two-thirds of the weighted
votes. "Major decisions" include at least the following: System plan
adoption and amendment; system phasing decisions; annual budget
adoption; authorization of annexations; modification of board
composition; and executive director employment.
(((3))) (4) Each member of the board is eligible to be reimbursed
for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and
to receive compensation as provided in RCW 43.03.250.

PART V
OTHER PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Captions and part headings used in this
act are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 Sections 101 through 305 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 The counties within the district
identified in section 103 of this act shall submit to the voters within
the district, at the next general election, a single ballot measure
that approves formation of the district, authorizes establishment of
the district council, and approves the powers of the council as set
forth in this act. The auditors of those counties shall transmit the
results of the election to the secretary of state in the manner
described in RCW 29A.60.230 for canvassing by the secretary in the
manner described by RCW 29A.60.260. A simple majority of the persons
voting on the single ballot measure is required for the district to be
established.
Sections 408 through 411 of this act take effect January 1, 2006,
if the district is formed.

--- END ---