BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW
to read as follows:
The governing board of an authority implementing a high-capacity
transportation system plan developed under chapter 81.104 RCW shall
appoint an administrative auditor and shall retain a qualified firm or
firms to conduct performance audits. A firm conducting an audit must
be independent and not have an interest, direct or indirect, in a
contract with the authority other than its employment. No member or
employee of the firm may be connected with the authority as an officer,
employee, or contractor. The administrative auditor and the firm or
firms shall be independently and directly responsible to the governing
board. The board shall require a firm to conduct continuing audits of
the methods, procedures, and organization used by the agency to control
costs, schedules, productivity, contract amendments, project design,
and any other topics deemed desirable by the board. The board may also
require a firm to analyze particular technical aspects of the
authority's projects and contract amendments. The firm or firms shall
provide advice to the board in its management and control of the
authority. At least once each year, the firm or firms shall prepare
and furnish a report of its actions and recommendations to the board
for the purpose of enabling it to attain the highest degree of
efficiency in the management and control of any high-capacity
transportation system being planned, designed, under construction, or
in operation. The administrative auditor shall assist the firm or
firms in the performance of its duties. The administrative auditor and
the firm or firms shall consult regularly with the board and furnish
any information or data to the board that the administrative auditor,
firm, or governing board deems helpful in accomplishing the purpose
stated in this section. The administrative auditor shall perform such
other duties as the board prescribes to accomplish the purposes of this
section.
Upon the concurrent request of the chair of the house
transportation committee and the chair of the senate highways and
transportation committee, the operating agency shall report to the
committees on a quarterly basis.

--- END ---