BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.050 and 1987 c 109 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
After June 6, 1945, no withdrawal of public ground waters of the
state shall be begun, nor shall any well or other works for such
withdrawal be constructed, unless an application to appropriate such
waters has been made to the department and a permit has been granted by
it as herein provided: EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That any withdrawal of public
ground waters for stock-watering purposes, or for the watering of a
lawn or of a noncommercial garden not exceeding one-half acre in area,
or for single or group domestic uses of not more than five residences
in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a day, or for group
domestic uses of more than five residences in an amount not exceeding
one thousand gallons a day for each residence, or for an industrial
purpose in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a day, is and
shall be exempt from the provisions of this section, but, to the extent
that it is regularly used beneficially, shall be entitled to a right
equal to that established by a permit issued under the provisions of
this chapter((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). The department from time
to time may require the person or agency making any such small
withdrawal to furnish information as to the means for and the quantity
of that withdrawal((: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)). The department shall
require that any well supplying group domestic uses of more than five
residences under the exemption from permitting provided by this section
be metered if such service is initiated after the effective date of
this act.
At the option of the party making withdrawals of ground waters of
the state not exceeding five thousand gallons per day, applications
under this section or declarations under RCW 90.44.090 may be filed and
permits and certificates obtained in the same manner and under the same
requirements as is in this chapter provided in the case of withdrawals
in excess of five thousand gallons a day.

--- END ---