BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.220 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter permits the state and any political subdivision of the
state or a county, city, or other public body to use either the
services of a soil scientist engaging in the practice of soil science
or a licensed geologist or licensed specialty geologist engaging in the
practice of geology or relevant specialty to perform work that is
within the scope of practice of both professions.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.220.010 and 2000 c 253 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the geologist licensing board.
(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(4) "Engineering geologist" means a geologist who, by reason of his
or her knowledge of engineering geology, acquired by education and
practical experience, is qualified to engage in the practice of
engineering geology, has met the qualifications in engineering geology
established under this chapter, and has been issued a license in
engineering geology by the board.
(5) "Engineering geology" means a specialty of geology affecting
the planning, design, operation, and maintenance of engineering works
and other human activities where geological factors and conditions
impact the public welfare or the safeguarding of life, health,
property, and the environment.
(6) "Geologist" means a person who, by reason of his or her
knowledge of geology, mathematics, the environment, and the supporting
physical and life sciences, acquired by education and practical
experience, has met the qualifications established under this chapter,
and has been issued a certificate of licensing as a geologist by the
board.
(7) "Geology" means the science that includes: Treatment of the
earth and its origin and history, in general; the investigation of the
earth's constituent rocks, minerals, solids, fluids, including surface
and underground waters, gases, and other materials; and the study of
the natural agents, forces, and processes that cause changes in the
earth.
(8) "Hydrogeology" means a science that involves the study of the
waters of the earth, including the study of the occurrence,
circulation, distribution, chemistry, remediation, or quality of water
or its role as a natural agent that causes changes in the earth, and
the investigation and collection of data concerning waters in the
atmosphere or on the surface or in the interior of the earth, including
data regarding the interaction of water with other gases, solids, or
fluids.
(9) "Licensed specialty geologist" means a licensed geologist who
has met the qualifications in a specialty of geology established under
this chapter and has been issued a license in that specialty by the
board.
(10) "Practice of engineering geology" means performance of
geological service or work including but not limited to consultation,
investigation, evaluation, planning, geological mapping, and inspection
of geological work, and the responsible supervision thereof, the
performance of which is related to public welfare or the safeguarding
of life, health, property, and the environment, except as otherwise
specifically provided by this chapter, and includes but is not limited
to the commonly recognized geological practices of construction
geology, environmental geology, and urban geology.
(11) "Practice of geology" means performance of geological service
or work including but not limited to collection of geological data,
consultation, investigation, evaluation, interpreting, planning,
geological mapping, or inspection relating to a service or work that
applies to geology, and the responsible supervision thereof, the
performance of which is related to public welfare or the safeguarding
of life, health, property, and the environment, except as otherwise
specifically provided by this chapter.
(12) "Practice of geology for others" includes, but is not limited
to:
(a) The preparation of geologic reports, documents, or exhibits by
any commission, board, department, district, or division of the state
or any political subdivision thereof or of any county, city, or other
public body, or by the employees or staff members of the commission,
board, department, district, or division of the state or any political
subdivision thereof or of any county, city, or other public body when
the reports, documents, or exhibits are disseminated or made available
to the public in such a manner that the public may reasonably be
expected to rely thereon or be affected thereby; and
(b) The performance of geological services by any individual, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other association or by the employees or
staff members thereof, whether or not the principal business of the
organization is the practice of geology, which the geological reports,
documents, or exhibits constituting the practice of geology are
disseminated or made available to the public or any individual or
organization in such a manner that the public or individual or
combination of individuals may reasonably be expected to rely thereon
or be affected thereby.
However, geological reports, documents, or exhibits that are
prepared by the employees or staff members of any individual, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other association or commission, board,
department, district, or division of the state or any political
subdivision thereof or any county, city, or other public body that are
for use solely within such organizations are considered in-house
reports, documents, or exhibits and are not the practice of geology for
others unless or until the reports are disseminated or made available
as set forth in (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(13) "Practice of hydrogeology" means the performance of or offer
to perform any hydrogeologic service or work in which the public
welfare or the safeguarding of life, health, environment, or property
is concerned or involved. This includes the collection of geological
data, and consultation, investigation, evaluation, interpretation,
planning, or inspection relating to a service or work that applies
hydrogeology.
(14) "Practice of soil science" means the performance of or offer
to perform soil science work including, but not limited to, the
investigation, evaluation, planning, management, classification, and
mapping of soil and the interpretation of soil behavior, including
surface erosion and landslide assessment, and the inspection and
responsible charge of such work.
(15) "Responsible charge" means the exercise of fully independent
control and direction of geological work or the supervision of such
work, and being fully responsible, answerable, accountable, or liable
for the results.
(((15))) (16) "Soil scientist" means a person who is qualified to
engage in the practice of soil science by reason of soil science
knowledge acquired by education and practical experience, as determined
by the director by rule, which must include at a minimum:
(a)(i) Graduation from an accredited college or university in a
four-year course of study satisfactory to the director or from a four-year course of study in a program accredited by an organization
recognized by the director, which includes at least thirty semester
hours of credit, or the equivalent, in biological, physical, or earth
science, with a minimum of fifteen semester hours, or the equivalent,
in subjects such as soil genesis, pedology, soil chemistry, soil
physics, and soil fertility, leading to a bachelor's or higher degree
in soil science; and
(ii) Four years of experience obtained subsequent to completion of
the academic requirements specified in (a)(i) of this subsection in
soil science work of a character satisfactory to the director and
demonstrating that the person is qualified to assume responsible charge
of soil science work; or
(b)(i) A bachelor's degree or higher from an accredited academic
institution satisfactory to the director, but not having the course of
study prescribed in (a)(i) of this subsection; and
(ii) Seven years of experience obtained subsequent to completion of
the academic requirements specified in (b)(i) of this subsection in
soil science work of a character satisfactory to the director and
demonstrating that the person is qualified to assume responsible charge
of soil science work.
(17) "Specialty" means a branch of geology that has been recognized
under this chapter for the purposes of licensure. Engineering geology
is considered to be a specialty of geology.
(((16))) (18) "Subordinate" means any person who assists in the
practice of geology by a licensed geologist or an exempt person,
without assuming the responsible charge of the work.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.220.190 and 2000 c 253 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following activities do not require a certificate of licensing
under this chapter:
(1) Geological work performed by an employee or a subordinate of a
geologist or specialty geologist licensed under this chapter, provided
that the work does not include responsible charge of geological work as
covered by this section, and is performed under the direct supervision
of a geologist licensed under this chapter, who shall be and remains
responsible for such work;
(2) Geological work performed by officers and employees of the
United States practicing solely as such officers and employees;
(3) Geological work performed exclusively in the exploration for
energy and mineral resources, insofar as such work has no substantial
impact upon the public health, safety, and welfare as determined by
regulations issued by the director;
(4) Geological research conducted through academic institutions,
agencies of the federal or state governments, nonprofit research
institutions, or for-profit organizations, including submission of
reports of research to public agencies;
(5) Teaching geology or related physical or natural sciences;
(6) The practice of engineering or other licensed professions: (a)
The acquisition of engineering data involving soil, rock, ground water,
and other earth materials; evaluation of the physical and chemical
properties of soil, rock, ground water, and other earth materials; and
the utilization of these data in analysis, design, and construction by
professional engineers appropriately registered or licensed in this
state; and (b) similar work performed by persons or organizations
licensed or registered in any other profession or occupation related to
geology, provided that such work is permitted under the applicable
licensing or registration law, and is incidental to the practice or the
profession or occupation for which licensing or registration is
required. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the use
of the title geologist or engineering geologist, or any other specialty
as defined by the director, by an engineer or other licensed
professional except as licensed under this chapter;
(7) Geological work or general scientific work performed by soil
scientists in the preparation of reports, documents, and exhibits
relating to the practice of soil science. Nothing in this section may
be construed to permit the use of the title geologist or engineering
geologist, or any other specialty as defined by the director, by a soil
scientist except as licensed under this chapter;
(8) General scientific work customarily performed by such physical
or natural scientists as chemists, archaeologists, geographers,
hydrologists, oceanographers, and pedologists, ((and soil scientists,))
providing such work does not include the design and execution of
geological investigations, being in responsible charge of geological or
specialty geological work, or the drawing of geological conclusions and
recommendations in a way that affects the public health, safety, or
welfare; or
(((8))) (9) The giving of testimony, or preparation and
presentation of exhibits or documents for the sole purpose of being
placed in evidence before any administrative or judicial tribunal or
hearing, providing such testimony, exhibits, or documents do not imply
that the person is registered under the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---