BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.120 and 1995 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A statement made by a child when under the age of ten, or a person
with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020,
describing any act of sexual contact performed with or on the child or
person with a developmental disability by another, describing any
attempted act of sexual contact with or on the child or person with a
developmental disability by another, or describing any act of physical
abuse of the child or person with a developmental disability by another
that results in substantial bodily harm as defined by RCW 9A.04.110,
not otherwise admissible by statute or court rule, is admissible in
evidence in dependency proceedings under Title 13 RCW and criminal
proceedings, including juvenile offense adjudications, in the courts of
the state of Washington if:
(1) The court finds, in a hearing conducted outside the presence of
the jury, that the time, content, and circumstances of the statement
provide sufficient indicia of reliability; and
(2) The child or person with a developmental disability either:
(a) Testifies at the proceedings; or
(b) Is unavailable as a witness: PROVIDED, That when the child or
person with a developmental disability is unavailable as a witness,
such statement may be admitted only if there is corroborative evidence
of the act.
A statement may not be admitted under this section unless the
proponent of the statement makes known to the adverse party his or her
intention to offer the statement and the particulars of the statement
sufficiently in advance of the proceedings to provide the adverse party
with a fair opportunity to prepare to meet the statement.

--- END ---