BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington, one of the most trade-dependent states in the
country, is the fifth largest exporter in the United States;
(2) Washington is the second leading exporter to mainland China and
Singapore and the third leading exporter to Japan, Germany, the United
Kingdom, Korea, and Taiwan;
(3) Washington is the second leading exporter to Africa, the third
leading exporter to Asia, and the fourth leading exporter to the
European Union;
(4) One in five employed persons in the state works in an
occupation or profession associated with international trade;
(5) Washington's increasing reliance on international trade makes
it imperative that the state increase the number of its citizens who
are fluent in languages other than English and who understand the
culture and customs of other countries.
The legislature intends to increase the attention of the K-12
system on the importance of world language instruction by
reestablishing the position of world language specialist at the office
of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall assign
at least one-half of a full-time equivalent employee to help school
districts in their efforts to offer world language instruction in the
state's public schools. The employee's responsibilities may include,
but are not limited to:
(1) The establishment and maintenance of a central data base for
world language programs statewide;
(2) Provision of information to teachers and school districts on
world language instruction best practices;
(3) Assistance to teachers and school districts for new or current
world language programs, including program continuity;
(4) Assistance to districts through coordination of language
programs throughout the state;
(5) Maintenance of contact with business interests to help school
districts align language course offerings with emerging job
requirements; and
(6) Subject to funding, offering classes to language teachers on
communicative language teaching.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The one-half of a full-time equivalent
employee under section 2 of this act shall be assigned from one of the
existing full-time equivalent employees that is available to the agency
on June 30, 2003.

--- END ---