BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
Since violation of rules of the department relating to the
accounting of the commercial harvest of food fish, commercialized game
fish, and shellfish result in damage to the resources of the state,
persons selling such fish and shellfish at retail, including but not
limited to stores, markets, and restaurants, must maintain sufficient
records for the department to be able to ascertain the origin of the
fish and shellfish in their possession.
(1) A retail fish seller is guilty of retail fish seller's failure
to account for commercial harvest if the retail seller sells fish or
shellfish at retail, the fish or shellfish were required to be entered
on a Washington state fish receiving ticket, the seller is not a
wholesale fish dealer or fisher selling under a direct retail sale
endorsement, and the seller fails to maintain sufficient records at the
location where the fish or shellfish are being sold to determine the
following:
(a) The name of the wholesale fish dealer from whom the fish were
purchased;
(b) The wholesale fish dealer's license number;
(c) The fish receiving ticket number documenting original receipt,
if known;
(d) The date of purchase; and
(e) The amount of fish or shellfish originally purchased from the
wholesale dealer.
(2) A retail fish seller's failure to account for commercial
harvest is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---