BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Nature-based tourism is a growing sector that can provide
Washington residents with jobs and local communities with needed
revenues;
(2) Contacts made through nature-based tourism activities may yield
future benefits in terms of future investments in the state and local
communities;
(3) Current efforts to promote nature-based tourism are limited by
funding; and
(4) A collaborative effort among state and local governments,
tribes, and private enterprises can serve to leverage the investments
in nature-based tourism made by each.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall
coordinate the development of an annual nature-based business and
marketing plan and coordinate with the department of fish and wildlife
and other appropriate agencies and organizations to promote and market
nature-based tourism in Washington to maximize efforts and benefits.
This effort shall include the coordination of:
(1) The promotion of nature-based tourism;
(2) The promotion of fishing, hunting, and wildlife viewing;
(3) The creation of partnerships among agencies, organizations,
tribes, and local communities to develop and promote nature-based
tourism;
(4) The provision of educational information to the minority and
local communities in order to educate them about rules and regulations
as well as recreational opportunities; and
(5) The promotion of local industries, such as agriculture-based
tourism.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2003, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---