BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that licensing
bicycles used upon Washington state's roads will ensure compliance with
the laws governing the operation of such vehicles upon Washington
state's roads, and will also aid in the deterrence of theft of the
bicycles and in the recovery of stolen bicycles.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.04.670 and 2002 c 247 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Vehicle" includes every device capable of being moved upon a
public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or property is or
may be transported or drawn upon a public highway, including bicycles.
The term does not include devices other than bicycles moved by human or
animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.
Mopeds shall not be considered vehicles or motor vehicles for the
purposes of chapter 46.70 RCW. Bicycles shall not be considered
vehicles for the purposes of chapter 46.12((, 46.16,)) or 46.70 RCW.
Electric personal assistive mobility devices are not considered
vehicles or motor vehicles for the purposes of chapter 46.12, 46.16,
46.29, 46.37, or 46.70 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.010 and 2000 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to operate any vehicle over and
along a public highway of this state without first having obtained and
having in full force and effect a current and proper vehicle license
and display vehicle license number plates therefor as by this chapter
provided. Failure to make initial registration before operation on the
highways of this state is a misdemeanor, and any person convicted
thereof must be punished by a fine of no less than three hundred thirty
dollars, no part of which may be suspended or deferred.
Failure to renew an expired registration before operation on the
highways of this state is a traffic infraction.
(2) The licensing of a vehicle in another state by a resident of
this state, as defined in RCW 46.16.028, evading the payment of any tax
or license fee imposed in connection with registration, is a gross
misdemeanor punishable as follows:
(a) For a first offense, up to one year in the county jail and a
fine equal to twice the amount of delinquent taxes and fees, no part of
which may be suspended or deferred;
(b) For a second or subsequent offense, up to one year in the
county jail and a fine equal to four times the amount of delinquent
taxes and fees, no part of which may be suspended or deferred;
(c) For fines levied under (b) of this subsection, an amount equal
to the avoided taxes and fees owed will be deposited in the vehicle
licensing fraud account created in the state treasury;
(d) The avoided taxes and fees shall be deposited and distributed
in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly paid in a
timely fashion.
(3) These provisions shall not apply to the following vehicles:
(a) ((Electric-assisted bicycles;
(b))) Farm vehicles if operated within a radius of fifteen miles of
the farm where principally used or garaged, farm tractors and farm
implements including trailers designed as cook or bunk houses used
exclusively for animal herding temporarily operating or drawn upon the
public highways, and trailers used exclusively to transport farm
implements from one farm to another during the daylight hours or at
night when such equipment has lights that comply with the law;
(((c))) (b) Spray or fertilizer applicator rigs designed and used
exclusively for spraying or fertilization in the conduct of
agricultural operations and not primarily for the purpose of
transportation, and nurse rigs or equipment auxiliary to the use of and
designed or modified for the fueling, repairing, or loading of spray
and fertilizer applicator rigs and not used, designed, or modified
primarily for the purpose of transportation;
(((d))) (c) Fork lifts operated during daylight hours on public
highways adjacent to and within five hundred feet of the warehouses
which they serve: PROVIDED FURTHER, That these provisions shall not
apply to vehicles used by the state parks and recreation commission
exclusively for park maintenance and operations upon public highways
within state parks;
(((e))) (d) "Special highway construction equipment" defined as
follows: Any vehicle which is designed and used primarily for grading
of highways, paving of highways, earth moving, and other construction
work on highways and which is not designed or used primarily for the
transportation of persons or property on a public highway and which is
only incidentally operated or moved over the highway. It includes, but
is not limited to, road construction and maintenance machinery so
designed and used such as portable air compressors, air drills, asphalt
spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders, track laying tractors,
ditchers, leveling graders, finishing machines, motor graders, paving
mixers, road rollers, scarifiers, earth moving scrapers and carryalls,
lighting plants, welders, pumps, power shovels and draglines, self-propelled and tractor-drawn earth moving equipment and machinery,
including dump trucks and tractor-dump trailer combinations which
either (i) are in excess of the legal width, or (ii) which, because of
their length, height, or unladen weight, may not be moved on a public
highway without the permit specified in RCW 46.44.090 and which are not
operated laden except within the boundaries of the project limits as
defined by the contract, and other similar types of construction
equipment, or (iii) which are driven or moved upon a public highway
only for the purpose of crossing such highway from one property to
another, provided such movement does not exceed five hundred feet and
the vehicle is equipped with wheels or pads which will not damage the
roadway surface.
Exclusions:
"Special highway construction equipment" does not include any of
the following:
Dump trucks originally designed to comply with the legal size and
weight provisions of this code notwithstanding any subsequent
modification which would require a permit, as specified in RCW
46.44.090, to operate such vehicles on a public highway, including
trailers, truck-mounted transit mixers, cranes and shovels, or other
vehicles designed for the transportation of persons or property to
which machinery has been attached.
(4) The following vehicles, whether operated solo or in
combination, are exempt from license registration and displaying
license plates as required by this chapter:
(a) A converter gear used to convert a semitrailer into a trailer
or a two-axle truck or tractor into a three or more axle truck or
tractor or used in any other manner to increase the number of axles of
a vehicle. Converter gear includes an auxiliary axle, booster axle,
dolly, and jeep axle.
(b) A tow dolly that is used for towing a motor vehicle behind
another motor vehicle. The front or rear wheels of the towed vehicle
are secured to and rest on the tow dolly that is attached to the towing
vehicle by a tow bar.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.230 and 1992 c 7 s 41 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall furnish to all persons making satisfactory
application for vehicle license as provided by law, two identical
vehicle license number plates each containing the vehicle license
number to be displayed on such vehicle as by law required: PROVIDED,
That if the vehicle to be licensed is a trailer, semitrailer or
motorcycle only one vehicle license number plate shall be issued for
each thereof. The number and plate shall be of such size and color and
shall contain such symbols indicative of the registration period for
which the same is issued and of the state of Washington, as shall be
determined and prescribed by the director. The director may specify a
different license plate size for bicycles licensed under this chapter.
Any vehicle license number plate or plates issued to a dealer shall
contain thereon a sufficient and satisfactory indication that such
plates have been issued to a dealer in vehicles. All vehicle license
number plates may be obtained by the director from the metal working
plant of a state correctional facility or from any source in accordance
with existing state of Washington purchasing procedures.
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, the
director may, in his discretion and under such rules and regulations as
he may prescribe, adopt a type of vehicle license number plates whereby
the same shall be used as long as legible on the vehicle for which
issued, with provision for tabs or emblems to be attached thereto or
elsewhere on the vehicle to signify renewals, in which event the term
"vehicle license number plate" as used in any enactment shall be deemed
to include in addition to such plate the tab or emblem signifying
renewal except when such plate contains the designation of the current
year without reference to any tab or emblem. Renewals shall be
effected by the issuance and display of such tab or emblem.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.260 and 1986 c 18 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
A certificate of license registration to be valid must have
endorsed thereon the signature of the registered owner (if a firm or
corporation, the signature of one of its officers or other duly
authorized agent) and must be carried in the vehicle for which it is
issued, at all times in the manner prescribed by the department. It
shall be unlawful for any person to operate or have in his possession
a vehicle without carrying thereon such certificate of license
registration. The operator of a bicycle licensed under this chapter
must carry the bicycle registration upon his or her person. Any person
in charge of such vehicle shall, upon demand of any of the local
authorities or of any police officer or of any representative of the
department, permit an inspection of such certificate of license
registration. This section does not apply to a vehicle for which
annual renewal of its license plates is not required and which is
marked in accordance with the provisions of RCW 46.08.065.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.68.030 and 2002 c 352 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for proceeds from fees for vehicle licensing for
vehicles paying such fees under RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085, and as
otherwise provided for in chapter 46.16 RCW, all fees received by the
director for vehicle licenses under the provisions of chapter 46.16 RCW
or in subsection (2) of this section, shall be forwarded to the state
treasurer, accompanied by a proper identifying detailed report, and be
deposited to the credit of the motor vehicle fund, except that the
proceeds from the vehicle license fee and renewal license fee shall be
deposited by the state treasurer as hereinafter provided. After July
1, 2002, $20.35 of each original or renewal license fee must be
deposited in the state patrol highway account in the motor vehicle
fund, hereby created. Vehicle license fees, renewal license fees, and
all other funds in the state patrol highway account shall be for the
sole use of the Washington state patrol for highway activities of the
Washington state patrol, subject to proper appropriations and
reappropriations therefor. $2.02 of each original vehicle license fee
and $0.93 of each renewal license fee shall be deposited each biennium
in the Puget Sound ferry operations account. Any remaining amounts of
vehicle license fees and renewal license fees that are not distributed
otherwise under this section must be deposited in the motor vehicle
fund.
(2) All vehicle license fees for bicycles paid under chapter 46.16
RCW will be forwarded to the state treasurer, accompanied by a proper
identifying detailed report, and be deposited to the credit of the
bicycle lane construction account, after deducting from these fees
sufficient funds to pay for costs incurred by the department in
administering the licensing of bicycles.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.80.020 and 2001 c 64 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county, or subject to subsection
(7) of this section, a qualifying city or town located in a county that
has not imposed a fifteen-dollar fee under this section, may fix and
impose an additional fee, not to exceed fifteen dollars per vehicle,
for each vehicle, other than a bicycle, that is subject to license fees
under RCW 46.16.0621 and for each vehicle that is subject to RCW
46.16.070 with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less, and
that is determined by the department of licensing to be registered
within the boundaries of the county.
(2) The department of licensing shall administer and collect the
fee. The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected, for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer for
monthly distribution under RCW 82.80.080.
(3) The proceeds of this fee shall be used strictly for
transportation purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070.
(4) A county or qualifying city or town imposing this fee or
initiating an exemption process shall delay the effective date at least
six months from the date the ordinance is enacted to allow the
department of licensing to implement administration and collection of
or exemption from the fee.
(5) The legislative authority of a county or qualifying city or
town may develop and initiate an exemption process of the fifteen
dollar fee for the registered owners of vehicles residing within the
boundaries of the county or qualifying city or town: (a) Who are
sixty-one years old or older at the time payment of the fee is due and
whose household income for the previous calendar year is less than an
amount prescribed by the county or qualifying city or town legislative
authority; or (b) who have a physical disability.
(6) The legislative authority of a county or qualifying city or
town shall develop and initiate an exemption process of the fifteen-dollar fee for vehicles registered within the boundaries of the county
that are licensed under RCW 46.16.374.
(7) For purposes of this section, a "qualifying city or town" means
a city or town residing within a county having a population of greater
than seventy-five thousand in which is located all or part of a
national monument. A qualifying city or town may impose the fee
authorized in subsection (1) of this section subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The city or town may impose the fee only if authorized to do so
by a majority of voters voting at a general or special election on a
proposition for that purpose. At a minimum, the ballot measure shall
contain: (i) A description of the transportation project proposed for
funding, properly identified by mileposts or other designations that
specify the project parameters; (ii) the proposed number of months or
years necessary to fund the city or town's share of the project cost;
and (iii) the amount of fee to be imposed for the project.
(b) The city or town may not impose a fee that, if combined with
the county fee, exceeds fifteen dollars. If a county imposes or
increases a fee under this section that, if combined with the fee
imposed by a city or town, exceeds fifteen dollars, the city or town
fee shall be reduced or eliminated as needed so that in no city or town
does the combined fee exceed fifteen dollars. All revenues from
county-imposed fees shall be distributed as called for in RCW
82.80.080.
(c) Any fee imposed by a city or town under this section shall
expire at the end of the term of months or years provided in the ballot
measure, or when the city or town's bonded indebtedness on the project
is retired, whichever is sooner.
(8) The fee imposed under subsection (7) of this section shall
apply only to renewals and shall not apply to ownership transfer
transactions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 47.30 RCW
to read as follows:
The bicycle lane construction account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may only be used for the purpose of
constructing lanes dedicated solely for use by bicycles as defined in
RCW 46.04.071.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 47.30 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may not construct bicycle lanes using funds from any
account other than the bicycle lane construction account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 47.30 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may sign an interlocal agreement with any county,
city, or town that wishes to construct a bicycle lane. The department
shall adopt rules to govern a process by which grants to counties,
cities, and towns who wish to build bicycle lanes may apply, and shall
adopt criteria to govern the award of such grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 47.30 RCW
to read as follows:
No county, city, or town shall construct any lane solely for the
use of bicycles, as defined in RCW 46.04.071, except using grants
awarded by the department from the bicycle lane construction account.

--- END ---