BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.12.010 and 2002 c 367 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1)(a) "Value of the article used" shall mean the consideration,
whether money, credit, rights, or other property except trade-in
property of like kind, expressed in terms of money, paid or given or
contracted to be paid or given by the purchaser to the seller for the
article of tangible personal property, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. The term includes the amount of any freight,
delivery, or other like transportation charge paid or given by the
purchaser to the seller with respect to the purchase of such article.
The term also includes, in addition to the consideration paid or given
or contracted to be paid or given, the amount of any tariff or duty
paid with respect to the importation of the article used. In case the
article used is acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted, produced,
or manufactured by the person using the same or is sold under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
thereof, the value of the article used shall be determined as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar products of like quality and character under such rules as the
department of revenue may prescribe.
(b) In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value
of the use of the articles so used shall be in an amount representing
a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so bailed, determined
as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places
of use of similar products of like quality and character under such
rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such
articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the
construction, repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become
or are to become an ingredient or component of, new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or
for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city
housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any such articles therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so
used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of such
articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar products of like quality and character or, in the absence of
either of these selling price measures, such value may be determined
upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.
(c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business
outside the state which are brought into the state for no more than one
hundred eighty days in any period of three hundred sixty-five
consecutive days and which are temporarily used for business purposes
by the person in this state, the value of the article used shall be an
amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles,
unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW
upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.
(d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user
and used in the manufacture or production of products sold or to be
sold to the department of defense of the United States, the value of
the articles used shall be determined according to the value of the
ingredients of such articles.
(e) In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes
of serving as a prototype for the development of a new or improved
product, the value of the article used shall be determined by: (i) The
retail selling price of such new or improved product when first offered
for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into the
prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered
for sale.
(f) In the case of an article purchased with a direct pay permit
under RCW 82.32.087, the value of the article used shall be determined
by the retail selling price, as defined in RCW 82.08.010, of such
article if but for the use of the direct pay permit the transaction
would have been subject to sales tax;
(2) "Value of the service used" means the consideration, whether
money, credit, rights, or other property, expressed in terms of money,
paid or given or contracted to be paid or given by the purchaser to the
seller for the service, the use of which is taxable under this chapter.
If the service is received by gift or under conditions wherein the
purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of
the service used shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the retail selling price at place of use of similar services of like
quality and character under rules the department of revenue may
prescribe;
(3) "Use," "used," "using," or "put to use" shall have their
ordinary meaning, and shall mean:
(a) With respect to tangible personal property, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or
control over the article of tangible personal property (as a consumer),
and include installation, storage, withdrawal from storage,
distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or
consumption within this state; and
(b) With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the
first act within this state after the service has been performed by
which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the
article of tangible personal property upon which the service was
performed (as a consumer), and include installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to
subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;
(4) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included within
the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word "consumer" as defined in
chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;
(5) "Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and
every person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal
property at retail and every person required to collect from purchasers
the tax imposed under this chapter;
(6) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and
82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with
respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this chapter.
"Consumer," in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04
and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable, shall also mean any person who
distributes or displays, or causes to be distributed or displayed, any
article of tangible personal property, except newspapers, the primary
purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or services. With
respect to property distributed to persons within this state by a
consumer as defined in this subsection (6), the use of the property
shall be deemed to be by such consumer.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.020 and 2002 c 367 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from every
person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within
this state as a consumer: (a) Any article of tangible personal
property purchased at retail, or acquired by lease, gift, repossession,
or bailment, or extracted or produced or manufactured by the person so
using the same, or otherwise furnished to a person engaged in any
business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); or (b) any canned
software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding canned
software that is either provided free of charge or is provided for
temporary use in viewing information, or both.
(2) This tax shall apply to the use of every service defined as a
retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a) and the use of every
article of tangible personal property, including property acquired at
a casual or isolated sale, and including byproducts used by the
manufacturer thereof, except as hereinafter provided, irrespective of
whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are
available for purchase within this state.
(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property or service taxable
under RCW 82.04.050(2)(a) or (3)(a) purchased at retail or acquired by
lease, gift, or bailment if the sale to, or the use by, the present
user or his bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under
chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the
present user or by his bailor or donor.
(4) Except as provided in ((RCW 82.12.0252)) this section, payment
by one purchaser or user of tangible personal property or service of
the tax imposed by chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall not have the effect
of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property or
service from the taxes imposed by such chapters. If the sale to, or
the use by, the present user or his or her bailor or donor has already
been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and
the tax has been paid by the present user or by his or her bailor or
donor; or in respect to the use of property acquired by bailment and
the tax has once been paid based on reasonable rental as determined by
RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value of the article at time of first use
multiplied by the tax rate imposed by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter
as of the time of first use; or in respect to the use of any article of
tangible personal property acquired by bailment, if the property was
acquired by a previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same
general activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961,
the tax imposed by this chapter does not apply.
(((4))) (5) The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount
equal to the value of the article used or value of the service used by
the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect for the retail sales tax
under RCW 82.08.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.0254 and 1998 c 311 s 7
are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of any airplane, locomotive, railroad car, or watercraft used
primarily in conducting interstate or foreign commerce by transporting
therein or therewith property and persons for hire or used primarily in
commercial deep sea fishing operations outside the territorial waters
of the state, and in respect to use of tangible personal property which
becomes a component part of any such airplane, locomotive, railroad
car, or watercraft((, and)) in the course of repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the same; also the use of labor and services
rendered in respect to such repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving.
(2) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use by a nonresident of this state of any motor vehicle or trailer
used exclusively in transporting persons or property across the
boundaries of this state and in intrastate operations incidental
thereto when such motor vehicle or trailer is registered and licensed
in a foreign state and in respect to the use by a nonresident of this
state of any motor vehicle or trailer so registered and licensed and
used within this state for a period not exceeding fifteen consecutive
days under such rules as the department of revenue shall adopt:
PROVIDED, That under circumstances determined to be justifiable by the
department of revenue a second fifteen day period may be authorized
consecutive with the first fifteen day period; and for the purposes of
this exemption the term "nonresident" as used herein, shall include a
user who has one or more places of business in this state as well as in
one or more other states, but the exemption for nonresidents shall
apply only to those vehicles which are most frequently dispatched,
garaged, serviced, maintained, and operated from the user's place of
business in another state((; and)).
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use by the holder of a carrier permit issued by the Interstate
Commerce Commission or its successor agency of any motor vehicle or
trailer whether owned by or leased with or without driver to the permit
holder and used in substantial part in the normal and ordinary course
of the user's business for transporting therein persons or property for
hire across the boundaries of this state; and in respect to the use of
any motor vehicle or trailer while being operated under the authority
of a one-transit permit issued by the director of licensing pursuant to
RCW 46.16.160 and moving upon the highways from the point of delivery
in this state to a point outside this state; and in respect to the use
of tangible personal property which becomes a component part of any
motor vehicle or trailer used by the holder of a carrier permit issued
by the Interstate Commerce Commission or its successor agency
authorizing transportation by motor vehicle across the boundaries of
this state whether such motor vehicle or trailer is owned by or leased
with or without driver to the permit holder, in the course of
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the same; also the use of
labor and services rendered in respect to such repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.0255 and 1980 c 37 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property or service which the
state is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution of the state or
under the Constitution or laws of the United States.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.12.02565 and 1999 c 211 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use by a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment
used directly in a manufacturing operation or research and development
operation ((or)), to the use by a person engaged in testing for a
manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used
directly in a testing operation, or to the use of labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the machinery and equipment.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.12.02567 and 2001 c 213 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply with respect to
machinery and equipment used directly in generating not less than two
hundred watts of electricity using wind, sun, or landfill gas as the
principal source of power, or to the use of labor and services rendered
in respect to installing such machinery and equipment.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this section.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2009.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.12.0259 and 1980 c 37 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of tangible personal property or the use of services defined in RCW
82.04.050(2)(a) by corporations which have been incorporated under any
act of the congress of the United States and whose principal purposes
are to furnish volunteer aid to members of the armed forces of the
United States and also to carry on a system of national and
international relief and to apply the same in mitigating the sufferings
caused by pestilence, famine, fire, flood, and other national
calamities and to devise and carry on measures for preventing the same.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.12.0277 and 2001 c 75 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of insulin; prosthetic devices and the components thereof; dental
appliances, devices, restorations, and substitutes, and the components
thereof, including but not limited to full and partial dentures,
crowns, inlays, fillings, braces, and retainers; orthotic devices
prescribed for an individual by a person licensed under chapters 18.22,
18.25, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW; hearing instruments dispensed or fitted by
a person licensed or certified under chapter 18.35 RCW, and the
components thereof; medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin
prescribed, administered, dispensed, or used in the treatment of an
individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW; ostomic
items; and medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to,
oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen
systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed for an
individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW for
use in the medical treatment of that individual. In addition, the
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of
labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving of any of the items exempted under this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.12.0279 and 1980 c 37 s 77 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of ferry vessels of the state of Washington or of local
governmental units in the state of Washington in transporting
pedestrian or vehicular traffic within and outside the territorial
waters of the state ((and)), in respect to the use of tangible personal
property which becomes a component part of any such ferry vessel, and
in respect to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to
improving such ferry vessels.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.12.0315 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of:
(a) Production equipment rented to a motion picture or video
production business;
(b) Production equipment acquired and used by a motion picture or
video production business in another state, if the acquisition and use
occurred more than ninety days before the time the motion picture or
video production business entered this state; and
(c) Production services that are within the scope of RCW
82.04.050(2)(a) and are sold to a motion picture or video production
business.
(2) As used in this section, "production equipment," "production
services," and "motion picture or video production business" have the
meanings given in RCW 82.08.0315.
(3) The exemption provided for in this section shall not apply to
the use of production equipment rented to, or production equipment or
production services that are within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2)(a)
acquired and used by, a motion picture or video production business
that is engaged, to any degree, in the production of erotic material,
as defined in RCW 9.68.050.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.12.02595 and 1998 c 182 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to the use by a nonprofit
charitable organization or state or local governmental entity of any
item
of tangible personal property that has been donated to the
nonprofit charitable organization or state or local governmental
entity, or to the subsequent use of the property by a person to whom
the property is donated or bailed in furtherance of the purpose for
which the property was originally donated.
(2) This chapter does not apply to the donation of tangible
personal property without intervening use to a nonprofit charitable
organization, or to the incorporation of tangible personal property
without intervening use into real or personal property of or for a
nonprofit charitable organization in the course of installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving, constructing, or
decorating the real or personal property for no charge.
(3) This chapter does not apply to the use by a nonprofit
charitable organization of labor and services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving
personal property provided to the charitable organization at no charge,
or to the donation of such services.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.12.810 and 1997 c 368 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "air pollution control
facilities" mean any treatment works, control devices and disposal
systems, machinery, equipment, structures, property, property
improvements, and accessories, that are installed or acquired for the
primary purpose of reducing, controlling, or disposing of industrial
waste that, if released to the outdoor atmosphere, could cause air
pollution, or that are required to meet regulatory requirements
applicable to their construction, installation, or operation.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to:
(a) The use of air pollution control facilities installed and used
by a light and power business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010, in
generating electric power; or
(b) The use of labor and services performed in respect to the
installing of air pollution control facilities.
(3) The exemption provided under this section applies only to air
pollution control facilities that are:
(a) Constructed or installed after May 15, 1997, and used in a
thermal electric generation facility placed in operation after December
31, 1969, and before July 1, 1975; and
(b) Constructed or installed to meet applicable regulatory
requirements established under state or federal law, including the
Washington clean air act, chapter 70.94 RCW.
(4) This section does not apply to the use of tangible personal
property for maintenance or repairs of the pollution control equipment
or to labor and services performed in respect to such maintenance or
repairs.
(5) If production of electricity at a thermal electric generation
facility for any calendar year after 2002 and before 2023 falls below
a twenty percent annual capacity factor for the generation facility,
all or a portion of the tax previously exempted under this section in
respect to construction or installation of air pollution control
facilities at the generation facility shall be due according to the
schedule provided in RCW 82.08.810(5).
(6) RCW 82.32.393 applies to this section.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.12.820 and 2000 c 103 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators, and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied under RCW
82.12.020 on:
(a) Material-handling equipment and racking equipment and labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the equipment; or
(b) Materials incorporated in the construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator, are eligible for an exemption on tax paid in the form
of a remittance or credit against tax owed. The amount of the
remittance or credit is computed under subsection (2) of this section
and is based on the state share of use tax.
(2)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.12.020 to the department. The person may then apply to the
department for remittance of all or part of the tax paid under RCW
82.12.020. For grain elevators with bushel capacity of one million but
less than two million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the
amount of tax paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred
thousand and for grain elevators with bushel capacity of two million or
more, the remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying construction materials, and fifty percent of
the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and
racking equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment;
location and size of warehouses, if applicable; and construction
invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit or credit
exempted amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications
during the previous quarter.
(3) Warehouse, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment and
racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has been
or is being received under chapter 82.60, 82.61, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or
RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any remittance
under this section. Materials incorporated in warehouses and grain
elevators upon which construction was initiated prior to May 20, 1997,
are not eligible for a remittance under this section.
(4) The lessor or owner of the warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance or credit under this section unless the
underlying ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and
material-handling equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in
the same person, or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to
pass the economic benefit of the exemption to the lessee in the form of
reduced rent payments.
(5) The definitions in RCW 82.08.820 apply to this section.

Sec.14 RCW 82.12.840 and 2000 c 40 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of machinery and equipment, and to services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of eligible
machinery and equipment, or tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of eligible machinery and equipment used more
than half of the time:
(a) For gathering, densifying, processing, handling, storing,
transporting, or incorporating straw or straw-based products that will
result in a reduction in field burning of cereal grains and field and
turf grass grown for seed; or
(b) To decrease air emissions resulting from field burning of
cereal grains and field and turf grass grown for seed.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section.
(3) The department of ecology shall provide the department with the
information necessary for the department to administer this section.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2006.

Sec. 15 RCW 82.12.890 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
by an eligible person of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of dairy nutrient management equipment and
facilities, as defined in RCW 82.08.890, or to labor and services
rendered in respect to repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
eligible tangible personal property. The equipment and facilities must
be used exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a dairy
management plan as required under chapter 90.64 RCW. This exemption
applies to the use of tangible personal property or labor and services
made after the dairy nutrient management plan is certified under
chapter 90.64 RCW. The exemption certificate and recordkeeping
requirements of RCW 82.08.890 apply to this section.

Sec. 16 RCW 82.12.900 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of anaerobic digesters ((or)), tangible personal property that becomes
an ingredient or component of anaerobic digesters ((to treat primarily
dairy manure)), or the use of services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving eligible
tangible personal property by an eligible person establishing or
operating an anaerobic digester, as defined in RCW 82.08.900. The
anaerobic digester must be used primarily to treat dairy manure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
by municipal corporations, the state, and all political subdivisions
thereof of tangible personal property consumed and/or of labor and
services as defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a) rendered in respect to
contracts for watershed protection and/or flood prevention. This
exemption is limited to that portion of the selling price that is
reimbursed by the United States government according to the provisions
of the watershed protection and flood prevention act (68 Stat. 666; 16
U.S.C. Sec. 101 et seq.).

Sec. 18 RCW 82.12.0251 and 1997 c 301 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use:
(1) Of any article of tangible personal property, and services that
were rendered in respect to such property, brought into the state of
Washington by a nonresident thereof for his or her use or enjoyment
while temporarily within the state of Washington unless such property
is used in conducting a nontransitory business activity within the
state of Washington; ((or in respect to the use))
(2) By a nonresident of Washington of a motor vehicle or trailer
which is registered or licensed under the laws of the state of his or
her residence, and which is not required to be registered or licensed
under the laws of Washington, including motor vehicles or trailers
exempt pursuant to a declaration issued by the department of licensing
under RCW 46.85.060, and services rendered outside the state of
Washington in respect to such property; ((or in respect to the use))
(3) Of household goods, personal effects, and private motor
vehicles, ((not including motor homes)) and services rendered in
respect to such property, by a bona fide resident of Washington, or
nonresident members of the armed forces who are stationed in Washington
pursuant to military orders, if such articles and services were
acquired and used by such person in another state while a bona fide
resident thereof and such acquisition and use occurred more than ninety
days prior to the time he or she entered Washington. For purposes of
this subsection, private motor vehicles does not include motor homes.
(4) For purposes of this section, "state" means a state of the
United States, any political subdivision thereof, the District of
Columbia, and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof, and
"services" means services defined as retail sales in RCW
82.04.050(2)(a).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 RCW 82.12.0252 (Exemptions -- Use of tangible
personal property upon which tax has been paid -- Use of tangible
personal property acquired by a previous bailee from same bailor before
June 9, 1961) and 1980 c 37 s 52 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The legislature finds that in the enactment
of chapter 367, Laws of 2002, some use tax exemptions were not updated
to reflect the change in taxability regarding services. It is the
legislature's intent to correct this omission by amending the various
use tax exemptions so that services exempt from the sales tax are also
exempt from the use tax. Sections 1 through 19 of this act apply
retroactively to June 1, 2002. The department of revenue shall refund
any use taxes paid and forgive use taxes unpaid as a result of the
omission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---