BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that among the
important duties of local communities is protecting the public health
of its citizens and promoting the safety of its work force.
To ensure the ability of local communities to do so, the
legislature finds and reaffirms the authority of cities, towns, and
counties to enact ordinances exercising local control and expressing
individual community values in the conduct of business and public
health protection within their jurisdictions, including restricting or
prohibiting smoking in locations where members of the public congregate
and work.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.160.080 and 1985 c 236 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city, town, or county may restrict or prohibit smoking in
public places situated within its jurisdiction, including but not
limited to restaurants, skating rinks, and bowling alleys, regardless
of whether such restrictions or prohibitions are more restrictive than
those imposed by state law.
(2) Local fire departments or fire districts and local health
departments may adopt regulations as required to implement this
chapter.

--- END ---