BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.260 and 1997 c 58 s 313 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Recipients who have not obtained paid, unsubsidized employment by
the end of the job search component authorized in section 312 of this
act shall be referred to a work activity.))
(1) Each recipient shall be assessed ((immediately upon completion
of the job search component)) within four weeks of becoming eligible
for the program. Assessments shall be based upon factors that are
critical to obtaining employment, including but not limited to
education, employment strengths, and employment history. Assessments
may be performed by the department or by a contracted entity. The
assessment shall be based on a uniform, consistent, transferable format
that will be accepted by all agencies and organizations serving the
recipient. Based on the assessment, an individual responsibility plan
shall be prepared that: (a) Sets forth an employment goal and a plan
for moving the recipient immediately into employment; (b) contains the
obligation of the recipient to become and remain employed; (c) moves
the recipient into whatever employment the recipient is capable of
handling as quickly as possible; and (d) describes the services
available to the recipient to enable the recipient to obtain and keep
employment.
(2) Recipients who are not engaged in work and work activities, and
do not qualify for a good cause exemption under RCW 74.08A.270, shall
engage in self-directed service as provided in RCW 74.08A.330.
(3) If a recipient refuses to engage in work and work activities
required by the department, the family's grant shall be reduced by the
recipient's share, and may, if the department determines it
appropriate, be terminated.
(4) The department may waive the penalties required under
subsection (3) of this section, subject to a finding that the recipient
refused to engage in work for good cause provided in RCW 74.08A.270.
(5) In implementing this section, the department shall assign the
highest priority to the most employable clients, including adults in
two-parent families and parents in single-parent families that include
older preschool or school-age children to be engaged in work
activities.
(6) In consultation with the recipient, the department or
contractor shall place the recipient into a work activity that is
available in the local area where the recipient resides.

--- END ---