BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is of utmost
importance to assure adequate investigation and reporting of child
deaths. The legislature finds that Washington does not have uniformity
among the counties in the use of coroners or medical examiners. The
lack of uniformity may lead to under-investigation of child deaths in
this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint task force on child death
investigations is established. The joint task force shall consist of
eight members, as follows:
(a) Four members from the house of representatives who shall be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. Two members
of the joint task force shall be members of the house of
representatives children and family services committee and two members
of the joint task force shall be members of the house of
representatives health care committee. Each of the two largest
caucuses shall be represented on the joint task force;
(b) Four members from the senate who shall be appointed by the
president of the senate. Two members of the joint task force shall be
members of the senate children and family services and corrections
committee and two members of the joint task force shall be members of
the senate health and long-term care committee. Each of the two
largest caucuses of the senate shall be represented on the joint task
force.
(2) The joint task force shall choose its cochairs from among its
membership.
(3) The cochairs of the joint task force shall appoint an advisory
committee of nonvoting advisors and experts to provide input on various
subjects. For purposes of this subsection, "advisors and experts" may
include, but are not limited to, representatives of: Counties,
coroners, medical examiners, members of the child death review team,
local health officials, and state agencies.
(4) The joint task force shall review the following issues:
(a) Whether Washington should replace the current county coroner
system with a state medical examiner system.
(b) Whether there is a need to implement statewide rules to ensure
uniformity in child death investigations.
(c) Whether the protocols required under RCW 43.103.100 are being
followed uniformly in Washington.
(d) Whether coroners are being reimbursed for the costs of
autopsies of children under the age of three as provided for in RCW
68.50.104.
(e) Any other issues which the joint task force deems relevant to
the intent of this act.
(5) The joint task force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the legislature no later than December 1, 2003.

--- END ---