BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
The cost of housing for each school district shall be determined
every ten years based on a standard set of housing specifications and
on data reported for the most recent annual period for which data are
available. The data shall be collected by a nationally recognized
entity that collects statistically valid housing cost data for federal
government agencies and businesses, selected by the legislative
evaluation and accountability program and subject to approval by the
legislative fiscal committees. The legislative evaluation and
accountability program shall contract with the entity selected under
this section from funds provided for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
Districts shall be divided into quartiles based on each district's
cost of housing as determined under section 1 of this act. The salary
increases provided to certificated instructional staff under RCW
28A.400.205 shall be distributed differentially to each of the
quartiles until percentage differences in certificated instructional
staff base salaries are as follows: The base salary for districts in
the second quartile shall be five percent greater than the base salary
in the lowest quartile; the base salary for districts in the third
quartile shall be ten percent greater than the base salary in the
lowest quartile; the base salary for districts in the fourth quartile
shall be fifteen percent greater than the base salary in the lowest
quartile. After these percentage differences have been attained,
salary increases shall be provided at the same percentage for all
districts.
The base salary for each of the quartiles shall be established in
the omnibus appropriations act and shall be reflected in supporting
LEAP documents. The statewide salary allocation schedule included in
the omnibus appropriations act shall be the schedule for the districts
in the lowest quartile.
The percentage increases provided under this section and RCW
28A.400.205 shall be the same for every district within each quartile,
except that a grandfathered district shall not receive salary increase
allocations and the base salary of the grandfathered district shall
remain unchanged, until the base salary of the district's quartile is
greater than the grandfathered district's base salary. In the year in
which the grandfathered district's base salary would be less than the
base salary of the district's quartile, the grandfathered district
shall receive a salary increase such that its base salary is equal to
the base salary of the quartile.
For purposes of this section, "base salary" means the state salary
allocation for an employee with a baccalaureate degree and zero years
of service; a "grandfathered district" means one of the thirty-four
districts with a base salary as identified on the LEAP 12E schedule for
the 2002-03 school year greater than the base salary on the statewide
salary allocation schedule.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.410 and 2002 c 353 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature shall establish for each school year in the
appropriations act a statewide salary allocation schedule, for
allocation purposes only, to be used to distribute funds for basic
education certificated instructional staff salaries under RCW
28A.150.260. The statewide salary allocation schedule shall be
adjusted for cost-of-living differences as specified under section 2 of
this act.
(2) Salary allocations for state-funded basic education
certificated instructional staff shall be calculated by the
superintendent of public instruction by determining the district's
average salary for certificated instructional staff, using the
statewide salary allocation schedule and adjustments for cost-of-housing differences under section 2 of this act, and related documents,
conditions, and limitations established by the omnibus appropriations
act.
(3) Beginning January 1, 1992, no more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree
may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state
salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in the omnibus
appropriations act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.400.205 and 2001 c 4 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) School district employees shall be provided an annual salary
cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
(a) The cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying the
rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base used in state funding formulas for teachers and
other school district employees. Beginning with the 2001-02 school
year, and for each subsequent school year, each school district shall
be provided a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to grant this cost-of-living increase for the salaries, including mandatory salary-related
benefits, of all employees of the district except that differential
salary increases may be provided for certificated instructional staff
as provided under section 2 of this act if total state funding for
salary increases for certificated instructional staff is the same as it
would be if the cost-of-living increase were provided to all
certificated instructional staff at the same rate.
(b) A school district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
compensation policies. No later than the end of the school year, each
school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) Any funded cost-of-living increase shall be included in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for all school
employees in subsequent years. For teachers and other certificated
instructional staff, the rate of the annual cost-of-living increase
funded for certificated instructional staff shall be applied to the
base salary used with the statewide salary allocation schedule
established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary models used
to recognize school district personnel costs.
(d) Beginning with the 2001-02 school year, the state shall fully
fund the cost-of-living increase in this section as part of its
obligation to meet the basic education requirements under Article IX of
the Washington Constitution.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any school year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect August 1, 2003.

--- END ---