BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Open Public
Meetings Act was not intended to prevent caucusing on the basis of
political party, where such party affiliation is the basis of
membership on the governing board of a public agency, as defined by the
act. The legislature finds that the Open Public Meetings Act has been
construed so as to cause unintended results, such as the minority of a
county council being permitted to caucus as a party while the majority
is not. The legislature intends to clarify the act so that governing
body members may caucus by political party affiliation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.30 RCW
to read as follows:
At any meeting of the governing body of a public agency where that
governing body is composed of officials elected or appointed on the
basis of political party affiliation, members of that governing body of
the same political party may caucus as a group without that caucus
being open to the public. No final action may be undertaken at such a
caucus.

--- END ---