BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is important
to ensure that state contracting is conducted in an open and honest
fashion, that citizens receive the best goods and services at the best
price, and to ensure the integrity of the contracting process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this section and sections 3 and 4 of this act,
the following definitions apply, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Debar" means to suspend, revoke, or prohibit the privilege of
contracting with the state of Washington for the provision of goods or
services.
(2) "Department" means the department of general administration.
(3) "Vendor" means a person or entity that has contracted with or
seeks to contract with the state of Washington for the provision of
goods or services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may debar a vendor from consideration of an
award for contract for the provision of goods or services to the state
of Washington or suspend the procurement of goods or services from a
vendor if, within the past three years, the vendor, an officer of the
vendor, or an owner of a twenty-five percent or greater interest in the
vendor has:
(a) Been convicted of a criminal offense incident to the
application for or performance of a state contract or subcontract;
(b) Been convicted of any offense which negatively reflects on the
vendor's business integrity, including but not limited to embezzlement,
theft, forgery, bribery, falsification or destruction of records,
receiving stolen property, or violating state or federal antitrust
statutes;
(c) Been convicted of any other offense, or violated any other
state or federal law, as determined by a court of competent
jurisdiction or an administrative proceeding, which, in the opinion of
the department, indicates that the vendor is unable to perform
responsibly or which reflects a lack of integrity that could negatively
impact or reflect upon the state of Washington;
(d) Failed to substantially perform a state contract or subcontract
according to its terms, conditions, and specifications within specified
time limits;
(e) Violated department bid solicitation procedures or violated the
terms of a solicitation after bid submission;
(f) Refused to provide information or documents required by a
contract including, but not limited to, information or documents
necessary for monitoring contract performance;
(g) Failed to respond to requests for information regarding vendor
performance, or accumulated repeated substantiated complaints regarding
performance of a contract/purchase order; or
(h) Failed to perform a state contract or subcontract in a manner
consistent with any applicable state or federal law, rule, or
regulation.
(2) If the department finds that grounds to debar a vendor exist,
it shall send the vendor a notice of proposed debarment indicating the
grounds and the procedure for requesting a hearing. If the vendor does
not respond with a written request for a hearing within twenty calendar
days, the department shall issue the decision to debar without a
hearing. The debarment period may be of any length, up to eight years.
After the debarment period expires, the vendor may reapply for
inclusion on bidder lists through the regular application process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The director of the department and agency heads shall revise
written departmental rules, policies, and procedures to conform with
this act and the terms of existing contracts with vendors.

--- END ---