BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions in this section, successful
completion of the high school assessment in reading, writing,
mathematics, and science shall lead to a certificate of mastery. The
certificate of mastery shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
The certificate of mastery is required for graduation but is not the
only requirement for graduation.
(2) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas in which the student was not
successful, and one or more alternative means, including an appeals
process, for a student to demonstrate achievement of state academic
standards.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, successful
completion of the reading, writing, and mathematics content areas of
the high school Washington assessment of student learning is required
for graduation from a public high school in the state of Washington.
(4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2010, successful
completion of the science content area of the high school Washington
assessment of student learning is required for graduation from a public
high school in the state of Washington.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of mastery for students in home-based instruction under
chapter 28A.200 RCW or for students enrolled in private schools under
chapter 28A.195 RCW.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, if a student takes
the high school assessment but is not successful in one or more content
areas required for the certificate of mastery, the student may retake
the assessment in that content area one or more times at no cost to the
student and may choose one or more of the following options:
(a) To retake the assessment in that content area at least once in
the spring and once in the fall of each year, at a minimum, if the
student is enrolled in a public school;
(b) To retake the assessment in that content area if the student is
enrolled in a high school completion program. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed; or
(c) To use an alternative means developed and approved by the
superintendent of public instruction to demonstrate achievement of the
standards for that content area.
(8) Opportunities for retaking the high school assessment shall
begin no later than the spring 2004 administration of the assessment,
subject to available funding. Beginning no later than 2006,
opportunities to retake the assessment in the fall shall be available
in each school district. In addition, subject to available funding,
beginning no later than 2006, the results of the spring administration
of the assessment shall be available to students, parents, and schools
before June 1st of each year.
(9) Beginning no later than September 1, 2006, subject to available
funding, alternative means to demonstrate mastery and an appeal option
shall be in place in each school district.
(10) Beginning no later than September 1, 2006, each school
district shall prepare a high school graduation plan for each student
in grades eight through twelve who is not successful in one or more
content areas of the Washington assessment of student learning for the
student's grade level.
(11)(a) By June 1, 2004, the superintendent of public instruction
shall report to the governor and the house of representatives and
senate education committees on whether the high school assessment
system in the content areas of reading, writing, and mathematics is a
sufficiently valid and reliable measure of the essential academic
learning requirements to be used to make consistent decisions about
whether individual students have met the performance standards related
to the essential academic learning requirements. In the report, the
superintendent shall recommend any actions necessary to increase the
validity and reliability of any assessment system content area that the
superintendent believes is not sufficiently valid and reliable to be
used for individual student decisions.
(b) By December 15, 2005, the superintendent shall report to the
governor and the house of representatives and senate education
committees on the readiness of the education system to support the
inclusion of the science content area as a graduation requirement for
the class of 2010. In the report, the superintendent shall recommend
any actions necessary to increase the validity and reliability of the
science content area if the superintendent believes that the assessment
for science is not yet sufficiently valid and reliable to be used for
individual student decisions.
(c) In making this determination, the superintendent shall consider
the following for each of the content areas included in the certificate
of mastery:
(i) The validity and reliability of the high school Washington
assessment of student learning for the content areas included in the
certificate;
(ii) The availability of retakes;
(iii) The availability of alternative means by which a student may
demonstrate that the student has met the standard; and
(iv) Other information relevant to ensuring that Washington's
students have been given an opportunity to learn the content areas
covered by the certificate of mastery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Before the results of the 2004 high
school assessment of student learning are reported to school districts,
the academic achievement and accountability commission shall review and
adjust, if necessary, the cut scores needed to meet the high school
standards and obtain a certificate of mastery as provided in section 1
of this act. The commission shall include in its review consideration
of the use of the standard error of measurement into the decision
regarding the award of the certificate of mastery. By November 30,
2004, the commission shall report its decision to the governor, the
superintendent of public instruction, and the house of representatives
and senate education committees. To assist in its deliberations, the
commission shall seek advice from a committee that includes parents,
practicing classroom teachers and principals, administrators, staff,
and other interested parties.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop alternative assessment options, procedures, and criteria,
including an appeals process, to help determine whether students who
were not successful in one or more of the content areas of the high
school assessment can demonstrate that they meet state standards
through another objectively evaluated means. In its deliberations, the
office shall consult with practicing classroom teachers and principals,
appropriate agencies, professional organizations, assessment experts,
and other interested parties.
(a) By July 1, 2004, the office shall report its recommendations
for alternative assessments and appeals, including possible options, to
the governor and the house of representatives and senate education
committees.
(b) By July 1, 2005, subject to available funding, the alternative
assessment options shall be available for voluntary use by school
districts.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
convene three task forces to provide advice to policymakers on the
certificate of mastery graduation requirements. By September 1, 2003,
each of the task forces shall provide the office with an initial report
on its progress. By November 30, 2003, each of the task forces shall
provide a copy of its recommendations to the governor, the
superintendent of public instruction, and the house of representatives
and senate education committees. In addition:
(a) One task force shall provide advice on the appropriate
application of the certificate of mastery requirement to special
education students. The task force shall also recommend one or more
ways to acknowledge the accomplishments of students who meet the
requirements of the students' individual education plans but who do not
earn a certificate of mastery. The task force shall include but need
not be limited to parents, practicing classroom teachers and
principals, and representatives of organizations interested in special
education;
(b) One task force shall provide advice on the appropriate
application of the certificate of mastery requirement to students with
limited English proficiency. The task force shall also recommend one
or more ways to acknowledge the accomplishments of limited English
proficient students who meet every state and local graduation
requirement except that of the certificate of mastery. The task force
shall include but need not be limited to parents, practicing classroom
teachers and principals, and representatives of organizations
interested in the education of limited English proficient students;
(c) One task force shall recommend best practices that schools may
use with middle, junior high, and high school students who need
additional assistance to meet the requirements of the certificate of
mastery. The task force shall include, but need not be limited to
district administrators, practicing teachers and middle and high school
principals, parents, and counselors. The task force shall examine ways
that current programs and student counseling efforts can be adjusted to
meet student assistance needs and identify additional tools needed by
the system for that purpose. The task force also shall examine how the
high school graduation plan in section 1(10) of this act could:
(i) Address, at a minimum, any courses, competencies, or other
steps needed by a student to demonstrate achievement of the state
standards for that content area;
(ii) Be used to help guide a student who meets every graduation
requirement except the acquisition of a certificate of mastery;
(iii) Be incorporated into the high school and beyond plan required
for graduation by the state board of education; and
(iv) Include an annual progress report to a student and the
student's parents or guardian that might include the steps the student
needs to take within the next year to make steady progress toward high
school graduation.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.230.090 and 1997 c 222 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements is encouraged to include
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of mastery requirements under section 1 of this
act are required for graduation from a public high school but are not
the only requirement for graduation.
(2) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of
education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit. Subsection (4) of
this section shall also apply to students enrolled in high school on
April 11, 1990, who took the courses before attending high school.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.655.030 and 2002 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The powers and duties of the academic achievement and
accountability commission shall include, but are not limited to the
following:
(1) For purposes of statewide accountability, the commission shall:
(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
writing, science, and mathematics by subject and grade level as the
commission deems appropriate to improve student learning, once
assessments in these subjects are required statewide. The goals shall
be consistent with student privacy protection provisions of RCW
28A.655.090(7) and shall not conflict with requirements contained in
Title I of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965,
as amended. The goals may be established for all students,
economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient
students, students with disabilities, and students from
disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic
backgrounds. The commission may establish school and school district
goals addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction
goals for students in grades seven through twelve. ((The goals shall
be in addition to any goals adopted in RCW 28A.655.050. The commission
may also revise any goal adopted in RCW 28A.655.050.)) The commission
shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before each goal is
implemented, the commission shall present the goal to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the
committees' review and comment in a time frame that will permit the
legislature to take statutory action on the goal if such action is
deemed warranted by the legislature;
(b) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the
standard on the Washington assessment of student learning and, for high
school students, obtain a certificate of mastery. The commission shall
also determine student scores that identify levels of student
performance below and beyond the standard. The commission shall
consider the incorporation of the standard error of measurement into
the decision regarding the award of the certificate of mastery. The
commission shall set such performance standards and levels in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and after
consideration of any recommendations that may be developed by any
advisory committees that may be established for this purpose;
(c) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify successful
schools and school districts and recommend to the superintendent of
public instruction schools and districts to be recognized for two types
of accomplishments, student achievement and improvements in student
achievement. Recognition for improvements in student achievement shall
include consideration of one or more of the following accomplishments:
(i) An increase in the percent of students meeting standards. The
level of achievement required for recognition may be based on the
achievement goals established by the legislature under RCW 28A.655.050
and the commission under (a) of this subsection;
(ii) Positive progress on an improvement index that measures
improvement in all levels of the assessment; and
(iii) Improvements despite challenges such as high levels of
mobility, poverty, English as a second language learners, and large
numbers of students in special populations as measured by either the
percent of students meeting the standard, or the improvement index.
When determining the baseline year or years for recognizing
individual schools, the commission may use the assessment results from
the initial years the assessments were administered, if doing so with
individual schools would be appropriate;
(d) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify schools and
school districts in need of assistance and those in which significant
numbers of students persistently fail to meet state standards. In its
deliberations, the commission shall consider the use of all statewide
mandated criterion-referenced and norm-referenced standardized tests;
(e) Identify schools and school districts in which state
intervention measures will be needed and a range of appropriate
intervention strategies, beginning no earlier than June 30, 2001, and
after the legislature has authorized a set of intervention strategies.
Beginning no earlier than June 30, 2001, and after the legislature has
authorized a set of intervention strategies, at the request of the
commission, the superintendent shall intervene in the school or school
district and take corrective actions. This chapter does not provide
additional authority for the commission or the superintendent of public
instruction to intervene in a school or school district;
(f) Identify performance incentive systems that have improved or
have the potential to improve student achievement;
(g) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure
fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially
with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of
public instruction of any improvements needed to the system;
(h) Annually report by December 1st to the legislature, the
governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and the state board
of education on the progress, findings, and recommendations of the
commission. The report may include recommendations of actions to help
improve student achievement;
(i) By December 1, 2000, and by December 1st annually thereafter,
report to the education committees of the house of representatives and
the senate on the progress that has been made in achieving the reading
goal under RCW 28A.655.050 and any additional goals adopted by the
commission;
(j) Coordinate its activities with the state board of education and
the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(k) Seek advice from the public and all interested educational
organizations in the conduct of its work; and
(l) Establish advisory committees, which may include persons who
are not members of the commission;
(2) Holding meetings and public hearings, which may include
regional meetings and hearings;
(3) Hiring necessary staff and determining the staff's duties and
compensation. However, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide staff support to the commission until the
commission has hired its own staff, and shall provide most of the
technical assistance and logistical support needed by the commission
thereafter. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall be the fiscal agent for the commission. The commission may
direct the office of the superintendent of public instruction to enter
into subcontracts, within the commission's resources, with school
districts, teachers, higher education faculty, state agencies, business
organizations, and other individuals and organizations to assist the
commission in its deliberations; and
(4) Receiving per diem and travel allowances as permitted under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.655.060 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 20 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The Washington commission on student learning is hereby
established. The primary purposes of the commission are to identify
the knowledge and skills all public school students need to know and be
able to do based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, to
develop student assessment and school accountability systems, to review
current school district data reporting requirements and make
recommendations on what data is necessary for the purposes of
accountability and meeting state information needs, and to take other
steps necessary to develop a performance-based education system. The
commission shall include three members of the state board of education,
three members appointed by the governor before July 1, 1992, and five
members appointed no later than June 1, 1993, by the governor elected
in the November 1992 election. The governor shall appoint a chair from
the commission members, and fill any vacancies in gubernatorial
appointments that may occur. The state board of education shall fill
any vacancies of state board of education appointments that may occur.
In making the appointments, educators, business leaders, and parents
shall be represented, and nominations from statewide education,
business, and parent organizations shall be requested. Efforts shall
be made to ensure that the commission reflects the racial and ethnic
diversity of the state's K-12 student population and that the major
geographic regions in the state are represented. Appointees shall be
qualified individuals who are supportive of educational restructuring,
who have a positive record of service, and who will devote sufficient
time to the responsibilities of the commission to ensure that the
objectives of the commission are achieved.
(2) The commission shall establish advisory committees. Membership
of the advisory committees shall include, but not necessarily be
limited to, professionals from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction and the state board of education, and other state
and local educational practitioners and student assessment specialists.
(3) The commission, with the assistance of the advisory committees,
shall:
(a) Develop essential academic learning requirements based on the
student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Essential academic learning
requirements shall be developed, to the extent possible, for each of
the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall
be considered primary. Essential academic learning requirements for
RCW 28A.150.210(1), goal one, and the mathematics component of RCW
28A.150.210(2), goal two, shall be completed no later than March 1,
1995. Essential academic learning requirements that incorporate the
remainder of RCW 28A.150.210 (2), (3), and (4), goals two, three, and
four, shall be completed no later than March 1, 1996. To the maximum
extent possible, the commission shall integrate goal four and the
knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the development of the
essential academic learning requirements;
(b)(i) The commission and superintendent of public instruction
shall develop a statewide academic assessment system for use in the
elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if each
student has learned the essential academic learning requirements
identified in (a) of this subsection. The academic assessment system
shall include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures. Performance standards for
determining if a student has successfully completed an assessment shall
be determined by the commission and the superintendent of public
instruction in consultation with the advisory committees required in
subsection (2) of this section.
(ii) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not learned the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(iii) Assessments measuring the essential academic learning
requirements shall be available for voluntary use by school districts
and shall be required to be administered by school districts according
to the following schedule unless the legislature takes action to delay
or prevent implementation of the assessment system and essential
academic learning requirements.

Assessments
available for
voluntary use
(School years) Assessments
required to be
administered
(School years)

Reading, Writing,
Communication, Mathematics

- Elementary school 1996-97 1997-98

- Middle school 1997-98 2000-01

- High school 1998-99 2000-01

Science

- High school 2002-03 2003-04

- Middle school 2002-03 2003-04

- Elementary school 2003-04 2004-05

Social Studies

- Elementary, middle, and
high school 2004-05 2007-08

Arts

- Middle and high school 2005-06 2008-09

- Elementary school 2005-06 2009-10

Health, Fitness

- Middle and high school 2005-06 2008-09

- Elementary school 2005-06 2009-10

The completed assessments and assessments still in development
shall be transferred by the commission on student learning to the
superintendent of public instruction by June 30, 1999.
(iv) To the maximum extent possible, the commission and the
superintendent of public instruction shall integrate knowledge and
skill areas in development of the assessments.
Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall be
integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(v) The commission on student learning may modify the essential
academic learning requirements and the assessments, as needed, before
June 30, 1999. The superintendent of public instruction may modify the
essential academic learning requirements and the assessments, as
needed, after June 30, 1999. The commission and superintendent shall,
upon request, provide opportunities for the education committees of the
house of representatives and the senate to review the assessments and
proposed modifications to the essential academic learning requirements
before the modifications are adopted.
(vi) The commission and the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop assessments that are directly related to the essential
academic learning requirements, and are not biased toward persons with
different learning styles, racial or ethnic backgrounds, or on the
basis of gender;
(c) ((After a determination is made by the state board of education
that the high school assessment system has been implemented and that it
is sufficiently reliable and valid, successful completion of the high
school assessment shall lead to a certificate of mastery. The
certificate of mastery shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the student has successfully
mastered the essential academic learning requirements during his or her
educational career. The certificate of mastery shall be required for
graduation but shall not be the only requirement for graduation. The
commission shall make recommendations to the state board of education
regarding the relationship between the certificate of mastery and high
school graduation requirements.)) Upon achieving the certificate of
mastery, schools shall provide students with the opportunity to pursue
career and educational objectives through educational pathways that
emphasize integration of academic and vocational education.
Educational pathways may include, but are not limited to, programs such
as work-based learning, school-to-work transition, tech prep,
vocational-technical education, running start, and preparation for
technical college, community college, or university education. Any
middle school, junior high school, or high school using educational
pathways shall ensure that all participating students will continue to
have access to the courses and instruction necessary to meet admission
requirements at baccalaureate institutions. Students shall be allowed
to enter the educational pathway of their choice. Before accepting a
student into an educational pathway, the school shall inform the
student's parent of the pathway chosen, the opportunities available to
the student through the pathway, and the career objectives the student
will have exposure to while pursuing the pathway. Parents and students
dissatisfied with the opportunities available through the selected
educational pathway shall be provided with the opportunity to transfer
the student to any other pathway provided in the school. Schools may
not develop educational pathways that retain students in high school
beyond the date they are eligible to graduate, and may not require
students who transfer between pathways to complete pathway requirements
beyond the date the student is eligible to graduate;
(d) Consider methods to address the unique needs of special
education students when developing the assessments in (b) and (c) of
this subsection;
(e) Consider methods to address the unique needs of highly capable
students when developing the assessments in (b) and (c) of this
subsection;
(f) Develop recommendations on the time, support, and resources,
including technical assistance, needed by schools and school districts
to help students achieve the essential academic learning requirements.
These recommendations shall include an estimate for the legislature,
superintendent of public instruction, and governor on the expected cost
of implementing the academic assessment system;
(g) Develop recommendations for consideration by the higher
education coordinating board for adopting college and university
entrance requirements for public school students that are consistent
with the essential academic learning requirements and the certificate
of mastery;
(h) Review current school district data reporting requirements for
the purposes of accountability and meeting state information needs.
The commission on student learning shall report recommendations to the
joint select committee on education restructuring by September 15,
1996, on:
(i) What data is necessary to compare how school districts are
performing before the essential academic learning requirements and the
assessment system are implemented with how school districts are
performing after the essential academic learning requirements and the
assessment system are implemented; and
(ii) What data is necessary pertaining to school district reports
under the accountability systems developed by the commission on student
learning under this section;
(i) Recommend to the legislature, governor, state board of
education, and superintendent of public instruction:
(i) A statewide accountability system to monitor and evaluate
accurately and fairly at elementary, middle, and high schools the level
of learning occurring in individual schools and school districts with
regard to the goals included in RCW 28A.150.210 (1) through (4). The
accountability system must assess each school individually against its
own baseline, schools with similar characteristics, and schools
statewide. The system shall include school-site, school district, and
state-level accountability reports;
(ii) A school assistance program to help schools and school
districts that are having difficulty helping students meet the
essential academic learning requirements as measured by performance on
the elementary, middle school, and high school assessments;
(iii) A system to intervene in schools and school districts in
which significant numbers of students persistently fail to learn the
essential academic learning requirements or meet the standards
established for the elementary, middle school, and high school
assessments; and
(iv) An awards program to provide incentives to school staff to
help their students learn the essential academic learning requirements,
with each school being assessed individually against its own baseline,
schools with similar characteristics, and the statewide average.
Incentives shall be based on the rate of percentage change of students
achieving the essential academic learning requirements and progress on
meeting the statewide average. School staff shall determine how the
awards will be spent.
The commission shall make recommendations regarding a statewide
accountability system for reading in grades kindergarten through four
by November 1, 1997. Recommendations for an accountability system in
the other subject areas and grade levels shall be made no later than
June 30, 1999;
(j) Report annually by December 1st to the legislature, the
governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and the state board
of education on the progress, findings, and recommendations of the
commission; and
(k) Make recommendations to the legislature and take other actions
necessary or desirable to help students meet the student learning
goals.
(4) The commission shall coordinate its activities with the state
board of education and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(5) The commission shall seek advice broadly from the public and
all interested educational organizations in the conduct of its work,
including holding periodic regional public hearings.
(6) The commission shall select an entity to provide staff support
and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide administrative oversight and be the fiscal agent for the
commission. The commission may direct the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to enter into subcontracts, within the
commission's resources, with school districts, teachers, higher
education faculty, state agencies, business organizations, and other
individuals and organizations to assist the commission in its
deliberations.
(7) Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(8)(a) By September 30, 1997, the commission on student learning,
the state board of education, and the superintendent of public
instruction shall jointly present recommendations to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate regarding the
high school assessments, the certificate of mastery, and high school
graduation requirements.
In preparing recommendations, the commission on student learning
shall convene an ad hoc working group to address questions, including:
(i) What type of document shall be used to identify student
performance and achievement and how will the document be described?
(ii) Should the students be required to pass the high school
assessments in all skill and content areas, or only in select skill and
content areas, to graduate?
(iii) How will the criteria for establishing the standards for
passing scores on the assessments be determined?
(iv) What timeline should be used in phasing-in the assessments as
a graduation requirement?
(v) What options may be used in demonstrating how the results of
the assessments will be displayed in a way that is meaningful to
students, parents, institutions of higher education, and potential
employers?
(vi) Are there other or additional methods by which the assessments
could be used to identify achievement such as endorsements, standards
of proficiency, merit badges, or levels of achievement?
(vii) Should the assessments and certificate of mastery be used to
satisfy college or university entrance criteria for public school
students? If yes, how should these methods be phased-in?
(b) The ad hoc working group shall report its recommendations to
the commission on student learning, the state board of education, and
the superintendent of public instruction by June 15, 1997. The
commission shall report the ad hoc working group's recommendations to
the education committees of the house of representatives and senate by
July 15, 1997. Final recommendations of the commission on student
learning, the state board of education, and the superintendent of
public instruction shall be presented to the education committees of
the house of representatives and the senate by September 30, 1997.
(9) The Washington commission on student learning shall expire on
June 30, 1999.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.655.070 and 1999 c 388 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall identify the
knowledge and skills all public school students need to know and be
able to do based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210,
develop student assessments, and implement the accountability
recommendations and requests regarding assistance, rewards, and
recognition of the academic achievement and accountability commission.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall periodically
revise the essential academic learning requirements, as needed, based
on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Goals one and two
shall be considered primary. To the maximum extent possible, the
superintendent shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and skill
areas in the other goals in the essential academic learning
requirements.
(3) In consultation with the academic achievement and
accountability commission, the superintendent of public instruction
shall maintain and continue to develop and revise a statewide academic
assessment system for use in the elementary, middle, and high school
years designed to determine if each student has mastered the essential
academic learning requirements identified in subsection (1) of this
section. The academic assessment system shall include:
(a) A variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced
and performance-based measures; and
(b) One or more alternative means, including an appeals process, to
demonstrate achievement of the state standards for the high school
assessment system.
(4) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development. In order to assist teachers in their efforts
to provide educational support to individual students, including
students seeking a certificate of mastery, the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students.
(5) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(6) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(7) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(8) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the unique
needs of special education students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(9) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the unique
needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments under
this section.
(10) The superintendent shall determine the validity and
reliability of each content area assessment of the high school
assessment system, including whether each of the content areas is
sufficiently valid and reliable to use for the purposes of the
certificate of mastery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---