BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.010 and 1997 c 58 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A family that includes an adult who has received temporary
assistance for needy families for sixty months after July 27, 1997,
shall be ineligible for further temporary assistance for needy families
assistance.
(2) For the purposes of applying the rules of this section, the
department shall count any month in which an adult family member
received a temporary assistance for needy families cash assistance
grant unless the assistance was provided when the family member was a
minor child and not the head of the household or married to the head of
the household.
(3) The department shall refer recipients who require specialized
assistance to appropriate department programs, crime victims' programs
through the department of community, trade, and economic development,
community-based domestic violence or sexual assault programs, or the
crime victims' compensation program of the department of labor and
industries.
(4) The department may exempt a recipient and the recipient's
family from the application of subsection (1) of this section by reason
of hardship ((or if the recipient meets the family violence options of
section 402(A)(7) of Title IVA of the federal social security act as
amended by P.L. 104-193)). The number of recipients and their families
exempted ((from)) under this subsection (((1) of this section)) for a
fiscal year shall not exceed twenty percent of the average monthly
number of recipients and their families to which assistance is provided
under the temporary assistance for needy families program.
(5) The department shall exempt a recipient and the recipient's
family from the application of subsection (1) of this section if the
recipient meets the family violence options of section 402 (A)(7) of
Title IVA of the federal social security act as amended by P.L. 104-193.
(6) The department shall not exempt a recipient and his or her
family from the application of subsection (1) of this section until
after the recipient has received fifty-two months of assistance under
this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.08A.260 and 1997 c 58 s 313 are each amended to
read as follows:
Recipients who have not obtained paid, unsubsidized employment by
the end of the job search component ((authorized in section 312 of this
act)) shall be referred to a work activity.
(1) Each recipient shall be assessed immediately upon completion of
the job search component. Assessments shall be based upon factors that
are critical to obtaining employment, including but not limited to
education, employment strengths, ((and)) employment history, and
history or risk of family violence. Assessments may be performed by
the department or by a contracted entity. The assessment shall be
based on a uniform, consistent, transferable format that will be
accepted by all agencies and organizations serving the recipient.
Based on the assessment, an individual responsibility plan shall be
prepared that: (a) Sets forth an employment goal and a plan for moving
the recipient immediately into employment; (b) contains the obligation
of the recipient to become and remain employed; (c) moves the recipient
into whatever employment the recipient is capable of handling as
quickly as possible; and (d) describes the services available to the
recipient to enable the recipient to obtain and keep employment.
(2) Recipients who are not engaged in work and work activities, and
do not qualify for a good cause exemption under RCW 74.08A.270, shall
engage in self-directed service as provided in RCW 74.08A.330.
(3) If a recipient refuses to engage in work and work activities
required by the department, the family's grant shall be reduced by the
recipient's share, and may, if the department determines it
appropriate, be terminated.
(4) The department may waive the penalties required under
subsection (3) of this section, subject to a finding that the recipient
refused to engage in work for good cause provided in RCW 74.08A.270.
(5) In implementing this section, the department shall assign the
highest priority to the most employable clients, including adults in
two-parent families and parents in single-parent families that include
older preschool or school-age children to be engaged in work
activities.
(6) In consultation with the recipient, the department or
contractor shall place the recipient into a work activity that is
available in the local area where the recipient resides.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.08A.270 and 2002 c 89 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Good cause reasons for failure to participate in WorkFirst
program components include:
(a) Situations where the recipient is a parent or other relative
personally providing care for a child under the age of six years, and
formal or informal child care, or day care for an incapacitated
individual living in the same home as a dependent child, is necessary
for an individual to participate or continue participation in the
program or accept employment, and such care is not available, and the
department fails to provide such care; ((or))
(b) The recipient is a parent with a child under the age of one
year, except that at the time a child reaches the age of three months,
the recipient is required to participate in one of the following for up
to twenty hours per week:
(i) Instruction or training which has the purpose of improving
parenting skills or child well-being;
(ii) Preemployment or job readiness training;
(iii) Course study leading to a high school diploma or GED; or
(iv) Volunteering in a child care facility licensed under chapter
74.15 RCW so long as the child care facility agrees to accept the
recipient as a volunteer and the child without compensation while the
parent is volunteering at the facility. The volunteer recipient and
his or her child shall not be counted for the purposes of determining
licensed capacity or the staff to child ratio of the facility; or
(c) If the recipient is a past or present victim of family violence
and participation in WorkFirst program components would make it more
difficult for the recipient to escape family violence, unfairly
penalize the recipient for being or having been a victim of family
violence, or place the individual at risk of further family violence.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prevent a recipient from
participating fully in the WorkFirst program on a voluntary basis. A
recipient who chooses to participate fully in the WorkFirst program
shall be considered to be fulfilling the requirements of this section.
(3) For any recipient who claims a good cause reason for failure to
participate in the WorkFirst program based on the fact that the
recipient has a child under the age of one year, the department shall,
within existing resources, conduct an assessment of the recipient
within ninety days and before a job search component is initiated in
order to determine if the recipient has any specific service needs or
employment barriers. The assessment may include identifying the need
for substance abuse treatment, mental health treatment, or domestic
violence or sexual assault services, and shall be used in developing
the recipient's individual responsibility plan.
(4) A parent may only receive the exemption under subsection (1)(b)
of this section one time, for one child.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.08A.275 and 1999 c 340 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each recipient approved to receive temporary assistance for needy
families shall be subject to an employability screening after
determination of program eligibility and before referral to job search.
Each recipient shall also be screened for family violence and notified
of deferrals and exemptions from WorkFirst program requirements for
family violence victims. If the employability screening determines the
recipient is not employable, or meets the criteria specified in RCW
74.08A.270 for a good cause exemption to work requirements, the
department shall defer the job search requirement under RCW 74.08A.285
and refer the recipient immediately to the assessment procedure
required under RCW 74.08A.260.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.08A.280 and 1997 c 58 s 315 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that moving those eligible for assistance
to self-sustaining employment is a goal of the WorkFirst program. It
is the intent of WorkFirst to aid a participant's progress to self-sufficiency by allowing flexibility within the statewide program to
reflect community resources, the local characteristics of the labor
market, and the composition of the caseload. Program success will be
enhanced through effective coordination at regional and local levels,
involving employers, labor representatives, educators, community
leaders, local governments, and social service providers.
(2) The department, through its regional offices, shall collaborate
with employers, recipients, frontline workers, educational
institutions, labor, private industry councils, the work force training
and education coordinating board, community rehabilitation employment
programs, employment and training agencies, local governments, the
employment security department, ((and)) community action agencies, and
community-based domestic violence or sexual assault programs to develop
work programs that are effective and work in their communities. For
planning purposes, the department shall collect and make accessible to
regional offices successful work program models from around the United
States, including the employment partnership program, apprenticeship
programs, microcredit, microenterprise, self-employment, and W-2
Wisconsin works. Work programs shall incorporate local volunteer
citizens in their planning and implementation phases to ensure
community relevance and success.
(3) To reduce administrative costs and to ensure equal statewide
access to services, the department may develop contracts for statewide
welfare-to-work services. These statewide contracts shall support
regional flexibility and ensure that resources follow local labor
market opportunities and recipients' needs.
(4) The secretary shall establish WorkFirst service areas for
purposes of planning WorkFirst programs and for distributing WorkFirst
resources. Service areas shall reflect department regions.
(5) By July 31st of each odd-numbered year, a plan for the
WorkFirst program shall be developed for each region. The plan shall
be prepared in consultation with local and regional sources, adapting
the statewide WorkFirst program to achieve maximum effect for the
participants and the communities within which they reside. Local
consultation shall include to the greatest extent possible input from
local and regional planning bodies for social services and work force
development. The regional and local administrator shall consult with
employers of various sizes, labor representatives, training and
education providers, program participants, economic development
organizations, community organizations, tribes, and local governments
in the preparation of the service area plan.
(6) The secretary has final authority in plan approval or
modification. Regional program implementation may deviate from the
statewide program if specified in a service area plan, as approved by
the secretary.

--- END ---