BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.82.010 and 1984 c 170 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any legal voter of the state or of any political
subdivision thereof, either individually or on behalf of an
organization, desires to demand the recall and discharge of any
elective public officer of the state or of such political subdivision,
as the case may be, under the provisions of sections 33 and 34 of
Article 1 of the Constitution, ((he or they)) the voter or organization
shall prepare a typewritten charge, reciting that such officer, naming
him or her and giving the title of ((his)) the office, has committed an
act or acts of malfeasance, or an act or acts of misfeasance while in
office, or has violated his oath of office, or has violated campaign
finance laws in a manner that probably affected the outcome of the
election, or has been guilty of any two or more of the acts specified
in the Constitution as grounds for recall. The charge shall state the
act or acts complained of in concise language, give a detailed
description including the approximate date, location, and nature of
each act complained of, be signed by the person or persons making the
charge, give their respective post office addresses, and be verified
under oath that ((he or they)) the person or persons believe the charge
or charges to be true and have knowledge of the alleged facts upon
which the stated grounds for recall are based.
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Misfeasance" or "malfeasance" in office means any wrongful
conduct that affects, interrupts, or interferes with the performance of
official duty;
(a) Additionally, "misfeasance" in office means the performance of
a duty in an improper manner; and
(b) Additionally, "malfeasance" in office means the commission of
an unlawful act;
(2) "Violation of the oath of office" means the willful neglect or
failure by an elective public officer to perform faithfully a duty
imposed by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.82.030 and 1984 c 170 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Recall petitions shall be printed on single sheets of paper of good
writing quality (including but not limited to newsprint) not less than
eleven inches in width and not less than fourteen inches in length. No
petition may be circulated or signed prior to the first day of the one
hundred eighty or two hundred seventy day period established by RCW
29.82.025 for that recall petition. Such petitions shall be
substantially in the following form:

WARNING

Every person who signs this petition with any other than his or her
true name, or who knowingly (1) signs more than one of these petitions,
(2) signs this petition when he or she is not a legal voter, or (3)
makes herein any false statement, may be fined, or imprisoned, or both.
Petition for the recall of (here insert the name of the office and
of the person whose recall is petitioned for) to the Honorable (here
insert the name and title of the officer with whom the charge is
filed).
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision in which the recall is to be
held), respectfully direct that a special election be called to
determine whether or not (here insert the name of the person charged
and the office ((which he holds)) held) be recalled and discharged from
((his)) office, for and on account of (((his)) having committed the act
or acts of malfeasance or misfeasance while in office, ((or)) having
violated ((his)) the oath of office, or having violated campaign
finance laws in a manner that probably affected the outcome of the
election, as the case may be), in the following particulars: (here
insert the synopsis of the charge); and each of us for himself or
herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I am a legal
voter of the State of Washington in the precinct and city (or town) and
county written after my name, and my residence address is correctly
stated, and to my knowledge, have signed this petition only once.

Petitioner's
signature Print name
for positive
identification Residence address,
street and number,
if any City
or
Town

County

(Here follow 20 numbered lines divided into columns as below.)

1 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

2 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

3 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

etc.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2004, if
the proposed amendment to Article I, section 33 of the state
Constitution (HJR . . . .) is validly submitted to and is approved and
ratified by the voters at a general election held in November 2003. If
the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void
in its entirety.

--- END ---