BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW
to read as follows:
If a person supplies materials to a facility or program and the
person knows the facility or program is using the type of materials
supplied for composting, the person must disclose to the facility or
program that the property on which the materials were grown had been
treated with a product containing the pesticide ingredient clopyralid
if the property had been treated with such a product within the
previous two years.

--- END ---