BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.330 and 1993 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Appropriate examinations shall be conducted for the promotion of
commissioned patrol officers to the rank of sergeant ((and)),
lieutenant, and captain. The examinations shall be prepared and
conducted under the supervision of the chief of the Washington state
patrol, who shall cause at least thirty days written notice thereof to
be given to all patrol officers eligible for such examinations. The
written notice shall specify the expected type of examination and
relative weights to be assigned if a combination of tests is to be
used. Examinations shall be given once every two years, or whenever
the eligible list becomes exhausted as the case may be. After the
giving of each such examination a new eligible list shall be compiled
replacing any existing eligible list for such rank. Only grades
attained in the last examination given for a particular rank shall be
used in compiling each eligible list therefor. The chief, or in his
discretion a committee of three individuals appointed by him, shall
prepare and conduct the examinations, and thereafter grade and evaluate
them in accordance with the following provisions, or factors: For
promotion to the rank of sergeant ((or)), lieutenant, or captain, the
examination shall consist of one or more of the following components:
(1) Oral examination; (2) written examination; (3) service rating; (4)
personnel record; (5) assessment center or other valid tests that
measures the skills, knowledge, and qualities needed to perform these
jobs. A cutoff score may be set for each testing component that allows
only those scoring above the cutoff on one component to proceed to take
a subsequent component.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.350 and 1998 c 193 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Eligibility for examination for promotion shall be determined as
follows:
Patrol officers with one year of probationary experience, in
addition to three years experience as a regular patrolman before the
date of the first examination occurrence, shall be eligible for
examination for the rank of sergeant; patrol officers with one year of
probationary experience in the rank of sergeant before the date of the
first examination occurrence, in addition to two years as a regular
sergeant, shall be eligible for examination for the rank of lieutenant;
patrol officers with one year of experience in the rank of lieutenant
shall be eligible for examination for the rank of captain.

--- END ---