BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every petition filed in proceedings under this chapter shall
contain a statement alleging whether the child is or may be an Indian
child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903. If the child is an Indian
child as defined under the Indian child welfare act, the provisions of
the act shall apply.
(2) Every order or decree entered in any proceeding under this
chapter shall contain a finding that the Indian child welfare act does
or does not apply. Where there is a finding that the Indian child
welfare act does apply, the decree or order must also contain a finding
that all notice requirements and evidentiary requirements under the
Indian child welfare act have been satisfied.

--- END ---