BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The real and personal property owned or used by a nonprofit
organization is exempt from taxation if the property is used for
solicitation or collection of gifts, donations, or grants for the
support of individual artists and the organization meets all of the
following conditions:
(1) The organization is organized and conducted for nonsectarian
purposes.
(2) The organization is qualified for exemption under section
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code.
(3) The organization is governed by a volunteer board of directors
of at least eight members.
(4) The gifts, donations, and grants are used by the organization
for grants, fellowships, information services, and educational
resources in support of individual artists engaged in the production or
performance of musical, dance, artistic, dramatic, or literary works.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2004 and thereafter.

--- END ---