BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 49.60.400 (Discrimination, preferential treatment
prohibited) and 1999 c 3 s 1; and
(2) RCW 49.60.401 (Short title -- 1999 c 3) and 1999 c 3 s 2.

--- END ---