BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax,
amounts derived from charges made for postage costs, if the postage was
purchased from the United States postal service and the purchase was on
behalf of a buyer to deliver printed materials to recipients at no
charge to the recipients, as directed by the buyer. This deduction is
provided only if the charges are separately stated and represent the
actual cost of the purchase of the postage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made for
postage costs, if the postage was purchased by the seller from the
United States postal service and the purchase was on behalf of a buyer
to deliver printed materials to recipients at no charge to the
recipients, as directed by the consumer. This exemption is provided
only if the charges for postage are separately stated and represent the
actual cost of the purchase of the postage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax imposed by this chapter shall not apply to the value of
postage, if the postage was purchased by the seller from the United
States postal service and the purchase was on behalf of a consumer to
deliver printed materials to recipients at no charge to the recipients,
as directed by the consumer. This exemption is provided only if the
charges for postage are separately stated and represent the actual cost
of the purchase of the postage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act applies retroactively.

--- END ---