BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.42.010 and 1997 c 392 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Basic necessities of life" means food, water, shelter,
clothing, and medically necessary health care, including but not
limited to health-related treatment or activities, hygiene, oxygen, and
medication.
(2)(a) "Bodily injury" means physical pain or injury, illness, or
an impairment of physical condition;
(b) "Substantial bodily harm" means bodily injury which involves a
temporary but substantial disfigurement, or which causes a temporary
but substantial loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part
or organ, or which causes a fracture of any bodily part;
(c) "Great bodily harm" means bodily injury which creates a high
probability of death, or which causes serious permanent disfigurement,
or which causes a permanent or protracted loss or impairment of the
function of any bodily part or organ.
(3) "Child" means a person under eighteen years of age and includes
an unborn quick child.
(4) "Dependent person" means a person who, because of physical or
mental disability, or because of extreme advanced age, is dependent
upon another person to provide the basic necessities of life. A
resident of a nursing home, as defined in RCW 18.51.010, a resident of
an adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, and a frail elder
or vulnerable adult, as defined in RCW 74.34.020(((8))) (13), is
presumed to be a dependent person for purposes of this chapter.
(5) "Employed" means hired by a dependent person, another person
acting on behalf of a dependent person, or by an organization or
governmental entity, to provide to a dependent person any of the basic
necessities of life. A person may be "employed" regardless of whether
the person is paid for the services or, if paid, regardless of who pays
for the person's services.
(6) "Parent" has its ordinary meaning and also includes a guardian
and the authorized agent of a parent or guardian.
(7) "Abandons" means leaving a child or other dependent person
without the means or ability to obtain one or more of the basic
necessities of life.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.42.020 and 1997 c 392 s 510 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A parent of a child, the person entrusted with the physical
custody of a child or dependent person, or a person employed to provide
to the child or dependent person the basic necessities of life is
guilty of criminal mistreatment in the first degree if he or she
recklessly, as defined in RCW 9A.08.010, causes great bodily harm to a
child or dependent person by withholding any of the basic necessities
of life, or if a mother recklessly causes great bodily harm to her
unborn quick child by the use of any illicit drug including, but not
limited to, cocaine, heroin, opium, amphetamine, methamphetamine,
lysergic acid diethylamide, mescaline, peyote, psilocybin, and
methadone.
(2) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.42.030 and 1997 c 392 s 511 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A parent of a child, the person entrusted with the physical
custody of a child or dependent person, or a person employed to provide
to the child or dependent person the basic necessities of life is
guilty of criminal mistreatment in the second degree if he or she
recklessly, as defined in RCW 9A.08.010((, either)):
(a) Creates an imminent and substantial risk of death or great
bodily harm((, or));
(b) Causes substantial bodily harm by withholding any of the basic
necessities of life; or
(c) Recklessly causes substantial bodily harm to her unborn quick
child by the use of any illicit drug including, but not limited to,
cocaine, heroin, opium, amphetamine, methamphetamine, lysergic acid
diethylamide, mescaline, peyote, psilocybin, and methadone.
(2) Criminal mistreatment in the second degree is a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, and morals or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---