BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that financial
illiteracy has reached record proportions, and that the average high
school student lacks even a basic knowledge of personal finance.
Washington schools require reading, writing, and arithmetic to ensure
that our children have the necessary foundation to earn a paycheck, but
not the financial skills necessary to survive on this paycheck.
In addition, legislature recognizes the damaging effects of not
properly preparing youth for the financial realities of modern life,
including bankruptcy, poor retirement planning, mounting debt, and a
lower standard of living for Washington families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall develop or adopt, and shall
make available to schools, one or more model programs for youth
financial education. A program under this section shall be designed to
incorporate financial education throughout the curriculum for grades
kindergarten through twelve and shall be based on the concept of
achieving financial literacy through the teaching of personal financial
management skills and the basic principles involved with earning,
spending, saving, and investing.
(2) Each school district is encouraged to adopt and implement the
model financial education programs developed under this section or one
or more similar financial education programs.
(3) To the extent that federal funds are available for these
purposes, the superintendent of public instruction shall use those
funds for grants to public schools and other measures to encourage
implementation of financial education programs.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.230.020 and 1991 c 116 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
All common schools shall give instruction in reading, penmanship,
orthography, written and mental arithmetic, financial literacy,
geography, the history of the United States, English grammar,
physiology and hygiene with special reference to the effects of alcohol
and drug abuse on the human system, science with special reference to
the environment, and such other studies as may be prescribed by rule or
regulation of the state board of education. All teachers shall stress
the importance of the cultivation of manners, the fundamental
principles of honesty, honor, industry and economy, the minimum
requisites for good health including the beneficial effect of physical
exercise and methods to prevent exposure to and transmission of
sexually transmitted diseases, and the worth of kindness to all living
creatures and the land. The prevention of child abuse may be offered
as part of the curriculum in the common schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
The state board of education shall establish a pilot program
authorizing and assisting up to five local school districts in the
implementation of programs on teaching personal financial literacy.
The purpose of the pilot program is to determine the best methods of
equipping students with the knowledge and skills they need, before they
become self-supporting, to make critical decisions regarding their
personal finances. The components of personal financial literacy
covered in the pilot program shall include, at a minimum, consumer
financial education, personal finance, and personal credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 3 and 4 of this act take effect
January 1, 2005.

--- END ---