BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.06.150 and 2002 c 371 s 906, 2002 c 354 s 202, and
2002 c 110 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The board shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and
provisions of this chapter, as now or hereafter amended, and with the
best standards of personnel administration, regarding the basis and
procedures to be followed for:
(1) The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an
employee;
(2) Certification of names for vacancies, including departmental
promotions, with the number of names equal to six more names than there
are vacancies to be filled, such names representing applicants rated
highest on eligibility lists: PROVIDED, That when other applicants
have scores equal to the lowest score among the names certified, their
names shall also be certified;
(3) Examinations for all positions in the competitive and
noncompetitive service;
(4) Appointments;
(5) Training and career development;
(6) Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of
probationary employees, depending on the job requirements of the class,
except as follows:
(a) Entry level state park rangers shall serve a probationary
period of twelve months;
(b) The probationary period of campus police officer appointees who
are required to attend the Washington state criminal justice training
commission basic law enforcement academy shall extend from the date of
appointment until twelve months from the date of successful completion
of the basic law enforcement academy, or twelve months from the date of
appointment if academy training is not required. The board shall adopt
rules to ensure that employees promoting to campus police officer who
are required to attend the Washington state criminal justice training
commission basic law enforcement academy shall have the trial service
period extend from the date of appointment until twelve months from the
date of successful completion of the basic law enforcement academy, or
twelve months from the date of appointment if academy training is not
required;
(7) Transfers;
(8)(a) Sick leaves and vacations; and
(b) Bereavement leave of five working days, not to be deducted from
vacation or sick leave;
(9) Hours of work;
(10) Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment, both
according to seniority;
(11) Collective bargaining procedures:
(a) After certification of an exclusive bargaining representative
and upon the representative's request, the director shall hold an
election among employees in a bargaining unit to determine by a
majority whether to require as a condition of employment membership in
the certified exclusive bargaining representative on or after the
thirtieth day following the beginning of employment or the date of such
election, whichever is the later, and the failure of an employee to
comply with such a condition of employment constitutes cause for
dismissal: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no more often than once in each
twelve-month period after expiration of twelve months following the
date of the original election in a bargaining unit and upon petition of
thirty percent of the members of a bargaining unit the director shall
hold an election to determine whether a majority wish to rescind such
condition of employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for purposes of this
clause, membership in the certified exclusive bargaining representative
is satisfied by the payment of monthly or other periodic dues and does
not require payment of initiation, reinstatement, or any other fees or
fines and includes full and complete membership rights: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That in order to safeguard the right of nonassociation of
public employees, based on bona fide religious tenets or teachings of
a church or religious body of which such public employee is a member,
such public employee shall pay to the union, for purposes within the
program of the union as designated by such employee that would be in
harmony with his or her individual conscience, an amount of money
equivalent to regular union dues minus any included monthly premiums
for union-sponsored insurance programs, and such employee shall not be
a member of the union but is entitled to all the representation rights
of a union member;
(b) Agreements between agencies and certified exclusive bargaining
representatives providing for grievance procedures and collective
negotiations on all personnel matters over which the appointing
authority of the appropriate bargaining unit of such agency may
lawfully exercise discretion;
(c) Written agreements may contain provisions for payroll
deductions of employee organization dues upon authorization by the
employee member and for the cancellation of such payroll deduction by
the filing of a proper prior notice by the employee with the appointing
authority and the employee organization: PROVIDED, That nothing
contained herein permits or grants to any employee the right to strike
or refuse to perform his or her official duties;
(d) A collective bargaining agreement entered into under this
subsection before July 1, 2004, covering employees subject to RCW
41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130, that expires after July 1,
2004, shall remain in full force during its duration, or until
superseded by a collective bargaining agreement entered into by the
parties under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130. However,
an agreement entered into before July 1, 2004, may not be renewed or
extended beyond July 1, 2005. This subsection (11) does not apply to
collective bargaining negotiations or collective bargaining agreements
entered into under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130;
(12) Adoption and revision of a comprehensive classification plan
for all positions in the classified service, based on investigation and
analysis of the duties and responsibilities of each such position.
(a) The board shall not adopt job classification revisions or class
studies unless implementation of the proposed revision or study will
result in net cost savings, increased efficiencies, or improved
management of personnel or services, and the proposed revision or study
has been approved by the director of financial management in accordance
with chapter 43.88 RCW.
(b) Reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments are
governed by (a) of this subsection and RCW 41.06.152;
(13) Allocation and reallocation of positions within the
classification plan;
(14) Adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect
the prevailing rates in Washington state private industries and other
governmental units but the rates in the salary schedules or plans shall
be increased if necessary to attain comparable worth under an
implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and that, for institutions of
higher education and related boards, shall be competitive for positions
of a similar nature in the state or the locality in which an
institution of higher education or related board is located, such
adoption and revision subject to approval by the director of financial
management in accordance with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW;
(15) Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay
grade based on length of service for all employees whose standards of
performance are such as to permit them to retain job status in the
classified service;
(16) Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the
agency director, whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make
a domiciliary move in accepting a transfer or other employment with the
state. An agency must provide lump sum compensation within existing
resources. If the person receiving the relocation payment terminates
or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than layoff,
disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency
director, within one year of the date of the employment, the state is
entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;
(17) Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing
statutes, with recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and
subsequent reemployment for veterans and their surviving spouses by
giving such eligible veterans and their surviving spouses additional
credit in computing their seniority by adding to their unbroken state
service, as defined by the board, the veteran's service in the military
not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section, "veteran"
means any person who has one or more years of active military service
in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who has less
than one year's service and is discharged with a disability incurred in
the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the government
and who, upon termination of such service has received an honorable
discharge, a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record,
or a release from active military service with evidence of service
other than that for which an undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable
discharge shall be given: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the surviving spouse
of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of this section regardless of
the veteran's length of active military service: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That for the purposes of this section "veteran" does not include any
person who has voluntarily retired with twenty or more years of active
military service and whose military retirement pay is in excess of five
hundred dollars per month;
(18) Permitting agency heads to delegate the authority to appoint,
reduce, dismiss, suspend, or demote employees within their agencies if
such agency heads do not have specific statutory authority to so
delegate: PROVIDED, That the board may not authorize such delegation
to any position lower than the head of a major subdivision of the
agency;
(19) Assuring persons who are or have been employed in classified
positions before July 1, 1993, will be eligible for employment,
reemployment, transfer, and promotion in respect to classified
positions covered by this chapter;
(20) Affirmative action in appointment, promotion, transfer,
recruitment, training, and career development; development and
implementation of affirmative action goals and timetables; and
monitoring of progress against those goals and timetables.
The board shall consult with the human rights commission in the
development of rules pertaining to affirmative action. The department
of personnel shall transmit a report annually to the human rights
commission which states the progress each state agency has made in
meeting affirmative action goals and timetables.
Notwithstanding this section and rules of the board adopted under
this section, agencies may place employees on temporary unpaid leave
during the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium for the purpose of implementing
appropriations reductions enacted in the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act. Mandatory unpaid leave must be approved by the
agency director, and must be, to the greatest extent possible, mutually
agreeable to the employee and employer. Employees taking mandatory
temporary unpaid leave will not lose seniority, leave accrual, or
health insurance benefits.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.06.133 and 2002 c 354 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and
provisions of this chapter and with the best standards of personnel
administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:
(1) The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an
employee;
(2) Training and career development;
(3) Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of
probationary employees, depending on the job requirements of the class,
except ((that)) as follows:
(a) Entry level state park rangers shall serve a probationary
period of twelve months; and
(b) The probationary period of campus police officer appointees who
are required to attend the Washington state criminal justice training
commission basic law enforcement academy shall extend from the date of
appointment until twelve months from the date of successful completion
of the basic law enforcement academy, or twelve months from the date of
appointment if academy training is not required. The director shall
adopt rules to ensure that employees promoting to campus police officer
who are required to attend the Washington state criminal justice
training commission basic law enforcement academy shall have the trial
service period extend from the date of appointment until twelve months
from the date of successful completion of the basic law enforcement
academy, or twelve months from the date of appointment if academy
training is not required;
(4) Transfers;
(5) Promotional preferences;
(6)(a) Sick leaves and vacations; and
(b) Bereavement leave of five working days, not to be deducted from
vacation or sick leave;
(7) Hours of work;
(8) Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment, except for
the financial basis for layoffs;
(9) The number of names to be certified for vacancies;
(10) Adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect
the prevailing rates in Washington state private industries and other
governmental units. The rates in the salary schedules or plans shall
be increased if necessary to attain comparable worth under an
implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and, for institutions of higher
education and related boards, shall be competitive for positions of a
similar nature in the state or the locality in which an institution of
higher education or related board is located. Such adoption and
revision is subject to approval by the director of financial management
in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW;
(11) Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay
grade based on length of service for all employees whose standards of
performance are such as to permit them to retain job status in the
classified service;
(12) Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the
agency director, whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make
a domiciliary move in accepting a transfer or other employment with the
state. An agency must provide lump sum compensation within existing
resources. If the person receiving the relocation payment terminates
or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than layoff,
disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency
director, within one year of the date of the employment, the state is
entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;
(13) Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing
statutes, with recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and
subsequent reemployment for veterans and their surviving spouses by
giving such eligible veterans and their surviving spouses additional
credit in computing their seniority by adding to their unbroken state
service, as defined by the director, the veteran's service in the
military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active military
service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who
has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability
incurred in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the
government and who, upon termination of such service, has received an
honorable discharge, a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable
record, or a release from active military service with evidence of
service other than that for which an undesirable, bad conduct, or
dishonorable discharge shall be given. However, the surviving spouse
of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of this section regardless of
the veteran's length of active military service. For the purposes of
this section, "veteran" does not include any person who has voluntarily
retired with twenty or more years of active military service and whose
military retirement pay is in excess of five hundred dollars per month.
Rules adopted under this section by the director shall provide for
local administration and management by the institutions of higher
education and related boards, subject to periodic audit and review by
the director.
Rules adopted by the director under this section may be superseded
by the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under
RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130. The supersession of
such rules shall only affect employees in the respective collective
bargaining units.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 2002 c 110 s 1 is repealed effective July 1,
2004.

--- END ---