BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Research has shown that early, intensive
assistance can significantly improve reading and language skills for
children who are struggling academically. This early research-based
assistance has been successful in reducing the number of children who
require specialized programs. However, by being effective in reducing
the number of students eligible for these programs, school district
funding is reduced.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The special services pilot program is created. The purpose of
the program is to encourage participating school districts to provide
early intensive reading and language assistance to students who are
struggling academically. The goal of such assistance is to effectively
address reading and language difficulties resulting in a substantially
greater proportion of students meeting the progressively increasing
performance standards for both the aggregate and disaggregated
subgroups under federal law.
(2) A maximum of two school districts may participate. Interested
districts shall apply no later than May 15, 2003, to the superintendent
of public instruction to participate in the pilot program established
by this section. The superintendent shall make a decision no later
than June 15, 2003, regarding which two school districts may
participate in the program.
(3) The pilot program is intended to be six years, to begin in the
2003-04 school year and conclude in the 2008-09 school year, unless the
program is extended by the legislature.
(4) School districts participating in the pilot program shall
receive state special education funding in accordance with state
special education funding formulas and a separate pilot program
appropriation from sources other than special education funds. The
separate appropriation shall be calculated as follows:
(a) The school district's estimated state special education funding
for the current year based on the school district's average percentage
of students age three through twenty-one who were eligible for special
education services in the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years as reported
to the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(b) Less the school district's actual state special education
funding based on the district's current percentage of students age
three through twenty-one eligible for special education services as
reported to the superintendent of public instruction.
(5) It is not the intent of this act to increase or decrease a
district's ability to access the safety net for high cost students by
virtue of the district's participation in this pilot program.
Districts participating in this pilot program shall have access to the
special education safety net using a modified application approach for
the office of the superintendent of public instruction Worksheet A -demonstration of financial need. The superintendent shall create a
modified application to include all special education revenues received
by the district, all pilot program funding, and include expenditures
for students with individual education plans and expenditures for
students generating pilot program revenue. Districts participating in
this pilot project that seek safety net funding shall convincingly
demonstrate to the committee that any change in demonstrated need on
the Worksheet A is not attributable to their participation in this
pilot project.
(6) School districts participating in the program must agree to:
(a) Implement a tiered set of research-based instructional
interventions addressing individual student needs that address reading
and language deficits;
(b) Use multiple diagnostic instruments to identify the literacy
needs of each student;
(c) Assure parents are informed of diagnosed student needs, and
have input into designed interventions;
(d) Actively engage parents as partners in the learning process;
(e) Comply with state special education requirements; and
(f) Participate in an evaluation of the program as determined by
the superintendent of public instruction. This may include
contributing funds and staff expertise for the design and
implementation of the evaluation. Districts shall annually review and
report progress to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(7) By December 15, 2007, the superintendent of public instruction
shall submit a report to the governor and legislature that summarizes
the effectiveness of the pilot program. The report shall also include
a recommendation as to whether or not the pilot program should be
continued, expanded, or otherwise modified.
(8) This section expires June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---