BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that it is the
policy of this state not to interfere with an employee's choice about
whether to join or be represented by an employee organization. For
this reason, the state should not subsidize efforts by an employer to
encourage or discourage unionization.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to prohibit an employer
from using state funds and facilities for the purpose of influencing
employees to support or oppose unionization and to prohibit an employer
from seeking to influence employees to support or oppose unionization
while these employees are performing work on a state contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Employee organization" means an organization of any kind in
which employees participate and which exists for the purpose, in whole
or in part, of collective bargaining with employers.
(2) "Employer" means: (a) A person, firm, corporation,
partnership, business trust, legal representative, or other business
entity that engages in a business, industry, profession, or activity in
this state; and (b) the state or a public agency.
(3) "Encourage or discourage unionization" means an attempt by an
employer to influence the decision of its employees in this state or
the employees of its subcontractors regarding whether to: (a) Support
or oppose an employee organization that represents or seeks to
represent those employees for the purpose of collective bargaining; or
(b) become a member of an employee organization.
(4) "Public agency" means political subdivisions of the state and
any municipal corporation or quasi-municipal corporation.
(5) "State" means the state of Washington.
(6) "State contractor" means an employer that receives state funds
for providing services pursuant to a written contract with: (a) The
state; or (b) a public agency of the state that is using state funds to
fund, in whole or in part, a service contract of more than fifty
thousand dollars.
(7) "State funds" means moneys appropriated by the state for any
purpose, whether from the state treasury or from moneys in the custody
of the state treasurer. "State funds" includes moneys appropriated by
the state and transferred to a public agency only if the funds are used
by the public agency to fund, in whole or in part, a service contract
of more than fifty thousand dollars.
(8) "State property" means any property or facility owned or leased
by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1)(a)(i) A state contractor that receives
state funds of more than fifty thousand dollars under a contract with
the state may not use those funds to encourage or discourage
unionization during the term of the contract, including any extensions
or renewals of the contract. The dollar threshold in this subsection
(1)(a)(i) does not limit the application of other provisions of this
chapter that restrict the use of state funds. All contracts of more
than fifty thousand dollars awarded by the state must contain the
prohibition stated in this subsection.
(ii) State funds may not be used to reimburse a state contractor
for costs incurred to encourage or discourage unionization. A request
for reimbursement from state funds by a state contractor must include
a certification that the contractor is not seeking reimbursement for
costs incurred to encourage or discourage unionization.
(iii) A state contractor may not encourage or discourage
unionization by employees who are performing work on a service
contract, including a public works contract, for the state.
(b) A state contractor subject to this subsection that makes
expenditures to encourage or discourage unionization must maintain
records sufficient to show that state funds have not been used for
those expenditures and that no reimbursement from state funds has been
sought for these costs. The state contractor must provide those
records to the attorney general on request.
(2)(a) A recipient of a grant of state funds, including state funds
disbursed as a grant by any public agency of the state, may not use the
funds to encourage or discourage unionization.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the recipient of a grant of
state funds must account for the funds as follows:
(i) State funds designated by the grantor for use for a specific
expenditure of the recipient shall be accounted for as allocated to
that expenditure.
(ii) State funds that are not designated as described in (b)(i) of
this subsection shall be allocated on a pro rata basis to all
expenditures by the recipient that support the program for which the
grant is made.
(c) Before disbursement of a grant of state funds, the recipient
must certify to the state that none of the funds will be used to
encourage or discourage unionization.
(d) A grant recipient that makes expenditures to encourage or
discourage unionization must maintain records sufficient to show that
state funds have not been used for those expenditures. The grant
recipient must provide those records to the attorney general on
request.
(3) A public employer receiving state funds may not use any of the
funds to encourage or discourage unionization.
(4)(a) A private employer receiving state funds of more than ten
thousand dollars in a calendar year on account of its participation in
a state program may not use any of the funds to encourage or discourage
unionization.
(b) As a condition of participating in the state program under
which the employer will receive state funds of more than ten thousand
dollars in a calendar year, the private employer must certify to the
state that none of the funds will be used to encourage or discourage
unionization.
(c) A private employer subject to this subsection that makes
expenditures to encourage or discourage unionization must maintain
records sufficient to show that state funds have not been used for
those expenditures. The private employer must provide those records to
the attorney general on request.
(5) An employer who derives revenue from state property and who
uses that property through a lease, concession contract, or other
agreement with the state may not encourage or discourage unionization
by his or her employees who are employed on or in relation to that
state property.
(6) Each contract for the payment of state funds to an employer
must contain a clause requiring the employer to comply with this
chapter.
(7) For the purposes of this section:
(a) Expenses, including legal and consulting fees and salaries of
supervisors and employees, incurred for research for, or preparation,
planning, or coordination of, or carrying out, an activity to encourage
or discourage unionization, shall be treated as paid or incurred for
that activity.
(b) To account for expenditures, if state funds and other funds are
commingled, any expenditures to encourage or discourage unionization
must be allocated between state funds and other funds on a pro rata
basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A person or entity is liable to the
state for funds reimbursed for expenditures or expended in violation of
section 3(1)(a) (i) or (ii), (2), or (4) of this act plus a civil
penalty equal to twice the amount of those funds.
(2) A public official who knowingly authorizes the use of state
funds in violation of section 3(3) of this act is liable to the state
for the amount of those funds.
(3) A state contractor who violates section 3(1)(a)(iii) of this
act is liable to the state for a civil penalty of one thousand dollars
per employee per violation.
(4) An employer who violates section 3(5) of this act is liable to
the state for a civil penalty of one thousand dollars per employee per
violation.
(5) A taxpayer may bring a civil action in the name of the state
seeking injunctive relief, civil penalties, and other appropriate
equitable relief for a violation of this chapter. A prevailing
plaintiff in an action under this subsection is entitled to recover
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This chapter does not apply to an activity
performed or an expense incurred in connection with:
(1) Addressing a grievance or negotiating or administering a
collective bargaining agreement;
(2) Allowing an employee organization or its representatives access
to the employer's facilities or property;
(3) Performing an activity required by federal or state law or by
a collective bargaining agreement; or
(4) Negotiating, entering into, or carrying out a voluntary
recognition agreement with an employee organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
All contracts entered into under this chapter on or after September
1, 2003, are subject to the requirements established under chapter
49.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
All contracts entered into under this chapter on or after September
1, 2003, are subject to the requirements established under chapter
49.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 39.29 RCW
to read as follows:
All contracts entered into under this chapter on or after September
1, 2003, are subject to the requirements established under chapter
49.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
All contracts entered into and purchases made, including leasing or
renting, under this chapter on or after September 1, 2003, are subject
to the requirements established under chapter 49.-- RCW (sections 1
through 5 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 47.28 RCW
to read as follows:
All contracts entered into under this chapter on or after September
1, 2003, are subject to the requirements established under chapter
49.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act does not apply to expenditures or
requests for reimbursements made before September 1, 2003, or to a
grant or contract entered into before September 1, 2003, unless the
grant or contract is modified, extended, or renewed on or after
September 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---