BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.05.020 and 1998 c 269 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Community facility" means a group care facility operated for
the care of juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185.
A county detention facility that houses juveniles committed to the
department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant to a contract with the
department is not a community facility.
(2) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(3) "Equitable distribution" or "distribute equitably" means siting
or locating community facilities in a manner that reasonably reflects
the proportion of juveniles sentenced to the department from each
county or rural multicounty geographic area designated by the
department, and, to the extent practicable, the proportion of such
juveniles residing in particular jurisdictions or communities within
such counties or geographic areas. Equitable distribution is a policy
goal, not a basis for any legal challenge to the siting, construction,
occupancy, or operation of any facility anywhere in the state.
(4) "Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has
been sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the
department under RCW 13.40.185.
(((4))) (5) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a
community facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall prepare a projected list of counties and
rural multicounty geographic areas in which community facilities need
to be sited during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2004, and every
biennium thereafter starting with the biennium beginning July 1, 2005,
and transmit the list to the office of financial management and the
counties on the list. The list may be updated as needed. In preparing
the list, the department shall make substantial efforts to provide for
the equitable distribution of community facilities among counties. The
department shall give great weight to the following factors in
determining equitable distribution:
(a) The locations of existing community facilities owned or
operated by, or operated under contract with, the department in each
county;
(b) The number and proportion of juvenile offenders committed to
the department residing in the county or rural multicounty geographic
area; and
(c) The number of juvenile registered sex offenders classified as
level II or III and juvenile sex offenders registered as homeless per
thousand persons residing in the county.
(2)(a) In preparing the list required under subsection (1) of this
section, the department shall:
(i) Give great weight to the factors identified in subsection (1)
of this section;
(ii) Use the information contained in the most recent edition of
the report required under subsection (4) of this section; and
(iii) Use the criteria adopted under subsection (7) of this
section.
(b) Prior to finalizing the list of projected community facilities
required under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
consult with the county legislative authorities of each county
identified on the list. The department shall also hold at least one
public hearing within each such county or rural multicounty geographic
area, including, if known, the affected part of the county.
(3) The department shall submit, along with the list required under
subsection (1) of this section, the operational requirements for the
facilities on the list to the office of financial management and the
counties on the list.
(4) To carry out the purposes of subsection (1) of this section,
the department shall, no later than July 1, 2004, develop a map of the
state that identifies the locations of existing facilities and the
counties or rural multicounty geographic areas needing projected
facilities identified in subsection (1) of this section during the
biennium. The department shall update the map at least once per
biennium. The department shall also maintain data on the number and
proportion of juvenile offenders identified in subsection (1)(b) and
(c) of this section and shall biennially publish a report including the
most recent version of the map and offender data for the counties and
rural multicounty geographic areas.
(5) A county, and any county designated by the department within a
rural multicounty geographic area, that is included on the list
required under subsection (1) of this section planning under RCW
36.70A.040 shall adopt development regulations that designate areas or
zones that allow the siting of each projected community facility on the
list within the county using its process for siting essential public
facilities under RCW 36.70A.200 and section 8 of this act.
(6) A county, and any county designated by the department within a
rural multicounty geographic area, that is included on the list
required under subsection (1) of this section not planning under RCW
36.70A.040 shall adopt development regulations that designate areas or
zones that allow the siting of each projected community facility on the
list within the county using the procedures established in section 9 of
this act.
(7) The department shall, by rule, adopt facility criteria and
shall consult with local governments in such rule making.

Sec. 3 RCW 72.05.400 and 1998 c 269 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the department operates, or the secretary enters a
contract to operate, a community facility, the community facility may
be operated only after the public notification and opportunities for
review and comment as required by this section.
(2) The secretary shall establish a process for early and
continuous public participation in establishing or relocating community
facilities. The process shall include, at a minimum, public meetings
in the local communities affected, as well as opportunities for written
and oral comments, in the following manner:
(a) If there are more than three sites initially selected as
potential locations and the selection process by the secretary or a
service provider reduces the number of possible sites for a community
facility to no fewer than three, the secretary or the chief operating
officer of the service provider shall notify the public of the possible
siting and hold at least two public hearings in each community where a
community facility may be sited at least forty-five days before a final
selection is made.
(b) When the secretary or service provider has determined the
community facility's location, the secretary or the chief operating
officer of the service provider shall hold at least one additional
public hearing in the community where the community facility will be
sited.
(c) When the secretary has entered negotiations with a service
provider and only one site is under consideration, then at least two
public hearings shall be held.
(d) To provide adequate notice of((,)) and opportunity for
interested persons to comment on((,)) a proposed location, the
secretary or the chief operating officer of the service provider shall
make a good faith effort to provide at least fourteen days' advance
notice of the ((meeting to)) public hearings to at least the following:
(i) The appropriate legislative authorities of the affected
counties, cities, and towns;
(ii) Local government planning agencies in the affected
communities;
(iii) All newspapers of general circulation in the ((community,))
local area and all radio stations and television stations generally
available to persons in the community((,)) where the potential site is
located;
(iv) Any school district, private school, or kindergarten in which
the community facility would be sited or whose boundary is within two
miles of a proposed community facility, any institution of higher
education, any library district ((in which the community facility would
be sited, local business or fraternal organizations that request
notification from the secretary or agency, and any person or property
owner within a one-half mile radius of the proposed community
facility)), and all other local government offices within a one-half
mile radius of the proposed site or sites;
(v) The local chamber of commerce, local economic development
agencies, and any other local organizations that request such
notification from the department; and
(vi) Written notification to all residents and property owners
within a one-half mile radius of the proposed site or sites.
(3) The notice required under subsection (2) of this section must
also inform the public that any interested person or entity, including
a local government entity, is invited to submit written comments
regarding a proposed location, including comments regarding whether the
site meets the equitable distribution and other statutory requirements
for the facility. Written comments must be submitted not later than
thirty days following the date notice is issued pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section.
(4) The department must consider the testimony received at the
public hearings and any written comments submitted before making a
final selection of the site for the location or relocation of a
community facility. The department shall issue a written analysis of
the final selection, including how the selection was consistent with
the requirements of section 2 of this act.
(5) Before initiating ((this)) the process in subsection (2) of
this section, the department shall contact local government planning
agencies in the communities containing the proposed community facility.
The department shall coordinate with local government agencies to
ensure that opportunities are provided for effective citizen input and
to reduce the duplication of notice and meetings.
(((3))) (6) The secretary shall not issue a license to any service
provider until the service provider submits proof that the requirements
of this section have been met.
(((4))) (7) If local government land use regulations require that
a special use or conditional use permit be submitted and approved
before a community facility can be sited, and the process for obtaining
the permit includes public notice and hearing requirements similar to
those required under this section, the requirements of this section
shall not apply to the extent they would duplicate requirements under
the local land use regulations.
(8) This section shall apply only to community facilities sited
after September 1, 1998.

Sec. 4 RCW 72.65.010 and 1992 c 7 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
(1) "Department" ((shall)) means the department of corrections.
(2) "Equitable distribution" or "distribute equitably" means siting
or locating work release facilities in a manner that reasonably
reflects the proportion of offenders sentenced to the custody or
supervision of the department by the courts of each county or rural
multicounty geographic area designated by the department, and, to the
extent practicable, the proportion of such offenders residing in
particular jurisdictions or communities within such counties or rural
multicounty geographic areas. Equitable distribution is a policy goal,
not a basis for any legal challenge to the siting, construction,
occupancy, or operation of any facility anywhere in the state.
(3) "Prisoner" means a person either male or female, convicted of
a felony and sentenced by the superior court to a term of confinement
and treatment in a state correctional institution under the
jurisdiction of the department.
(4) "Secretary" ((shall)) means the secretary of corrections.
(((3))) (5) "State correctional institutions" shall mean and
include all state adult correctional facilities established pursuant to
law under the jurisdiction of the department for the treatment of
convicted felons sentenced to a term of confinement.
(((4) "Prisoner" shall mean a person either male or female,
convicted of a felony and sentenced by the superior court to a term of
confinement and treatment in a state correctional institution under the
jurisdiction of the department.
(5))) (6) "Superintendent" ((shall)) means the superintendent of a
state correctional institution, camp or other facility now or hereafter
established under the jurisdiction of the department pursuant to law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 72.65 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall prepare a projected list of counties and
rural multicounty geographic areas in which work release facilities
need to be sited during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2004, and
every biennium thereafter starting with the biennium beginning July 1,
2005, and transmit the list to the office of financial management and
the counties on the list. The list may be updated as needed. In
preparing the list, the department shall make substantial efforts to
provide for the equitable distribution of work release facilities among
counties. The department shall give great weight to the following
factors in determining equitable distribution:
(a) The locations of existing residential facilities owned or
operated by, or operated under contract with, the department in each
county;
(b) The number and proportion of adult offenders sentenced to the
custody or supervision of the department by the courts of the county or
rural multicounty geographic area; and
(c) The number of adult registered sex offenders classified as
level II or III and adult sex offenders registered as homeless per
thousand persons residing in the county.
(2)(a) In preparing the list required under subsection (1) of this
section, the department shall:
(i) Give great weight to the factors identified in subsection (1)
of this section;
(ii) Use the information contained in the most recent edition of
the report required under subsection (4) of this section; and
(iii) Use the criteria adopted under subsection (7) of this
section.
(b) Prior to finalizing the list of projected work release
facilities required under subsection (1) of this section, the
department shall consult with the county legislative authorities of
each county identified on the list. The department also shall hold at
least one public hearing within each such county or rural multicounty
geographic area, including, if known, the affected part of the county
or rural multicounty geographic area.
(3) The department shall submit, along with the list required under
subsection (1) of this section, the operational requirements for the
facilities on the list to the office of financial management and the
counties on the list.
(4) To carry out the purposes of subsection (1) of this section,
the department shall, no later than July 1, 2004, develop a map of the
state that identifies the locations of existing facilities and the
counties or rural multicounty geographic areas needing projected
facilities identified in subsection (1) of this section during the
biennium. The department shall update the map at least once per
biennium. The department shall also maintain data on the number and
proportion of offenders identified in subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this
section and shall biennially publish a report including the most recent
version of the map and offender data for the counties and rural
multicounty geographic areas.
(5) A county, and any county designated by the department within a
rural multicounty geographic area, that is included on the list
required under subsection (1) of this section planning under RCW
36.70A.040 shall adopt development regulations that designate areas or
zones that allow the siting of each projected work release facility on
the list within the county using its process for siting essential
public facilities under RCW 36.70A.200 and section 8 of this act.
(6) A county, and any county designated by the department within a
rural multicounty geographic area, that is included on the list
required under subsection (1) of this section not planning under RCW
36.70A.040 shall adopt development regulations that designate areas or
zones that allow the siting of each projected work release facility on
the list within the county using the procedures established in section
9 of this act.
(7) The department shall, by rule, adopt facility criteria and
shall consult with local governments in such rule making.

Sec. 6 RCW 72.65.220 and 1997 c 348 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department or a private or public entity under contract
with the department may establish or relocate for the operation of a
work release or other community-based facility only after ((public
notifications and local public meetings have been completed consistent
with)) meeting the requirements of this section.
(2) The department and other state agencies responsible for siting
department-owned, operated, or contracted facilities shall establish a
process for early and continuous public participation in establishing
or relocating work release or other community-based facilities. This
process shall include public meetings in the local communities
affected, opportunities for written and oral comments, and wide
dissemination of proposals and alternatives, including at least the
following:
(a) When the department or a private or public entity under
contract with the department has selected three or fewer sites for
final consideration of a department-owned, operated, or contracted work
release or other community-based facility, the department or
contracting organization shall make public notification and conduct at
least two public hearings in each of the local communities ((of the
final three or fewer proposed sites)) where such a facility may be
sited at least forty-five days before a final selection is made. An
additional public hearing after public notification shall also be
conducted in the local community selected as the final proposed site.
(b) ((Notifications required under this section shall be provided
to)) To provide adequate notice of and opportunity for interested
persons to comment on a proposed location, the department or
contracting entity shall make a good faith effort to provide at least
fourteen days' advance notice of the public hearings to at least the
following:
(i) The appropriate legislative authorities of the affected
counties, cities, and towns;
(ii) Local government planning agencies in the affected
communities;
(iii) All newspapers of general circulation in the local area and
all ((local)) radio stations((,)) and television stations((, and cable
networks)) generally available to persons in the community where the
potential site is located;
(((ii))) (iv) Appropriate school districts, private schools,
kindergartens, institutions of higher education, city and county
libraries, and all other local government offices within a one-half
mile radius of the proposed site or sites;
(((iii))) (v) The local chamber of commerce, local economic
development agencies, and any other local organizations that request
such notification from the department; and
(((iv) In writing)) (vi) Written notification to all residents
((and/or)) and property owners within a one-half mile radius of the
proposed site or sites.
(3) The notice required under subsection (2) of this section must
also inform the public that any interested person or entity, including
a local government entity, is invited to submit written comments
regarding a proposed location, including comments regarding whether the
site meets the equitable distribution and other statutory requirements
for the facility. Written comments must be submitted not later than
thirty days following the date notice is issued pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section.
(4) The department must consider the testimony received at the
public hearings and any written comments submitted before making a
final selection of the site for the location or relocation of a work
release facility. The department shall issue a written analysis of the
final selection, including how the selection was consistent with the
requirements of section 5 of this act.
(5) When the department contracts for the operation of a work
release or other community-based facility that is not owned or operated
by the department, the department shall require as part of its contract
that the contracting entity comply with all the public notification and
public hearing requirements as provided in this section for each
located and relocated work release or other community-based facility.
(6) If local government regulations require that a special use or
conditional use permit be submitted and approved before a work release
facility can be sited, and the process for obtaining the permit
includes public notice and hearing requirements similar to those
required under this section, the requirements of this section shall not
apply to the extent they would duplicate requirements under the local
land use regulations.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.70A.200 and 2002 c 68 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The comprehensive plan of each county and city that is planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall include a process for identifying and siting
essential public facilities. Essential public facilities include those
facilities that are typically difficult to site, such as airports,
state education facilities and state or regional transportation
facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, state and local correctional
facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and in-patient facilities
including substance abuse facilities, mental health facilities, group
homes, and secure community transition facilities as defined in RCW
71.09.020.
(2) Each county and city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process, or amend its
existing process, for identifying and siting essential public
facilities and adopt or amend its development regulations as necessary
to provide for the siting of secure community transition facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(3) Any city or county not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process for siting secure
community transition facilities and adopt or amend its development
regulations as necessary to provide for the siting of such facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(4) Each county planning under RCW 36.70A.040, in cooperation with
the cities located in whole or in part within the county, and each city
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, when it next amends its
comprehensive plan, but in no case later than the deadline specified in
RCW 36.70A.130, establish a process, or amend its existing process, for
identifying and siting essential public facilities, and adopt or amend
its development regulations as necessary to provide for the siting of
community facilities as defined in RCW 72.05.020 and work release and
other facilities operated by or under contract with the department of
corrections. When siting a community facility under chapter 72.05 RCW
or a work release facility under chapter 72.65 RCW, a county or city
shall follow, in addition to requirements of the process for siting
essential public facilities established under this section, the
requirements established in section 8 of this act.
(5) The office of financial management shall maintain a list of
those essential state public facilities that are required or likely to
be built within the next six years. The office of financial management
may at any time add facilities to the list.
(((5))) (6) No local comprehensive plan or development regulation
may preclude the siting of essential public facilities.
(((6))) (7) No person may bring a cause of action for civil damages
based on the good faith actions of any county or city to provide for
the siting of secure community transition facilities in accordance with
this section and with the requirements of chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess. For purposes of this subsection, "person" includes, but is
not limited to, any individual, agency as defined in RCW 42.17.020,
corporation, partnership, association, and limited liability entity.
(((7))) (8) Counties or cities siting facilities pursuant to
subsection (2) or (3) of this section shall comply with RCW 71.09.341.
(((8))) (9) The failure of a county or city to act by the deadlines
established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section is not:
(a) A condition that would disqualify the county or city for
grants, loans, or pledges under RCW 43.155.070 or 70.146.070;
(b) A consideration for grants or loans provided under RCW
43.17.250(2); or
(c) A basis for any petition under RCW 36.70A.280 or for any
private cause of action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When providing for the siting of an essential public facility
that is a community facility under chapter 72.05 RCW, a county or city
planning under this chapter shall:
(a) Involve the department of social and health services in the
siting process;
(b) Make a substantial effort to provide for the equitable
distribution of community facilities by giving great weight to the
factors in section 2(1) (a) through (c) of this act; and
(c) Ensure that any location identified is consistent with the
operational requirements established by the department of social and
health services under section 2(3) of this act.
(2) When providing for the siting of an essential public facility
that is a work release facility under chapter 72.65 RCW, a county or
city planning under this chapter shall:
(a) Involve the department of corrections in the siting process;
(b) Make a substantial effort to provide for the equitable
distribution of work release facilities by giving great weight to the
factors in section 5(1) (a) through (c) of this act; and
(c) Ensure that any location identified is consistent with the
operational requirements established by the department of corrections
under section 5(3) of this act.
(3)(a) As part of the permitting process for a community facility
under chapter 72.05 RCW, a county or city may not impose upon the
department of social and health services any requirements beyond the
operational requirements established under section 2(3) of this act and
the facility criteria established under section 2(7) of this act.
(b) As part of the permitting process for a work release facility
under chapter 72.65 RCW, a county or city may not impose upon the
department of corrections any requirements beyond the operational
requirements established under section 5(3) of this act and the
facility criteria established under section 5(7) of this act.
(4) Any conditional use permit, special use permit, or any other
development application process necessary to site a community facility
or work release facility may not exceed one hundred twenty days and
must include an appeal process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When providing for the siting of a community facility under
chapter 72.05 RCW, a county or city planning under this chapter shall:
(a) Involve the department of social and health services in the
siting process;
(b) Make a substantial effort to provide for the equitable
distribution of community facilities by giving great weight to the
factors in section 2(1) (a) through (c) of this act; and
(c) Ensure that any location identified is consistent with the
operational requirements established by the department of social and
health services under section 2(3) of this act.
(2) When providing for the siting of a work release facility under
chapter 72.65 RCW, a county and city planning under this chapter shall:
(a) Involve the department of corrections in the siting process;
(b) Make a substantial effort to provide for the equitable
distribution of work release facilities by giving great weight to the
factors in section 5(1) (a) through (c) of this act; and
(c) Ensure that any location identified is consistent with the
operational requirements established by the department of corrections
under section 5(3) of this act.
(3)(a) As part of the permitting process for a community facility
under chapter 72.05 RCW, a county or city may not impose upon the
department of social and health services any requirements beyond the
operational requirements established under section 2(3) of this act and
the facility criteria established under section 2(7) of this act.
(b) As part of the permitting process for a work release facility
under chapter 72.65 RCW, a county or city may not impose upon the
department of corrections any requirements beyond the operational
requirements established under section 5(3) of this act and the
facility criteria established under section 5(7) of this act.
(4) Any conditional use permit, special use permit, or any other
development application process necessary to site a community facility
or work release facility may not exceed one hundred twenty days and
must include an appeal process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---