BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds, declares, and
determines that it is necessary and appropriate to enact limited
changes in the law related to liability for decisions made by a
condominium association board of directors, the scope of the implied
warranty of quality, and actions for breach of warranty under this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.34.308 and 1992 c 220 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in the declaration, the bylaws, subsection
(((2))) (3) of this section, or other provisions of this chapter, the
board of directors shall act in all instances on behalf of the
association. In the performance of their duties, the officers and
members of the board of directors are required to exercise: (a) If
appointed by the declarant, the care required of fiduciaries of the
unit owners; or (b) if elected by the unit owners, ordinary and
reasonable care.
(2) An association and its directors, officers, and managing agents
are not liable for a decision, including a decision not to commence a
judicial proceeding under this chapter if:
(a) The decision is made by a board of directors elected under
subsection (7) of this section and that board does not include any
member who is an affiliate of a declarant; or
(b) In reaching the decision the directors, officers, and managing
agents act in good faith, in a manner they believe to be in the best
interests of the corporation, and with the care, including reasonable
inquiry, an ordinarily prudent person in a like position uses under the
circumstances.
(3) The board of directors shall not act on behalf of the
association to amend the declaration in any manner that requires the
vote or approval of the unit owners pursuant to RCW 64.34.264, to
terminate the condominium pursuant to RCW 64.34.268, or to elect
members of the board of directors or determine the qualifications,
powers, and duties, or terms of office of members of the board of
directors pursuant to subsection (((6))) (7) of this section; but the
board of directors may fill vacancies in its membership for the
unexpired portion of any term.
(((3))) (4) Within thirty days after adoption of any proposed
budget for the condominium, the board of directors shall provide a
summary of the budget to all the unit owners and shall set a date for
a meeting of the unit owners to consider ratification of the budget not
less than fourteen nor more than sixty days after mailing of the
summary. Unless at that meeting the owners of units to which a
majority of the votes in the association are allocated or any larger
percentage specified in the declaration reject the budget, the budget
is ratified, whether or not a quorum is present. In the event the
proposed budget is rejected or the required notice is not given, the
periodic budget last ratified by the unit owners shall be continued
until such time as the unit owners ratify a subsequent budget proposed
by the board of directors.
(((4))) (5)(a) Subject to subsection (((5))) (6) of this section,
the declaration may provide for a period of declarant control of the
association, during which period a declarant, or persons designated by
the declarant, may: (i) Appoint and remove the officers and members of
the board of directors; or (ii) veto or approve a proposed action of
the board or association. A declarant's failure to veto or approve
such proposed action in writing within thirty days after receipt of
written notice of the proposed action shall be deemed approval by the
declarant.
(b) Regardless of the period provided in the declaration, a period
of declarant control terminates no later than the earlier of: (i)
Sixty days after conveyance of seventy-five percent of the units which
may be created to unit owners other than a declarant; (ii) two years
after the last conveyance or transfer of record of a unit except as
security for a debt; (iii) two years after any development right to add
new units was last exercised; or (iv) the date on which the declarant
records an amendment to the declaration pursuant to which the declarant
voluntarily surrenders the right to further appoint and remove officers
and members of the board of directors. A declarant may voluntarily
surrender the right to appoint and remove officers and members of the
board of directors before termination of that period pursuant to (i),
(ii), and (iii) of this subsection (((4))) (5)(b), but in that event
the declarant may require, for the duration of the period of declarant
control, that specified actions of the association or board of
directors, as described in a recorded instrument executed by the
declarant, be approved by the declarant before they become effective.
(((5))) (6) Not later than sixty days after conveyance of twenty-five percent of the units which may be created to unit owners other
than a declarant, at least one member and not less than twenty-five
percent of the members of the board of directors must be elected by
unit owners other than the declarant. Not later than sixty days after
conveyance of fifty percent of the units which may be created to unit
owners other than a declarant, not less than thirty-three and one-third
percent of the members of the board of directors must be elected by
unit owners other than the declarant.
(((6))) (7) Within thirty days after the termination of any period
of declarant control, the unit owners shall elect a board of directors
of at least three members, at least a majority of whom must be unit
owners. The number of directors need not exceed the number of units
then in the condominium. The board of directors shall elect the
officers. Such members of the board of directors and officers shall
take office upon election.
(((7))) (8) Notwithstanding any provision of the declaration or
bylaws to the contrary, the unit owners, by a two-thirds vote of the
voting power in the association present and entitled to vote at any
meeting of the unit owners at which a quorum is present, may remove any
member of the board of directors with or without cause, other than a
member appointed by the declarant. The declarant may not remove any
member of the board of directors elected by the unit owners. Prior to
the termination of the period of declarant control, the unit owners,
other than the declarant, may remove by a two-thirds vote, any director
elected by the unit owners.

Sec. 3 RCW 64.34.445 and 1992 c 220 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A declarant and any dealer warrants that a unit will be in at
least as good condition at the earlier of the time of the conveyance or
delivery of possession as it was at the time of contracting, reasonable
wear and tear and damage by casualty or condemnation excepted.
(2) A declarant and any dealer impliedly warrants that a unit and
the common elements in the condominium are suitable for the ordinary
uses of real estate of its type and that any improvements made or
contracted for by such declarant or dealer will be:
(a) Free from defective materials; ((and))
(b) Constructed in accordance with sound engineering and
construction standards((, and));
(c) Completed in a workmanlike manner; and
(d) In compliance with all laws then applicable to such
improvements. However, there is a breach of an implied warranty under
this subsection (2)(d) only if the failure to comply with applicable
law has a material effect on any of the following: Safety,
habitability, performance, durability, functionality, marketability, or
use and enjoyment, of the unit, the common elements, or any of the
condominium components.
(3) A declarant and any dealer warrants to a purchaser of a unit
that may be used for residential use that an existing use, continuation
of which is contemplated by the parties, does not violate applicable
law at the earlier of the time of conveyance or delivery of possession.
(4) Warranties imposed by this section may be excluded or modified
as specified in RCW 64.34.450.
(5) For purposes of this section, improvements made or contracted
for by an affiliate of a declarant, as defined in RCW 64.34.020(1), are
made or contracted for by the declarant.
(6) Any conveyance of a unit transfers to the purchaser all of the
declarant's implied warranties of quality.

Sec. 4 RCW 64.34.452 and 2002 c 323 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A judicial proceeding for breach of any obligations arising
under RCW 64.34.443 and 64.34.445 must be commenced within ((four))
eight years after the cause of action accrues: PROVIDED, That the
period for commencing an action for a breach accruing pursuant to
subsection (2)(b) of this section shall not expire prior to one year
after termination of the period of declarant control, if any, under RCW
64.34.308(4). ((Such)) Except under chapter 64.50 RCW, this period may
not be reduced by either oral or written agreement, or through the use
of contractual claims or notice procedures that require the filing or
service of any claim or notice prior to the expiration of the period
specified in this section.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a cause of action or
breach of warranty of quality, regardless of the purchaser's lack of
knowledge of the breach, accrues:
(a) As to a unit, the date the purchaser to whom the warranty is
first made enters into possession if a possessory interest was conveyed
or the date of acceptance of the instrument of conveyance if a
nonpossessory interest was conveyed; and
(b) As to each common element, at the latest of (i) the date the
first unit in the condominium was conveyed to a bona fide purchaser,
(ii) the date the common element was completed, or (iii) the date the
common element was added to the condominium.
(3) If a warranty of quality explicitly extends to future
performance or duration of any improvement or component of the
condominium, the cause of action accrues at the time the breach is
discovered or at the end of the period for which the warranty
explicitly extends, whichever is earlier.
(4) If a written notice of claim is served under RCW 64.50.020
within the time prescribed for the filing of an action under this
chapter, the statutes of limitation in this chapter and any applicable
statutes of repose for construction-related claims are tolled until
sixty days after the period of time during which the filing of an
action is barred under RCW 64.50.020.

--- END ---