BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.101 and 2002 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A transfer of ownership in a motor vehicle is perfected by
compliance with the requirements of this section.
(1) If an owner transfers his or her interest in a vehicle, other
than by the creation, deletion, or change of a security interest, the
owner shall, at the time of the delivery of the vehicle, execute an
assignment to the transferee and provide an odometer disclosure
statement under RCW 46.12.124 on the certificate of ownership or as the
department otherwise prescribes, and cause the certificate and
assignment to be transmitted to the transferee. The owner shall notify
the department or its agents or subagents, in writing, on the
appropriate form, of the date of the sale or transfer, the name and
address of the owner and of the transferee, the transferee's driver's
license number if available, and such description of the vehicle,
including the vehicle identification number, the license plate number,
or both, as may be required in the appropriate form provided or
approved for that purpose by the department. The report of sale will
be deemed properly filed if all information required in this section is
provided on the form and includes a department-authorized notation that
the document was received by the department, its agents, or subagents
on or before the fifth day after the sale of the vehicle, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, and state and federal holidays. Agents and
subagents shall immediately electronically transmit the seller's report
of sale to the department. Reports of sale processed and recorded by
the department's agents or subagents may be subject to fees as
specified in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a) or (5)(b). By January 1, 2003, the
department shall create a system enabling the seller of a vehicle to
transmit the report of sale electronically. The system created by the
department must immediately indicate on the department's vehicle record
that a seller's report of sale has been filed.
(2) When a vehicle is sold by a private party transaction between
the registered owner and a private buyer, the registered owner must
disclose if the vehicle being sold was or was not originally equipped
with air bags, to the best of his or her knowledge. Effective January
1, 2004, the report of sale form, as provided for in subsection (1) of
this section, must contain the following statements which the
registered owner must complete, in order for the report of sale to be
deemed properly filed: "The vehicle described in this report of sale,
to the best of my knowledge, does or does not (circle one) currently
contain the same number and type of operational air bags with which it
was originally equipped."
(3) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section to provide
an odometer disclosure statement apply to the transfer of vehicles held
for lease when transferred to a lessee and then to the lessor at the
end of the leasehold and to vehicles held in a fleet when transferred
to a purchaser.
(((3))) (4) Except as provided in RCW 46.70.122 the transferee
shall within fifteen days after delivery to the transferee of the
vehicle, execute the application for a new certificate of ownership in
the same space provided therefor on the certificate or as the
department prescribes, and cause the certificates and application to be
transmitted to the department.
(((4))) (5) Upon request of the owner or transferee, a secured
party in possession of the certificate of ownership shall, unless the
transfer was a breach of its security agreement, either deliver the
certificate to the transferee for transmission to the department or,
when the secured party receives the owner's assignment from the
transferee, it shall transmit the transferee's application for a new
certificate, the existing certificate, and the required fee to the
department. Compliance with this section does not affect the rights of
the secured party.
(((5))) (6) If a security interest is reserved or created at the
time of the transfer, the certificate of ownership shall be retained by
or delivered to the person who becomes the secured party, and the
parties shall comply with the provisions of RCW 46.12.170.
(((6))) (7) If the purchaser or transferee fails or neglects to
make application to transfer the certificate of ownership and license
registration within fifteen days after the date of delivery of the
vehicle, he or she shall on making application for transfer be assessed
a twenty-five dollar penalty on the sixteenth day and two dollars
additional for each day thereafter, but not to exceed one hundred
dollars. The director may by rule establish conditions under which the
penalty will not be assessed when an application for transfer is
delayed for reasons beyond the control of the purchaser. Conditions
for not assessing the penalty may be established for but not limited to
delays caused by:
(a) The department requesting additional supporting documents;
(b) Extended hospitalization or illness of the purchaser;
(c) Failure of a legal owner to release his or her interest;
(d) Failure, negligence, or nonperformance of the department,
auditor, or subagent.
Failure or neglect to make application to transfer the certificate
of ownership and license registration within forty-five days after the
date of delivery of the vehicle is a misdemeanor.
(((7))) (8) Upon receipt of an application for reissue or
replacement of a certificate of ownership and transfer of license
registration, accompanied by the endorsed certificate of ownership or
other documentary evidence as is deemed necessary, the department
shall, if the application is in order and if all provisions relating to
the certificate of ownership and license registration have been
complied
with, issue new certificates of title and license registration
as in the case of an original issue and shall transmit the fees
together with an itemized detailed report to the state treasurer, to be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund.
(((8))) (9) Once each quarter the department shall report to the
department of revenue a list of those vehicles for which a seller's
report has been received but no transfer of title has taken place.
(10) For purposes of this section, "private party transaction"
means a transaction in which a vehicle is being sold by the registered
owner to a private buyer, and does not include any vehicle sale
transactions executed by a licensed business.

--- END ---