BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that access to
care for people who need long-term care services is in jeopardy because
of the difficulty in providing public funds to finance the medical
assistance program. It also finds that eligibility policy for the
medical assistance program, for people needing long-term care services,
has evolved in such a way that it provides eligibility to some people
who have the ability to pay for the care they need from their own
resources.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that eligibility for
medical assistance, for the provision of long-term care services, be
limited to people who do not have the ability to pay for the care they
need, and that eligibility for medical assistance be set at the minimum
threshold, with regard to assets, required for participation in the
federal medicaid program under Title XIX of the social security act.
It is also the intent of the legislature to establish a process for
offering information and referral to private sector financing
mechanisms that will allow people to draw upon their fixed assets to
finance their long-term care service needs. It is the further intent
of the legislature that by taking these measures, eligibility for the
medical assistance program will be reserved for the people in greatest
financial need, and that we will be better able to afford to provide
good quality care to those who are eligible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is directed to conform its medical assistance
eligibility requirements, for those who commence to receive long-term
care services on or after July 1, 2004, to the minimum level permitted
by Title XIX of the social security act with regard to any exemptions
for assets.
(2) The department is directed to periodically review, and adjust
as necessary, its eligibility requirements to counteract the effects of
anyone attempting to obtain eligibility by concealing or divesting
assets or income.
(3) The department is directed to seek waivers from the federal
government from requirements that the state exempt from eligibility
determination the value of an applicant's home or other real estate.
(4) The department is directed to report to the legislature
regarding federal actions on the requested waivers, and to identify any
changes in federal statutes required to carry out the intent of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
The department is directed to establish an information and referral
process, for people seeking medical assistance for long-term care
services who appear to have sufficient assets in the form of a home, to
financial institutions that can arrange a home equity conversion
mortgage designed by the United States department of housing and urban
development and insured by the federal housing administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---