BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.64.005 and 1998 c 262 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that there is a need to establish a clear
and understandable process that provides for the proper and effective
management of dairy nutrients that affect the quality of surface or
ground waters in the state of Washington. The legislature finds that
there is a need for a program that will provide a stable and
predictable business climate upon which dairy farms may base future
investment decisions.
(2) The legislature also finds that federal regulations require a
permit program for dairies with over seven hundred head of mature cows
and((,)) other specified dairy farms that directly discharge into
waters or are otherwise significant contributors of pollution. The
legislature finds that significant work has been ongoing over a period
of time ((and that the intent of)).
(3) The legislature intends by enacting this chapter ((is)) to take
the consensus that has been developed and place it into statutory form.
((It is also the intent of this chapter)) The legislature also intends
to establish and maintain an inspection and technical assistance
program for dairy farms to address the discharge of pollution to
surface and ground waters of the state that will lead to water quality
compliance by the industry. ((A further purpose is)) The legislature
further intends to create a balanced program involving technical
assistance, regulation, and enforcement ((with coordination and
oversight of the program by a committee composed of industry, agency,
and other representatives)). Furthermore, ((it is)) the legislature
declares that the objective of this chapter to maintain the
administration of the water quality program as it relates to dairy
operations at the state level.
((It is also the intent of)) (4) The legislature also intends in
enacting this chapter to recognize the existing working relationships
between and among conservation districts, the conservation commission,
and the department of ecology in protecting water quality of the state.
A further purpose of this chapter is to provide statutory recognition
of the coordination of the functions of conservation districts, the
conservation commission, and the department of ecology pertaining to
development of dairy waste management plans for the protection of water
quality.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.64.010 and 1998 c 262 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) (("Advisory and oversight committee" means a balanced committee
of agency, dairy farm, and interest group representatives convened to
provide oversight and direction to the dairy nutrient management
program.
(2))) "Bypass" means the intentional diversion of waste streams
from any portion of a treatment facility.
(((3))) (2) "Catastrophic" means a tornado, hurricane, earthquake,
flood, or other extreme condition that causes an overflow from a
required waste retention structure.
(((4))) (3) "Certification" means:
(a) The acknowledgment by a local conservation district that a
dairy producer has constructed or otherwise put in place the elements
necessary to implement his or her dairy nutrient management plan; and
(b) The acknowledgment by a dairy producer that he or she is
managing dairy nutrients as specified in his or her approved dairy
nutrient management plan.
(((5))) (4) "Chronic" means a series of wet weather events that
precludes the proper operation of a dairy nutrient management system
that is designed for the current herd size.
(((6))) (5) "Conservation commission" or "commission" means the
conservation commission under chapter 89.08 RCW.
(((7))) (6) "Conservation districts" or "district" means a
subdivision of state government organized under chapter 89.08 RCW.
(((8))) (7) "Concentrated dairy animal feeding operation" means a
dairy animal feeding operation subject to regulation under this chapter
which the director designates under RCW 90.64.020 or meets the
following criteria:
(a) Has more than seven hundred mature dairy cows, whether milked
or dry cows, that are confined; or
(b) Has more than two hundred head of mature dairy cattle, whether
milked or dry cows, that are confined and either:
(i) From which pollutants are discharged into navigable waters
through a manmade ditch, flushing system, or other similar manmade
device; or
(ii) From which pollutants are discharged directly into surface or
ground waters of the state that originate outside of and pass over,
across, or through the facility or otherwise come into direct contact
with the animals confined in the operation.
(((9))) (8) "Dairy animal feeding operation" means a lot or
facility where the following conditions are met:
(a) Dairy animals that have been, are, or will be stabled or
confined and fed for a total of forty-five days or more in any twelve-month period; and
(b) Crops, vegetation forage growth, or postharvest residues are
not sustained in the normal growing season over any portion of the lot
or facility. Two or more dairy animal feeding operations under common
ownership are considered, for the purposes of this chapter, to be a
single dairy animal feeding operation if they adjoin each other or if
they use a common area for land application of wastes.
(((10))) (9) "Dairy farm" means any farm that is licensed to
produce milk under chapter 15.36 RCW.
(((11))) (10) "Dairy nutrient" means any organic waste produced by
dairy cows or a dairy farm operation.
(((12))) (11) "Dairy nutrient management plan" means a plan meeting
the requirements established under RCW 90.64.026.
(((13))) (12) "Dairy nutrient management technical assistance team"
means one or more professional engineers and local conservation
district employees convened to serve one of four distinct geographic
areas in the state.
(((14))) (13) "Dairy producer" means a person who owns or operates
a dairy farm.
(((15))) (14) "Department" means the department of ecology under
chapter 43.21A RCW.
(((16))) (15) "Director" means the director of the department of
ecology, or his or her designee.
(((17))) (16) "Upset" means an exceptional incident in which there
is an unintentional and temporary noncompliance with technology-based
permit effluent limitations because of factors beyond the reasonable
control of the dairy. An upset does not include noncompliance to the
extent caused by operational error, improperly designed treatment
facilities, inadequate treatment facilities, lack of preventive
maintenance, or careless or improper operation.
(((18))) (17) "Violation" means the following acts or omissions:
(a) A discharge of pollutants into the waters of the state, except
those discharges that are due to a chronic or catastrophic event, or to
an upset as provided in 40 C.F.R. Sec. 122.41, or to a bypass as
provided in 40 C.F.R. Sec. 122.41, and that occur when:
(i) A dairy producer has a current national pollutant discharge
elimination system permit with a wastewater system designed, operated,
and maintained for the current herd size and that contains all process-generated wastewater plus average annual precipitation minus
evaporation plus contaminated storm water runoff from a twenty-five
year, twenty-four hour rainfall event for that specific location, and
the dairy producer has complied with all permit conditions, including
dairy nutrient management plan conditions for appropriate land
application practices; or
(ii) A dairy producer does not have a national pollutant discharge
elimination system permit, but has complied with all of the elements of
a dairy nutrient management plan that: Prevents the discharge of
pollutants to waters of the state, is commensurate with the dairy
producer's current herd size, and is approved and certified under RCW
90.64.026;
(b) Failure to register as required under RCW 90.64.017; or
(c) The lack of an approved dairy nutrient management plan by July
1, 2002; or
(d) The lack of a certified dairy nutrient management plan for a
dairy farm after December 31, 2003.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.64.017 and 1998 c 262 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every dairy producer licensed under chapter 15.36 RCW shall
register with the department ((by September 1, 1998, and shall
reregister with the department)) by September 1st of every even-numbered year. Every dairy producer licensed after September 1,
((1998)) 2002, shall register with the department within sixty days of
licensing. The purpose of registration is to provide and update
baseline information for the dairy nutrient management program.
(2) To facilitate registration, the department shall obtain from
the food safety and animal health division of the department of
agriculture a current list of all licensed dairy producers in the state
and mail a registration form to each licensed dairy producer no later
than July ((15, 1998)) 15th of each even-numbered year.
(3) At a minimum, the form shall require the following information
as of the date the form is completed:
(a) The name and address of the operator of the dairy farm;
(b) The name and address of the dairy farm;
(c) The telephone number of the dairy farm;
(d) The number of cows in the dairy farm;
(e) The number of young stock in the dairy farm;
(f) The number of acres owned and rented in the dairy farm;
(g) Whether the dairy producer, to the best of his or her
knowledge, has a plan for managing dairy nutrient discharges that is
commensurate with the size of his or her herd, and whether the plan is
being fully implemented; and
(h) If the fields where dairy nutrients are being applied belong to
someone other than the dairy producer whose farm operation generated
the nutrients, the name, address, and telephone number of the owners of
the property accepting the dairy nutrients.
(4) In the mailing to dairy producers containing the registration
form, the department shall also provide clear and comprehensive
information regarding the requirements of this chapter.
(5) The department shall require the registrant to provide only
information that is not already available from other sources accessible
to the department, such as dairy licensing information.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.64.023 and 1998 c 262 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((By October 1, 1998,)) The department shall ((initiate))
manage an inspection program of all dairy farms in the state. The
purpose of the inspections is to:
(a) Survey for evidence of violations based upon complaints
submitted according to RCW 90.64.050;
(b) Identify corrective actions for actual or imminent discharges
that violate or could violate the state's water quality standards;
(c) ((Monitor the development and implementation of)) Review
changes in dairy nutrient management plans; and
(d) ((Identify)) Provide technical assistance upon request of dairy
producers ((who would benefit from technical assistance programs)).
(2) Local conservation district employees may, at their discretion,
accompany department inspectors on any scheduled inspection of dairy
farms ((except random, unannounced inspections)) conducted according to
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Follow-up inspections shall be conducted by the department to
ensure that corrective and other actions as identified in the course of
initial inspections are being carried out. The department shall also
conduct such additional inspections as are necessary to ensure
compliance with state and federal water quality requirements((,
provided that all licensed dairy farms shall be inspected once within
two years of the start of this program)). The department((, in
consultation with the advisory and oversight committee established in
section 8 of this act,)) shall develop and periodically review its
performance-based criteria to determine the frequency of inspections.
(4) Dairy farms shall be prioritized for inspection pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section and based on the development of criteria
that include, but are not limited to, the following factors:
(a) Existence or implementation of a dairy nutrient management
plan;
(b) Proximity to impaired waters of the state; and
(c) Proximity to all other waters of the state. ((The criteria
developed to implement this subsection (4) shall be reviewed by the
advisory and oversight committee.))

Sec. 5 RCW 90.64.026 and 1998 c 262 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for those producers who already have a certified dairy
nutrient management plan as required under the terms and conditions of
an individual or general national pollutant discharge elimination
system permit, all dairy producers licensed under chapter 15.36 RCW,
regardless of size, shall prepare a dairy nutrient management plan. If
at any time a dairy nutrient management plan fails to prevent the
discharge of pollutants to waters of the state, it shall be ((required
to be)) updated.
(2) ((By November 1, 1998,)) The conservation commission((, in
conjunction with the advisory and oversight committee established under
section 8 of this act)) shall develop and provide to dairy producers
upon request a document clearly describing the elements that a dairy
nutrient management plan must contain to gain local conservation
district approval.
(3) In developing the elements that an approved dairy nutrient
management plan must contain, the commission may authorize the use of
other methods and technologies than those developed by the natural
resources conservation service ((when such alternatives have been
evaluated by the advisory and oversight committee)). Alternative
methods and technologies shall meet the standards and specifications
of:
(a) The natural resources conservation service as modified by the
geographically based standards developed under RCW 90.64.140; or
(b) A professional engineer with expertise in the area of dairy
nutrient management.
(4) In evaluating alternative technologies and methods, the
commission's principal objectives ((of the committee's evaluation))
shall be determining whether:
(a) ((Whether)) There is a substantial likelihood that, once
implemented, the alternative technologies and methods would not violate
water quality requirements;
(b) ((Whether)) More cost-effective methods can be successfully
implemented in some or all categories of dairy operations; and
(c) ((Whether)) The technologies and methods approved or provided
by the natural resources conservation service for use by confined
animal feeding operations are necessarily required for other categories
of dairy operations.
((In addition,)) (5) The ((committee shall encourage the
conservation)) commission and the conservation districts are encouraged
to apply in dairy nutrient management plans technologies and methods
that are appropriate to the needs of the specific type of operation and
the specific farm site and to avoid imposing requirements that are not
necessary for the specific dairy producer to achieve compliance with
water quality requirements.
(((5) Such)) (6) Dairy nutrient management plans shall be submitted
for approval ((to)) of the local conservation district ((where)) in
which the dairy farm is located, and shall be approved by conservation
districts no later than by July 1, 2002. The conservation commission,
in conjunction with conservation districts, shall develop a statewide
schedule of plan development and approval to ensure adequate resources
are available to have all plans approved by July 1, 2002.
(((6))) (7) If a dairy producer leases land for dairy production
from an owner who has prohibited the development of capital
improvements, such as storage lagoons, on the leased property, the
dairy producer shall indicate in his or her dairy nutrient management
plan that such improvements are prohibited by the landowner and shall
describe other methods, such as land application, that will be employed
by the dairy producer to manage dairy nutrients.
(((7))) (8) Notwithstanding the timelines in this section, any
dairy farm licensed after September 1, ((1998)) 2002, shall have six
months from the date of licensing to develop a dairy nutrient
management plan and another eighteen months to fully implement that
plan. A dairy nutrient management plan for a dairy farm licensed after
September 1, 2002, shall be submitted for approval of the local
conservation district in which the dairy farm is located.
(((8))) (9) If a plan contains the elements identified in
subsection (2) of this section, a conservation district shall approve
the plan no later than ninety days after receiving the plan. If the
plan does not contain the elements identified in subsection (2) of this
section, the local conservation district shall notify the dairy
producer in writing of modifications needed in the plan no later than
ninety days after receiving the plan. The dairy producer shall provide
a revised plan that includes the needed modifications within ninety
days of the date of the local conservation district notification. If
the dairy producer does not agree with, or otherwise takes exception
to, the modifications requested by the local conservation district, the
dairy producer may initiate the appeals process described in RCW
90.64.028 within thirty days of receiving the letter of notification.
(((9))) (10) An approved plan shall be certified by a conservation
district and a dairy producer when the elements necessary to implement
the plan have been constructed or otherwise put in place, and are being
used as designed and intended. A certification form shall be developed
and maintained by the conservation commission for use statewide and
shall provide for a signature by both a conservation district
representative and a dairy producer. A copy of the certification
form((s)) shall be ((signed by December 31, 2003, and a copy)) provided
to the department for recording in the data base established in RCW
90.64.130.
(((10))) (11) The ability of dairy producers to comply with the
planning requirements of this chapter depends, in many cases, on the
availability of federal and state funding to support technical
assistance provided by local conservation districts. Dairy producers
shall not be held responsible for noncompliance with the planning
requirements of this chapter if conservation districts are unable to
perform their duties under this chapter because of insufficient
funding.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.64.028 and 1998 c 262 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The following may be appealed under this chapter:
(i) Conservation district decisions pertaining to denial of
approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan;
(ii) Modification or amendment of a plan;
(iii) Conditions contained in a plan;
(iv) Application of any dairy nutrient management practices,
standards, methods, and technologies to a particular dairy farm; and
(v) The failure to adhere to plan review and approval timelines
identified in RCW 90.64.026 ((are appealable under this chapter)).
(b) Department actions pertaining to water quality violations are
appealable under chapter 90.48 RCW.
((In addition,)) (2) A dairy producer who is constrained from
complying with the planning requirements of this chapter because of
financial hardship or local permitting delays may request a hearing
before the conservation commission and may request an extension of up
to one year beyond the approval and certification dates prescribed in
this chapter for plan approval and certification.
(((2))) (3) Within thirty days of receiving a local conservation
district notification regarding any of the decisions identified in
subsection (1) of this section, a dairy producer who disagrees with any
of these decisions may request an informal hearing before the
conservation commission or may appeal directly to the pollution control
hearings board. The commission shall issue a written decision no later
than thirty days after the informal hearing.
(((3))) (4) If the conservation commission reverses the decision of
the conservation district, the conservation district may appeal this
reversal to the pollution control hearings board according to the
procedure in chapter 43.21B RCW within thirty days of receipt of the
commission's decision.
(((4))) (5) When an appeals process is initiated under this
section, the length of time extending from the start of the appeals
process to its conclusion shall be added onto the timelines provided in
this chapter for plan development, approval, and certification only if
an appeal is heard by the pollution control hearings board.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.64.050 and 1998 c 262 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department has the following duties:
(a) Identify existing or potential water quality problems resulting
from dairy farms through implementation of the inspection program in
RCW 90.64.023;
(b) Inspect a dairy farm upon the request of a dairy producer;
(c) Receive, process, and verify complaints concerning discharge of
pollutants from all dairy farms;
(d) Determine if a dairy-related water quality problem requires
immediate corrective action under the Washington state water pollution
control laws, chapter 90.48 RCW, or the Washington state water quality
standards adopted under chapter 90.48 RCW. The department shall
maintain the lead enforcement responsibility;
(e) Administer and enforce national pollutant discharge elimination
system permits for operators of concentrated dairy animal feeding
operations, where required by federal regulations and state laws or
upon request of a dairy producer;
(f) ((Participate on the advisory and oversight committee;
(g))) Encourage communication and cooperation between local
department personnel and the appropriate conservation district
personnel;
(((h))) (g) Require the use of dairy nutrient management plans as
required under this chapter for entities required to plan under this
chapter; and
(((i))) (h) Provide to the commission ((and the advisory and
oversight committee)) an annual report of dairy farm inspection and
enforcement activities.
(2) The department may not delegate its responsibilities in
enforcement.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.64.080 and 1998 c 262 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The conservation commission has the following duties:
(a) Provide assistance as may be appropriate to the conservation
districts in the discharge of their responsibilities as management
agencies in dairy nutrient management program implementation;
(b) Provide coordination for conservation district programs at the
state level through special arrangements with appropriate federal and
state agencies, including oversight of the review, approval, and
certification of dairy nutrient management plans;
(c) Inform conservation districts of activities and experiences of
other conservation districts relative to agricultural water quality
protection, and facilitate an interchange of advice, experience, and
cooperation between the districts;
(d) Provide an informal hearing for disputes between dairy
producers and local conservation districts pertaining to: (i) Denial
of approval or denial of certification of dairy nutrient management
plans; (ii) modification or amendment of plans; (iii) conditions
contained in plans; (iv) application of any dairy nutrient management
practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a particular dairy
farm; and (v) the failure to adhere to the plan review and approval
timelines identified in RCW 90.64.026. An informal hearing may also
provide an opportunity for dairy producers who are constrained from
timely compliance with the planning requirements of this chapter
because of financial hardship or local permitting delays to petition
for additional time to comply;
(e) Encourage communication between the conservation district
personnel and local department personnel;
(f) ((Accept nominations and appoint members to serve on the
advisory and oversight committee with advice of the Washington
association of conservation districts and the department;
(g) Provide a cochair to the advisory and oversight committee;
(h))) Report to the legislature by December 1st of each year until
2003 on the status of dairy nutrient management planning and on the
technical assistance provided to dairy producers in carrying out the
requirements of this chapter; and
(((i))) (g) Work with the department to provide communication
outreach to representatives of agricultural and environmental
organizations to receive feedback on implementation of this chapter.
(2) The commission's capability to carry out its responsibilities
under this chapter is contingent upon the availability of funding and
resources to implement a dairy nutrient management program.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.64.130 and 1998 c 262 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((By October 1, 1998,)) The department((, in consultation with
the advisory and oversight committee,)) shall develop and maintain a
data base to account for the implementation of this chapter.
(2) The data base shall track registrations; inspection dates and
results, including findings of violations; regulatory and enforcement
actions; and the status of dairy nutrient management plans. In
addition, the number of dairy farm inspections by inspector shall be
tallied by month. ((A summary of data base information shall be
provided quarterly to the advisory and oversight committee.))
(3) Any information entered into the data base by the department
about any aspect of a particular dairy operation may be reviewed by the
affected dairy producer upon request. The department shall correct any
information in the data base upon a showing that the information is
faulty or inaccurate. Complaints that have been filed with the
department and determined to be unfounded, invalid, or without merit
shall not be recorded in the data base. Appeals of decisions related
to dairy nutrient management plans to the pollution control hearings
board or to any court shall be recorded, as well as the decisions of
those bodies.

Sec. 10 RCW 90.64.140 and 1998 c 262 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The conservation commission shall establish four dairy nutrient
management technical assistance teams ((by June 1, 1998)). The teams
shall be geographically located throughout the state. Each team shall
consist of one or more professional engineers, local conservation
district employees, and dairy nutrient management experts from
Washington State University. The purpose of the teams is to:
(a) Actively develop and promote new cost-effective approaches for
managing dairy nutrients; and
(b) Assist dairy farms in developing dairy nutrient management
plans.
(2) ((By January 1, 1999,)) Each team shall develop one or more
initial sets of standards and specifications to assist dairy producers
in developing and implementing dairy nutrient management plans.
Standards and specifications developed by a technical assistance team
shall be appropriate to the soils and other conditions within that
geographic area ((and shall be reviewed by the advisory and oversight
committee)).

Sec. 11 RCW 90.64.800 and 1998 c 262 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department((, in conjunction with the conservation
commission and advisory and oversight committee,)) shall report to the
legislature by December 1st of each year until 2003, on progress made
in implementing this chapter ((262, Laws of 1998)). At a minimum, the
reports shall include data on inspections, the status of dairy nutrient
planning, compliance with water quality standards, and enforcement
actions. The report shall also provide recommendations on how
implementation of this chapter ((262, Laws of 1998)) could be
facilitated for dairy producers and generally improved.
((The conservation commission shall include in the report to the
legislature filed December 1, 1999, an evaluation of whether the fiscal
resources available to the commission, to conservation districts, and
to Washington State University dairy nutrient management experts are
adequate to fund the technical assistance teams established under RCW
90.64.140 and to develop and certify plans as required by the schedule
established in RCW 90.64.026. If the funding is insufficient, the
report shall include an estimate of the amount of funding necessary to
accomplish the schedule contained in RCW 90.64.026.))
(2) This section expires June 30, 2004.

Sec. 12 RCW 90.64.810 and 2000 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A dairy nutrient management task force is created that shall be
comprised of ((no more than fifteen)) up to sixteen members, who are
appointed as follows:
(a) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each
major caucus, appointed by the co-speakers of the house of
representatives;
(b) Two members of the senate, one from each major caucus,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) A representative of the department of ecology, appointed by the
director of ecology;
(d) A representative of the state conservation commission,
appointed by its executive secretary;
(e) A representative of local conservation districts, appointed by
the president of a statewide association of conservation districts;
(f) A representative of local health departments, appointed by the
Washington state association of local public health officials;
(g) A representative of commercial shellfish growers, appointed by
a statewide organization representing oyster growers;
(h) Four representatives of the dairy industry, appointed by a
statewide organization representing the dairy industry in the state;
(i) A representative of an environmental interest organization with
familiarity and expertise in water quality issues, appointed by a
statewide organization representing environmental interests;
(j) A representative of the United States environmental protection
agency, appointed by the regional director of the agency if the agency
chooses to be represented on the task force; and
(k) A representative of the United States natural resources
conservation service, appointed by the state conservationist of that
agency for this state, if the agency chooses to be represented on the
task force.
(2) The task force shall convene as soon as possible upon
appointment of its members. The task force shall elect a chair and
adopt rules for conducting the business of the task force. Staff
support for the task force shall be provided by the Washington state
conservation commission.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2004.

Sec. 13 RCW 90.64.811 and 2000 c 147 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((By December 31, 2000, the task force shall recommend to the
department and to the legislature:
(a) Clarification of key terms and phrases such as, but not limited
to, "potential to pollute," that are used in the administration of this
chapter and other statutes on water quality;
(b) How frequently dairy nutrient management plans should be
updated, considering the evolution of technical standards developed by
the natural resources conservation service;
(c) Considering the report under section 3, chapter 147, Laws of
2000, the disposition of penalties collected from dairy producers under
chapter 90.48 RCW;
(d) Considering the report under section 4 of this act, recommended
sources of funding to meet the needs identified in the report;
(e) The extent to which engineering expertise is required to
implement the provisions of this chapter;
(f) How to address responsibility for contamination originating
from neighboring farms; and
(g) Clarification of the duties of the department as they pertain
to initial inspections of dairy farms.
(2))) The task force shall make recommendations to the department
and to the legislature on any other issues, and at such times, as the
task force deems important to the successful implementation of this
chapter.
(((3))) (2) This section expires June 30, 2004.

--- END ---