BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.05.022 and 2002 c 56 s 302 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The legislature designates)) The following highways are of
statewide significance:
(1) That portion of state route number 509 that runs or will run
from state route number 518 in the north to the intersection with
Interstate 5 in the south ((as a state highway of statewide
significance));
(2) That portion of state route number 502 that runs from a
junction with state route number 5, thence easterly to a junction with
state route number 503 at Battleground.

--- END ---