BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.05.150 and 1998 c 297 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When a county designated mental health professional receives
information alleging that a person, as a result of a mental disorder:
(i) Presents a likelihood of serious harm; or (ii) is gravely disabled;
the county designated mental health professional may, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of any person providing information to
initiate detention, if satisfied that the allegations are true and that
the person will not voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a
petition for initial detention. Before filing the petition, the county
designated mental health professional must personally interview the
person, unless the person refuses an interview, and determine whether
the person will voluntarily receive appropriate evaluation and
treatment at an evaluation and treatment facility.
(b) Whenever it appears, by petition for initial detention, to the
satisfaction of a judge of the superior court that a person presents,
as a result of a mental disorder, a likelihood of serious harm, or is
gravely disabled, and that the person has refused or failed to accept
appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily, the judge may issue
an order requiring the person to appear within twenty-four hours after
service of the order at a designated evaluation and treatment facility
for not more than a seventy-two hour evaluation and treatment period.
The order shall state the address of the evaluation and treatment
facility to which the person is to report and whether the required
seventy-two hour evaluation and treatment services may be delivered on
an outpatient or inpatient basis and that if the person named in the
order fails to appear at the evaluation and treatment facility at or
before the date and time stated in the order, such person may be
involuntarily taken into custody for evaluation and treatment. The
order shall also designate retained counsel or, if counsel is appointed
from a list provided by the court, the name, business address, and
telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent the person.
(c) The county designated mental health professional shall then
serve or cause to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and
conservator, if any, a copy of the order to appear together with a
notice of rights and a petition for initial detention. After service
on such person the county designated mental health professional shall
file the return of service in court and provide copies of all papers in
the court file to the evaluation and treatment facility and the
designated attorney. The county designated mental health professional
shall notify the court and the prosecuting attorney that a probable
cause hearing will be held within seventy-two hours of the date and
time of outpatient evaluation or admission to the evaluation and
treatment facility. The person shall be permitted to remain in his or
her home or other place of his or her choosing prior to the time of
evaluation and shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of
his or her relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or
other professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. An
attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be
permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other
individual accompanying the person may be present during the admission
evaluation. The facility may exclude the individual if his or her
presence would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or
otherwise interfere with the evaluation.
(d) If the person ordered to appear does appear on or before the
date and time specified, the evaluation and treatment facility may
admit such person as required by RCW 71.05.170 or may provide treatment
on an outpatient basis. If the person ordered to appear fails to
appear on or before the date and time specified, the evaluation and
treatment facility shall immediately notify the county designated
mental health professional who may notify a peace officer to take such
person or cause such person to be taken into custody and placed in an
evaluation and treatment facility. Should the county designated mental
health professional notify a peace officer authorizing him or her to
take a person into custody under the provisions of this subsection, he
or she shall file with the court a copy of such authorization and a
notice of detention. At the time such person is taken into custody
there shall commence to be served on such person, his or her guardian,
and conservator, if any, a copy of the original order together with a
notice of detention, a notice of rights, and a petition for initial
detention.
(2) When a county designated mental health professional receives
information alleging that a person, as the result of a mental disorder,
presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent
danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and
evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and
credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any,
the county designated mental health professional may take such person,
or cause by oral or written order such person to be taken into
emergency custody in an evaluation and treatment facility for not more
than seventy-two hours as described in RCW 71.05.180.
(3) A peace officer may take such person or cause such person to be
taken into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility
pursuant to subsection (1)(d) of this section.
(4) A peace officer may, without prior notice of the proceedings
provided for in subsection (1) of this section, take or cause such
person to be taken into custody and immediately delivered to an
evaluation and treatment facility or the emergency department of a
local hospital:
(a) Only pursuant to subsections (1)(d) and (2) of this section; or
(b) When he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person
is suffering from a mental disorder and presents an imminent likelihood
of serious harm or is in imminent danger because of being gravely
disabled.
(5) Persons delivered to evaluation and treatment facilities by
peace officers pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section may be
held by the facility for a period of up to twelve hours: PROVIDED,
That they are examined by a mental health professional within three
hours of their arrival. Within twelve hours of their arrival, the
county designated mental health professional must file a supplemental
petition for detention, and commence service on the designated attorney
for the detained person.
(6) A person detained and taken into custody under this section by
a county designated mental health professional or a peace officer shall
not be charged with assault if physically resisting under diminished
capacity conditions and at least one of the following conditions is
present:
(a) Proper and adequate crisis intervention training for detaining
a person with mental illness was not provided to the detaining person;
(b) No permanent bodily harm was done to the detaining person;
(c) The detainee was psychotic at the time he or she was taken into
custody;
(d) The detainee was acting in a defensive manner; or
(e) The detainee was not armed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the Shawn
Bryan act.

--- END ---