BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.62.020 and 1999 c 259 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((At least)) Every ((third)) day after a special election,
primary, or general election and before certification of the election
results, except Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, the county
auditor shall convene the county canvassing board or their designees to
process absentee ballots and canvass the votes cast at that special
election, primary, or general election, if the county auditor is in
possession of more than twenty-five ballots that have yet to be
canvassed. The county auditor may use his or her discretion in
determining when to convene the canvassing board or their designees
during the final four days before the certification of election results
in order to protect the secrecy of any ballot.
Each absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by
the county auditor ((two days or more)) before the convening of the
canvassing board or their designees and that either was received by the
county auditor before the closing of the polls on the day of the
special election, primary, or general election for which it was issued,
or that bears a date of mailing on or before the special election,
primary, or general election for which it was issued, must be processed
at that time. The tabulation of votes that results from that day's
canvass must be made available to the general public immediately upon
completion of the canvass.
(2) On the tenth day after a special election or a primary and on
the fifteenth day after a general election, the canvassing board shall
complete the canvass and certify the results. Each absentee ballot
that was returned before the closing of the polls on the date of the
primary or election for which it was issued, and each absentee ballot
with a date of mailing on or before the date of the primary or election
for which it was issued and received on or before the date on which the
primary or election is certified, shall be included in the canvass
report.
(3) At the request of any caucus of the state legislature, the
county auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state
and legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house.

--- END ---