BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.610 and 1998 c 280 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is ((hereby)) created a joint administrative rules review
committee ((which shall be a bipartisan committee)) consisting of
((four)) five senators and ((four)) five representatives from the state
legislature. The senate members of the committee shall be appointed by
the president of the senate, and the house members of the committee
shall be appointed by the speaker of the house. ((Not more than two
members from each house may be from the same political party.)) Three
of the members from each house must be from the majority caucus, and
two of the members from each house must be from the minority caucus.
The appointing authorities shall also appoint one alternate member from
each caucus of each house. All appointments to the committee are
subject to approval by the caucuses to which the appointed members
belong.
(2) Members and alternates shall be appointed as soon as possible
after the legislature convenes in regular session in an odd-numbered
year, and their terms shall extend until their successors are appointed
and qualified at the next regular session of the legislature in an odd-numbered year or until such persons no longer serve in the legislature,
whichever occurs first. Members and alternates may be reappointed to
the committee.
(3) ((On or about January 1, 1999, the president of the senate
shall appoint the chairperson and the vice chairperson from among the
committee membership.)) The speaker of the house shall appoint the
chairperson and the vice chairperson in alternating even-numbered years
beginning in the year 2000 from among the committee membership. The
secretary of the senate shall appoint the chairperson and the vice
chairperson in the alternating even-numbered years beginning in the
year 2002 from among the committee membership. Such appointments shall
be made in January of each even-numbered year as soon as possible after
a legislative session convenes.
(4) The chairperson of the committee shall cause all meeting
notices and committee documents to be sent to the members and
alternates. A vacancy shall be filled by appointment of a legislator
from the same political party as the original appointment. The
appropriate appointing authority shall make the appointment within
thirty days of the vacancy occurring.

--- END ---