BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.570 and 1995 c 403 s 802 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Generally. Except to the extent that this chapter or another
statute provides otherwise:
(a) The burden of demonstrating the invalidity of agency action is
on the party asserting invalidity;
(b) The validity of agency action shall be determined in accordance
with the standards of review provided in this section, as applied to
the agency action at the time it was taken;
(c) The court shall make a separate and distinct ruling on each
material issue on which the court's decision is based; and
(d) The court shall grant relief only if it determines that a
person seeking judicial relief has been substantially prejudiced by the
action complained of.
(2) Review of rules. (a) A rule may be reviewed by petition for
declaratory judgment filed pursuant to this subsection or in the
context of any other review proceeding under this section. In an
action challenging the validity of a rule, the agency shall be made a
party to the proceeding.
(b) The validity of any rule may be determined upon petition for a
declaratory judgment addressed to the superior court of Thurston
county, when it appears that the rule, or its threatened application,
interferes with or impairs or immediately threatens to interfere with
or impair the legal rights or privileges of the petitioner. The
declaratory judgment order may be entered whether or not the petitioner
has first requested the agency to pass upon the validity of the rule in
question.
(c) In a proceeding involving review of a rule, the court shall
declare the rule invalid only if it finds that: The rule violates
constitutional provisions; the rule exceeds the statutory authority of
the agency; the rule was adopted without compliance with statutory
rule-making procedures; or the rule is arbitrary and capricious.
(d) If the rules review committee has made an adverse finding under
RCW 34.05.640(2) (a) or (b) on the rule in question, the agency has the
burden of demonstrating the validity of the rule, notwithstanding
subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(3) Review of agency orders in adjudicative proceedings. The court
shall grant relief from an agency order in an adjudicative proceeding
only if it determines that:
(a) The order, or the statute or rule on which the order is based,
is in violation of constitutional provisions on its face or as applied;
(b) The order is outside the statutory authority or jurisdiction of
the agency conferred by any provision of law;
(c) The agency has engaged in unlawful procedure or decision-making process, or has failed to follow a prescribed procedure;
(d) The agency has erroneously interpreted or applied the law;
(e) The order is not supported by evidence that is substantial when
viewed in light of the whole record before the court, which includes
the agency record for judicial review, supplemented by any additional
evidence received by the court under this chapter;
(f) The agency has not decided all issues requiring resolution by
the agency;
(g) A motion for disqualification under RCW 34.05.425 or 34.12.050
was made and was improperly denied or, if no motion was made, facts are
shown to support the grant of such a motion that were not known and
were not reasonably discoverable by the challenging party at the
appropriate time for making such a motion;
(h) The order is inconsistent with a rule of the agency unless the
agency explains the inconsistency by stating facts and reasons to
demonstrate a rational basis for inconsistency; or
(i) The order is arbitrary or capricious.
(4) Review of other agency action.
(a) All agency action not reviewable under subsection (2) or (3) of
this section shall be reviewed under this subsection.
(b) A person whose rights are violated by an agency's failure to
perform a duty that is required by law to be performed may file a
petition for review pursuant to RCW 34.05.514, seeking an order
pursuant to this subsection requiring performance. Within twenty days
after service of the petition for review, the agency shall file and
serve an answer to the petition, made in the same manner as an answer
to a complaint in a civil action. The court may hear evidence,
pursuant to RCW 34.05.562, on material issues of fact raised by the
petition and answer.
(c) Relief for persons aggrieved by the performance of an agency
action, including the exercise of discretion, or an action under (b) of
this subsection can be granted only if the court determines that the
action is:
(i) Unconstitutional;
(ii) Outside the statutory authority of the agency or the authority
conferred by a provision of law;
(iii) Arbitrary or capricious; or
(iv) Taken by persons who were not properly constituted as agency
officials lawfully entitled to take such action.

Sec. 2 RCW 34.05.610 and 1998 c 280 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is ((hereby)) created a joint administrative rules review
committee, which shall be a bipartisan committee consisting of the
lieutenant governor, four senators, and four representatives from the
state legislature. The lieutenant governor shall serve as a nonvoting
committee member unless there is a tie vote among the members voting on
an issue, in which case the lieutenant governor may vote to break the
tie. The senate members of the committee shall be appointed by the
president of the senate, and the house members of the committee shall
be appointed by the speaker of the house. Not more than two members
from each house may be from the same political party. The appointing
authorities shall also appoint one alternate member from each caucus of
each house. All appointments to the committee are subject to approval
by the caucuses to which the appointed members belong.
(2) Members and alternates shall be appointed as soon as possible
after the legislature convenes in regular session in an odd-numbered
year, and their terms shall extend until their successors are appointed
and qualified at the next regular session of the legislature in an odd-numbered year or until such persons no longer serve in the legislature,
whichever occurs first. Members and alternates may be reappointed to
the committee.
(3) ((On or about January 1, 1999, the president of the senate
shall appoint the chairperson and the vice chairperson from among the
committee membership.)) The speaker of the house shall appoint the
chairperson and the vice chairperson in alternating even- numbered
years beginning in the year 2000 from among the committee membership.
The secretary of the senate shall appoint the chairperson and the vice
chairperson in the alternating even- numbered years beginning in the
year 2002 from among the committee membership. Such appointments shall
be made in January of each even- numbered year as soon as possible
after a legislative session convenes.
(4) The chairperson of the committee shall cause all meeting
notices and committee documents to be sent to the members and
alternates. A vacancy shall be filled by appointment of a legislator
from the same political party as the original appointment. The
appropriate appointing authority shall make the appointment within
thirty days of the vacancy occurring.

Sec. 3 RCW 34.05.630 and 1998 c 21 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All rules required to be filed pursuant to RCW 34.05.380, and
emergency rules adopted pursuant to RCW 34.05.350, are subject to
selective review by the committee.
(2) All agency policy and interpretive statements, guidelines, and
documents that are of general applicability, or their equivalents, are
subject to selective review by the committee to determine whether or
not a statement, guideline, or document that is of general
applicability, or its equivalent, is being used as a rule that has not
been adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of law.
(3) If the rules review committee finds by a majority vote of its
members: (a) That an existing rule is not within the intent of the
legislature as expressed by the statute which the rule implements, (b)
that the rule has not been adopted in accordance with all applicable
provisions of law, or (c) that an agency is using a policy or
interpretive statement in place of a rule, the agency affected shall be
notified of such finding and the reasons therefor. Within thirty days
of the receipt of the rules review committee's notice, the agency shall
file notice of a hearing on the rules review committee's finding with
the code reviser and mail notice to all persons who have made timely
request of the agency for advance notice of its rule-making proceedings
as provided in RCW 34.05.320. The agency's notice shall include the
rules review committee's findings and reasons therefor, and shall be
published in the Washington state register in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 34.08 RCW.
(4) The agency shall conduct the hearing within ninety days of
receiving the rules review committee's finding. The agency shall
consider fully all written and oral submissions regarding (a) whether
the rule in question is within the intent of the legislature as
expressed by the statute which the rule implements, (b) whether the
rule was adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of law,
and (c) whether the agency is using a policy or interpretive statement,
guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or its
equivalent, in place of a rule.

Sec. 4 RCW 34.05.640 and 1998 c 21 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within seven days of an agency hearing held after notification
of the agency by the rules review committee pursuant to RCW 34.05.620
or 34.05.630, the affected agency shall notify the committee of its
intended action on a proposed or existing rule to which the committee
objected or on a committee finding of the agency's failure to adopt
rules.
(2) If the rules review committee finds by a majority vote of its
members: (a) That the proposed or existing rule in question will not
be modified, amended, withdrawn, or repealed by the agency so as to
conform with the intent of the legislature, (b) that an existing rule
was not adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of law, or
(c) that the agency will not replace the policy or interpretive
statement, guideline, or document that is of general applicability, or
its equivalent, with a rule, the rules review committee may, within
((thirty)) one hundred twenty days from notification by the agency of
its intended action, file with the code reviser notice of its
objections together with a concise statement of the reasons therefor.
Such notice and statement shall also be provided to the agency by the
rules review committee.
(3)(a) If the rules review committee makes an adverse finding
regarding an existing rule under subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this
section, the committee may, by a majority vote of its members,
recommend suspension of the rule. Within seven days of such vote the
committee shall transmit to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature, the governor, the code reviser, and the agency written
notice of its objection and recommended suspension and the concise
reasons therefor. Within thirty days of receipt of the notice, the
governor shall transmit to the committee, the code reviser, and the
agency written approval or disapproval of the recommended suspension.
If the suspension is approved by the governor, it is effective from the
date of that approval and continues until ninety days after the
expiration of the next regular legislative session.
(b) If the rules review committee makes an adverse finding
regarding a policy or interpretive statement, guideline, or document
that is of general applicability, or its equivalent, under subsection
(2)(c) of this section, the committee may, by a majority vote of its
members, advise the governor of its finding.
(4) The code reviser shall publish transmittals from the rules
review committee or the governor issued pursuant to subsection (2) or
(3) of this section in the Washington state register and shall publish
in the next supplement and compilation of the Washington Administrative
Code a reference to the committee's objection or recommended suspension
and the governor's action on it and to the issue of the Washington
state register in which the full text thereof appears.
(5) The reference shall be removed from a rule published in the
Washington Administrative Code if a subsequent adjudicatory proceeding
determines that the rule is within the intent of the legislature or was
adopted in accordance with all applicable laws, whichever was the
objection of the rules review committee.

Sec. 5 RCW 34.05.660 and 2001 c 64 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it is the
express policy of the legislature that establishment of procedures for
review of administrative rules by the legislature and the notice of
objection required by RCW 34.05.630(3) and 34.05.640(2) in no way
serves to establish a presumption as to the legality or
constitutionality of a rule in any subsequent judicial proceedings
interpreting such rules.
(2) If the joint administrative rules review committee recommends
to the governor that an existing rule be suspended because it does not
conform with the intent of the legislature or was not adopted in
accordance with all applicable provisions of law, the recommendation
establishes a rebuttable presumption in a proceeding challenging the
validity of the rule that the rule is invalid. The burden of
demonstrating the validity of the rule is then on the adopting agency.

--- END ---