BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the legislature's intent to conduct a pilot test to
determine whether providing student food services through contracts
with local restaurants, restaurant franchises, or other private food
purveyors can be cost-effective and have a positive impact on student
satisfaction with food services.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, the board of regents of the University
of Washington shall designate a portion of student food services to be
provided through contracts under this section. The designated portion
of student food services must be of a size sufficient to permit a valid
comparison over at least a four-year period between contracted food
services and food services provided directly by the university.
(3) Using a competitive process in compliance with RCW 28B.10.029,
the board shall contract with local restaurants, restaurant franchises,
or other private food purveyors to provide the portion of student food
services designated under subsection (2) of this section. The board
shall structure the solicitation of contracts in such a way to permit
multiple contractors to provide the student food services. The
contracts under this section may not extend beyond June 30, 2008.
(4) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct
a performance audit of the implementation of this section to determine
whether the pilot test resulted in cost savings and had an impact on
student satisfaction with food services and shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2007, on the results of the audit. The
performance audit must include a student satisfaction survey.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not prohibit the University of Washington
from providing a portion of student food services through contracts
with private entities as required under section 1 of this act.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---