BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.54 RCW
to read as follows:
The state adopts as its recommended schedule for establishing
instream flows by rule the schedule for setting such flows contained in
the December 12, 2002, document prepared by the department entitled
"Work Plan for Instream Flow Setting Through 2010."

--- END ---