BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.120.040 and 2002 c 56 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee shall adopt a regional transportation investment plan
providing for the development, construction, and financing of
transportation projects. The planning committee may consider the
following factors in formulating its plan:
(a) Land use planning criteria;
(b) The input of cities located within a participating county; and
(c) The input of regional transportation planning organizations in
which a participating county is located. A regional transportation
planning organization in which a participating county is located shall
review its adopted regional transportation plan and submit, for the
planning committee's consideration, its list of transportation
improvement priorities.
(2) The planning committee may coordinate its activities with the
department, which shall provide services, data, and personnel to assist
in this planning as desired by the planning committee. In addition,
the planning committee may coordinate with affected cities, towns, and
other local governments that engage in transportation planning.
(3) The planning committee shall:
(a) Conduct public meetings that are needed to assure active public
participation in the development of the plan;
(b) Adopt a plan proposing the:
(i) Creation of a regional transportation investment district; and
((recommending the))
(ii) Construction of transportation projects to improve mobility
within each county. Operations, maintenance, and preservation of
facilities or systems may not be part of the plan; ((and))
(c) Recommend sources of revenue authorized by RCW 36.120.050 and
a financing plan to fund selected transportation projects. The overall
plan of the district must leverage the district's financial
contributions so that the federal, state, local, and other revenue
sources continue to fund major congestion relief and transportation
capacity improvement projects in each county and the district. A
combination of local, state, and federal revenues may be necessary to
pay for transportation projects, and the planning committee shall
consider all of these revenue sources in developing a plan.
(4) The plan must use tax revenues and related debt for projects
that generally benefit a participating county in proportion to the
general level of tax revenues generated within that participating
county. This equity principle applies to all modifications to the
plan, appropriation of contingency funds not identified within the
project estimate, and future phases of the plan. During implementation
of the plan, the board shall retain the flexibility to manage
distribution of revenues, debt, and project schedules so that the
district may effectively implement the plan. Nothing in this section
should be interpreted to prevent the district from pledging district-wide tax revenues for payment of any contract or debt entered into
under RCW 36.120.130.
(5) Before adopting the plan, the planning committee, with
assistance from the department, shall work with the lead agency to
develop accurate cost forecasts for transportation projects. This
project costing methodology must be integrated with revenue forecasts
in developing the plan and must at a minimum include estimated project
costs in constant dollars as well as year of expenditure dollars, the
range of project costs reflected by the level of project design,
project contingencies, identification of mitigation costs, the range of
revenue forecasts, and project and plan cash flow and bond analysis.
The plan submitted to the voters must provide cost estimates for each
project, including reasonable contingency costs. Plans submitted to
the voters must provide that the maximum amount possible of the funds
raised will be used to fund projects in the plan, including
environmental improvements and mitigation, and that administrative
costs be minimized. If actual revenue exceeds actual plan costs, the
excess revenues must be used to retire any outstanding debt associated
with the plan.
(((5))) (6) If a county opts not to adopt the plan or participate
in the regional transportation investment district, but two or more
contiguous counties do choose to continue to participate, then the
planning committee may, within ninety days, redefine the regional
transportation investment plan and the ballot measure to be submitted
to the people to reflect elimination of the county, and submit the
redefined plan to the legislative authorities of the remaining counties
for their decision as to whether to continue to adopt the redefined
plan and participate. This action must be completed within sixty days
after receipt of the redefined plan.
(((6))) (7) Once adopted, the plan must be forwarded to the
participating county legislative authorities to initiate the election
process under RCW 36.120.070. The planning committee shall at the same
time provide notice to each city and town within the district, the
governor, the chairs of the transportation committees of the
legislature, the secretary of transportation, and each legislator whose
legislative district is partially or wholly within the boundaries of
the district.
(((7))) (8) If the ballot measure is not approved, the planning
committee may redefine the selected transportation projects, financing
plan, and the ballot measure. The county legislative authorities may
approve the new plan and ballot measure, and may then submit the
revised proposition to the voters at the next election or a special
election. If no ballot measure is approved by the voters by the third
vote, the planning committee is dissolved.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.120.140 and 2002 c 56 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((A plan may be modified)) The board may modify the plan to
change transportation projects or revenue sources if:
(a) Two or more participating counties adopt a resolution to modify
the plan; and
(b) The counties submit to the voters in the district a ballot
measure that redefines the scope of the plan, its projects, its
schedule, its costs, or the revenue sources. If the voters fail to
approve the redefined plan, the district shall continue to work on and
complete the plan, and the projects in it, that was originally approved
by the voters. If the voters approve the redefined plan, the district
shall work on and complete the projects under the redefined plan.
(2) The board may modify the plan to change transportation projects
within a participating county if:
(a) A majority of the board approves the change;
(b) The modifications are limited to projects within the county;
(c) The county submits to the voters in the county a ballot measure
that redefines:
(i) Projects;
(ii) Scopes of projects; or
(iii) Costs; and
(iv) The financial plan for the county;
(d) The proposed modifications maintain the equity of the plan and
does not increase the total level of plan expenditure for the county.
If the voters fail to approve the modified plan, the district shall
continue to work on and complete the plan, and the projects in it, that
was originally approved by the voters. If the voters approve the
redefined plan, the district shall work on and complete the projects
under the redefined plan.
(3) If a transportation project cost exceeds its original cost by
more than twenty percent as identified in the plan:
(a) The board shall, in coordination with the county legislative
authorities, submit to the voters in the district or county a ballot
measure that redefines the scope of the transportation project, its
schedule, or its costs. If the voters fail to approve the redefined
transportation project, the district shall terminate work on that
transportation project, except that the district may take reasonable
steps to use, preserve, or connect any improvement already constructed.
The remainder of any funds that would otherwise have been expended on
the terminated transportation project must first be used to retire any
outstanding debt attributable to the plan and then may be used to
implement the remainder of the plan.
(b) Alternatively, upon adoption of a resolution by two or more
participating counties:
(i) The counties shall submit to the voters in the district a
ballot measure that redefines the scope of the plan, its transportation
projects, its schedule, or its costs. If the voters fail to approve
the redefined plan, the district shall terminate work on that plan,
except that the district may take reasonable steps to use, preserve, or
connect any improvement already constructed. The remainder of any
funds must be used to retire any outstanding debt attributable to the
plan; or
(ii) The counties may elect to have the district continue the
transportation project without submitting an additional ballot proposal
to the voters.
(((3))) (4) To assure accountability to the public for the timely
construction of the transportation improvement project or projects
within cost projections, the district shall issue a report, at least
annually, to the public and copies of the report to newspapers of
record in the district. In the report, the district shall indicate the
status of transportation project costs, transportation project
expenditures, revenues, and construction schedules. The report may
also include progress towards meeting the performance criteria provided
under this chapter.

--- END ---