BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the hydraulic
project approval provides critical protections for fish and fish
habitat and is a key component of the state's approach to salmon
recovery. The legislature also finds that the hydraulic project
approval is the only state permit solely intended to protect fish life.
The legislature finds that changes to the existing program recommended
by the hydraulic project approval task force would improve the
efficiency and effectiveness of the hydraulic approval program. The
legislature further finds that the hydraulic approval program needs to
be redesigned to provide better customer service, improved consistency,
and enhanced compliance and effectiveness monitoring. Therefore, it is
the intent of the legislature to clarify the department of fish and
wildlife's authority under chapter 77.55 RCW, streamline the
application process to provide consistency and predictability for
permit applicants, and ensure that those hydraulic projects with the
highest potential risk to fish and fish habitat receive the highest
priority.

--- END ---