BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4451 and 1997 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter, as
provided in this section.
(a) If the taxpayer is not eligible under (b) of this subsection,
the maximum credit for a taxpayer for a reporting period is thirty-five
dollars multiplied by the number of months in the reporting period, as
determined under RCW 82.32.045.
(b)(i) If the amount of wages paid by the taxpayer in the twelve-month period that ends with the reporting period is at least ten
percent greater than the amount of wages paid by the taxpayer in the
twelve-month period that precedes the twelve-month period that ends
with the reporting period, the maximum credit for a taxpayer for a
reporting period is one hundred five dollars multiplied by the number
of months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW 82.32.045.
(ii) No credit may be taken under this subsection (1)(b):
(A) Following the two-year period after which the credit under this
subsection (1)(b) was first taken;
(B) If the taxpayer is a business that has been restructured,
reorganized, or transferred, unless the majority of the activities to
be conducted after restructuring, reorganization, or transferral are
significantly different from the activities previously conducted; or
(C) If the taxpayer is a business that is substantially similar to
a business currently operated, or operated within the past five years,
by the same principals.
(2) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter is
equal to or less than the maximum credit, a credit is allowed equal to
the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter.
(3) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter exceeds
the maximum credit, a reduced credit is allowed equal to twice the
maximum credit, minus the tax otherwise due under this chapter, but not
less than zero.
(4) The department may prepare a tax credit table consisting of tax
ranges using increments of no more than five dollars and a
corresponding tax credit to be applied to those tax ranges. The table
shall be prepared in such a manner that no taxpayer will owe a greater
amount of tax by using the table than would be owed by performing the
calculation under subsections (1) through (3) of this section. A table
prepared by the department under this subsection shall be used by all
taxpayers in taking the credit provided in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---