BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.157.020 and 1999 c 393 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any tobacco product manufacturer selling cigarettes to consumers
within the State (whether directly or through a distributor, retailer
or similar intermediary or intermediaries) after May 18, 1999, shall do
one of the following:
(a) become a participating manufacturer (as that term is defined in
section II(jj) of the Master Settlement Agreement) and generally
perform its financial obligations under the Master Settlement
Agreement; or
(b)(1) place into a qualified escrow fund by April 15 of the year
following the year in question the following amounts (as such amounts
are adjusted for inflation) --
1999: $.0094241 per unit sold after May 18, 1999;
2000: $.0104712 per unit sold;
for each of 2001 and 2002: $.0136125 per unit sold;
for each of 2003 through 2006: $.0167539 per unit sold;
for each of 2007 and each year thereafter: $.0188482 per unit
sold.
(2) A tobacco product manufacturer that places funds into escrow
pursuant to paragraph (1) shall receive the interest or other
appreciation on such funds as earned. Such funds themselves shall be
released from escrow only under the following circumstances --
(A) to pay a judgment or settlement on any released claim brought
against such tobacco product manufacturer by the State or any releasing
party located or residing in the State. Funds shall be released from
escrow under this subparagraph (i) in the order in which they were
placed into escrow and (ii) only to the extent and at the time
necessary to make payments required under such judgment or settlement;
(B) to the extent that a tobacco product manufacturer establishes
that the amount it was required to place into escrow on account of
units sold in the state in a particular year was greater than the
((State's allocable share of the total payments that such manufacturer
would have been required to make in that year under the Master
Settlement Agreement (as determined pursuant to section IX(i)(2) of the
Master Settlement Agreement, and before any of the adjustments or
offsets described in section IX(i)(3) of that Agreement other than the
Inflation Adjustment))) Master Settlement Agreement payments, as
determined pursuant to section IX(i) of that Agreement including after
final determination of all adjustments, that such manufacturer would
have been required to make on account of such units sold, had it been
a Participating Manufacturer, the excess shall be released from escrow
and revert back to such tobacco product manufacturer; or
(C) to the extent not released from escrow under subparagraphs (A)
or (B), funds shall be released from escrow and revert back to such
tobacco product manufacturer twenty-five years after the date on which
they were placed into escrow.
(3) Each tobacco product manufacturer that elects to place funds
into escrow pursuant to this subsection shall annually certify to the
Attorney General that it is in compliance with this subsection. The
Attorney General may bring a civil action on behalf of the State
against any tobacco product manufacturer that fails to place into
escrow the funds required under this section. Any tobacco product
manufacturer that fails in any year to place into escrow the funds
required under this section shall --
(A) be required within 15 days to place such funds into escrow as
shall bring it into compliance with this section. The court, upon a
finding of a violation of this subsection, may impose a civil penalty
to be paid to the general fund of the state in an amount not to exceed
5 percent of the amount improperly withheld from escrow per day of the
violation and in a total amount not to exceed 100 percent of the
original amount improperly withheld from escrow;
(B) in the case of a knowing violation, be required within 15 days
to place such funds into escrow as shall bring it into compliance with
this section. The court, upon a finding of a knowing violation of this
subsection, may impose a civil penalty to be paid to the general fund
of the state in an amount not to exceed 15 percent of the amount
improperly withheld from escrow per day of the violation and in a total
amount not to exceed 300 percent of the original amount improperly
withheld from escrow; and
(C) in the case of a second knowing violation, be prohibited from
selling cigarettes to consumers within the State (whether directly or
through a distributor, retailer or similar intermediary) for a period
not to exceed 2 years.
Each failure to make an annual deposit required under this section
shall constitute a separate violation. The violator shall also pay the
State's costs and attorney's fees incurred during a successful
prosecution under this paragraph (3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.157 RCW
to read as follows:
If this act is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
unconstitutional, then RCW 70.157.020(b)(2)(B) shall be repealed in its
entirety. If RCW 70.157.020(b)(2) shall thereafter be held by a court
of competent jurisdiction to be unconstitutional, then this act shall
be repealed, and RCW 70.157.020(b)(2)(B) be restored as if no
amendments had been made. Neither any holding of unconstitutionality
nor the repeal of RCW 70.157.020(b)(2)(B) shall affect, impair, or
invalidate any other portion of RCW 70.157.020 or the application of
that section to any other person or circumstance, and the remaining
portions of RCW 70.157.020 shall at all times continue in full force
and effect.

--- END ---