BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.250 and 2000 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this
chapter, "work activity" means:
(1) Unsubsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;
(2) Subsidized paid employment in the private or public sector((,
including));
(3) Employment through the state or federal work-study program and
the accompanying education program for a period not to exceed twenty-four months. Students who work the maximum state or federal work-study
offered to them by their educational institution while attending the
accompanying education program shall be considered full-time WorkFirst
participants;
(((3))) (4) Work experience, including:
(a) An internship or practicum, that is paid or unpaid and is
required to complete a course of vocational training or to obtain a
license or certificate in a high demand field, as determined by the
employment security department. No internship or practicum shall
exceed twelve months; or
(b) Work associated with the refurbishing of publicly assisted
housing, if sufficient paid employment is not available;
(((4))) (5) On-the-job training;
(((5))) (6) Job search and job readiness assistance;
(((6))) (7) Community service programs;
(((7))) (8) Vocational educational training, not to exceed twelve
months with respect to any individual;
(((8))) (9) Job skills training directly related to employment;
(((9))) (10) Education directly related to employment, in the case
of a recipient who has not received a high school diploma or a GED;
(((10))) (11) Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a
course of study leading to a GED, in the case of a recipient who has
not completed secondary school or received such a certificate;
(((11))) (12) The provision of child care services to an individual
who is participating in a community service program;
(((12))) (13) Internships, that shall be paid or unpaid work
experience performed by an intern in a business, industry, or
government or nongovernmental agency setting;
(((13))) (14) Practicums, which include any educational program in
which a student is working under the close supervision of a
professional in an agency, clinic, or other professional practice
setting for purposes of advancing their skills and knowledge; and
(((14))) (15) Services required by the recipient under RCW
74.08.025(3) and 74.08A.010(3) to become employable.

--- END ---