BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that fraudulent or
fictitious drivers' licenses are sometimes used to obtain the use of
rental vehicles. Unlicensed drivers are operating rental vehicles on
state highways and roads. Often these drivers have lost their licenses
because of various driving offenses. It is a public safety benefit to
the state that these drivers not have access to rental vehicles. The
legislature also finds that criminal activity is often facilitated by
the use of rental vehicles which are often obtained through the use of
illegal drivers' licenses. The legislature declares that existing
technology can allow rental car companies to determine in real time
only the validity of a driver's license which will allow vehicle rental
companies to prevent the illegal rental of vehicles in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The state patrol and department of licensing shall develop and
adopt through joint rule making, in consultation and cooperation with
the car and truck renting and leasing association, a program, at no
cost to the state, that provides vehicle rental companies with the
means to determine in real time only the validity of this state's and
other states' drivers' licenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The state patrol and department of licensing
shall report to the legislature by December 31, 2003, on the details of
the program developed under section 2 of this act.

--- END ---