BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that agencies
frequently maintain data warehouses that contain various information
regarding persons who do business with, provide services to, and
receive services from the state. The legislature further finds that
instances exist where the accurate and timely exchange of data among
agencies would be to the benefit of Washington citizens. Therefore,
the office of financial management shall convene a common data
definition work group to evaluate the feasibility and challenges of
creating a common data definition for the state. The work group shall
include consideration of all instances in which state agencies collect
uniquely identifying information regarding persons and businesses that
provide services to the state, receive services from the state, file
claims with or against the state, receive benefits from the state,
enter into contracts with the state, make payments to the state, or
otherwise conduct business with the state.
(2) The common data definition work group shall include at least
one representative from at least the following state agencies:
(a) The office of financial management;
(b) The department of social and health services;
(c) The department of revenue;
(d) The department of labor and industries;
(e) The health care authority;
(f) The employment security department;
(g) The higher education coordinating board;
(h) The department of corrections;
(i) The department of personnel;
(j) The department of retirement systems;
(k) The department of financial institutions;
(l) The department of licensing;
(m) The department of health;
(n) The department of veterans affairs;
(o) The department of information services;
(p) The office of superintendent of public instruction;
(q) The office of the secretary of state;
(r) The department of community, trade, and economic development;
(s) The department of fish and wildlife;
(t) The office of the state auditor; and
(u) The work force training and education coordinating board.
(3) The office of financial management shall facilitate and provide
staff support to the common data definition work group. The common
data definition work group must examine the following topics:
(a) The manual or automated system that each agency uses to
collect, store, and exchange uniquely identifying information;
(b) The information associated with each record, including
personally identifying information;
(c) The requirements and procedures provided in state and federal
law to protect privacy and to prevent the unauthorized release of
information;
(d) The processes each agency has in place to prevent the
unauthorized release of information;
(e) The processes each agency has in place to lawfully exchange
information with other state agencies, local government agencies, the
federal government, and other authorized parties;
(f) The challenges of creating a common data definition;
(g) The challenges of maintaining data integrity and accuracy when
sharing or exchanging data; and
(h) The processes necessary to ensure that the information
associated with each individual or business is only accessible to those
persons authorized to have access.
(4) The common data definition work group shall provide at least
seven days' notice of the date, time, location, and agenda of each
meeting to every member of the house of representatives and the senate.
Notice must be mailed to the Olympia office and, where applicable, to
the district office of every member of the house of representatives and
the senate. The common data definition work group shall issue a
progress report to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature no later than January 31, 2004. The report shall include
findings and recommendations on the feasibility of creating and
maintaining a common data definition, whether to create such a
definition and, if so, how to create the definition.
(5) This section expires December 31, 2004.

--- END ---