BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.91.170 and 2001 c 112 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any person who has received notice that his or her behavior
is interfering with the use of a dog guide or service animal who
continues with reckless disregard to interfere with the use of a dog
guide or service animal by obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise
jeopardizing the safety of the dog guide or service animal user or his
or her dog guide or service animal is guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, except that for a second or
subsequent offense it is a gross misdemeanor.
(b) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her dog
to interfere with the use of a dog guide or service animal by
obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise jeopardizing the safety of the
dog guide or service animal user or his or her dog guide or service
animal is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20
RCW, except that for a second or subsequent offense it is a gross
misdemeanor.
(2)(a) Any person who, with reckless disregard, injures, disables,
or causes the death of a dog guide or service animal is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(b) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her dog
to injure, disable, or cause the death of a dog guide or service animal
is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20
RCW.
(3) Any person who intentionally injures, disables, or causes the
death of a dog guide or service animal is guilty of a class C felony.
(4) Any person who wrongfully obtains or exerts unauthorized
control over a dog guide or service animal with the intent to deprive
the dog guide or service animal user of his or her dog guide or service
animal is guilty of theft in the first degree, RCW 9A.56.030.
(5)(a) In any case in which the defendant is convicted of a
violation of this section, he or she shall also be ordered to make full
restitution for all damages, including incidental and consequential
expenses incurred by the dog guide or service animal user and the dog
guide or service animal which arise out of or are related to the
criminal offense.
(b) Restitution for a conviction under this section shall include,
but is not limited to:
(i) The value of the replacement of an incapacitated or deceased
dog guide or service animal, the training of a replacement dog guide or
service animal, or retraining of the affected dog guide or service
animal and all related veterinary and care expenses; and
(ii) Medical expenses of the dog guide or service animal user,
training of the dog guide or service animal user, and compensation for
wages or earned income lost by the dog guide or service animal user.
(6) Nothing in this section shall affect any civil remedies
available for violation of this section.
(7) It is the duty of all peace officers and law enforcement
agencies within this state to respond to, investigate, and enforce all
violations of this section.
(8) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of
guiding blind persons or a dog trained for the purpose of assisting
hearing impaired persons.
(b) (("Service animal" means an animal that is trained for the
purposes of assisting or accommodating a disabled person's sensory,
mental, or physical disability)) "Law enforcement agency" means any
general authority Washington law enforcement agency as defined in RCW
10.93.020(1). For purposes of this section, "law enforcement agency"
does not include animal care and control agencies as defined in RCW
16.52.011(2)(b).
(c) "Notice" means a verbal or otherwise communicated warning
prescribing the behavior of another person and a request that the
person stop their behavior.
(d) "Peace officer" means any general authority Washington peace
officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020(3). For purposes of this section,
"peace officer" does not include animal control officers as defined in
RCW 16.52.011(2)(c) or humane officers as defined in RCW
16.52.011(2)(e).
(e) "Service animal" means an animal that is trained for the
purposes of assisting or accommodating a disabled person's sensory,
mental, or physical disability.
(f) "Value" means the value to the dog guide or service animal user
and does not refer to cost or fair market value.

--- END ---