BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state
annually awards service contracts to private contractors and vendors to
provide services on behalf of the state, and that such expenditures
should be spent in a manner that promotes the creation of jobs that
allow residents to support themselves and their families with dignity.
The legislature further finds that the present federal and state
minimum wages generate income at a level below the amount required to
support a family at a basic level and that jobs that do not pay living
wages result in families who have greater need of social services
provided by the state and paid for by state taxpayers. The payment of
adequate wages to workers for those hours performing services on behalf
of the state will promote stability and reduced turnover, resulting in
a higher quality of service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Contract" means public works contracts, personal services
contracts, and purchasing contracts for goods and services.
(2) "Contractor" means any person, firm, or corporation that, in
the pursuit of an independent business, undertakes a contract with the
state.
(3) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries.
(5) "Subcontractor" means any person, firm, or corporation that, in
the pursuit of an independent business, undertakes a contract with
another person, firm, or corporation who holds a contract with the
state.
(6) "Employee" includes any individual employed by an employer but
does not include:
(a) An individual seventeen years old or younger;
(b) An individual in a position that is designated for a trainee,
apprentice, or is otherwise part of a training program;
(c) An individual in a work study position, internship, or who is
in a position that requires student status as a prerequisite to being
employed in that position;
(d) An individual standing by or on-call according to the criteria
established by the fair labor standards act, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 201, but
only for those hours when the employee is actually standing by or on-call;
(e) An individual (i) employed as a hand harvest laborer and paid
on a piece rate basis in an operation that has been, and is generally
and customarily recognized as having been, paid on a piece rate basis
in the region of employment; (ii) who commutes daily from his or her
permanent residence to the farm on which he or she is employed; and
(iii) who has been employed in agriculture less than thirteen weeks
during the preceding calendar year;
(f) An individual employed in casual labor in or about a private
home, unless performed in the course of the employer's trade, business,
or profession;
(g) An individual employed in a bona fide executive,
administrative, or professional capacity or in the capacity of outside
salesman as those terms are defined by rules of the director. However,
those terms shall be defined by the Washington personnel resources
board pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW;
(h) An individual engaged in the activities of an educational,
charitable, religious, state, or local governmental body or agency, or
nonprofit organization where the employer-employee relationship does
not in fact exist or where the services are rendered to such
organizations gratuitously. If the individual receives reimbursement
in lieu of compensation for normally incurred out-of-pocket expenses or
receives a nominal amount of compensation per unit of voluntary service
rendered, an employer-employee relationship is deemed not to exist for
the purposes of this chapter or for purposes of membership or
qualification in any state, local government, or publicly supported
retirement system other than that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(i) An individual employed full-time by any state or local
governmental body or agency who provides voluntary services but only
with regard to the provision of the voluntary services. The voluntary
services and any compensation therefor does not affect or add to
qualification, entitlement, or benefit rights under any state or local
government, or publicly supported retirement system other than that
provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(j) A newspaper vendor or carrier;
(k) A carrier subject to regulation by Part 1 of the interstate
commerce act;
(l) An individual engaged in forest protection and fire prevention
activities;
(m) An individual employed by any charitable institution charged
with child care responsibilities engaged primarily in the development
of character or citizenship or promoting health or physical fitness or
providing or sponsoring recreational opportunities or facilities for
young people or members of the armed forces of the United States;
(n) An individual whose duties require that he or she resides or
sleeps at the place of his or her employment or who otherwise spends a
substantial portion of his or her work time subject to call, and not
engaged in the performance of active duties;
(o) A resident, inmate, or patient of a state, county, or municipal
correctional, detention, treatment, or rehabilitative institution;
(p) An individual who holds a public elective or appointive office
of the state, any county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, political subdivision, or any instrumentality
thereof, or any employee of the state legislature;
(q) All vessel operating crews of the Washington state ferries
operated by the department of transportation;
(r) An individual employed as a seaman on a vessel other than an
American vessel; or
(s) An individual subject to a bona fide collective bargaining
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All contractors and subcontractors
covered under this act shall pay employees a living wage no less than
ten dollars per hour if health benefits are paid for in whole or in
substantial part by the employer, or eleven dollars and fifty cents per
hour if health benefits are not so provided.
(2)(a) Beginning January 1, 2004, and each following January 1st as
set forth under (b) of this subsection, every contractor and
subcontractor shall pay to each of his or her qualifying employees at
a rate of not less than the amount established under (b) of this
subsection.
(b) Beginning September 30, 2003, and on each following September
30th, the department shall calculate an adjusted living wage rate by
increasing the current year's living wage rate by the rate of
inflation. The adjusted living wage rate shall be calculated to the
nearest cent using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and
clerical workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months
before each September 1st as calculated by the United States department
of labor. Each adjusted living wage rate calculated under this
subsection (2)(b) takes effect on the following January 1st.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In circumstances where a contract also
requires the contractor or subcontractor to pay its employees
prevailing wages, the contractor or subcontractor shall pay its
employees at the contractually prescribed prevailing wage rate or the
minimum living wage payable under this chapter, whichever is higher.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The office of financial management may grant
an exemption to the requirements of this chapter upon making a written
finding either that:
(1) Compliance with the living wage will cause economic hardship to
the state or its citizens; or
(2) The exemption is in the best interests of the state due to
unforeseen or special circumstances including but not limited to a
declared natural disaster.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 No contractor or subcontractor shall
retaliate or discriminate against an employee in his or her terms and
conditions of employment for: (1) Reporting a possible violation of
this chapter to the director; (2) participating in any legal or
administrative proceeding in respect to this chapter; (3) seeking civil
remedies to enforce his or her rights conferred by this chapter; or (4)
otherwise asserting his or her rights under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) An employee claiming a violation of this
chapter may report the violation to the director.
(2) The department shall have the same administrative and
enforcement powers as identified in chapter 49.48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Compliance with this chapter is required
in all state contracts to which it applies. Upon award of a contract
covered by this chapter, the contractor must certify that he or she
will comply, and will require all subcontractors to comply, with the
requirements of this chapter.
(2) Such contracts shall provide that upon a violation of this
chapter, a contractor or subcontractor who is out of compliance for the
first time has thirty days to come into compliance including the
payment of any back wages required. If the contractor or subcontractor
remains out of compliance after thirty days, the state may terminate
the contract and otherwise pursue contractual remedies for breach of
contract. The contractor or subcontractor may appeal the finding of
the department made under this section in accordance with the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) Within ten days of a request by the state, the contractor or
subcontractor shall provide satisfactory proof of compliance with the
living wage provisions of this chapter in the form of payroll records,
benefit records, or other appropriate evidence.
(4) If the state finds that a contractor or subcontractor has
violated this chapter a second time, the state may terminate all
contracts with the contractor or subcontractor, and the contractor or
subcontractor shall be prohibited from contracting with the state for
a period of two years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Nothing contained in this chapter may be
construed to limit in any way the remedies, legal or equitable, that
are available for violations of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The living wage requirement imposed by
this chapter applies to all contracts and related subcontracts entered
into, renewed, or extended on or after July 1, 2003.
(2) This act does not apply to contracts entered into before July
1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
All contracts entered into under this chapter on or after July 1,
2003, are subject to the requirements established under chapter 39.--RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
All contracts entered into under this chapter on or after July 1,
2003, are subject to the requirements established under chapter 39.--RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 47.28 RCW
to read as follows:
All contracts entered into under this chapter on or after July 1,
2003, are subject to the requirements established under chapter 39.--RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---