BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.57 RCW
to read as follows:
An effective livestock identification program is essential for
tracking, from source to consumer, livestock and products made from
livestock to protect the public health and to thwart any attempted
bioterrorism. Such a program is also essential for the owners of
livestock for verifying ownership, for recovering stolen animals, and
for prosecuting theft.

--- END ---