BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state patrol may conduct inspections of salvage
vehicles presented to the state for titling and/or licensing. In
addition to those powers and duties elsewhere granted, the chief of the
Washington state patrol shall adopt, apply, and enforce such rules
relating to salvage vehicles and salvage vehicle inspections as may be
deemed necessary by the chief for the public welfare and safety.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.12.005 and 2002 c 245 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) The words "delivery," "notice," "send," and "security interest"
have the same meaning as these terms are defined in RCW 62A.1-201; the
word "secured party" has the same meaning as this term is defined in
RCW 62A.9A-102.
(2) "Salvage vehicle" means a vehicle whose certificate of
ownership has been surrendered to the department under RCW 46.12.070
due to the vehicle's destruction or declaration as a total loss or for
which there is documentation indicating that the vehicle has been
declared salvage or has been damaged to the extent that the owner, an
insurer, or other person acting on behalf of the owner, has determined
that the cost of parts and labor ((plus the salvage value has made it
uneconomical to repair)) for repairs to reconstruct the vehicle to its
condition before it was wrecked, destroyed, or damaged, and for legal
operation on the roads or highways, exceeds eighty percent of the
retail value of the vehicle. The term does not include a motor vehicle
having a model year designation of a calendar year that is at least six
years before the calendar year in which the vehicle was wrecked,
destroyed, or damaged, unless, after June 13, 2002, and immediately
before the vehicle was wrecked, destroyed, or damaged, the vehicle had
a retail fair market value of at least the then market value threshold
amount and has a model year designation of a calendar year not more
than twenty years before the calendar year in which the vehicle was
wrecked, destroyed, or damaged. "Market value threshold amount" means
six thousand five hundred dollars or such greater amount as is then in
effect by rule of the department in accordance with this section. If,
for any year beginning with 2002, the Consumer Price Index for All
Urban Consumers, compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United
States Department of Labor, or its successor, for the West Region, in
the expenditure category "used cars and trucks," shows an increase in
the annual average for that year compared to that of the year
immediately prior, the department shall, by rule, increase the then
market value threshold amount by the same percentage as the percentage
increase of the annual average, with the increase of the market value
threshold amount to be effective on July 1st of the year immediately
after the year with the increase of the annual average. However, the
market value threshold amount may not be increased if the amount of the
increase would be less than fifty dollars, and each increase of the
market value threshold amount will be rounded to the nearest ten
dollars. If an increase in the market value threshold amount is not
made because the increase would be less than fifty dollars, the unmade
increase will be carried forward and added to later year calculations
of increase until the unmade increase is included in an increase made
to the market value threshold amount.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.12.030 and 2001 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The application for a certificate of ownership shall be upon a
form furnished or approved by the department and shall contain:
(((1))) (a) A full description of the vehicle, which shall contain
the proper vehicle identification number, the number of miles indicated
on the odometer at the time of delivery of the vehicle, and any
distinguishing marks of identification;
(((2))) (b) The name and address of the person who is to be the
registered owner of the vehicle and, if the vehicle is subject to a
security interest, the name and address of the secured party;
(((3))) (c) Such other information as the department may require.
(2) The department may in any instance, in addition to the
information required on the application, require additional information
and a physical examination of the vehicle or of any class of vehicles,
or either.
(3)(a) A physical examination of the vehicle is mandatory if it has
been rebuilt after surrender of the certificate of ownership to the
department under RCW 46.12.070 due to the vehicle's destruction or
declaration as a total loss. The inspection must verify that the
vehicle identification number is genuine and agrees with the number
shown on the title and registration certificate. The inspection must
be made by a member of the Washington state patrol or other person
authorized by the department to make such inspections.
(b)(i) A physical examination of the vehicle is mandatory if the
vehicle was declared totaled or salvage under the laws of this state,
or the vehicle is presented with documents from another state showing
the vehicle was totaled or salvage and has not been rebuilt or repaired
in the jurisdiction of that state.
(ii) The inspection must verify that the vehicle identification
number is genuine and agrees with the number shown on the original
documents supporting the vehicle purchase or ownership.
(iii) A Washington state patrol VIN specialist must ensure that all
major component parts used for the reconstruction of a salvage or
rebuildable vehicle were obtained legally. Original invoices must be
from a vendor that is registered with the department of revenue for the
collection of retail sales or use taxes. The invoices must include the
name and address of the business, a description of the part or parts
sold, the date of sale, and the amount of sale to include all taxes
paid unless exempted by the department of revenue. Should the parts or
components be purchased from a private individual, that bill of sale
must be notarized. The bills of sale must include the names and
addresses of the sellers and purchasers, a description of the vehicle,
the part or parts being sold, including the make, model, year, and
identification or serial number, that date of sale, and the purchase
price of the vehicle or part or parts.
(iv) A vehicle being rebuilt for titling or registration within the
state of Washington must be repaired to meet the original equipment
manufacture appearance and standards for the model year and manufacture
prior to inspection of the salvage vehicle by the Washington state
patrol.
(4) Rebuilt or salvage vehicles presented for inspection for
retitling or registration within the state must meet the requirements
found under chapter 46.37 RCW.
(5) The application shall be subscribed by the registered owner and
be sworn to by that applicant in the manner described by RCW 9A.72.085.
The department shall retain the application in either the original,
computer, or photostatic form.

--- END ---