BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.16.035 and 1999 c 7 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) The department shall classify all occupations or industries
in accordance with their degree of hazard and fix therefor basic rates
of premium which shall be:
(i) The lowest necessary to maintain actuarial solvency of the
accident and medical aid funds in accordance with recognized insurance
principles; and
(ii) Designed to attempt to limit fluctuations in premiums.
(b) The department shall, in consultation with the workers'
compensation advisory committee, adopt rules regarding the level of the
contingency reserve needed to maintain actuarial solvency of the
accident and medical aid funds. The policy must include a process by
which the department may, no sooner than thirty days after reporting
the proposed action to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
pay premium dividends if the level of the contingency reserve exceeds
the amount required under the rules. This subsection does not
authorize the department to fix rates at a level below the actuarially
indicated rates.
(c) The department shall formulate and adopt rules ((and
regulations)) governing the method of premium calculation and
collection and providing for a rating system consistent with recognized
principles of workers' compensation insurance which shall be designed
to stimulate and encourage accident prevention and to facilitate
collection. The department may annually, or at such other times as it
deems necessary to ((maintain solvency of the funds)) achieve the
objectives under (a) of this subsection, readjust rates in accordance
with the rating system to become effective on such dates as the
department may designate.
(2) In providing a retrospective rating plan under RCW 51.18.010,
the department may consider each individual retrospective rating group
as a single employing entity for purposes of dividends or premium
discounts.

--- END ---