BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington currently denies the right to vote to all persons
who have not fully paid legal financial obligations, even though they
have completed all other requirements of their felony sentences;
(2) Voting is part of the fabric of our democracy and, by
increasing voter participation, restoring the right to vote to ex-felons both strengthens democracy and reintegrates ex-felons into
society;
(3) The current disenfranchisement law has a disproportionate
impact on male African-American Washingtonians, disenfranchising
approximately one-fourth of all African-American males otherwise
eligible to vote in this state;
(4) Crime victims have a strong interest in repayment of legal
financial obligations; and
(5) Restoring the right to vote before legal financial obligations
have been paid does not lessen, void, or nullify the continuing
obligation of ex-felons to pay legal financial obligations, their
motivation to do so, or the state's ability to collect the debt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The purpose of this act is to strengthen the
state's democratic institutions by increasing participation in
elections, and to promote the health and safety of Washington citizens
by fostering ex-felons becoming fully productive members of society.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29.07 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, persons
convicted of a felony will have their civil right to the elective
franchise restored if they have completed all the requirements of all
of their sentences, except for legal financial obligations as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030.
(2) This section does not impair an offender's ability to obtain a
certificate of discharge prior to completion of community supervision
if eligible under RCW 9.94A.637(3).
(3) This section does not affect or prevent the enforcement of
legal financial obligations or the offender's obligation to comply with
an order issued under chapter 10.99 RCW or any other legal authority
that excludes or prohibits the offender from having contact with a
specified person, or coming within a set distance of any specified
location, that was contained in the judgment and sentence.

--- END ---