BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
When a municipality receives a written protest from a bidder for a
public works project which is the subject of competitive bids, the
municipality shall not execute a contract for the project with anyone
other than the protesting bidder without first providing at least two
full business days' written notice of the municipality's intent to
execute a contract for the project. Intermediate Saturdays, Sundays,
and legal holidays are not counted in determining the minimum two-day
notice period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
A low bidder on a public works project who claims error and fails
to enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project
if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.10.061 and 2002 c 46 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and after complying
with RCW 39.10.030, a public body may utilize the general
contractor/construction manager procedure of public works contracting
for public works projects authorized under subsection (2) of this
section. For the purposes of this section, "general
contractor/construction manager" means a firm with which a public body
has selected and negotiated a maximum allowable construction cost to be
guaranteed by the firm, after competitive selection through formal
advertisement and competitive bids, to provide services during the
design phase that may include life-cycle cost design considerations,
value engineering, scheduling, cost estimating, constructability,
alternative construction options for cost savings, and sequencing of
work, and to act as the construction manager and general contractor
during the construction phase.
(2) Except those school districts proposing projects that are
considered and approved by the school district project review board,
public bodies authorized under this section may utilize the general
contractor/construction manager procedure for public works projects
valued over ten million dollars where:
(a) Implementation of the project involves complex scheduling
requirements; or
(b) The project involves construction at an existing facility which
must continue to operate during construction; or
(c) The involvement of the general contractor/construction manager
during the design stage is critical to the success of the project.
(3) Public bodies should select general contractor/construction
managers early in the life of public works projects, and in most
situations no later than the completion of schematic design.
(4) Contracts for the services of a general contractor/construction
manager under this section shall be awarded through a competitive
process requiring the public solicitation of proposals for general
contractor/construction manager services. The public solicitation of
proposals shall include: A description of the project, including
programmatic, performance, and technical requirements and
specifications when available; the reasons for using the general
contractor/construction manager procedure; a description of the
qualifications to be required of the proposer, including submission of
the proposer's accident prevention program; a description of the
process the public body will use to evaluate qualifications and
proposals, including evaluation factors and the relative weight of
factors; the form of the contract to be awarded; the estimated maximum
allowable construction cost; and the bid instructions to be used by the
general contractor/construction manager finalists. Evaluation factors
shall include, but not be limited to: Ability of professional
personnel, past performance in negotiated and complex projects, and
ability to meet time and budget requirements; the scope of work the
general contractor/construction manager proposes to self-perform and
its ability to perform it; location; recent, current, and projected
work loads of the firm; and the concept of their proposal. A public
body shall establish a committee to evaluate the proposals. After the
committee has selected the most qualified finalists, these finalists
shall submit final proposals, including sealed bids for the percent
fee, which is the percentage amount to be earned by the general
contractor/construction manager as overhead and profit, on the
estimated maximum allowable construction cost and the fixed amount for
the detailed specified general conditions work. The public body shall
select the firm submitting the highest scored final proposal using the
evaluation factors and the relative weight of factors published in the
public solicitation of proposals.
(5) The maximum allowable construction cost may be negotiated
between the public body and the selected firm after the scope of the
project is adequately determined to establish a guaranteed contract
cost for which the general contractor/construction manager will provide
a performance and payment bond. The guaranteed contract cost includes
the fixed amount for the detailed specified general conditions work,
the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost, the percent fee on
the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost, and sales tax. If
the public body is unable to negotiate a satisfactory maximum allowable
construction cost with the firm selected that the public body
determines to be fair, reasonable, and within the available funds,
negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated and the public
body shall negotiate with the next highest scored firm and continue
until an agreement is reached or the process is terminated. If the
maximum allowable construction cost varies more than fifteen percent
from
the bid estimated maximum allowable construction cost due to
requested and approved changes in the scope by the public body, the
percent fee shall be renegotiated.
(6) All subcontract work shall be competitively bid with public bid
openings. When critical to the successful completion of a
subcontractor bid package and after publication of notice of intent to
determine bidder eligibility in a legal newspaper of general
circulation published in or as near as possible to that part of the
county in which the public work will be done at least twenty days
before requesting qualifications from interested subcontract bidders,
the owner and general contractor/construction manager may determine
subcontractor bidding eligibility using the following evaluation
criteria:
(a) Adequate financial resources or the ability to secure such
resources;
(b) History of successful completion of a contract of similar type
and scope;
(c) Project management and project supervision personnel with
experience on similar projects and the availability of such personnel
for the project;
(d) Current and projected workload and the impact the project will
have on the subcontractor's current and projected workload;
(e) Ability to accurately estimate the subcontract bid package
scope of work;
(f) Ability to meet subcontract bid package shop drawing and other
coordination procedures;
(g) Eligibility to receive an award under applicable laws and
regulations; and
(h) Ability to meet subcontract bid package scheduling
requirements.
The owner and general contractor/construction manager shall weigh
the evaluation criteria and determine a minimum acceptable score to be
considered an eligible subcontract bidder.
After publication of notice of intent to determine bidder
eligibility, subcontractors requesting eligibility shall be provided
the evaluation criteria and weighting to be used by the owner and
general contractor/construction manager to determine eligible
subcontract bidders. After the owner and general
contractor/construction manager determine eligible subcontract bidders,
subcontractors requesting eligibility shall be provided the results and
scoring of the subcontract bidder eligibility determination.
Subcontract bid packages shall be awarded to the responsible bidder
submitting the low responsive bid. The requirements of RCW 39.30.060
apply to each subcontract bid package. All subcontractors who bid work
over three hundred thousand dollars shall post a bid bond and all
subcontractors who are awarded a contract over three hundred thousand
dollars shall provide a performance and payment bond for their contract
amount. All other subcontractors shall provide a performance and
payment bond if required by the general contractor/construction
manager. If a general contractor/construction manager receives a
written protest from a subcontractor bidder, the general
contractor/construction manager shall not execute a contract for the
subcontract bid package with anyone other than the protesting bidder
without first providing at least two full business days' written notice
of the general contractor/construction manager's intent to execute a
contract for the subcontract bid package. Intermediate Saturdays,
Sundays, and legal holidays are not counted in determining the minimum
two-day notice period. A low bidder who claims error and fails to
enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if
a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project. Except
as provided for under subsection (7) of this section, bidding on
subcontract work by the general contractor/construction manager or its
subsidiaries is prohibited. The general contractor/construction
manager may negotiate with the low-responsive bidder in accordance with
RCW 39.10.080 or, if unsuccessful in such negotiations, rebid.
(7) The general contractor/construction manager, or its
subsidiaries, may bid on subcontract work if:
(a) The work within the subcontract bid package is customarily
performed by the general contractor/construction manager;
(b) The bid opening is managed by the public body; and
(c) Notification of the general contractor/construction manager's
intention to bid is included in the public solicitation of bids for the
bid package.
In no event may the value of subcontract work performed by the
general contractor/construction manager exceed thirty percent of the
negotiated maximum allowable construction cost.
(8) A public body may include an incentive clause in any contract
awarded under this section for savings of either time or cost or both
from that originally negotiated. No incentives granted may exceed five
percent of the maximum allowable construction cost. If the project is
completed for less than the agreed upon maximum allowable construction
cost, any savings not otherwise negotiated as part of an incentive
clause shall accrue to the public body. If the project is completed
for more than the agreed upon maximum allowable construction cost,
excepting increases due to any contract change orders approved by the
public body, the additional cost shall be the responsibility of the
general contractor/construction manager.

--- END ---