BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.32.050 and 2003 c 3 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) A person is guilty of murder in the second degree when:
(a) With intent to cause the death of another person but without
premeditation, he or she causes the death of such person or of a third
person; or
(b) He or she commits or attempts to commit any felony, including
assault, other than those enumerated in RCW 9A.32.030(1)(c), and, in
the course of and in furtherance of such crime or in immediate flight
therefrom, he or she, or another participant, causes the death of a
person other than one of the participants; except that in any
prosecution under this ((subdivision)) subsection (1)(b) in which the
defendant was not the only participant in the underlying crime, if
established by the defendant by a preponderance of the evidence, it is
a defense that the defendant:
(i) Did not commit the homicidal act or in any way solicit,
request, command, importune, cause, or aid the commission thereof; and
(ii) Was not armed with a deadly weapon, or any instrument,
article, or substance readily capable of causing death or serious
physical injury; and
(iii) Had no reasonable grounds to believe that any other
participant was armed with such a weapon, instrument, article, or
substance; and
(iv) Had no reasonable grounds to believe that any other
participant intended to engage in conduct likely to result in death or
serious physical injury.
(2) Manslaughter in the first degree and manslaughter in the second
degree are lesser included offenses of murder in the second degree
under subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section.
(3) Murder in the second degree is a class A felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---