BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that bail bond
agents and bail bond recovery agents serve a useful purpose in the
criminal justice system by apprehending and surrendering fugitives.
The legislature also recognizes that locating, apprehending, and
surrendering fugitives require special skills and knowledge, and that
bail bond recovery agents are often required to perform their duties
under stressful and demanding conditions. Therefore, bail bond
agencies who use the services of bail bond recovery agents must be
encouraged, in the interest of public safety, to use bail bond recovery
agents who possess the training and experience necessary for the job.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.185.010 and 2000 c 171 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(3) "Collateral or security" means property of any kind given as
security to obtain a bail bond.
(4) "Bail bond agency" means a business that sells and issues
corporate surety bail bonds or that provides security in the form of
personal or real property to insure the appearance of a criminal
defendant before the courts of this state or the United States.
(5) "Qualified agent" means an owner, sole proprietor, partner,
manager, officer, or chief operating officer of a corporation who meets
the requirements set forth in this chapter for obtaining a bail bond
agency license.
(6) "Bail bond agent" means a person who is employed by a bail bond
agency and engages in the sale or issuance of bail bonds, but does not
mean a clerical, secretarial, or other support person who does not
participate in the sale or issuance of bail bonds.
(7) "Licensee" means a bail bond agency or a bail bond agent or
both.
(8) "Branch office" means any office physically separated from the
principal place of business of the licensee from which the licensee or
an employee or agents conduct any activity meeting the criteria of a
bail bond agency.
(9) "Bail bond recovery agent" means a person who receives
compensation or reward for apprehending and surrendering another person
for whom a bail bond has been posted. "Bail bond recovery agent" does
not include bail bond agents or qualified agents licensed under this
chapter or law enforcement officers.
(10) "Certificate" means the document issued to a bail bond
recovery agent by a bail bond agency or bail bond agent licensed in
this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.185 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may not perform the duties of a bail bond recovery
agent in this state unless he or she:
(a) Is certified by a bail bond agency or bail bond agent licensed
in this state;
(b) Is a bail bond agent or qualified agent licensed in this state;
or
(c) If the person is a bail bond recovery agent from another state,
works under the direct supervision of a bail bond agent or qualified
agent licensed in this state.
(2) Any bail bond agency or bail bond agent licensed in this state
may certify a person to perform the functions of a bail bond recovery
agent. A certificate issued to a person under this section is
authority for the person to perform the functions of a bail bond
recovery agent only for the bail bond agency or bail bond agent issuing
the certificate and only for the time period specified on the
certificate. A certified bail bond recovery agent is subject to
supervision by the bail bond agency or bail bond agent issuing the
certification. No certification made by one bail bond agency or bail
bond agent is transferrable to another bail bond agency or bail bond
agent.
(3) Before certifying the bail bond recovery agent, the bail bond
agency or bail bond agent shall verify that the bail bond recovery
agent has met the minimum standards established by the director
pursuant to section 4 of this act. The bail bond agent or bail bond
agency may require any information and documentation that reasonably
relates to the need to determine whether the bail bond recovery agent
meets the standards. These standards do not prevent the certifying
entity from imposing any additional standards or requirements as the
certifying entity considers appropriate. Nothing in this act gives a
person who has been denied a certificate from a bail bond agency or
bail bond agent, or whose certificate has been revoked by a bail bond
agency or bail bond agent, any right to appeal the denial or revocation
or any cause of action against the bail bond agency or bail bond agent
or the department.
(4) A bail bond recovery agent must have the certificate with him
or her when apprehending and surrendering a person. A bail bond
recovery agent must exhibit the certificate upon request.
(5) The bail bond agency or bail bond agent shall provide the
department with a roster of bail bond recovery agents the bail bond
agency or bail bond agent has certified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.185 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director or the director's designee, with the advice of
designees of the bail bond industry, law enforcement agencies and
associations, and prosecutors' associations, shall adopt rules
necessary to administer, implement, and enforce sections 2 through 5 of
this act and shall establish minimum standards necessary for a bail
bond agency or qualified agent to certify a bail bond recovery agent.
(2) The standards must include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(a) A minimum level of education or experience appropriate for
performing the duties of a bail bond recovery agent;
(b) A minimum level of instruction in relevant areas of criminal
and civil law;
(c) A minimum level of instruction regarding the appropriate use of
force and different degrees of the use of force;
(d) Adequate training of the use of firearms from the criminal
justice training commission; and
(e) Possession of a concealed pistol license.
(3) The director or the director's designee shall develop a format
for the certificate required under section 3 of this act. At a
minimum, the certificate must include the following:
(a) The name, address, phone number, and license number of the bail
bond agency or bail bond agent certifying the bail bond recovery agent;
(b) The name, address, and phone number of the bail bond recovery
agent;
(c) A statement that the bail bond agency or bail bond agent
attests that the bail bond recovery agent has met the minimum standards
required by the director; and
(d) The length of time the bail bond recovery agent will be
providing services for the bail bond agency or bail bond agent
certifying the bail bond recovery agent.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.185.110 and 2002 c 86 s 251 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW
18.235.130, the following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute
unprofessional conduct:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter;
(2) Failing to meet the qualifications set forth in RCW 18.185.020
and 18.185.030;
(3) Knowingly committing, or being a party to, any material fraud,
misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme,
or device whereby any other person lawfully relies upon the word,
representation, or conduct of the licensee;
(4) Assigning or transferring any license issued pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter, except as provided in RCW 18.185.030;
(5) Conversion of any money or contract, deed, note, mortgage, or
other evidence of title, to his or her own use or to the use of his or
her principal or of any other person, when delivered to him or her in
trust or on condition, in violation of the trust or before the
happening of the condition; and failure to return any money or
contract, deed, note, mortgage, or other evidence of title within
thirty days after the owner is entitled to possession, and makes demand
for possession, shall be prima facie evidence of conversion;
(6) Failing to keep records, maintain a trust account, or return
collateral or security, as required by RCW 18.185.100;
(7) Any conduct in a bail bond transaction which demonstrates bad
faith, dishonesty, or untrustworthiness; ((or))
(8) Violation of an order to cease and desist that is issued by the
director under this chapter; or
(9) Using the services of a bail bond recovery agent without
issuing the proper certification to the bail bond recovery agent or
certifying a bail bond recovery agent who does not meet the minimum
standards established by the director under this chapter. Any costs
associated with the department's enforcement pursuant to this
subsection are exempt from the fee policy stated in RCW 43.24.086, and
the department shall not use costs associated with enforcement to
increase the fees to bail bond agencies and bail bond agents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.185 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person who performs the functions of a bail bond recovery agent
without first being certified by a bail bond agency or bail bond agent
licensed in this state commits a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---