BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 3.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Where approved by the local legislative body, courts of limited
jurisdiction may enter into agreements with one or more licensed bail
bond agencies for the purpose of executing bench warrants for an
accused's failure to appear or violation of a condition of release.
These agreements may specify the scope of work, remuneration for
services, and other charges deemed appropriate.
(2) Upon the release of an accused on bail or on his or her
personal recognizance pending trial, a court using licensed bail bond
agencies shall advise the accused in writing that his or her failure to
appear or violation of the conditions of release may result in a
warrant for the accused's arrest, that the warrant may be executed by
a bail bond agency, and that the accused will be financially
responsible for reimbursement costs to the bail bond agency.
(3) When a warrant is executed by a licensed bail bond agency, the
court shall require the accused to pay the costs of executing the
warrant. Costs are limited to actual expenses incurred by the licensed
bail bond agency in seeking, apprehending, and transporting the
accused. Such costs imposed constitute a judgment against the accused
and survive a dismissal or acquittal of the underlying action against
the accused. The court may assign to the licensed bail bond agency any
debt incurred by the accused for the bail bond agency's costs of
executing the warrant.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.20.270 and 1992 c 99 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The position of warrant officer is hereby created and shall be
maintained by the city within the city police department. The number
and qualifications of warrant officers shall be fixed by ordinance, and
their compensation shall be paid by the city.
(2) Warrant officers shall be vested only with the special
authority to make arrests authorized by warrants and other arrests as
are authorized by ordinance.
(3) All criminal and civil process issuing out of courts created
under this title shall be directed to the chief of police of the city
served by the court and/or to the sheriff of the county in which the
court is held and/or the warrant officers and be by them executed
according to law in any county of this state.
(4) No process of courts created under this title shall be executed
outside the corporate limits of the city served by the court unless the
person authorized by the process first contacts the applicable law
enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the process is to be served.
(5) Upon a defendant being arrested in another city or county the
cost of arresting or serving process thereon shall be borne by the
court issuing the process including the cost of returning the defendant
from any county of the state to the city.
(6) Warrant officers shall not be entitled to death, disability, or
retirement benefits pursuant to chapter 41.26 RCW on the basis of
service as a warrant officer as described in this section.
(7) Nothing in this section precludes a court of limited
jurisdiction, upon the approval of the local legislative body, from
entering into agreements with licensed bail bond agencies for the
purposes of executing bench warrants for an accused's failure to appear
or violation of a condition of release as provided for in section 1 of
this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 3.62.020 and 1995 c 301 s 31 and 1995 c 291 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
costs, fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected in
whole or in part by district courts, except costs, fines, forfeitures
and penalties assessed and collected, in whole or in part, because of
the violation of city ordinances, shall be remitted by the clerk of the
district court to the county treasurer at least monthly, together with
a financial statement as required by the state auditor, noting the
information necessary for crediting of such funds as required by law.
(2) The county treasurer shall remit thirty-two percent of the
noninterest money received under subsection (1) of this section except
certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this
subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil
actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against
convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state or county in the
prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Money
remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be
deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received by the county
treasurer under subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in
the county current expense fund.
(4) All money collected for county parking infractions shall be
remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly, with the
information required under subsection (1) of this section, to the
county treasurer for deposit in the county current expense fund. If
the court uses licensed bail bond agencies to execute warrants, as
provided for in section 1 of this act, the clerk shall remit all money
collected for the reimbursement of bail bond agency expenses to the
bail bond agency that incurred such expenses.
(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the county current
expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county current expense
fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 4 RCW 3.62.040 and 1995 c 291 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
costs, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected, in
whole or in part, by district courts because of violations of city
ordinances shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court at
least monthly directly to the treasurer of the city wherein the
violation occurred.
(2) The city treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of
the noninterest money received under this section, other than for
parking infractions and certain costs, to the state treasurer.
"Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded
to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040,
or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions
under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes
if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are
awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state,
county, city, or town in the prosecution of the case, including the
fees of defense counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the
state treasurer shall be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) All money collected for city parking infractions shall be
remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly to the
city treasurer for deposit in the city's general fund. If the court
uses licensed bail bond agencies to execute warrants, as provided for
in section 1 of this act, the clerk shall remit all money collected for
the reimbursement of bail bond agency expenses to the bail bond agency
that incurred such expenses.
(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund,
and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

--- END ---