BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that the liquor
control board shall generate additional revenues to increase
distributions to state and local governments from the liquor revolving
fund. Pursuant to RCW 66.08.190, fifty percent of the funds are
distributed to local governments and fifty percent are distributed to
the state general fund. The legislature further intends that the
liquor control board optimize retail outlet resources to serve the
public through implementing a retail business plan by expanding hours
of sales to include Sundays, and devising and implementing additional
strategies and programs to maximize revenue-generating opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall immediately devise a retail business plan to
implement strategies to improve retail sales operations and maximize
revenue-generating opportunities. Strategies to be implemented shall
include but are not limited to:
(1) Expanding hours of retail sales operations by including Sunday
sales in liquor stores according to section 3 of this act;
(2) Implementing a plan of in-store merchandising, including
point-of-sale advertising, and product specific point-of-sale
promotional displays and carousels, including displays designed and
provided by vendors;
(3) Implementing a plan for in-store merchandising of brands and
gift packs; and
(4) Sales of liquor related items and products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By November 1, 2003, the board shall implement a plan to open
for business on Sunday at least fifty state-operated retail stores that
had gross sales of two million dollars or more during calendar year
2002 and will implement the board's retail business plan.
(2) By July 1, 2004, the board shall implement a plan to open for
business on Sunday at least fifty additional state-operated retail
stores that had gross sales of two million dollars or more during
calendar year 2002 and will implement the board's retail business plan.
(3) By November 1, 2004, the board shall implement a plan to open
for business on Sunday the remainder of those state-operated stores
that will best implement the board's retail business plan.
(4) The board shall allow all agency retail stores to open for
business on Sunday.
(5) The board shall not raise retail prices pursuant to RCW
66.16.010 beyond the surcharges and percentage markup in effect on
January 1, 2003, until the board has implemented subsections (1) and
(2) of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.08.030 and 2002 c 119 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of this
title according to their true intent or of supplying any deficiency
therein, the board may make such ((regulations)) rules not inconsistent
with the spirit of this title as are deemed necessary or advisable.
All ((regulations so made)) rules shall be a public record and shall be
filed in the office of the code reviser, and ((thereupon)) shall have
the same force and effect as if incorporated in this title. ((Such
regulations)) These rules, together with a copy of this title, shall be
published in pamphlets and shall be distributed as directed by the
board.
(2) Without ((thereby)) limiting the generality of the provisions
contained in subsection (1) of this section, it is declared that the
power of the board to make ((regulations)) rules in the manner set out
in that subsection shall extend to:
(a) Regulating the equipment and management of stores and
warehouses in which state liquor is sold or kept, and prescribing the
books and records to be kept therein and the reports to be made thereon
to the board;
(b) Prescribing the duties of the employees of the board, and
regulating their conduct in the discharge of their duties;
(c) Governing the purchase of liquor by the state and the
furnishing of liquor to stores established under this title;
(d) Determining the classes, varieties, and brands of liquor to be
kept for sale at any store;
(e) Prescribing((, subject to RCW 66.16.080,)) the hours during
which the state liquor stores shall be kept open for the sale of
liquor;
(f) Providing for the issuing and distributing of price lists
showing the price to be paid by purchasers for each variety of liquor
kept for sale under this title;
(g) Prescribing an official seal and official labels and stamps and
determining the manner in which they shall be attached to every package
of liquor sold or sealed under this title, including the prescribing of
different official seals or different official labels for different
classes of liquor;
(h) Providing for the payment by the board in whole or in part of
the carrying charges on liquor shipped by freight or express;
(i) Prescribing forms to be used for purposes of this title or the
((regulations)) rules, and the terms and conditions to be contained in
permits and licenses issued under this title, and the qualifications
for receiving a permit or license issued under this title, including a
criminal history record information check. The board may submit the
criminal history record information check to the Washington state
patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of
investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for
prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who
filled out the forms. The board shall require fingerprinting of any
applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted
to the federal bureau of investigation;
(j) Prescribing the fees payable in respect of permits and licenses
issued under this title for which no fees are prescribed in this title,
and prescribing the fees for anything done or permitted to be done
under the ((regulations)) rules;
(k) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor which may be
kept on hand by the holder of a special permit for the purposes named
in the permit, regulating the manner in which the same shall be kept
and disposed of, and providing for the inspection of the same at any
time at the instance of the board;
(l) Regulating the sale of liquor kept by the holders of licenses
which entitle the holder to purchase and keep liquor for sale;
(m) Prescribing the records of purchases or sales of liquor kept by
the holders of licenses, and the reports to be made thereon to the
board, and providing for inspection of the records so kept;
(n) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor for which a
prescription may be given, and the number of prescriptions which may be
given to the same patient within a stated period;
(o) Prescribing the manner of giving and serving notices required
by this title or the ((regulations)) rules, where not otherwise
provided for in this title;
(p) Regulating premises in which liquor is kept for export from the
state, or from which liquor is exported, prescribing the books and
records to be kept therein and the reports to be made thereon to the
board, and providing for the inspection of the premises and the books,
records and the liquor so kept;
(q) Prescribing the conditions and qualifications requisite for the
obtaining of club licenses and the books and records to be kept and the
returns to be made by clubs, prescribing the manner of licensing clubs
in any municipality or other locality, and providing for the inspection
of clubs;
(r) Prescribing the conditions, accommodations, and qualifications
requisite for the obtaining of licenses to sell beer and wines, and
regulating the sale of beer and wines ((thereunder));
(s) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the
manner, methods, and means by which manufacturers shall deliver liquor
within the state; and the time and periods when, and the manner,
methods, and means by which liquor may lawfully be conveyed or carried
within the state;
(t) Providing for the making of returns by brewers of their sales
of beer shipped within the state, or from the state, showing the gross
amount of ((such)) the sales and providing for the inspection of
brewers' books and records, and for the checking of the accuracy of any
((such)) returns;
(u) Providing for the making of returns by the wholesalers of beer
whose breweries are located beyond the boundaries of the state;
(v) Providing for the making of returns by any other liquor
manufacturers, showing the gross amount of liquor produced or
purchased, the amount sold within and exported from the state, and to
whom so sold or exported, and providing for the inspection of the
premises of any ((such)) liquor manufacturers, their books and records,
and for the checking of any ((such)) return;
(w) Providing for the giving of fidelity bonds by any or all of the
employees of the board((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the premiums
((therefor)) shall be paid by the board;
(x) Providing for the shipment by mail or common carrier of liquor
to any person holding a permit and residing in any unit which has, by
election pursuant to this title, prohibited the sale of liquor therein;
(y) Prescribing methods of manufacture, conditions of sanitation,
standards of ingredients, quality and identity of alcoholic beverages
manufactured, sold, bottled, or handled by licensees and the board; and
conducting from time to time, in the interest of the public health and
general welfare, scientific studies and research relating to alcoholic
beverages and the use and effect thereof;
(z) Seizing, confiscating, and destroying all alcoholic beverages
manufactured, sold, or offered for sale within this state which do not
conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this title or
the ((regulations)) rules of the board((: PROVIDED, Nothing herein
contained shall be construed as authorizing)). The liquor board ((to))
may not prescribe, alter, limit, or in any way change the present law
as to the quantity or percentage of alcohol used in the manufacturing
of wine or other alcoholic beverages.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.08.060 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 43 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall not advertise liquor in any form or through any
medium whatsoever.
(2) The following is not considered advertising for the purposes of
this section:
(a) Placement of signs that are visible through the window of
retail stores;
(b) Use of media designed to be informational regarding locations
or hours of operation of retail outlets; and
(c) In-store merchandising, including point-of-sale advertising,
and product specific point-of-sale promotional displays and carousels,
including displays designed and provided by vendors.
(3) The board shall have power to adopt any and all reasonable
((regulations)) rules as to the kind, character, and location of
advertising of liquor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 66.16.080 (Sunday closing) and 1988 c
101 s 1 & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 11 are each repealed.

--- END ---