BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that placing a high
priority on the continuation of military activities at the military
bases located in our state is in the best interest of the state and the
United States. The combined efforts of the state and local governments
and the private sector, working in partnership with the United States
military, will be required to avoid the closure of these bases.
Therefore, the joint committee on veterans' and military affairs shall
conduct a Washington military facilities study to determine and
coordinate statewide efforts needed to ensure that all military
facilities in Washington retain their premier status with respect to
their national defense missions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint committee on veterans' and
military affairs shall inform the governor and the legislature on
matters affecting the operational viability of military facilities
within Washington through:
(a) Understanding the mission of each military facility in
Washington;
(b) Examining the integral role of Washington facilities within the
national defense structure;
(c) Identifying any obstacles to the mission of each facility
according to criteria used by its respective branch of service;
(d) Examining any law, ordinance, requirement, rule, or regulation
that impacts each facility's mission;
(e) Evaluating any locally developed proposals intended to mitigate
the impact of military facilities on surrounding areas or the impact of
nonmilitary activities in surrounding areas on the mission of military
facilities; and
(f) Studying the economic impacts of the facilities on the
Washington economy.
(2) The joint committee shall make recommendations to the governor
and the legislature regarding actions needed to ensure the viability of
military facilities, including:
(a) Expenditures appropriate to ensure the proper functioning and
continued operation of military facilities within the state;
(b) Required changes to state law, local ordinances, local zoning
requirements, or any other state or local requirement, rule, or
regulation in order to encourage the continued operation of military
facilities within the state; and
(c) Any required actions to be taken by the state at the federal
level in support of military facilities within the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In carrying out the requirements of this
act, the joint committee shall invite participation and seek input from
any experts it deems appropriate, but at a minimum shall consult with
representatives and nonelected community leaders of each county and
city containing a major military facility and the military authorities
of each military base in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The joint committee shall begin work on the
Washington military facilities study immediately after the completion
of the legislative session. It shall continue until such time as the
consensus of committee membership is to conclude.

--- END ---