BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.233 and 2000 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for those license plates issued under RCW 46.16.305(1)
before January 1, 1987, under RCW 46.16.305(3), and to commercial
vehicles with a gross weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds,
effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1,
2001, the appearance of the background of all vehicle license plates
may vary in color and design but must be ((issued on a standard
background)) legible and clearly identifiable as a Washington state
license plate, as designated by the department.
(2) Additionally, to ensure maximum legibility and reflectivity,
the department shall periodically provide for the replacement of
license plates, except for commercial vehicles with a gross weight in
excess of twenty-six thousand pounds. Frequency of replacement shall
be established in accordance with empirical studies documenting the
longevity of the reflective materials used to make license plates.
(3) In providing for the periodic replacement of license plates,
the department shall offer to vehicle owners the option of retaining
their current license plate numbers. The department shall charge a
retention fee of twenty dollars if this option is exercised. Revenue
generated from the retention fee will be deposited into the multimodal
transportation account.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.01.140 and 2001 c 331 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county auditor, if appointed by the director of licensing
shall carry out the provisions of this title relating to the licensing
of vehicles and the issuance of vehicle license number plates under the
direction and supervision of the director and may with the approval of
the director appoint assistants as special deputies and recommend
subagents to accept applications and collect fees for vehicle licenses
and transfers and to deliver vehicle license number plates.
(2) A county auditor appointed by the director may request that the
director appoint subagencies within the county.
(a) Upon authorization of the director, the auditor shall use an
open competitive process including, but not limited to, a written
business proposal and oral interview to determine the qualifications of
all interested applicants.
(b) A subagent may recommend a successor who is either the
subagent's sibling, spouse, or child, or a subagency employee, as long
as the recommended successor participates in the open, competitive
process used to select an applicant. In making successor
recommendation and appointment determinations, the following provisions
apply:
(i) If a subagency is held by a partnership or corporate entity,
the nomination must be submitted on behalf of, and agreed to by, all
partners or corporate officers.
(ii) No subagent may receive any direct or indirect compensation or
remuneration from any party or entity in recognition of a successor
nomination. A subagent may not receive any financial benefit from the
transfer or termination of an appointment.
(iii) (a) and (b) of this subsection are intended to assist in the
efficient transfer of appointments in order to minimize public
inconvenience. They do not create a proprietary or property interest
in the appointment.
(c) The auditor shall submit all proposals to the director, and
shall recommend the appointment of one or more subagents who have
applied through the open competitive process. The auditor shall
include in his or her recommendation to the director, not only the name
of the successor who is a relative or employee, if applicable and if
otherwise qualified, but also the name of one other applicant who is
qualified and was chosen through the open competitive process. The
director has final appointment authority.
(3)(a) A county auditor who is appointed as an agent by the
department shall enter into a standard contract provided by the
director, developed with the advice of the title and registration
advisory committee.
(b) A subagent appointed under subsection (2) of this section shall
enter into a standard contract with the county auditor, developed with
the advice of the title and registration advisory committee. The
director shall provide the standard contract to county auditors.
(c) The contracts provided for in (a) and (b) of this subsection
must contain at a minimum provisions that:
(i) Describe the responsibilities, and where applicable, the
liability, of each party relating to the service expectations and
levels, equipment to be supplied by the department, and equipment
maintenance;
(ii) Require the specific type of insurance or bonds so that the
state is protected against any loss of collected motor vehicle tax
revenues or loss of equipment;
(iii) Specify the amount of training that will be provided by the
state, the county auditor, or subagents;
(iv) Describe allowable costs that may be charged to vehicle
licensing activities as provided for in (d) of this subsection;
(v) Describe the causes and procedures for termination of the
contract, which may include mediation and binding arbitration.
(d) The department shall develop procedures that will standardize
and prescribe allowable costs that may be assigned to vehicle licensing
and vessel registration and title activities performed by county
auditors.
(e) The contracts may include any provision that the director deems
necessary to ensure acceptable service and the full collection of
vehicle and vessel tax revenues.
(f) The director may waive any provisions of the contract deemed
necessary in order to ensure that readily accessible service is
provided to the citizens of the state.
(4)(a) At any time any application is made to the director, the
county auditor, or other agent pursuant to any law dealing with
licenses, registration, or the right to operate any vehicle or vessel
upon the public highways or waters of this state, excluding applicants
already paying such fee under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085, the applicant
shall pay to the director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of
three dollars for each application in addition to any other fees
required by law.
(b) Counties that do not cover the expenses of vehicle licensing
and vessel registration and title activities may submit to the
department a request for cost-coverage moneys. The request must be
submitted on a form developed by the department. The department shall
develop procedures to verify whether a request is reasonable. Payment
shall be made on requests found to be allowable from the licensing
services account.
(c) Applicants for certificates of ownership, including applicants
paying fees under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085, shall pay to the
director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of four dollars in
addition to any other fees required by law.
(d) The fees under (a) and (c) of this subsection, if paid to the
county auditor as agent of the director, or if paid to a subagent of
the county auditor, shall be paid to the county treasurer in the same
manner as other fees collected by the county auditor and credited to
the county current expense fund. If the fee is paid to another agent
of the director, the fee shall be used by the agent to defray his or
her expenses in handling the application.
(e) Applicants required to pay the three-dollar fee established
under (a) of this subsection, must pay an additional ((fifty)) seventy-five cents on registrations that are due or are to become due November
1, 2003, which must be collected and remitted to the state treasurer
((for deposit)) and distributed as follows:
(i) Fifty cents must be deposited into the department of licensing
services account of the motor vehicle fund((. Revenue deposited into
this account)) and must be used for agent and subagent support, which
is to include but not be limited to the replacement of department-owned
equipment in the possession of agents and subagents.
(ii) Twenty-five cents must be deposited into the license plate
technology account created under section 3 of this act.
(5) A subagent shall collect a service fee of (a) eight dollars and
fifty cents for changes in a certificate of ownership, with or without
registration renewal, or verification of record and preparation of an
affidavit of lost title other than at the time of the title application
or transfer and (b) three dollars and fifty cents for registration
renewal only, issuing a transit permit, or any other service under this
section.
(6) If the fee is collected by the state patrol as agent for the
director, the fee so collected shall be certified to the state
treasurer and deposited to the credit of the state patrol highway
account. If the fee is collected by the department of transportation
as agent for the director, the fee shall be certified to the state
treasurer and deposited to the credit of the motor vehicle fund. All
such fees collected by the director or branches of his office shall be
certified to the state treasurer and deposited to the credit of the
highway safety fund.
(7) Any county revenues that exceed the cost of providing vehicle
licensing and vessel registration and title activities in a county,
calculated in accordance with the procedures in subsection (3)(d) of
this section, shall be expended as determined by the county legislative
authority during the process established by law for adoption of county
budgets.
(8) The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The license plate technology account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts collected under RCW 46.01.140(4)(e)(ii) must be
deposited into this account. Expenditures from this account must
support current and future license plate technology and systems
integration upgrades. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall offer license plate design services to
organizations that are sponsoring a new special license plate series or
are seeking to redesign the appearance of an existing special license
plate series that they sponsored. In providing this service, the
department must work with the requesting organization in determining
the specific qualities of the new plate design and must provide full
design services to the organization. The department shall collect from
the requesting organization a fee of one thousand five hundred dollars
for providing license plate design services. This fee includes one
original license plate design and up to five additional renditions of
the original design. If the organization requests the department to
provide further renditions, in addition to the five renditions provided
for under the original fee, the department shall collect an additional
fee of five hundred dollars per rendition. All revenue collected under
this section must be deposited into the multimodal transportation
account.

--- END ---