BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.305.130 and 2002 c 205 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the
state board of education shall:
(1) Approve or disapprove the program of courses leading to
teacher, school administrator, and school specialized personnel
certification offered by all institutions of higher education within
the state which may be accredited by a regional or national accrediting
organization and whose graduates may become entitled to receive such
certification.
(2) Conduct every five years a review of the program approval
standards, including the minimum standards for teachers,
administrators, and educational staff associates, to reflect research
findings and assure continued improvement of preparation programs for
teachers, administrators, and educational staff associates.
(3) Investigate the character of the work required to be performed
as a condition of entrance to and graduation from any institution of
higher education in this state relative to such certification as
provided for in subsection (1) of this section, and prepare a list of
accredited institutions of higher education of this and other states
whose graduates may be awarded such certificates.
(4)(a) The state board of education shall adopt rules to allow a
teacher certification candidate to fulfill, in part, teacher
preparation program requirements through work experience as a
classified teacher's aide in a public school or private school meeting
the requirements of RCW 28A.195.010. The rules shall include, but are
not limited to, limitations based upon the recency of the teacher
preparation candidate's teacher aide work experience, and limitations
based on the amount of work experience that may apply toward teacher
preparation program requirements under this chapter.
(b) The state board of education shall require that at the time of
the individual's enrollment in a teacher preparation program, the
supervising teacher and the building principal shall jointly provide to
the teacher preparation program of the higher education institution at
which the teacher candidate is enrolled, a written assessment of the
performance of the teacher candidate. The assessment shall contain
such information as determined by the state board of education and
shall include: Evidence that at least fifty percent of the candidate's
work as a classified teacher's aide was involved in instructional
activities with children under the supervision of a certificated
teacher and that the candidate worked a minimum of six hundred thirty
hours for one school year; the type of work performed by the candidate;
and a recommendation of whether the candidate's work experience as a
classified teacher's aide should be substituted for teacher preparation
program requirements. In compliance with such rules as may be
established by the state board of education under this section, the
teacher preparation programs of the higher education institution where
the candidate is enrolled shall make the final determination as to what
teacher preparation program requirements may be fulfilled by teacher
aide work experience.
(5) Supervise the issuance of such certificates as provided for in
subsection (1) of this section and specify the types and kinds of
certificates necessary for the several departments of the common
schools by rule or regulation in accordance with RCW 28A.410.010.
(6) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and
procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all
schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to the
provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a program
for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve: PROVIDED,
That no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten
program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no public or private schools
shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret
societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state board may elect to require
all or certain classifications of the public schools to conduct and
participate in such preaccreditation examination and evaluation
processes as may now or hereafter be established by the board.
(7) Make rules and regulations governing the establishment in any
existing nonhigh school district of any secondary program or any new
grades in grades nine through twelve. Before any such program or any
new grades are established the district must obtain prior approval of
the state board.
(8) Prepare such outline of study for the common schools as the
board shall deem necessary, and prescribe such rules for the general
government of the common schools, as shall seek to secure regularity of
attendance, prevent truancy, secure efficiency, and promote the true
interest of the common schools.
(9) Continuously reevaluate courses and adopt and enforce
regulations within the common schools so as to meet the educational
needs of students and articulate with the institutions of higher
education and unify the work of the public school system.
(10) Carry out board powers and duties relating to the organization
and reorganization of school districts under ((RCW 28A.315.010 through
28A.315.680 and 28A.315.900)) this title.
(11) Hear and decide appeals as otherwise provided by law.
The state board of education is given the authority to promulgate
information and rules dealing with the prevention of child abuse for
purposes of curriculum use in the common schools.

--- END ---