BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.050 and 1987 c 109 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
After June 6, 1945, no withdrawal of public ground waters of the
state shall be begun, nor shall any well or other works for such
withdrawal be constructed, unless an application to appropriate such
waters has been made to the department and a permit has been granted by
it as herein provided: EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That any withdrawal of public
ground waters for stock-watering purposes, or for the watering of a
lawn or of a noncommercial garden not exceeding one-half acre in area,
or for single or group domestic uses in an amount not exceeding five
thousand gallons a day, or as provided in section 2 of this act, or for
an industrial purpose in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons
a day, is and shall be exempt from the provisions of this section, but,
to the extent that it is regularly used beneficially, shall be entitled
to a right equal to that established by a permit issued under the
provisions of this chapter: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the department
from time to time may require the person or agency making any such
small withdrawal to furnish information as to the means for and the
quantity of that withdrawal: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That at the option of
the party making withdrawals of ground waters of the state not
exceeding five thousand gallons per day, applications under this
section or declarations under RCW 90.44.090 may be filed and permits
and certificates obtained in the same manner and under the same
requirements as is in this chapter provided in the case of withdrawals
in excess of five thousand gallons a day.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On a pilot project basis, the use of water for domestic use in
clustered residential developments is exempt as described in subsection
(2) of this section from the permit requirements of RCW 90.44.050 in
Whitman county. The department must review the use of water under this
section and its impact on water resources in the county and report to
the legislature by December 31st of each even-numbered year through
2016 regarding its review.
(2) For the pilot project, the domestic use of water for a
clustered residential development is exempt from the permit
requirements of RCW 90.44.050 for an amount of water that is not more
than one thousand two hundred gallons a day per residence for a
residential development that has an overall density equal to or less
than one residence per ten acres.
(3) No new right to use water may be established for a clustered
development under this section where the first residential use of water
for the development begins after December 31, 2015.

--- END ---