BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 57.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) If the board of commissioners of a water-sewer district find
it more conducive to the public health, safety, welfare, or convenience
that water-sewer services be provided by a cooperative or mutual
association or corporation organized under Title 24 RCW or chapter
23.86 RCW, the board may adopt a resolution calling for
disincorporation of the district and the transfer to such association
or corporation of all the property constituting its system of sewerage,
system of water, or combined water and sewerage system, together with
any of its other real or personal property used or useful in connection
with the operation, maintenance, repair, or replacement of that system,
and the association or corporation may acquire such property on such
terms as may be mutually agreed upon by the association or corporation
and the board of commissioners. Such resolution shall contain the
written agreement setting forth the terms and conditions of the
transfer and shall be filed with the county.
(b) In consideration of a transfer of property by a district to an
association or corporation in a manner provided in this section, the
association or corporation must assume and agree to pay or provide for
the payment of all of the indebtedness of a district including the
payment and retirement of outstanding general obligation and revenue
bonds issued by a district. The association or corporation may cause
service and other charges to be collected from such property or owners
or occupants thereof and enforce such collection.
The association or corporation and the district must execute a
written agreement setting forth the terms and conditions upon which
they have agreed and finding the transfer and acquisition of property
pursuant to such agreement to be in the public interest and conducive
to the public health, safety, welfare, or convenience. Such written
agreement may include provisions, by way of description and not by way
of limitation, for the rights, powers, duties, and obligations of such
association or corporation and district with regard to the use and
ownership of property, the providing of services, the maintenance and
operation of facilities, the disposition of liabilities and
indebtedness, the performance of contractual obligations, and any other
matters relating to the proposed transfer of property. The agreement
may provide for a period of time during which the district may continue
to exercise certain rights, privileges, powers, and functions
authorized to it by law. Such agreement must be presented to the
registered voters of the district as part of the resolution to transfer
and disincorporate the district. Upon passage of the resolution, the
president of the board of commissioners of the district and the person
or persons vested with the management of the affairs of the association
shall sign and formalize the agreement.
(2)(a) Upon the filing with the county in which the district is
located of the resolution calling for the disincorporation of the
district and transfer of functions to an association or corporation,
the county legislative authority shall hold a public hearing to
determine whether or not the best interests of all persons concerned
will be served by the proposed disincorporation of the district and
transfer of functions to an association or corporation.
(b) If the county legislative authority finds that the best
interests of all persons concerned will be served by disincorporating
the district and transferring functions to an association or
corporation, it shall order an election under subsection (4) of this
section, specify the manner in which it is to be accomplished, and
supervise the liquidation of any assets and the satisfaction of any
outstanding indebtedness.
(3) After all transfers to the association or corporation have been
made as required by the written agreement, and the district has been
disincorporated, any remaining property shall be sold or liquidated and
the proceeds of the sale, together with money on hand in the treasury
of the district, shall, after payment of all costs and expenses and all
outstanding indebtedness, be placed to the credit of the school
district, or districts, in which such district is situated.
(4) Upon entry of the findings of the hearing by the county that
the proposed disincorporation and transfer of assets will be conducive
to the public health, welfare, and convenience and will benefit the
land therein, the county legislative authority shall present a
resolution to the county auditor calling for a special election to be
held at a date specified under RCW 29.13.020, that occurs forty-five or
more days after the resolution is presented, at which a ballot
proposition authorizing the transfer of assets and disincorporation of
the district shall be submitted to the voters of the district for their
approval or rejection. The commissioners shall cause to be published
a notice of the election for four successive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the district, which notice shall state the hours
during which the polls will be open and the object of the election, and
the notice shall also be posted ten days in ten public places in the
district. The transfer of assets shall be executed as provided in the
written agreement and the district shall be disincorporated if the
ballot proposition is approved by a majority of the voters voting on
the proposition.

--- END ---