BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND INTENT. The legislature finds
that an actively coordinated and cooperatively facilitated railcar pool
for transportation of perishable agricultural commodities is necessary
for the continued viability and competitiveness of Washington's
agricultural industry. The legislature also finds that the rail
transportation model established by the Washington Grain Train program
has been successful in serving the shipping needs of the wheat
industry.
It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to authorize and
direct the Washington department of transportation to develop a railcar
program for Washington's perishable commodity industries to be known as
the Washington Produce Railcar Pool. This railcar program should be
modeled from the Washington Grain Train program, but be made flexible
enough to work with entities outside state government in order to
fulfill its mission, including, but not limited to, the federal and
local governments, commodity commissions, and private entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEPARTMENTAL AUTHORITY. In addition to
powers otherwise granted by law, the department may:
(1) Establish a Washington Produce Railcar Pool to promote viable,
cost-effective rail service for Washington produce, including but not
limited to apples, onions, pears, and potatoes;
(2) Operate the Washington Produce Railcar Pool program while
working in close coordination with the department of agriculture,
interested commodity commissions, and port districts;
(3) Purchase used refrigerated railcars, or accept donated
refrigerated railcars;
(4) Refurbish and remodel the railcars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 FUNDING. The department shall fund the
program as follows:
(1) The department may accept funding from the state and the
federal government, or other public or private sources, to refurbish
and remodel the railcars.
(2) The program must be funded at a level suitable for the
departments of transportation and agriculture, or such entity as they
may wish to designate, to facilitate and coordinate the program.
(3) The department may contribute the efforts of a short line rail-financing expert to find funding for the project to help interested
short line railroads in this state to accomplish the necessary
operating arrangements once the railcars are rebuilt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RAILCAR REFURBISHMENT. The department or
any other entity, including but not limited to a short line railroad,
may dismantle some cars to obtain parts to put other cars in operating
condition, or may totally rebuild some cars. As used in sections 1
through 6 of this act "short line railroad" means a Class II or Class
III railroad as defined by the United States Surface Transportation
Board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 FLEET MANAGEMENT. (1) The fleet must be
managed over the life of the cars so that the railcars will be evenly
distributed to railroads and port districts around the state for
produce loadings as market conditions warrant or periodically to other
users during times of excess capacity.
(2) The department shall act in an oversight role to verify that
the car fleet is managed in accordance with subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) The department shall work with affected stakeholders, including
but not limited to short line railroads, commodity commissions, and
port districts, to hire a transportation management firm to manage the
day-to-day operations of the cars, such as monitoring where the cars
are located, getting them back to this state, distributing them,
arranging for pretrips and repairs, and arranging for per diem, mileage
allowances, and other freight billing charges with the railroads.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 REPAYMENT OF PROGRAM START-UP COSTS. (1)
The transportation management firm employed under section 5(3) of this
act is responsible for repaying any loans used in the rebuilding
process from revenue derived from the per diem charges, mileage
charges, and freight billing charges paid by the railroads and shippers
that use the cars.
(2) Interest may be charged at a rate similar to the federal
discount rate.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.76.250 and 1996 c 73 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The essential rail assistance account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be appropriated only for the
purposes specified in this section.
(2) Moneys appropriated from the account to the department of
transportation may be used by the department or distributed by the
department to cities, county rail districts, counties, economic
development councils, and port districts for the purpose of:
(a) Acquiring, rebuilding, rehabilitating, or improving rail lines;
(b) Purchasing or rehabilitating railroad equipment necessary to
maintain or improve essential rail service;
(c) Constructing railroad improvements to mitigate port access or
mainline congestion;
(d) Construction of loading facilities to increase business on
light density lines or to mitigate the impacts of abandonment;
(e) Preservation, including operation, of light density lines, as
identified by the Washington state department of transportation, in
compliance with this chapter; or
(f) Preserving rail corridors for future rail purposes by purchase
of rights of way. The department shall first pursue transportation
enhancement program funds, available under the federal surface
transportation program, to the greatest extent practicable to preserve
rail corridors. Purchase of rights of way may include track, bridges,
and associated elements, and must meet the following criteria:
(i) The right of way has been identified and evaluated in the state
rail plan prepared under this chapter;
(ii) The right of way may be or has been abandoned; and
(iii) The right of way has potential for future rail service.
(3) The department or the participating local jurisdiction is
responsible for maintaining any right of way acquired under this
chapter, including provisions for drainage management, fire and weed
control, and liability associated with ownership.
(4) Nothing in this section impairs the reversionary rights of
abutting landowners, if any, without just compensation.
(5) The department, cities, county rail districts, counties, and
port districts may grant franchises to private railroads for the right
to operate on lines acquired under this chapter.
(6) The department, cities, county rail districts, counties, and
port districts may grant trackage rights over rail lines acquired under
this chapter.
(7) If rail lines or rail rights of way are used by county rail
districts, port districts, state agencies, or other public agencies for
the purposes of rail operations and are later abandoned, the rail lines
or rail rights of way cannot be used for any other purposes without the
consent of the underlying fee title holder or reversionary rights
holder, or until compensation has been made to the underlying fee title
holder or reversionary rights holder.
(8) The department of transportation shall develop criteria for
prioritizing freight rail projects that meet the minimum eligibility
requirements for state assistance under RCW 47.76.240. The department
shall develop criteria in consultation with the Washington state
freight rail policy advisory committee. Project criteria should
consider the level of local financial commitment to the project as well
as cost/benefit ratio. Counties, local communities, railroads,
shippers, and others who benefit from the project should participate
financially to the greatest extent practicable.
(9) Moneys received by the department from franchise fees, trackage
rights fees, and loan payments shall be redeposited in the essential
rail assistance account. Repayment of loans made under this section
shall occur within a period not longer than fifteen years, as set by
the department. The repayment schedule and rate of interest, if any,
shall be determined before the distribution of the moneys.
(10) The state shall maintain a contingent interest in any
equipment, property, rail line, or facility that has outstanding grants
or loans. The owner may not use the line as collateral, remove track,
bridges, or associated elements for salvage, or use it in any other
manner subordinating the state's interest without permission from the
department.
(11) Moneys distributed under this chapter should be provided as
loans wherever practicable. Except as provided by section 3, chapter
73, Laws of 1996, for improvements on or to privately owned railroads,
railroad property, or other private property, moneys distributed shall
be provided solely as loans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section captions used in this act are not
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 47.76 RCW.

--- END ---