BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On and after April 1, 2004, a dealer shall maintain in working
order, within the building designated in the dealer's license issued
under RCW 9.41.110, an antitheft system intended to prevent theft of
firearms.
(2) The Washington state patrol shall by rule maintain a list of
approved antitheft systems. In addition to other criteria identified
by the Washington state patrol, such antitheft systems must include an
audible alarm that sounds whenever any firearm is taken from the
premises without the knowledge and approval of the dealer. The initial
list of approved antitheft systems shall be adopted by January 1, 2004.
(3) A dealer violating subsection (1) of this section is guilty of
a class 1 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW.

--- END ---