BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Because of the number of recreational
boating accidents, fatalities, and near misses on the waters of this
state, the Washington state legislature believes there is a need to
provide for safer recreational boating practices.
The legislature therefore directs the Washington state parks and
recreation commission and the boating safety advisory council to
research and recommend ways to reduce boating accidents, fatalities,
and near misses. The Washington state parks and recreation commission
should also include in its research recognition of the need for
homeland security safety precautions for boaters.
The Washington state parks and recreation commission shall
investigate a variety of methods to achieve safer boating practices,
including a program of mandatory safe boater education, identifying the
costs associated with designing, implementing, and maintaining
mandatory safe boater education, and identifying all potential sources
of funds to pay for such costs and report back to the legislature by
January 1, 2004.

--- END ---