BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) At the time the higher education coordinating board was created
in 1985, the legislature wanted a board with a comprehensive mission
that included planning, budget and program review authority, and
program administration;
(b) Since its creation, the board has achieved numerous
accomplishments, including proposals leading to creation of the branch
campus system, and has made access and affordability of higher
education a consistent priority;
(c) However, higher education in Washington state is currently at
a crossroads. Demographic, economic, and technological changes present
new and daunting challenges for the state and its institutions of
higher education. As the state looks forward to the future, the
legislature, the governor, and institutions need a common strategic
vision to guide planning and decision making.
(2) Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to reaffirm and
strengthen the strategic planning role of the higher education
coordinating board. It is also the legislature's intent to examine
options for reassigning or altering other roles and responsibilities to
enable the board to place priority and focus on planning and
coordination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall develop a statewide strategic plan that
proposes a vision and identifies goals and priorities for the system of
higher education in Washington state. The board shall also specify
strategies for maintaining and expanding access, affordability,
quality, efficiency, and accountability among the various institutions
of higher education.
(2) In developing the statewide strategic plan, the board shall
collaborate with the four-year institutions of higher education, the
community and technical college system, and, when appropriate, the work
force training and education coordinating board, the superintendent of
public instruction, and the independent higher education institutions.
The board shall also seek input from students, faculty organizations,
community and business leaders in the state, members of the
legislature, and the governor.
(3) As a foundation for the statewide strategic plan, the board
shall develop and establish role and mission statements for each of the
four-year institutions of higher education and the community and
technical college system. The board shall determine whether certain
major lines of study or types of degrees, including applied degrees or
research-oriented degrees, shall be assigned uniquely to some
institutions or institutional sectors in order to create centers of
excellence that focus resources and expertise.
(4) In assessing needs of the state's higher education system, the
board may consider and analyze the following information:
(a) Demographic, social, economic, and technological trends and
their impact on service delivery;
(b) The changing ethnic composition of the population and the
special needs arising from those trends;
(c) Business and industrial needs for a skilled work force;
(d) College attendance, retention, transfer, and dropout rates;
(e) Needs and demands for basic and continuing education and
opportunities for lifelong learning by individuals of all age groups;
and
(f) Needs and demands for access to higher education by placebound
students and individuals in heavily populated areas underserved by
public institutions.
(5) The statewide strategic plan shall include, but not be limited
to, the following:
(a) Recommendations based on enrollment forecasts and analysis of
data about demand for higher education, and policies and actions to
meet those needs;
(b) State or regional priorities for new or expanded degree
programs or off-campus programs, including what models of service
delivery may be most cost-effective;
(c) Recommended policies or actions to improve the efficiency of
student transfer and graduation or completion;
(d) State or regional priorities for addressing needs in high-demand fields where enrollment access is limited and employers are
experiencing difficulty finding enough qualified graduates to fill job
openings;
(e) Recommended tuition and fees policies and levels; and
(f) Priorities and recommendations on financial aid.
(6) The board shall present the vision, goals, priorities, and
strategies in the statewide strategic plan in a way that provides
guidance for institutions, the governor, and the legislature to make
further decisions regarding institution-level plans, policies,
legislation, and operating and capital funding for higher education.
In the statewide strategic plan, the board shall recommend specific
actions to be taken and identify measurable performance indicators and
benchmarks for gauging progress toward achieving the goals and
priorities.
(7) The board shall submit a draft of the initial statewide
strategic plan under this section to the governor and the legislature
by December 15, 2003. The plan shall be updated every four years and
presented to the governor and the appropriate legislative policy
committees. Following public hearings, the legislature shall, by
concurrent resolution, approve or recommend changes to the initial
plan. The plan shall then become state higher education policy unless
legislation is enacted to alter the policies set forth in the plan.
The board shall publish a final plan incorporating any legislative
changes by June 1, 2004, and every four years thereafter.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.80.330 and 1997 c 369 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall perform the following planning duties in
consultation with the four-year institutions, the community and
technical college system, and when appropriate the work force training
and education coordinating board, the superintendent of public
instruction, and the independent higher educational institutions:
(1) ((Develop and establish role and mission statements for each of
the four-year institutions and for the community and technical college
system;
(2) Identify the state's higher education goals, objectives, and
priorities;
(3) Prepare a comprehensive master plan which includes but is not
limited to:
(a) Assessments of the state's higher education needs. These
assessments may include, but are not limited to: The basic and
continuing needs of various age groups; business and industrial needs
for a skilled work force; analyses of demographic, social, and economic
trends; consideration of the changing ethnic composition of the
population and the special needs arising from such trends; college
attendance, retention, and dropout rates, and the needs of recent high
school graduates and placebound adults. The board should consider the
needs of residents of all geographic regions, but its initial
priorities should be applied to heavily populated areas underserved by
public institutions;
(b) Recommendations on enrollment and other policies and actions to
meet those needs;
(c) Guidelines for continuing education, adult education, public
service, and other higher education programs;
(d) Mechanisms through which the state's higher education system
can meet the needs of employers hiring for industrial projects of
statewide significance.
The initial plan shall be submitted to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 1987. Comments on the plan from the board's
advisory committees and the institutions shall be submitted with the
plan.
The plan shall be updated every four years, and presented to the
governor and the appropriate legislative policy committees. Following
public hearings, the legislature shall, by concurrent resolution,
approve or recommend changes to the initial plan, and the updates. The
plan shall then become state higher education policy unless legislation
is enacted to alter the policies set forth in the plan;
(4))) Review, evaluate, and make recommendations on operating and
capital budget requests from four-year institutions and the community
and technical college system, based on ((the elements outlined in
subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, and on)) how the budget
requests align with and implement the statewide strategic plan under
section 2 of this act.
(a) By December of each odd-numbered year, the board shall
distribute guidelines which outline the board's fiscal priorities((.
These guidelines shall be distributed)) to the institutions and the
state board for community and technical colleges ((board by December of
each odd-numbered year)). The institutions and the state board for
community and technical colleges ((board)) shall submit an outline of
their proposed budgets, identifying major components, to the board no
later than August 1st of each even-numbered year. The board shall
submit recommendations on the proposed budgets and on the board's
budget priorities to the office of financial management before November
1st of each even-numbered year, and to the legislature by January 1st
of each odd-numbered year;
(((5))) (b) Institutions and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall submit any supplemental budget requests and
revisions to the board at the same time they are submitted to the
office of financial management. The board shall submit recommendations
on the proposed supplemental budget requests to the office of financial
management by November 1st and to the legislature by January 1st;
(((6))) (2) Recommend legislation affecting higher education;
(((7) Recommend tuition and fees policies and levels based on
comparisons with peer institutions;
(8) Establish priorities and develop recommendations on financial
aid based on comparisons with peer institutions;
(9))) (3) Prepare recommendations on merging or closing
institutions; and
(((10))) (4) Develop criteria for identifying the need for new
baccalaureate institutions.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.80.340 and 1985 c 370 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall perform the following program responsibilities,
in consultation with the institutions and with other interested
agencies and individuals:
(((1))) (a) Approve the creation of any new degree programs at the
four-year institutions and prepare fiscal notes on any such programs;
(((2))) (b) Review, evaluate, and make recommendations for the
modification, consolidation, initiation, or elimination of on-campus
programs, at the four-year institutions;
(((3))) (c) Review and evaluate and approve, modify, consolidate,
initiate, or eliminate off-campus programs at the four-year
institutions;
(((4))) (d) Approve, and adopt guidelines for, higher education
centers and consortia;
(((5))) (e) Approve purchase or lease of major off-campus
facilities for the four-year institutions and the community colleges;
(((6))) (f) Establish campus service areas and define on-campus and
off-campus activities and major facilities; and
(((7))) (g) Approve contracts for off-campus educational programs
initiated by the state's four-year institutions individually, in
concert with other public institutions, or with independent
institutions.
(2) In performing its responsibilities under this section, the
board shall consider, and require institutions to demonstrate, how the
proposals align with or implement the statewide strategic plan under
section 2 of this act. The board shall also develop clear guidelines
and objective decision-making criteria regarding approval of proposals
under this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.80.610 and 1993 c 363 s 2
are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the local level, the higher education institutional
responsibilities include but are not limited to:
(a) Development and provision of strategic plans ((under the
guidelines established by the higher education coordinating board))
that implement the vision, goals, priorities, and strategies within the
statewide strategic plan under section 2 of this act based on the
institution's role and mission. Institutional strategic plans shall
also contain measurable performance indicators and benchmarks for
gauging progress toward achieving the goals and priorities. In
developing their strategic plans, the research universities shall
consider the feasibility of significantly increasing the number of
evening graduate classes;
(b) For the four-year institutions of higher education, timely
provision of information required by the higher education coordinating
board to report to the governor, the legislature, and the citizens;
(c) Provision of local student financial aid delivery systems to
achieve both statewide goals and institutional objectives in concert
with statewide policy; and
(d) Operating as efficiently as feasible within institutional
missions and goals.
(2) At the state level, the higher education coordinating board
shall be responsible for:
(a) ((Delineation and coordination of)) Ensuring that strategic
plans to be prepared by the institutions are aligned with and implement
the statewide strategic plan under section 2 of this act and
periodically monitoring institutions' progress toward achieving the
goals and priorities within their plans;
(b) Preparation of reports to the governor, the legislature, and
the citizens on program accomplishments and use of resources by the
institutions;
(c) Administration and policy implementation for statewide student
financial aid programs; and
(d) Assistance to institutions in improving operational efficiency
through measures that include periodic review of program efficiencies.
(3) At the state level, on behalf of community colleges and
technical colleges, the state board for community and technical
colleges
shall coordinate and report on the system's strategic plans,
including reporting on the system's progress toward achieving the
statewide goals and priorities within its plan, and shall provide any
information required of its colleges by the higher education
coordinating board.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.50.090 and 1991 c 238 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
The college board shall have general supervision and control over
the state system of community and technical colleges. In addition to
the other powers and duties imposed upon the college board by this
chapter, the college board shall be charged with the following powers,
duties and responsibilities:
(1) Review the budgets prepared by the boards of trustees, prepare
a single budget for the support of the state system of community and
technical colleges and adult education, and submit this budget to the
governor as provided in RCW 43.88.090;
(2) Establish guidelines for the disbursement of funds; and receive
and disburse such funds for adult education and maintenance and
operation and capital support of the college districts in conformance
with the state and district budgets, and in conformance with chapter
43.88 RCW;
(3) Ensure, through the full use of its authority:
(a) That each college district shall offer thoroughly comprehensive
educational, training and service programs to meet the needs of both
the communities and students served by combining high standards of
excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and practical
courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded; and
community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational
nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general,
family, and work force literacy programs and services. However,
technical colleges, and college districts containing only technical
colleges, shall maintain programs solely for occupational education,
basic skills, and literacy purposes. For as long as a need exists,
technical colleges may continue those programs, activities, and
services they offered during the twelve-month period preceding May 17,
1991;
(b) That each college district shall maintain an open-door policy,
to the end that no student will be denied admission because of the
location of the student's residence or because of the student's
educational background or ability; that, insofar as is practical in the
judgment of the college board, curriculum offerings will be provided to
meet the educational and training needs of the community generally and
the students thereof; and that all students, regardless of their
differing courses of study, will be considered, known and recognized
equally as members of the student body: PROVIDED, That the
administrative officers of a community or technical college may deny
admission to a prospective student or attendance to an enrolled student
if, in their judgment, the student would not be competent to profit
from the curriculum offerings of the college, or would, by his or her
presence or conduct, create a disruptive atmosphere within the college
not consistent with the purposes of the institution. This subsection
(3)(b) shall not apply to competency, conduct, or presence associated
with a disability in a person twenty-one years of age or younger
attending a technical college;
(4) Prepare a comprehensive master plan for the development of
community and technical college education and training in the state;
and assist the office of financial management in the preparation of
enrollment projections to support plans for providing adequate college
facilities in all areas of the state. The master plan shall include
implementation of the vision, goals, priorities, and strategies in the
statewide strategic plan under section 2 of this act based on the
community and technical college system's role and mission. The master
plan shall also contain measurable performance indicators and
benchmarks for gauging progress toward achieving the goals and
priorities;
(5) Define and administer criteria and guidelines for the
establishment of new community and technical colleges or campuses
within the existing districts;
(6) Establish criteria and procedures for modifying district
boundary lines consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020
as now or hereafter amended and in accordance therewith make such
changes as it deems advisable;
(7) Establish minimum standards to govern the operation of the
community and technical colleges with respect to:
(a) Qualifications and credentials of instructional and key
administrative personnel, except as otherwise provided in the state
plan for vocational education,
(b) Internal budgeting, accounting, auditing, and financial
procedures as necessary to supplement the general requirements
prescribed pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW,
(c) The content of the curriculums and other educational and
training programs, and the requirement for degrees and certificates
awarded by the colleges,
(d) Standard admission policies,
(e) Eligibility of courses to receive state fund support;
(8) Establish and administer criteria and procedures for all
capital construction including the establishment, installation, and
expansion of facilities within the various college districts;
(9) Encourage innovation in the development of new educational and
training programs and instructional methods; coordinate research
efforts to this end; and disseminate the findings thereof;
(10) Exercise any other powers, duties and responsibilities
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;
(11) Authorize the various community and technical colleges to
offer programs and courses in other districts when it determines that
such action is consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020
as now or hereafter amended;
(12) Notwithstanding any other law or statute regarding the sale of
state property, sell or exchange and convey any or all interest in any
community and technical college real and personal property, except such
property as is received by a college district in accordance with RCW
28B.50.140(8), when it determines that such property is surplus or that
such a sale or exchange is in the best interests of the community and
technical college system;
(13) In order that the treasurer for the state board for community
and technical colleges appointed in accordance with RCW 28B.50.085 may
make vendor payments, the state treasurer will honor warrants drawn by
the state board providing for an initial advance on July 1, 1982, of
the current biennium and on July 1 of each succeeding biennium from the
state general fund in an amount equal to twenty-four percent of the
average monthly allotment for such budgeted biennium expenditures for
the state board for community and technical colleges as certified by
the
office of financial management; and at the conclusion of such
initial month and for each succeeding month of any biennium, the state
treasurer will reimburse expenditures incurred and reported monthly by
the state board treasurer in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW:
PROVIDED, That the reimbursement to the state board for actual
expenditures incurred in the final month of each biennium shall be less
the initial advance made in such biennium;
(14) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (12) of this
section, may receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical
college programs and may sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the
same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to
the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income
thereof;
(15) The college board shall have the power of eminent domain;
(16) Provide general supervision over the state's technical
colleges. The president of each technical college shall report
directly to the director of the state board for community and technical
colleges, or the director's designee, until local control is assumed by
a new or existing board of trustees as appropriate, except that a
college president shall have authority over program decisions of his or
her college until the establishment of a board of trustees for that
college. The directors of the vocational-technical institutes on March
1, 1991, shall be designated as the presidents of the new technical
colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A legislative work group is established
to provide guidance for the statewide strategic plan and review options
pertaining to the higher education coordinating board. The legislative
work group shall consist of the following members:
(a) Three members from each caucus of the senate, appointed by the
president of the senate, including at least two members of the higher
education committee and at least two members of the ways and means
committee. The president of the senate shall appoint one member to
serve as cochair; and
(b) Three members from each caucus of the house of representatives,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, including two
members each of the higher education, capital budget, and
appropriations committees. The speaker of the house of representatives
shall appoint one member to serve as cochair.
(2) The legislative work group shall:
(a) Define legislative expectations and provide policy direction
for the statewide strategic plan under section 2 of this act;
(b) Make recommendations for ensuring the coordination of higher
education capital and operating budgets with the goals and priorities
in the statewide strategic plan;
(c) Examine opportunities to update the roles and responsibilities
of the higher education coordinating board, including alternatives for
administration of financial aid and other programs; review of
institution budget requests; approval of off-campus programs, centers,
and consortia; and collection and analysis of data.
(3) The legislative work group shall use legislative facilities and
staff from senate committee services and the office of program
research.
(4) The legislative work group shall report its findings and
recommendations to the legislature by January 2, 2004.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2004.

--- END ---