BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.050 and 1997 c 200 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except in the person's place of abode or fixed place of
business, a person shall not carry a pistol concealed on his or her
person without a license to carry a concealed pistol.
(b) Every licensee shall have his or her concealed pistol license
in his or her immediate possession at all times that he or she is
required by this section to have a concealed pistol license and shall
display the same upon demand to any police officer or to any other
person when and if required by law to do so. Any violation of this
subsection (1)(b) shall be a class 1 civil infraction under chapter
7.80 RCW and shall be punished accordingly pursuant to chapter 7.80 RCW
and the infraction rules for courts of limited jurisdiction.
(2) A person shall not carry or place a loaded pistol in any
vehicle unless the person has a license to carry a concealed pistol
and: (a) The pistol is on the licensee's person, (b) the licensee is
within the vehicle at all times that the pistol is there, or (c) the
licensee is away from the vehicle and the pistol is locked within the
vehicle and concealed from view from outside the vehicle.
(3) A person at least eighteen years of age who is in possession of
an unloaded pistol shall not leave the unloaded pistol in a vehicle
unless the unloaded pistol is locked within the vehicle and concealed
from view from outside the vehicle.
(4) Violation of any of the prohibitions of subsection((s))(1)(a),
(2) ((and)), or (3) of this section is a misdemeanor.
(5) Nothing in this section permits the possession of firearms
illegal to possess under state or federal law.
(6) For purposes of this section, a concealed pistol license means
either a license issued under RCW 9.41.070 or a license issued by
another jurisdiction outside of this state but within the United
States. A license from another jurisdiction is valid for purposes of
this section only if:
(a) The license is currently valid in that jurisdiction; and
(b) The jurisdiction appears on a registry maintained by the
department of licensing as a jurisdiction that the Washington state
patrol has determined:
(i) Has eligibility criteria for the issuance of a concealed pistol
license that are at least as restrictive as those in RCW 9.41.070;
(ii) Has administrative procedures and practices for determining
eligibility of applicants that are at least as comprehensive and
accurate as those used in this state; and
(iii) Recognizes Washington state concealed pistol licenses as
valid in that jurisdiction or will recognize Washington licenses upon
the inclusion of the jurisdiction in the registry maintained by the
department of licensing under this subsection.
(7) It is not necessary for the prosecution to plead or prove the
nonexistence of a license from a jurisdiction outside this state in
order to prove a charge of a violation of subsection (1)(a) or (2) of
this section. It is an affirmative defense to a charge that the
defendant lacked a license, which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence, that at the time of the alleged
violation the defendant was the holder of a license from a jurisdiction
outside the state and the license was valid under subsection (6) of
this section.

--- END ---