BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.82.090 and 1995 c 291 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Financial obligations other than restitution imposed in a
judgment shall bear interest from the date of the judgment until
payment, at the rate applicable to civil judgments. All nonrestitution
interest retained by the court shall be split twenty-five percent to
the state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education
account as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the county current
expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county current expense
fund to fund local courts.
(2) The restitution portion of a financial obligation imposed in a
judgment bears interest at the rate applicable to civil judgments and
commences as follows:
(a) For a judgment entered before the effective date of this act,
interest commences at the date of the judgment;
(b) For a judgment entered on or after the effective date of this
act, interest commences and accrues retroactively from the date the
crime was committed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature declares that this act is
remedial in nature and has retroactive effect to carry out its
purposes.

--- END ---