BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.70.340 and 2002 c 349 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that creating a shared game lottery
could result in less revenue being raised by the existing state lottery
ticket sales. The legislature further recognizes that the two funds
most impacted by this potential event are the student achievement fund
and the education construction account. Therefore, it is the intent of
the legislature to use some of the proceeds from the shared game
lottery to make up the difference that the potential state lottery
revenue loss would have on the student achievement fund and the
education construction account.
(2) The student achievement fund and the education construction
account are expected to collectively receive one hundred two million
dollars annually from state lottery games other than the shared game
lottery. For fiscal year 2003 and thereafter, if the amount of lottery
revenues earmarked for the student achievement fund and the education
construction account are less than one hundred two million dollars, the
commission must transfer sufficient moneys from revenues derived from
the shared game lottery into the student achievement fund and the
education construction account to bring the total revenue up to one
hundred two million dollars. The funds transferred from the shared
game lottery account under this subsection must be divided between the
student achievement fund and the education construction account in a
manner consistent with RCW 67.70.240(3).
(3) For fiscal year 2003, the commission shall transfer from
revenues derived from the shared game lottery to the violence reduction
and drug enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520 five hundred thousand
dollars exclusively for the treatment of pathological gambling as
prescribed by RCW 67.70.350.
(4) The remaining net revenues, if any, in the shared game lottery
account after the transfers shall be ((deposited into the general
fund)) distributed to cities and counties for the support of public
safety functions, in the following manner: Forty percent shall be
deposited into the municipal criminal justice assistance account under
RCW 82.14.320; forty percent shall be deposited into the county
criminal justice assistance account under RCW 82.14.310; and twenty
percent shall be allocated to counties for the exclusive support of the
operation of drug courts. The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall establish an equitable method for
distribution of funding to counties for drug courts under this section,
giving priority to counties that had effective drug court programs in
operation before January 1, 2003.

--- END ---