BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.250 and 1984 c 228 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of directors of any school district, the Washington state
teachers' retirement system, the superintendent of public instruction,
and educational service district superintendents are authorized to
provide and pay for tax deferred annuities for their respective
employees in lieu of a portion of salary or wages as authorized under
the provisions of 26 U.S.C.((, section)) Sec. 403(b), as amended ((by
Public Law 87-370, 75 Stat. 796, as now or hereafter amended)). The
superintendent of public instruction and educational service district
superintendents, if eligible, may also be provided with such annuities.
At the request of at least five employees, the employees' employer
shall arrange for the purchase of tax deferred annuity contracts which
meet the requirements of 26 U.S.C.((, section)) Sec. 403(b), as ((now
or hereafter)) amended, for the employees from any company the
employees may choose that is authorized to do business in this state
((through a Washington-licensed insurance agent that the employees may
select)). Payroll deductions shall be made in accordance with the
arrangements for the purpose of paying the entire premium due and to
become due under the contracts. Employees' rights under the annuity
contract are nonforfeitable except for the failure to pay premiums.
The board of directors of any school district, the Washington state
teachers' retirement system, the superintendent of public instruction,
and educational service district superintendents shall not restrict,
except as provided in this section, employees' right to select the tax
deferred annuity of their choice ((or the agent, broker, or company
licensed by the state of Washington through which the tax deferred
annuity is placed or purchased,)) and shall not place limitations on
the time or place that the employees make the selection.
The board of directors of any school district, the Washington state
teachers' retirement system, the superintendent of public instruction,
and educational service district superintendents may each adopt rules
regulating the sale of tax deferred annuities which: (1) Prohibit
solicitation of employees for the purposes of selling tax deferred
annuities on school premises during normal school hours; and (2) ((only
permit the solicitation of tax deferred annuities by agents, brokers,
and companies licensed by the state of Washington; and (3))) require
participating companies to execute reasonable agreements protecting the
respective employers from any liability attendant to procuring tax
deferred annuities.

--- END ---