BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds the children of
Washington state need and deserve high quality public schools that will
give all students the opportunity to meet the state's academic
standards and gain the knowledge and skill required to be successful
and contented citizens of the twenty-first century. A quality public
education system is also crucial for our state's future economic
success and prosperity. The legislature further finds that Washington
state made a major commitment to improved public education by passing
the Washington education reform act in 1993. That act established new,
higher standards of academic achievement for all students. It also
established new levels of accountability for students, teachers,
schools, and school districts. Finally, it promised management and
fiscal flexibility to school districts to help them use their ingenuity
to improve student learning and help all children meet the state's new
academic standards.
The legislature intends to take the next step toward education
reform by changing the basic education act to increase school district
management flexibility and to give all children the opportunity to
attend a school in which at least seventy-five percent of children meet
or exceed the state's academic standards. The legislature further
intends to allow school districts that meet this goal in every school
to ask their voters for additional local funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning September 1, 2005, basic education includes the
opportunity to attend a school in which at least seventy-five percent
of the students achieve the state's academic standards in reading,
writing, and mathematics, as measured by the fourth, seventh, or high
school Washington assessment of student learning.
(2) At the beginning of the fourth school year after the Washington
assessment of student learning in science and social studies is
required by law, basic education shall include the opportunity to
attend a school in which at least seventy-five percent of the students
achieve the state's academic standards in those two subjects as
measured by such assessment.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.200 and 1990 c 33 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
This 1977 amendatory act shall be known and may be cited as "The
Washington Basic Education Act of 1977." The program evolving from the
Basic Education Act shall include (1) the goal of the school system as
defined in RCW 28A.150.210, (2) those program requirements enumerated
in RCW 28A.150.220, ((and)) (3) the determination and distribution of
state resources as defined in RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and (4)
the provisions in section 2 of this act.
The requirements of the Basic Education Act are deemed by the
legislature to comply with the requirements of Article IX, section 1 of
the state Constitution, which states that "It is the paramount duty of
the state to make ample provision for the education of all children
residing within its borders, without distinction or preference on
account of race, color, caste, or sex," and are adopted pursuant to
Article IX, section 2 of the state Constitution, which states that "The
legislature shall provide for a general and uniform system of public
schools."

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.220 and 1993 c 371 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) Satisfaction of the basic education program requirements
identified in RCW 28A.150.210 shall be considered to be implemented by
((the following program:
(a) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in kindergarten at least a total instructional offering of four hundred
fifty hours. The program shall include instruction in the essential
academic learning requirements under RCW 28A.630.885 and such other
subjects and such activities as the school district shall determine to
be appropriate for the education of the school district's students
enrolled in such program;
(b) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in grades one through twelve, at least a district-wide annual average
total instructional hour offering of one thousand hours. The state
board of education may define alternatives to classroom instructional
time for students in grades nine through twelve enrolled in alternative
learning experiences. The state board of education shall establish
rules to determine annual average instructional hours for districts
including fewer than twelve grades. The program shall include the
essential academic learning requirements under RCW 28A.630.885 and such
other subjects and such activities as the school district shall
determine to be appropriate for the education of the school district's
students enrolled in such group;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages.
(2) Nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to require individual students to attend school for any
particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.
(3) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty
school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten: PROVIDED, That effective May 1, 1979, a
school district may schedule the last five school days of the one
hundred and eighty day school year for noninstructional purposes in the
case of students who are graduating from high school, including, but
not limited to, the observance of graduation and early release from
school upon the request of a student, and all such students may be
claimed as a full time equivalent student to the extent they could
otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and
28A.150.260.
(4) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish))
meeting the requirements of section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.150.230 and 1994 c 245 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent and purpose of this section to guarantee that
each common school district board of directors, whether or not acting
through its respective administrative staff, be held accountable for
the proper operation of their district to the local community and its
electorate. In accordance with the provisions of Title 28A RCW, as now
or hereafter amended, each common school district board of directors
shall be vested with the final responsibility for the setting of
policies ensuring quality in the content and extent of its educational
program and that such program provide students with the opportunity to
achieve those skills which are generally recognized as requisite to
learning.
(2) In conformance with the provisions of Title 28A RCW, as now or
hereafter amended, it shall be the responsibility of each common school
district board of directors to adopt policies to:
(a) Establish performance criteria and an evaluation process for
its certificated personnel, including administrative staff, and for all
programs constituting a part of such district's curriculum;
(b) Determine the final assignment of staff, certificated or
classified, according to board enumerated classroom and program needs;
(c) Determine the amount of instructional hours necessary for any
student to acquire a quality education in such district, in not less
than an amount otherwise required in RCW 28A.150.220, or rules and
regulations of the state board of education;
(d) Determine the allocation of staff time, whether certificated or
classified;
(e) Establish final curriculum standards consistent with law and
rules and regulations of the state board of education, relevant to the
particular needs of district students or the unusual characteristics of
the district, and ensuring a quality education for each student in the
district; ((and))
(f) Evaluate teaching materials, including text books, teaching
aids, handouts, or other printed material, in public hearing upon
complaint by parents, guardians or custodians of students who consider
dissemination of such material to students objectionable; and
(g) Meet the requirements of section 2 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.52.0531 and 1997 c 259 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as defined
in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (4) or (5) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) With the exception of a district that meets the requirements of
subsection (5) of this section, a district's maximum levy percentage
shall be twenty-two percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and
every year thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the
grandfathered percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section
that are to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(5) For any year in which each school in a school district meets
the requirements of section 2 of this act, the district shall have no
maximum levy percentage.
(6) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsection (3) of
this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment changes,
compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are
or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(((6))) (7) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year"
means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which
the levies are to be collected.
(((7))) (8) For the purposes of this section, "current school year"
means the year immediately following the prior school year.
(((8))) (9) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax
levies shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(((9))) (10) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
rules ((and regulations)) and inform school districts of the pertinent
data necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---