BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.255 and 1997 c 360 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall, when evaluating an application for a water
right, transfer, or change filed pursuant to RCW 90.03.250 or 90.03.380
that includes provision for any water impoundment or other resource
management technique, take into consideration the benefits and costs,
including environmental effects, of any water impoundment or other
resource management technique that is included as a component of the
application. The department's consideration shall extend to any
increased water supply that results from the impoundment or other
resource management technique, including but not limited to any
recharge of ground water that may occur, as a means of making water
available or otherwise offsetting the impact of the diversion of
surface water proposed in the application for the water right,
transfer, or change. Provision for an impoundment or other resource
management technique in an application shall be made solely at the
discretion of the applicant and shall not otherwise be made by the
department as a condition for approving an application that does not
include such provision. For these purposes and when considering an
application regarding the domestic use of water, the department shall
not consider the return or recharge portion of the water as being lost
through beneficial use. The return or recharge portion of the water is
the amount returned to surface or ground waters after septic or sewage
treatment or returned in the form of seepage. Analyses contained in a
watershed plan developed or approved under chapter 90.82 RCW shall be
used by the department in determining the return or recharge portion of
the water in that watershed.
This section does not lessen, enlarge, or modify the rights of any
riparian owner, or any existing water right acquired by appropriation
or otherwise.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.44.055 and 1997 c 360 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall, when evaluating an application for a water
right or an amendment filed pursuant to RCW 90.44.050 or 90.44.100 that
includes provision for any water impoundment or other resource
management technique, take into consideration the benefits and costs,
including environmental effects, of any water impoundment or other
resource management technique that is included as a component of the
application. The department's consideration shall extend to any
increased water supply that results from the impoundment or other
resource management technique, including but not limited to any
recharge of ground water that may occur, as a means of making water
available or otherwise offsetting the impact of the withdrawal of
ground water proposed in the application for the water right or
amendment in the same water resource inventory area. Provision for an
impoundment or other resource management technique in an application
shall be made solely at the discretion of the applicant and shall not
be made by the department as a condition for approving an application
that does not include such provision. For these purposes and when
considering an application regarding the domestic use of water, the
department shall not consider the return or recharge portion of the
water as being lost through beneficial use. The return or recharge
portion of the water is the amount returned to surface or ground waters
after septic or sewage treatment or returned in the form of seepage.
Analyses contained in a watershed plan developed or approved under
chapter 90.82 RCW shall be used by the department in determining the
return or recharge portion of the water in that watershed.
This section does not lessen, enlarge, or modify the rights of any
riparian owner, or any existing water right acquired by appropriation
or otherwise.

--- END ---