BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.67.020 and 1997 c 447 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every city and town may construct, condemn and purchase,
acquire, add to, maintain, conduct, and operate systems of sewerage and
systems and plants for refuse collection and disposal together with
additions, extensions, and betterments thereto, within and without its
limits((, with)). Every city and town has full jurisdiction and
authority to manage, regulate, and control them and, except as provided
in subsection (3) of this section, to fix, alter, regulate, and control
the rates and charges for their use.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the rates charged
under this section must be uniform for the same class of customers or
service and facilities furnished. In classifying customers served or
service and facilities furnished by such system of sewerage, the city
or town legislative body may in its discretion consider any or all of
the following factors:
(((1))) (a) The difference in cost of service and facilities to the
various customers;
(((2))) (b) The location of the various customers within and
without the city or town;
(((3))) (c) The difference in cost of maintenance, operation,
repair, and replacement of the various parts of the system;
(((4))) (d) The different character of the service and facilities
furnished various customers;
(((5))) (e) The quantity and quality of the sewage delivered and
the time of its delivery;
(((6))) (f) The achievement of water conservation goals and the
discouragement of wasteful water use practices;
(((7))) (g) Capital contributions made to the system, including but
not limited to, assessments;
(((8))) (h) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW
24.03.490, of the land user; and
(((9))) (i) Any other matters which present a reasonable difference
as a ground for distinction.
(3) The rate a city or town may charge under this section for storm
or surface water sewer systems or combined sanitary sewage and storm or
surface water sewer systems shall be reduced by a minimum of ten
percent for any new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes the
permissive rainwater harvesting system guidelines for nonresidential
occupancies adopted by the Washington state building code council on
July 12, 2002.
(4) Rates or charges for on-site inspection and maintenance
services may not be imposed under this chapter on the development,
construction, or reconstruction of property.
(5) A city or town may provide assistance to aid low-income persons
in connection with services provided under this chapter.
(6) Under this chapter, after July 1, 1998, any requirements for
pumping the septic tank of an on-site sewage system should be based,
among other things, on actual measurement of accumulation of sludge and
scum by a trained inspector, trained owner's agent, or trained owner.
Training must occur in a program approved by the state board of health
or by a local health officer.
(7) Before adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility
services, or incorporating residences into an on-site inspection and
maintenance or sewer utility under this chapter, notification must be
provided, prior to the applicable public hearing, to all residences
within the proposed service area that have on-site systems permitted by
the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the
residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the
service.
(8) A city or town shall not provide on-site sewage system
inspection, pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services
under this section using city or town employees unless the on-site
system is connected by a publicly owned collection system to the city
or town's sewerage system, and the on-site system represents the first
step in the sewage disposal process. Nothing in this section shall
affect the authority of state or local health officers to carry out
their responsibilities under any other applicable law.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.92.020 and 1997 c 447 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city or town may construct, condemn and purchase, purchase,
acquire, add to, alter, maintain, and operate systems, plants, sites,
or other facilities of sewerage as defined in RCW 35.67.010, or solid
waste handling as defined by RCW 70.95.030((, and)). A city or town
shall have full authority to manage, regulate, operate, control, and,
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, to fix the price
of service and facilities of those systems, plants, sites, or other
facilities within and without the limits of the city or town.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the rates charged
shall be uniform for the same class of customers or service and
facilities. In classifying customers served or service and facilities
furnished by a system or systems of sewerage, the legislative authority
of the city or town may in its discretion consider any or all of the
following factors:
(((1))) (a) The difference in cost of service and facilities to
customers;
(((2))) (b) The location of customers within and without the city
or town;
(((3))) (c) The difference in cost of maintenance, operation,
repair, and replacement of the parts of the system;
(((4))) (d) The different character of the service and facilities
furnished to customers;
(((5))) (e) The quantity and quality of the sewage delivered and
the time of its delivery;
(((6))) (f) Capital contributions made to the systems, plants,
sites, or other facilities, including but not limited to, assessments;
(((7))) (g) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW
24.03.490, of the land user; and
(((8))) (h) Any other factors that present a reasonable difference
as a ground for distinction.
(3) The rate a city or town may charge under this section for storm
or surface water sewer systems or combined sanitary sewage and storm or
surface water sewer systems shall be reduced by a minimum of ten
percent for any new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes the
permissive rainwater harvesting system guidelines for nonresidential
occupancies adopted by the Washington state building code council on
July 12, 2002.
(4) Rates or charges for on-site inspection and maintenance
services may not be imposed under this chapter on the development,
construction, or reconstruction of property.
(5) A city or town may provide assistance to aid low-income persons
in connection with services provided under this chapter.
(6) Under this chapter, after July 1, 1998, any requirements for
pumping the septic tank of an on-site sewage system should be based,
among other things, on actual measurement of accumulation of sludge and
scum by a trained inspector, trained owner's agent, or trained owner.
Training must occur in a program approved by the state board of health
or by a local health officer.
(7) Before adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility
services, or incorporating residences into an on-site inspection and
maintenance or sewer utility under this chapter, notification must be
provided, prior to the applicable public hearing, to all residences
within the proposed service area that have on-site systems permitted by
the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the
residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the
service.
(8) A city or town shall not provide on-site sewage system
inspection, pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services
under this section using city or town employees unless the on-site
system is connected by a publicly owned collection system to the city
or town's sewerage system, and the on-site system represents the first
step in the sewage disposal process. Nothing in this section shall
affect the authority of state or local health officers to carry out
their responsibilities under any other applicable law.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.89.080 and 1998 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, any county
legislative authority may provide by resolution for revenues by fixing
rates and charges for the furnishing of service to those served or
receiving benefits or to be served or to receive benefits from any
storm water control facility or contributing to an increase of surface
water runoff. In fixing rates and charges, the county legislative
authority may in its discretion consider:
(((1))) (a) Services furnished or to be furnished;
(((2))) (b) Benefits received or to be received;
(((3))) (c) The character and use of land or its water runoff
characteristics;
(((4))) (d) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW
24.03.490, of the land user;
(((5))) (e) Income level of persons served or provided benefits
under this chapter, including senior citizens and disabled persons; or
(((6))) (f) Any other matters which present a reasonable difference
as a ground for distinction.
(2) The rate a county may charge under this section for storm water
control facilities shall be reduced by a minimum of ten percent for any
new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes the permissive
rainwater harvesting system guidelines for nonresidential occupancies
adopted by the Washington state building code council on July 12, 2002.
(3) Rates and charges authorized under this section may not be
imposed on lands taxed as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW or as
timber land under chapter 84.34 RCW.
(4) The service charges and rates collected shall be deposited in
a special fund or funds in the county treasury to be used only for the
purpose of paying all or any part of the cost and expense of
maintaining and operating storm water control facilities, all or any
part of the cost and expense of planning, designing, establishing,
acquiring, developing, constructing and improving any of such
facilities, or to pay or secure the payment of all or any portion of
any issue of general obligation or revenue bonds issued for such
purpose.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.94.140 and 1997 c 447 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every county, in the operation of a system of sewerage and/or
water, shall have full jurisdiction and authority to manage, regulate,
and control it ((and)). Except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section, every county shall have full jurisdiction and authority to
fix, alter, regulate, and control the rates and charges for the service
and facilities to those to whom such service and facilities are
available, and to levy charges for connection to the system.
(2) The rates for availability of service and facilities, and
connection charges so charged must be uniform for the same class of
customers or service and facility. In classifying customers served,
service furnished or made available by such system of sewerage and/or
water, or the connection charges, the county legislative authority may
consider any or all of the following factors:
(((1))) (a) The difference in cost of service to the various
customers within or without the area;
(((2))) (b) The difference in cost of maintenance, operation,
repair and replacement of the various parts of the systems;
(((3))) (c) The different character of the service and facilities
furnished various customers;
(((4))) (d) The quantity and quality of the sewage and/or water
delivered and the time of its delivery;
(((5))) (e) Capital contributions made to the system or systems,
including, but not limited to, assessments;
(((6))) (f) The cost of acquiring the system or portions of the
system in making system improvements necessary for the public health
and safety;
(((7))) (g) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW
24.03.490, of the land user; and
(((8))) (h) Any other matters which present a reasonable difference
as a ground for distinction.
(3) The rate a county may charge under this section for storm or
surface water sewer systems or combined sanitary sewage and storm or
surface water sewer systems shall be reduced by a minimum of ten
percent for any new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes the
permissive rainwater harvesting system guidelines for nonresidential
occupancies adopted by the Washington state building code council on
July 12, 2002.
(4) A county may provide assistance to aid low-income persons in
connection with services provided under this chapter.
(5) The service charges and rates shall produce revenues sufficient
to take care of the costs of maintenance and operation, revenue bond
and warrant interest and principal amortization requirements, and all
other charges necessary for the efficient and proper operation of the
system.

Sec. 5 RCW 57.08.005 and 1999 c 153 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A district shall have the following powers:
(1) To acquire by purchase or condemnation, or both, all lands,
property and property rights, and all water and water rights, both
within and without the district, necessary for its purposes. The right
of eminent domain shall be exercised in the same manner and by the same
procedure as provided for cities and towns, insofar as consistent with
this title, except that all assessment or reassessment rolls to be
prepared and filed by eminent domain commissioners or commissioners
appointed by the court shall be prepared and filed by the district, and
the duties devolving upon the city treasurer are imposed upon the
county treasurer;
(2) To lease real or personal property necessary for its purposes
for a term of years for which that leased property may reasonably be
needed;
(3) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
supply waterworks to furnish the district and inhabitants thereof and
any other persons, both within and without the district, with an ample
supply of water for all uses and purposes public and private with full
authority to regulate and control the use, content, distribution, and
price thereof in such a manner as is not in conflict with general law
and may construct, acquire, or own buildings and other necessary
district facilities. Where a customer connected to the district's
system uses the water on an intermittent or transient basis, a district
may charge for providing water service to such a customer, regardless
of the amount of water, if any, used by the customer. District
waterworks may include facilities which result in combined water supply
and electric generation, if the electricity generated thereby is a
byproduct of the water supply system. That electricity may be used by
the district or sold to any entity authorized by law to use or
distribute electricity. Electricity is deemed a byproduct when the
electrical generation is subordinate to the primary purpose of water
supply. For such purposes, a district may take, condemn and purchase,
acquire, and retain water from any public or navigable lake, river or
watercourse, or any underflowing water, and by means of aqueducts or
pipeline conduct the same throughout the district and any city or town
therein and carry it along and upon public highways, roads, and
streets, within and without such district. For the purpose of
constructing or laying aqueducts or pipelines, dams, or waterworks or
other necessary structures in storing and retaining water or for any
other lawful purpose such district may occupy the beds and shores up to
the high water mark of any such lake, river, or other watercourse, and
may acquire by purchase or condemnation such property or property
rights or privileges as may be necessary to protect its water supply
from pollution. For the purposes of waterworks which include
facilities for the generation of electricity as a byproduct, nothing in
this section may be construed to authorize a district to condemn
electric generating, transmission, or distribution rights or facilities
of entities authorized by law to distribute electricity, or to acquire
such rights or facilities without the consent of the owner;
(4) To purchase and take water from any municipal corporation,
private person, or entity. A district contiguous to Canada may
contract with a Canadian corporation for the purchase of water and for
the construction, purchase, maintenance, and supply of waterworks to
furnish the district and inhabitants thereof and residents of Canada
with an ample supply of water under the terms approved by the board of
commissioners;
(5) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
operate systems of sewers for the purpose of furnishing the district,
the inhabitants thereof, and persons outside the district with an
adequate system of sewers for all uses and purposes, public and
private, including but not limited to on-site sewage disposal
facilities, approved septic tanks or approved septic tank systems, on-site sanitary sewerage systems, inspection services and maintenance
services for private and public on-site systems, point and nonpoint
water pollution monitoring programs that are directly related to the
sewerage facilities and programs operated by a district, other
facilities, programs, and systems for the collection, interception,
treatment, and disposal of wastewater, and for the control of pollution
from wastewater with full authority to regulate the use and operation
thereof and the service rates to be charged. Under this chapter, after
July 1, 1998, any requirements for pumping the septic tank of an on-site sewage system should be based, among other things, on actual
measurement of accumulation of sludge and scum by a trained inspector,
trained owner's agent, or trained owner. Training must occur in a
program approved by the state board of health or by a local health
officer. Sewage facilities may include facilities which result in
combined sewage disposal or treatment and electric generation, except
that the electricity generated thereby is a byproduct of the system of
sewers. Such electricity may be used by the district or sold to any
entity authorized by law to distribute electricity. Electricity is
deemed a byproduct when the electrical generation is subordinate to the
primary purpose of sewage disposal or treatment. For such purposes a
district may conduct sewage throughout the district and throughout
other political subdivisions within the district, and construct and lay
sewer pipe along and upon public highways, roads, and streets, within
and without the district, and condemn and purchase or acquire land and
rights of way necessary for such sewer pipe. A district may erect
sewage treatment plants within or without the district, and may
acquire, by purchase or condemnation, properties or privileges
necessary to be had to protect any lakes, rivers, or watercourses and
also other areas of land from pollution from its sewers or its sewage
treatment plant. For the purposes of sewage facilities which include
facilities that result in combined sewage disposal or treatment and
electric generation where the electric generation is a byproduct,
nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a district to
condemn electric generating, transmission, or distribution rights or
facilities of entities authorized by law to distribute electricity, or
to acquire such rights or facilities without the consent of the owners;
(6)(a) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
operate systems of drainage for the benefit and use of the district,
the inhabitants thereof, and persons outside the district with an
adequate system of drainage, including but not limited to facilities
and systems for the collection, interception, treatment, and disposal
of storm or surface waters, and for the protection, preservation, and
rehabilitation of surface and underground waters, and drainage
facilities for public highways, streets, and roads, with full authority
to regulate the use and operation thereof and, except as provided in
(b) of this subsection, the service rates to be charged.
(b) The rate a district may charge under this section for storm or
surface water sewer systems or combined sanitary sewage and storm or
surface water sewer systems shall be reduced by a minimum of ten
percent for any new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes the
permissive rainwater harvesting system guidelines for nonresidential
occupancies adopted by the Washington state building code council on
July 12, 2002.
(c) Drainage facilities may include natural systems. Drainage
facilities may include facilities which result in combined drainage
facilities and electric generation, except that the electricity
generated thereby is a byproduct of the drainage system. Such
electricity may be used by the district or sold to any entity
authorized by law to distribute electricity. Electricity is deemed a
byproduct when the electrical generation is subordinate to the primary
purpose of drainage collection, disposal, and treatment. For such
purposes, a district may conduct storm or surface water throughout the
district and throughout other political subdivisions within the
district, construct and lay drainage pipe and culverts along and upon
public highways, roads, and streets, within and without the district,
and condemn and purchase or acquire land and rights of way necessary
for
such drainage systems. A district may provide or erect facilities
and improvements for the treatment and disposal of storm or surface
water within or without the district, and may acquire, by purchase or
condemnation, properties or privileges necessary to be had to protect
any lakes, rivers, or watercourses and also other areas of land from
pollution from storm or surface waters. For the purposes of drainage
facilities which include facilities that also generate electricity as
a byproduct, nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a
district to condemn electric generating, transmission, or distribution
rights or facilities of entities authorized by law to distribute
electricity, or to acquire such rights or facilities without the
consent of the owners;
(7) To construct, condemn, acquire, and own buildings and other
necessary district facilities;
(8) To compel all property owners within the district located
within an area served by the district's system of sewers to connect
their private drain and sewer systems with the district's system under
such penalty as the commissioners shall prescribe by resolution. The
district may for such purpose enter upon private property and connect
the private drains or sewers with the district system and the cost
thereof shall be charged against the property owner and shall be a lien
upon property served;
(9) Where a district contains within its borders, abuts, or is
located adjacent to any lake, stream, ground water as defined by RCW
90.44.035, or other waterway within the state of Washington, to provide
for the reduction, minimization, or elimination of pollutants from
those waters in accordance with the district's comprehensive plan, and
to issue general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, local improvement
district bonds, or utility local improvement bonds for the purpose of
paying all or any part of the cost of reducing, minimizing, or
eliminating the pollutants from these waters;
(10) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, to fix rates and
charges for water, sewer, and drain service supplied and to charge
property owners seeking to connect to the district's systems, as a
condition to granting the right to so connect, in addition to the cost
of the connection, such reasonable connection charge as the board of
commissioners shall determine to be proper in order that those property
owners shall bear their equitable share of the cost of the system. For
the purposes of calculating a connection charge, the board of
commissioners shall determine the pro rata share of the cost of
existing facilities and facilities planned for construction within the
next ten years and contained in an adopted comprehensive plan and other
costs borne by the district which are directly attributable to the
improvements required by property owners seeking to connect to the
system. The cost of existing facilities shall not include those
portions of the system which have been donated or which have been paid
for by grants. The connection charge may include interest charges
applied from the date of construction of the system until the
connection, or for a period not to exceed ten years, whichever is
shorter, at a rate commensurate with the rate of interest applicable to
the district at the time of construction or major rehabilitation of the
system, or at the time of installation of the lines to which the
property owner is seeking to connect. A district may permit payment of
the cost of connection and the reasonable connection charge to be paid
with interest in installments over a period not exceeding fifteen
years. The county treasurer may charge and collect a fee of three
dollars for each year for the treasurer's services. Those fees shall
be a charge to be included as part of each annual installment, and
shall be credited to the county current expense fund by the county
treasurer. Revenues from connection charges excluding permit fees are
to be considered payments in aid of construction as defined by
department of revenue rule. Rates or charges for on-site inspection
and maintenance services may not be imposed under this chapter on the
development, construction, or reconstruction of property.
Before adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility
services, or incorporating residences into an on-site inspection and
maintenance or sewer utility under this chapter, notification must be
provided, prior to the applicable public hearing, to all residences
within the proposed service area that have on-site systems permitted by
the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the
residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the
service.
A water-sewer district shall not provide on-site sewage system
inspection, pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services
under this section using water-sewer district employees unless the on-
site system is connected by a publicly owned collection system to the
water-sewer district's sewerage system, and the on-site system
represents the first step in the sewage disposal process.
Except as otherwise provided in RCW 90.03.525, any public entity
and public property, including the state of Washington and state
property, shall be subject to rates and charges for sewer, water, storm
water control, drainage, and street lighting facilities to the same
extent private persons and private property are subject to those rates
and charges that are imposed by districts. In setting those rates and
charges, consideration may be made of in-kind services, such as stream
improvements or donation of property;
(11) To contract with individuals, associations and corporations,
the state of Washington, and the United States;
(12) To employ such persons as are needed to carry out the
district's purposes and fix salaries and any bond requirements for
those employees;
(13) To contract for the provision of engineering, legal, and other
professional services as in the board of commissioner's discretion is
necessary in carrying out their duties;
(14) To sue and be sued;
(15) To loan and borrow funds and to issue bonds and instruments
evidencing indebtedness under chapter 57.20 RCW and other applicable
laws;
(16) To transfer funds, real or personal property, property
interests, or services subject to RCW 57.08.015;
(17) To levy taxes in accordance with this chapter and chapters
57.04 and 57.20 RCW;
(18) To provide for making local improvements and to levy and
collect special assessments on property benefitted thereby, and for
paying for the same or any portion thereof in accordance with chapter
57.16 RCW;
(19) To establish street lighting systems under RCW 57.08.060;
(20) To exercise such other powers as are granted to water-sewer
districts by this title or other applicable laws; and
(21) To exercise any of the powers granted to cities and counties
with respect to the acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation
of, and fixing rates and charges for waterworks and systems of sewerage
and drainage.

Sec. 6 RCW 57.08.081 and 1999 c 153 s 11 are each
amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 57.08.005(6), the commissioners of any district
shall provide for revenues by fixing rates and charges for furnishing
sewer and drainage service and facilities to those to whom service is
available or for providing water, such rates and charges to be fixed as
deemed necessary by the commissioners, so that uniform charges will be
made for the same class of customer or service and facility. Rates and
charges may be combined for the furnishing of more than one type of
sewer or drainage service and facilities.
(2) In classifying customers of such water, sewer, or drainage
system, the board of commissioners may in its discretion consider any
or all of the following factors: The difference in cost to various
customers; the location of the various customers within and without the
district; the difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair, and
replacement of the various parts of the system; the different character
of the service furnished various customers; the quantity and quality of
the service and facility furnished; the time of its use; the
achievement of water conservation goals and the discouragement of
wasteful practices; capital contributions made to the system including
but not limited to assessments; and any other matters which present a
reasonable difference as a ground for distinction. Rates shall be
established as deemed proper by the commissioners and as fixed by
resolution and shall produce revenues sufficient to take care of the
costs of maintenance and operation, revenue bond and warrant interest
and principal amortization requirements, and all other charges
necessary for efficient and proper operation of the system. Prior to
furnishing services, a district may require a deposit to guarantee
payment for services. However, failure to require a deposit does not
affect the validity of any lien authorized by this section.
(3) The commissioners shall enforce collection of connection
charges, and rates and charges for water supplied against property
owners connecting with the system or receiving such water, and for
sewer and drainage services charged against property to which and its
owners to whom the service is available, such charges being deemed
charges against the property served, by addition of penalties of not
more than ten percent thereof in case of failure to pay the charges at
times fixed by resolution. The commissioners may provide by resolution
that where either connection charges or rates and charges for services
supplied are delinquent for any specified period of time, the district
shall certify the delinquencies to the auditor of the county in which
the real property is located, and the charges and any penalties added
thereto and interest thereon at the rate of not more than the prime
lending rate of the district's bank plus four percentage points per
year shall be a lien against the property upon which the service was
received, subject only to the lien for general taxes.
(4) The district may, at any time after the connection charges or
rates and charges for services supplied or available and penalties are
delinquent for a period of sixty days, bring suit in foreclosure by
civil action in the superior court of the county in which the real
property is located. The court may allow, in addition to the costs and
disbursements provided by statute, attorneys' fees, title search and
report costs, and expenses as it adjudges reasonable. The action shall
be in rem, and may be brought in the name of the district against an
individual or against all of those who are delinquent in one action.
The laws and rules of the court shall control as in other civil
actions.
(5) In addition to the right to foreclose provided in this section,
the district may also cut off all or part of the service after charges
for water or sewer service supplied or available are delinquent for a
period of thirty days.
(6) A district may determine how to apply partial payments on past
due accounts.
(7) A district may provide a real property owner or the owner's
designee with duplicate bills for service to tenants, or may notify an
owner or the owner's designee that a tenant's service account is
delinquent. However, if an owner or the owner's designee notifies the
district in writing that a property served by the district is a rental
property, asks to be notified of a tenant's delinquency, and has
provided, in writing, a complete and accurate mailing address, the
district shall notify the owner or the owner's designee of a tenant's
delinquency at the same time and in the same manner the district
notifies the tenant of the tenant's delinquency or by mail. When a
district provides a real property owner or the owner's designee with
duplicates of tenant utility service bills or notice that a tenant's
utility account is delinquent, the district shall notify the tenant
that
it is providing the duplicate bills or delinquency notice to the
owner or the owner's designee. After January 1, 1999, if a district
fails to notify the owner of a tenant's delinquency after receiving a
written request to do so and after receiving the other information
required by this subsection (7), the district shall have no lien
against the premises for the tenant's delinquent and unpaid charges.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.33.210 and 2001 c 249 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any land that is designated as forest land under this chapter
at the earlier of the times the legislative authority of a local
government adopts a resolution, ordinance, or legislative act (a) to
create a local improvement district, in which the land is included or
would have been included but for the designation, or (b) to approve or
confirm a final special benefit assessment roll relating to a sanitary
or storm sewerage system, domestic water supply or distribution system,
or road construction or improvement, which roll would have included the
land but for the designation, shall be exempt from special benefit
assessments ((or)), charges in lieu of assessment, or rates and charges
for storm water control facilities under RCW 36.89.080 for such
purposes as long as that land remains designated as forest land, except
as otherwise provided in RCW 84.33.250.
(2) Whenever a local government creates a local improvement
district, the levying, collection, and enforcement of assessments shall
be in the manner and subject to the same procedures and limitations as
are provided under the law concerning the initiation and formation of
local improvement districts for the particular local government.
Notice of the creation of a local improvement district that includes
designated forest land shall be filed with the assessor and the
legislative authority of the county in which the land is located. The
assessor, upon receiving notice of the creation of a local improvement
district, shall send a notice to the owners of the designated forest
lands listed on the tax rolls of the applicable treasurer of:
(a) The creation of the local improvement district;
(b) The exemption of that land from special benefit assessments;
(c) The fact that the designated forest land may become subject to
the special benefit assessments if the owner waives the exemption by
filing a notarized document with the governing body of the local
government creating the local improvement district before the
confirmation of the final special benefit assessment roll; and
(d) The potential liability, pursuant to RCW 84.33.220, if the
exemption is not waived and the land is subsequently removed from
designated forest land status.
(3) When a local government approves and confirms a special benefit
assessment roll, from which designated forest land has been exempted
under this section, it shall file a notice of this action with the
assessor and the legislative authority of the county in which the land
is located and with the treasurer of that local government. The notice
shall describe the action taken, the type of improvement involved, the
land exempted, and the amount of the special benefit assessment that
would have been levied against the land if it had not been exempted.
The filing of the notice with the assessor and the treasurer of that
local government shall constitute constructive notice to a purchaser or
encumbrancer of the affected land, and every person whose conveyance or
encumbrance is subsequently executed or subsequently recorded, that the
exempt land is subject to the charges provided in RCW 84.33.220 and
84.33.230, if the land is removed from its designation as forest land.
(4) The owner of the land exempted from special benefit assessments
under this section may waive that exemption by filing a notarized
document to that effect with the legislative authority of the local
government upon receiving notice from said local government concerning
the assessment roll hearing and before the local government confirms
the final special benefit assessment roll. A copy of that waiver shall
be filed by the local government with the assessor, but the failure to
file this copy shall not affect the waiver.
(5) Except to the extent provided in RCW 84.33.250, the local
government shall have no duty to furnish service from the improvement
financed by the special benefit assessment to the exempted land.

Sec. 8 RCW 86.15.160 and 1986 c 278 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter the supervisors may authorize:
(1) An annual excess ad valorem tax levy within any zone or
participating zones when authorized by the voters of the zone or
participating zones under RCW 84.52.052 and 84.52.054;
(2) An assessment upon property, including state property,
specially benefited by flood control improvements or storm water
control improvements imposed under chapter 86.09 RCW;
(3) Within any zone or participating zones an annual ad valorem
property tax levy of not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value when the levy will not take dollar rates that other
taxing districts may lawfully claim and that will not cause the
combined levies to exceed the constitutional and/or statutory
limitations, and the additional levy, or any portion thereof, may also
be made when dollar rates of other taxing units is released therefor by
agreement with the other taxing units from their authorized levies;
(4) A charge, under RCW 36.89.080, for the furnishing of service to
those who are receiving or will receive benefits from storm water
control facilities and who are contributing to an increase in surface
water runoff. The rate or charge imposed under this section shall be
reduced by a minimum of ten percent for any new or remodeled commercial
building that utilizes the permissive rainwater harvesting system
guidelines for nonresidential occupancies adopted by the Washington
state building code council on July 12, 2002;
(5) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 90.03.525, any public
entity and public property, including the state and state property,
shall be liable for the charges to the same extent a private person and
privately owned property is liable for the charges, and in setting
these rates and charges, consideration may be made of in-kind services,
such as stream improvements or donation of property;
(((5))) (6) The creation of local improvement districts and utility
local improvement districts, the issuance of improvement district bonds
and warrants, and the imposition, collection, and enforcement of
special assessments on all property, including any state-owned or other
publicly-owned property, specially benefited from improvements in the
same manner as provided for counties by chapter 36.94 RCW.

--- END ---