BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that active military and naval veterans,
reserve military and naval veterans, and national guard members called
to active duty have served their country and have risked their lives to
defend the lives of all Americans and the freedoms that define and
distinguish our nation. The legislature intends to honor active
military and naval veterans, reserve military and naval veterans, and
national guard members who have served on active military or naval duty
for the public service they have provided to this country.
(2) Subject to the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges, may waive all or
a portion of tuition and fees for the following persons:
(a) An eligible veteran or national guard member;
(b) A child and the spouse of an eligible veteran or national guard
member who became totally disabled as defined in RCW 28B.15.385 while
engaged in active federal military or naval service, or who is
determined by the federal government to be a prisoner of war or missing
in action;
(c) A child and the surviving spouse of an eligible veteran or
national guard member who lost his or her life while engaged in active
federal military or naval service. However, upon remarriage, the
surviving spouse of an eligible veteran or national guard member is
ineligible for a waiver under this section.
(3) Subject to the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges, may waive all or
a portion of tuition and fees increases that have occurred during the
academic years in which an eligible veteran or national guard member
was engaged in active federal military or naval service on foreign soil
or in another location in support of federal military or naval action
on foreign soil, if the eligible veteran or national guard member could
have qualified as a resident student under RCW 28B.15.012(2) had he or
she been enrolled as a student.
(4) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community colleges,
may waive all or a portion of tuition and fees for a military or naval
veteran who is a Washington domiciliary, but who did not serve on
foreign soil or in international waters or in another location in
support of those serving on foreign soil or in international waters and
who does not qualify as an eligible veteran or national guard member
under subsection (5) of this section. However, there shall be no state
general fund support for waivers granted under this subsection.
(5) Private vocational schools and private higher education
institutions are encouraged to provide waivers consistent with the
terms in subsections (2) through (4) of this section.
(6) As used in this section "eligible veteran or national guard
member" means a Washington domiciliary who was an active or reserve
member of the United States military or naval forces, or a national
guard member called to active duty, and who served in active federal
service in a war or conflict fought on foreign soil or in international
waters or in another location in support of those serving on foreign
soil or in international waters as a member of the armed military or
naval forces of the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
Institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016,
shall provide an enrolled student who is called to active federal
service in United States military action initiated by an executive
order issued by the President of the United States, and who is unable
to complete the academic term in which the student is enrolled, with
the option of receiving a refund of the total tuition and fees paid by
the eligible student for the applicable academic term, or of being
readmitted for a comparable academic term under the following
conditions:
(1) The eligible student shall be exempt from the payment of
additional tuition and fees;
(2) No new course sections shall be created as a direct result of
students receiving the waivers; and
(3) Enrollment information on students receiving the waivers shall
be maintained separately from other enrollment information and shall
not be considered in any enrollment statistics that would affect
budgetary determinations.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.15.380 and 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen
State College may exempt the following students from the payment of all
or a portion of tuition fees and services and activities fees:
(((1) All veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.005: PROVIDED, That
such persons are no longer entitled to federal vocational or
educational benefits conferred by virtue of their military service:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That if any such veterans have not resided in
this state for one year prior to registration, the board may exempt the
student from paying up to fifty percent of the nonresident tuition fees
differential. Such exemptions may be provided only to those persons
otherwise covered who were enrolled in universities on or before
October 1, 1977.
(2))) Children of any law enforcement officer or fire fighter who
lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty
while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full time or
volunteer fire department in this state: PROVIDED, That such persons
may receive the exemption only if they begin their course of study at
a state-supported college or university within ten years of their
graduation from high school.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.15.910 and 2000 c 152 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to
public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived
under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and
unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations
act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen
State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial
management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to
all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.
(a) University of Washington 21 percent
(b) Washington State University 20 percent
(c) Eastern Washington University 11 percent
(d) Central Washington University 8 percent
(e) Western Washington University 10 percent
(f) The Evergreen State College 6 percent
(g) Community colleges as a whole 35 percent
(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to
waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the
following:
(a) ((RCW 28B.10.265;
(b))) RCW 28B.15.014;
(((c))) (b) RCW 28B.15.100;
(((d))) (c) RCW 28B.15.225;
(((e))) (d) RCW 28B.15.380;
(((f))) (e) RCW 28B.15.520;
(((g))) (f) RCW 28B.15.526;
(((h))) (g) RCW 28B.15.527;
(((i))) (h) RCW 28B.15.543;
(((j))) (i) RCW 28B.15.545;
(((k))) (j) RCW 28B.15.555;
(((l))) (k) RCW 28B.15.556;
(((m))) (l) RCW 28B.15.615;
(((n) RCW 28B.15.620;
(o) RCW 28B.15.628;
(p))) (m) RCW 28B.15.730;
(((q))) (n) RCW 28B.15.740;
(((r))) (o) RCW 28B.15.750;
(((s))) (p) RCW 28B.15.756;
(((t))) (q) RCW 28B.50.259;
(((u))) (r) RCW 28B.70.050;
(((v) RCW 28B.80.580; and
(w) During the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the western interstate
commission for higher education undergraduate exchange program for
students attending Eastern Washington University)); and
(s) Section 1 (2) and (3) of this act.
(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees
contained in the following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.522;
(b) RCW 28B.15.540; and
(c) RCW 28B.15.558.
(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the
western interstate commission for higher education western
undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.
(a) Washington State University 1 percent
(b) Eastern Washington University 3 percent
(c) Central Washington University 3 percent

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.10.265 (Waiver from fees -- Children of certain citizens
missing in action or prisoners of war) and 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 1, 1992 c
231 s 2, 1985 c 390 s 1, 1973 c 63 s 2, & 1972 ex.s. c 17 s 2;
(2) RCW 28B.15.620 (Exemption from tuition and fees increase at
institutions of higher education -- Vietnam veterans) and 1999 c 82 s 1,
1995 c 349 s 1, 1994 c 208 s 1, 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 24, 1992 c 231 s 22,
1989 c 306 s 4, 1983 c 307 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c 83 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 322
s 9, 1972 ex.s. c 149 s 3, & 1971 ex.s. c 279 s 22;
(3) RCW 28B.15.625 (Persian Gulf veterans -- Private higher education
institutions -- Tuition refund encouraged) and 1991 c 164 s 10;
(4) RCW 28B.15.628 (Waiver of tuition and fees increases at
institutions of higher education -- Persian Gulf veterans) and 1999 c 82
s 2, 1996 c 169 s 1, 1994 c 208 s 2, 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 25, 1992 c 231
s 23, & 1991 c 228 s 14; and
(5) RCW 28B.15.629 (Tuition waivers at technical colleges -- Vietnam
veterans -- Persian Gulf veterans) and 1999 c 82 s 3.

--- END ---