BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.91 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Any person who has received notice that his or her behavior
is interfering with the use of a search and rescue dog who continues
with reckless disregard to interfere with the use of a search and
rescue dog by obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise jeopardizing the
safety of the search and rescue dog user or his or her search and
rescue dog is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable according to chapter
9A.20 RCW, except that for a second or subsequent offense it is a gross
misdemeanor.
(b) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her dog
to interfere with the use of a search and rescue dog by obstructing,
intimidating, or otherwise jeopardizing the safety of the search and
rescue dog user or his or her search and rescue dog is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, except that for
a second or subsequent offense it is a gross misdemeanor.
(2)(a) Any person who, with reckless disregard, injures, disables,
or causes the death of a search and rescue dog is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(b) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her dog
to injure, disable, or cause the death of a search and rescue dog is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20
RCW.
(3) Any person who intentionally injures, disables, or causes the
death of a search and rescue dog is guilty of a class C felony.
(4) Any person who wrongfully obtains or exerts unauthorized
control over a search and rescue dog with the intent to deprive the dog
user of his or her search and rescue dog is guilty of theft in the
first degree under RCW 9A.56.030.
(5)(a) In any case in which the defendant is convicted of a
violation of this section, he or she shall also be ordered to make full
restitution for all damages, including incidental and consequential
expenses incurred by the search and rescue dog user and the dog that
arise out of, or are related to, the criminal offense.
(b) Restitution for a conviction under this section shall include,
but is not limited to:
(i) The value of the replacement of an incapacitated or deceased
dog, the training of a replacement search and rescue dog, or retraining
of the affected dog and all related veterinary and care expenses; and
(ii) Medical expenses of the search and rescue dog user, training
of the dog user, and compensation for any wages or earned income lost
by the search and rescue dog user as a result of a violation of
subsection (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section.
(6) Nothing in this section affects any civil remedies available
for violation of this section.
(7) For purposes of this section, "search and rescue dog" means a
dog that is trained for the purpose of search and rescue of persons
lost or missing.

--- END ---