BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.64.010 and 1961 c 12 s 46.64.010 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every traffic enforcement agency in this state shall provide in
appropriate form traffic citations containing notices to appear which
shall be issued in books with citations in quadruplicate and meeting
the requirements of this section, or issued by an electronic device
capable of producing a printed copy and electronic copies of the
citations.
The chief administrative officer of every such traffic enforcement
agency shall be responsible for the issuance of such books or
electronic devices and shall maintain a record of every such book and
each citation contained therein and every electronic device issued to
individual members of the traffic enforcement agency and shall require
and retain a receipt for every book or electronic device so issued.
Every traffic enforcement officer upon issuing a traffic citation
to an alleged violator of any provision of the motor vehicle laws of
this state or of any traffic ordinance of any city or town shall
deposit the original or a printed or electronic copy of such traffic
citation with a court having competent jurisdiction over the alleged
offense or with its traffic violations bureau.
Upon the deposit of the original or a copy of such traffic citation
with a court having competent jurisdiction over the alleged offense or
with its traffic violations bureau as aforesaid, ((said)) the original
or copy of such traffic citation may be disposed of only by trial in
((said)) the court or other official action by a judge of ((said)) the
court, including forfeiture of the bail or by the deposit of sufficient
bail with or payment of a fine to ((said)) the traffic violations
bureau by the person to whom ((such)) the traffic citation has been
issued by the traffic enforcement officer.
It shall be unlawful and official misconduct for any traffic
enforcement officer or other officer or public employee to dispose of
a traffic citation or copies thereof or of the record of the issuance
of the same in a manner other than as required ((herein)) in this
section.
The chief administrative officer of every traffic enforcement
agency shall require the return to him or her of a printed or
electronic copy of every traffic citation issued by an officer under
his or her supervision to an alleged violator of any traffic law or
ordinance and of all copies of every traffic citation which has been
spoiled or upon which any entry has been made and not issued to an
alleged violator.
Such chief administrative officer shall also maintain or cause to
be maintained in connection with every traffic citation issued by an
officer under his or her supervision a record of the disposition of the
charge by the court or its traffic violations bureau in which the
original or copy of the traffic citation was deposited.
Any person who cancels or solicits the cancellation of any traffic
citation, in any manner other than as provided in this section, ((shall
be)) is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Every record of traffic citations required in this section shall be
audited monthly by the appropriate fiscal officer of the government
agency to which the traffic enforcement agency is responsible.

--- END ---