BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
Institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016,
shall provide eligible students as defined in RCW 28B.10.017 with two
options. At the option of the eligible student, the institution shall
either refund the total tuition and fees paid by the eligible student
for the applicable academic term, or shall readmit the eligible student
for one academic term under the following conditions:
(1) The eligible student shall be exempt from the payment of
additional tuition and fees;
(2) No new course sections shall be created as a direct result of
students receiving the waivers;
(3) Enrollment information on students receiving the waivers shall
be maintained separately from other enrollment information and shall
not be considered in any enrollment statistics that would affect
budgetary determinations; and
(4) Institutions may apply to the legislature for a supplemental
appropriation to cover the cost of serving any student who elects to
exercise a reenrollment option under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.600 and 1995 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College may refund or cancel in
full the tuition and services and activities fees if the student
withdraws from a university or college course or program prior to the
sixth day of instruction of the quarter or semester for which the fees
have been paid or are due. If the student withdraws on or after the
sixth day of instruction, the governing boards may refund or cancel up
to one-half of the fees, provided such withdrawal occurs within the
first thirty calendar days following the beginning of instruction.
However, if a different policy is required by federal law in order for
the institution of higher education to maintain eligibility for federal
funding of programs, the governing board may adopt a refund policy that
meets the minimum requirements of the federal law, and the policy may
treat all students attending the institution in the same manner.
The governing boards of the respective universities and college may
adopt rules for the refund of tuition and fees for courses or programs
that begin after the start of the regular quarter or semester. The
governing boards may adopt rules to comply with ((RCW 28B.15.623))
section 1 of this act and may extend the refund or cancellation period
for students who withdraw for medical reasons or who are called into
the military service of the United States and may refund other fees
pursuant to such rules as they may prescribe.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.15.625 and 1991 c 164 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Private vocational schools and private higher education
institutions are encouraged to provide students deployed either to the
Persian Gulf combat zone, as designated by the president of the United
States through executive order, or in another location in support of
the Persian Gulf combat zone, with the choice of tuition refunds or one
free term, as provided under RCW 28B.10.017 and ((28B.15.623)) section
1 of this act for public higher education institutions.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.15.628 and 1999 c 82 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that military and naval veterans who have
served their country in wars on foreign soil have risked their own
lives to defend both the lives of all Americans and the freedoms that
define and distinguish our nation. It is the intent of the legislature
to honor Persian Gulf combat zone veterans and veterans of the Persian
Gulf geographic region for the public service they have provided to
their country. It is the further intent of the legislature that, for
eligible Persian Gulf combat zone veterans, institutions of higher
education waive tuition and fee increases that have occurred after the
1990-91 academic year; and for veterans who served on active military
duty in the Persian Gulf geographic region or in another location in
support of United States' military action in the Persian Gulf, during
the time the veteran served on active military duty in that location.
(2) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges may exempt veterans
of the Persian Gulf combat zone from all or a portion of increases in
tuition and fees that occur after the 1990-91 academic year, if the
veteran could have qualified as a Washington resident student under RCW
28B.15.012(2), had he or she been enrolled as a student on August 1,
1990, and during the academic year or years the veteran served on
active military duty in the Persian Gulf geographic region or in
another location in support of United States' military action initiated
by executive order issued during 2003 or 2004.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "a veteran of the Persian
Gulf combat zone" means a person who served on active duty in the armed
forces of the United States during any portion of the 1991 calendar
year in the Persian Gulf combat zone as designated by executive order
of the president of the United States or during any portion of the
2002-03 or 2003-04 academic years in the Persian Gulf geographic region
in support of United States' military action initiated by executive
order issued during 2003 or 2004.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.10.017 and 1991 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Eligible student" means a student who (((1))):
(a)(i) Was enrolled in a Washington college, university, community
college, or vocational-technical institute on or after August 2,
1990((,)); and
(((2))) (ii) Is unable to complete the period of enrollment or
academic term in which the student was enrolled because the student was
deployed either in the Persian Gulf combat zone, as designated by the
president of the United States by executive order, or in another
location in support of the Persian Gulf combat zone; or
(b) Was deployed in the Persian Gulf geographic region in support
of United States' military action by executive order issued in 2003 or
2004.
(2) An eligible student is required to verify his or her inability
to complete an academic term through military service records, movement
orders, or a certified letter signed by the student's installation
personnel officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---