BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a criminal action brought by reason of a person having been
detained on or in the immediate vicinity of the premises of an outdoor
music venue or related campground for the purpose of pursuing an
investigation or questioning by a law enforcement officer as to the
lawfulness of the consumption or possession of alcohol or drugs, it is
a defense to the action that the person was detained in a reasonable
manner and for not more than a reasonable time to permit the
investigation or questioning by a law enforcement officer, and that a
peace officer, owner, operator, employee, or agent of the outdoor music
venue had reasonable grounds to believe that the person so detained was
committing or attempting to unlawfully consume or possess alcohol or
drugs on the premises.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Reasonable grounds" include, but are not limited to:
(b) "Exhibiting the effects of having consumed liquor" means that
a person has the odor of liquor on his or her breath, or that by
speech, manner, appearance, behavior, lack of coordination, or
otherwise exhibits that he or she has consumed liquor, and either:
(i) Is in possession of or in close proximity to a container that
has or recently had liquor in it; or
(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently consumed liquor.
(c) "Exhibiting the effects of having consumed an illegal drug"
means that a person by speech, manner, appearance, behavior, lack of
coordination, or otherwise exhibits that he or she has consumed an
illegal drug, and either:
(i) Is in possession of an illegal drug; or
(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently consumed an
illegal drug.
(d) "Illegal drug" means a controlled substance under chapter 69.50
RCW for which the person detained does not have a valid prescription or
that is not being consumed in accordance with the prescription
directions and warnings, or a legend drug under chapter 69.41 RCW for
which the person does not have a valid prescription or that is not
being consumed in accordance with the prescription directions and
warnings.
(e) "A reasonable time" means the time necessary to permit the
person detained to make a statement or to refuse to make a statement,
and the time necessary to allow a law enforcement officer to determine
the lawfulness of the consumption or possession of alcohol or drugs.
However, this time may not exceed one hour.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a civil action brought by reason of a person having been
detained on or in the immediate vicinity of the premises of an outdoor
music venue or related campground for the purpose of investigation or
questioning as to the lawfulness of the consumption or possession of
alcohol or drugs, it is a defense to the action that the person was
detained in a reasonable manner and for not more than a reasonable time
to permit the investigation or questioning by a law enforcement
officer, and that a peace officer, owner, operator, employee, or agent
of the outdoor music venue had reasonable grounds to believe that the
person so detained was committing or attempting to unlawfully consume
or possess alcohol or drugs on the premises.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Reasonable grounds" include, but are not limited to:
(b) "Exhibiting the effects of having consumed liquor" means that
a person has the odor of liquor on his or her breath, or that by
speech, manner, appearance, behavior, lack of coordination, or
otherwise exhibits that he or she has consumed liquor, and either:
(i) Is in possession of or in close proximity to a container that
has or recently had liquor in it; or
(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently consumed liquor.
(c) "Exhibiting the effects of having consumed an illegal drug"
means that a person by speech, manner, appearance, behavior, lack of
coordination, or otherwise exhibits that he or she has consumed an
illegal drug, and either:
(i) Is in possession of an illegal drug; or
(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently consumed an
illegal drug.
(d) "Illegal drug" means a controlled substance under chapter 69.50
RCW for which the person detained does not have a valid prescription or
that is not being consumed in accordance with the prescription
directions and warnings, or a legend drug under chapter 69.41 RCW for
which the person does not have a valid prescription or that is not
being consumed in accordance with the prescription directions and
warnings.
(e) "A reasonable time" means the time necessary to permit the
person detained to make a statement or to refuse to make a statement,
and the time necessary to allow a law enforcement officer to determine
the lawfulness of the consumption or possession of alcohol or drugs.
However, this time may not exceed one hour.

--- END ---