BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature finds
and declares that the distribution and sale of motorsports vehicles in
this state vitally affect the general economy of the state and the
public interest and public welfare, that provision for warranty service
to motorsports vehicles is of substantial concern to the people of this
state, that the maintenance of fair competition among dealers and
others is in the public interest, and that the maintenance of strong
and sound dealerships is essential to provide continuing and necessary
reliable services to the consuming public in this state and to provide
stable employment to the citizens of this state. The legislature
further finds that there is a substantial disparity in bargaining power
between motorsports vehicle manufacturers and their dealers, and that
in order to promote the public interest and the public welfare, and in
the exercise of its police power, it is necessary to regulate the
relationship between motorsports vehicle dealers and motorsports
vehicle manufacturers, importers, distributors, and their
representatives doing business in this state, not only for the
protection of dealers but also for the benefit for the public in
assuring the continued availability and servicing of motorsports
vehicles sold to the public.
The legislature recognizes it is in the best interest for
manufacturers and dealers of motorsports vehicles to conduct business
with each other in a fair, efficient, and competitive manner. The
legislature declares the public interest is best served by dealers
being assured of the ability to manage their business enterprises under
a contractual obligation with manufacturers where dealers do not
experience unreasonable interference and are assured of the ability to
transfer ownership of their business without undue constraints. It is
the intent of the legislature to impose a regulatory scheme and to
regulate competition in the motorsports vehicle industry to the extent
necessary to balance fairness and efficiency. These actions will
permit motorsports vehicle dealers to better serve consumers and allow
dealers to devote their best competitive efforts and resources to the
sale and services of the manufacturer's products to consumers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(3) "Franchise" means one or more agreements, whether oral or
written, between a manufacturer and a new motorsports vehicle dealer,
under which the new motorsports vehicle dealer is authorized to sell,
service, and repair new motorsports vehicles, parts, and accessories
under a common name, trade name, trademark, or service mark of the
manufacturer.
"Franchise" includes an oral or written contract and includes a
dealer agreement, either expressed or implied, between a manufacturer
and a new motorsports vehicle dealer that purports to fix the legal
rights and liabilities between the parties and under which (a) the
dealer is granted the right to purchase and resell motorsports vehicles
manufactured, distributed, or imported by the manufacturer; (b) the
dealer's business is associated with the trademark, trade name,
commercial symbol, or advertisement designating the franchisor or the
products distributed by the manufacturer; and (c) the dealer's business
relies on the manufacturer for a continued supply of motorsports
vehicles, parts, and accessories.
(4) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and fair dealing in the
trade as defined and interpreted in RCW 62A.2-103.
(5) "Designated successor" means:
(a) The spouse, biological or adopted child, grandchild, parent,
brother, or sister of the owner of a new motorsports vehicle dealership
who, in the case of the owner's death, is entitled to inherit the
ownership interest in the new motorsports vehicle dealership under the
terms of the owner's will or similar document, and if there is no such
will or similar document, then under applicable intestate laws;
(b) A qualified person experienced in the business of a new
motorsports vehicle dealer who has been nominated by the owner of a new
motorsports vehicle dealership as the successor in a written,
notarized, and witnessed instrument submitted to the manufacturer; or
(c) In the case of an incapacitated owner of a new motorsports
vehicle dealership, the person who has been appointed by a court as the
legal representative of the incapacitated owner's property.
(6) "Manufacturer" means a person, firm, association, corporation,
or trust, resident or nonresident, who manufactures or assembles new
and unused motorsports vehicles or remanufactures motorsports vehicles
in whole or in part and further includes the terms:
(a) "Distributor," which means a person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who in whole or in part
offers for sale, sells, or distributes new and unused motorsports
vehicles to vehicle dealers or who maintains factory representatives.
(b) "Factory branch," which means a branch office maintained by a
manufacturer for the purpose of selling or offering for sale,
motorsports vehicles to a distributor, wholesaler, or vehicle dealer,
or for directing or supervising in whole or in part factory or
distributor representatives, and further includes a sales promotion
organization, whether a person, firm, or corporation, that is engaged
in promoting the sale of new and unused motorsports vehicles in this
state of a particular brand or make to vehicle dealers.
(c) "Factory representative," which means a representative employed
by a manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch for the purpose of
making or promoting for the sale of their motorsports vehicles or for
supervising or contracting with their dealers or prospective dealers.
(7) "Motorsports vehicle" means a motorcycle as defined in RCW
46.04.330; a moped as defined in RCW 46.04.304; a motor-driven cycle as
defined in RCW 46.04.332; a personal watercraft as defined in RCW
79A.60.010; a snowmobile as defined in RCW 46.10.010; a four-wheel,
all-terrain vehicle; and any other motorsports vehicle defined under
section 20 of this act by the department that is otherwise not subject
to chapter 46.96 RCW.
(8) "New motorsports vehicle dealer" or "dealer" means a person
engaged in the business of buying, selling, exchanging, or otherwise
dealing in new motorsports vehicles or new and used motorsports
vehicles at an established place of business under a franchise, sales
and service agreement, or any other contract with a manufacturer of any
one or more types of new motorsports vehicles. The term does not
include a miscellaneous vehicle dealer as defined in RCW 46.70.011.
(9) "Owner" means a person holding an ownership interest in the
business entity operating as a new motorsports vehicle dealer and who
is the designated dealer in the new motorsports vehicle franchise
agreement.
(10) "Person" means a natural person, partnership, stock company,
corporation, trust, agency, or any other legal entity, as well as any
individual officers, directors, or other persons in active control of
the activities of the entity.
(11) "Place of business" means a permanent, enclosed commercial
building, situated within this state, and the real property on which it
is located, at which the business of a motorsports vehicle dealer,
including the display and repair of motorsports vehicles, may be
lawfully conducted in accordance with the terms of all applicable laws
and at which the public may contact the motorsports vehicle dealer and
employees at all reasonable times.
(12) "Relevant market area" is defined as follows:
(a) If the population in the county in which the existing, proposed
new, or relocated dealership is located or is to be located is four
hundred thousand or more, the relevant market area is the geographic
area within the radius of ten miles around the existing, proposed new,
or relocated place of business for the dealership;
(b) If the population in the county in which the existing, proposed
new, or relocated dealership is to be located is two hundred thousand
or more and less than four hundred thousand, the relevant market area
is the geographic area within a radius of twelve miles around the
existing, proposed new, or relocated place of business for the
dealership;
(c) If the population in the county in which the existing, proposed
new, or relocated dealership is to be located is less than two hundred
thousand, the relevant market area is the geographic area within a
radius of twenty miles around the existing, proposed new, or relocated
place of business for the dealership.
(d) In determining population for this definition, the most recent
census by the United States Bureau of Census or the most recent
population update, either from the National Planning Data Corporation
or other similar recognized source, will be accumulated for all census
tracts either wholly or partially within the relevant market area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 TERMINATION, CANCELLATION, NONRENEWAL OF
FRANCHISE RESTRICTED. Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise and
notwithstanding the terms of a waiver, no manufacturer may terminate,
cancel, or fail to renew a franchise with a new motorsports vehicle
dealer, unless the manufacturer has complied with the notice
requirements of section 7 of this act and an administrative law judge
has determined, if requested in writing by the dealer within forty-five
days of receiving a notice from a manufacturer, after hearing, that
there is good cause for the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of
the franchise and that the manufacturer has acted in good faith
regarding the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 DETERMINATION OF GOOD CAUSE, GOOD FAITH--PETITION, NOTICE, DECISION, APPEAL. A new motorsports vehicle dealer
who has received written notification from the manufacturer of the
manufacturer's intent to terminate, cancel, or not renew the franchise,
may file a petition with the department for a determination as to the
existence of good cause and good faith for the termination,
cancellation, or nonrenewal of a franchise. The petition must contain
a short statement setting forth the reasons for the dealer's objection
to the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of the franchise. Upon
the filing of the petition and the receipt of the filing fee, the
department shall promptly notify the manufacturer that a timely
petition has been filed and shall request the appointment of an
administrative law judge under chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct a hearing.
The franchise in question continues in full force and effect pending
the administrative law judge's decision. If the decision of the
administrative law judge terminating, canceling, or failing to renew a
dealer's franchise is appealed by a dealer or manufacturer, the
franchise continues in full force and effect until all appeals to a
superior court or any appellate court have been completed. Nothing in
this section precludes a manufacturer or dealer from petitioning the
superior court for a stay or other relief pending judicial review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 DETERMINATION OF GOOD CAUSE, GOOD FAITH--HEARING, DECISION, PROCEDURES--JUDICIAL REVIEW. (1) The administrative
law judge shall conduct the hearing and render a final decision as
expeditiously as possible, but in any event not later than one hundred
eighty days after a petition is filed. If the termination,
cancellation, or nonrenewal is under section 7(2) of this act, the
administrative law judge shall give the proceeding priority
consideration and shall render a final decision not later than sixty
days after a petition is filed.
(2) The administrative law judge shall conduct the hearing as an
adjudicative proceeding in accordance with the procedures provided for
in the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. The
administrative law judge shall render the final decision and shall
enter a final order. Except as otherwise provided in RCW 34.05.446 and
34.05.449, all hearing costs must be borne on an equal basis by the
parties to the hearing.
(3) A party to a hearing under this chapter may be represented by
counsel. A party to a hearing aggrieved by the final order of the
administrative law judge concerning the termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal of a franchise may seek judicial review of the order in the
superior court or appellate court in the manner provided for in RCW
34.05.510 through 34.05.598. A petitioner for judicial review need not
exhaust all administrative appeals or administrative review processes
as a prerequisite for seeking judicial review under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 GOOD CAUSE, WHAT CONSTITUTES--BURDEN OF
PROOF. (1) Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise or the terms of a
waiver, and except as otherwise provided in section 7(2) (a) through
(d) of this act, good cause exists for termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal of a franchise when there is a failure by the dealer to
comply with a provision of the franchise that is both reasonable and of
material significance to the franchise relationship, if the dealer was
notified of the failure within one hundred eighty days after the
manufacturer first acquired knowledge of the failure, and the dealer
did not correct the failure after being requested to do so.
If, however, the failure of the dealer relates to the performance
of the dealer in sales, service, or level of customer satisfaction,
good cause is the failure of the dealer to comply with reasonable
performance standards determined by the manufacturer in accordance with
uniformly applied criteria, and:
(a) The dealer was advised, in writing, by the manufacturer of the
failure;
(b) The notice under this subsection stated that notice was
provided of a failure of performance under this section;
(c) The manufacturer provided the dealer with specific, reasonable
goals or reasonable performance standards with which the dealer must
comply, together with a suggested timetable or program for attaining
those goals or standards, and the dealer was given a reasonable
opportunity, for a period of at least ninety days, to comply with the
goals or standards; and
(d) The dealer did not substantially comply with the manufacturer's
performance standards during that period and the failure to demonstrate
substantial compliance was not due to market or economic factors within
the dealer's relevant market area that were beyond the control of the
dealer.
(2) The manufacturer has the burden of proof of establishing good
cause and good faith for the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal
of the franchise under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 NOTICE OF TERMINATION, CANCELLATION, OR
NONRENEWAL. Before the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a
franchise, the manufacturer shall give written notification to both the
department and the dealer. The notice must be by certified mail or
personally delivered to the new motorsports vehicle dealer and must
state the intention to terminate, cancel, or not renew the franchise,
the reasons for the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal, and the
effective date of the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal. The
notice must be given:
(1) Not less than ninety days, which runs concurrently with the
ninety-day period provided in section 6(1)(c) of this act, before the
effective date of the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal;
(2) Not less than fifteen days before the effective date of the
termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal with respect to any of the
following that constitute good cause for termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal:
(a) Insolvency of the dealer or the filing of any petition by or
against the dealer under bankruptcy or receivership law;
(b) Failure of the dealer to conduct sales and service operations
during customary business hours for seven consecutive business days,
except for acts of God or circumstances beyond the direct control of
the dealer;
(c) Conviction of the dealer, or principal operator of the
dealership, of a felony punishable by imprisonment; or
(d) Suspension or revocation of a license that the dealer is
required to have to operate the dealership where the suspension or
revocation is for a period in excess of thirty days;
(3) Not less than one hundred eighty days before the effective date
of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal, where the manufacturer
intends to discontinue sale and distribution of the new motorsports
vehicle line.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 PAYMENTS BY MANUFACTURER TO DEALER FOR
INVENTORY, EQUIPMENT, ETC. (1) Upon the termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal of a franchise by the manufacturer under this chapter, the
manufacturer shall pay the dealer, at a minimum:
(a) Dealer cost, less all allowances paid or credited to the dealer
by the manufacturer, of unused, undamaged, and unsold new motorsports
vehicles in the dealer's inventory that were acquired from the
manufacturer or another dealer of the same line make;
(b) Dealer cost for all unused, undamaged, and unsold supplies,
parts, and accessories in original packaging, except that in the case
of sheet metal, a comparable substitute for original packaging may be
used, if the supply, part, or accessory was acquired from the
manufacturer or from another dealer ceasing operations as a part of the
dealer's initial inventory, as long as the supplies, parts, and
accessories appear in the manufacturer's current parts catalog, list,
or current offering;
(c) Dealer cost for all unused, undamaged, and unsold inventory,
whether vehicles, parts, or accessories, the purchase of which was
required by the manufacturer;
(d) The fair market value of each undamaged sign owned by the
dealer that bears a common name, trade name, or trademark of the
manufacturer, if acquisition of the sign was recommended or required by
the manufacturer and the sign is in good and usable condition less
reasonable wear and tear, and has not been depreciated by the dealer
more than fifty percent of the value of the sign; and
(e) The fair market value of all special tools owned or leased by
the dealer that were acquired from the manufacturer or persons approved
by the manufacturer, and that were required by the manufacturer, and
are in good and usable condition, less reasonable wear and tear.
However, if the tools are leased by the dealer, the manufacturer shall
pay the dealer such amounts that are required by the lessor to
terminate the lease under the terms of the lease agreement.
(2) To the extent the franchise agreement provides for payment or
reimbursement to the dealer in excess of that specified in this
section, the provisions of the franchise agreement will control.
(3) The manufacturer shall pay the dealer the sums specified in
subsection (1) of this section within ninety days after the tender of
the property, if the dealer has clear title to the property and is in
a position to convey that title to the manufacturer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 MITIGATION OF DAMAGES. Sections 3 through
8 of this act do not relieve a dealer from the obligation to mitigate
the dealer's damages upon termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of
the franchise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 WARRANTY WORK. (1) Each manufacturer shall
specify in its franchise agreement, or in a separate written agreement,
with each of its dealers licensed in this state, the dealer's
obligation to perform warranty work or service on the manufacturer's
products. Each manufacturer shall provide each of its dealers with a
schedule of compensation to be paid to the dealer for any warranty work
or service, including parts, labor, and diagnostic work, required of
the dealer by the manufacturer in connection with the manufacturer's
products, and for work on and preparation of motorsports vehicles
received from the manufacturer. The compensation may not be less than
the rates reasonably charged by the dealer for like services and parts
to retail customers. The compensation may not be reduced by the
manufacturer for any reason or made conditional on an activity outside
the performance of warranty work.
(2) All claims for warranty work for parts and labor made by
dealers under this section must be paid by the manufacturer within
thirty days after approval, and must be approved or denied within
thirty days of receipt by the manufacturer. Denial of a claim must be
in writing with the specific grounds for denial. The manufacturer may
audit claims for warranty work and charge the dealer for any
unsubstantiated, incorrect, or false claims for a period of one year
after payment. However, the manufacturer may audit and charge the
dealer for any fraudulent claims during any period for which an action
for fraud may be commenced under applicable state law.
(3) All claims submitted by dealers on the forms and in the manner
specified by the manufacturer must be either approved or disapproved
within thirty days after their receipt. The manufacturer shall notify
the dealer in writing of a disapproved claim, and shall set forth the
reasons why the claim was not approved. A claim not specifically
disapproved in writing within thirty days after receipt is approved,
and the manufacturer is required to pay that claim within thirty days
of receipt of the claim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 DESIGNATED SUCCESSOR TO FRANCHISE
OWNERSHIP. (1) Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise, an owner may
appoint a designated successor to succeed to the ownership of the
dealer franchise upon the owner's death or incapacity.
(2) Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise, a designated
successor of a deceased or incapacitated owner of a dealer franchise
may succeed to the ownership interest of the owner under the existing
franchise, if:
(a) In the case of a designated successor who meets the definition
of a designated successor under section 2(5) of this act, but who is
not experienced in the business of a new motorsports vehicle dealer,
the person will employ an individual who is qualified and experienced
in the business of a new motorsports vehicle dealer to help manage the
day-to-day operations of the dealership; or in the case of a designated
successor who meets the definition of a designated successor under
section 2(5) (b) or (c) of this act, the person is qualified and
experienced in the business of a new motorsports vehicle dealer and
meets the normal, reasonable, and uniformly applied standards for grant
of an application as a dealer by the manufacturer; and
(b) The designated successor furnishes written notice to the
manufacturer of his or her intention to succeed to the ownership of the
dealership within sixty days after the owner's death or incapacity; and
(c) The designated successor agrees to be bound by all terms and
conditions of the franchise.
(3) The manufacturer may request, and the designated successor
shall promptly provide, such personal and financial information as is
reasonably necessary to determine whether the succession should be
honored.
(4) A manufacturer may refuse to honor the succession to the
ownership of a dealer franchise by a designated successor if the
manufacturer establishes that good cause exists for its refusal to
honor the succession. If the designated successor of a deceased or
incapacitated owner of a dealer franchise fails to meet the
requirements set forth in subsection (2)(a), (b), and (c) of this
section, good cause for refusing to honor the succession is presumed to
exist. If a manufacturer believes that good cause exists for refusing
to honor the succession to the ownership of a dealer franchise by a
designated successor, the manufacturer shall serve written notice on
the designated successor and on the department of its refusal to honor
the succession no earlier than sixty days from the date the notice is
served. The notice must be served not later than sixty days after the
manufacturer's receipt of:
(a) Notice of the designated successor's intent to succeed to the
ownership interest of the dealer's franchise; or
(b) Any personal or financial information requested by the
manufacturer.
(5) The notice in subsection (4) of this section must state the
specific grounds for the refusal to honor the succession. If the
notice of refusal is not timely and properly served, the designated
successor may continue the franchise in full force and effect, subject
to termination only as otherwise provided under this chapter.
(6) Within twenty days after receipt of the notice, or within
twenty days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the
manufacturer, whichever is greater, the designated successor may file
a petition with the department protesting the refusal to honor the
succession. The petition must contain a short statement setting forth
the reasons for the designated successor's protest. Upon the filing of
a protest and the receipt of the filing fee, the department shall
promptly notify the manufacturer that a timely protest has been filed
and shall request the appointment of an administrative law judge under
chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct a hearing. The manufacturer may not
terminate or otherwise discontinue the existing franchise until the
administrative law judge has held a hearing and has determined that
there is good cause for refusing to honor the succession. If an appeal
is taken, the manufacturer may not terminate or discontinue the
franchise until all appeals to a superior court or any appellate court
have been completed. Nothing in this section precludes a manufacturer
or dealer from petitioning the superior court for a stay or other
relief pending judicial review.
(7) The manufacturer has the burden of proof to show that good
cause exists for the refusal to honor the succession.
(8) The administrative law judge shall conduct the hearing and
render a final decision as expeditiously as possible, but in any event
not later than one hundred eighty days after a protest is filed.
(9) The administrative law judge shall conduct a hearing concerning
the refusal to the succession as provided in section 5(2) of this act,
and all hearing costs must be borne as provided in that subsection. A
party to such a hearing aggrieved by the final order of the
administrative law judge may appeal as provided and allowed in section
5(3) of this act.
(10) This section does not preclude the owner of a dealer franchise
from designating any person as his or her successor by a written,
notarized, and witnessed instrument filed with the manufacturer. In
the event of a conflict between this section and such a written
instrument that has not been revoked by written notice from the owner
to the manufacturer, the written instrument governs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 RELEVANT MARKET AREA--NEW OR RELOCATED
DEALERSHIPS, NOTICE OF. Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise and
notwithstanding the terms of a waiver, if a manufacturer intends or
proposes to enter into a franchise to establish an additional dealer or
to relocate an existing dealer within or into a relevant market area in
which the same line make of motorsports vehicle is then represented,
the manufacturer shall provide at least ten days advance written notice
to the department and to each dealer of the same line make in the
relevant market area, of the manufacturer's intention to establish an
additional dealer or to relocate an existing dealer within or into the
relevant market area. The notice must be sent by certified mail to
each such party and include the following information:
(1) The specific location at which the additional or relocated
dealer will be established;
(2) The date on or after which the additional or relocated dealer
intends to commence business at the proposed location;
(3) The identity of all dealers who are franchised to sell the same
line make vehicles as the proposed dealer and who have licensed
locations within the relevant market area;
(4) The names and addresses, if available, of the owners of and
principal investors in the proposed additional or relocated dealership;
and
(5) The specific grounds or reasons for the proposed establishment
of an additional dealer or relocation of an existing dealer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 PROTEST OF NEW OR RELOCATED DEALERSHIP--HEARING--ARBITRATION. (1) Within thirty days after receipt of the
notice under section 12 of this act, or within thirty days after the
end of an appeal procedure provided by the manufacturer, whichever is
greater, a dealer notified or entitled to notice may file a petition
with the department protesting the proposed establishment or
relocation. The petition must contain a short statement setting forth
the reasons for the dealer's objection to the proposed establishment or
relocation. Upon the filing of a protest and the receipt of the filing
fee, the department shall promptly notify the manufacturer that a
timely protest has been filed and shall request the appointment of an
administrative law judge under chapter 34.12 RCW to conduct a hearing.
The manufacturer may not establish or relocate the dealer until the
administrative law judge has held a hearing and administrative
proceeding under the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW,
and has determined that there is good cause for permitting the proposed
establishment or relocation. When more than one protest is filed
against the establishment or relocation of the same dealer, the
administrative law judge shall consolidate the hearings to expedite
disposition of the matter.
(2) If a manufacturer provides in the franchise agreement or by
written statement distributed and provided to its dealers for
arbitration under the Washington Arbitration Act, chapter 7.04 RCW, as
a mechanism for resolving disputes relating to the establishment of an
additional new motorsports vehicle dealer or the relocation of a new
motorsports vehicle dealer, subsection (1) of this section and section
14 of this act will take precedence and the arbitration provision in
the franchise agreement or a written statement is void, unless the
manufacturer and dealer agree to use arbitration.
(3) If the manufacturer and dealer agree to use arbitration, the
dispute must be referred for arbitration to such arbitrator as may be
agreed upon by the parties to the dispute. The thirty-day period for
filing a protest under subsection (1) of this section still applies
except the protesting dealer shall file the protest with the
manufacturer. If the parties cannot agree upon a single arbitrator
within thirty days from the date the protest is filed, the protesting
dealer will select an arbitrator, the manufacturer will select an
arbitrator, and the two arbitrators will then select a third
arbitrator. If a third arbitrator is not agreed upon within thirty
days, any party may apply to the superior court, and the judge of the
superior court having jurisdiction will appoint the third arbitrator.
The protesting dealer will pay the arbitrator selected by him or her,
and the manufacturer will pay the arbitrator it selected. The expense
of the third arbitrator and all other expenses of arbitration will be
shared equally by the parties. Attorneys' fees and fees paid to expert
witnesses are not expenses of arbitration and will be paid by the
person incurring them.
(4) Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise or written statement
of the manufacturer and notwithstanding the terms of a waiver, the
arbitration will take place in this state in the county where the
protesting dealer has its principal place of business. Section 14 of
this act applies to a determination made by the arbitrator or
arbitrators in determining whether good cause exists for permitting the
proposed establishment or relocation of a dealer, and the manufacturer
has the burden of proof to establish that good cause exists for
permitting the proposed establishment or relocation. After a hearing
has been held, the arbitrator or arbitrators shall render a decision as
expeditiously as possible, but in any event not later than one hundred
twenty days from the date the arbitrator or arbitrators are selected or
appointed. The manufacturer may not establish or relocate the new
motorsports vehicle dealer until the arbitration hearing has been held
and the arbitrator or arbitrators have determined that there is good
cause for permitting the proposed establishment or relocation and any
judicial appeals under chapter 7.04 RCW have been completed. The
written decision of the arbitrator is binding upon the parties unless
modified, corrected, or vacated under the Washington Arbitration Act.
Any party may appeal the decision of the arbitrator or arbitrators
under the Washington Arbitration Act, chapter 7.04 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 FACTORS CONSIDERED BY ADMINISTRATIVE LAW
JUDGE. In determining whether good cause exists for permitting the
proposed establishment or relocation of a dealer of the same line make,
the factors that the administrative law judge shall consider must
include, but are not limited to the following:
(1) The extent, nature, and permanency of the investment of both
the existing dealers of the same line make in the relevant market area
and the proposed additional or relocating dealer, including obligations
reasonably incurred by the existing dealers to perform their
obligations under their respective franchises;
(2) The growth or decline in population and new motorsports vehicle
registrations during the past five years in the relevant market area;
(3) The effect on the consuming public;
(4) The effect on the existing dealers in the relevant market area,
including any adverse financial impact;
(5) The reasonably expected or anticipated vehicle market for the
relevant market area, including demographic factors such as age of
population, income, education, size class preference, product
popularity, retail lease transactions, or other factors affecting sales
to consumers in the relevant market area;
(6) Whether it is injurious or beneficial to the public welfare for
an additional dealership to be established;
(7) Whether the dealers of the same line make in the relevant
market area are providing adequate competition and convenient customer
care for the motorsports vehicles of the same line make in the relevant
market area, including the adequacy of motorsports vehicle sales and
service facilities, equipment, supply of vehicle parts, and qualified
service personnel;
(8) Whether the establishment of an additional dealer would
increase competition and be in the public interest;
(9) Whether the manufacturer is motivated principally by good faith
to establish an additional or new dealer and not by noneconomic
considerations;
(10) Whether the manufacturer has denied its existing dealers of
the same line make the opportunity for reasonable growth, market
expansion, or relocation;
(11) Whether the protesting dealer or dealers are in substantial
compliance with their dealer agreements or franchises; and
(12) Whether the manufacturer has complied with the requirements of
sections 12 and 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 HEARING--PROCEDURES, COSTS, APPEAL. (1)
The manufacturer has the burden of proof to establish that good cause
exists for permitting the proposed establishment or relocation.
(2) The administrative law judge shall conduct any hearing as
provided in section 5(2) of this act and all hearing costs will be
borne as provided in that subsection. The administrative law judge
shall render the final decision as expeditiously as possible, but in
any event not later than one hundred twenty days after a protest is
filed. If more than one protest is filed, the one hundred twenty days
commences to run from the date the last protest is filed. A party to
such a hearing aggrieved by the final order of the administrative law
judge may appeal as provided and allowed in section 5(3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 EXCEPTIONS. Sections 12 through 15 of this
act do not apply:
(1) To the sale or transfer of the ownership or assets of an
existing dealer where the transferee proposes to engage in business
representing the same line make at the same location or within two
miles of that location;
(2) To the relocation of an existing dealer within the dealer's
relevant market area, if the relocation is not at a site within eight
miles of any dealer of the same line make;
(3) If the proposed dealer is to be established at or within two
miles of a location at which a former dealer of the same line make had
ceased operating within the previous twenty-four months;
(4) Where the proposed relocation is two miles or less from the
existing location of the relocating dealer; or
(5) Where the proposed relocation is to be further away from all
other existing dealers of the same line make in the relevant market
area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 UNFAIR PRACTICES. (1) Notwithstanding the
terms of a franchise agreement, a manufacturer, distributor, factory
branch, or factory representative, or an agent, officer, parent
company, wholly or partially owned subsidiary, affiliated entity, or
other person controlled by or under common control with a manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative, shall not:
(a) Discriminate between dealers by selling or offering to sell a
like motorsports vehicle to one dealer at a lower actual price than the
actual price offered to another dealer for the same model similarly
equipped;
(b) Discriminate between dealers by selling or offering to sell
parts or accessories to one dealer at a lower actual price than the
actual price offered to another dealer;
(c) Discriminate between dealers by using a promotion plan,
marketing plan, or other similar device that results in a lower actual
price on vehicles, parts, or accessories being charged to one dealer
over another dealer;
(d) Discriminate between dealers by adopting a method, or changing
an existing method, for the allocation, scheduling, or delivery of new
motorsports vehicles, parts, or accessories to its dealers that is not
fair, reasonable, and equitable. Upon the request of a dealer, a
manufacturer shall disclose in writing to the dealer the method by
which new motorsports vehicles, parts, and accessories are allocated,
scheduled, or delivered to its dealers handling the same line or make
of vehicles;
(e) Give preferential treatment to some dealers over others by
refusing or failing to deliver, in reasonable quantities and within a
reasonable time after receipt of an order, to a dealer holding a
franchise for a line or make of motorsports vehicles sold or
distributed by the manufacturer, a new vehicle, parts, or accessories,
if the vehicle, parts, or accessories are being delivered to other
dealers, or require a dealer to purchase unreasonable advertising
displays or other materials, or unreasonably require a dealer to
remodel or renovate existing facilities as a prerequisite to receiving
a model or series of vehicles;
(f) Compete with a dealer by acting in the capacity of a dealer, or
by owning, operating, or controlling, whether directly or indirectly,
a dealership in this state. It is not, however, a violation of this
subsection for:
(i) A manufacturer to own or operate a dealership for a temporary
period, not to exceed two years, during the transition from one owner
of the dealership to another where the dealership was previously owned
by a franchised dealer and is currently for sale to any qualified
independent person at a fair and reasonable price. The temporary
operation may be extended for one twelve-month period on petition of
the temporary operator to the department. The matter will be handled
as an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW. A dealer who is
a franchisee of the petitioning manufacturer or distributor may
intervene and participate in a proceeding under this subsection
(1)(f)(i). The temporary operator has the burden of proof to show
justification for the extension and a good faith effort to sell the
dealership to an independent person at a fair and reasonable price;
(ii) A manufacturer to own or operate a dealership in conjunction
with an independent person in a bona fide business relationship for the
purpose of broadening the diversity of its dealer body and enhancing
opportunities for qualified persons who are part of a group who have
historically been underrepresented in its dealer body, or other
qualified persons who lack the resources to purchase a dealership
outright, and where the independent person (A) has made a significant,
bona fide capital investment in the dealership that is subject to loss;
(B) has an ownership interest in the dealership; and (C) operates the
dealership under a bona fide written agreement with the manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative under which he
or she will acquire all of the ownership interest in the dealership
within a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and
conditions. The manufacturer has the burden of proof of establishing
that the acquisition of the dealership by the independent person was
made within a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and
conditions;
(iii) A manufacturer to own or operate a dealership in conjunction
with an independent person in a bona fide business relationship where
the independent person (A) has made a significant, bona fide capital
investment in the dealership that is subject to loss; (B) has an
ownership interest in the dealership; and (C) operates the dealership
under a bona fide written agreement with the manufacturer under which
he or she will acquire all of the ownership interest in the dealership
within a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and
conditions. The manufacture has the burden of proof of establishing
that the acquisition of the dealership by the independent person was
made within a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and
conditions. The number of dealerships operated under this subsection
(1)(f)(iii) may not exceed four percent rounded up to the nearest whole
number of a manufacturer's total of dealer franchises in this state;
(iv) A manufacturer to own, operate, or control a dealership
trading exclusively in a single line make of the manufacturer if (A)
the manufacturer does not own, directly or indirectly, in the
aggregate, in excess of forty-five percent of the total ownership
interest in the dealership; (B) at the time the manufacturer first
acquires ownership or assumes operation or control of any such
dealership, the distance between any dealership thus owned, operated,
or controlled and the nearest dealership trading in the same line make
of vehicle and in which the manufacturer has no ownership or control
complies with the applicable provisions in the relevant market area
sections of this chapter; (C) all of the manufacturer's franchise
agreements confer rights on the dealer of that line make to develop and
operate within a defined geographic territory or area, as many
dealership facilities as the dealer and the manufacturer agree are
appropriate; and (D) the manufacturer had no more than four new
motorsports vehicle dealers of that manufacturer's line make in this
state, and at least half of those dealers owned and operated two or
more dealership facilities in the geographic territory or area covered
by their franchise agreements with the manufacturer;
(g) Compete with a dealer by owning, operating, or controlling,
whether directly or indirectly, a service facility in this state for
the repair or maintenance of motorsports vehicles under the
manufacturer's new motorsports vehicle warranty and extended warranty.
Nothing in this subsection (1)(g), however, prohibits a manufacturer
from owning or operating a service facility for the purpose of
providing or performing maintenance, repair, or service work on
motorsports vehicles that are owned by the manufacturer;
(h) Use confidential or proprietary information obtained from a
dealer to unfairly compete with the dealer without the prior written
consent of the dealer. For purposes of this subsection (1)(h),
"confidential or proprietary information" means trade secrets as
defined in RCW 19.108.010, business plans, marketing plans or
strategies, customer lists, contracts, sales data, revenues, or other
financial information;
(i) Coerce, threaten, intimidate, or require, either directly or
indirectly, a dealer to accept, buy, or order any motorsports vehicle,
part, or accessory, or any other commodity or service not voluntarily
ordered, or requested, or to buy, order, or pay anything of value for
such items in order to obtain a motorsports vehicle, part, accessory,
or other commodity that has been voluntarily ordered or requested;
(j) Coerce, threaten, intimidate, or require, either directly or
indirectly, a dealer to enter into any agreement that violates this
chapter;
(k) Require a change in capital structure or means of financing for
the dealership if the dealer at all times meets the reasonable,
written, and uniformly applied capital standards determined by the
manufacturer;
(l) Prevent or attempt to prevent a dealer from making reasonable
changes in the capital structure of a dealership or the means by which
the dealership is financed if the dealer meets the reasonable, written,
and uniformly applied capital requirements determined by the
manufacturer;
(m) Unreasonably require the dealer to change the location or
require any substantial alterations to the place of business;
(n) Condition a renewal or extension of the franchise on the
dealer's substantial renovation of the existing place of business or on
the construction, purchase, acquisition, or re-lease of a new place of
business unless written notice is first provided one hundred eighty
days before the date of renewal or extension and the manufacturer
demonstrates the reasonableness of the requested actions. The
manufacturer shall agree to supply the dealer with an adequate quantity
of motorsports vehicles, parts, and accessories to meet the sales level
necessary to support the overhead resulting from substantial
construction, acquisition, or lease of a new place of business;
(o) Coerce, threaten, intimidate, or require, either directly or
indirectly, a dealer to order or accept delivery of a motorsports
vehicle with special features, accessories, or equipment not included
in the list price of the vehicle as advertised by the manufacturer,
except items that have been voluntarily requested or ordered by the
dealer, and except items required by law;
(p) Fail to hold harmless and indemnify a dealer against losses,
including lawsuits and court costs, arising from: (i) The manufacture
or performance of a motorsports vehicle, part, or accessory if the
lawsuit involves representations by the manufacturer on the manufacture
or performance of a motorsports vehicle without negligence on the part
of the dealer; (ii) damage to merchandise in transit where the
manufacturer specifies the carrier; (iii) the manufacturer's failure to
jointly defend product liability suits concerning the motorsports
vehicle, part, or accessory provided to the dealer; or (iv) any other
act performed by the manufacturer;
(q) Unfairly prevent or attempt to prevent a dealer from receiving
reasonable compensation for the value of a motorsports vehicle;
(r) Fail to pay to a dealer, within a reasonable time after receipt
of a valid claim, a payment agreed to be made by the manufacturer on
grounds that a new motorsports vehicle, or a prior year's model, is in
the dealer's inventory at the time of introduction of new model
motorsports vehicles;
(s) Deny a dealer the right of free association with any other
dealer for any lawful purpose;
(t) Charge increased prices without having given written notice to
the dealer at least fifteen days before the effective date of the price
increases;
(u) Permit factory authorized warranty service to be performed upon
motorsports vehicles or accessories by persons other than their
franchised dealers;
(v) Require or coerce a dealer to sell, assign, or transfer a
retail sales installment contract, or require the dealer to act as an
agent for a manufacturer, in the securing of a promissory note, a
security agreement given in connection with the sale of a motorsports
vehicle, or securing of a policy of insurance for a motorsports
vehicle. The manufacturer may not condition delivery of any
motorsports vehicle, parts, or accessories upon the dealer's
assignment, sale, or other transfer of sales installment contracts to
specific finance companies;
(w) Require or coerce a dealer to grant a manufacturer a right of
first refusal or other preference to purchase the dealer's franchise or
place of business, or both.
(2) Subsections (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section do not apply
to sales to a dealer: (a) For resale to a federal, state, or local
government agency; (b) where the motorsports vehicles will be sold or
donated for use in a program of driver's education; (c) where the sale
is made under a manufacturer's bona fide promotional program offering
sales incentives or rebates; (d) where the sale of parts or accessories
is under a manufacturer's bona fide quantity discount program; or (e)
where the sale is made under a manufacturer's bona fide fleet vehicle
discount program. For purposes of this subsection, "fleet" means a
group of fifteen or more new motorsports vehicles purchased or leased
by a dealer at one time under a single purchase or lease agreement for
use as part of a fleet, and where the dealer has been assigned a fleet
identifier code by the department.
(3) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Actual price" means the price to be paid by the dealer less
any incentive paid by the manufacturer, whether paid to the dealer or
the ultimate purchaser of the motorsports vehicle.
(b) "Control" or "controlling" means (i) the possession of, title
to, or control of ten percent or more of the voting equity interest in
a person, whether directly or indirectly through a fiduciary, agent, or
other intermediary, or (ii) the possession, direct or indirect, of the
power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of
a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, through
director control, by contract, or otherwise, except as expressly
provided under the franchise agreement.
(c) "Operate" means to manage a dealership, whether directly or
indirectly.
(d) "Own" or "ownership" means to hold the beneficial ownership of
one percent or more of any class of equity interest in a dealership,
whether the interest is that of a shareholder, partner, limited
liability company member, or otherwise. To hold an ownership interest
means to have possession of, title to, or control of the ownership
interest, whether directly or indirectly through a fiduciary, agent, or
other intermediary.
(4) A violation of this section is deemed to affect the public
interest and constitutes an unlawful and unfair practice under chapter
19.86 RCW. A person aggrieved by an alleged violation of this section
may petition the department to have the matter handled as an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 SALE, TRANSFER, OR EXCHANGE OF FRANCHISE.
(1) Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise, a manufacturer may not
unreasonably withhold consent to the sale, transfer, or exchange of a
franchise to a qualified buyer who meets the normal, reasonable, and
uniformly applied standards established by the manufacturer for the
appointment of a dealer or is capable of being approved by the
department as a dealer in this state. A manufacturer's failure to
respond in writing to a request for consent under this subsection
within sixty days after receipt of a written request on the forms, if
any, generally used by the manufacturer containing the information and
reasonable promises required by a manufacturer, is deemed to be consent
to the request. A manufacturer may request, and, if so requested, the
applicant for a franchise (a) shall promptly provide such personal and
financial information as is reasonably necessary to determine whether
the sale, transfer, or exchange should be approved, and (b) shall agree
to be bound by all reasonable terms and conditions of the franchise.
(2) If a manufacturer refuses to approve the sale, transfer, or
exchange of a franchise, the manufacturer shall serve written notice on
the applicant, the transferring, selling, or exchanging dealer, and the
department, of its refusal to approve the transfer of the franchise no
later than sixty days after the date the manufacturer receives the
written request from the dealer. If the manufacturer has requested
personal or financial information from the applicant under subsection
(1) of this section, the notice must be served not later than sixty
days after the receipt of all of such documents. Service of all
notices under this section must be made by personal service or by
certified mail, return receipt requested.
(3) The notice in subsection (2) of this section must state the
specific grounds for the refusal to approve the sale, transfer, or
exchange of the franchise.
(4) Within twenty days after receipt of the notice of refusal to
approve the sale, transfer, or exchange of the franchise by the
transferring dealer, the dealer may file a petition with the department
to protest the refusal to approve the sale, transfer, or exchange. The
petition must contain a short statement setting forth the reasons for
the dealer's protest. Upon the filing of a protest and the receipt of
the filing fee, the department shall promptly notify the manufacturer
that a timely protest has been filed, and the department shall arrange
for a hearing with an administrative law judge as the presiding officer
to determine if the manufacturer unreasonably withheld consent to the
sale, transfer, or exchange of the franchise.
(5) In determining whether the manufacturer unreasonably withheld
its approval to the sale, transfer, or exchange, the manufacturer has
the burden of proof that it acted reasonably. A manufacturer's refusal
to accept or approve a proposed buyer who otherwise meets the normal,
reasonable, and uniformly applied standards established by the
manufacturer for the appointment of a new dealer, or who otherwise is
capable of operating as a dealer in this state, is presumed to be
unreasonable.
(6) The administrative law judge shall conduct a hearing and render
a final decision as expeditiously as possible, but in any event not
later than one hundred twenty days after a protest is filed. Only the
selling, transferring, or exchanging dealer and the manufacturer may be
parties to the hearing.
(7) The administrative law judge shall conduct any hearing as
provided in section 5(2) of this act, and all hearing costs must be
borne as provided in that subsection. Only the manufacturer and the
selling, transferring, or exchanging dealer may appeal the final order
of the administrative law judge to the superior court or the appellate
court as provided in the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 PETITION AND HEARING FILING FEES, COSTS,
SECURITY. The department shall determine and establish the amount of
the filing fees required in sections 4, 11, 13, and 18 of this act.
The fees must be set in accordance with RCW 43.24.086.
The department may also require the petitioning or protesting party
to give security, in such sum as the department deems proper but not to
exceed one thousand dollars, for the payment of such costs as may be
incurred in conducting the hearing as required under this chapter. The
security may be given in the form of a bond or stipulation or other
undertaking with one or more sureties.
At the conclusion of the hearing, the department shall assess, in
equal shares, each of the parties to the hearing for the cost of
conducting the hearing. Upon receipt of payment of the costs, the
department shall refund and return to the petitioning party any excess
funds initially posted by the party as security for the hearing costs.
If the petitioning party provided security in the form of a bond or
other undertaking with one or more sureties, the bond or other
undertaking will then be exonerated and the surety or sureties under it
discharged.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 DEPARTMENT DEFINING ADDITIONAL MOTORSPORTS
VEHICLES. The department shall determine through rule making under the
Administrative Procedure Act any motorsports vehicles not already
defined in section 2(7) of this act as of the effective date of this
act, that are manufactured after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this chapter
are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 Sections 1 through 22 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 46.94.001 (Short title) and 1985 c 472 s 1;
(2) RCW 46.94.005 (Legislative intent) and 1985 c 472 s 2;
(3) RCW 46.94.010 (Definitions) and 1985 c 472 s 3;
(4) RCW 46.94.020 (Prohibited trade practices) and 1985 c 472 s 4;
(5) RCW 46.94.030 (Succession to business by designated family
member) and 1985 c 472 s 5;
(6) RCW 46.94.040 (Compensation for warranty, delivery, preparation
expenses) and 1985 c 472 s 8;
(7) RCW 46.94.050 (Prohibited financial practices) and 1985 c 472
s 9;
(8) RCW 46.94.060 (Civil remedies) and 1985 c 472 s 10; and
(9) RCW 46.94.900 (Severability -- 1985 c 472) and 1985 c 472 s 14.

--- END ---