BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.60.135 and 1997 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The charter use of Washington State Ferry vessels when
established route operations and normal user requirements are not
disrupted is permissible.
(2) Consistent with the policy as established in subsection (1) of
this section, the ((general manager)) chief executive officer of the
Washington State Ferries may approve agreements for the chartering of
Washington State Ferry vessels to groups or individuals, including
hazardous material transporters, in accordance with the following:
(a) Vessels may be committed to charter only when established route
operation and normal user requirements are not disrupted or
inconvenienced. If a vessel is engaged in the transport of hazardous
materials, the transporter shall pay for all legs necessary to complete
the charter, even if the vessel is simultaneously engaged in an
operational voyage on behalf of Washington State Ferries.
(b) Charter rates for vessels must be established at actual vessel
operating costs plus ((fifty percent of such actual costs rounded to
the nearest fifty dollars)) a market-rate profit margin. Actual vessel
operating costs include, but are not limited to, all labor, fuel, and
vessel maintenance costs incurred due to the charter agreement,
including deadheading and standby.
(c) ((Recognizing the need for stabilized charter rates in order to
encourage use of vessels, rates must be established and revised July
1st of each year and must remain fixed for a one-year period unless
actual vessel operating costs increase five percent or more within that
year, in which case the charter rates must be revised in accordance
with (b) of this subsection.
(d))) All charter agreements must be in writing and substantially
in the form of (((e))) (d) of this subsection and available, with
calculations, for inspection by the legislature and the public.
(((e))) (d) Parties chartering Washington State Ferry vessels shall
comply with all applicable laws, rules, and regulations during the
charter voyage, and failure to so comply is cause for immediate
termination of the charter voyage.

"CHARTER CRUISE AGREEMENT

On this . . . . day of . . . ., . . . ., Washington State Ferries
(WSF) and . . . . ., hereinafter called Lessee, enter into this
agreement for rental of a ferry vessel for the purpose of a charter
voyage to be held on . . . . ., the parties agree as follows:

1. WSF agrees to supply the vessel . . . . . (subject to change)
for the use of the Lessee from the period from . . . . . to . . . . .
on . . . . . (date).

2. The maximum number of passengers; or in the case of hazardous
materials transports, trucks and trailers; that will be accommodated on
the assigned vessel is . . . . .. This number MAY NOT be exceeded.

3. The voyage will originate at . . . . ., and the route of travel
during the voyage will be as follows:
. . . . . . . . . . . .

4. The charge for the above voyage is . . . . . dollars ($. . . )
plus a property damage deposit of $350 for a total price of $. . . . ,
to be paid by cashier's check three working days before the date of the
voyage at the offices of the WSF at Seattle Ferry Terminal, Pier 52,
Seattle, Washington 98104. The Lessee remains responsible for property
damage in excess of $350.

5. WSF is responsible only for the navigational operation of the
chartered ferry and in no way is responsible for directing voyage
activities, providing equipment, or any food service.

6. ((Other than for hazardous materials transport, the voyage
activities must be conducted exclusively on the passenger decks of the
assigned ferry.)) Voyage patrons will not be permitted to enter the
pilot house or the engine room((, nor shall the vehicle decks be used
for any purpose other than loading or unloading of voyage patrons or
hazardous materials)).

7. If the Lessee or any of the voyage patrons will possess or
consume alcoholic beverages aboard the vessel, the Lessee must obtain
the appropriate licenses or permits from the Washington State Liquor
Control Board. The Lessee must furnish copies of any necessary
licenses or permits to WSF at the same time payment for the voyage is
made. Failure to comply with applicable laws, rules, and regulations
of appropriate State and Federal agencies is cause for immediate
termination of the voyage, and WSF shall retain all payments made as
liquidated damages.

8. WSF is not obligated to provide shoreside parking for the
vehicles belonging to voyage patrons.

9. The Lessee recognizes that the primary function of the WSF is
for the cross-Sound transportation of the public and the maintaining of
the existing schedule. The Lessee recognizes therefore the right of
WSF to cancel a voyage commitment without liability to the Lessee due
to unforeseen circumstances or events that require the use of the
chartered vessel on its scheduled route operations. In the event of
such a cancellation, WSF agrees to refund the entire amount of the
charter fee to the Lessee.

10. The Lessee agrees to hold WSF harmless from, and shall process
and defend at its own expense, all claims, demands, or suits at law or
equity, of whatever nature brought against WSF arising in whole or in
part from the performance of provisions of this agreement. This
indemnity provision does not require the Lessee to defend or indemnify
WSF against any action based solely on the alleged negligence of WSF.

11. This writing is the full agreement between the parties.

. . . . . . . . . . . . . WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
Lessee

Sec. 2 RCW 47.60.140 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 4 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department is empowered to operate such ferry system,
including all operations, whether intrastate or international, upon any
route or routes, and toll bridges as a revenue-producing and self-liquidating undertaking. The department has full charge of the
construction, rehabilitation, rebuilding, enlarging, improving,
operation, and maintenance of the ferry system, including toll bridges,
approaches, and roadways incidental thereto that may be authorized by
the department, including the collection of tolls and other charges for
the services and facilities of the undertaking. The department has the
exclusive right to enter into leases and contracts for use and
occupancy by other parties of the concessions and space located on the
ferries, wharves, docks, approaches, parking lots, and landings,
including the selling of commercial advertising space and licenses to
use the Washington State Ferries trademarks, but, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, no such leases or contracts may be
entered into for more than ten years, nor without a competitive
contract process, except as otherwise provided in this section. The
competitive process shall be either an invitation for bids in
accordance with the process established by chapter 43.19 RCW, or a
request for proposals in accordance with the process established by RCW
47.56.030. All revenues from commercial advertising, concessions,
parking, leases, and contracts must be deposited in the Puget Sound
ferry operations account in accordance with RCW 47.60.150.
(2) As part of a joint development agreement under which a public
or private developer constructs or installs improvements on ferry
system property, the department may lease all or part of such property
and improvements to such developers for that period of time, not to
exceed fifty-five years, or not to exceed thirty years for those areas
located within harbor areas, which the department determines is
necessary to allow the developer to make reasonable recovery on its
initial investment. Any lease entered into as provided for in this
subsection that involves state aquatic lands shall conform with the
Washington state Constitution and applicable statutory requirements as
determined by the department of natural resources. That portion of the
lease rate attributable to the state aquatic lands shall be distributed
in the same manner as other lease revenues derived from state aquatic
lands as provided in RCW 79.24.580.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.60.150 and 1999 c 94 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to the provisions of RCW 47.60.326, the schedule of charges
for the services and facilities of the system shall be fixed and
revised from time to time by the commission so that the tolls and other
revenues deposited in the Puget Sound ferry operations account for
maintenance and operation, and all moneys in the Puget Sound capital
construction account available for debt service will yield annual
revenue and income sufficient, after allowance for all operating,
maintenance, and repair expenses to pay the interest and principal and
sinking fund charges for all outstanding revenue bonds, and to create
and maintain a fund for ordinary renewals and replacements: PROVIDED,
That if provision is made by any resolution for the issuance of revenue
bonds for the creation and maintenance of a special fund for
rehabilitating, rebuilding, enlarging, or improving all or any part of
the ferry system then such schedule of tolls and rates of charges shall
be fixed and revised so that the revenue and income will also be
sufficient to comply with such provision.
All income and revenues as collected by the ferry system from any
source shall be paid to the state treasurer for the account of the
department and deposited into the Puget Sound ferry operations account.
Nothing in this section requires tolls on the Hood Canal bridge except
as may be required by any bond covenants.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.60.326 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) In order to maintain an adequate, fair, and economically sound
schedule of charges for the transportation of passengers, vehicles, and
commodities on the Washington state ferries, the department of
transportation each year shall conduct a full review of such charges.
(2) Prior to February 1st of each odd-numbered year the department
shall transmit to the transportation commission a report of its review
together with its recommendations for the revision of a schedule of
charges for the ensuing biennium. The commission on or before July 1st
of that year shall adopt as a rule, in the manner provided by the
Washington administrative procedure act, a schedule of charges for the
Washington state ferries for the ensuing biennium commencing July 1st.
The schedule may initially be adopted as an emergency rule if necessary
to take effect on, or as near as possible to, July 1st.
(3) The department in making its review and formulating
recommendations and the commission in adopting a schedule of charges
may consider any of the following factors:
(a) The amount of subsidy available to the ferry system for
maintenance and operation;
(b) The time and distance of ferry runs;
(c) The maintenance and operation costs for ferry runs with a
proper adjustment for higher costs of operating outmoded or less
efficient equipment;
(d) The efficient distribution of traffic between cross-sound
routes;
(e) The desirability of reasonable commutation rates for persons
using the ferry system to commute daily to work;
(f) The effect of proposed fares in increasing walk-on and
vehicular passenger use;
(g) The effect of proposed fares in promoting all types of ferry
use during nonpeak periods;
(h) The estimated revenues that are projected to be earned by the
ferry system from commercial advertisements, parking, contracts,
leases, and other sources;
(i) Such other factors as prudent managers of a major ferry system
would consider.
(4) If at any time during the biennium it appears that projected
revenues from the Puget Sound ferry operations account and any other
operating subsidy available to the Washington state ferries will be
less than the projected total cost of maintenance and operation of the
Washington state ferries for the biennium, the department shall
forthwith undertake a review of its schedule of charges to ascertain
whether or not the schedule of charges should be revised. The
department shall, upon completion of its review report, submit its
recommendation to the transportation commission which may in its sound
discretion revise the schedule of charges as required to meet necessary
maintenance and operation expenditures of the ferry system for the
biennium or may defer action until the regular annual review and
revision of ferry charges as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(5) The provisions of RCW 47.60.330 relating to public
participation shall apply to the process of revising ferry tolls under
this section.
(6) Under RCW 43.135.055, the transportation commission may
increase ferry tolls included in the schedule of charges adopted under
this section by a percentage that exceeds the fiscal growth factor.
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section and chapter
81.28 RCW, and using sound business judgment, the chief executive
officer of the ferry system may authorize the use of promotional,
discounted, and special event fares to the general public and
commercial enterprises for the purpose of maximizing capacity use and
the revenues collected by the ferry system. The department shall
report to the transportation commission a summary of the promotional,
discounted, and special event fares offered during each fiscal year and
the financial results from these activities.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.60.330 and 1983 c 15 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before a substantial expansion or curtailment in the level of
service provided to ferry users, or a revision in the schedule of ferry
tolls or charges, the department of transportation shall consult with
affected ferry users. The consultation shall be: (a) By public
hearing in affected local communities; (b) by review with the affected
ferry advisory committees pursuant to RCW 47.60.310; (c) by conducting
a survey of affected ferry users; or (d) by any combination of (a)
through (c). Promotional, discount, and special event fares that are
not part of the published schedule of ferry charges or tolls are
exempt. The department shall report an accounting of all exempt
revenues to the transportation commission each fiscal year.
(2) There is created a ferry system productivity council consisting
of a representative of each ferry advisory committee empanelled under
RCW 47.60.310, elected by the members thereof, and two representatives
of employees of the ferry system appointed by mutual agreement of all
of the unions representing ferry employees, which shall meet from time
to time with ferry system management to discuss means of improving
ferry system productivity.
(3) Before increasing ferry tolls the department of transportation
shall consider all possible cost reductions with full public
participation as provided in subsection (1) of this section and,
consistent with public policy, shall consider adapting service levels
equitably on a route-by-route basis to reflect trends in and forecasts
of traffic usage. Forecasts of traffic levels shall be developed by
the bond covenant traffic engineering firm appointed under the
provisions of RCW 47.60.450. Provisions of this section shall not
alter obligations under RCW 47.60.450. Before including any toll
increase in a budget proposal by the commission, the department of
transportation shall consult with affected ferry users in the manner
prescribed in (1)(b) of this section plus the procedure of either (1)
(a) or (c) of this section.

--- END ---