BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that education is the
fundamental building block of a democracy and that education must be
extended to all Washington students in a way that encourages and
supports higher achievement levels and lifelong learning. Education
provides the state's citizens with the capacity, knowledge, and skills
to foster a thriving economy and to provide the foundation for a
harmonious society.
The legislature finds further that a comprehensive, coherent,
integrated, and flexible approach to education from preschool through
college is the best means to be responsive to Washington's needs. The
legislature intends to develop a P-16 governance structure to improve
student flow and raise student achievement through improved
collaboration and coordination across education levels. Components of
Washington's P-16 system should include early care and education
programs, grades kindergarten through ten, and grades eleven through
sixteen, including career and technical education, and adult education.
The system should incorporate clear standards, aligned and rigorous
curricula, effective assessments, clear expectations, and widely shared
responsibilities.

--- END ---