BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.36.310 and 2001 c 241 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin on or after the tenth day before the
primary or election. ((The tabulation of absentee ballots must not
commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election.))
(2) After opening the return envelopes, the county canvassing board
shall place all of the ballots in secure storage until ((after 8:00
p.m. of the day of the primary or election)) tabulation. Absentee
ballots that are to be tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system
may be taken from the inner envelopes and all the normal procedural
steps may be performed to prepare these ballots for tabulation.
Election returns from the count of these ballots must be held in
secrecy, as provided in RCW 29.85.225, until the polls have been closed
on election day.
(3) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the postmark,
statement, and signature on the return envelope that contains the
security envelope and absentee ballot. They shall verify that the
voter's signature on the return envelope is the same as the signature
of that voter in the registration files of the county. For registered
voters casting absentee ballots, the date on the return envelope to
which the voter has attested determines the validity, as to the time of
voting for that absentee ballot if the postmark is missing or is
illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service
voters, the date on the return envelope to which the voter has attested
determines the validity as to the time of voting for that absentee
ballot. For any absentee ballot, a variation between the signature of
the voter on the return envelope and the signature of that voter in the
registration files due to the substitution of initials or the use of
common nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting
are clearly the same.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.54.015 and 1990 c 59 s 53 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Immediately after the close of the polls and the completion of
voting)) On election day, the precinct election officers shall count
the number of voted ballots and make a record of any discrepancy
between this number and the number of voters who signed the poll book
for that precinct or polling place, complete the certifications in the
poll book, and prepare the ballots for transfer to the counting center
if necessary((, and)). Immediately after the close of the polls and
the completion of voting, the precinct election officers shall seal the
voting devices.

Sec. 3 RCW 29.54.018 and 1990 c 59 s 54 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Paper)) Ballots may be tabulated at the precinct polling
place before the closing of the polls under rules adopted by the
secretary of state. The tabulation of ballots, paper or otherwise,
shall be open to the public, but no persons except those employed and
authorized by the county auditor may touch a ballot card or ballot
container or operate vote tallying equipment.
(2) The results of the tabulation of ((paper)) ballots at the polls
shall be delivered to the county auditor as soon as the tabulation is
complete. Election returns from the count of these ballots must be
held in secrecy, as provided in RCW 29.85.225, until the polls have
been closed.

Sec. 4 RCW 29.54.085 and 1999 c 158 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ballots picked up from the precincts during the polling
hours may be counted ((only)) at the counting center before the polls
have closed. Election returns from the count of these ballots must be
held in secrecy until the polls have been closed as provided by RCW
29.54.018.
(2) Upon breaking the seals and opening the ballot containers from
the precincts, all voted ballots shall be manually inspected for
damage, write-in votes, and incorrect or incomplete marks. If it is
found that any ballot is damaged so that it cannot properly be counted
by the vote tallying system, a true duplicate copy shall be made of the
damaged ballot in the presence of witnesses and substituted for the
damaged ballot. All damaged ballots shall be kept by the county
auditor until sixty days after the primary or election.
(3) The returns produced by the vote tallying system, to which have
been added the counts of questioned ballots, write-in votes, and
absentee votes, constitute the official returns of the primary or
election in that county.

Sec. 5 RCW 29.54.097 and 1999 c 158 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
((After the close of the polls,)) Counties employing poll-site
ballot counting devices may telephonically or electronically transmit
the accumulated tally for each device to a central reporting location.
Before making a telephonic or electronic transmission the precinct
election officer must create a printed record of the results of the
election for that poll site. During the canvassing period the results
transmitted telephonically or electronically must be considered
unofficial until a complete reconciliation of the results has been
performed. This reconciliation may be accomplished by a direct loading
of the results from the memory pack into the central accumulator, or a
comparison of the report produced at the poll site on election
((night)) day with the results received by the central accumulating
device.

--- END ---