BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The Washington institute for public
policy, in consultation with the sentencing guidelines commission, the
caseload forecast council, and stakeholders, shall study the
relationship between (a) prison overcrowding and (b) the current state
criminal sentencing structure and sentencing ranges.
(2) The institute shall determine whether any changes could be made
to the current state sentencing structure and sentencing ranges to
reduce prison overcrowding giving great weight to the primary purposes
of the criminal justice system. For purposes of this act, the primary
purposes of the criminal justice system are to:
(a) Ensure that the punishment for a criminal offense is
proportionate to the seriousness of the offense and the offender's
criminal history;
(b) Make frugal use of state and local government resources by
concentrating resources on violent offenders and sex offenders who pose
the greatest risk to our communities;
(c) Promote respect for the law by providing punishment that is
just;
(d) Be commensurate with the punishment imposed on others
committing similar offenses;
(e) Protect the public;
(f) Offer offenders an opportunity to improve themselves; and
(g) Reduce the risk of reoffending by offenders in the community.
(3) The institute shall report its findings to the governor and the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature no later than
January 1, 2004.
(4) For purposes of this section, stakeholders include, but are not
limited to:
(a) The department of corrections;
(b) The indeterminate sentence review board;
(c) Victims' advocates;
(d) Law enforcement;
(e) Prosecutors;
(f) Defense attorneys;
(g) Local governments;
(h) Judges; and
(i) Groups or organizations interested in sentencing reform in
Washington.

--- END ---