BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Eligible regulated real property is exempt from taxation from
regular property tax levies by the state, city or town, and county.
Eligible regulated real property means real property for which the land
value has been reduced by ten percent or more after November 20, 2002,
as a result of regulation under a shoreline master program adopted
under chapter 90.58 RCW or under an amendment to or new comprehensive
plan or development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW. The
exemption continues until the cumulative tax savings due to the
exemption equals or exceeds the reduction in value.
(2) A claim for exemption shall be made and filed on or before
March 31st with the county assessor. The claim for exemption must be
filed within five years of the adoption of the regulation. To
establish the value reduction, the property owner may petition the
county assessor under RCW 84.40.039 or establish the value reduction
through an appraisal report prepared by a state-certified general real
estate appraiser licensed under chapter 18.140 RCW. The value
reduction shall be determined with reference to the value on January
1st of the year in which the regulation under subsection (1) of this
section is adopted.
(3) If the value reduction is established by the assessor, the
owner may petition the county board of equalization for a change in the
value reduction within thirty days of being notified of the assessor's
valuation. If the value reduction is established by an appraisal
report, the state, city or town, or county in which the property is
located may petition the county board of equalization for a change in
the value reduction established in the appraisal report within thirty
days of receiving the appraisal report. Upon review by the county
board of equalization, board of tax appeals, or any court, the value
reduction established by an appraisal report is presumed correct,
however, this presumption is not a defense against any correction
indicated by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.
(4) The assessor shall either approve or deny the exemption and
notify the property owner in writing by August 1st. The property owner
may appeal the assessor's determination under the provisions of RCW
84.48.010.
(5) The levy for a taxing district in any year shall be reduced as
necessary to prevent exemptions under this section from resulting in a
higher tax rate than would have occurred in the absence of the
exemptions under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2004 and thereafter.

--- END ---