BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that ten years
have passed since the state attempted to redefine the relationship with
its institutions of higher education based on trust, evidence, and a
new alignment of responsibilities, as articulated in chapter 363, Laws
of 1993.
(2) However, the legislature also finds that the intent to combine
institutional flexibility and authority to make decisions at the local
level with accountability for achieving statewide goals and objectives
has never been fully achieved, in part because there has not been an
operating mechanism through which to implement this relationship.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to explore opportunities to
create performance contracts between the state and public institutions
of higher education. It is the intent of the legislature that such a
contract would constitute a negotiated agreement between the state and
an institution, where the state's primary interest would lie not in the
management and operations of an institution, but in the institution's
contribution to achieving agreed-upon statewide goals and objectives
for higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A task force on higher education
performance contracts is established. The task force shall consist of
sixteen members, as follows:
(a) Two members from each major caucus of the senate, appointed by
the president of the senate, including members of the higher education
and ways and means committees. The president of the senate shall
appoint one member to serve as cochair of the task force;
(b) Two members from each major caucus of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, including members of the higher education, capital
budget, and appropriations committees. The speaker of the house of
representatives shall appoint one member to serve as cochair of the
task force;
(c) One representative of the higher education coordinating board,
appointed by the board;
(d) One representative of the state board for community and
technical colleges, appointed by the state board;
(e) Two representatives of public four-year institutions of higher
education, appointed by the council of presidents;
(f) Two representatives of the community and technical colleges,
appointed by the Washington administrative council; and
(g) One representative of the governor's office and one
representative of the office of financial management, each appointed by
the governor.
(2) The task force may invite input from other interested parties,
including but not limited to faculty and student representatives and
representatives of the business community. Within available funds, the
task force may obtain additional expertise or engage consultants if
necessary to carry out its work.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Examine the experience of other states in developing and
implementing performance contracts with institutions of higher
education;
(b) Consider the feasibility of implementing performance contracts
in Washington;
(c) Identify whether amendments to current laws may be necessary to
implement performance contracts; and
(d) Develop guidelines and possible models for performance
contracts, including:
(i) The types of indicators and benchmarks that could be included
in a contract to measure an institution's progress in meeting the
contract's objectives; and
(ii) The types of flexibility, exemptions, or commitments that
could be included in a contract to reflect the state's obligation to an
institution.
(4) The task force shall use legislative facilities and staff from
senate committee services and the office of program research. Each
nonlegislative member of the task force shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Travel
expenses for the nonlegislative members shall be paid by their
respective institutions or agencies. All other expenses of the task
force shall be paid jointly by the senate and the house of
representatives.
(5) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the higher education and fiscal committees of the legislature by
December 15, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires June 30, 2004.

--- END ---