BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct a study of public works projects built after
June 9, 1994, under the general contractor/construction manager
procedure authorized by chapter 39.10 RCW. The joint legislative audit
and review committee shall provide an interim report to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature by December 31, 2003, and a
final report, including any findings and recommendations, by December
31, 2004. The study must include:
(a) An analysis of the costs and benefits of using general
contractor/construction manager procedures as opposed to other public
works contracting procedures, including the fiscal impacts. In
conducting this analysis, the committee may consider developing a
sample of public works projects built using these procedures;
(b) An examination of the jurisdictions that used the general
contractor/construction manager procedure for a public works project;
and
(c) An examination of the number, size, and cost of public works
projects built using the general contractor/construction manager
procedure.
(2) Public bodies using the general contractor/construction manager
procedure, or other public works contracting procedures, shall provide
any requested information concerning the selection, design,
contracting, implementation, management, costs, performance, and
outcomes of projects to the joint legislative audit and review
committee in a timely manner, including relevant proprietary
information that may be associated with individual firms. However, any
proprietary information provided to the committee for this study shall
be deemed confidential and is not subject to public disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An independent oversight committee is established to review the
practices and use of the general contractor/construction manager
procedures authorized by this chapter for the contracting of public
works projects. The committee shall consider the reports on general
contractor/construction manager procedures to be issued by the joint
legislative audit and review committee under section 1 of this act.
The committee shall examine the use of general contractor/construction
manager procedures in public works projects built after June 9, 1994,
and consider recommendations for changes to the procedures.
(2) The committee is composed of: Two members of the house of
representatives, one from each major caucus, appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives; two members of the senate, one from
each major caucus, appointed by the president of the senate; a
representative from each of the contracting, subcontracting, and design
industries, appointed by the governor; a representative from an
appropriate labor organization, appointed by the governor; a
representative from a public body authorized to use the alternative
public works contracting procedures under this chapter, appointed by
the governor; a representative from a school district that has used the
general contractor/construction manager contracting procedure to build
a public works project as authorized under RCW 39.10.067, appointed by
the governor; and a representative from the office of financial
management, appointed by the governor. The governor shall consider the
recommendations of the established organizations representing the
contracting, subcontracting, and design industries and organized labor
in making the industry and labor appointments to the committee.
Legislative members of the oversight committee shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members of the oversight committee, except those representing an
employer or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, such reimbursement to be paid jointly
by the senate and the house of representatives.
(3) The committee shall meet quarterly or more often as the
committee deems appropriate, beginning after July 1, 2003. At the
first meeting of the committee, a chair or cochairs must be selected
from among the committee's membership. Staff support for the committee
must be provided by legislative staff.
(4) Public bodies utilizing the general contractor/construction
manager procedure of public works contracting shall provide any
requested information concerning implementation of projects under this
chapter to the committee in a timely manner, excepting any trade
secrets or proprietary information.
(5) The committee shall report to the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature by December 10th of every year concerning
its findings and recommendations.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.10.020 and 2001 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Alternative public works contracting procedure" means the
design-build and the general contractor/construction manager
contracting procedures authorized in RCW 39.10.051 and 39.10.061,
respectively.
(2) "Public body" means the state department of general
administration; the University of Washington; Washington State
University; every city with a population greater than seventy thousand
and any public authority chartered by such city under RCW 35.21.730
through 35.21.755 and specifically authorized as provided in RCW
39.10.120(4); every county with a population greater than ((four)) two
hundred ((fifty)) thousand; every port district with total revenues
greater than fifteen million dollars per year; every public hospital
district with total revenues greater than fifteen million dollars per
year utilizing the design-build procedure authorized by RCW 39.10.051
and every public hospital district, regardless of total revenues,
proposing projects that are considered and approved by the public
hospital district project review board under section 8 of this act;
every public utility district with revenues from energy sales greater
than twenty-three million dollars per year; and those school districts
proposing projects that are considered and approved by the school
district project review board under RCW 39.10.115.
(3) "Public works project" means any work for a public body within
the definition of the term public work in RCW 39.04.010.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.10.051 and 2002 c 46 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and after complying
with RCW 39.10.030, the following public bodies may utilize the design-build procedure of public works contracting for public works projects
authorized under this section: The state department of general
administration; the University of Washington; Washington State
University; every city with a population greater than seventy thousand
and any public authority chartered by such city under RCW 35.21.730
through 35.21.755 and specifically authorized as provided in RCW
39.10.120(4); every county with a population greater than ((four)) two
hundred ((fifty)) thousand; every public utility district with revenues
from energy sales greater than twenty-three million dollars per year;
every public hospital district with total revenues greater than fifteen
million dollars per year; and every port district with total revenues
greater than fifteen million dollars per year. The authority granted
to port districts in this section is in addition to and does not affect
existing contracting authority under RCW 53.08.120 and 53.08.130. For
the purposes of this section, "design-build procedure" means a contract
between a public body and another party in which the party agrees to
both design and build the facility, portion of the facility, or other
item specified in the contract.
(2) Public bodies authorized under this section may utilize the
design-build procedure for public works projects valued over ten
million dollars where:
(a) The construction activities or technologies to be used are
highly specialized and a design-build approach is critical in
developing the construction methodology or implementing the proposed
technology; or
(b) The project design is repetitive in nature and is an incidental
part of the installation or construction; or
(c) Regular interaction with and feedback from facilities users and
operators during design is not critical to an effective facility
design.
(3) Public bodies authorized under this section may also use the
design-build procedure for the following projects that meet the
criteria in subsection (2)(b) and (c) of this section:
(a) The construction or erection of preengineered metal buildings
or prefabricated modular buildings, regardless of cost; or
(b) The construction of new student housing projects valued over
five million dollars.
(4) Contracts for design-build services shall be awarded through a
competitive process utilizing public solicitation of proposals for
design-build services. The public body shall publish at least once in
a legal newspaper of general circulation published in or as near as
possible to that part of the county in which the public work will be
done, a notice of its request for proposals for design-build services
and the availability and location of the request for proposal
documents. The request for proposal documents shall include:
(a) A detailed description of the project including programmatic,
performance, and technical requirements and specifications, functional
and operational elements, minimum and maximum net and gross areas of
any building, and, at the discretion of the public body, preliminary
engineering and architectural drawings;
(b) The reasons for using the design-build procedure;
(c) A description of the qualifications to be required of the
proposer including, but not limited to, submission of the proposer's
accident prevention program;
(d) A description of the process the public body will use to
evaluate qualifications and proposals, including evaluation factors and
the relative weight of factors. Evaluation factors shall include, but
not be limited to: Proposal price; ability of professional personnel;
past performance on similar projects; ability to meet time and budget
requirements; ability to provide a performance and payment bond for the
project; recent, current, and projected work loads of the firm;
location; and the concept of the proposal;
(e) The form of the contract to be awarded;
(f) The amount to be paid to finalists submitting best and final
proposals who are not awarded a design-build contract; and
(g) Other information relevant to the project.
(5) The public body shall establish a committee to evaluate the
proposals based on the factors, weighting, and process identified in
the request for proposals. Based on its evaluation, the public body
shall select not fewer than three nor more than five finalists to
submit best and final proposals. The public body may, in its sole
discretion, reject all proposals. Design-build contracts shall be
awarded using the procedures in (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(a) Best and final proposals shall be evaluated and scored based on
the factors, weighting, and process identified in the initial request
for proposals. The public body may score the proposals using a system
that measures the quality and technical merits of the proposal on a
unit price basis. Final proposals may not be considered if the
proposal cost is greater than the maximum allowable construction cost
identified in the initial request for proposals. The public body shall
initiate negotiations with the firm submitting the highest scored best
and final proposal. If the public body is unable to execute a contract
with the firm submitting the highest scored best and final proposal,
negotiations with that firm may be suspended or terminated and the
public body may proceed to negotiate with the next highest scored firm.
Public bodies shall continue in accordance with this procedure until a
contract agreement is reached or the selection process is terminated.
(b) If the public body determines that all finalists are capable of
producing plans and specifications that adequately meet project
requirements, the public body may award the contract to the firm that
submits the responsive best and final proposal with the lowest price.
(6) The firm awarded the contract shall provide a performance and
payment bond for the contracted amount. The public body shall provide
appropriate honorarium payments to finalists submitting best and final
proposals who are not awarded a design-build contract. Honorarium
payments shall be sufficient to generate meaningful competition among
potential proposers on design-build projects.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.10.061 and 2002 c 46 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and after complying
with RCW 39.10.030, a public body may utilize the general
contractor/construction manager procedure of public works contracting
for public works projects authorized under subsection (2) of this
section. For the purposes of this section, "general
contractor/construction manager" means a firm with which a public body
has selected and negotiated a maximum allowable construction cost to be
guaranteed by the firm, after competitive selection through formal
advertisement and competitive bids, to provide services during the
design phase that may include life-cycle cost design considerations,
value engineering, scheduling, cost estimating, constructability,
alternative construction options for cost savings, and sequencing of
work, and to act as the construction manager and general contractor
during the construction phase.
(2) Except those school districts proposing projects that are
considered and approved by the school district project review board and
those public hospital districts proposing projects that are considered
and approved by the public hospital district project review board,
public bodies authorized under this section may utilize the general
contractor/construction manager procedure for public works projects
valued over ten million dollars where:
(a) Implementation of the project involves complex scheduling
requirements; or
(b) The project involves construction at an existing facility which
must continue to operate during construction; or
(c) The involvement of the general contractor/construction manager
during the design stage is critical to the success of the project.
(3) Public bodies should select general contractor/construction
managers early in the life of public works projects, and in most
situations no later than the completion of schematic design.
(4) Contracts for the services of a general contractor/construction
manager under this section shall be awarded through a competitive
process requiring the public solicitation of proposals for general
contractor/construction manager services. The public solicitation of
proposals shall include: A description of the project, including
programmatic, performance, and technical requirements and
specifications when available; the reasons for using the general
contractor/construction manager procedure; a description of the
qualifications to be required of the proposer, including submission of
the proposer's accident prevention program; a description of the
process the public body will use to evaluate qualifications and
proposals, including evaluation factors and the relative weight of
factors; the form of the contract to be awarded; the estimated maximum
allowable construction cost; and the bid instructions to be used by the
general contractor/construction manager finalists. Evaluation factors
shall include, but not be limited to: Ability of professional
personnel, past performance in negotiated and complex projects, and
ability to meet time and budget requirements; the scope of work the
general contractor/construction manager proposes to self-perform and
its ability to perform it; location; recent, current, and projected
work loads of the firm; and the concept of their proposal. A public
body shall establish a committee to evaluate the proposals. After the
committee has selected the most qualified finalists, these finalists
shall submit final proposals, including sealed bids for the percent
fee, which is the percentage amount to be earned by the general
contractor/construction manager as overhead and profit, on the
estimated maximum allowable construction cost and the fixed amount for
the detailed specified general conditions work. The public body shall
select the firm submitting the highest scored final proposal using the
evaluation factors and the relative weight of factors published in the
public solicitation of proposals.
(5) The maximum allowable construction cost may be negotiated
between the public body and the selected firm after the scope of the
project is adequately determined to establish a guaranteed contract
cost for which the general contractor/construction manager will provide
a performance and payment bond. The guaranteed contract cost includes
the fixed amount for the detailed specified general conditions work,
the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost, the percent fee on
the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost, and sales tax. If
the public body is unable to negotiate a satisfactory maximum allowable
construction cost with the firm selected that the public body
determines to be fair, reasonable, and within the available funds,
negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated and the public
body shall negotiate with the next highest scored firm and continue
until an agreement is reached or the process is terminated. If the
maximum allowable construction cost varies more than fifteen percent
from the bid estimated maximum allowable construction cost due to
requested and approved changes in the scope by the public body, the
percent fee shall be renegotiated.
(6) All subcontract work shall be competitively bid with public bid
openings. When critical to the successful completion of a
subcontractor bid package and after publication of notice of intent to
determine bidder eligibility in a legal newspaper of general
circulation published in or as near as possible to that part of the
county in which the public work will be done at least twenty days
before requesting qualifications from interested subcontract bidders,
the owner and general contractor/construction manager may determine
subcontractor bidding eligibility using the following evaluation
criteria:
(a) Adequate financial resources or the ability to secure such
resources;
(b) History of successful completion of a contract of similar type
and scope;
(c) Project management and project supervision personnel with
experience on similar projects and the availability of such personnel
for the project;
(d) Current and projected workload and the impact the project will
have on the subcontractor's current and projected workload;
(e) Ability to accurately estimate the subcontract bid package
scope of work;
(f) Ability to meet subcontract bid package shop drawing and other
coordination procedures;
(g) Eligibility to receive an award under applicable laws and
regulations; and
(h) Ability to meet subcontract bid package scheduling
requirements.
The owner and general contractor/construction manager shall weigh
the evaluation criteria and determine a minimum acceptable score to be
considered an eligible subcontract bidder.
After publication of notice of intent to determine bidder
eligibility, subcontractors requesting eligibility shall be provided
the evaluation criteria and weighting to be used by the owner and
general contractor/construction manager to determine eligible
subcontract bidders. After the owner and general
contractor/construction manager determine eligible subcontract bidders,
subcontractors requesting eligibility shall be provided the results and
scoring of the subcontract bidder eligibility determination.
Subcontract bid packages shall be awarded to the responsible bidder
submitting the low responsive bid. The requirements of RCW 39.30.060
apply to each subcontract bid package. All subcontractors who bid work
over three hundred thousand dollars shall post a bid bond and all
subcontractors who are awarded a contract over three hundred thousand
dollars shall provide a performance and payment bond for their contract
amount. All other subcontractors shall provide a performance and
payment bond if required by the general contractor/construction
manager. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a
contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or
subsequent call for bids is made for the project. Except as provided
for under subsection (7) of this section, bidding on subcontract work
by the general contractor/construction manager or its subsidiaries is
prohibited. The general contractor/construction manager may negotiate
with the low-responsive bidder in accordance with RCW 39.10.080 or, if
unsuccessful in such negotiations, rebid.
(7) The general contractor/construction manager, or its
subsidiaries, may bid on subcontract work if:
(a) The work within the subcontract bid package is customarily
performed by the general contractor/construction manager;
(b) The bid opening is managed by the public body; and
(c) Notification of the general contractor/construction manager's
intention to bid is included in the public solicitation of bids for the
bid package.
In no event may the value of subcontract work performed by the
general contractor/construction manager exceed thirty percent of the
negotiated maximum allowable construction cost.
(8) A public body may include an incentive clause in any contract
awarded under this section for savings of either time or cost or both
from that originally negotiated. No incentives granted may exceed five
percent of the maximum allowable construction cost. If the project is
completed for less than the agreed upon maximum allowable construction
cost, any savings not otherwise negotiated as part of an incentive
clause shall accrue to the public body. If the project is completed
for more than the agreed upon maximum allowable construction cost,
excepting increases due to any contract change orders approved by the
public body, the additional cost shall be the responsibility of the
general contractor/construction manager.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 39.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the projects authorized in RCW 39.10.061, public
hospital districts may also use the general contractor/construction
manager contracting procedure for the construction of public hospital
district capital demonstration projects, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) The project must receive approval from the public hospital
district project review board established under section 8 of this act.
(b) The public hospital district project review board may not
authorize more than ten demonstration projects valued between five and
ten million dollars.
(2) Public hospital districts may also use the general
contractor/construction manager contracting procedure for the
construction of any public hospital district capital project that has
a value over ten million dollars and that has received approval from
the public hospital district project review board established under
section 8 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.10.067 and 2002 c 46 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the projects authorized in RCW 39.10.061, public
bodies may also use the general contractor/construction manager
contracting procedure for the construction of school district capital
demonstration projects, subject to the following conditions:
(1) The project must receive approval from the school district
project review board established under RCW 39.10.115.
(2) The school district project review board may not authorize more
than ((ten)) twenty demonstration projects valued over five million
dollars, of which ((at least)) no more than two demonstration projects
((must)) may be valued between five and ten million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 39.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The public hospital district project review board is
established to review public hospital district proposals submitted by
public hospital districts to use alternative public works contracting
procedures. The board shall select and approve qualified projects
based upon an evaluation of the information submitted by the public
hospital district under subsection (2) of this section. Any
appointments for full terms or to fill a vacancy shall be made by the
governor and shall include the following representatives, each having
experience with public works or commercial construction: One
representative from the department of health; one representative from
the office of financial management; two representatives from the
construction industry, one of whom works for a construction company
with gross annual revenues of twenty million dollars or less; one
representative from the specialty contracting industry; one
representative from organized labor; one representative from the design
industry; one representative from a public body previously authorized
under this chapter to use an alternative public works contracting
procedure who has experience using such alternative contracting
procedures; one representative from public hospital districts with
total revenues greater than fifteen million dollars per year; and one
representative from public hospital districts with total revenues equal
to or less than fifteen million dollars per year. Each member shall be
appointed for a term of three years, with the first three-year term
commencing after July 27, 2003. Any member of the public hospital
district project review board who is directly affiliated with any
applicant before the board must recuse him or herself from
consideration of the application.
(2) A public hospital district seeking to use alternative
contracting procedures authorized under this chapter pursuant to
section 6 of this act shall file an application with the public
hospital district project review board. The application form shall
require the district to submit a detailed statement of the proposed
project, including the public hospital district's name; the current
projected total budget for the project, including the estimated
construction costs, costs for professional services, equipment and
furnishing costs, off-site costs, contract administration costs, and
other related project costs; the anticipated project design and
construction schedule; a summary of the public hospital district's
construction activity for the preceding six years; and an explanation
of why the public hospital district believes the use of an alternative
contracting procedure is in the public interest and why the public
hospital district is qualified to use an alternative contracting
procedure, including a summary of the relevant experience of the public
hospital district's management team. The applicant shall also provide
in a timely manner any other information concerning implementation of
projects under this chapter requested by the public hospital district
project review board to assist in its consideration.
(3) Any public hospital district whose application is approved by
the public hospital district project review board shall comply with the
public notification and review requirements in RCW 39.10.030.
(4) Any public hospital district whose application is approved by
the public hospital district project review board shall not use as an
evaluation factor whether a contractor submitting a bid for the
approved project has had prior general contractor/construction manager
procedure experience.

Sec. 9 RCW 39.10.902 and 2002 c 46 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2007:
(1) RCW 39.10.010 and 1994 c 132 s 1;
(2) RCW 39.10.020 and 2003 c ... s 3 (section 3 of this act), 2001
c 328 s 1, 2000 c 209 s 1, 1997 c 376 s 1, & 1994 c 132 s 2;
(3) RCW 39.10.030 and 1997 c 376 s 2 & 1994 c 132 s 3;
(4) RCW 39.10.040 and 1994 c 132 s 4;
(5) RCW 39.10.051 and 2003 c ... s 4 (section 4 of this act), 2002
c 46 s 1, & 2001 c 328 s 2;
(6) RCW 39.10.061 and 2003 c ... s 5 (section 5 of this act), 2002
c 46 s 2, & 2001 c 328 s 3;
(7) RCW 39.10.065 and 1997 c 376 s 5;
(8) RCW 39.10.067 and 2003 c ... s 7 (section 7 of this act), 2002
c 46 s 3, & 2000 c 209 s 3;
(9) RCW 39.10.070 and 1994 c 132 s 7;
(10) RCW 39.10.080 and 1994 c 132 s 8;
(11) RCW 39.10.090 and 1994 c 132 s 9;
(12) RCW 39.10.100 and 1994 c 132 s 10;
(13) RCW 39.10.115 and 2001 c 328 s 4 & 2000 c 209 s 4;
(14) RCW 39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13; ((and))
(15) RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14;
(16) RCW 39.10.--- and 2003 c ... s 2 (section 2 of this act);
(17) RCW 39.10.--- and 2003 c ... s 6 (section 6 of this act); and
(18) RCW 39.10.--- and 2003 c ... s 8 (section 8 of this act).

--- END ---