BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.600 and 1995 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College may refund or cancel in
full the tuition and services and activities fees if the student
withdraws from a university or college course or program prior to the
sixth day of instruction of the quarter or semester for which the fees
have been paid or are due. If the student withdraws on or after the
sixth day of instruction, the governing boards may refund or cancel up
to one-half of the fees, provided such withdrawal occurs within the
first thirty calendar days following the beginning of instruction.
However, if a different policy is required by federal law in order for
the institution of higher education to maintain eligibility for federal
funding of programs, the governing board may adopt a refund policy that
meets the minimum requirements of the federal law, and the policy may
treat all students attending the institution in the same manner.
Additionally, if federal law provides that students who receive federal
financial aid must return a larger amount to the federal government
than that refunded by the institution, the governing board may adopt a
refund policy that uses the formula used to calculate the amount
returned to the federal government, and the policy may treat all
students attending the institution in the same manner.
(2) The governing boards of the respective universities and college
may adopt rules for the refund of tuition and fees for courses or
programs that begin after the start of the regular quarter or semester.
(3) The governing boards ((may adopt rules to comply with RCW
28B.15.623 and)) may extend the refund or cancellation period for
students who withdraw for medical reasons or who are called into the
military service of the United States and may refund other fees
pursuant to such rules as they may prescribe.

--- END ---