BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the growing
research literature on proven family preservation and intervention
services can have a positive impact on how these services are funded
and delivered in our communities. This body of research helps to
demonstrate that successful, effective family preservation and
intervention services are cost-effective to the state by measurably
reducing rates of child abuse and neglect, out-of-home placement, re-referrals to child protective services, family conflict, and behavioral
problems in children who are in out-of-home care.
The legislature further finds that while this body of research is
instructive in helping to guide decision making, research is by no
means static. Research should guide, but not limit, innovation within
a local community to best tailor proven prevention and intervention
strategies to the particular needs of that community. The legislature
finds that the state can benefit greatly from the involvement of
individuals who are knowledgeable about research in the field of family
preservation and intervention, as well as individuals who are
knowledgeable about local community needs.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to establish a new,
integrated delivery system for family preservation and intervention
services which assures that both research and community perspectives on
effective prevention and intervention strategies guide program funding
decisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) There is established a family
preservation and intervention services legislative task force. The
task force shall establish a plan for implementing integration of
funding for family preservation and intervention services in the state.
(2) The membership of the task force must include the following:
(a) Individuals with expertise in research on effective family
preservation and intervention services; (b) individuals with expertise
in community-based provision of family preservation and intervention
services; (c) current or former recipients of family preservation and
intervention services; (d) representatives of the Washington state
institute for public policy; and (e) representatives of the department
of social and health services, including regional office
representatives.
(3) The task force shall consist of fifteen members as follows:
(a) Eleven members appointed by the secretary of the department of
social and health services; and
(b) Four members of the legislature, one from each political caucus
of the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives and one from each political caucus of the
senate to be appointed by the president of the senate, each of whom
shall serve as ex officio members of the task force.
(4) The task force shall elect a chair from among its members.
Vacancies in the membership of the task force shall be filled in the
same manner as the original appointments.
(5) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060, such reimbursement to be paid jointly by the senate and the
house of representatives.
(6) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by the house
of representatives office of program research and senate committee
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The family preservation and intervention
services task force shall, at a minimum:
(1) Propose a decision-making structure for the distribution of
funds appropriated for family preservation and intervention services,
which emphasizes community involvement and takes into account regional
differences;
(2) Clearly define a request for proposal process for the
distribution of funds appropriated for family preservation and
intervention services, including a proposal for a system of rating
proposals;
(3) Propose a formula for the equitable, statewide distribution of
funds appropriated for family preservation and intervention services;
(4) Define populations to be served with funds appropriated for
family preservation and intervention services, which must include
families at risk of further involvement with child protective services
and families whose children are at risk of being placed outside the
home or who have already been placed outside the home;
(5) Identify services eligible for funds appropriated for family
preservation and intervention services; and
(6) Determine criteria that programs must meet in order to qualify
for funds appropriated for family preservation and intervention
services, including, at a minimum, identification of: (a) Clear,
measurable outcomes; (b) research that may be applicable; (c)
anticipated cost-effectiveness; (d) broad community involvement,
support, and partnerships; and (e) provision of data related to program
outcomes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The family preservation and intervention
services task force shall report to the governor and the appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the results of its
work no later than December 1, 2003.
(2) The family preservation and intervention task force shall
expire January 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The legislature intends that the department
of social and health services shall implement the results of the work
of the family preservation and intervention services task force in the
2005-2007 biennium.

--- END ---