BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any vehicle dealer who allows a driver to test drive a motor
vehicle without an employee of the vehicle dealer accompanying the
driver shall first require proof that (a) the driver possesses a valid
driver's license in accordance with RCW 46.20.001, and (b) the driver
possesses motor vehicle liability insurance. For the purposes of this
subsection, possession of an insurance identification card required
under RCW 46.30.030 shall be considered proof of motor vehicle
liability insurance. The vehicle dealer shall maintain, on file, a
photocopy of the driver's license and insurance identification card.
(2) If a driver is unable to provide proof under subsection (1) of
this section that he or she possesses motor vehicle liability
insurance, then the vehicle dealer may not allow the driver to test
drive a motor vehicle unless an employee of the vehicle dealer
accompanies the driver.
(3) Any violation of this section is a class 1 civil infraction
under chapter 7.80 RCW.
(4) Nothing in chapter 46.29 or 46.30 RCW, or Title 48 RCW shall be
affected by this section.

--- END ---