BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.050 and 1987 c 109 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, after
June 6, 1945, no withdrawal of public ground waters of the state shall
be begun, nor shall any well or other works for such withdrawal be
constructed, unless an application to appropriate such waters has been
made to the department and a permit has been granted by it as herein
provided((: EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That)).
(2) Each of the following water uses is exempt from the permit
requirements of subsection (1) of this section to the extent that the
water is regularly used beneficially, and the right to use the water
shall be entitled to a right equal to that established by a permit
issued under the provisions of this chapter:
(a) Any withdrawal of public ground waters ((for stock-watering
purposes, or)) for the watering of a lawn or of a noncommercial garden
not exceeding one-half acre in area((, or)); and
(b) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, any
withdrawal of public ground waters in an amount not exceeding five
thousand gallons a day for:
(i) Single or group domestic uses ((in an amount not exceeding five
thousand gallons a day, or for an industrial purpose in an amount not
exceeding five thousand gallons a day, is and shall be exempt from the
provisions of this section, but, to the extent that it is regularly
used beneficially, shall be entitled to a right equal to that
established by a permit issued under the provisions of this chapter:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That));
(ii) Stock watering purposes; or
(iii) An industrial purpose.
(3) However, the department from time to time may require the
person or agency making any such small withdrawal to furnish
information as to the means for and the quantity of that withdrawal((:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)). At the option of the party making
withdrawals of ground waters of the state not exceeding five thousand
gallons per day, applications under this section or declarations under
RCW 90.44.090 may be filed and permits and certificates obtained in the
same manner and under the same requirements as ((is)) provided in this
chapter ((provided)) in the case of withdrawals in excess of five
thousand gallons a day.
(4) Any withdrawal of water for stock watering purposes begun
before the effective date of this section is exempt from the permit
requirements of subsection (1) of this section to the maximum extent
that water was withdrawn for those purposes under the right prior to
the effective date of this section. Beginning on the effective date of
this section, such a withdrawal begun before the effective date of this
section continues to be exempt from the permit requirements of
subsection (1) of this act for that maximum extent.

--- END ---