BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall continue to operate and maintain passenger-only ferry service on existing routes and schedules, at least until
June 30, 2005. By that date, the department shall prepare a report
that includes a series of options to provide ongoing passenger-only
service in the future, including but not limited to the following:
(1) The department would continue to provide the current level of
service on the existing routes;
(2) The department would provide commuter service only on existing
routes;
(3) The department would provide increased service on existing or
new routes.
The report must include a review of operational issues, capital
issues, and funding options for each series of service level options
evaluated. The department shall consult with affected communities and
local, state, and federal agencies in preparing the report.
The department shall submit the report to the legislature by
September 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---