BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of the Washington climate action
registry is to assist entities that voluntarily choose to record their
greenhouse gas emission inventories in order to gain recognition for
emission reductions under any future federal regulatory regime and to
trade emission credits. To that end, the Washington climate and rural
energy development center may:
(1) Provide technical and educational resources to registrants;
(2) Publish basic definitions and protocols and identify
organizations qualified to provide technical assistance to registrants;
(3) Assist registrants, if requested by the registrant, to devise
protocols, reporting formats, and verification procedures as may be
sought by the registrant to ensure the credibility of the information
recorded in the registry; and
(4) Develop protocols for a specific economic sector that apply to
all registrants in that sector if sectorwide protocols are requested by
a registrant of that economic sector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The
definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Center" means the Washington climate and rural energy
development center established in RCW 28B.30.642.
(2) "Direct emissions" are emissions from sources, sinks, and
activities that an entity owns or has direct or effective control over,
such as, but not limited to, on-site combustion and process equipment
emissions.
(3) "Emissions" means the net of release and absorption of
greenhouse gases into or from the ambient air.
(4) "Emissions inventory" means the report of emissions and
normalized emissions for a calendar year.
(5) "Entity" means a for-profit or a nonprofit corporation filing
a separate federal income tax return, a city or county, each state
government department and agency, and all political subdivisions of the
state.
(6) "Greenhouse gases" means those gaseous constituents of the
atmosphere, both natural and anthropogenic, that absorb and emit
radiation at wavelengths within the spectrum of infrared radiation
emitted by the earth's surface, atmosphere, and clouds.
(7) "Normalized emissions" means a ratio of emissions per unit time
divided by a factor such as, but not limited to, revenues,
expenditures, energy use, or production for the same time period and
for the same scope as the emissions.
(8) "Normalized emissions for electrical generation facilities"
means a measurement of emissions based on pounds, or the metric
equivalent of pounds, of emissions per megawatt hour.
(9) "Primary greenhouse gas" means carbon dioxide,
hydrofluorocarbons, methane, nitrous oxide, perfluorocarbons, and
sulfur hexafluoride.
(10) "Registrant" means an entity that has voluntarily filed with
the registry information, notified the center that it intends to record
emissions inventories, and has paid the necessary fees.
(11) "Registry" means the Washington climate action registry.
(12) "Scope" means the sources, sinks, and activities creating
emissions designated by the center.
(13) "Subsidiary" means an entity effectively under the control of
a parent entity, including but not limited to, public and private
nonprofit and for-profit corporations, whose board of directors or
similar managing authority is composed of a majority of persons
appointed by either the legislative or executive authority, or both, of
the parent entity. However, each department and independent agency of
the state and each municipal electric utility may not be considered a
subsidiary of a parent entity for the purpose of this chapter.
"Subsidiary" includes entities that are joint ventures with other
entities with emissions assigned to the parent entities according to
mutual agreement or in the absence of an agreement in proportions
determined by the protocols of the registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The center may establish and maintain
the registry to assist entities that voluntarily register emission
inventories in receiving recognition under any future federal
regulatory scheme relating to greenhouse gases and trading emissions
credits. An entity operating in the state may voluntarily register
with the center and use the services of the center.
(2) The center may: (a) Adopt protocols for defining the scope of
emissions inventories, and for measuring, calculating, reporting, and
verifying emissions, normalized emissions, and emission inventories;
(b) adopt a uniform format for reporting emissions inventories; and (c)
maintain a record of verified emissions inventories submitted by active
registrants.
(3) The center may adopt procedures for delisting registrants and
adopt fees to: (a) Recover any costs necessary to maintain the
registry; (b) develop protocols for a specific economic sector under
section 5 of this act; and (c) provide assistance to registrants.
(4) All records or other information furnished to the registry by
a registrant remain the property of the registrant in perpetuity.
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to affect in any way the right
of privacy and confidentiality of a registrant's records or other
information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A registrant that voluntarily reports
its emission inventories with the center may report emissions for which
it may seek recognition under any future regulatory scheme or for
credit trading.
(2) Except as provided in section 5 of this act, registrants may:
(a) File with the registry as an entity and may report emission
inventories for subsidiaries, individual facilities, or projects, as a
subset of an entity's entire emissions inventory report. A registrant
may separately report emissions inventories for subsidiaries,
facilities, projects, or portions of the entity in other countries, and
it may report emissions inventories for subsidiaries or individual
facilities located in the state or report emissions inventory for its
entire operations. A registrant's scope may include all activities,
sources, and sinks in the state and may include the remainder of the
entity in the United States. A registrant may report verified
emissions inventories for sequential multiple years after January 1,
1990, from facilities or activities outside the entity for which it
claims ownership of the net change in emissions;
(b) Record an emissions inventory by calendar year. Registrants
that have sufficiently complete data for prior years that can be
verified may record emissions inventories for consecutive years before
the first year for which they report, but not before January 1, 1990;
(c) Separately identify within their annual emissions inventories
any rights or ownership to emissions or emissions credits by year, that
have been acquired from or transferred to: (i) Other entities located
within or outside the state; or (ii) within the registrant entity,
including its subsidiaries, to or from locations outside the state that
would not otherwise be included in a registrant's report. An
explanatory note may be included in the registry to prior years' data
when there is a change in the procedures or protocols by which a
registrant's emissions inventories are created. Registrants may record
emissions inventories with separately identified adjustments to report
any change in scope. Registrants may record verified revised emissions
inventories for prior years to conform to current protocols or current
scope. Where the scope of the registrant changes significantly during
the year, the center may record with the registry for the year in which
the scope change occurs an emissions inventory including only the scope
of the prior year and shall add an explanatory note to the record;
(d) Identify and quantify any portion of the emissions inventory
that is being reported to any other registry of greenhouse gas
emissions, any differences between the reports, and the name and
address of the other registry; and
(e) Hire, at their own expense, a third-party organization or
person qualified under this chapter to independently verify and attest
to the accuracy of the emission results reported by the registrant to
the registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If a registrant requests that protocols be
developed for the specific economic sector in which the registrant
files its emissions inventory, the center shall develop protocols for
that specific economic sector. In developing the protocols, the center
must take into consideration input from other potential registrants,
public and private sector interests, and any source necessary to
accomplish the goals of this chapter. Protocols must be developed for
defining the scope of emissions inventories, and for measuring,
calculating, reporting, and verifying emissions, normalized emissions,
and emissions inventories for a specific economic sector. The center
may register and record only those inventories of registrants that
choose to record greenhouse gas emissions inventories using the
protocols developed by the center under this section for a specific
economic sector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The center may develop a procedure for
identifying and qualifying third-party organizations or persons who can
provide registrants competent technical assistance and advice in any or
all of the areas of verifying emission inventories, measuring,
monitoring, and calculating greenhouse gas emissions, and identifying
appropriate emissions reduction targets. The center may limit its
recognition of the organization or person to specific areas of
competency. The center may reopen the qualification process
periodically to enable new organizations and persons to be added to the
list.
(2) All records or other information furnished to or reviewed by a
person under this section remain the property of the registrant in
perpetuity. Nothing in this chapter may be construed to affect in any
way the right of privacy and confidentiality of a registrant's records
or other information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If a mandatory federal greenhouse gas
emissions registry is enacted, the director of the center must report
to the legislature as soon as practical on any conflicts with this
chapter. The center shall certify the date on which a mandatory
federal greenhouse gas registry becomes operational. As of the date
certified by the center, the center may no longer accept emissions
inventories for registration with the state greenhouse gas emissions
registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---