BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.01.012 and 2002 c 5 s 101 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals
for the planning, operation, performance of, and investment in, the
state's transportation system. The policy goals shall consist of, but
not be limited to, the following benchmark categories((, adopted by the
state's Blue Ribbon Commission on Transportation on November 30,
2000)). In addition to improving safety, public investments in
transportation shall support achievement of these and other priority
goals:
No interstate highways, state routes, and local arterials shall be
in poor condition; no bridges shall be structurally deficient, and
safety retrofits shall be performed on those state bridges at the
highest seismic risk levels; ((traffic congestion on urban state
highways shall be significantly reduced and be no worse than the
national mean;)) delay per ((driver)) person, and delay per unit of
goods shall be significantly reduced and no worse than the national
mean; per capita vehicle miles traveled shall be ((maintained at 2000
levels)) significantly reduced; access to goods, services, employment,
and recreation shall be improved; the nonauto share of commuter trips
shall be increased in urban areas; administrative costs as a percentage
of transportation spending shall achieve the most efficient quartile
nationally; and the state's public transit agencies shall achieve the
median cost per vehicle revenue hour of peer transit agencies,
adjusting for the regional cost-of-living.
(2) These policy goals shall be the basis for establishment of
detailed and measurable performance benchmarks.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that the transportation
commission, its successor entity, or any other citizen oversight panel
created by the legislature, shall establish performance measures to
ensure transportation system performance meets the goals established in
subsection (1) of this section at local, regional, and state government
levels, and the transportation commission should work with appropriate
government entities to accomplish this.

--- END ---