BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there have
been strong calls for simplifying the administration of state-purchased
health care programs from health care providers and managed health care
plans that contract with the state. These calls take on even more
importance during a period of budgetary shortfalls when increases in
provider payment rates under state-purchased health care programs will
be minimal at best. In these difficult times, the state should
maximize opportunities to decrease provider and health plan
administrative burdens, and the costs associated with those burdens,
for providers and plans participating in department of social and
health services medical assistance programs, the department of labor
and industries medical aid program, the basic health plan, and the
state employees health benefit program.
(2) The legislature intends that state agency efforts to reduce
administrative burdens on health care providers and managed health care
plans that contract to provide services through state-purchased health
care programs focus upon:
(a) Performing core business functions of state-purchased health
care programs in an efficient and effective manner so as not to
introduce administrative and fiscal burdens on providers and health
plans;
(b) Identifying ways to eliminate operational problems experienced
by providers and managed health care plans;
(c) Clearly defining operational expectations of managed health
care plans;
(d) Following existing industry standards, where applicable, rather
than creating their own; and
(e) Where state-purchased health care programs have similar
functions, carrying out those functions in similar ways.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The administrator of the health care
authority, the assistant secretary for the medical assistance
administration of the department of social and health services, and the
director of the department of labor and industries shall collectively:
(a) Assess each of the strategies in subsection (2) of this
section;
(b) Take steps to implement by December 31, 2004, those strategies
in subsection (2) of this section that are feasible to implement,
taking into consideration fiscal constraints, federal statutory or
regulatory barriers, and state statutory barriers;
(c) To the extent that a strategy in subsection (2) of this section
cannot be implemented by December 2004, identify the specific fiscal
constraints, or the specific federal statutory, federal regulatory, or
state statutory barriers that prevent its implementation; and
(d) On or before December 1, 2003, provide a progress report to the
relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the
activities provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(2) The strategies to be assessed under subsection (1) of this
section include:
(a) Improvement of core services:
(i) Significantly increasing the timeliness of claims payments for
medical assistance programs and the medical aid program;
(ii) Increasing the response times and capacity of the department
of social and health services' provider assistance and claims payments
telephone lines;
(iii) Distributing medical assistance program fee schedules to
avoid time consuming reprocessing of claims;
(iv) With respect to medical assistance program managed care
contracting, clearly defining scope of coverage under managed care
contracts, eliminating conflicts between department of social and
health services billing instructions and managed care contracts, and
developing mechanisms to ensure consistent communication with
contracting health plans when the department of social and health
services is asked to interpret the scope of benefits under the
contracts;
(v) Improving the accuracy and timeliness of medical assistance
eligibility information by reducing the number of retroactive
eligibility termination notices to contracting managed health care
plans;
(b) Streamline current administrative practices:
(i) Maximizing the capacity for electronic billing and claims
submission for medical assistance programs, the medical aid program,
and the basic health plan through modifications such as:
Implementation of electronic claims adjustment forms by the department
of social and health services and the department of labor and
industries; recognition of multiple surgeons on the same medical claim
form for the department of labor and industries medical aid program;
elimination of requirements for paper attachments to claims; and
allowing electronic billing capability for managed care contractors
under medical assistance and the basic health plan; and
(ii) Providing electronic access to eligibility, benefits
exclusion, and authorization information for medical assistance
programs and the department of labor and industries medical aid
program;
(c) Establish clear expectations:
(i) Developing, in rule or through guidelines, clear auditing and
data requirements for contracting managed health care plans under
medical assistance programs, the basic health plan, and state employee
health benefits; and
(ii) Improving consistency between edits in claims processing
systems and published fee schedules for medical assistance programs and
the department of labor and industries medical aid program;
(d) Consistency with national and regional standards:
(i) Eliminating "local" codes wherever possible within the
department of labor and industries medical aid claims processing
system;
(ii) Adopting medicare's ambulatory patient classification system
for outpatient hospital payments under medical assistance and medical
aid programs; and
(iii) Increasing the extent to which the office of the insurance
commissioner, the department of social and health services, and the
health care authority accept compliance with standards adopted by
national managed care accreditation organizations, such as the national
committee for quality assurance, as meeting agency requirements for the
same subject areas covered under accreditation by these organizations;
and
(e) Standardize similarities between agencies:
(i) Using the same denial codes and applying codes consistently
across state-purchased health care programs;
(ii) Eliminating burdensome data collection by having state
agencies collect data that is available from other state agencies
rather than imposing that burden on contracting managed health care
plans;
(iii) Coordinating audits by the department of social and health
services, the department of labor and industries, and the health care
authority; and
(iv) Where state-purchased health care programs cover similar
services, standardizing definitions and interpretations of services.

--- END ---