BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.04.040 and 1999 c 158 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((No paper ballot precinct may contain more than three hundred
active registered voters.)) The county legislative authority may
divide, alter, or combine precincts ((so that,)) whenever
practicable((, over-populated precincts shall contain no more than two
hundred fifty active registered voters in anticipation of future
growth)).
(((2))) Precinct boundaries may be altered at any time as long as
sufficient time exists prior to a given election for the necessary
procedural steps to be honored. Except as permitted under subsection
(((5))) (4) of this section, no precinct boundaries may be changed
during the period starting on the thirtieth day prior to the first day
for candidates to file for the primary election and ending with the day
of the general election.
(((3) Precincts in which voting machines or electronic voting
devices are used may contain as many as nine hundred active registered
voters.))
(2) The number of poll-site ballot counting devices at each polling
place is at the discretion of the auditor. The number of devices must
be adequate to meet the expected voter turnout.
(((4))) (3) On petition of twenty-five or more voters resident more
than ten miles from any polling site, the county legislative authority
shall establish a separate voting precinct therefor.
(((5))) (4) The county auditor shall temporarily adjust precinct
boundaries when a city or town annexes unincorporated territory to the
city or town. The adjustment shall be made as soon as possible after
the approval of the annexation. The temporary adjustment shall be
limited to the minimum changes necessary to accommodate the addition of
the territory to the city or town and shall remain in effect only until
precinct boundary modifications reflecting the annexation are adopted
by the county legislative authority.
The county legislative authority may establish by ordinance a
limitation on the maximum number of active registered voters in each
precinct within its jurisdiction. The limitation may be different for
precincts based upon the method of voting used for such precincts ((and
the number may be less than the number established by law, but in no
case may the number exceed that authorized by law)).
The county legislative authority of each county in the state
hereafter formed shall, at their first session, divide their respective
counties into election precincts ((with two hundred fifty active
registered voters or less)) and establish the boundaries of the
precincts. The county auditor shall thereupon designate the voting
place for each such precinct.
(((6))) (5) In determining the number of active registered voters
for the purposes of this section, persons who are ongoing absentee
voters under RCW ((29.36.013)) 29.36.240 shall not be counted. Nothing
in this subsection may be construed as altering the vote tallying
requirements of RCW 29.62.090.

--- END ---