BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.42.040 and 1990 c 59 s 104 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any member of a major political party who is a registered voter in
the precinct or an adjacent precinct may upon payment of a fee of one
dollar file his or her declaration of candidacy as prescribed under RCW
29.15.010 with the county auditor for the office of precinct committee
officer of his or her party in that precinct. When elected the
precinct committee officer shall serve so long as the committee officer
remains an eligible voter in that precinct and until a successor has
been elected at the next ensuing state general election in the even-numbered year.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.42.050 and 1991 c 363 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
The statutory requirements for filing as a candidate at the
primaries shall apply to candidates for precinct committee officer
except that the filing period for this office alone shall be extended
to and include the Friday immediately following the last day for
political parties to fill vacancies in the ticket as provided by RCW
29.18.150((, and)). One precinct committee officer position will be
designated by number for each five hundred active registered voters and
one additionally designated by position number for every major portion
of five hundred active registered voters in a precinct. For the
purpose of determining the number of precinct committee officer
positions allocated to each precinct, the county auditor shall use the
number of active registered voters resident in the precinct as of
thirty days before the first day for candidates to file a declaration
of candidacy for public office in even-numbered years. The office
shall not be voted upon at the primaries, but the names of all
candidates must appear under the proper party, position number, and
office designations on the ballot for the general November election for
each even-numbered year, and the one receiving the highest number of
votes in each designated position shall be declared elected: PROVIDED,
That to be declared elected, a candidate must receive at least ((ten))
two percent of the number of votes cast for the candidate of the
candidate's party receiving the greatest number of votes in the
precinct. Any person elected to the office of precinct committee
officer who has not filed a declaration of candidacy shall pay the fee
of one dollar to the county auditor for a certificate of election. The
term of office of precinct committee officer shall be for two years,
commencing upon completion of the official canvass of votes by the
county canvassing board of election returns. Should any vacancy occur
in this office by reason of death, resignation, or disqualification of
the incumbent, or because of failure to elect, the respective county
chair of the county central committee shall be empowered to fill such
vacancy by appointment: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in legislative
districts having a majority of its precincts in a county with a
population of one million or more, such appointment shall be made only
upon the recommendation of the legislative district chair: PROVIDED,
That the person so appointed shall have the same qualifications as
candidates when filing for election to such office for such precinct:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That when a vacancy in the office of precinct
committee officer exists because of failure to elect at a state general
election, such vacancy shall not be filled until after the organization
meeting of the county central committee and the new county chair
selected as provided by RCW 29.42.030.

--- END ---