BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Reports from state agencies to the legislature shall be provided in
an electronic format to the chief clerk of the house of representatives
and the secretary of the senate. The chief clerk of the house of
representatives and the secretary of the senate shall provide an online
site for reports submitted to the legislature on the legislative
internet home page. The reports shall be organized in such a way as to
make the reports easy to find and accessible by legislators, staff, and
the public.
Upon submitting required reports to the legislature electronically,
the agency shall send a letter to the appropriate legislative committee
that the report has been filed electronically with the chief clerk of
the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate to be made
available on the legislative internet home page. The letter may also
include a brief summary of the report. The agency may make hard copies
available by request.

--- END ---