BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.32.010 and 1985 c 469 s 62 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of the city or town having control of
any public street or road, or, where the street or road is not within
the limits of any incorporated city or town, then the county
legislative authority of the county wherein the road or street is
situated, may grant authority for the construction, maintenance and
operation of transmission lines for transmitting electric power,
together with poles, wires and other appurtenances, upon, over, along
and across any such public street or road, and in granting this
authority the legislative authority of the city or town, or the county
legislative authority, as the case may be, may prescribe the terms and
conditions on which the transmission line and its appurtenances, shall
be constructed, maintained and operated upon, over, along and across
the road or street, and the grade or elevation at which the same shall
be constructed, maintained and operated: PROVIDED, That on application
being made to the county legislative authority for such authority, the
county legislative authority shall fix a time and place for hearing the
same, and shall cause the county auditor to give public notice thereof
at the expense of the applicant, by posting written or printed notices
in three public places in the county seat of the county, and in at
least one conspicuous place on the road or street or part thereof, for
which application is made, at least fifteen days before the day fixed
for such hearing, and by publishing a like notice once a week for two
consecutive weeks in the official county newspaper, the last
publication to be at least five days before the day fixed for the
hearing, which notice shall state the name or names of the applicant or
applicants, a description of the roads or streets or parts thereof for
which the application is made, and the time and place fixed for the
hearing. The hearing may be adjourned from time to time by order of
the county legislative authority. If after such hearing the county
legislative authority shall deem it to be for the public interest to
grant the authority in whole or in part, it may make and enter the
proper order granting the authority applied for or such part thereof as
it deems to be for the public interest, and shall require the
transmission line and its appurtenances to be placed in such location
on or along the road or street as it finds will cause the least
interference with other uses of the road or street. In case any such
transmission line is or shall be located in part on private right of
way, the owner thereof shall have the right to construct and operate
the same across any county road or county street which intersects the
private right of way, if the crossing is so constructed and maintained
as to do no unnecessary damage: PROVIDED, That any person or
corporation constructing the crossing or operating the transmission
line on or along the county road or county street shall be liable to
the county for all necessary expense incurred in restoring the county
road or county street to a suitable condition for travel.
(2)(a) In addition to the authority in subsection (1) of this
section, where two or more electric utilities, as defined in RCW
19.29A.010(12), operate within a contiguous or overlapping geographic
area, a city, town, or county legislative authority may require an
agreement between the electric utilities to discourage and reduce the
duplication of transmission lines and other appurtenances and to carry
out the policy in RCW 54.48.020.
(b) The agreement must be filed with the city, town, or county that
requires the agreement and the city, town, or county must approve the
agreement by adopting an ordinance.
(c) This subsection shall not apply to an electric utility's
transmission lines or other appurtenances in place prior to the
effective date of this act. Any addition to or expansion of
transmission lines and appurtenances existing after the effective date
of this act are subject to this subsection.

--- END ---