BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the liquor control board has developed
a retail services business plan to provide greater efficiency of
operations and to maximize revenues to the state. The legislature
intends to examine whether expanding liquor store operations to include
Sundays would provide additional revenue and provide increased customer
convenience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall devise a retail business plan, or amend an existing
retail business plan, to implement strategies to improve the efficiency
of retail sales operations and maximize revenue-generating
opportunities. Strategies to be implemented shall include, but are not
limited to:
(1) Expanding store operations to include Sunday sales in selected
liquor stores until July 1, 2007. Sunday sales are optional for liquor
vendors operating agency stores until July 1, 2007;
(2) Implementing a plan of in-store liquor merchandising, including
point-of-sale advertising, and product specific point-of-sale
promotional displays and carousels, including displays designed and
provided by vendors; and
(3) Implementing a plan for in-store liquor merchandising of
brands. The plan may not include provisions for selling liquor-related
items other than those items previously authorized.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
By September 1, 2004, the board shall implement a pilot program to
expand operations in at least twenty state-operated retail stores to
include Sundays. The board shall select at least sixteen of the stores
to participate in the pilot program based on a regional area determined
by the board, and at least four additional stores in major metropolitan
areas. The four additional stores in major metropolitan areas will be
chosen, insofar as is possible, based on what stores are expected to
gross the most revenues on Sunday by considering factors including, but
not limited to, population density, proximity to shopping centers, and
proximity to other businesses that are open on Sunday. In implementing
this program, if the board determines it would be beneficial to retain
a consultant to assist the board in determining appropriate stores for
the pilot program and monitoring the results of the program, the agency
is authorized to do so. The selected stores shall be open for retail
business a minimum of five hours on Sunday. The board shall track
gross sales and expenses of the selected stores and compare them to
previous years' sales and projected sales and expenses before opening
on Sunday. The board shall also examine the sales of state and
contract liquor stores in proximity to those stores opened on Sundays
to determine whether Sunday openings has reduced the sales of other
state and contract liquor stores that are not open on Sundays. The
board shall present this information to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2006.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.08.060 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 43 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall not advertise liquor in any form or through any
medium whatsoever.
(2) In-store liquor merchandising is not advertising for the
purposes of this section.
(3) The board shall have power to adopt any and all reasonable
((regulations)) rules as to the kind, character, and location of
advertising of liquor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before the board determines which state liquor stores will be
open on Sundays, it shall give: (a) Due consideration to the location
of the liquor store with respect to the proximity of places of worship,
schools, and public institutions; and (b) written notice by certified
mail of the proposed Sunday opening, including proposed Sunday opening
hours, to places of worship, schools, and public institutions within
five hundred feet of the liquor store proposed to be open on Sunday.
(2) Before permitting an agency vendor liquor store to open for
business on Sunday, the board must meet the due consideration and
written notice requirements established in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) The board may not open a state-operated liquor store on Sundays
if the state-operated liquor store is within five hundred feet of the
premises of any tax-supported public elementary or secondary school
measured along the most direct route over or across established public
walks, streets, or other public passageway from the outer property line
of the school grounds to the nearest public entrance of the state-operated liquor store, and if, after receipt by the school or public
institution of the notice as provided in subsection (1) of this
section, the board receives written notice, within twenty days after
posting such notice, from an official representative or representatives
of the school within five hundred feet of the state-operated liquor
store, indicating to the board that there is an objection to the Sunday
opening because of proximity to a school.
(4) For the purpose of this section, "place of worship" means a
building erected for and used exclusively for religious worship and
schooling or other related religious activity.
(5) It is the intent under this section that no state-operated
liquor store be opened on Sunday where doing so would, in the judgment
of the board, adversely affect a private school meeting the
requirements for private schools under Title 28A RCW and is within five
hundred feet of the proposed licensee. The board shall fully consider
and give substantial weight to objections filed by private schools. If
a state-operated liquor store is opened on Sundays despite the
proximity of a private school, the board shall state in a letter
addressed to the private school the board's reasons for opening the
store on Sundays.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.08.030 and 2002 c 119 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of this
title according to their true intent or of supplying any deficiency
therein, the board may make such ((regulations)) rules not inconsistent
with the spirit of this title as are deemed necessary or advisable.
All ((regulations so made)) rules shall be a public record and shall be
filed in the office of the code reviser, and ((thereupon)) shall have
the same force and effect as if incorporated in this title. ((Such
regulations)) These rules, together with a copy of this title, shall be
published in pamphlets and shall be distributed as directed by the
board.
(2) Without ((thereby)) limiting the generality of the provisions
contained in subsection (1) of this section, it is declared that the
power of the board to make ((regulations)) rules in the manner set out
in that subsection shall extend to:
(a) Regulating the equipment and management of stores and
warehouses in which state liquor is sold or kept, and prescribing the
books and records to be kept therein and the reports to be made thereon
to the board;
(b) Prescribing the duties of the employees of the board, and
regulating their conduct in the discharge of their duties;
(c) Governing the purchase of liquor by the state and the
furnishing of liquor to stores established under this title;
(d) Determining the classes, varieties, and brands of liquor to be
kept for sale at any store;
(e) Prescribing, subject to ((RCW 66.16.080)) section 8 of this
act, the hours during which the state liquor stores shall be kept open
for the sale of liquor;
(f) Providing for the issuing and distributing of price lists
showing the price to be paid by purchasers for each variety of liquor
kept for sale under this title;
(g) Prescribing an official seal and official labels and stamps and
determining the manner in which they shall be attached to every package
of liquor sold or sealed under this title, including the prescribing of
different official seals or different official labels for different
classes of liquor;
(h) Providing for the payment by the board in whole or in part of
the carrying charges on liquor shipped by freight or express;
(i) Prescribing forms to be used for purposes of this title or the
((regulations)) rules, and the terms and conditions to be contained in
permits and licenses issued under this title, and the qualifications
for receiving a permit or license issued under this title, including a
criminal history record information check. The board may submit the
criminal history record information check to the Washington state
patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of
investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for
prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who
filled out the forms. The board shall require fingerprinting of any
applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted
to the federal bureau of investigation;
(j) Prescribing the fees payable in respect of permits and licenses
issued under this title for which no fees are prescribed in this title,
and prescribing the fees for anything done or permitted to be done
under the ((regulations)) rules;
(k) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor which may be
kept on hand by the holder of a special permit for the purposes named
in the permit, regulating the manner in which the same shall be kept
and disposed of, and providing for the inspection of the same at any
time at the instance of the board;
(l) Regulating the sale of liquor kept by the holders of licenses
which entitle the holder to purchase and keep liquor for sale;
(m) Prescribing the records of purchases or sales of liquor kept by
the holders of licenses, and the reports to be made thereon to the
board, and providing for inspection of the records so kept;
(n) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor for which a
prescription may be given, and the number of prescriptions which may be
given to the same patient within a stated period;
(o) Prescribing the manner of giving and serving notices required
by this title or the ((regulations)) rules, where not otherwise
provided for in this title;
(p) Regulating premises in which liquor is kept for export from the
state, or from which liquor is exported, prescribing the books and
records to be kept therein and the reports to be made thereon to the
board, and providing for the inspection of the premises and the books,
records and the liquor so kept;
(q) Prescribing the conditions and qualifications requisite for the
obtaining of club licenses and the books and records to be kept and the
returns to be made by clubs, prescribing the manner of licensing clubs
in any municipality or other locality, and providing for the inspection
of clubs;
(r) Prescribing the conditions, accommodations, and qualifications
requisite for the obtaining of licenses to sell beer and wines, and
regulating the sale of beer and wines ((thereunder));
(s) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the
manner, methods, and means by which manufacturers shall deliver liquor
within the state; and the time and periods when, and the manner,
methods, and means by which liquor may lawfully be conveyed or carried
within the state;
(t) Providing for the making of returns by brewers of their sales
of beer shipped within the state, or from the state, showing the gross
amount of ((such)) the sales and providing for the inspection of
brewers' books and records, and for the checking of the accuracy of any
((such)) returns;
(u) Providing for the making of returns by the wholesalers of beer
whose breweries are located beyond the boundaries of the state;
(v) Providing for the making of returns by any other liquor
manufacturers, showing the gross amount of liquor produced or
purchased, the amount sold within and exported from the state, and to
whom so sold or exported, and providing for the inspection of the
premises of any ((such)) liquor manufacturers, their books and records,
and for the checking of any ((such)) return;
(w) Providing for the giving of fidelity bonds by any or all of the
employees of the board((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the premiums
((therefor)) shall be paid by the board;
(x) Providing for the shipment by mail or common carrier of liquor
to any person holding a permit and residing in any unit which has, by
election pursuant to this title, prohibited the sale of liquor therein;
(y) Prescribing methods of manufacture, conditions of sanitation,
standards of ingredients, quality and identity of alcoholic beverages
manufactured, sold, bottled, or handled by licensees and the board; and
conducting from time to time, in the interest of the public health and
general welfare, scientific studies and research relating to alcoholic
beverages and the use and effect thereof;
(z) Seizing, confiscating, and destroying all alcoholic beverages
manufactured, sold, or offered for sale within this state which do not
conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this title or
the ((regulations)) rules of the board((: PROVIDED, Nothing herein
contained shall be construed as authorizing)). The liquor board ((to))
may not prescribe, alter, limit, or in any way change the present law
as to the quantity or percentage of alcohol used in the manufacturing
of wine or other alcoholic beverages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 66.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Employees in state liquor stores, including agency vendor liquor
stores, may not be required to work on their Sabbath if doing so would
violate their religious beliefs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 66.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2007, no sale or delivery of liquor shall be made
on or from the premises of any state liquor store, nor shall any store
be open for the sale of liquor, on Sunday, unless the board determines
that unique circumstances exist which necessitate Sunday liquor sales
by vendors appointed under RCW 66.08.050(2) of products of their own
manufacture, not to exceed one case of liquor per customer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 66.16.080 (Sunday closing) and 1988 c
101 s 1 & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 11 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---