BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Nonoriginal equipment manufacturer crash part" means a
replacement for any of the nonmechanical sheet metal or plastic parts
that generally constitute the exterior of a motor vehicle, including
inner and outer panels, that was not made for or by the manufacturer of
that motor vehicle.
(b) "Original equipment manufacturer crash part" means a
replacement part for any of the nonmechanical sheet metal or plastic
parts that generally constitute the exterior of a motor vehicle,
including inner and outer panels, that was manufactured by or for the
original manufacturer of that motor vehicle.
(2) No insurance company may require the use of nonoriginal
equipment manufacturer crash parts in the repair of a motor vehicle for
a period of five years running from the year the motor vehicle was
manufactured or while the vehicle is under manufacturer's warranty
unless the motor vehicle owner consents in writing at the time of the
repair. If the motor vehicle owner consents to the use of nonoriginal
equipment manufacturer crash parts, the insurer must specify on the
repair estimate which parts are original equipment manufacturer crash
parts and which parts are nonoriginal equipment manufacturer crash
parts and must include with the estimate a disclosure document
containing the following information in no smaller than twelve-point
type:

THIS ESTIMATE IS BASED UPON THE USE OF NONORIGINAL
EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER CRASH PARTS THAT WERE MANUFACTURED
NEITHER BY THE ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER OR THE MOTOR VEHICLE NOR
BY A MANUFACTURER AUTHORIZED BY THE ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER OF
THE VEHICLE TO USE ITS NAME OR TRADEMARK. THE USE OF A
NONORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER CRASH PART INVALIDATES ANY
REMAINING WARRANTY OF THE ORIGINAL PART IT REPLACES. THE ONLY
WARRANTIES, IF ANY, COVERING NONORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER
CRASH PARTS ARE THOSE THAT MAY BE MADE BY THE MANUFACTURER OR
DISTRIBUTOR OF THOSE PARTS.

I UNDERSTAND THAT MY VEHICLE WILL BE REPAIRED USING
NONORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER CRASH PARTS AS SPECIFIED IN
THE REPAIR ESTIMATE, AND I AUTHORIZE THE REPAIR FACILITY TO
INSTALL THOSE SPECIFIED PARTS.

. . . . . . . . . . . .

CUSTOMER SIGNATURE DATE

--- END ---