BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) There is established an oversight
committee to review the mission and purpose of the state board for
volunteer fire fighters and reserve officers authorized under chapter
41.24 RCW and report back to the legislature on their findings and
recommendations. The membership of the committee shall include:
(a) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each
major caucus, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(b) Two members of the senate, one from each major caucus,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) One representative of fire chiefs, appointed by the governor;
(d) One representative of fire commissioners, appointed by the
governor;
(e) One volunteer fire fighter, appointed by the governor;
(f) One full-time, paid, career fire fighter, appointed by the
governor;
(g) One representative from the state board for volunteer fire
fighters and reserve officers, appointed by the state board; and
(h) One representative from the association of Washington cities,
appointed by the association of Washington cities.
(2) The committee shall meet quarterly or more often as the
committee deems appropriate, beginning after July 1, 2003. At the
first meeting of the committee, a chair or cochairs shall be selected
from among the committee's membership. Staff support for the committee
shall be provided by the state board for volunteer fire fighters and
reserve officers.
(3) The committee shall evaluate the mission of the state board for
volunteer fire fighters and reserve officers as it relates to:
(a) Recruitment and retention of volunteer fire fighters;
(b) Flexibility of incentives by region;
(c) The pension program for volunteer fire fighters as it relates
to retention;
(d) The current and future needs of volunteer fire fighters; and
(e) The costs and benefits of various benefit programs.
(4) Municipal corporations that maintain a regularly organized fire
department shall provide any information requested by the oversight
committee in a timely manner.
(5) The committee shall report to the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature by January 31, 2004, concerning its
findings and recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act expires December 31,
2004.

--- END ---