BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that rural communities
across Washington state have been unable to provide sufficient economic
development to sustain the rural lifestyle. The legislature recognizes
that residential development is appropriate in limited areas of more
intense rural development and in planned resort communities.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.070 and 2002 c 212 s 2 and 2002 c 154 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps,
and descriptive text covering objectives, principles, and standards
used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an
internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent
with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted
and amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140.
Each comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for
each of the following:
(1) A land use element designating the proposed general
distribution and general location and extent of the uses of land, where
appropriate, for agriculture, timber production, housing, commerce,
industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation airports, public
utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land use
element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall
provide for protection of the quality and quantity of ground water used
for public water supplies. Where applicable, the land use element
shall review drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area
and nearby jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to
mitigate or cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state,
including Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.
(2) A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of
established residential neighborhoods that: (a) Includes an inventory
and analysis of existing and projected housing needs that identifies
the number of housing units necessary to manage projected growth; (b)
includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of
housing, including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient
land for housing, including, but not limited to, government-assisted
housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured housing,
multifamily housing, and group homes and foster care facilities; and
(d) makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all
economic segments of the community.
(3) A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An
inventory of existing capital facilities owned by public entities,
showing the locations and capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a
forecast of the future needs for such capital facilities; (c) the
proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new capital
facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital
facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies
sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to
reassess the land use element if probable funding falls short of
meeting existing needs and to ensure that the land use element, capital
facilities plan element, and financing plan within the capital
facilities plan element are coordinated and consistent. Park and
recreation facilities shall be included in the capital facilities plan
element.
(4) A utilities element consisting of the general location,
proposed location, and capacity of all existing and proposed utilities,
including, but not limited to, electrical lines, telecommunication
lines, and natural gas lines.
(5) Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element
including lands that are not designated for urban growth, agriculture,
forest, or mineral resources. The following provisions shall apply to
the rural element:
(a) Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because
circumstances vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of
rural densities and uses, a county may consider local circumstances,
but shall develop a written record explaining how the rural element
harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.
(b) Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural
development, forestry, and agriculture in rural areas. The rural
element shall provide for a variety of rural densities, uses, essential
public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to serve the
permitted densities and uses. In order to achieve a variety of rural
densities and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density
transfer, design guidelines, conservation easements, and other
innovative techniques that will accommodate appropriate rural densities
and uses that are not characterized by urban growth and that are
consistent with rural character.
(c) Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall
include measures that apply to rural development and protect the rural
character of the area, as established by the county, by:
(i) Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;
(ii) Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the
surrounding rural area;
(iii) Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development in the rural area;
(iv) Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and
surface water and ground water resources; and
(v) Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural,
forest, and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
(d) Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to
the requirements of this subsection and except as otherwise
specifically provided in this subsection (5)(d), the rural element may
allow for limited areas of more intensive rural development, including
necessary public facilities and public services to serve the limited
area as follows:
(i) Rural development consisting of the infill, development of new
areas not associated with existing already intensely developed areas,
or redevelopment of existing commercial, industrial, residential, or
mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline development,
villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads developments.
A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use area
shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this subsection, but
shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and (iii) of this
subsection. An industrial area is not required to be principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population;
(ii) The intensification of development on lots containing, or new
development of, small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including
commercial facilities to serve those recreational or tourist uses, that
rely on a rural location and setting, but that ((do not)) include new
associated short-term visitor accommodations and permanent residential
((development)) use. A small-scale recreation or tourist use is not
required to be principally designed to serve the existing and projected
rural population. Public services and public facilities shall be
limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or tourist use and
the allowed residential use and shall be provided in a manner that does
not permit low-density sprawl;
(iii) The intensification of development on lots containing
isolated nonresidential uses or new development of isolated cottage
industries and isolated small-scale businesses that are not principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population and
nonresidential uses, but do provide job opportunities for rural
residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion of small-scale
businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with the
rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(14). Rural counties may also allow new
small-scale businesses to utilize a site previously occupied by an
existing business as long as the new small-scale business conforms to
the rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(14). Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated
nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does not
permit low-density sprawl;
(iv) A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the
existing areas or uses of more intensive rural development, as
appropriate, authorized under this subsection. Lands included in such
existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the logical outer
boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new pattern of
low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary
delineated predominately by the built environment, but that may also
include undeveloped lands if limited as provided in this subsection.
The county shall establish the logical outer boundary of an area of
more intensive rural development. In establishing the logical outer
boundary the county shall address (A) the need to preserve the
character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities, (B)
physical boundaries such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and
land forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular
boundaries, and (D) the ability to provide public facilities and public
services in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;
(v) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or
existing use is one that was in existence:
(A) On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to
plan under all of the provisions of this chapter;
(B) On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW
36.70A.040(2), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions
of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2); or
(C) On the date the office of financial management certifies the
county's population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that
is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040(5).
(e) Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit
in the rural area a major industrial development or a master planned
resort unless otherwise specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and
36.70A.365.
(6) A transportation element that implements, and is consistent
with, the land use element.
(a) The transportation element shall include the following
subelements:
(i) Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;
(ii) Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation
facilities resulting from land use assumptions to assist the department
of transportation in monitoring the performance of state facilities, to
plan improvements for the facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation facilities;
(iii) Facilities and services needs, including:
(A) An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation
facilities and services, including transit alignments and general
aviation airport facilities, to define existing capital facilities and
travel levels as a basis for future planning. This inventory must
include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or
county's jurisdiction boundaries;
(B) Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and
transit routes to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system.
These standards should be regionally coordinated;
(C) For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service
standards for highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW,
to gauge the performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting
level of service standards for state highways in the local
comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the system, to
evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination between
the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the department of transportation's six-year investment program. The
concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply to
transportation facilities and services of statewide significance except
for counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the
mainland are state highways or ferry routes. In these island counties,
state highways and ferry route capacity must be a factor in meeting the
concurrency requirements in (b) of this subsection;
(D) Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance
locally owned transportation facilities or services that are below an
established level of service standard;
(E) Forecasts of traffic for at least ten years based on the
adopted land use plan to provide information on the location, timing,
and capacity needs of future growth;
(F) Identification of state and local system needs to meet current
and future demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation
facilities must be consistent with the statewide multimodal
transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW;
(iv) Finance, including:
(A) An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against
probable funding resources;
(B) A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the
comprehensive plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the
basis for the six-year street, road, or transit program required by RCW
35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795
for public transportation systems. The multiyear financing plan should
be coordinated with the six-year improvement program developed by the
department of transportation as required by RCW 47.05.030;
(C) If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a
discussion of how additional funding will be raised, or how land use
assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that level of service
standards will be met;
(v) Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment
of the impacts of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on
the transportation systems of adjacent jurisdictions;
(vi) Demand-management strategies.
(b) After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions
required to plan or who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local
jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances which prohibit
development approval if the development causes the level of service on
a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the standards
adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan, unless
transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies
may include increased public transportation service, ride sharing
programs, demand management, and other transportation systems
management strategies. For the purposes of this subsection (6)
"concurrent with the development" shall mean that improvements or
strategies are in place at the time of development, or that a financial
commitment is in place to complete the improvements or strategies
within six years.
(c) The transportation element described in this subsection (6),
and the six-year plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW
36.81.121 for counties, RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation
systems, and RCW 47.05.030 for the state, must be consistent.
(7) An economic development element establishing local goals,
policies, objectives, and provisions for economic growth and vitality
and a high quality of life. The element shall include: (a) A summary
of the local economy such as population, employment, payroll, sectors,
businesses, sales, and other information as appropriate; (b) a summary
of the strengths and weaknesses of the local economy defined as the
commercial and industrial sectors and supporting factors such as land
use, transportation, utilities, education, work force, housing, and
natural/cultural resources; and (c) an identification of policies,
programs, and projects to foster economic growth and development and to
address future needs. A city that has chosen to be a residential
community is exempt from the economic development element requirement
of this subsection.
(8) A park and recreation element that implements, and is
consistent with, the capital facilities plan element as it relates to
park and recreation facilities. The element shall include: (a)
Estimates of park and recreation demand for at least a ten-year period;
(b) an evaluation of facilities and service needs; and (c) an
evaluation of intergovernmental coordination opportunities to provide
regional approaches for meeting park and recreational demand.
(9) It is the intent that new or amended elements required after
January 1, 2002, be adopted concurrent with the scheduled update
provided in RCW 36.70A.130. Requirements to incorporate any such new
or amended elements shall be null and void until funds sufficient to
cover applicable local government costs are appropriated and
distributed by the state at least two years before local government
must update comprehensive plans as required in RCW 36.70A.130.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.360 and 1998 c 112 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 may permit master planned resorts which may constitute urban
growth outside of urban growth areas as limited by this section. A
master planned resort means a self-contained and fully integrated
planned unit development, in a setting of significant natural
amenities, with primary focus on destination resort facilities
consisting of short-term visitor accommodations and allowing up to
fifty percent permanent residential use, associated with a range of
developed on-site indoor or outdoor recreational facilities.
(2) Capital facilities, utilities, and services, including those
related to sewer, water, storm water, security, fire suppression, and
emergency medical, provided on-site shall be limited to meeting the
needs of the master planned resort. Such facilities, utilities, and
services may be provided to a master planned resort by outside service
providers, including municipalities and special purpose districts,
provided that all costs associated with service extensions and capacity
increases directly attributable to the master planned resort are fully
borne by the resort. A master planned resort and service providers may
enter into agreements for shared capital facilities and utilities,
provided that such facilities and utilities serve only the master
planned resort or urban growth areas.
Nothing in this subsection may be construed as: Establishing an
order of priority for processing applications for water right permits,
for granting such permits, or for issuing certificates of water right;
altering or authorizing in any manner the alteration of the place of
use for a water right; or affecting or impairing in any manner
whatsoever an existing water right.
All waters or the use of waters shall be regulated and controlled
as provided in chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW and not otherwise.
(3) A master planned resort may include ((other)) residential uses
as specified in subsection (1) of this section within its boundaries,
but only if the residential uses are integrated into and support the
on-site recreational nature of the resort.
(4) A master planned resort may be authorized by a county only if:
(a) The comprehensive plan specifically identifies policies to
guide the development of master planned resorts;
(b) The comprehensive plan and development regulations include
restrictions that preclude new urban or suburban land uses in the
vicinity of the master planned resort, except in areas otherwise
designated for urban growth under RCW 36.70A.110;
(c) The county includes a finding as a part of the approval process
that the land is better suited, and has more long-term importance, for
the master planned resort than for the commercial harvesting of timber
or agricultural production, if located on land that otherwise would be
designated as forest land or agricultural land under RCW 36.70A.170;
(d) The county ensures that the resort plan is consistent with the
development regulations established for critical areas; and
(e) On-site and off-site infrastructure and service impacts are
fully considered and mitigated.

--- END ---