BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds and declares:
(a) A growing number of publicly traded companies based in the
United States are flouting United States taxation and legal protections
of investors by reincorporating, in name only, in Bermuda, the Cayman
Islands, and other tax haven countries;
(b) This practice, also known as "corporate expatriation," is part
of a larger pattern of deception and lack of integrity in the corporate
boardroom that has harmed the marketplace and investors;
(c) An expatriate company is a United States based company that has
moved in name and on paper only to a tax haven country and has no
substantial business activities in the country of reincorporation;
(d) These paper relocations result in a substantial weakening of
shareholders' rights and significant tax avoidance;
(e) The congressional joint committee on taxation has projected
that United States revenue losses from corporate expatriations are
estimated to be six hundred twenty-eight million dollars over five
years and two billion one hundred twenty-eight million dollars over ten
years; and
(f) For these reasons, it is not in the best interests of the state
and its citizens to use public funds to do business with publicly held
expatriate companies.
(2) A state agency may not enter into any agreement or contract
with any publicly held expatriate corporation. The awarding agency
director or his or her designee may waive the prohibition in this
subsection if he or she makes a written finding that the contract is
necessary to meet a compelling public interest.
(3) Each vendor submitting a bid or contract must certify under
penalty of perjury that it is not a publicly held expatriate
corporation.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Compelling public interest" includes, but is not limited to,
ensuring public health and safety, or the provision of essential
services in an emergency.
(b) "Tax haven country" means a country that has no corporate
income tax or an effective tax rate less than ten percent on income
that does not arise in or is not derived from that country. A tax
haven country does not include any country that is a signatory to a
treaty that would contravene this prohibition.
(5) This section may be known and cited as the taxpayer and
shareholder protection act.

--- END ---