BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.0621 and 2002 c 352 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) License tab fees shall be thirty dollars per year for all
vehicles.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license tab fees" are
defined as the general fees paid annually for licensing motor vehicles
and trailers as defined in RCW 46.04.620 and 46.04.623. Trailers
licensed under RCW 46.16.068 or 46.16.085 or as provided for in section
2 of this act and campers licensed under RCW 46.16.505 are not required
to pay license tab fees under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
In lieu of the fees provided in RCW 46.16.0621, trailers less than
two thousand pounds scale weight and used for personal use on the
public highways may be licensed upon the payment of a license fee
according to the following weight schedule:

Under 250 pounds $0.00

250 - 1,999 pounds $30.00

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The owner of a trailer that under reciprocal agreements with
another jurisdiction would be required to obtain a license registration
in this state or an unlicensed trailer that would be required to obtain
a license registration for operation on public highways of this state
may, as an alternative to license registration, operate the trailer
under the authority of a trailer trip permit issued by this state.
(2) Each trailer trip permit authorizes the operation of a single
trailer at the maximum legal weight limit for the vehicle for a period
of three consecutive days, commencing with the day of first use. No
more than three such permits may be used for any one trailer in a
period of thirty consecutive days. Every permit must identify, as the
department may require, the trailer for which it is issued and must be
completed in full and signed by the operator before use of the trailer
on the public highways. Correction of data on the permit such as
dates, license number, or vehicle identification number invalidates the
permit. The trip permit must be displayed in the vehicle pulling the
trailer as prescribed by the department.
(3) Trailers operating under the authority of trip permits are
subject to all laws, rules, and regulations affecting the operation of
like vehicles in this state.
(4) Trailer trip permits may be obtained from field offices of the
department of transportation, Washington state patrol, department of
licensing, or other agents appointed by the department. The fee for
each trailer trip permit is three dollars and fifty cents. For each
permit issued, a filing fee as provided by RCW 46.01.140 must be
charged. The trailer trip permit fee must be deposited to the credit
of the motor vehicle fund. These fees are in lieu of all other vehicle
license fees and taxes. No exchange, credits, or refunds may be given
for trip permits after they have been purchased.
(5) The department may appoint county auditors or businesses as
agents for the purpose of selling trailer trip permits to the public.
County auditors or businesses so appointed may retain the filing fee
collected for each trip permit to defray expenses incurred in handling
and selling the permits.
(6) A violation of or a failure to comply with any provision of
this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(7) The department of licensing may adopt rules as it deems
necessary to administer this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.63.020 and 2001 c 325 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(2) RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(3) RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or
habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(4) RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of ownership and
registration and markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed
or declared a total loss;
(6) RCW 46.16.010 relating to initial registration of motor
vehicles;
(7) RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(8) RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(9) Section 3 of this act relating to trailer trip permits;
(10) RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or
license plate for disabled persons' parking;
(((10))) (11) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid
driver's license;
(((11))) (12) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding
a driver's license or instruction permit;
(((12))) (13) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession
and use of a driver's license;
(((13))) (14) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or
revoked license or status;
(((14))) (15) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor
vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;
(((15))) (16) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of
restrictions of an occupational driver's license;
(((16))) (17) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor
vehicle without an ignition interlock device in violation of a license
notation that the device is required;
(((17))) (18) RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another person to
start a vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device;
(((18))) (19) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's
licenses;
(((19))) (20) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial
responsibility;
(((20))) (21) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(((21))) (22) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(((22))) (23) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home
pilot vehicles;
(((23))) (24) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of
dangerous articles;
(((24))) (25) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an
unattended car or other property;
(((25))) (26) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to
or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(((26))) (27) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen,
storagemen, and appraisers;
(((27))) (28) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the
driving record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer,
and an alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(((28))) (29) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities
of a registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(((29))) (30) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow
truck operators;
(((30))) (31) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police
officers, flaggers, or fire fighters;
(((31))) (32) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information
to or cooperate with an officer;
(((32))) (33) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(((33))) (34) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude
pursuing police vehicles;
(((34))) (35) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(((35))) (36) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(((36))) (37) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(((37))) (38) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor
vehicle;
(((38))) (39) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(((39))) (40) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent
driving;
(((40))) (41) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of
roadway workers;
(((41))) (42) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on
highways;
(((42))) (43) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an
unattended vehicle with the motor running;
(((43))) (44) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle
fuel;
(((44))) (45) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or
attempt to cancel a traffic citation;
(((45))) (46) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding,
abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(((46))) (47) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic
offenders;
(((47))) (48) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to
obtain a refund;
(((48))) (49) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle
business practices, except where that chapter provides for the
assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(((49))) (50) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of
passengers in for hire vehicles;
(((50))) (51) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier
insurance;
(((51))) (52) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine
without a vehicle certificate;
(((52))) (53) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a
limousine carrier;
(((53))) (54) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(((54))) (55) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training
schools;
(((55))) (56) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a
cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued
under chapter 46.87 RCW;
(((56))) (57) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an
unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is effective with registration
expirations that are due or become due on September 1, 2003, and
thereafter.

--- END ---