BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.130 and 1998 c 276 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each tenant shall pay the rental amount at such times and in such
amounts as provided for in the rental agreement or as otherwise
provided by law and comply with all obligations imposed upon tenants by
applicable provisions of all municipal, county, and state codes,
statutes, ordinances, and regulations, and in addition shall:
(1) Keep that part of the premises which he or she occupies and
uses as clean and sanitary as the conditions of the premises permit;
(2) Properly dispose from his or her dwelling unit all rubbish,
garbage, and other organic or flammable waste, in a clean and sanitary
manner at reasonable and regular intervals, and assume all costs of
extermination and fumigation for infestation caused by the tenant;
(3) Properly use and operate all electrical, gas, heating, plumbing
and other fixtures and appliances supplied by the landlord;
(4) Not intentionally or negligently destroy, deface, damage,
impair, or remove any part of the structure or dwelling, with the
appurtenances thereto, including the facilities, equipment, furniture,
furnishings, and appliances, or permit any member of his or her family,
invitee, licensee, or any person acting under his or her control to do
so. Violations may be prosecuted under chapter 9A.48 RCW if the
destruction is intentional and malicious;
(5) Not permit a nuisance or common waste;
(6) Not engage in drug-related activity at the rental premises, or
allow a subtenant, sublessee, resident, or anyone else to engage in
drug-related activity at the rental premises with the knowledge or
consent of the tenant. "Drug-related activity" means that activity
which constitutes a violation of chapter 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW;
(7) Maintain the smoke detection device in accordance with the
manufacturer's recommendations, including the replacement of batteries
where required for the proper operation of the smoke detection device,
as required in RCW 48.48.140(3);
(8) Not engage in any activity at the rental premises that is:
(a) Imminently hazardous to the physical safety of other persons on
the premises; and
(b)(i) Entails physical assaults upon another person which result
in an arrest; or
(ii) Entails the unlawful use of a firearm or other deadly weapon
as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 which results in an arrest, including
threatening another tenant or the landlord with a firearm or other
deadly weapon under RCW 59.18.352. Nothing in this subsection (8)
shall authorize the termination of tenancy and eviction of the victim
of a physical assault or the victim of the use or threatened use of a
firearm or other deadly weapon;
(9) Not engage in any gang-related activity at the premises, as
defined in RCW 59.18.030, or allow another to engage in such activity
at the premises, that renders people in at least two or more dwelling
units or residences insecure in life or the use of property or that
injures or endangers the safety or health of people in at least two or
more dwelling units or residences. In determining whether a tenant is
engaged in gang-related activity, a court should consider the totality
of the circumstances, including factors such as whether there have been
a significant number of complaints to the landlord about the tenant's
activities at the property, damages done by the tenant to the property,
including the property of other tenants or neighbors, harassment or
threats made by the tenant to other tenants or neighbors that have been
reported to law enforcement agencies, any police incident reports
involving the tenant, and the tenant's criminal history; ((and))
(10) Not engage in any act of domestic violence as defined in RCW
26.50.010 against another tenant of the same rental dwelling unit that
results in an arrest. This subsection does not authorize the
termination of tenancy and eviction of the victim of an act of domestic
violence; and
(11) Upon termination and vacation, restore the premises to their
initial condition except for reasonable wear and tear or conditions
caused by failure of the landlord to comply with his or her obligations
under this chapter: PROVIDED, That the tenant shall not be charged for
normal cleaning if he or she has paid a nonrefundable cleaning fee.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.18.180 and 1998 c 276 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the tenant fails to comply with any portion of RCW 59.18.130
or 59.18.140, and such noncompliance can substantially affect the
health and safety of the tenant or other tenants, or substantially
increase the hazards of fire or accident that can be remedied by
repair, replacement of a damaged item, or cleaning, the tenant shall
comply within thirty days after written notice by the landlord
specifying the noncompliance, or, in the case of emergency as promptly
as conditions require. If the tenant fails to remedy the noncompliance
within that period the landlord may enter the dwelling unit and cause
the work to be done and submit an itemized bill of the actual and
reasonable cost of repair, to be payable on the next date when periodic
rent is due, or on terms mutually agreed to by the landlord and tenant,
or immediately if the rental agreement has terminated. Any substantial
noncompliance by the tenant of RCW 59.18.130 or 59.18.140 shall
constitute a ground for commencing an action in unlawful detainer in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 59.12 RCW, and a landlord may
commence such action at any time after written notice pursuant to such
chapter. The tenant shall have a defense to an unlawful detainer
action filed solely on this ground if it is determined at the hearing
authorized under the provisions of chapter 59.12 RCW that the tenant is
in substantial compliance with the provisions of this section, or if
the tenant remedies the noncomplying condition within the thirty day
period provided for above or any shorter period determined at the
hearing to have been required because of an emergency: PROVIDED, That
if the defective condition is remedied after the commencement of an
unlawful detainer action, the tenant may be liable to the landlord for
statutory costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(2) If drug-related activity is alleged to be a basis for
termination of tenancy under RCW 59.18.130(6), 59.12.030(5), or
59.20.140(5), the compliance provisions of this section do not apply
and the landlord may proceed directly to an unlawful detainer action.
(3) If activity on the premises that creates an imminent hazard to
the physical safety of other persons on the premises as defined in RCW
59.18.130(8) is alleged to be the basis for termination of the tenancy,
and the tenant is arrested as a result of this activity, then the
compliance provisions of this section do not apply and the landlord may
proceed directly to an unlawful detainer action against the tenant who
was arrested for this activity.
(4) If gang-related activity, as prohibited under RCW 59.18.130(9),
is alleged to be the basis for termination of the tenancy, then the
compliance provisions of this section do not apply and the landlord may
proceed directly to an unlawful detainer action in accordance with
chapter 59.12 RCW, and a landlord may commence such an action at any
time after written notice under chapter 59.12 RCW.
(5) If an act of domestic violence against another tenant is
alleged to be the basis for termination of tenancy under RCW
59.18.130(10), and if the tenant is arrested for the act of domestic
violence and the victim of the domestic violence consents to the
eviction by affidavit, the compliance provisions of this section do not
apply and the landlord may proceed directly to an unlawful detainer
action to evict the tenant arrested for the act of domestic violence.
(6) A landlord may not be held liable in any cause of action for
bringing an unlawful detainer action against a tenant for drug-related
activity, for creating an imminent hazard to the physical safety of
others, for committing an act of domestic violence, or for engaging in
gang-related activity that renders people in at least two or more
dwelling units or residences insecure in life or the use of property or
that injures or endangers the safety or health of people in at least
two or more dwelling units or residences under this section, if the
unlawful detainer action was brought in good faith. Nothing in this
section shall affect a landlord's liability under RCW 59.18.380 to pay
all damages sustained by the tenant should the writ of restitution be
wrongfully sued out.

--- END ---