BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.79.070 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state nursing care quality assurance commission is
established, consisting of eleven members to be appointed by the
governor to four-year terms. No person may serve as a member of the
commission for more than two consecutive full terms.
(2) There must be three registered nurse members, two advanced
registered nurse practitioner members, three licensed practical nurse
members, two public members, and one nonvoting midwife member licensed
under chapter 18.50 RCW, on the commission. Each member of the
commission must be a citizen of the United States and a resident of
this state.
(3) Registered nurse members of the commission must:
(a) Be licensed as registered nurses under this chapter; ((and))
(b) Have had at least five years' experience in the active practice
of nursing and have been engaged in that practice within two years of
appointment; and
(c) Have at least one member be on the faculty at a four-year
nursing program.
(4) Advanced registered nurse practitioner members of the
commission must:
(a) Be licensed as advanced registered nurse practitioners under
this chapter; and
(b) Have had at least five years' experience in the active practice
of advanced registered nursing and have been engaged in that practice
within two years of appointment.
(5) Licensed practical nurse members of the commission must:
(a) Be licensed as licensed practical nurses under this chapter;
((and))
(b) Have had at least five years' actual experience as a licensed
practical nurse and have been engaged in practice as a practical nurse
within two years of appointment; and
(c) Have at least one member be on the faculty at a two-year
nursing program.
(6) Public members of the commission may not be a member of any
other health care licensing board or commission, or have a fiduciary
obligation to a facility rendering health services regulated by the
commission, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering
of health services regulated by the commission.
(7) The nonvoting licensed midwife member of the commission must:
(a) Be licensed as a midwife under chapter 18.50 RCW; and
(b) Have had at least five years' actual experience as a licensed
midwife and have been engaged in practice as a midwife within two years
of appointment.
In appointing the initial members of the commission, it is the
intent of the legislature that, to the extent possible, the governor
appoint the existing members of the board of nursing and the board of
practical nursing repealed under chapter 9, Laws of 1994 sp. sess. The
governor may appoint initial members of the commission to staggered
terms of from one to four years. Thereafter, all members shall be
appointed to full four-year terms. Members of the commission hold
office until their successors are appointed.

--- END ---