BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means a county with fewer than one hundred
persons per square mile as determined annually by the office of
financial management and published by the department effective for the
period July 1st through June 30th, or a county that has a population of
less than two hundred twenty-five thousand as determined by the office
of financial management and has an area greater than two hundred
twenty-five square miles.
(4)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project in
an eligible area.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for
a deferral unless the underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery,
and equipment vests exclusively in the same person, or unless the
lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the
deferral to the lessee in the form of reduced rent payments.
(c) "Eligible investment project" does not include any portion of
an investment project undertaken by a light and power business as
defined in RCW 82.16.010(5), other than that portion of a cogeneration
project that is used to generate power for consumption within the
manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an integral
part, or investment projects which have already received deferrals
under this chapter.
(5) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project.
(6) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the
activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories.
(7) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(8) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and
expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for manufacturing
and research and development activities, including plant offices and
warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw material or
finished goods if such facilities are an essential or an integral part
of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory used for manufacturing or
research and development. If a building is used partly for
manufacturing or research and development and partly for other
purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department.
(9) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a manufacturing or research and
development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes:
Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment;
manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving
parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all equipment
used to control or operate the machinery.
(10) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(11) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun. As used in this
subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales
for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the
product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.
(12) "Wood biomass fuel" means a pyrolytic liquid fuel or synthesis
gas-derived liquid fuel, comprised primarily of carbon monoxide and
hydrogen, produced from wood, and used in internal combustion engines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Application for deferral of taxes under
this chapter must be made before initiation of the construction of the
investment project or acquisition of equipment or machinery. The
application shall be made to the department in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The application shall contain
information regarding the location of the investment project, the
applicant's average employment in the state for the prior year,
estimated or actual new employment related to the project, estimated or
actual wages of employees related to the project, estimated or actual
costs, time schedules for completion and operation, and other
information required by the department.
(2) The department shall rule on the application within sixty days.
The department shall keep a running total of all deferrals granted
under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec.3 (1) The department shall issue a sales and
use tax deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes
due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible
investment project that is located in an eligible area as defined in
section 1 of this act, if the investment project is undertaken for the
purpose of manufacturing wood biomass fuel.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Eligible area" means a designated community empowerment zone
approved under RCW 43.31C.020 or a county containing a community
empowerment zone.
(b) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project
undertaken for the purpose of manufacturing wood biomass fuel that is
located in an eligible area.
(c) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed in the eligible investment project during the entire
year.
(2) In addition to the provisions of section 3 of this act, the
department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for
state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.14 RCW, on each eligible investment project that is located in
an eligible area, if the applicant establishes that at the time the
project is operationally complete:
(a) The applicant will hire at least one qualified employment
position for each seven hundred fifty thousand dollars of investment on
which a deferral is requested; and
(b) The positions will be filled by persons who at the time of hire
are residents of the community empowerment zone. As used in this
subsection, "resident" means the person makes his or her home in the
community empowerment zone. A mailing address alone is insufficient to
establish that a person is a resident for the purposes of this section.
The persons must be hired after the date the application is filed with
the department.
(3) All other provisions and eligibility requirements of this
chapter apply to applicants eligible under this section.
(4) The qualified employment position must be filled by the end of
the calendar year following the year in which the project is certified
as operationally complete. If a person does not meet the requirements
for qualified employment positions by the end of the second calendar
year following the year in which the project is certified as
operationally complete, all deferred taxes are immediately due.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Each recipient of a deferral granted
under this chapter after June 30, 2003, shall submit a report to the
department on December 31st of the year in which the investment project
is certified by the department as having been operationally completed,
and on December 31st of each of the seven succeeding calendar years.
The report shall contain information, as required by the department,
from which the department may determine whether the recipient is
meeting the requirements of this chapter. If the recipient fails to
submit a report or submits an inadequate report, the department may
declare the amount of deferred taxes outstanding to be immediately
assessed and payable.
(2) If, on the basis of a report under this section or other
information, the department finds that an investment project is not
eligible for tax deferral under this chapter, the amount of deferred
taxes outstanding for the project are immediately due. For any taxes
that are due, penalties and interest applicable to delinquent excise
taxes shall be assessed and imposed for delinquent payments under this
chapter. The debt for deferred taxes will not be extinguished by
insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership
does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is transferred, subject
to the successor meeting the eligibility requirements of this chapter,
for the remaining periods of the deferral.
(3) Deferred taxes need not be repaid if the department determines,
in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section,
that the recipient has met the requirements of this chapter for the
seven calendar years following the certification by the department that
the investment project has been operationally completed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The employment security department shall
make, and certify to the department of revenue, all determinations of
employment and wages as requested by the department under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the
administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Applications, reports, and any other
information received by the department under this chapter shall not be
confidential and shall be subject to disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "wood biomass fuel" means a
pyrolytic liquid fuel or synthesis gas-derived liquid fuel, comprised
primarily of carbon monoxide and hydrogen, produced from wood, and used
in internal combustion engines.
(2)(a) All buildings, machinery, equipment, and other personal
property which is used primarily for the manufacturing of wood biomass
fuel, the land upon which this property is located, and land that is
reasonably necessary in the manufacturing of wood biomass fuel, but not
land necessary for growing of crops, which together comprise a new
manufacturing facility or an addition to an existing manufacturing
facility, are exempt from property taxation for the six assessment
years following the date on which the facility or the addition to the
existing facility becomes operational.
(b) For manufacturing facilities which produce products in addition
to wood biomass fuel, the amount of the property tax exemption shall be
based upon the annual percentage of the total value of all products
manufactured that is the value of the wood biomass fuel manufactured.
(3) Claims for exemptions authorized by this section shall be filed
with the county assessor on forms prescribed by the department of
revenue and furnished by the assessor. Once filed, the exemption is
valid for six years and shall not be renewed. The assessor shall
verify and approve claims as the assessor determines to be justified
and in accordance with this section. No claims may be filed after
December 31, 2009.
The department of revenue may promulgate such rules, pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary to properly administer this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.29A.135 and 1985 c 371 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section((,)):
(a) "Alcohol fuel" means any alcohol made from a product other than
petroleum or natural gas, which is used alone or in combination with
gasoline or other petroleum products for use as a fuel for motor
vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements of husbandry.
(b) "Wood biomass fuel" means a pyrolytic liquid fuel or synthesis
gas-derived liquid fuel, comprised primarily of carbon monoxide and
hydrogen, produced from wood, and used in internal combustion engines.
(2)(a) All leasehold interests in buildings, machinery, equipment,
and other personal property which is used primarily for the
manufacturing of alcohol fuel, wood biomass fuel, the land upon which
((such)) this property is located, and land that is reasonably
necessary in the manufacturing of alcohol fuel, wood biomass fuel, but
not land necessary for growing of crops, which together comprise a new
((alcohol)) manufacturing facility or an addition to an existing
((alcohol)) manufacturing facility, are exempt from leasehold taxes for
a period of six years from the date on which the facility or the
addition to the existing facility becomes operational.
(b) For ((alcohol)) manufacturing facilities which produce
((alcohol for use as)) products in addition to alcohol fuel ((and
alcohol used for other purposes)), wood biomass fuel, the amount of the
leasehold tax exemption shall be based upon ((an annually determined
percentage of the total gallons of alcohol produced that is sold and
used as alcohol fuel)) the annual percentage of the total value of all
products manufactured that is the value of the alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured.
(3) Claims for exemptions authorized by this section shall be filed
with the department of revenue on forms prescribed by the department of
revenue and furnished by the department of revenue. Once filed, the
exemption is valid for six years and shall not be renewed. The
department of revenue shall verify and approve ((such)) claims as the
department of revenue determines to be justified and in accordance with
this section. No claims may be filed after December 31, ((1992)) 2009.
The department of revenue may promulgate such rules, pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW, as are necessary to properly administer this
section.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.04.260 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 2 are
each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits and vegetables, or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and
vegetables canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated by the
seller and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who
transports in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state,
the seller shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by
the department and retain the statement as a business record; ((and))
(d) Dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in
21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including byproducts
from the manufacturing of the dairy products such as whey and casein;
or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports
in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller
shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by the
department and retain the statement as a business record; and
(e) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales, at retail or wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the assemblies multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing nuclear fuel assemblies, as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this
state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(11) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to
such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income of such
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(12) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts received from the retail sale, or for the distribution, of wood
biomass fuel.
(2) For the purposes of this act, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Wood biomass fuel" means a pyrolytic liquid fuel or synthesis
gas-derived liquid fuel, comprised primarily of carbon monoxide and
hydrogen, produced from wood, and used in internal combustion engines.
(b) "Distribution" means any of the actions specified in RCW
82.36.020(2).
(3) This section expires July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
constructing structures, installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning,
decorating, altering, or improving of structures or machinery and
equipment, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of structures or machinery and equipment, if
the machinery, equipment, or structure is used directly for the retail
sale of a wood biomass fuel blend. Structures and machinery and
equipment that are used for the retail sale of a wood biomass fuel
blend and for other purposes are exempt only on the portion used
directly for the retail sale of a wood biomass fuel blend.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of fuel
delivery vehicles or to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the vehicles including repair parts and replacement parts if
at least seventy-five percent of the fuel distributed by the vehicles
is a wood biomass fuel blend.
(3) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 1
of this act and this subsection apply.
(a) "Wood biomass fuel blend" means fuel that contains at least
twenty percent wood biomass fuel by volume.
(b) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities and tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement
parts that are integral and necessary for the delivery of a wood
biomass fuel blend into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of eligible
machinery and equipment, or tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of machinery and equipment used directly for
the retail sale of a wood biomass fuel blend.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of fuel delivery vehicles including repair parts and replacement
parts and to services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the vehicles if at least seventy-five
percent of the fuel distributed by the vehicles is a wood biomass fuel
blend.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 13
of this act apply.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Section 9 of this act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2004 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) Sections 9 through 15 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2003.
(2) Sections 1 through 8 of this act take effect July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 1 through 8 of this act are null
and void if the legislature passes and the governor signs any bill into
law before July 1, 2004, that extends the expiration date in RCW
82.60.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---