BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.235
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By January 12, 2004, the superintendent of public instruction,
in consultation with the Washington state school directors'
association, parents, representatives of food service employee groups,
principals, and other interested parties, shall develop and make
available to school districts a model policy for protecting children in
preschool through sixth grade who assist in elementary school kitchens.
(2) By August 1, 2004, each school district shall adopt or amend a
policy for protecting children in preschool through sixth grade who
assist in elementary school kitchens.

--- END ---