BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state's
current tax structure does not meet the needs perceived by some
citizens of the state to contribute a sufficient amount of their
personal resources to the support of state programs and services. The
legislature therefore declares that it is the responsibility of state
government to create an opportunity for such citizens to provide
enhancements to state revenues in a way that ensures recognition of
their generosity and civic-mindedness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The monetary offerings for revenue enhancement account, which may
be known and cited as the MORE account, is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from citizens' voluntary contributions,
donations, gifts, bequests, grants, or other sources granted or given
for this account shall be deposited in the MORE account. Money in the
MORE account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from
the MORE account may be used for the support of any function currently
supported by the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---