BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.0621 and 2002 c 352 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 82.80.020, license tab fees ((shall
be)) are thirty dollars per year for all vehicles.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license tab fees" are
defined as the general fees paid annually for licensing motor vehicles
and trailers as defined in RCW 46.04.620 and 46.04.623. Trailers
licensed under RCW 46.16.068 or 46.16.085 and campers licensed under
RCW 46.16.505 are not required to pay license tab fees under this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.070 and 1994 c 262 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In lieu of all other vehicle licensing fees, unless
specifically exempt, and in addition to the ((excise tax prescribed in
chapter 82.44 RCW and the)) mileage fees prescribed for buses and
stages in RCW 46.16.125, there shall be paid and collected annually for
each truck, motor truck, truck tractor, road tractor, tractor, bus,
auto stage, or for hire vehicle with seating capacity of more than six,
based upon the declared combined gross weight or declared gross weight
thereof pursuant to the provisions of chapter 46.44 RCW, the following
licensing fees by such gross weight:

DECLARED GROSS WEIGHT SCHEDULE A SCHEDULE B

4,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((37.00))
30.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((37.00))
30.00

6,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((44.00))
30.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((44.00))
30.00

8,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((55.00))
30.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((55.00))
30.00

10,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 62.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 62.00

12,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 72.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 72.00

14,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 82.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 82.00

16,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 92.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 92.00

18,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 137.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 137.00

20,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 152.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 152.00

22,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 164.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 164.00

24,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 177.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 177.00

26,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 187.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 187.00

28,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 220.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 220.00

30,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 253.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 253.00

32,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 304.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 304.00

34,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 323.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 323.00

36,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 350.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 350.00

38,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 384.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 384.00

40,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 439.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 439.00

42,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 456.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 546.00

44,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 466.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 556.00

46,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 501.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 591.00

48,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 522.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 612.00

50,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 566.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 656.00

52,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 595.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 685.00

54,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 642.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 732.00

56,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 677.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 767.00

58,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 704.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 794.00

60,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 840.00

62,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 804.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 894.00

64,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 822.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 912.00

66,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 915.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,005.00

68,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 954.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,044.00

70,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,027.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,117.00

72,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,098.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,188.00

74,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,193.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,283.00

76,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,289.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,379.00

78,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,407.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,497.00

80,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,518.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,608.00

82,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,623.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,713.00

84,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,728.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,818.00

86,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,833.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,923.00

88,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,938.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,028.00

90,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,043.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,133.00

92,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,148.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,238.00

94,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,253.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,343.00

96,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,358.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,448.00

98,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,463.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,553.00

100,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,568.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,658.00

102,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,673.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,763.00

104,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,778.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,868.00

105,500 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,883.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,973.00

Schedule A applies to vehicles either used exclusively for hauling
logs or that do not tow trailers. Schedule B applies to vehicles that
tow trailers and are not covered under Schedule A.
Every truck, motor truck, truck tractor, and tractor exceeding
6,000 pounds empty scale weight registered under chapter 46.16, 46.87,
or 46.88 RCW shall be licensed for not less than one hundred fifty
percent of its empty weight unless the amount would be in excess of the
legal limits prescribed for such a vehicle in RCW 46.44.041 or
46.44.042, in which event the vehicle shall be licensed for the maximum
weight authorized for such a vehicle or unless the vehicle is used only
for the purpose of transporting any well drilling machine, air
compressor, rock crusher, conveyor, hoist, donkey engine, cook house,
tool house, bunk house, or similar machine or structure attached to or
made a part of such vehicle.
The following provisions apply when increasing gross or combined
gross weight for a vehicle licensed under this section:
(a) The new license fee will be one-twelfth of the fee listed above
for the new gross weight, multiplied by the number of months remaining
in the period for which licensing fees have been paid, including the
month in which the new gross weight is effective.
(b) Upon surrender of the current certificate of registration or
cab card, the new licensing fees due shall be reduced by the amount of
the licensing fees previously paid for the same period for which new
fees are being charged.
(2) The proceeds from the fees collected under subsection (1) of
this section shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 46.68.035.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.80.020 and 2001 c 64 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county, or subject to subsection
(7) of this section, a qualifying city or town located in a county that
has not imposed a fifteen-dollar fee under this section, may fix and
impose an additional fee, not to exceed fifteen dollars per vehicle,
for each vehicle that is subject to license fees under RCW 46.16.0621
and for each vehicle that is subject to RCW 46.16.070 with an unladen
weight of six thousand pounds or less, and that is determined by the
department of licensing to be registered within the boundaries of the
county. Before the legislative authority may impose the fee under this
section, the fee must be approved by at least sixty percent of the
voters voting at a general or special election on the fee proposition.
(2) The department of licensing shall administer and collect the
fee. The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected, for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer for
monthly distribution under RCW 82.80.080.
(3) The proceeds of this fee shall be used strictly for
((transportation)) highway purposes ((in accordance with RCW
82.80.070)) consistent with Article II, section 40 of the state
Constitution.
(4) A county or qualifying city or town imposing this fee or
initiating an exemption process shall delay the effective date at least
six months from the date the ordinance is enacted to allow the
department of licensing to implement administration and collection of
or exemption from the fee.
(5) The legislative authority of a county or qualifying city or
town may develop and initiate an exemption process of the fifteen
dollar fee for the registered owners of vehicles residing within the
boundaries of the county or qualifying city or town: (a) Who are
sixty-one years old or older at the time payment of the fee is due and
whose household income for the previous calendar year is less than an
amount prescribed by the county or qualifying city or town legislative
authority; or (b) who have a physical disability.
(6) The legislative authority of a county or qualifying city or
town shall develop and initiate an exemption process of the fifteen-dollar fee for vehicles registered within the boundaries of the county
that are licensed under RCW 46.16.374.
(7) For purposes of this section, a "qualifying city or town" means
a city or town residing within a county having a population of greater
than seventy-five thousand in which is located all or part of a
national monument. A qualifying city or town may impose the fee
authorized in subsection (1) of this section subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The city or town may impose the fee only if authorized to do so
by a majority of voters voting at a general or special election on a
proposition for that purpose. At a minimum, the ballot measure shall
contain: (i) A description of the transportation project proposed for
funding, properly identified by mileposts or other designations that
specify the project parameters; (ii) the proposed number of months or
years necessary to fund the city or town's share of the project cost;
and (iii) the amount of fee to be imposed for the project.
(b) The city or town may not impose a fee that, if combined with
the county fee, exceeds fifteen dollars. If a county imposes or
increases a fee under this section that, if combined with the fee
imposed by a city or town, exceeds fifteen dollars, the city or town
fee shall be reduced or eliminated as needed so that in no city or town
does the combined fee exceed fifteen dollars. All revenues from
county-imposed fees shall be distributed as called for in RCW
82.80.080.
(c) Any fee imposed by a city or town under this section shall
expire at the end of the term of months or years provided in the ballot
measure, or when the city or town's bonded indebtedness on the project
is retired, whichever is sooner.
(8) The fee imposed under subsection (7) of this section shall
apply only to renewals and shall not apply to ownership transfer
transactions.
(9) Trailers registered under RCW 46.04.620 and 46.04.623 are
exempt from the fee imposed under this section.
(10) Any county imposing the fee authorized in this section as of
March 1, 2003, must submit the fee to the voters for their ratification
at the November 2003 general election. At least sixty percent of
voters voting at the election must ratify the continued imposition of
the fee.

Sec. 4 RCW 81.104.160 and 1998 c 321 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation
authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation
benefit areas, and regional transit authorities may submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters, and if approved, may levy and
collect an excise tax, at a rate approved by the voters, but not
exceeding eighty one-hundredths of one percent on the value, under
chapter 82.44 RCW, of every motor vehicle owned by a resident of the
taxing district, solely for the purpose of providing high capacity
transportation service. In any county imposing a motor vehicle excise
tax surcharge pursuant to RCW 81.100.060, the maximum tax rate under
this section shall be reduced to a rate equal to eighty one-hundredths
of one percent on the value less the equivalent motor vehicle excise
tax rate of the surcharge imposed pursuant to RCW 81.100.060. This
rate shall not apply to vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 except
vehicles with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less, RCW
46.16.079, 46.16.085, or 46.16.090.
(2))) An agency ((imposing a tax under subsection (1) of this
section)) may ((also)) impose a sales and use tax solely for the
purpose of providing high capacity transportation service, in addition
to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030, upon retail car rentals within
the agency's jurisdiction that are taxable by the state under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax shall not exceed 2.172 percent.
((The rate of tax imposed under this subsection shall bear the same
ratio to the 2.172 percent rate authorized that the rate imposed under
subsection (1) of this section bears to the rate authorized under
subsection (1) of this section.)) The base of the tax shall be the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or the rental value of the
vehicle used in the case of a use tax. ((The revenue collected under
this subsection shall be used in the same manner as excise taxes under
subsection (1) of this section.))
Any motor vehicle excise tax previously imposed under the
provisions of RCW 81.104.160(1) shall be repealed, terminated, and
expire on the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If the repeal of taxes in section 4 of this
act affects any bonds previously issued for any purpose relating to
light rail, the people expect transit agencies to retire these bonds
using reserve funds including accrued interest, sale of property or
equipment, new voter approved tax revenues, or any combination of these
sources of revenue. Taxing districts should abstain from further bond
sales for any purpose relating to light rail until voters decide this
measure. The people encourage transit agencies to put another tax
revenue measure before voters if they want to continue with a light
rail system dramatically changed from that previously represented to
and approved by voters.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.80.070 and 2002 c 56 s 413 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The proceeds collected pursuant to the exercise of the local
option authority of RCW 82.80.010, ((82.80.020,)) 82.80.030, and
82.80.050 (hereafter called "local option transportation revenues")
shall be used for transportation purposes only, including but not
limited to the following: The operation and preservation of roads,
streets, and other transportation improvements; new construction,
reconstruction, and expansion of city streets, county roads, and state
highways and other transportation improvements; development and
implementation of public transportation and high-capacity transit
improvements and programs; and planning, design, and acquisition of
right of way and sites for such transportation purposes. The proceeds
collected from excise taxes on the sale, distribution, or use of motor
vehicle fuel and special fuel under RCW 82.80.010 and the vehicle
license fee under RCW 82.80.020 shall be used exclusively for "highway
purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the
state Constitution.
(2) The local option transportation revenues shall be expended for
transportation uses consistent with the adopted transportation and land
use plans of the jurisdiction expending the funds and consistent with
any applicable and adopted regional transportation plan for
metropolitan planning areas.
(3) Each local government with a population greater than eight
thousand that levies or expends local option transportation funds, is
also required to develop and adopt a specific transportation program
that contains the following elements:
(a) The program shall identify the geographic boundaries of the
entire area or areas within which local option transportation revenues
will be levied and expended.
(b) The program shall be based on an adopted transportation plan
for the geographic areas covered and shall identify the proposed
operation and construction of transportation improvements and services
in the designated plan area intended to be funded in whole or in part
by local option transportation revenues and shall identify the annual
costs applicable to the program.
(c) The program shall indicate how the local transportation plan is
coordinated with applicable transportation plans for the region and for
adjacent jurisdictions.
(d) The program shall include at least a six-year funding plan,
updated annually, identifying the specific public and private sources
and amounts of revenue necessary to fund the program. The program
shall include a proposed schedule for construction of projects and
expenditure of revenues. The funding plan shall consider the
additional local tax revenue estimated to be generated by new
development within the plan area if all or a portion of the additional
revenue is proposed to be earmarked as future appropriations for
transportation improvements in the program.
(4) Local governments with a population greater than eight thousand
exercising the authority for local option transportation funds shall
periodically review and update their transportation program to ensure
that it is consistent with applicable local and regional transportation
and land use plans and within the means of estimated public and private
revenue available.
(5) In the case of expenditure for new or expanded transportation
facilities, improvements, and services, priorities in the use of local
option transportation revenues shall be identified in the
transportation program and expenditures shall be made based upon the
following criteria, which are stated in descending order of weight to
be attributed:
(a) First, the project serves a multijurisdictional function;
(b) Second, it is necessitated by existing or reasonably
foreseeable congestion;
(c) Third, it has the greatest person-carrying capacity;
(d) Fourth, it is partially funded by other government funds, such
as from the state transportation improvement board, or by private
sector contributions, such as those from the local transportation act,
chapter 39.92 RCW; and
(e) Fifth, it meets such other criteria as the local government
determines is appropriate.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that as a condition of
levying, receiving, and expending local option transportation revenues,
no local government agency use the revenues to replace, divert, or loan
any revenues currently being used for transportation purposes to
nontransportation purposes. The association of Washington cities and
the Washington state association of counties, in consultation with the
legislative transportation committee, shall study the issue of
nondiversion and make recommendations to the legislative transportation
committee for language implementing the intent of this section by
December 1, 1990.
(7) Local governments are encouraged to enter into interlocal
agreements to jointly develop and adopt with other local governments
the transportation programs required by this section for the purpose of
accomplishing regional transportation planning and development.
(8) Local governments may use all or a part of the local option
transportation revenues for the amortization of local government
general obligation and revenue bonds issued for transportation purposes
consistent with the requirements of this section.
(9) Subsections (1) through (8) of this section do not apply to a
regional transportation investment district imposing a tax or fee under
the local option authority of this chapter. Proceeds collected under
the exercise of local option authority under this chapter by a district
must be used in accordance with chapter 36.120 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.80.090 and 1990 c 42 s 214 are each amended to read
as follows:
A referendum petition to repeal a county or city ordinance imposing
a tax or fee authorized under RCW ((82.80.020 and)) 82.80.030 must be
filed with a filing officer, as identified in the ordinance, within
seven days of passage of the ordinance. Within ten days, the filing
officer shall confer with the petitioner concerning form and style of
the petition, issue an identification number for the petition, and
write a ballot title for the measure. The ballot title shall be posed
as a question so that an affirmative answer to the question and an
affirmative vote on the measure results in the tax or fee being imposed
and a negative answer to the question and a negative vote on the
measure results in the tax or fee not being imposed. The petitioner
shall be notified of the identification number and ballot title within
this ten-day period.
After this notification, the petitioner has thirty days in which to
secure on petition forms the signatures of not less than fifteen
percent of the registered voters of the county for county measures, or
not less than fifteen percent of the registered voters of the city for
city measures, and to file the signed petitions with the filing
officer. Each petition form must contain the ballot title and the full
text of the measure to be referred. The filing officer shall verify
the sufficiency of the signatures on the petitions. If sufficient
valid signatures are properly submitted, the filing officer shall
submit the referendum measure to the county or city voters at a general
or special election held on one of the dates provided in RCW 29.13.010
as determined by the county or city legislative authority, which
election shall not take place later than one hundred twenty days after
the signed petition has been filed with the filing officer.
The referendum procedure provided in this section is the exclusive
method for subjecting any county or city ordinance imposing a tax or
fee under RCW ((82.80.020 and)) 82.80.030 to a referendum vote.

--- END ---