BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that a capital
investment in higher education facilities is needed over the next
several biennia to adequately preserve, modernize, and expand the
capacity of the state's public two-year and four-year colleges and
universities. This investment is needed to responsibly preserve and
restore existing facilities and to provide additional space for new
students. Further, the legislature finds that capital appropriations
will need to respond to each of these areas of need in a planned,
balanced, and prioritized manner so that access to a quality system of
higher education is ensured.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that a methodology be
developed that will guide capital appropriation decisions by rating and
individually ranking, in sequential, priority order, all major capital
projects proposed by the two-year and four-year public universities and
colleges. Further, it is the intent of the legislature that this
rating, ranking, and prioritization of capital needs will reflect the
state's higher education policies and goals including the comprehensive
master plan for higher education as submitted by the higher education
coordinating board and as adopted by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2005-2007 biennial capital budget submittal,
the public four-year institutions, in consultation with the council of
presidents and the higher education coordinating board, shall prepare
a single prioritized individual ranking of the individual projects
proposed by the four-year institutions as provided in subsection (2) of
this section. The public four-year institutions may aggregate minor
works project requests into priority categories without separately
ranking each minor project, provided that these aggregated minor works
requests are ranked within the overall list. For repairs and
improvements to existing facilities and systems, the rating and ranking
of individual projects must be based on criteria or factors that
include, but are not limited to, the age and condition of buildings or
systems, the programmatic suitability of the building or system, and
the activity/occupancy level supported by the building or system. For
projects creating new space or capacity, the ratings and rankings of
projects must be based upon criteria or factors that include, but are
not limited to, measuring existing capacity and progress toward meeting
increased space utilization levels as determined by the higher
education coordinating board.
(2) The single prioritized four-year project list shall be approved
by the governing boards of each public four-year institution and shall
be submitted to the office of financial management and the higher
education coordinating board concurrent with the institution's
submittal of their biennial capital budget requests.
(3)(a) The higher education coordinating board, in consultation
with the office of financial management and the joint legislative audit
and review committee, shall develop common definitions that public
four-year institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall use in developing their project lists under this
section.
(b) As part of its duties under RCW 28B.80.330(4), the higher
education coordinating board shall, as part of its biennial budget
guidelines, disseminate, by December 1st of each odd-numbered year, the
criteria framework, including general definitions, categories, and
rating system, to be used by the public four-year institutions in the
development of the prioritized four-year project list. The criteria
framework shall specify the general priority order of project types
based on criteria determined by the board, in consultation with the
public four-year institutions.
(c) Under RCW 28B.80.330(4), the public four-year institutions
shall submit a preliminary prioritized four-year project list to the
higher education coordinating board by August 1st of each even-numbered
year.
(d) The state board for community and technical colleges shall, as
part of its biennial capital budget request, submit a single
prioritized ranking of the individual projects proposed for the
community and technical colleges. The state board for community and
technical colleges shall submit an outline of the prioritized community
and technical college project list to the higher education coordinating
board under RCW 28B.80.330(4) by August 1st of each even-numbered year.
(4) The higher education coordinating board, in consultation with
the public four-year institutions, shall resolve any disputes or
disagreements arising among the four-year institutions concerning the
ranking of particular projects. Further, should one or more governing
boards of the public four-year institutions fail to approve the
prioritized four-year project list as required in this section, or
should a prioritized project list not be submitted by the public four-year institutions concurrent with the submittal of their respective
biennial capital budget requests as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, the higher education coordinating board shall prepare the
prioritized four-year institution project list itself.
(5) In developing any rating and ranking of capital projects
proposed by the two-year and four-year public universities and
colleges, the board:
(a) Shall be provided with available information by the public two-year and four-year institutions as deemed necessary by the board;
(b) May utilize independent services to verify, sample, or evaluate
information provided to the board by the two-year and four-year
institutions; and
(c) Shall have full access to all data maintained by the office of
financial management and the joint legislative audit and review
committee concerning the condition of higher education facilities.
(6) Beginning with the 2005-2007 biennial capital budget submittal,
the higher education coordinating board shall, in consultation with the
state board for community and technical colleges and four-year colleges
and universities, submit its capital budget recommendations and the
separate two-year and four-year prioritized project lists.

--- END ---