BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the unemployment
insurance system must continue to fulfill its fundamental purposes of
providing workers with partial wage replacement when they are
unemployed through no fault of their own, and providing communities
with economic stability to counter the effects of an economic downturn.
The legislature also finds that the system should be modified to
eliminate certain inequities in the unemployment insurance system and
that changes should make the system more fair, predictable, and stable.

--- END ---