BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.270 and 1997 c 291 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The total replacement plate fee shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund.
(1) Upon the loss, defacement, or destruction of one or both of the
vehicle license number plates issued for any vehicle where more than
one plate was originally issued or where one or both have become so
illegible or in such a condition as to be difficult to distinguish, or
upon the owner's option, the owner of the vehicle shall make
application for new vehicle license number plates upon a form furnished
by the director. The application shall be filed with the director or
the director's authorized agent, accompanied by the certificate of
license registration of the vehicle and a fee in the amount of three
dollars per plate, whereupon the director, or the director's authorized
agent, shall issue new vehicle license number plates to the applicant.
It shall be accompanied by a fee of two dollars for a new motorcycle
license number plate.
(2) If an owner of a vehicle must replace the license plates
because the current license plate or plates have been stolen, the
department shall not impose the fees provided for in subsection (1) of
this section if the owner submits a copy of the police report
indicating that the owner reported the theft of the plates. The
department must provide a declaration form or include a declaration
statement on the existing replacement plate application form that
requires the owner to attest to the fact that the license plate or
plates were stolen.
(3) In the event the director has issued license period tabs or a
windshield emblem instead of vehicle license number plates, and upon
the loss, defacement, or destruction of the tabs or windshield emblem,
application shall be made on a form provided by the director and in the
same manner as above described, and shall be accompanied by a fee of
one dollar for each pair of tabs or for each windshield emblem,
whereupon the director shall issue to the applicant a duplicate pair of
tabs, year tabs, and when necessary month tabs or a windshield emblem
to replace those lost, defaced, or destroyed.
(4) For vehicles owned, rented, or leased by the state of
Washington or by any county, city, town, school district, or other
political subdivision of the state of Washington or United States
government, or owned or leased by the governing body of an Indian tribe
as defined in RCW 46.16.020, a fee shall be charged for replacement of
a vehicle license number plate only to the extent required by the
provisions of RCW 46.16.020, ((46.16.061,)) 46.16.237, and 46.01.140.
(5) For vehicles owned, rented, or leased by foreign countries or
international bodies to which the United States government is a
signatory by treaty, the payment of any fee for the replacement of a
vehicle license number plate shall not be required.

--- END ---