BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Spinal cord stimulators are effective sources of pain relief
for patients with chronic pain conditions and are covered by forty-nine
of fifty state industrial insurance programs as well as medicare,
medicaid, and all major private insurers in the state of Washington.
Many Washington self-insurers cover the machines under their industrial
insurance as well.
(2) Patients cannot be expected to return to a productive life or
carry out the activities of daily living if they are in severe chronic
pain. Pain control is an essential feature of any muscular-skeletal
rehabilitation regimen. Spinal cord stimulators are often preferable
to the administration of oral narcotics because they dramatically
reduce the adverse side effects of narcotics.
(3) Recent advances in medical technology have substantially
improved the life and performance of the implanted devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop treatment guidelines for spinal
cord stimulators at least in accordance with relevant standards adopted
by national payors and most state industrial insurance programs.
Nothing in this section prevents the department from making informed
decisions about the appropriateness of the device in a specific case in
accordance with the standards referred to in this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "spinal cord stimulator"
means a device that delivers low voltage electrical stimulation to the
spinal cord to block the sensation of pain. The device is implantable
and consists of a lead that delivers the stimulation to the spinal cord
and an extension wire that conducts electrical pulses from the battery
power source to the lead. The device covers or masks the sensation of
pain with a tingling sensation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---