BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that Article IX
of the Washington state Constitution provides that, "It is the
paramount duty of the state to make ample provision for the education
of all children residing within its borders, without distinction or
preference on account of race, color, caste, or sex" and that "The
legislature shall provide for a general and uniform system of public
schools." The legislature finds that children have different learning
styles and needs and that parent and family involvement in educational
activities is critical to the academic achievement of children and
crucial to the success of all K-12 educational programs. Families have
the right and responsibility to be active partners and participants in
the education of their children based on the needs of each child.
Although the value of parent and family involvement in educational
activities is without question, certain barriers to parent and family
participation in school activities exist, including, but not limited
to, work schedules, illness, disabilities, poverty, limited English
proficiency, lack of transportation, cultural differences, lack of
child care, and incarceration. Written contracts and verbal
expectations mandating parent and family participation in school
activities create unfair barriers to program admission for many
students who would otherwise benefit from a diversity of educational
opportunities. Most of these barriers are economic in nature,
preventing many parents and families with lower incomes from
participating in certain alternative educational programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
Traditional and alternative educational opportunities shall be made
available to students on a general, uniform, and equal basis. Schools
shall not create barriers to admission for students who would otherwise
benefit from traditional or alternative educational opportunities. The
admission criteria for any traditional or alternative common school
program shall not include any written or verbal requirement or
expectation that parents or family members must volunteer or
participate in school activities for a child to attend the program.
Parent and family involvement in school programs and activities shall
be valued and encouraged but not required for school or program
admission. A child shall not be denied admission into any traditional
or alternative classroom because of disabilities caused by a family's
economic or social status, including the inability or unwillingness of
a parent or family member to volunteer, provide transportation, or
participate in school activities. Traditional and alternative common
school programs shall be free of tuition whether required in the form
of dollars or hours of labor.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.320.140 and 1997 c 266 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School district boards of directors may establish schools or
programs which parents may choose for their children to attend in
which: (a) Students are required to conform to dress and grooming
codes, including requiring that students wear uniforms; (b) parents are
((required)) regularly encouraged to participate in the student's
education; or (c) discipline requirements are more stringent than in
other schools in the district.
(2) School district boards of directors may establish schools or
programs in which: (a) Students are required to conform to dress and
grooming codes, including requiring that students wear uniforms; (b)
parents are regularly ((counseled and)) encouraged to participate in
the student's education; or (c) discipline requirements are more
stringent than in other schools in the district. School boards may
require that students who are subject to suspension or expulsion attend
these schools or programs as a condition of continued enrollment in the
school district.
(3) If students are required to wear uniforms in these programs or
schools, school districts shall accommodate students so that the
uniform requirement is not an unfair barrier to school attendance and
participation.
(4) Nothing in this section impairs or reduces in any manner
whatsoever the authority of a board under other law to impose a dress
and appearance code. However, if a board requires uniforms under such
other authority, it shall accommodate students so that the uniform
requirement is not an unfair barrier to school attendance and
participation.
(5) School district boards of directors may adopt dress and
grooming code policies which prohibit students from wearing gang-related apparel. If a dress and grooming code policy contains this
provision, the school board must also establish policies to notify
students and parents of what clothing and apparel is considered to be
gang-related apparel. This notice must precede any disciplinary action
resulting from a student wearing gang-related apparel.
(6) School district boards of directors may not adopt a dress and
grooming code policy which precludes students who participate in
nationally recognized youth organizations from wearing organization
uniforms on days that the organization has a scheduled activity or
prohibit students from wearing clothing in observance of their
religion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
Acceptance to a traditional or alternative school program shall not
be determined by parents or family members of participants in
traditional or alternative school programs.

--- END ---