BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the traditional
state revenue sources for providing state assistance for common school
construction are insufficient for the level of support the state would
prefer to provide. One method the legislature intends to use to
increase available resources in the future is to endow the permanent
common school fund so that investment income provides more significant
revenues for common school construction in the future. While this
process will take several years, the legislature intends to begin by
depositing revenue from the following sources into the permanent common
school fund: (1) The amount of federal forest revenue currently
credited against the state basic education allocation; (2) five percent
of the lottery revenue going into the education construction account;
and (3) project savings going into the common school construction
account under chapter . . ., (House Bill No. 1789) Laws of 2003. The
federal forest revenue deposit into the permanent common school fund is
intended to be accomplished in this act. The lottery revenue and
project savings are intended to be done in each biennial capital
budget.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.520.020 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 113 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a fund known as the federal forest revolving
account. The state treasurer, who shall be custodian of the revolving
account, shall deposit into the revolving account the funds for each
county received by the state in accordance with Title 16, section 500,
United States Code. The state treasurer shall distribute these moneys
to the counties according to the determined proportional area. The
county legislative authority shall expend fifty percent of the money
for the benefit of the public roads and other public purposes as
authorized by federal statute or public schools of such county and not
otherwise. Disbursements by the counties of the remaining fifty
percent of the money shall be as authorized by the superintendent of
public instruction, or the superintendent's designee, and shall occur
in the manner provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) No later than thirty days following receipt of the funds from
the federal government, the superintendent of public instruction shall
apportion moneys distributed to counties for schools to public school
districts in the respective counties in proportion to the number of
full time equivalent students enrolled in each public school district
to the number of full time equivalent students enrolled in public
schools in the county. In apportioning these funds, the superintendent
of public instruction shall utilize the October enrollment count.
(3) ((If)) The amount received by any public school district
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section is ((less than the basic
education allocation to which the district would otherwise be entitled,
the superintendent of public instruction shall apportion to the
district, in the manner provided by RCW 28A.510.250, an amount which
shall be the difference between the amount received pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section and)) in addition to the basic education
allocation to which the district would otherwise be entitled.
(4) All federal forest funds shall be expended in accordance with
the requirements of Title 16, section 500, United States Code, as now
existing or hereafter amended.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.250 and 1990 c 33 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
From those funds made available by the legislature for the current
use of the common schools, the superintendent of public instruction
shall distribute annually as provided in RCW 28A.510.250 to each school
district of the state operating a program approved by the state board
of education an amount which, when combined with an appropriate portion
of such locally available revenues, ((other than receipts from federal
forest revenues distributed to school districts pursuant to RCW
28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020,)) as the superintendent of public
instruction may deem appropriate for consideration in computing state
equalization support, excluding excess property tax levies, will
constitute a basic education allocation in dollars for each annual
average full time equivalent student enrolled, based upon one full
school year of one hundred eighty days, except that for kindergartens
one full school year shall be one hundred eighty half days of
instruction, or the equivalent as provided in RCW 28A.150.220.
However, the superintendent of public instruction shall subtract from
the distribution to school districts an amount equal to the amount of
receipts from federal forest revenues distributed to the school
districts under RCW 28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020 and this amount shall
be deposited into the permanent common school fund in RCW 28A.515.300.
Basic education shall be considered to be fully funded by those
amounts of dollars appropriated by the legislature pursuant to RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 to fund those program requirements
identified in RCW 28A.150.220 in accordance with the formula and ratios
provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and those amounts of dollars appropriated
by the legislature to fund the salary requirements of RCW 28A.150.100
and 28A.150.410.
Operation of a program approved by the state board of education,
for the purposes of this section, shall include a finding that the
ratio of students per classroom teacher in grades kindergarten through
three is not greater than the ratio of students per classroom teacher
in grades four and above for such district: PROVIDED, That for the
purposes of this section, "classroom teacher" shall be defined as an
instructional employee possessing at least a provisional certificate,
but not necessarily employed as a certificated employee, whose primary
duty is the daily educational instruction of students: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the state board of education shall adopt rules and
regulations to insure compliance with the student/teacher ratio
provisions of this section, and such rules and regulations shall allow
for exemptions for those special programs and/or school districts which
may be deemed unable to practicably meet the student/teacher ratio
requirements of this section by virtue of a small number of students.
If a school district's basic education program fails to meet the
basic education requirements enumerated in RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.220, the state board of education shall
require the superintendent of public instruction to withhold state
funds in whole or in part for the basic education allocation until
program compliance is assured: PROVIDED, That the state board of
education may waive this requirement in the event of substantial lack
of classroom space.

--- END ---