BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
industrial insurance system administered by the department of labor and
industries is being affected by a period of national and state economic
uncertainty that has reduced investment income and increased stresses
on the system. It is the intent of the legislature to address these
short-term economic problems with policy changes that assist this
industrial insurance system through this period of uncertainty and that
meet all of the following goals:
(1) The policy changes should treat workers fairly without
affecting their long-standing rights under the system;
(2) The policy changes should support a sound and stable financial
basis for the system; and
(3) The policy changes should allow immediate efficiencies in
administration.

--- END ---