BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer shall provide the following information to an
applicant for a position of employment:
(a) The nature of the work;
(b) The hours of work expected each week;
(c) The wage rate paid for each hour;
(d) Any benefits provided, including but not limited to health
insurance, sick leave, vacation leave, and child care;
(e) The conditions of work, including but not limited to available
shifts and meal and rest breaks;
(f) Any required alcohol or controlled substances testing; and
(g) Any required uniforms as defined in RCW 49.12.450 or other
required apparel.
(2) The employer must provide the information specified in
subsection (1) of this section to the applicant in writing, and within
twenty-four hours of receiving his or her application for the position
of employment.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Employer" means a person who had ten or more full-time
equivalent employees in the previous year; and
(b) "Position" means a position of employment paying less than one
hundred fifty percent of the minimum wage rate calculated under RCW
49.46.020.
(4) The legislature declares that the public policies articulated
in this section depend on the procedures established in this section
and no civil or criminal action may be maintained relying on the public
policies articulated in this section without complying with the
procedures set forth in this section, and to that end all civil actions
and civil causes of action for such injuries and all jurisdiction of
the courts of this state over such causes are hereby abolished, except
as provided in this section.

--- END ---