BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that graduating from
high school is an important indicator of how students will fare later
in life. High school graduates are almost twice as likely as dropouts
to be gainfully employed. Salaries of working graduates are nearly
twice as high as those enjoyed by dropouts who work. Students who fail
to graduate from high school are also significantly more likely to
become single parents and have children at young ages. Students who do
not graduate from high school are significantly more likely to rely
upon public assistance or be in prison.
The legislature finds that there is a correlation between the
dropout rates of youth and the rate of truancy within the educational
system. The state must have as a priority the reduction in the rates
of truancy and dropouts in the state educational system. The state
must encourage the districts to adopt policies which reduce the rates
of truancy and dropouts within the schools in their districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A school district may choose to utilize the procedure set out
in subsection (2) of this section to increase the district's funding
allocated under RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350.
(2) A school district shall receive increased funding under RCW
28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350 if the district increases its
attendance percentage. For every percentage increase in attendance
percentage for the prior school year compared to the attendance
percentage for the school year immediately preceding the prior school
year, the allocation received by the district under RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350 shall be increased by one percent. For
every percentage decrease in the attendance percentage for the prior
school year compared to the year immediately preceding the prior school
year, the district's allocation under RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and
28A.150.350 shall be decreased by one percent except that in no case
shall the adjustment under this subsection result in an allocation that
is less than the allocation under RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and
28A.150.350.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Average daily attendance" means the aggregate attendance of a
district during a school year divided by the number of days a district
is in session.
(b) "Average daily enrollment" means the aggregate enrollment of a
district during a school year divided by the number of days a district
is in session.
(c) "Attendance percentage" means the average daily attendance
divided by the average daily enrollment.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.225.010 and 1998 c 244 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All parents in this state of any child eight years of age and
under eighteen years of age shall cause such child to attend the public
school of the district in which the child resides and such child shall
have the responsibility to and therefore shall attend for the full time
when such school may be in session unless:
(a) The child is attending an approved private school for the same
time or is enrolled in an extension program as provided in RCW
28A.195.010(4);
(b) The child is receiving home-based instruction as provided in
subsection (((4))) (5) of this section;
(c) The child is attending an education center as provided in
chapter 28A.205 RCW;
(d) The ((school district superintendent of the district in which
the child resides shall have excused such child from attendance because
the child is physically or mentally unable to attend school,)) child is
attending a residential school operated by the department of social and
health services((,));
(e) The child is incarcerated in an adult correctional facility((,
or has been temporarily excused upon the request of his or her parents
for purposes agreed upon by the school authorities and the parent:
PROVIDED, That such excused absences shall not be permitted if deemed
to cause a serious adverse effect upon the student's educational
progress: PROVIDED FURTHER, That students excused for such temporary
absences may be claimed as full time equivalent students to the extent
they would otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and shall not affect school district
compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220));
(f) The child's absence qualifies under one of the following
excused absences and, if the absence qualifies, a student shall be
allowed one makeup day for each day of absence:
(i) Participation in a school-approved activity is excused if this
absence is authorized by a staff member and the affected teacher is
notified prior to the absence unless it is clearly impossible to do so;
(ii) An absence due to illness, health condition, or family
emergency is excused if the parent notifies the school office on the
morning of the first day of the absence and sends a signed note of
explanation with the student upon his or her return to school unless
the parent is unable to comply with this requirement. Adult students
age eighteen or over and students age sixteen or over who have been
emancipated by court action shall notify the school office of their
absences with a signed note of explanation;
(iii) An absence for religious purposes is excused if a parent
requests that a student be excused from attending school in observance
of a religious holiday. In addition, a student, upon the request of
his or her parent, may be excused for a portion of a school day to
participate in religious instruction provided such is not conducted on
school property;
(iv) An absence for parental-approved activities is excused if it
is agreed to by the principal and the parent. An absence may not be
approved if it causes a serious adverse effect on the student's
educational progress. In participation-type classes, such as certain
music and physical education classes, the student may not be able to
achieve the objectives of the unit of instruction as a result of
absence from class. In such a case, a parent-approved absence would
have an adverse effect on the student's educational progress which
would ultimately be reflected in the grade for such a course;
(v) An absence resulting from disciplinary actions, or short-term
suspensions;
(vi) An absence due to an extended illness or health condition; or
(((e))) (g) The child is sixteen years of age or older and:
(i) The child is regularly and lawfully employed and either the
parent agrees that the child should not be required to attend school or
the child is emancipated in accordance with chapter 13.64 RCW;
(ii) The child has already met graduation requirements in
accordance with state board of education rules and regulations; or
(iii) The child has received a certificate of educational
competence under rules and regulations established by the state board
of education under RCW 28A.305.190.
(2) A child's absence from school is unexcused if it does not meet
the definition of an excused absence in this section.
(3) A parent for the purpose of this chapter means a parent,
guardian, or person having legal custody of a child.
(((3))) (4) An approved private school for the purposes of this
chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be one approved under regulations
established by the state board of education pursuant to RCW
28A.305.130.
(((4))) (5) For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200
RCW, instruction shall be home-based if it consists of planned and
supervised instructional and related educational activities, including
a curriculum and instruction in the basic skills of occupational
education, science, mathematics, language, social studies, history,
health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of an
appreciation of art and music, provided for a number of hours
equivalent to the total annual program hours per grade level
established for approved private schools under RCW 28A.195.010 and
28A.195.040 and if such activities are:
(a) Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only
and are supervised by a certificated person. A certificated person for
purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be a person
certified under chapter 28A.410 RCW. For purposes of this section,
"supervised by a certificated person" means: The planning by the
certificated person and the parent of objectives consistent with this
subsection; a minimum each month of an average of one contact hour per
week with the child being supervised by the certificated person; and
evaluation of such child's progress by the certificated person. The
number of children supervised by the certificated person shall not
exceed thirty for purposes of this subsection; or
(b) Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only
and who has either earned forty-five college level quarter credit hours
or its equivalent in semester hours or has completed a course in home-based instruction at a postsecondary institution or a vocational-technical institute; or
(c) Provided by a parent who is deemed sufficiently qualified to
provide home-based instruction by the superintendent of the local
school district in which the child resides.
(((5))) (6) The legislature recognizes that home-based instruction
is less structured and more experiential than the instruction normally
provided in a classroom setting. Therefore, the provisions of
subsection (((4))) (5) of this section relating to the nature and
quantity of instructional and related educational activities shall be
liberally construed.

--- END ---