BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW
to read as follows:
In no case may a secure community transition facility sited under
this chapter, including a facility sited under RCW 71.09.342, be
located on state-owned land managed by the department of natural
resources where current or future public recreational opportunities
exist. This section does not apply to the secure community transition
facility authorized by RCW 71.09.250(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The provisions of this act are retroactive
as well as prospective and apply to all sites and possible sites for
secure community transition facilities selected before, on, or after
the effective date of this act except for the facility authorized by
RCW 71.09.250(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---