BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds there is a rising
trend of spiraling credit card debt owed by college students and that
the major contributing factor to deep student debt is the unchecked
prevalence of unsolicited credit card applications on college campuses.
Many of these credit card offers extend thousands of dollars in credit
to students who provide little more than a signature and a student
identification card. The legislature finds that eighty-three percent
of undergraduate students have at least one credit card and carry an
average credit card debt of three thousand dollars. The legislature
further finds that banks and credit card companies are increasingly
using offers of free merchandise to encourage students to apply for
credit cards.
The legislature finds that financially inexperienced students may
become trapped in a cycle of credit card debt, crippling their ability
to qualify for the student loans necessary to complete their education
and their ability to purchase a car and obtain a mortgage after
graduation. The legislature further finds that reasonable restrictions
on the marketing of credit cards to college students by banks and
credit card companies serve a significant state interest in providing
a buffer between the aggressive marketing tactics pursued by some banks
and credit card companies and the students who have not yet developed
the financial skills to avoid unmanageable credit card debt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community colleges
shall require a bank or credit card company that intends to solicit
business from students on the institution's campus to register with the
institution before engaging in marketing activities on campus.
However, this section shall not be construed to require an institution
to permit the marketing of credit cards to students on the
institution's campus.
(2) A bank or credit card company permitted to engage in marketing
activities on an institution's campus shall not be permitted to:
(a) Advertise or offer free merchandise and incentives to students
as part of a credit card marketing effort; or
(b) Engage in door-to-door solicitation of business from students
in a residence facility operated by, or under contract to operate with,
the institution of higher education or to engage in direct marketing to
students in a dining facility operated by, or under contract to operate
with, the institution of higher education.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a bank or
credit card company extending a credit card offer to students on the
campus of an institution of higher education shall provide debt
management seminars free of charge to students. Such seminars shall be
offered on campus at times and in places convenient to students no less
often than the bank or credit card company is present on the campus for
the purpose of soliciting business from students. The times and
locations of debt management seminars required under this subsection
shall be provided to the institution at the time the bank or credit
card company registers with the institution as required in subsection
(1) of this section.
(4) A bank or credit union operating an authorized branch location
on the campus of an institution of higher education may extend a credit
card offer to a student within the normal course of banking business
conducted within the confines of the bank or credit union branch
facility.
(5) The governing boards of the state and regional universities,
The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges
shall not permit the selling of student directory information to a bank
or credit card company by the institution.
(6) Each institution of higher education shall establish and
maintain a do not contact list and shall inform students of the
availability of the list and the procedures for voluntary participation
in the list. A do not contact list shall consist of the names, phone
numbers, and addresses of those students requesting that a bank or
credit card company refrain from contacting the student with an
unsolicited credit card offer. The institution of higher education
shall incorporate the do not contact list, including an express
requirement that the students listed shall not be contacted with
unsolicited offers, into any contract or agreement with a bank or
credit card company for the solicitation of business from students on
campus.
(7) As used in this section, "campus" has the definition used by
each institution of higher education for the purpose of crime
statistics reporting required by RCW 28B.10.569.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---