BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that manufacturing
remains a vital component of the Washington economy. The manufacturing
sector accounts for thirteen percent of all employment in Washington,
provides sixteen percent of total wages in the state, and supports
high-wage jobs. The average wage in manufacturing is routinely the
highest of all major industry groups. Manufacturing also has a
significant multiplier effect; every manufacturing job adds another one
and one-half to three jobs to the region's economy.
The legislature also recognizes that manufacturing has long been
subject to the ups and downs of market cycles, and the pressures of an
increasingly competitive global market. In addition, manufacturing in
Washington has suffered the effects of national and state recessions,
and soft global markets for specific products such as aircraft and
electronics. In recent years, manufacturing employment has declined.
The consequence of this downward trend on the Washington economy is
significant by reducing personal income and local tax revenues.
For these reasons, the legislature declares that new efforts aimed
at revitalizing the manufacturing sector are essential. Therefore, a
collaborative partnership of stakeholders should be convened to direct
research and advise stakeholders on how best to revitalize the
manufacturing sector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An advisory partnership on the Washington manufacturing sector
is established. The partnership shall consist of eight members: One
member from each caucus of the house of representatives, each member
being a member of the house of representatives commerce and labor
committee, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
one member from each caucus of the senate, each member being a member
of the senate commerce and trade committee, appointed by the president
of the senate; two members representing labor, appointed jointly by the
president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives, from a list of names recommended by a statewide
organization representing a cross-section and majority of organized
labor in the state; two members representing business, appointed
jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives, from a list of names recommended by a statewide
organization of employers representing a majority of employers of the
state.
(2) The manufacturing advisory partnership shall have access to and
the assistance of the labor market and economic analysis branch of the
employment security department and other state agencies as necessary to
perform studies, develop recommendations, and report to the legislature
concerning issues related to the manufacturing sector.
(3) The manufacturing advisory partnership shall study and make
findings and recommendations related to the following aspects of
Washington's manufacturing sector:
(a) The work force education and training needs of the
manufacturing sector;
(b) The use of manufacturing skill standards to enhance work force
development and human resources practices;
(c) The activities necessary to develop regionally strategic
industry clusters; and
(d) Other issues identified by the partnership.
(4) The manufacturing advisory partnership shall report its
findings and recommendations to the commerce and labor committee of the
house of representatives and the commerce and trade committee of the
senate by December 1 of each year.

--- END ---