BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Washington state heritage license plate series" means a series of
eight license plate designs displaying colorful pictorial images that
are depictive of the state of Washington. The eight plates must have
the following basic design themes: Orca, Steelhead trout, Lewis and
Clark, Chief Seattle and the story pole, Willow Goldfinch, Western
Hemlock, Washington state ferry, and Space Needle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall convene a task force comprised of four
legislative members, one from each caucus of the house of
representatives and of the senate, a representative from the Washington
state patrol, and a representative from the department. This task
force shall work together to create and design the special Washington
state heritage license plate series incorporating the basic themes
listed in section 1 of this act. The task force may solicit
suggestions from the general public for the designs of the plates,
involving school children, amateur and professional artists, and
others. This solicitation may take the form of a competition with
appropriate recognition for the chosen designs. The task force shall
ensure that all necessary rights are secured to display the images on
the license plates. It is the intent of the legislature that the
Washington state heritage license plate series will be a source of
pride for all residents of Washington state, from the east, west,
north, and south. The license plate designs must be selected
considering the marketability of the plates so as to ensure that the
plate designs will appeal to as much of the state's population as
possible. License plates in the series may contain a slogan to
describe the content or idea of each individual plate design.
The department shall cooperate with advocacy groups, nonprofit
agencies, and others interested in the identified themes to promote the
sale of the Washington state heritage license plate series to their
members and others interested in displaying the plates and supporting
the associated accounts and trust funds.
The department shall issue the Washington state heritage license
plates. The heritage plates may be used in lieu of regular or
personalized license plates for vehicles required to display one or two
vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter
46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the department.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee of no more than forty
dollars for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section
5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration
of this program. ((Until December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed
thirty-five dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations due or to
become due on January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to no
more than forty dollars.)) This fee is in addition to all other fees
required to register and license the vehicle for which the plates have
been requested. All such additional special license plate fees
collected by the department shall be deposited in the state treasury
and credited to the motor vehicle fund.
(2) ((Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application, registration, and renewal
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license
plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder
of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(((4) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(((5))) (4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(((6) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a
Washington state heritage license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The department
shall remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state
treasurer, who shall credit the remaining funds in accordance with
section 5 of this act.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a Washington state
heritage license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The department shall remit the
remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer, who shall
credit the remaining funds in accordance with section 5 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.316 and 1997 c 291 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.16.305:
(1) When a person who has been issued a special license plate or
plates under section 2 of this act or RCW 46.16.301 as it existed
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, sells,
trades, or otherwise transfers or releases ownership of the vehicle
upon which the special license plate or plates have been displayed, he
or she shall immediately report the transfer of such plate or plates to
an acquired vehicle or vehicle eligible for such plates pursuant to
departmental rule, or he or she shall surrender such plates to the
department immediately if such surrender is required by departmental
rule. If a person applies for a transfer of the plate or plates to
another eligible vehicle, a transfer fee of five dollars shall be
charged in addition to all other applicable fees. Such transfer fees
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Failure to surrender the
plates when required is a traffic infraction.
(2) If the special license plate or plates issued by the department
become lost, defaced, damaged, or destroyed, application for a
replacement special license plate or plates shall be made and fees paid
as provided by law for the replacement of regular license plates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The proceeds generated from the sale of the Washington state
heritage license plate series are intended to benefit various state
activities and interests. The proceeds from the sale of each license
plate theme within the series must be distributed in the following
manner:
(1) Orca theme heritage license plate sale proceeds must be
credited to the vessel response account under RCW 90.56.335;
(2) Steelhead trout theme heritage license plate sale proceeds must
be credited to the natural science, wildlife, and environmental
education partnership account under RCW 28A.300.445;
(3) Lewis and Clark theme heritage license plate sale proceeds must
be credited to the oral history, state library, and archives account
under RCW 43.07.380;
(4) Chief Seattle and story pole theme heritage license plate sale
proceeds must be credited to the American Indian endowed scholarship
trust fund under RCW 28B.108.050;
(5) Willow Goldfinch theme heritage license plate sale proceeds
must be credited to the habitat conservation account under RCW
79A.15.020;
(6) Western Hemlock theme heritage license plate sale proceeds must
be credited to the state parks renewal and stewardship account in RCW
79A.05.215;
(7) Washington state ferry theme heritage license plate sale
proceeds must be credited to the multimodal transportation account
under RCW 47.66.070; and
(8) Space Needle theme heritage license plate sale proceeds must be
credited to the tourism development and promotion account in RCW
43.330.094.

--- END ---