BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.28.181 and 1998 c 35 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any municipality may impose an excise
tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is
subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW. The rate of tax shall not
exceed the lesser of two percent or a rate that, when combined with all
other taxes imposed upon sales of lodging within the municipality under
this chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.40, 82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals
twelve percent. A tax under this chapter shall not be imposed in
increments smaller than tenths of a percent.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:
(a) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this
chapter or RCW 67.40.100 or both with a total rate exceeding four
percent before July 27, 1997, such total authorization shall continue
through January 1, 1999, and thereafter the municipality may impose a
tax under this section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually
imposed by the municipality on January 1, 1999.
(b) If a city or town, other than a municipality imposing a tax
under (a) of this subsection or a city or town located in more than one
county, is located in a county that imposed taxes under this chapter
with a total rate of four percent or more on January 1, 1997, the city
or town may not impose a tax under this section.
(c) If a city has a population of four hundred thousand or more and
is located in a county with a population of one million or more, the
rate of tax imposed under this chapter by the city shall not exceed the
lesser of four percent or a rate that, when combined with all other
taxes imposed upon sales of lodging in the municipality under this
chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.40, 82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals
fifteen and two-tenths percent.
(d) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this
chapter or RCW 67.40.100, or both, at a rate equal to six percent
before January 1, 1998, the municipality may impose a tax under this
section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually imposed by the
municipality on January 1, 1998.
(3) A city or town located in more than one county may impose a tax
under this section in each county at the maximum rate that is allowed
in that county.
(4) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted under this section
shall contain a provision allowing a credit against the county tax for
the full amount of any city or town tax imposed under this section upon
the same taxable event.

--- END ---