BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS--INTENT--SHORT TITLE. The
legislature finds that currently in the state of Washington, race car
driving schools are not subject to any form of licensing or regulation.
The lack of oversight and industry accountability creates a potential
for the operation of unsafe equipment and the employment of
inconsistent safety standards. Ashley Bergman, who was sixteen years
old, was killed while learning to drive a late model division race car
at a race car driving school in Yakima, Washington. The death of
Ashley caused many to evaluate the safety standards and emergency
preparedness of these types of schools. It was discovered in this
evaluation that no state in the United States regulates this industry
and most of the schools in Washington state operate in the absence of
critical safety policies and practices, such as having standby
emergency care staff on the premises, and conducting regular safety
checks of the vehicle's equipment. It is therefore the intent of the
legislature to create a regulatory environment in which race car
driving schools must operate in order that the consumers of this
industry will be assured that steps have been taken to create a safe
environment for them to learn in. In memory of the tragic loss of
Ashley Bergman, this act shall be known as the "Ashley Bergman Safety
Act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(3) "School" means race car driving school.
(4) "Most recent standard" means standards specified by a
sanctioning body no more than six months before the date of
registration or reregistration of a school, whichever is later.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 REGISTRATION REQUIRED. (1) All race car
driving schools operating in this state must register with the
department and obtain a license to operate in this state. The license
is valid for a period of two years. Applications for registration and
licensing must be on forms provided by the department.
(2) The director may require any information and documentation that
reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets
the criteria for registration and licensing provided for in this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 APPLICATION--FEE. Initial application to
the department for registration and licensing must be accompanied with
the payment of an application fee of fifty dollars, to be deposited
into the multimodal transportation account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RENEWAL--FEE. Licenses issued by the
department to race car driving schools must be renewed on January 1st
of the second year after initial issuance and must meet the
requirements set forth in section 6 of this act. The fee to renew the
license is thirty dollars and must be deposited into the multimodal
transportation account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS AND CRITERIA. (1)
For a race car driving school to qualify for a license to operate in
this state, the following must be demonstrated to the department's
satisfaction:
(a) The vehicles in operation at the school and the track used by
the school must adhere to safety-related specifications set forth in
the rule books of one of the following sanctioning bodies:
(i) The National Association of Stock Car Auto Racing;
(ii) The Sports Car Club of America;
(iii) The National Hot Rod Association;
(iv) The National Auto Sport Association;
(v) The Championship Auto Racing Teams; or
(vi) The Indy Racing League.
(b) If a school is using a vehicle type or a track not included in
the specifications of one of the sanctioning bodies provided for in (1)
of this section, the director shall determine the eligibility of the
school and use of the vehicle or track on a case by case basis under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(c) At the time the school is registered and licensed, the vehicles
in operation and the track being used must meet the most recent
standards set forth by the relevant sanctioning body.
(2) An ambulance, as provided for in RCW 18.73.030, and a certified
paramedic, as provided for in RCW 18.71.200, must be present and onsite
at all times when the school's track is in use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 OPERATING WITHOUT A LICENSE--PENALTY. It is
a gross misdemeanor for a race car driving school to operate in this
state without a valid license from the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 INVESTIGATION OF BUSINESS PRACTICES. If a
vehicle operated by a race car driving school is involved in an
accident during operation by a student or employee of the school that
results in an injury or a death, an investigation by the law
enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the school is required.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RULES. The director may adopt rules
necessary to carry out this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Captions used in this act are not part of
the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---