BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the state as
a whole benefits from investment in distressed communities because it
promotes emergency community and economic development. Private
investment stimulates business activity and helps retain and create
jobs; stimulates the redevelopment of brownfields and blighted areas in
the inner city; and promotes efficient redevelopment of industrial,
manufacturing, and new land uses. The legislature finds that these
activities generate revenue for the state and that it is in the public
interest to invest in these projects through tax deferrals against the
state sales and use tax to those local governments that can demonstrate
the expected returns to the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3)(a) "Investment project" means construction of site preparation,
structures, infrastructure, and the acquisition of related machinery
and equipment when the structures, machinery, and equipment
installations are used in the operation of a community increment area
revitalization project, or any identifiable part related to promote
community and economic development, due to redevelopment of brownfields
and blighted areas in the inner city; promotes private investments that
generate revenue for the local and state governments; and is in the
public interest to invest in these projects through a state sales and
use tax deferral to those local governments that can demonstrate the
expected returns to the state.
(b) The lessor/owner of a structure is not eligible for a deferral
unless the underlying ownership of the structures, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person, or unless the lessor by
written contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the deferral to
the lessee in the form of reduced rent payments.
(c) "Investment project" includes any portion of an increment area
investment project undertaken by a light and power business as defined
in RCW 82.16.010(5), and that portion of a cogeneration project that is
used to generate power for consumption within the increment area of
which the cogeneration project is an integral part.
(d) "Investment project" includes expenditures for historic
preservation activities authorized under RCW 35.21.395.
(e) "Investment project" includes structures or installation of
machinery and equipment, including labor and services rendered in the
planning, installation, and construction of the project within the
increment area.
(4) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(5) "Structures" means existing and new edifices such as offices,
entertainment facilities, maintenance facilities, cold storage
facilities, parking facilities, transportation facilities,
infrastructure, and other structures that are an essential or integral
part of the increment area investment project. The term also includes
corporate offices located within the increment area investment project
and includes hotels or motels if such facilities are located within the
increment area investment project.
(6) "Machinery and equipment" means all fixtures, equipment, and
support facilities that are an integral and necessary part of the
investment project, including buses or other means of vehicular
transportation, rolling stock and rail improvements, sky rail, and any
fixtures and equipment integral to qualifying structures.
(7) "Recipient" means a person exempt from tax under section 501(c)
of the internal revenue code, receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(8) "Increment area" means the geographic area from which a local
government defines an inner city area that qualifies for a distressed
community revitalization project under this chapter and:
(a) Is a site of at least one hundred fifty acres;
(b) Has at least twenty acres of publicly owned open space used for
public park and outdoor community recreational activities adjacent to
the increment area;
(c) Has at least one hundred acres of public land used for
recreational golf adjacent to the increment area;
(d) Has existing standard gauge freight or passenger rail
infrastructure developed and servicing it;
(e) Has existing egress and ingress and is no greater distance than
one mile from a state and federal highway system; and
(f) Is on a site with water rights allowing a wide variety of
facilities to be designed around a particular recreational subject or
idea.
(9) "Amusement park" means an entertainment facility within a
designated increment area, and is described under subsections (5) and
(6) of this section.
(10) "Cogeneration project" means any investment project related to
generating power for consumption within the increment area or any
integral part of producing power to distribute into an existing power
grid and subject to sale to a light and power business.
(11) "Improvement costs" means the costs of: (a) Design, planning,
acquisition, including land acquisition, site preparation including
land clearing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
improvement, and installation of private improvements; (b) demolishing,
relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of
private improvements; (c) relocating utilities as a result of private
improvements; (d) financing private improvements, including interest
during construction, legal and other professional services, taxes,
insurance, principal and interest costs on general indebtedness issued
to finance private improvements, and any necessary reserves for general
indebtedness; and (e) administrative expenses and feasibility studies
reasonably necessary and related to these costs, including related
costs that may have been incurred before authorizing the private
improvements and the use of community revitalization financing to fund
the costs of the private improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Application for deferral of taxes under this
chapter must be made before initiation of the construction of the
increment area investment project or acquisition of equipment or
machinery. Application shall be made to the department in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The application shall contain
information regarding the location of the increment area investment
project, estimated or actual costs, time schedules for completion and
operation, and other information required by the department. The
department shall rule on the application within sixty days. An
applicant may apply for a separate deferral for each identifiable part
of a project, such as the amusement park, the infrastructure,
structures, machinery and equipment, the retail stores, the
restaurants, the parking facilities, and the hotels. Each separate
deferral need not overcome the initiation of construction threshold as
long as the initial construction of the project was begun before
January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, taxes deferred under this chapter must be repaid.
(2) If, on the basis of a report under section 5 of this act or
other information, the department finds that an investment project is
used for purposes other than an approved private investment project at
any time during the calendar year in which the investment project is
certified by the department as being operationally complete, or at any
time during any of the four succeeding calendar years, a portion of
deferred taxes is immediately due according to the following schedule:

Year in which use occurs % of distributed taxes due

1 100.0%

2 87.5%

3 75.0%

4 62.5%

5 50.0%

6 37.5%

7 25.0%

8 12.5%

The department shall assess interest at the rate provided for
delinquent taxes, but not penalties, retroactively to the date of
deferral. The debt for deferred taxes will not be extinguished by
insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership
does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is transferred, subject
to the successor meeting the eligibility requirements of this chapter,
for the remaining periods of the deferral.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Each recipient of a deferral granted under
this chapter shall submit a report to the department on December 31st
of the year in which the investment project is certified by the
department as being operationally complete, and on December 31st of
each of the seven succeeding calendar years. The report shall contain
information, as required by the department, from which the department
may determine whether the recipient is meeting the requirements of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Each recipient of a deferral granted under
this chapter shall distribute taxes to a local government located
within the county where the investment project is developed according
to the schedule in this section.

Year in which use occurs Private applicant payments Private applicant deferral

1 0 100

2 0 90

3 0 80

4 0 70

5 70 0

6 80 0

7 90 0

8 160 0

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall
not apply to sales to an increment area amusement park development, or
to increment area sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the machinery and equipment, but only when the purchaser
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department by rule. The seller shall retain a copy
of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Machinery and equipment" with regard to the increment area
does not include:
(i) Hand-powered tools;
(ii) Property with a useful life of less than one year;
(iii) Buildings, other than machinery and equipment that is
permanently affixed to or becomes a physical part of a building; and
(iv) Building fixtures that are not integral to the investment
project operation and amusement park.
(b) "Manufacturing" means the portion of a cogeneration project
that is used to generate power for consumption within the increment
area site of which the cogeneration project is an integral part. The
term includes the production of electricity by a light and power
business as defined in RCW 82.16.010. The term includes the
preparation of food products on the premises of a person selling food
products at retail within the increment area.
(c) "Cogeneration" means the simultaneous generation of electrical
energy and low-grade heat from the same fuel or other energy fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---