BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.34.090 and 1984 c 258 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county legislative authority shall provide for the bonding
of each district judge, district judge pro tempore, district court
commissioner, clerk of the district court, and court employee, at the
expense of the county, in such amount as the county legislative
authority shall prescribe, conditioned that each such person will pay
over according to law all moneys which shall come into the person's
custody in causes filed in the district court. Such bond shall not be
less than the maximum amount of money liable to be under the control,
at any one time, of each such person in the performance of his or her
duties. Such bond may be a blanket bond.
(2) The county legislative authority may provide for employee
fidelity insurance in lieu of a bond described in this section,
provided that the amount of insurance equals or exceeds the amount of
the bond. If the county obtains employee fidelity or errors and
omissions insurance covering district court personnel, the costs of
such coverage shall be a reimbursable expense pursuant to RCW 3.62.050
as now or hereafter amended.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.16.050 and 1991 c 363 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every county official before he or she enters upon the duties
of his or her office shall furnish a bond conditioned that he or she
will faithfully perform the duties of his or her office and account for
and pay over all money which may come into his or her hands by virtue
of his or her office, and that he or she, or his or her executors or
administrators, will deliver to his or her successor safe and undefaced
all books, records, papers, seals, equipment, and furniture belonging
to his or her office. Bonds of elective county officers shall be as
follows:
(((1))) (a) Assessor: Amount to be fixed and sureties to be
approved by proper county legislative authority;
(((2))) (b) Auditor: Amount to be fixed at not less than ten
thousand dollars and sureties to be approved by the proper county
legislative authority;
(((3))) (c) Clerk: Amount to be fixed in a penal sum not less than
double the amount of money liable to come into his or her hands and
sureties to be approved by the judge or a majority of the judges
presiding over the court of which he or she is clerk: PROVIDED, That
the maximum bond fixed for the clerk shall not exceed in amount that
required for the treasurer in a county of that class;
(((4))) (d) Coroner: Amount to be fixed at not less than five
thousand dollars with sureties to be approved by the proper county
legislative authority;
(((5))) (e) Members of the proper county legislative authority:
Sureties to be approved by the county clerk and the amounts to be:
(((a))) (i) In each county with a population of one hundred twenty-five thousand or more, twenty-five thousand dollars;
(((b))) (ii) In each county with a population of from seventy
thousand to less than one hundred twenty-five thousand, twenty-two
thousand five hundred dollars;
(((c))) (iii) In each county with a population of from forty
(([thousand])) thousand to less than seventy thousand, twenty thousand
dollars;
(((d))) (iv) In each county with a population of from eighteen
thousand to less than forty thousand, fifteen thousand dollars;
(((e))) (v) In each county with a population of from twelve
thousand to less than eighteen thousand, ten thousand dollars;
(((f))) (vi) In each county with a population of from eight
thousand to less than twelve thousand, seven thousand five hundred
dollars;
(((g))) (vii) In all other counties, five thousand dollars;
(((6))) (f) Prosecuting attorney: In the amount of five thousand
dollars with sureties to be approved by the proper county legislative
authority;
(((7))) (g) Sheriff: Amount to be fixed and bond approved by the
proper county legislative authority at not less than five thousand nor
more than fifty thousand dollars; surety to be a surety company
authorized to do business in this state;
(((8))) (h) Treasurer: Sureties to be approved by the proper
county legislative authority and the amounts to be fixed by the proper
county legislative authority at double the amount liable to come into
the treasurer's hands during his or her term, the maximum amount of the
bond, however, not to exceed:
(((a))) (i) In each county with a population of two hundred ten
thousand or more, two hundred fifty thousand dollars;
(((b))) (ii) In each county with a population of from one hundred
twenty-five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand, two hundred
thousand dollars;
(((c))) (iii) In each county with a population of from eighteen
thousand to less than one hundred twenty-five thousand, one hundred
fifty thousand dollars;
(((d))) (iv) In all other counties, one hundred thousand dollars.
The treasurer's bond shall be conditioned that all moneys received
by him or her for the use of the county shall be paid as the proper
county legislative authority shall from time to time direct, except
where special provision is made by law for the payment of such moneys,
by order of any court, or otherwise, and for the faithful discharge of
his or her duties.
Bonds for other than elective officials, if deemed necessary by the
proper county legislative authority, shall be in such amount and form
as such legislative authority shall determine.
In the approval of official bonds, the chair may act for the county
legislative authority if it is not in session.
(2) The county legislative authority may provide for employee
fidelity insurance in lieu of a bond described in this section,
provided that the amount of insurance equals or exceeds the amount of
the bond.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.16.060 and 1963 c 4 s 36.16.060 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every county officer, before entering upon the duties of his
office, shall file his oath of office in the office of the county
auditor and his official bond or certificate of employee fidelity
insurance in the office of the county clerk: PROVIDED, That the
official bond or certificate of insurance of the county clerk, after
first being recorded by the county auditor, shall be filed in the
office of the county treasurer.
Oaths and bonds or certificates of employee fidelity insurance of
deputies shall be filed in the offices in which the oaths and bonds of
their principals are required to be filed.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.23.020 and 1963 c 4 s 36.23.020 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the judge or judges of any court, or a majority of them,
believe that the clerk of the court does not have a good and sufficient
bond on file, ((or)) that the bond is not large enough in amount, or
that employee fidelity insurance obtained pursuant to RCW 36.16.050(2)
is inadequate, such judge or judges shall enter an order requiring
((him)) the clerk, within such time as may be specified in the order,
to execute and present to them a good and sufficient bond, in such sum
as may be fixed by the order. In case of ((his)) the clerk's failure
to file the bond within ten days from the expiration of the date fixed
the judge or judges shall declare the office vacant.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.28.030 and 1963 c 4 s 36.28.030 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the company acting as surety on the official bond or
employee fidelity insurance of a sheriff is disqualified, insolvent, or
the ((penalty)) amount of the bond or insurance becomes insufficient on
account of recovery had thereon, or otherwise, the sheriff shall submit
a new or additional bond or a certificate of new or additional
insurance for approval ((to)) of the board of county commissioners, if
in session, or, if not in session, for the approval of the chairman of
such board, and file the same, when approved, in the office of the
county clerk of his county, and such new or additional bond or
insurance shall be ((in a penal sum)) sufficient in amount to equal the
sum specified in the original bond or insurance when added to the
((penalty)) amount of any existing bond, so that under one or more
bonds or employee fidelity insurance policies there shall always be an
enforceable obligation of the surety on the official bond or bonds or
insurance of the sheriff in a penal sum of not less than the amount of
the bond or insurance as originally approved.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.32.060 and 1963 c 4 s 36.32.060 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The bond of each member of the county ((commissioner))
legislative authority shall be payable to the county, and it shall be
conditioned that the ((commissioner)) member shall well and faithfully
discharge the duties of his or her office, and not approve, audit, or
order paid any illegal, unwarranted, or unjust claim against the county
for personal services.
(2) If a county obtains employee fidelity insurance for members of
the legislative authority in lieu of a bond pursuant to RCW
36.16.050(2), the insurance shall be in a form as determined
appropriate by the county legislative authority.

Sec. 7 RCW 65.12.060 and 1907 c 250 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Deputy registrars shall perform any and all duties of the registrar
in the name of the registrar, and the acts of such deputies shall be
held to be the acts of the registrar, and in the case of the death of
the registrar or his removal from office, the vacancy shall be filled
in the same manner as is provided by law for filling such vacancy in
the office of the county auditor. The person so appointed to fill such
vacancy shall ((file a bond and)) be vested with the same powers as the
registrar whose office he is appointed to fill.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 65.12.055 (Bond of registrar) and 1907
c 250 s 10 are each repealed.

--- END ---