BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
State agencies, when planning for the construction of a state
facility, must consider the implementation and utilization of fuel cell
technology as a primary source of energy for a facility that requires
a source of uninterrupted electric power. As used in this section,
"fuel cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates
electricity by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence
of a catalyst. "State facilities" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 43.19.450.

--- END ---