BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act shall be known and cited as the
Washington state equal rights, not special rights act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW
to read as follows:
Neither the state of Washington, nor its political subdivisions,
shall deny any right expressly guaranteed by the Constitution of the
state of Washington or the Constitution of these United States of
America.
Persons who commit acts of violence against the person or property
of others should be prosecuted and appropriately punished in order to
protect law-abiding citizens and to ensure the guarantee of equal
justice for all.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The people find that equal protection of the law, not special
rights, is a fundamental principle of constitutional government and is
essential to the well-being and perpetuation of a free society.
The people further find that there is a legitimate and compelling
state interest in ensuring equal protection of the law for all citizens
and in preventing special rights based on any homosexual, bisexual,
transsexual, or transvestite status, preference, orientation, conduct,
act, practice, or relationship.
The people further find that there is a legitimate and compelling
state interest in ensuring that the rights of parents to control the
education of their children and that the sincerely held values and
beliefs of citizens regarding homosexuality, bisexuality,
transsexuality, or transvestism are not denigrated or denied by the
public schools and that homosexuality, bisexuality, transsexuality, or
transvestism are not presented, promoted, or approved as positive,
healthy, or appropriate behavior.
The people further find that "the duty of all teachers" as required
in RCW 28A.405.030 "to endeavor to impress on the minds of their pupils
the principles of morality, truth, justice, temperance, humanity and
patriotism" and "to teach them to avoid idleness, profanity and
falsehood" is an indispensable prerequisite for providing a sound
education, maintaining a virtuous and ethical society, and guaranteeing
the rights of all citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW
to read as follows:
Neither the state of Washington, nor its political subdivisions,
including counties, cities, towns, and school districts, shall by any
means or instrumentality, enact or enforce a policy whereby any
homosexual, bisexual, transsexual, or transvestite status, preference,
orientation, conduct, act, practice, or relationship, or gender
expression or identity shall be a basis for a person to maintain any
special classification or privilege; minority status; quota preference;
affirmative action right; legal standing; public benefit; marital,
spousal, parental, familial, or domestic privilege, advantage,
entitlement, benefit, position, or status; claim of discrimination; or
special right or protection.
A school, through any employee, volunteer, guest, agent, or other
means or instrumentality, shall not present, promote, or approve
homosexuality, bisexuality, transsexuality, or transvestism, or any
such conduct, act, practice, or relationship, or gender expression or
identity as a positive, healthy, or appropriate behavior or lifestyle.
As used in this section, "school" means any common school of the state
of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The provisions of this act are to be
liberally construed to effectuate the policies and purposes of this
act. In the event of conflict between this act and any other provision
of law, the provisions of this act shall govern.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The secretary of state shall submit this act
to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the
next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

--- END ---