BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.36.080 and 1993 c 127 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious harassment if he or she
maliciously and intentionally commits one of the following acts because
of ((his or her perception of)) the victim's race, color, religion,
ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, or mental,
physical, or sensory handicap:
(a) Causes physical injury to the victim or another person;
(b) Causes physical damage to or destruction of the property of the
victim or another person; or
(c) Threatens a specific person or ((group of)) specific persons
and places that person((, or members of the specific group of)) or
those persons, in reasonable fear of harm to person or property. The
fear must be a fear that a reasonable person would have under all the
circumstances. ((For purposes of this section, a "reasonable person"
is a reasonable person who is a member of the victim's race, color,
religion, ancestry, national origin, gender, or sexual orientation, or
who has the same mental, physical, or sensory handicap as the victim.))
Words alone do not constitute malicious harassment unless the context
or circumstances surrounding the words indicate the words are a threat.
Threatening words do not constitute malicious harassment if it is
apparent to the victim that the person does not have the ability, will,
or intent to carry out the threat.
(2) In any prosecution for malicious harassment, unless evidence
exists which explains to the trier of fact's satisfaction that the
person did not intend to threaten the victim or victims, the trier of
fact may infer that the person intended to threaten a specific victim
or group of victims because of the person's perception of the victim's
or victims' race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender,
((sexual orientation)) sexuality, or mental, physical, or sensory
handicap if the person commits one of the following acts:
(a) Burns a cross on property of a victim who is or whom the actor
perceives to be of African American heritage; or
(b) Defaces property of a victim who is or whom the actor perceives
to be of Jewish heritage by defacing the property with a swastika.
This subsection only applies to the creation of a reasonable
inference for evidentiary purposes. This subsection does not restrict
the state's ability to prosecute a person under subsection (1) of this
section when the facts of a particular case do not fall within (a) or
(b) of this subsection.
(3) It is not a defense that the accused was mistaken that the
victim was a member of a certain race, color, religion, ancestry,
national origin, gender, or sexual orientation, or had a mental,
physical, or sensory handicap.
(4) Evidence of expressions or associations of the accused may not
be introduced as substantive evidence at trial unless the evidence
specifically relates to the crime charged. Nothing in this chapter
shall affect the rules of evidence governing impeachment of a witness.
(5) Every person who commits another crime during the commission of
a crime under this section may be punished and prosecuted for the other
crime separately.
(6) "((Sexual orientation)) Sexuality" for the purposes of this
section means ((heterosexuality, homosexuality, or bisexuality)) sexual
practices or conduct.
(7) Malicious harassment is a class C felony.
(8) The penalties provided in this section for malicious harassment
do not preclude the victims from seeking any other remedies otherwise
available under law.
(9) Nothing in this section confers or expands any civil rights or
protections to any group or class identified under this section, beyond
those rights or protections that exist under the federal or state
Constitution or the civil laws of the state of Washington.
(10) Nothing in this section restricts or burdens any legal right
of a person under the federal or state constitution or the civil laws
of the state of Washington to consider a person's sexuality in making
decisions regarding employment, credit and insurance transactions,
places of public resort, accommodation, or amusement, and real property
transactions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The provisions of this act are to be
liberally construed to effectuate the policies and purposes of this
act. In the event of conflict between this act and any other provision
of law, the provisions of this act shall govern.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The secretary of state shall submit this act
to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the
next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

--- END ---