BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act shall be known and cited as the
Washington state defense of marriage act.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.04.020 and 1998 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Marriages in the following cases are prohibited:
(a) When either party thereto has a wife or husband living at the
time of such marriage;
(b) When the husband and wife are nearer of kin to each other than
second cousins, whether of the whole or half blood computing by the
rules of the civil law; or
(c) When the parties are persons other than a male and a female.
(2) It is unlawful for any man to marry his father's sister,
mother's sister, daughter, sister, son's daughter, daughter's daughter,
brother's daughter or sister's daughter; it is unlawful for any woman
to marry her father's brother, mother's brother, son, brother, son's
son, daughter's son, brother's son or sister's son.
(3) A marriage between two persons that is recognized as valid in
another jurisdiction is valid in this state only if the marriage is not
prohibited ((or made unlawful)) under subsection (1)(a)((, (1))) or (c)
of this section, or unlawful under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The uniting of two persons in a nonmarital domestic
relationship, including a civil union, domestic partnership, or other
similar relationship when the persons are other than a male and a
female is not valid in this state, and such a uniting of two persons
recognized as valid in another jurisdiction is not recognized as valid
in this state.
(5) A person in a nonmarital domestic relationship shall not
qualify for, or receive, any spousal, familial, or marital benefit,
privilege, advantage, or entitlement, or any equivalent thereof, that
is paid for, directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, with public
funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The provisions of this act are to be
liberally construed to effectuate the policies and purposes of this
act. In the event of conflict between this act and any other provision
of law, the provisions of this act shall govern.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The secretary of state shall submit this act
to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the
next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

--- END ---