BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.030 and 2001 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The application for a certificate of ownership shall be upon a form
furnished or approved by the department and shall contain:
(1) A full description of the vehicle, which shall contain the
proper vehicle identification number, the number of miles indicated on
the odometer at the time of delivery of the vehicle, and any
distinguishing marks of identification;
(2) The name and address of the person who is to be the registered
owner of the vehicle and, if the vehicle is subject to a security
interest, the name and address of the secured party;
(3) Such other information as the department may require. The
department may in any instance, in addition to the information required
on the application, require additional information and a physical
examination of the vehicle or of any class of vehicles, or either. A
physical examination of the vehicle is mandatory if it has been rebuilt
after surrender of the certificate of ownership to the department under
RCW 46.12.070 due to the vehicle's destruction or declaration as a
total loss. The inspection must:
(a) Verify that the vehicle identification number is genuine and
agrees with the number shown on the title and registration certificate;
(b) Ensure that air bags are present on vehicles whose original
equipment included air bags. The inspection must be made by a member
of the Washington state patrol or other person authorized by the
department to make such inspections.
The application shall be subscribed by the registered owner and be
sworn to by that applicant in the manner described by RCW 9A.72.085.
The department shall retain the application in either the original,
computer, or photostatic form.

--- END ---