BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as follows:
(1) Any member retiring between September 1, 2003, and February 29,
2004, may irrevocably elect, at the time of retirement, to withdraw all
or a part of his or her accumulated contributions, other than any
amount paid under RCW 41.50.165, and to receive, in lieu of the full
retirement allowance provided by RCW 41.40.185, a reduction in the
standard two percent allowance, of the actuarially determined amount of
monthly annuity which would have been purchased by the contributions.
(2) No member electing the option provided in subsection (1) of
this section may withdraw an amount of accumulated contributions which
would lower his or her retirement allowance below the minimum allowance
provided by RCW 41.40.1984 on the date the withdrawal is made.
(3) The monthly retirement allowance of a member electing the
option provided in subsection (1) of this section may be reduced even
further pursuant to the options provided in RCW 41.40.188.
(4) If a retiree under this section enters employment with an
employer, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that
month up to a maximum reduction of one hundred percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 2" to read as follows:
(1) Any member with at least five service credit years who has
attained at least age sixty shall be eligible to retire between
September 1, 2003, and February 29, 2004, and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to RCW 41.40.620, except that a member
retiring under this section shall have his or her retirement allowance
reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age
sixty-five.
(2) The monthly retirement allowance of a member retiring under
this section may be reduced even further as provided in RCW 41.40.660.
(3) If a retiree under this section enters employment with an
employer, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that
month up to a maximum reduction of one hundred percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:
(1) Any member with at least five service credit years who has
attained at least age sixty shall be eligible to retire between
September 1, 2003, and February 29, 2004, and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to RCW 41.40.790, except that a member
retiring under this section shall have his or her retirement allowance
reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age
sixty-five.
(2) The monthly retirement allowance of a member retiring under
this section may be reduced even further as provided in RCW 41.40.845.
(3) If a retiree under this section enters employment with an
employer, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that
month up to a maximum reduction of one hundred percent.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.45.061 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 13, 2001 2nd sp.s.
c 11 s 12, and 2001 c 180 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The required contribution rate for members of the plan 2
teachers' retirement system shall be fixed at the rates in effect on
July 1, 1996, subject to the following:
(a) Beginning September 1, 1997, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, the employee contribution rate shall not exceed the
employer plan 2 and 3 rates adopted under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.053, and
41.45.070 for the teachers' retirement system;
(b) In addition, the employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall be
increased by fifty percent of the contribution rate increase caused by
any plan 2 benefit increase passed after July 1, 1996;
(c) In addition, the employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall
not be increased as a result of any distributions pursuant to section
309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998 and RCW 41.31A.020.
(2) The required contribution rate for members of the school
employees' retirement system plan 2 shall equal the school employees'
retirement system employer plan 2 and 3 contribution rate adopted under
RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.053, and 41.45.070, except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The member contribution rate for the school employees'
retirement system plan 2 shall be increased by fifty percent of the
contribution rate increase caused by any plan 2 benefit increase passed
after September 1, 2000.
(4) The required contribution rate for members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 shall be set at the same rate as
the employer combined plan 2 and plan 3 rate.
(5) The required contribution rate for members of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 shall
be set at fifty percent of the cost of the retirement system.
(6) The employee contribution rates for plan 2 under subsections
(3) and (4) of this section shall not include any increase as a result
of any distributions pursuant to RCW 41.31A.020 and 41.31A.030.
(7) The required plan 2 and 3 contribution rates for employers
shall be adopted in the manner described in RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.053,
and 41.45.070.
(8) The employee contribution rate for members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 and school employees' retirement
system plan 2 shall not include any increase as a result of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The monthly retirement allowance of a person retiring pursuant
to this act shall be temporarily increased by ten dollars per month per
year of service. This increase shall remain in effect for the first
twenty-four months of the person's retirement.
(2) Because of the temporary nature of this section it shall not be
codified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plans 2 and 3" to read as follows:
(1) Any member with at least five service credit years who has
attained at least age sixty shall be eligible to retire between
September 1, 2003, and February 29, 2004, and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to RCW 41.35.400 for plan 2 members or RCW
41.35.620 for plan 3 members, except that a member retiring under this
section shall have his or her retirement allowance reduced by three
percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years
between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(2) The monthly retirement allowance of a member retiring under
this section may be reduced even further as provided in RCW 41.35.220.
(3) If a retiree under this section enters employment with an
employer, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by
five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that
month up to a maximum reduction of one hundred percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The monthly retirement allowance of a person retiring pursuant
to this act shall be temporarily increased by ten dollars per month per
year of service. This increase shall remain in effect for the first
twenty-four months of the person's retirement.
(2) Because of the temporary nature of this section it shall not be
codified.

--- END ---