BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.17.020 and 2002 c 262 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter
clearly requires otherwise, the words or phrases defined in this
section shall have the indicated meanings.
(1) "Subdivision" is the division or redivision of land into
((five)) fifteen or more lots, tracts, parcels, sites, or divisions for
the purpose of sale, lease, or transfer of ownership, except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section.
(2) "Plat" is a map or representation of a subdivision, showing
thereon the division of a tract or parcel of land into lots, blocks,
streets and alleys, or other divisions and dedications.
(3) "Dedication" is the deliberate appropriation of land by an
owner for any general and public uses, reserving to himself or herself
no other rights than such as are compatible with the full exercise and
enjoyment of the public uses to which the property has been devoted.
The intention to dedicate shall be evidenced by the owner by the
presentment for filing of a final plat or short plat showing the
dedication thereon; and, the acceptance by the public shall be
evidenced by the approval of such plat for filing by the appropriate
governmental unit.
A dedication of an area of less than two acres for use as a public
park may include a designation of a name for the park, in honor of a
deceased individual of good character.
(4) "Preliminary plat" is a neat and approximate drawing of a
proposed subdivision showing the general layout of streets and alleys,
lots, blocks, and other elements of a subdivision consistent with the
requirements of this chapter. The preliminary plat shall be the basis
for the approval or disapproval of the general layout of a subdivision.
(5) "Final plat" is the final drawing of the subdivision and
dedication prepared for filing for record with the county auditor and
containing all elements and requirements set forth in this chapter and
in local regulations adopted under this chapter.
(6) "Short subdivision" is the division or redivision of land into
((four)) fourteen or fewer lots, tracts, parcels, sites, or divisions
for the purpose of sale, lease, or transfer of ownership. ((However,
the legislative authority of any city or town may by local ordinance
increase the number of lots, tracts, or parcels to be regulated as
short subdivisions to a maximum of nine. The legislative authority of
any county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that has adopted a
comprehensive plan and development regulations in compliance with
chapter 36.70A RCW may by ordinance increase the number of lots,
tracts, or parcels to be regulated as short subdivisions to a maximum
of nine in any urban growth area.))
(7) "Binding site plan" means a drawing to a scale specified by
local ordinance which: (a) Identifies and shows the areas and
locations of all streets, roads, improvements, utilities, open spaces,
and any other matters specified by local regulations; (b) contains
inscriptions or attachments setting forth such appropriate limitations
and conditions for the use of the land as are established by the local
government body having authority to approve the site plan; and (c)
contains provisions making any development be in conformity with the
site plan.
(8) "Short plat" is the map or representation of a short
subdivision.
(9) "Lot" is a fractional part of divided lands having fixed
boundaries, being of sufficient area and dimension to meet minimum
zoning requirements for width and area. The term shall include tracts
or parcels.
(10) "Block" is a group of lots, tracts, or parcels within well
defined and fixed boundaries.
(11) "County treasurer" shall be as defined in chapter 36.29 RCW or
the office or person assigned such duties under a county charter.
(12) "County auditor" shall be as defined in chapter 36.22 RCW or
the office or person assigned such duties under a county charter.
(13) "County road engineer" shall be as defined in chapter 36.40
RCW or the office or person assigned such duties under a county
charter.
(14) "Planning commission" means that body as defined in chapter
36.70, 35.63, or 35A.63 RCW as designated by the legislative body to
perform a planning function or that body assigned such duties and
responsibilities under a city or county charter.
(15) "County commissioner" shall be as defined in chapter 36.32 RCW
or the body assigned such duties under a county charter.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.44.050 and 1987 c 109 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
After June 6, 1945, no withdrawal of public ground waters of the
state shall be begun, nor shall any well or other works for such
withdrawal be constructed, unless an application to appropriate such
waters has been made to the department and a permit has been granted by
it as herein provided: EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That any withdrawal of public
ground waters for stock-watering purposes, or for the watering of a
lawn or of a noncommercial garden not exceeding one-half acre in
area((, or for single or group domestic uses)) is exempt from this
section. Further, any withdrawal of public ground water for
residential use in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a day
per residence, or for use within an approved group B water system, as
defined in WAC 246-291-010 as of the effective date of this act, in an
amount not to exceed five thousand gallons per day, or for an
industrial purpose in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a
day, is and shall be exempt from the provisions of this section, but,
to the extent that it is regularly used beneficially, shall be entitled
to a right equal to that established by a permit issued under the
provisions of this chapter: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the department
from time to time may require the person or agency making any such
small withdrawal to furnish information as to the means for and the
quantity of that withdrawal: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That at the option of
the party making withdrawals of ground waters of the state not
exceeding five thousand gallons per day, applications under this
section or declarations under RCW 90.44.090 may be filed and permits
and certificates obtained in the same manner and under the same
requirements as is in this chapter provided in the case of withdrawals
in excess of five thousand gallons a day.

--- END ---