BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.104.180 and 1993 c 387 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
No license under this chapter shall be required of:
(1) Any individual who personally constructs a well on land which
is owned or leased by the individual or in which the individual has a
beneficial interest as a contract purchaser and is used by the
individual for farm or single-family residential use only. An
individual who constructs a well without a license pursuant to this
subsection shall comply with all other requirements of this chapter and
rules adopted by the department, including but not limited to, well
construction standards, payment of well construction fees, and
notification of well construction required by RCW 18.104.048. An
individual without a license may construct not more than one well every
two years pursuant to the provisions of this subsection.
(2) An individual who performs labor or services for a well
contractor in connection with the construction of a well at the
direction and under the supervision and control of a licensed operator
who is present at the construction site.
(3) A person licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.08 ((or)),
18.43, or 18.220 RCW if in the performance of duties covered by those
licenses, and as long as those individuals complete a minimum of two
continuing education units per year that relate to well drilling
installation, safety, and other issues described in the drilling
regulations of chapter 173-160 WAC as it exists on the effective date
of this act.

--- END ---