BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a
significant backlog of preservation projects needed to maintain the
usefulness of buildings and protect the health and safety of students,
faculty, and the public. The legislature also finds that facility
inventory and condition data is independently produced and maintained
by each higher education institution. A 2002 legislative study
indicates that this independent data can be translated and calibrated
to a standard statewide data base while maintaining the individuality
of the institutions. Uniform and comprehensive facility inventory and
condition data will enable institutions and the legislature to
prioritize projects to reduce the preservation backlog and to prevent
the backlog from increasing. It will also enable the legislature to
use preservation standards along with mission, access, and program
considerations when determining capital priorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office, in consultation with the higher education
coordinating board and higher education institutions, shall establish
and maintain a system to collect and assemble existing facility data at
the various institutions and translate this information into a
comparable framework to create a statewide uniform building inventory
and condition system. This process must seek to minimize the needed
changes to current systems and reporting costs at the individual
institutions.
(2) The office and the higher education coordinating board shall
report to the legislature each December of even-numbered years on
progress made in establishing the inventory and condition system under
subsection (1) of this section, and progress made in addressing the
preservation backlog. The office shall add infrastructure to the
system and incorporate program suitability in prioritizing preservation
projects as soon as feasible.
(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee and the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee shall, upon
request, provide technical and system design assistance.
(4) The office may allow for possible expansion of this detailed
uniform statewide facility inventory and condition system for higher
education to other areas of state government.

--- END ---