BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, upon
every person engaging in this state in the business of providing
staffing services; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
such business shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of .484 percent. If the activities are
conducted both within and without this state, the amount of tax on such
person shall be equal to the apportioned gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of .484 percent.
(2) Persons providing staffing services to provide services that
would be taxable under RCW 82.04.050(2) if performed for a consumer,
remain taxable under RCW 82.04.050 or 82.04.060 as applicable.
(3) The apportioned gross income shall be calculated by multiplying
the apportionable income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the
sum of the property factor, if any, the payroll factor, if any, and the
sales factor, if any, and the denominator of which is three reduced by
the number of factors that have a denominator of zero. The
apportionment factors shall be calculated according to rules adopted by
the department consistent with the principles and concepts in chapter
82.56 RCW but are not required to be identical to those contained in
chapter 82.56 RCW. If the provisions of this section do not fairly
represent the extent of the taxpayer's business activity in this state,
the taxpayer may petition or the department may require the use of an
alternative apportionment method, if reasonable, such as separate
accounting, the exclusion of any one or more of the factors, or the
inclusion of one or more additional factors.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Apportionable income" means the gross income of the taxpayer,
less the exemptions and deductions allowable under this chapter.
(b) "Staffing services" means an arrangement in which the staffing
business recruits and hires its own employees from the labor market and
assigns them to perform services for another to support, supplement, or
provide their work force, or to provide assistance in special work
situations such as employee absences, skill shortages, and seasonal
workloads, or to perform special assignments or projects. "Staffing
services" includes recruitment and search firms that make job
placements on behalf of employers and job candidates. It includes all
receipts and charges associated with providing the workers.

--- END ---