BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that proper repair,
replacement, and maintenance work on elevators and other conveyances is
essential to protecting workers and the public. Therefore, the
legislature declares that certain work in particular facilities should
be subject to licensure, and that certain work in other facilities may
be subject to other appropriate means of ensuring worker and public
safety.

--- END ---