BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.16.105 and 1998 c 345 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Licensees of race meets that are nonprofit in nature and are of
ten days or less shall be exempt from payment of a parimutuel tax.
(2) Licensees that do not fall under subsection (1) of this section
shall withhold and pay to the commission daily for each authorized day
of parimutuel wagering the following applicable percentage of all daily
gross receipts from its in-state parimutuel machines:
(a) If the gross receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines
are more than fifty million dollars in the previous calendar year, the
licensee shall withhold and pay to the commission daily 1.30 percent of
the daily gross receipts; and
(b) If the gross receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines
are fifty million dollars or less in the previous calendar year, the
licensee shall withhold and pay to the commission daily ((0.52)) 1.803
percent of the daily gross receipts.
(3) In addition to those amounts in subsection (2) of this section,
a licensee shall forward one-tenth of one percent of the daily gross
receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines to the commission for
payment to those nonprofit race meets as set forth in RCW 67.16.130 and
subsection (1) of this section, but said percentage shall not be
charged against the licensee. Payments to nonprofit race meets under
this subsection shall be distributed on a pro rata per-race-day basis
and used only for purses at race tracks that have been operating under
RCW 67.16.130 and subsection (1) of this section for the five
consecutive years immediately preceding the year of payment. The
commission shall transfer funds generated under subsection (2) of this
section equal to the difference between funds collected under this
subsection (3) in a calendar year and three hundred thousand dollars,
and distribute that amount under this subsection (3).
(4) Beginning July 1, 1999, at the conclusion of each authorized
race meet, the commission shall calculate the mathematical average
daily gross receipts of parimutuel wagering that is conducted only at
the physical location of the live race meet at those race meets of
licensees with gross receipts of all their in-state parimutuel machines
of more than fifty million dollars. Such calculation shall include
only the gross parimutuel receipts from wagering occurring on live
racing dates, including live racing receipts and receipts derived from
one simulcast race card that is conducted only at the physical location
of the live racing meet, which, for the purposes of this subsection, is
"the handle." If the calculation exceeds eight hundred eighty-six
thousand dollars, the licensee shall within ten days of receipt of
written notification by the commission forward to the commission a sum
equal to the product obtained by multiplying 0.6 percent by the handle.
Sums collected by the commission under this subsection shall be
forwarded on the next business day following receipt thereof to the
state treasurer to be deposited in the fair fund created in RCW
15.76.115.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---