BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' plan 2 retirement board established in RCW 41.26.715 has
the following duties and powers in addition to any other duties or
powers authorized or required by law. The board:
(1) Shall employ staff as necessary to implement the purposes of
chapter 2, Laws of 2003. Staff must be state employees under Title 41
RCW;
(2) Shall adopt an annual budget as provided in RCW 41.26.720.
Expenses of the board are paid from the expense fund created in section
4 of this act;
(3) May make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and
other instruments necessary to exercise and discharge its powers and
duties;
(4) May contract for all or part of the services necessary for the
management and operation of the board with other state or nonstate
entities authorized to do business in the state; and
(5) May contract with actuaries, auditors, and other consultants as
necessary to carry out its responsibilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 44.44.040 and 1987 c 25 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of the state actuary shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) Perform all actuarial services for the department of retirement
systems, including all studies required by law. Reimbursement for such
services shall be made to the state actuary pursuant to the provisions
of RCW 39.34.130 as now or hereafter amended.
(2) Advise the legislature and the governor regarding pension
benefit provisions, and funding policies and investment policies of the
state investment board.
(3) Consult with the legislature and the governor concerning
determination of actuarial assumptions used by the department of
retirement systems.
(4) Prepare a report, to be known as the actuarial fiscal note, on
each pension bill introduced in the legislature which briefly explains
the financial impact of the bill. The actuarial fiscal note shall
include: (a) The statutorily required contribution for the biennium
and the following twenty-five years; (b) the biennial cost of the
increased benefits if these exceed the required contribution; and (c)
any change in the present value of the unfunded accrued benefits. An
actuarial fiscal note shall also be prepared for all amendments which
are offered in committee or on the floor of the house of
representatives or the senate to any pension bill. However, a majority
of the members present may suspend the requirement for an actuarial
fiscal note for amendments offered on the floor of the house of
representatives or the senate.
(5) Provide such actuarial services to the legislature as may be
requested from time to time.
(6) Provide staff and assistance to the committee established under
RCW ((46.44.050)) 44.44.050.
(7) Provide actuarial assistance to the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' plan 2 retirement board as provided in chapter 2,
Laws of 2003. Reimbursement for services shall be made to the state
actuary under RCW 39.34.130 and 41.26.720(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Not later than September 30, 2004, and every even-numbered year
thereafter, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
retirement board shall adopt contribution rates for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 as provided in
chapter 2, Laws of 2003.
(2) The law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
retirement board shall immediately notify the directors of the office
of financial management and department of retirement systems of the
state, employer, and employee rates adopted. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period subject to any legislative
modifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 2 expense fund is created in the state
treasury. Money in the expense fund may be spent only for the purposes
of defraying the administrative expenses of the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 retirement board. Administrative
expenses include, but are not limited to, the salaries and expenses of
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 retirement
board personnel including lease payments, travel, and goods and
services necessary for the operation of the board, audits, and other
general costs of conducting the business of the board.
(2) The board shall allocate from the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 fund to the expense fund
sufficient assets to defray the obligations of the fund including the
costs of board administration and reimbursement of the department of
retirement systems and the office of the state actuary. The board
shall notify the state treasurer of the allocation determination.
(3) Upon receipt of the notification to allocate money from the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 fund
to the expense fund, the state treasurer shall transfer the amount
determined by the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
board necessary to cover the expenses of the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' plan 2 retirement board.
(4) Money from the expense fund used for administrative expenses is
subject to the allotment of all expenditures pursuant to chapter 43.88
RCW, and an appropriation is required for all expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 All expenses of the department and the
office of the state actuary related to the implementation of chapter 2,
Laws of 2003 shall be reimbursed from the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system expense fund as provided for under RCW
39.34.130.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.84.092 and 2002 c 242 s 2, 2002 c 114 s 24, and
2002 c 56 s 402 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
the federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the
public health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2
expense fund, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real
estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the
medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the
multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice
assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement
account, the regional transportation investment district account, the
resource management cost account, the site closure account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state
employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation equipment
fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account,
the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1, 4, and 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 41.26 RCW and codified under the subchapter heading
"plan 2 management."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 In the event a final judicial decision
renders Initiative Measure No. 790 unenforceable, in whole or in part,
making this act or parts of this act unnecessary, unreasonable, or
impossible to implement, the director of the department of retirement
systems shall adopt rules as necessary to implement chapters 41.26 and
41.45 RCW as they existed on November 1, 2002. The director shall
prepare and submit corrective legislation to the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---