BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.88.110 and 1997 c 96 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section sets forth the expenditure programs and the allotment
and reserve procedures to be followed by the executive branch for
public funds.
(1) Allotments of an appropriation for any fiscal period shall
conform to the terms, limits, or conditions of the appropriation.
(2) The director of financial management shall provide all agencies
with a complete set of operating and capital instructions for preparing
a statement of proposed expenditures at least thirty days before the
beginning of a fiscal period. The set of instructions need not include
specific appropriation amounts for the agency.
(3) Within forty-five days after the beginning of the fiscal period
or within forty-five days after the governor signs the omnibus biennial
appropriations act, whichever is later, all agencies shall submit to
the governor a statement of proposed expenditures at such times and in
such form as may be required by the governor.
(4) The office of financial management shall develop a method for
monitoring capital appropriations and expenditures that will capture at
least the following elements:
(a) Appropriations made for capital projects including
transportation projects;
(b) Estimates of total project costs including past, current,
ensuing, and future biennial costs;
(c) Comparisons of actual costs to estimated costs;
(d) Comparisons of estimated construction start and completion
dates with actual dates;
(e) Documentation of fund shifts between projects.
This data may be incorporated into the existing accounting system
or into a separate project management system, as deemed appropriate by
the office of financial management.
(5) The office of financial management shall publish agency annual
maintenance summary reports beginning in October 1997. State agencies
shall submit a separate report for each major campus or site, as
defined by the office of financial management. Reports shall be
prepared in a format prescribed by the office of financial management
and shall include, but not be limited to: Information describing the
number, size, and condition of state-owned facilities; facility
maintenance, repair, and operating expenses paid from the state
operating and capital budgets, including maintenance staffing levels;
the condition of major infrastructure systems; and maintenance
management initiatives undertaken by the agency over the prior year.
Agencies shall submit their annual maintenance summary reports to the
office of financial management by September 1 each year.
(6) The office of financial management, prior to approving
allotments for major capital construction projects valued over five
million dollars, shall institute procedures for reviewing such projects
at the predesign stage that will reduce long-term costs and increase
facility efficiency. The procedures shall include, but not be limited
to, the following elements:
(a) Evaluation of facility program requirements and consistency
with long-range plans;
(b) Utilization of a system of cost, quality, and performance
standards to compare major capital construction projects; and
(c) A requirement to incorporate value-engineering analysis and
constructability review into the project schedule.
(7) No expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered into for
such major capital construction projects including, without exception,
land acquisition, site development, predesign, design, construction,
and equipment acquisition and installation, until the allotment of the
funds to be expended has been approved by the office of financial
management. This limitation does not prohibit the continuation of
expenditures and obligations into the succeeding biennium for projects
for which allotments have been approved in the immediate prior
biennium.
(8) If at any time during the fiscal period the governor projects
a cash deficit in a particular fund or account as defined by RCW
43.88.050, the governor shall make across-the-board reductions in
allotments for that particular fund or account so as to prevent a cash
deficit, unless the legislature has directed the liquidation of the
cash deficit over one or more fiscal periods. Except for the
legislative and judicial branches and other agencies headed by elective
officials, the governor shall review the statement of proposed
operating expenditures for reasonableness and conformance with
legislative intent. The governor may request corrections of proposed
allotments submitted by the legislative and judicial branches and
agencies headed by elective officials if those proposed allotments
contain significant technical errors. Once the governor approves the
((statements of)) proposed ((operating expenditures)) allotments,
further revisions ((shall)) may at the request of the office of
financial management or upon the agency's initiative be made ((only at
the beginning of the second fiscal year and must be initiated by the
governor)) on a quarterly basis and must be accompanied by an
explanation of the reasons for significant changes. However, changes
in appropriation level authorized by the legislature, changes required
by across-the-board reductions mandated by the governor, changes caused
by executive increases to spending authority, and changes caused by
executive decreases to spending authority for failure to comply with
the provisions of chapter 36.70A RCW may require additional revisions.
Revisions shall not be made retroactively. ((Revisions caused by
executive increases to spending authority shall not be made after June
30, 1987.)) However, the governor may assign to a reserve status any
portion of an agency appropriation withheld as part of across-the-board
reductions made by the governor and any portion of an agency
appropriation conditioned on a contingent event by the appropriations
act. The governor may remove these amounts from reserve status if the
across-the-board reductions are subsequently modified or if the
contingent event occurs. The director of financial management shall
enter approved statements of proposed expenditures into the state
budgeting, accounting, and reporting system within forty-five days
after receipt of the proposed statements from the agencies. If an
agency or the director of financial management is unable to meet these
requirements, the director of financial management shall provide a
timely explanation in writing to the legislative fiscal committees.
(9) It is expressly provided that all agencies shall be required to
maintain accounting records and to report thereon in the manner
prescribed in this chapter and under the regulations issued pursuant to
this chapter. Within ninety days of the end of the fiscal year, all
agencies shall submit to the director of financial management their
final adjustments to close their books for the fiscal year. Prior to
submitting fiscal data, written or oral, to committees of the
legislature, it is the responsibility of the agency submitting the data
to reconcile it with the budget and accounting data reported by the
agency to the director of financial management.
(10) ((The director of financial management shall monitor agency
operating expenditures against the approved statement of proposed
expenditures and shall provide the legislature with quarterly
explanations of major variances.
(11))) The director of financial management may exempt certain
public funds from the allotment controls established under this chapter
if it is not practical or necessary to allot the funds. Allotment
control exemptions expire at the end of the fiscal biennium for which
they are granted. The director of financial management shall report
any exemptions granted under this subsection to the legislative fiscal
committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---