BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' plan 2 retirement board established in section 4, chapter 2,
Laws of 2003 has the following duties and powers in addition to any
other duties or powers authorized or required by law. The board:
(1) Shall employ staff as necessary to implement the purposes of
chapter 2, Laws of 2003. Staff must be state employees under Title 41
RCW;
(2) Shall adopt an annual budget as provided in section 5, chapter
2, Laws of 2003. Expenses of the board are paid from the expense fund
created in section 6 of this act;
(3) May make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and
other instruments necessary to exercise and discharge its powers and
duties;
(4) May contract for all or part of the services necessary for the
management and operation of the board with other state or nonstate
entities authorized to do business in the state; and
(5) May contract with actuaries, auditors, and other consultants as
necessary to carry out its responsibilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 44.44.040 and 1987 c 25 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of the state actuary shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) Perform all actuarial services for the department of retirement
systems, including all studies required by law. Reimbursement for such
services shall be made to the state actuary pursuant to the provisions
of RCW 39.34.130 as now or hereafter amended.
(2) Advise the legislature and the governor regarding pension
benefit provisions, and funding policies and investment policies of the
state investment board.
(3) Consult with the legislature and the governor concerning
determination of actuarial assumptions used by the department of
retirement systems.
(4) Prepare a report, to be known as the actuarial fiscal note, on
each pension bill introduced in the legislature which briefly explains
the financial impact of the bill. The actuarial fiscal note shall
include: (a) The statutorily required contribution for the biennium
and the following twenty-five years; (b) the biennial cost of the
increased benefits if these exceed the required contribution; and (c)
any change in the present value of the unfunded accrued benefits. An
actuarial fiscal note shall also be prepared for all amendments which
are offered in committee or on the floor of the house of
representatives or the senate to any pension bill. However, a majority
of the members present may suspend the requirement for an actuarial
fiscal note for amendments offered on the floor of the house of
representatives or the senate.
(5) Provide such actuarial services to the legislature as may be
requested from time to time.
(6) Provide staff and assistance to the committee established under
RCW ((46.44.050)) 44.44.050.
(7) Provide actuarial assistance to the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' plan 2 retirement board as provided in chapter 2,
Laws of 2003. Reimbursement for services shall be made to the state
actuary under RCW 39.34.130 and section 5(5), chapter 2, Laws of 2003.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.45.060 and 2002 c 26 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state actuary shall provide actuarial valuation results
based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique
included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted by the council under RCW 41.45.030
or 41.45.035.
(2) Not later than September 30, 2002, and every two years
thereafter, consistent with the economic assumptions and asset value
smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW
41.45.030 or 41.45.035, the council shall adopt and may make changes
to:
(a) A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1;
(b) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the Washington
state patrol retirement system to be used in the ensuing biennial
period; and
(c) A basic employer contribution rate for the school employees'
retirement system for funding both that system and the public
employees' retirement system plan 1.
The contribution rates adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.
(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the
council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:
(a) To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
1 not later than June 30, 2024, except as provided in subsection (5) of
this section; and
(b) To also continue to fully fund the public employees' retirement
system plans 2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3,
and the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3((, and the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2))
in accordance with RCW 41.45.061, 41.45.067, and this section((; and
(c) For the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system
plan 2 the rate charged to employers, except as provided in RCW
41.26.450, shall be thirty percent of the cost of the retirement system
and the rate charged to the state shall be twenty percent of the cost
of the retirement system)).
(4) The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate
a combined plan 2 and 3 employer contribution rate and a Washington
state patrol retirement system contribution rate.
(5) The council shall immediately notify the directors of the
office of financial management and department of retirement systems of
the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative
modifications.
(6) The director of the department of retirement systems shall
collect the rates established in RCW 41.45.053 through June 30, 2003.
Thereafter, the director shall collect those rates adopted by the
council. The rates established in RCW 41.45.053, or by the council,
shall be subject to revision by the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Not later than September 30, 2004, and every even-numbered year
thereafter, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
retirement board shall adopt contribution rates for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 as provided in
RCW 41.26.720(1)(a).
(2) The law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
retirement board shall immediately notify the directors of the office
of financial management and department of retirement systems of the
state, employer, and employee rates adopted. Thereafter, the director
shall collect those rates adopted by the board. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative
modifications.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.45.070 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 16 and 2001 2nd
sp.s. c 11 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the basic employer contribution rate established
in RCW 41.45.060 ((or 41.45.053)), the department shall also charge
employers of public employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement
system, school employees' retirement system, or Washington state patrol
retirement system members an additional supplemental rate to pay for
the cost of additional benefits, if any, granted to members of those
systems. Except as provided in subsections (6) and (7) of this
section, the supplemental contribution rates required by this section
shall be calculated by the state actuary and shall be charged
regardless of language to the contrary contained in the statute which
authorizes additional benefits.
(2) In addition to the basic member, employer, and state
contribution rate established in ((RCW 41.45.060 or 41.45.053)) section
4 of this act for the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2, the department shall also establish ((a))
supplemental rates to pay for the cost of additional benefits, if any,
granted to members of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2. Except as provided in subsection (6) of this
section, ((this)) these supplemental rates shall be calculated by the
actuary retained by the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
board and the state actuary through the process provided in RCW
41.26.720(1)(a) and the state treasurer shall transfer the additional
required contributions regardless of language to the contrary contained
in the statute which authorizes the additional benefits.
(3) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
benefit increases provided to active members of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
Washington state patrol retirement system, shall be calculated as the
level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund the cost of the
benefit not later than June 30, 2024.
(4) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
benefit increases provided to active and retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, or the school employees'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3((, or the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2,)) shall be calculated as
the level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund the cost of the
benefit, as calculated under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, or 41.45.067.
(5) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
postretirement adjustments which are provided on a nonautomatic basis
to current retirees shall be calculated as the percentage of pay needed
to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the retirees. The
supplemental rate charged under this section to fund automatic
postretirement adjustments for active or retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 shall be calculated as the level percentage of pay needed to
fund the cost of the automatic adjustments not later than June 30,
2024.
(6) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws of
1998.
(7) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW;
section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998; or section 701, chapter 341,
Laws of 1998.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 2 expense fund is created within the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2
fund.
(2) The state investment board has the full power to invest,
reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment money in the
expense fund. The state investment board is authorized to adopt
investment policies for the money in the expense fund. All investment
and operating costs associated with the investment of money shall be
paid pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of
these expenses, the earnings from the investment of the money shall be
retained by the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 2 fund.
(3) All investments made by the investment board shall be made with
the exercise of that degree of judgment and care pursuant to RCW
43.33A.140 and the investment policy established by the state
investment board.
(4) When appropriate for investment purposes, the state investment
board may commingle money in the expense fund with other funds.
(5) The authority to establish all policies relating to the expense
fund, other than the investment policies as set forth in subsections
(2) through (4) of this section, resides with the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 retirement board. With the
exception of investments by, and expenses of, the state investment
board set forth in subsection (2) of this section, disbursements from
this expense fund may be made only on the authorization of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 retirement board, and
money in the expense fund may be spent only for the purposes of
defraying the expenses of the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' plan 2 retirement board as provided in section 5, chapter 2,
Laws of 2003.
(6) The state investment board shall routinely consult and
communicate with the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan
2 retirement board on the investment policy, earnings of the trust, and
related needs of the expense fund.
(7) The law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
retirement board shall administer the expense fund in a manner
reasonably designed to be actuarially sound. The assets of the expense
fund must be sufficient to defray the obligations of the account
including the costs of administration. Money used for administrative
expenses is subject to the allotment of all expenditures pursuant to
chapter 43.88 RCW. However, an appropriation is not required for
expenditures. Administrative expenses include, but are not limited to,
the salaries and expenses of law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' plan 2 retirement board personnel including lease payments,
travel, and goods and services necessary for operation of the board,
audits, and other general costs of conducting the business of the
board.
(8) The state investment board shall allocate from the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 fund
to the expense fund the amount necessary to cover the expenses of the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 retirement board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 All expenses of the department and the
office of the state actuary related to the implementation of chapter 2,
Laws of 2003 shall be reimbursed from the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system expense fund under RCW 39.34.130.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2002 c 322 s 5, 2002 c 204 s 7, and
2002 c 61 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
Washington state combined fund drive account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game farm alternative
account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the rural rehabilitation account,
the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility
account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, and the children's trust fund. However, the
earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to
the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1, 6, and 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 41.26 RCW and codified with the subchapter heading of
"plan 2 governance."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 In the event a final judicial decision
renders Initiative Measure No. 790 unenforceable, in whole or in part,
making this act or parts of this act unnecessary, unreasonable, or
impossible to implement, the director of the department of retirement
systems shall adopt rules as necessary to implement chapters 41.26 and
41.45 RCW as they existed on November 1, 2002. The director shall
prepare and submit corrective legislation to the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---