BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.725 and 2003 c 2 s 6 (Initiative Measure No.
790) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) The board of trustees shall establish contributions as set
forth in this section. The cost of the minimum benefits as defined in
this plan shall be funded on the following ratio:
Employee contributions 50%
Employer contributions 30%
State contributions 20%
(2) The minimum benefits shall constitute a contractual obligation
of the state and the contributing employers and may not be reduced
below the levels in effect on July 1, 2003. The state and the
contributing employers shall maintain the minimum benefits on a sound
actuarial basis in accordance with the actuarial standards adopted by
the board.
(3) Increased benefits created as provided for in RCW 41.26.720 are
granted on a basis not to exceed the contributions provided for in this
section. In addition to the contributions necessary to maintain the
minimum benefits, for any increased benefits provided for by the board,
the employee contribution shall not exceed fifty percent of the
actuarial cost of the benefit. In no instance shall the employee cost
exceed ten percent of covered payroll without the consent of a majority
of the affected employees. Employer contributions shall not exceed
thirty percent of the cost, but in no instance shall the employer
contribution exceed six percent of covered payroll. State
contributions shall not exceed twenty percent of the cost, but in no
instance shall the state contribution exceed four percent of covered
payroll. Employer contributions may not be increased above the maximum
under this section without the consent of the governing body of the
employer. State contributions may not be increased above the maximum
provided for in this section without the consent of the legislature.
In the event that the cost of maintaining the increased benefits on a
sound actuarial basis exceeds the aggregate contributions provided for
in this section, the board shall submit to the affected members of the
plan the option of paying the increased costs or of having the
increased benefits reduced to a level sufficient to be maintained by
the aggregate contributions. The reduction of benefits in accordance
with this section shall not be deemed a violation of the contractual
rights of the members, provided that no reduction may result in
benefits being lower than the level of the minimum benefits.
(4) The board shall manage the trust in a manner that maintains
reasonable contributions and administrative costs. Providing
additional benefits to members and beneficiaries is the board's
priority.
(((5) All earnings of the trust in excess of the actuarially
assumed rate of investment return shall be used exclusively for
additional benefits for members and beneficiaries.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---