BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.36.300 and 1985 c 450 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature declares it is the policy of the state to:
(1) Preserve affordable universal telecommunications service;
(2) Maintain and advance the efficiency and availability of
telecommunications service;
(3) Ensure that customers pay only reasonable charges for
telecommunications service;
(4) Ensure that rates for noncompetitive telecommunications
services do not subsidize the competitive ventures of regulated
telecommunications companies;
(5) Promote diversity in the supply of telecommunications services
and products in telecommunications markets throughout the state;
((and))
(6) Permit flexible regulation of competitive telecommunications
companies and services; and
(7) Ensure that rate of return, rate base regulation of
telecommunications companies is commensurate with the level of
competitive activity from alternative service providers in a company's
service territory.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.36.320 and 1998 c 337 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall classify a telecommunications company as
a competitive telecommunications company if the services it offers are
subject to effective competition. Effective competition means that the
company's customers have reasonably available alternatives and that the
company does not have a significant captive customer base. In
determining whether a company is competitive, factors the commission
shall consider include but are not limited to:
(a) The number and sizes of alternative providers of service;
(b) The extent to which services are available from alternative
providers in the relevant market;
(c) The ability of alternative providers to make functionally
equivalent or substitute services readily available at competitive
rates, terms, and conditions; ((and))
(d) The presence of all alternative service providers offering
alternative services in competition with a telecommunications company
without regard to the technology used by an alternative service
provider in providing alternative service.
(e) Other indicators of market power which may include market
share, growth in market share, ease of entry, and the affiliation of
providers of services.
The commission shall conduct the initial classification and any
subsequent review of the classification in accordance with such
procedures as the commission may establish by rule.
(2) Competitive telecommunications companies shall be subject to
minimal regulation. Minimal regulation means that competitive
telecommunications companies may file, instead of tariffs, price lists
that shall be effective after ten days' notice to the commission and
customers. The commission shall prescribe the form of notice. The
commission may also waive other regulatory requirements under this
title for competitive telecommunications companies when it determines
that competition will serve the same purposes as public interest
regulation. The commission may waive different regulatory requirements
for different companies if such different treatment is in the public
interest. A competitive telecommunications company shall at a minimum:
(a) Keep its accounts according to regulations as determined by the
commission;
(b) File financial reports with the commission as required by the
commission and in a form and at times prescribed by the commission;
(c) Keep on file at the commission such current price lists and
service standards as the commission may require; and
(d) Cooperate with commission investigations of customer
complaints.
(3) When a telecommunications company has demonstrated that the
equal access requirements ordered by the federal district court in the
case of U.S. v. AT&T, 552 F. Supp. 131 (1982), or in supplemental
orders, have been met, the commission shall review the classification
of telecommunications companies providing inter-LATA interexchange
services. At that time, the commission shall classify all such
companies as competitive telecommunications companies unless it finds
that effective competition, as defined in subsection (1) of this
section, does not then exist.
(4) The commission may revoke any waivers it grants and may
reclassify any competitive telecommunications company if the revocation
or reclassification would protect the public interest.
(5) The commission may waive the requirements of RCW 80.36.170 and
80.36.180 in whole or in part for a competitive telecommunications
company if it finds that competition will serve the same purpose and
protect the public interest.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.36.135 and 2000 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature declares that:
(a) Changes in technology and the structure of the
telecommunications industry ((may produce)) have produced conditions
under which traditional rate of return, rate base regulation of
telecommunications companies may not in all cases provide the most
efficient and effective means of achieving the public policy goals of
this state as declared in RCW 80.36.300, this section, and RCW
80.36.145. The commission should ((be authorized to)) employ an
alternative form of regulation if that alternative is better suited to
achieving those policy goals.
(b) Because of the great diversity in the scope and type of
services provided by telecommunications companies, including
alternative services and alternative service providers whether or not
the services or the providers are regulated by the commission,
alternative regulatory arrangements that meet the varying circumstances
of different companies and their ratepayers ((may be)) is desirable.
(2) Subject to the conditions set forth in this chapter and RCW
80.04.130, the commission may regulate telecommunications companies
subject to traditional rate of return, rate base regulation by
authorizing an alternative form of regulation. The commission may
determine the manner and extent of any alternative forms of regulation
as may in the public interest be appropriate. In addition to the
public policy goals declared in RCW 80.36.300, the commission shall
consider, in determining the appropriateness of any proposed
alternative form of regulation, whether it will:
(a) Facilitate the broad deployment of technological improvements
and advanced telecommunications services to underserved areas or
underserved customer classes;
(b) Improve the efficiency of the regulatory process;
(c) Preserve or enhance the development of effective competition
and protect against the exercise of market power during its
development;
(d) Preserve or enhance service quality and protect against the
degradation of the quality or availability of efficient
telecommunications services;
(e) Provide for rates and charges that are fair, just, reasonable,
sufficient, and not unduly discriminatory or preferential; and
(f) Not unduly or unreasonably prejudice or disadvantage any
particular customer class.
(3) A telecommunications company or companies subject to
traditional rate of return, rate base regulation may petition the
commission to establish an alternative form of regulation. The company
or companies shall submit with the petition a plan for an alternative
form of regulation. The plan shall contain a proposal for transition
to the alternative form of regulation and the proposed duration of the
plan. The plan must also contain a proposal for ensuring adequate
carrier-to-carrier service quality, including service quality standards
or performance measures for interconnection, and appropriate
enforcement or remedial provisions in the event the company fails to
meet service quality standards or performance measures. The commission
also may initiate consideration of alternative forms of regulation for
a company or companies on its own motion. The commission, after notice
and hearing, shall issue an order accepting, modifying, or rejecting
the plan within nine months after the petition or motion is filed,
unless extended by the commission for good cause. The commission shall
order implementation of the alternative plan of regulation unless it
finds that, on balance, an alternative plan as proposed or modified
fails to meet the considerations stated in subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) Not later than sixty days from the entry of the commission's
order, the company or companies affected by the order may file with the
commission an election not to proceed with the alternative form of
regulation as authorized by the commission.
(5) The commission may waive such regulatory requirements under
Title 80 RCW for a telecommunications company subject to an alternative
form of regulation as may be appropriate to facilitate the
implementation of this section. However, the commission may not waive
any grant of legal rights to any person contained in this chapter and
chapter 80.04 RCW. The commission may waive different regulatory
requirements for different companies or services if such different
treatment is in the public interest.
(6) Upon petition by the company, and after notice and hearing, the
commission may rescind or modify an alternative form of regulation in
the manner requested by the company.
(7) The commission or any person may file a complaint under RCW
80.04.110 alleging that a telecommunications company under an
alternative form of regulation has not complied with the terms and
conditions set forth in the alternative form of regulation. The
complainant shall bear the burden of proving the allegations in the
complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall obtain information on the number of customers
as defined under RCW 82.04.065(6) receiving telephone service as
defined under RCW 82.04.065(3) to determine the level of competition
within each rate of return, rate base telecommunications company's
service territory. This information shall be used in evaluating
petitions by telecommunications companies and motions by the commission
for competitive classification under RCW 80.36.320 and alternative
forms of regulation under RCW 80.36.135.

--- END ---