BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, no
interest or penalties may be imposed on any person because of the
failure to pay excise taxes on or before the date due for payment if
the person establishes that:
(a) The failure to pay was caused, in whole or in part, by
participation of key employees as military personnel in the situation
known as Operation Enduring Freedom; and
(b) If it were not for the participation of key employees as
military personnel in the situation known as Operation Enduring
Freedom, the person would have been able to satisfy the payment of
taxes in a timely manner.
(2) Payment of taxes shall be made within thirty days after the
return of the key personnel.
(3) As used in this section, "person" means a natural person or a
small business as defined in RCW 19.85.020.
(4) This section does not affect those transactions upon which a
default has occurred before participation of key employees as military
personnel in the situation known as Operation Enduring Freedom.
(5) This section applies to excise taxes with a date due for
payment on or before July 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---