BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.16.020 and 2002 c 111 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Apprenticeship program" means an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the practice of cosmetology,
barbering, esthetics, and manicuring.
(2) "Apprentice" means a person engaged in an apprenticeship
program and who may receive a wage or compensation.
(3) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((2))) (4) "Board" means the cosmetology, barbering, esthetics,
and manicuring advisory board.
(((3))) (5) "Director" means the director of the department of
licensing or the director's designee.
(((4))) (6) "The practice of cosmetology" means arranging,
dressing, cutting, trimming, styling, shampooing, permanent waving,
chemical relaxing, straightening, curling, bleaching, lightening,
coloring, waxing, tweezing, shaving, and mustache and beard design of
the hair of the face, neck, and scalp; temporary removal of superfluous
hair by use of depilatories, waxing, or tweezing; manicuring and
pedicuring, limited to cleaning, shaping, polishing, decorating, and
caring for and treatment of the cuticles and nails of the hands and
feet, excluding the application and removal of sculptured or otherwise
artificial nails; esthetics limited to toning the skin of the scalp,
stimulating the skin of the body by the use of preparations, tonics,
lotions, or creams; and tinting eyelashes and eyebrows.
(((5))) (7) "Cosmetologist" means a person licensed under this
chapter to engage in the practice of cosmetology.
(((6))) (8) "The practice of barbering" means the cutting,
trimming, arranging, dressing, curling, shampooing, shaving, and
mustache and beard design of the hair of the face, neck, and scalp.
(((7))) (9) "Barber" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of barbering.
(((8))) (10) "Practice of manicuring" means the cleaning, shaping,
polishing, decorating, and caring for and treatment of the cuticles and
the nails of the hands or feet, and the application and removal of
sculptured or otherwise artificial nails by hand or with mechanical or
electrical apparatus or appliances.
(((9))) (11) "Manicurist" means a person licensed under this
chapter to engage in the practice of manicuring.
(((10))) (12) "Practice of esthetics" means care of the skin by
application and use of preparations, antiseptics, tonics, essential
oils, or exfoliants, or by any device or equipment, electrical or
otherwise, or by wraps, compresses, cleansing, conditioning,
stimulation, pore extraction, or product application and removal; the
temporary removal of superfluous hair by means of lotions, creams,
mechanical or electrical apparatus, appliance, waxing, tweezing, or
depilatories; tinting of eyelashes and eyebrows; and lightening the
hair, except the scalp, on another person.
(((11))) (13) "Esthetician" means a person licensed under this
chapter to engage in the practice of esthetics.
(((12))) (14) "Instructor-trainee" means a person who is currently
licensed in this state as a cosmetologist, barber, manicurist, or
esthetician, and is enrolled in an instructor-trainee curriculum in a
school licensed under this chapter.
(((13))) (15) "School" means any establishment that offers
curriculum of instruction in the practice of cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, manicuring, or instructor-trainee to students and is
licensed under this chapter.
(((14))) (16) "Student" means a person sixteen years of age or
older who is enrolled in a school licensed under this chapter and
receives instruction in any of the curricula of cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, manicuring, or instructor-training with or without tuition,
fee, or cost, and who does not receive any wage or commission.
(((15))) (17) "Instructor" means a person who gives instruction in
a school in a curriculum in which he or she holds a license under this
chapter, has completed at least five hundred hours of instruction in
teaching techniques and lesson planning in a school, and has passed a
licensing examination approved or administered by the director. An
applicant who holds a degree in education from an accredited
postsecondary institution shall upon application be licensed as an
instructor to give instruction in a school in a curriculum in which he
or she holds a license under this chapter. An applicant who holds an
instructional credential from an accredited community or technical
college and who has passed a licensing examination approved or
administered by the director shall upon application be licensed as an
instructor to give instruction in a school in a curriculum in which he
or she holds a license under this chapter.
(((16))) (18) "Person" means any individual, partnership,
professional service corporation, joint stock association, joint
venture, or any other entity authorized to do business in this state.
(((17))) (19) "Salon/shop" means any building, structure, or any
part thereof, other than a school, where the commercial practice of
cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring is conducted; provided
that any person, except employees of a salon/shop, who operates from a
salon/shop is required to meet all salon/shop licensing requirements.
(((18))) (20) "Crossover training" means training approved by the
director as training hours that may be credited to current licensees
for similar training received in another profession licensed under this
chapter.
(((19))) (21) "Approved security" means surety bond.
(((20))) (22) "Personal services" means a location licensed under
this chapter where the practice of cosmetology, barbering, manicuring,
or esthetics is performed for clients in the client's home, office, or
other location that is convenient for the client.
(((21))) (23) "Individual license" means a cosmetology, barber,
manicurist, esthetician, or instructor license issued under this
chapter.
(((22))) (24) "Location license" means a license issued under this
chapter for a salon/shop, school, personal services, or mobile unit.
(((23))) (25) "Mobile unit" is a location license under this
chapter where the practice of cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or
manicuring is conducted in a mobile structure. Mobile units must
conform to the health and safety standards set by rule under this
chapter.
(((24))) (26) "Curriculum" means the courses of study taught at a
school, set by rule under this chapter, and approved by the department.
After consulting with the board, the director may set by rule a
percentage of hours in a curriculum, up to a maximum of ten percent,
that could include hours a student receives while training in a
salon/shop under a contract approved by the department. Each
curriculum must include at least the following required hours:
(a) Cosmetologist, one thousand six hundred hours;
(b) Barber, one thousand hours;
(c) Manicurist, six hundred hours;
(d) Esthetician, six hundred hours;
(e) Instructor-trainee, five hundred hours.
(((25))) (27) "Student monthly report" means the student record of
daily activities and the number of hours completed in each course of a
curriculum that is prepared monthly by the school and provided to the
student, audited annually by the department, and kept on file by the
school for three years.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.16.070 and 1984 c 208 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter shall not apply to persons licensed under other laws
of this state who are performing services within their authorized scope
of practice and shall not be construed to require a license for
students enrolled in a school or an apprentice engaged in an
apprenticeship program.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.16.090 and 2002 c 111 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Examinations for licensure under this chapter shall be conducted at
such times and places as the director determines appropriate.
Examinations shall consist of tests designed to reasonably measure the
applicant's knowledge of safe and sanitary practices and may also
include the applicant's knowledge of this chapter and rules adopted
pursuant to this chapter. The director may establish by rule a
performance examination in addition to any other examination. The
director shall establish by rule the minimum passing score for all
examinations and the requirements for reexamination of applicants who
fail the examination or examinations. The director may allow an
independent person to conduct the examinations at the expense of the
applicants.
The director shall take steps to ensure that after completion of
the required course or apprenticeship program, applicants may promptly
take the examination and receive the results of the examination.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.16.100 and 2002 c 111 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon completion of an application approved by the department
and payment of the proper fee, the director shall issue the appropriate
license to any person who:
(a) Is at least seventeen years of age or older;
(b)(i) Has completed and graduated from a school licensed under
this chapter in a curriculum approved by the director of sixteen
hundred hours of training in cosmetology, one thousand hours of
training in barbering, six hundred hours of training in manicuring, six
hundred hours of training in esthetics, and/or five hundred hours of
training as an instructor-trainee, or has met the requirements in RCW
18.16.020 or 18.16.130; or
(ii) Has successfully completed an apprenticeship training program;
and
(c) Has received a passing grade on the appropriate licensing
examination approved or administered by the director.
(2) A person currently licensed under this chapter may qualify for
examination and licensure, after the required examination is passed, in
another category if he or she has completed the crossover training
course.
(3) Upon completion of an application approved by the department,
certification of insurance, and payment of the proper fee, the director
shall issue a location license to the applicant.
(4) The director may consult with the state board of health and the
department of labor and industries in establishing training,
apprenticeship, and examination requirements.

--- END ---