BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some electrical
work requires minimal electrical circuit modifications and has limited
exposure hazards. The legislature also finds that it may be
appropriate to permit and inspect such work on a random basis, or to
exempt such work from permitting and inspection requirements. Any
changes to current law, however, should further the state's compelling
public interest in protecting public safety.

--- END ---