BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this chapter is to reform the
process of appeal and review of permit decisions made by state agencies
for qualifying economic development projects, by establishing uniform,
expedited, and consolidated appeal procedures and uniform criteria for
reviewing such decisions, in order to provide consistent, predictable,
and timely judicial review. The appeal process authorized in this
chapter is intended to be the exclusive process for review of decisions
made by agencies on permit applications for qualifying economic
development projects, superseding other existing administrative board
appeal procedures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Final decision" means the highest and last decision available
within the permit agency with respect to a permit application to the
agency, including but not limited to decisions resulting from internal
appeals available within the agency for the permit decision.
(2) "Participating permit agency" means any permit agency in which
the applicant for a qualifying project has filed an application for an
environmental or land use permit that is required for the qualifying
project.
(3) "Permit" means any discretionary environmental or land use
permit or similar approval document that is issued by a state agency or
local government and is required for a qualifying project; this
definition does not include building, grading, and other
nondiscretionary construction permits.
(4) "Permit agency" means any state or local government authorized
by law to issue permits.
(5) "Qualifying project" means an economic development project that
is (a) located within a county that qualifies as a distressed area as
defined in RCW 43.168.020(3) and a rural natural resources impact area
as defined in RCW 43.160.020, and (b) designed to provide at least
thirty full-time year-round jobs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The appeal process authorized in this
chapter shall, notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, be
the exclusive process for review of the decisions made by participating
permit agencies on permit applications for a qualifying project and
shall be in lieu of state hearings board or other state quasi-judicial
appeals processes that would otherwise apply to final permit decisions
by the agencies. The superior court civil rules shall govern
procedural matters for the appeal process under this chapter to the
extent that the rules are consistent with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Proceedings for review under this
section shall be commenced by filing a petition in the superior court
for the county in which the property of the qualifying project is
located.
(2) Such petition is barred, and the court may not grant review,
unless the petition is timely filed with the court and timely served on
the following persons who shall be parties to the review of the
petition:
(a) The participating permit agencies, which for purposes of the
petition shall be (i) if a state agency, the director thereof, and (ii)
if a local government, the jurisdiction's corporate entity and not an
individual decision maker;
(b) Each of the following persons if the person is not the
petitioner:
(i) Each person identified by name and address in the application
to the participating permit agencies;
(ii) Each person identified in project application documents as an
owner of the property at issue or, if none, each person identified as
a taxpayer for the property at issue in the records of the county
assessor.
(3) The petition is timely if it is filed and served on all parties
listed in subsection (2) of this section within twenty-one days of the
issuance by the permit agency of the permit for the qualifying project.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the date on which a permit
decision is issued is:
(a) Three days after a written decision is mailed by the permit
agency to the project applicant or, if not mailed, the date on which
the permit agency provides notice that a written decision is publicly
available; or
(b) If (a) of this subsection does not apply, the date the decision
is entered into the public record.
(5) Service on all parties must be in accordance with superior
court rules and applicable statutes. Service by mail is effective on
the date of mailing. Proof of service shall be by affidavit or
declaration under penalty of perjury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If the project applicant for the permit
approval is not the owner of the real property at issue, and if the
owner is not accurately identified in the records referred to in this
chapter, the applicant shall be responsible for promptly securing the
joinder of the owners. In addition, within fourteen days after service
each party initially named by the petitioner shall disclose to the
other parties the name and address of any person whom such party knows
may be needed for just adjudication of the petition, and the petitioner
shall promptly name and serve any such person whom the petitioner
agrees may be needed for just adjudication. If such a person is named
and served before the initial hearing, leave of court for the joinder
is not required, and the petitioner shall provide the newly joined
party with copies of the pleadings filed before the party's joinder.
Failure by the petitioner to name or serve, within the time required by
section 4(3) of this act, persons who are needed for just adjudication
but who are not identified in the records referred to in this section
shall not deprive the court of jurisdiction to hear the petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Standing to bring a petition under this
chapter is limited to the following persons:
(1) The applicant and the owner of the property to which the permit
decision is directed;
(2) Another person aggrieved or adversely affected by the permit
decision, or who would be aggrieved or adversely affected by a reversal
or modification of the permit decision. A person is aggrieved or
adversely affected within the meaning of this section only when all of
the following conditions are present:
(a) The permit decision has prejudiced or is likely to prejudice
that person;
(b) That person's asserted interests are among those that at least
one participating permit agency was required to consider when it made
its permit decision;
(c) A judgment in favor of that person would substantially
eliminate or redress the prejudice to that person caused or likely to
be caused by the permit decision; and
(d) The petitioner has exhausted his or her administrative remedies
to the extent required by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A petition must set forth:
(1) The name and mailing address of the petitioner;
(2) The name and mailing address of the petitioner's attorney, if
any;
(3) The name and mailing address of the permit agency whose permit
is at issue, if any;
(4) A duplicate copy of the permit decision;
(5) Identification of each person to be made a party under this
chapter;
(6) Facts demonstrating that the petitioner has standing to seek
judicial review under this chapter;
(7) A separate and concise statement of each error alleged to have
been committed;
(8) A concise statement of facts upon which the petitioner relies
to sustain the statement of error; and
(9) A request for relief, specifying the type and extent of relief
requested.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Within seven days (a) after the petition
is served on the parties identified in section 4(2) of this act or (b)
if the project applicant elects consolidation of the project permits as
provided in section 9 of this act after the appeal period for the final
permit issued for the qualifying project, the petitioner shall note,
according to the local rules of superior court, an initial hearing on
jurisdictional and other preliminary matters and, if applicable, other
pretrial matters. This initial hearing shall be set no sooner than
thirty-five days and not later than fifty days after the petition is
served on the parties identified in section 4(2) of this act or if
applicable after the appeal period for the final permit issued on the
qualifying project.
(2) The parties shall note all motions on jurisdictional and
procedural issues for resolution at the initial hearing, except that a
motion to allow discovery may be brought sooner. Where confirmation of
motions is required, each party shall be responsible for confirming its
own motions.
(3) The defenses of lack of standing, untimely filing or service of
the petition, lack of good faith or improper purpose in filing, and
failure to join persons needed for just adjudication are waived if not
raised by timely motion noted to be heard at the initial hearing,
unless the court allows discovery on such issues.
(4) The petitioner shall move the court for an order at the initial
hearing that sets the date on which the permit decision record of
applicable permit agency or agencies must be submitted, sets a briefing
schedule, sets a discovery schedule if discovery is to be allowed, and
sets a date for the hearing or trial on the merits. Such hearing or
trial shall be set no later than one hundred eighty days after the
initial hearing date.
(5) The parties may waive the initial hearing by scheduling with
the court a date for the hearing or trial on the merits and filing a
stipulated order that resolves the jurisdictional and procedural issues
raised by the petition, including the issues identified in subsections
(3) and (4) of this section.
(6) A party need not file an answer to the petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The project applicant, if a party, may
within seven days after receiving service of the petition file with the
court an affidavit certifying all environmental or land use permit
applications that the project applicant has filed with participating
permit agencies for the qualifying project. The court shall request
verification from the participating agencies of the permit applications
certified in the project applicant's affidavit and of the expected date
for final decision on the permit applications. If permits for the
qualifying project are verified by a participating permit agency as
applied for but not yet issued, the court shall toll from the date of
filing of the applicant's affidavit the hearings and other schedules as
set forth in section 8 of this act for any and all petitions for review
already filed on the qualifying project until twenty-one days after the
issuance of the final permit for the qualifying project that has been
certified in the applicant's affidavit and verified by a participating
agency as applied for.
(2) If petitions for review of other permits issued by
participating permit agencies for the qualifying project have
previously been filed with the court, the court shall consolidate all
such petitions into the same case for review and hearing. The
schedules set forth in section 8 of this act shall be adjusted
accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The court shall provide expedited review of
petitions filed under this chapter. The matter must be set for hearing
within sixty days of the date set for submitting the decision record of
all participating permit agencies, absent a showing of good cause for
a different date or a stipulation of the parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) A petitioner or other party may request
the court to stay or suspend an action by a participating permit agency
or another party to implement the decision under review. The request
must set forth a statement of grounds for the stay and the factual
basis for the request.
(2) A court may grant a stay only if the court finds that: (a) The
party requesting the stay is likely to prevail on the merits, (b)
without the stay the party requesting it will suffer irreparable harm,
(c) the grant of a stay will not substantially harm other parties to
the proceedings, and (d) the request for the stay is timely in light of
the circumstances of the case.
(3) The court may grant the request for a stay upon such terms and
conditions, including the filing of security, as are necessary to
prevent harm to other parties by the stay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) Within forty-five days after entry of
an order to submit the record, or within such a further time as the
court allows or as the parties agree, each participating agency shall
submit to the court a certified copy of the record for judicial review
of the permit decision, except that the petitioner shall prepare at the
petitioner's expense and submit a verbatim transcript of any hearings
held on the matter.
(2) If the parties agree, or upon order of the court, the record
shall be shortened or summarized to avoid reproduction and
transcription of portions of the record that are duplicative or not
relevant to the issues to be reviewed by the court.
(3) The petitioner shall pay the participating agency the cost of
preparing the record before the participating agency submits the record
to the court. Failure by the petitioner to timely pay the
participating agency relieves the participating agency of
responsibility to submit the record and is grounds for dismissal of the
petition.
(4) If the relief sought by the petitioner is granted in whole or
in part the court shall equitably assess the cost of preparing the
record among the parties. In assessing costs the court shall take into
account the extent to which each party prevailed and the reasonableness
of the parties' conduct in agreeing or not agreeing to shorten or
summarize the record under subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) For all permit decisions being reviewed
that (a) were made by quasi-judicial bodies or permit agency officers
who made factual determinations in support of the decisions, and (b)
provided proceedings in which the parties had an opportunity consistent
with due process to make records on the factual issues, judicial review
of factual issues and the conclusions drawn from the factual issues
shall be confined to the records created by the quasi-judicial bodies
or permit agency officers, except as provided in subsections (2)
through (4) of this section.
(2) For decisions described in subsection (1) of this section, the
records may be supplemented by additional evidence only if the
additional evidence relates to:
(a) Grounds for disqualification of a member of the body or of the
officer that made the permit decision, when such grounds were unknown
by the petitioner at the time the record was created;
(b) Matters that were improperly excluded from the record after
being offered by a party to a permit decision proceeding; or
(c) Matters that were outside the jurisdiction of the body or
officer that made the permit decision.
(3) For permit decisions other than those described in subsection
(1) of this section, the judicial review of the permit decision shall
be de novo on issues presented as error in the petition.
(4) The court may require or permit corrections of ministerial
errors or inadvertent omissions in the preparation of the record.
(5) The parties may not conduct pretrial discovery except with the
prior permission of the court, which may be sought by motion at any
time after service of the petition. Except as required under
subsection (3) of this section, the court shall not grant permission
unless the party requesting it makes a prima facie showing of need.
The court shall strictly limit discovery to what is necessary for
equitable and timely review of the issues that are raised under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section. If the court allows the
record to be supplemented or requires de novo review, the court shall
require the parties to disclose before the hearing or trial on the
merits the specific evidence they intend to offer. If any party, or
anyone acting on behalf of any party, requests records under chapter
42.17 RCW relating to the matters at issue, a copy of the request shall
simultaneously be given to all other parties and the court shall take
such request into account in fashioning an equitable discovery order
under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) The superior court, acting without a
jury, shall review the record and such supplemental evidence as is
permitted or required for de novo review under section 13 of this act.
The court may grant relief only if the party seeking relief has carried
the burden of establishing that one of the standards set forth in (a)
through (f) of this subsection has been met. The standards are:
(a) The body or officer that made the permit decision engaged in
unlawful procedure or failed to follow a prescribed process, unless the
error was harmless;
(b) The permit decision is an erroneous interpretation of the law,
after allowing for such deference as is due the construction of a law
by an agency with expertise;
(c) The permit decision is not supported by evidence that is
substantial when viewed in light of the whole record before the court;
(d) The permit decision is a clearly erroneous application of the
law to the facts;
(e) The permit decision is outside the authority or jurisdiction of
the body or officer making the decision; or
(f) The permit decision violates the constitutional rights of the
party seeking relief.
(2) In order to grant relief under this section, it is not
necessary for the court to find that the permit agency engaged in
arbitrary and capricious conduct. The court may grant relief on a
petition for review of one permit decision and not on others
consolidated with it for review. A grant of relief by itself may not
be deemed to establish liability for monetary damages or compensation.
(3) The court may affirm or reverse any or all permit decisions
under review or remand the decision for modification or further
proceedings involving the permit agencies. If the decision is remanded
for modification or further proceedings, the court may make such an
order as it finds necessary to preserve the interests of the parties
and the public, pending further proceedings or action by the permit
agencies.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2001 c 220 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, and the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW, or
local health departments:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and
90.56.330.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Proceedings conducted by the department, or the department's
designee, under RCW 90.03.160 through 90.03.210 or 90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 14 of this act).
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 16 RCW 77.55.170 and 2000 c 107 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created within the environmental hearings
office under RCW 43.21B.005 the hydraulic appeals board of the state of
Washington.
(2) The hydraulic appeals board shall consist of three members:
The director of the department of ecology or the director's designee,
the director of the department of agriculture or the director's
designee, and the director or the director's designee of the department
whose action is appealed under subsection (6) of this section. A
decision must be agreed to by at least two members of the board to be
final.
(3) The board may adopt rules necessary for the conduct of its
powers and duties or for transacting other official business.
(4) The board shall make findings of fact and prepare a written
decision in each case decided by it, and that finding and decision
shall be effective upon being signed by two or more board members and
upon being filed at the hydraulic appeals board's principal office, and
shall be open to public inspection at all reasonable times.
(5) The board has exclusive jurisdiction to hear appeals arising
from the approval, denial, conditioning, or modification of a hydraulic
approval issued by the department: (a) Under the authority granted in
RCW 77.55.110 for the diversion of water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes or when associated with streambank
stabilization to protect farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW
84.34.020; or (b) under the authority granted in RCW 77.55.230 for off-site mitigation proposals.
(6)(a) Any person aggrieved by the approval, denial, conditioning,
or modification of a hydraulic approval pursuant to RCW 77.55.110 may,
except as otherwise provided in chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through
14 of this act), seek review from the board by filing a request for the
same within thirty days of notice of the approval, denial,
conditioning, or modification of such approval.
(b) The review proceedings authorized in (a) of this subsection are
subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW pertaining to procedures
in adjudicative proceedings.

Sec. 17 RCW 90.58.180 and 1997 c 199 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person aggrieved by the granting, denying, or rescinding of
a permit on shorelines of the state pursuant to RCW 90.58.140 may,
except as otherwise provided in chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through
14 of this act), seek review from the shorelines hearings board by
filing a petition for review within twenty-one days of the date of
filing as defined in RCW 90.58.140(6).
Within seven days of the filing of any petition for review with the
board as provided in this section pertaining to a final decision of a
local government, the petitioner shall serve copies of the petition on
the department, the office of the attorney general, and the local
government. The department and the attorney general may intervene to
protect the public interest and insure that the provisions of this
chapter are complied with at any time within fifteen days from the date
of the receipt by the department or the attorney general of a copy of
the petition for review filed pursuant to this section. The shorelines
hearings board shall schedule review proceedings on the petition for
review without regard as to whether the period for the department or
the attorney general to intervene has or has not expired.
(2) The department or the attorney general may obtain review of any
final decision granting a permit, or granting or denying an application
for a permit issued by a local government by filing a written petition
with the shorelines hearings board and the appropriate local government
within twenty-one days from the date the final decision was filed as
provided in RCW 90.58.140(6).
(3) The review proceedings authorized in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section are subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW
pertaining to procedures in adjudicative proceedings. Judicial review
of such proceedings of the shorelines hearings board is governed by
chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall issue its decision on the appeal
authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section within one
hundred eighty days after the date the petition is filed with the board
or a petition to intervene is filed by the department or the attorney
general, whichever is later. The time period may be extended by the
board for a period of thirty days upon a showing of good cause or may
be waived by the parties.
(4) Any person may appeal any rules, regulations, or guidelines
adopted or approved by the department within thirty days of the date of
the adoption or approval. The board shall make a final decision within
sixty days following the hearing held thereon.
(5) The board shall find the rule, regulation, or guideline to be
valid and enter a final decision to that effect unless it determines
that the rule, regulation, or guideline:
(a) Is clearly erroneous in light of the policy of this chapter; or
(b) Constitutes an implementation of this chapter in violation of
constitutional or statutory provisions; or
(c) Is arbitrary and capricious; or
(d) Was developed without fully considering and evaluating all
material submitted to the department during public review and comment;
or
(e) Was not adopted in accordance with required procedures.
(6) If the board makes a determination under subsection (5)(a)
through (e) of this section, it shall enter a final decision declaring
the rule, regulation, or guideline invalid, remanding the rule,
regulation, or guideline to the department with a statement of the
reasons in support of the determination, and directing the department
to adopt, after a thorough consultation with the affected local
government and any other interested party, a new rule, regulation, or
guideline consistent with the board's decision.
(7) A decision of the board on the validity of a rule, regulation,
or guideline shall be subject to review in superior court, if
authorized pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. A petition for review of the
decision of the shorelines hearings board on a rule, regulation, or
guideline shall be filed within thirty days after the date of final
decision by the shorelines hearings board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 14 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---