BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that
recreational fishing is one of the most popular outdoor sporting
activities in this state. The vast number of individuals who take to
the waters of Washington for the purpose of recreational fishing make
a substantial contribution to the state and local economy.
Recreational fishing also makes a substantial contribution to the
quality of life in this state. The legislature further finds and
declares that recreational fishers have long demonstrated a
conservation ethic through their abidance with fisheries management
laws and rules including minimum size requirements, bag limits,
seasonal closures, and through the use of nonlethal fishing gear. The
legislature further finds and declares that the ocean, bays, and
estuaries are some of Washington's most important natural resources.
Effective planning, assessment, and management in the conservation of
the resources of the ocean, bays, and estuaries are important tools,
which must be utilized effectively to protect the marine environment.
The legislature further finds and declares that the marine environment
can be adequately protected without unnecessarily closing off areas of
this state's ocean, bays, or estuaries to recreational fishers.
Therefore, the legislature declares the necessity of the enactment of
this act to ensure that the fishing public's interest and the interests
of the marine environment are both adequately protected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The marine waters of the state of Washington may not be permanently
closed to recreational fishing unless:
(1) There is a clear indication that recreational fishing is the
cause of a specific conservation problem and that less severe
conservation measures, including but not limited to, minimum size
requirements, bag limits, or seasonal closures will not adequately
provide for conservation of the affected stocks of fish;
(2) The closed area rules include specific measurable criteria to
determine the conservation benefit of the closed area on the affected
stocks of fish and provide a timetable for periodic review of the
continued need for the closed area at least once every three years;
(3) The closed area is no larger than that which is supported by
the best available scientific information as determined by the
department; and
(4) Provisions are made to reopen the closed area to recreational
fishing whenever the basis for the closure no longer exists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---