BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, under current
law, persons who work in the equipment repair specialty are subject to
electrical licensing and certification requirements. It may be
appropriate, however, to exempt some persons who do certain work who
are authorized by manufacturers to perform such work, who are or who
employ factory-trained technicians to perform such work, or who are or
who employ persons who are otherwise qualified to perform certain work.

--- END ---