BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.120.020 and 2002 c 56 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional transportation
investment district.
(2) "Department" means the Washington state department of
transportation.
(3) "Highway of statewide significance" means an existing or
proposed state route or federal interstate designated as a highway of
statewide significance by the transportation commission, its successor
entity, or the legislature.
(4) "Lead agency" means a public agency that by law can plan,
design, and build or deliver a transportation project and has been so
designated by the district.
(5) "Regional transportation investment district" or "district"
means a municipal corporation whose boundaries are coextensive with two
or more contiguous counties and that has been created by county
legislative authorities and a vote of the people under this chapter to
implement a regional transportation investment plan.
(6) "Regional transportation investment district planning
committee" or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created
under RCW 36.120.030 to create and propose to county legislative
authorities a regional transportation investment plan to develop,
finance, and construct transportation projects.
(7) "Regional transportation investment plan" or "plan" means a
plan to develop, construct, and finance a transportation project or
projects.
(8) "Transportation project" means((:
(a) A capital improvement or improvements to a highway that has
been designated, in whole or in part, as a highway of statewide
significance, including an extension, that:
(i) Adds a lane or new lanes to an existing state or federal
highway; or
(ii) Repairs or replaces a lane or lanes damaged by an event
declared an emergency by the governor before January 1, 2002.
(b) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
highway of statewide significance, including an extension, and may
include the following associated multimodal capital improvements:
(i) Approaches to highways of statewide significance;
(ii) High-occupancy vehicle lanes;
(iii) Flyover ramps;
(iv) Park and ride lots;
(v) Bus pullouts;
(vi) Vans for vanpools;
(vii) Buses; and
(viii) Signalization, ramp metering, and other transportation
system management improvements.
(c) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
city street, county road, or existing highway or the creation of a new
highway that intersects with a highway of statewide significance, if
all of the following conditions are met:
(i) The project is included in a plan that makes highway
improvement projects that add capacity to a highway or highways of
statewide significance;
(ii) The secretary of transportation determines that the project
would better relieve traffic congestion than investing that same money
in adding capacity to a highway of statewide significance;
(iii) Matching money equal to one-third of the total cost of the
project is provided by local entities, including but not limited to a
metropolitan planning organization, county, city, port, or private
entity in which a county participating in a plan is located. Local
entities may use federal grants to meet this matching requirement;
(iv) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed ten percent of the revenues generated by the
district;
(v) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed one billion dollars; and
(vi) The specific projects are included within the plan and
submitted as part of the plan to a vote of the people.
(d) Operations, preservation, and maintenance are excluded from
this definition and may not be included in a regional transportation
investment plan)) a project or program contained in the transportation
plan of the state or of a regional transportation planning
organization. Projects may include new or existing highways of
statewide significance or state and local arterials of regional
significance, rail facilities, light rail facilities, monorail
facilities, public transportation investments, ferry system capital
improvements, and transportation demand management programs. Projects
may also include the operation, preservation, and maintenance of these
roadways and other facilities.
(9) "Weighted vote" means a vote that reflects the population each
board or planning committee member represents relative to the
population represented by the total membership of the board or planning
committee. Population will be determined using the federal 2000 census
or subsequent federal census data.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.120.040 and 2002 c 56 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee shall adopt a regional transportation investment plan
providing for the development, construction, and financing of
transportation projects. The planning committee ((may)) shall consider
the following factors in formulating its plan:
(a) Land use planning criteria;
(b) The input of cities located within a participating county; and
(c) The input of regional transportation planning organizations in
which a participating county is located. A regional transportation
planning organization in which a participating county is located shall
review its adopted regional transportation plan and submit, for the
planning committee's consideration, its list of transportation
improvement priorities.
(2) The planning committee may coordinate its activities with the
department, which shall provide services, data, and personnel to assist
in this planning as desired by the planning committee. In addition,
the planning committee may coordinate with affected cities, towns, and
other local governments that engage in transportation planning.
(3) The planning committee shall:
(a) Consult regularly with, and seek input from, the county
executive of each participating county;
(b) Conduct public meetings that are needed to assure active public
participation in the development of the plan;
(((b))) (c) Adopt a plan proposing the creation of a regional
transportation investment district and recommending the construction of
transportation projects to improve mobility((. Operations,
maintenance, and preservation of facilities or systems may not be part
of the plan)); and
(((c))) (d) Recommend sources of revenue authorized by RCW
36.120.050 and a financing plan to fund selected transportation
projects. The overall plan of the district must leverage the
district's financial contributions so that the federal, state, local,
and other revenue sources continue to fund major congestion relief and
transportation capacity improvement projects in the district. A
combination of local, state, and federal revenues may be necessary to
pay for transportation projects, and the planning committee shall
consider all of these revenue sources in developing a plan.
(4) Before adopting the plan, the planning committee, with
assistance from the department, shall work with the lead agency to
develop accurate cost forecasts for transportation projects. This
project costing methodology must be integrated with revenue forecasts
in developing the plan and must at a minimum include estimated project
costs in constant dollars as well as year of expenditure dollars, the
range of project costs reflected by the level of project design,
project contingencies, identification of mitigation costs, the range of
revenue forecasts, and project and plan cash flow and bond analysis.
The plan submitted to the voters must provide cost estimates for each
project, including reasonable contingency costs. Plans submitted to
the voters must provide that the maximum amount possible of the funds
raised will be used to fund projects in the plan, including
environmental improvements and mitigation, and that administrative
costs be minimized. If actual revenue exceeds actual plan costs, the
excess revenues must be used to retire any outstanding debt associated
with the plan.
(5) If a county opts not to adopt the plan or participate in the
regional transportation investment district, but two or more contiguous
counties do choose to continue to participate, then the planning
committee may, within ninety days, redefine the regional transportation
investment plan and the ballot measure to be submitted to the people to
reflect elimination of the county, and submit the redefined plan to the
legislative authorities of the remaining counties for their decision as
to whether to continue to adopt the redefined plan and participate.
This action must be completed within sixty days after receipt of the
redefined plan.
(6) Once adopted, the plan must be forwarded to the participating
county legislative authorities to initiate, with the approval of the
county executive of each participating county, the election process
under RCW 36.120.070. The planning committee shall at the same time
provide notice to each city and town within the district, the governor,
the chairs of the transportation committees of the legislature, the
secretary of transportation, and each legislator whose legislative
district is partially or wholly within the boundaries of the district.
(7) If the ballot measure is not approved, the planning committee
may redefine the selected transportation projects, financing plan, and
the ballot measure. The county legislative authorities may approve the
new plan and ballot measure, and may then submit the revised
proposition to the voters at the next election or a special election.
If no ballot measure is approved by the voters by the third vote, the
planning committee is dissolved.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.120.050 and 2002 c 56 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee may, as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
recommend the imposition of some or all of the following revenue
sources, which a regional transportation investment district may impose
upon approval of the voters as provided in this chapter:
(a) A regional sales and use tax, as specified in RCW 82.14.430, of
up to 0.5 percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used, in the case of a use tax, upon the
occurrence of any taxable event in the regional transportation
investment district;
(b) A local option vehicle license fee, as specified under RCW
82.80.100, of up to one hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the
district. As used in this subsection, "vehicle" means motor vehicle as
defined in RCW 46.04.320. Certain classes of vehicles, as defined
under chapter 46.04 RCW, may be exempted from this fee;
(c) A parking tax under RCW 82.80.030;
(d) A local motor vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060 and
chapter 81.104 RCW;
(e) An employer excise tax under RCW 81.100.030; ((and))
(f) Vehicle tolls on ((new or reconstructed facilities)) a state
route or federal highway within the boundaries of the district. The
plan must identify the specific location to be tolled and the purpose
of the toll. Unless otherwise specified by law or contract, the
department shall administer the collection of vehicle tolls on
designated facilities, and the state transportation commission, or its
successor, shall be the tolling authority; and
(g) A local option fuel tax under section 11 of this act.
(2) Taxes, fees, and tolls may not be imposed without an
affirmative vote of the majority of the voters within the boundaries of
the district voting on a ballot proposition as set forth in RCW
36.120.070. Revenues from these taxes and fees may be used only to
implement the plan as set forth in this chapter. A district may
contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate
entities for administration and collection of any of the taxes or fees
authorized in this section.
(3) Existing statewide motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes,
at the distribution rates in effect on January 1, 2001, are not
intended to be altered by this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.120.070 and 2002 c 56 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
Two or more contiguous county legislative authorities, upon receipt
of the regional transportation investment plan under RCW 36.120.040,
may, with the approval of the county executive of each participating
county, certify the plan to the ballot, including identification of the
tax options necessary to fund the plan. County legislative authorities
may draft a ballot title, give notice as required by law for ballot
measures, and perform other duties as required to put the plan before
the voters of the proposed district for their approval or rejection as
a single ballot measure that both approves formation of the district
and approves the plan. Counties may negotiate interlocal agreements
necessary to implement the plan. The electorate will be the voters
voting within the boundaries of the participating counties. A simple
majority of the total persons voting on the single ballot measure to
approve the plan, establish the district, and approve the taxes and
fees is required for approval.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.120.090 and 2002 c 56 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governing board of a district consists of the members of
the legislative authority of each member county, acting ex officio and
independently. The secretary of transportation or the appropriate
regional administrator of the department, as named by the secretary,
shall also serve as a nonvoting member of the board. The governing
board may elect an executive board of seven members to discharge the
duties of the governing board subject to the approval of the full
governing board.
(2) A sixty-percent majority of the weighted votes of the total
board membership and the approval of the county executive of each
participating county is required to submit to the counties a modified
plan under RCW 36.120.140 or any other proposal to be submitted to the
voters. The counties may, with majority vote of each county
legislative authority, submit a modified plan or proposal to the
voters.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.120.110 and 2002 c 56 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governing board of the district is responsible for the
execution of the voter-approved plan. The board shall:
(a) Impose taxes and fees authorized by district voters;
(b) Enter into agreements with state, local, and regional agencies
and departments as necessary to accomplish district purposes and
protect the district's investment in transportation projects;
(c) Accept gifts, grants, or other contributions of funds that will
support the purposes and programs of the district;
(d) Monitor and audit the progress and execution of transportation
projects to protect the investment of the public and annually make
public its findings;
(e) Pay for services and enter into leases and contracts, including
professional service contracts;
(f) Hire no more than ten employees, including a director or
executive officer, a treasurer or financial officer, a project manager
or engineer, a project permit coordinator, and clerical staff; and
(g) Exercise other powers and duties as may be reasonable to carry
out the purposes of the district.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that existing staff
resources of lead agencies be used in implementing this chapter. A
district may coordinate its activities with the department, which shall
provide services, data, and personnel to assist as desired by the
regional transportation investment district. Lead agencies for
transportation projects that are not state facilities shall also
provide staff support for the board.
(3) A district may not acquire, hold, or dispose of real property.
(4) A district may not own, operate, or maintain an ongoing
facility, road, or transportation system.
(5) A district may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, or
donations.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that administrative and
overhead costs of a regional transportation investment district be
minimized. For transportation projects costing up to fifty million
dollars, administrative and overhead costs may not exceed three percent
of the total construction and design project costs per year. For
transportation projects costing more than fifty million dollars,
administrative and overhead costs may not exceed three percent of the
first fifty million dollars in costs, plus an additional one-tenth of
one percent of each additional dollar above fifty million. These
limitations apply only to the district, and do not limit the
administration or expenditures of the department or other lead
agencies.
(7) A district may use the design-build procedure for
transportation projects developed by it. As used in this section
"design-build procedure" means a method of contracting under which the
district contracts with another party for that party to both design and
build the structures, facilities, and other items specified in the
contract. The requirements and limitations of RCW 47.20.780 and
47.20.785 do not apply to the transportation projects under this
chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.120.130 and 2002 c 56 s 113 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The district may borrow money, but may not issue any debt of its
own for more than two years' duration. A district may issue notes or
other evidences of indebtedness with a maturity of not more than two
years. A district may, when authorized by the plan, enter into
agreements with the state or lead agencies to pledge taxes or other
revenues of the district for the purpose of paying in part or whole
principal and interest on bonds issued by the lead agency. The
contracts pledging revenues and taxes are binding for the term of the
agreement, but not to exceed twenty-five years, and no tax pledged by
an agreement may be eliminated or modified if it would impair the
pledge of the agreement.))
(1)(a) Notwithstanding RCW 39.36.020(1), the district may at any
time contract indebtedness or borrow money for district purposes and
may issue general obligation bonds or other evidences of indebtedness,
secured by the pledge of one or more of the taxes, tolls, charges, or
fees authorized to be imposed by the district, in an amount not
exceeding, together with any existing indebtedness of the district not
authorized by the voters, one and one-half percent of the value of the
taxable property within the boundaries of the district.
(b) With the approval of three-fifths of the voters voting at an
election, a district may contract indebtedness or borrow money for
district purposes and may issue general obligation bonds or other
evidences of indebtedness as long as the total indebtedness of the
district does not exceed five percent of the value of the taxable
property within the district, including indebtedness authorized under
(a) of this subsection. The bonds must be issued and sold in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.
(2) The district may at any time issue revenue bonds or other
evidences of indebtedness, secured by the pledge of one or more of the
revenues authorized to be collected by the district, to provide funds
to carry out its authorized functions without submitting the matter to
the voters of the district. These obligations must be issued and sold
in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.
(3) The district may enter into agreements with the lead agencies
or the state of Washington, when authorized by the plan, to pledge
taxes or other revenues of the district for the purpose of paying in
part or whole principal and interest on bonds issued by the lead agency
or the state of Washington. The agreements pledging revenues and taxes
must be binding for their terms, but not to exceed thirty years, and no
tax pledged by an agreement may be eliminated or modified if it would
impair the pledge made in any agreement.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.56.076 and 2002 c 56 s 403 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon approval of a majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, and only for the purposes authorized
in RCW 36.120.050(1)(f), a regional transportation investment district
may impose vehicle tolls on a state ((routes where improvements
financed in whole or in part by a regional transportation investment
district add additional lanes to, or reconstruct lanes on, a highway of
statewide significance)) or federal highway within the boundaries of
the district. The department shall administer the collection of
vehicle tolls on designated facilities unless otherwise specified in
law or by contract, and the state transportation commission, or its
successor, shall ((be the tolling authority)) set and impose the tolls
in amounts sufficient to implement the plan and issue bonds and
maintain and operate the toll facility within the scope and intent of
the regional transportation investment plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this chapter, a
regional transportation investment district may impose vehicle tolls on
either Lake Washington bridge upon approval of a majority of the voters
voting on a regional transportation investment plan ballot measure
within its boundaries as authorized in chapter 36.120 RCW and RCW
47.56.076.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.80.010 and 1998 c 176 s 86 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.
(2) Subject to the conditions of this section, any county may levy,
by approval of its legislative body and a majority of the registered
voters of the county voting on the proposition at a general or special
election, additional excise taxes equal to ten percent of the statewide
motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the
county. Vehicles paying an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are
exempt from the county fuel excise tax. An election held under this
section must be held not more than twelve months before the date on
which the proposed tax is to be levied. The ballot setting forth the
proposition shall state the tax rate that is proposed. The county's
authority to levy additional excise taxes under this section includes
the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county. The
additional excise taxes are subject to the same exceptions and rights
of refund as applicable to other motor vehicle fuel and special fuel
excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. The proposed
tax shall not be levied less than one month from the date the election
results are certified by the county election officer. The commencement
date for the levy of any tax under this section shall be the first day
of January, April, July, or October.
(((2) Every person subject to the tax shall pay, in addition to any
other taxes provided by law, an additional excise tax to the director
of licensing at the rate levied by a county exercising its authority
under this section.))
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of a county to
a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a county shall contract with the department of
revenue for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the levying
county and cities contained therein the proceeds of the additional
excise taxes collected under this section, after the deductions for
payments and expenditures as provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and
(((2))) (b) and under the conditions and limitations provided in RCW
82.80.080.
(((4))) (8) The proceeds of the additional excise taxes levied
under this section shall be used strictly for transportation purposes
in accordance with RCW 82.80.070.
(((5) The department of licensing shall administer and collect the
county fuel taxes. The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as
provided by contract, for administrative, collection, refund, and audit
expenses incurred. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the
custody of the state treasurer for monthly distribution under RCW
82.80.080.))
(9) A county may not levy the tax under this section if they are a
member of a regional transportation investment district levying the tax
in section 11 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030;
(c) "District" means a regional transportation investment district
under chapter 36.120 RCW.
(2) A regional transportation investment district under chapter
36.120 RCW, subject to the conditions of this section, may levy
additional excise taxes equal to ten percent of the statewide motor
vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the
district. The additional excise tax is subject to the approval of a
majority of the voters within the district boundaries. Vehicles paying
an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the
district's fuel excise tax. The additional excise taxes are subject to
the same exceptions and rights of refund as applicable to other motor
vehicle fuel and special fuel excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36
and 82.38 RCW. The proposed tax may not be levied less than one month
from the date the election results are certified. The commencement
date for the levy of any tax under this section will be the first day
of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of the
district to a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the
fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a district shall contract with the department of
revenue for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the district
levying the tax as part of the regional transportation investment
district plan, after the deductions for payments and expenditures as
provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and (b).
(8) The proceeds of the additional taxes levied by a district in
this section, to be used as a part of a regional transportation
investment district plan, must be used in accordance with chapter
36.120 RCW, but only for those areas that are considered "highway
purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the
state Constitution.
(9) A district may not levy the tax in this section if a member
county is levying the tax in RCW 82.80.010.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.36.440 and 1991 c 173 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tax levied in this chapter is in lieu of any excise, privilege,
or occupational tax upon the business of manufacturing, selling, or
distributing motor vehicle fuel, and no city, town, county, township or
other subdivision or municipal corporation of the state shall levy or
collect any excise tax upon or measured by the sale, receipt,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, except as provided in
chapter 82.80 RCW ((82.80.010)) and RCW 82.47.020.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.38.280 and 1991 c 173 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tax levied in this chapter is in lieu of any excise, privilege,
or occupational tax upon the business of manufacturing, selling, or
distributing special fuel, and no city, town, county, township or other
subdivision or municipal corporation of the state shall levy or collect
any excise tax upon or measured by the sale, receipt, distribution, or
use of special fuel, except as provided in chapter 82.80 RCW
((82.80.010)) and RCW 82.47.020.

--- END ---