BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.64 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to any other penalties prescribed by law:
(1) A person who receives three or more traffic citations or
notices of traffic infractions in a one-year period for other than
stopping, standing, parking, or pedestrian violations must attend three
hours of mandatory traffic school in the city or county of residence;
and
(2) For each subsequent traffic citation or qualifying notice of
traffic infraction received within one year of completing the traffic
school required by subsection (1) of this section, the person must
attend an additional three hours of traffic school.

--- END ---