BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state of Washington is experiencing a
time of tremendous economic uncertainty. The businesses in our state
provide jobs that keep our economy running and employ citizens who, in
turn, support our local communities and consume the goods and services
that generate sales and property tax revenues. Businesses are leaving
the state for more favorable financial incentives and business
climates. It is the intent of the legislature to take a leadership
role in addressing the needs of business in our state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall procure all goods and services from
Washington-based companies whenever possible.
(2) Washington businesses and companies shall receive a five
percent preference on all competitive bids in which sixty percent of
the work done is performed in Washington state.
(3) For purposes of this section, "Washington businesses and
companies" means those businesses and companies that have headquarters
or a home office located in Washington state.

--- END ---