BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040(1)(f), the commission may offer on-line games in which the drawing or selection of winning tickets occurs
more than once every twenty-four hours.
(2) The multiple daily draw account is created as a separate
account outside the state treasury. The account is managed,
maintained, and controlled by the commission and consists of all
revenues received from the sale of lottery tickets for on-line games in
which the drawing or selection of winners occurs more than once every
twenty-four hours, and all other moneys credited or transferred to it
from any other fund or source under law. The account is allotted
according to chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The net revenues, if any, in the multiple daily draw account shall
be deposited in the general fund.

--- END ---