BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The secretary of the department of
social and health services shall create a program for homeless persons
for the purpose of short-term cash assistance intended to enable
homeless persons to obtain housing and employment. In creating the
program, the department shall consult with (a) homeless persons in the
state, and (b) the legislature.
(2) The secretary shall adopt rules to operate the program, which
shall include eligibility determination for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The program created by the secretary
pursuant to section 1 of this act shall provide a monthly benefit of
three hundred dollars per month per person for each eligible homeless
person.
(2) Eligibility for the program created by the secretary pursuant
to section 1 of this act shall end after each eligible homeless person
has received the three hundred dollar monthly benefit provided in
subsection (1) of this section for twelve months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire July 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to Title 74 RCW but shall not be codified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2003, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---