BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person commits the crime of sexual assault of an animal if
the person:
(a) Touches or contacts, or causes an object or another person to
touch or contact, the mouth, anus, or sex organs of an animal for the
purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of a person; or
(b) Causes an animal to touch or contact the mouth, anus, or sex
organs of a person for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual
desire of a person.
(2) Sexual assault of an animal is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon the conviction of a defendant for a violation of section 1 of
this act, the court, in addition to any other sentence imposed, shall
order the defendant to undergo a psychiatric or psychological
evaluation and, if warranted by the mental condition of the defendant,
undergo appropriate care or treatment. The defendant shall bear the
costs of the evaluation and treatment.

--- END ---