BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is a
compelling need for the construction of up to five or more auto-passenger ferries to replace the four Steel Electric Class ferries in
service and continue current service levels. The long-range travel
demand for trips throughout the ferry system indicates a seventy-seven
percent growth in passenger usage and a fifty-seven percent growth in
vehicle usage over the next twenty years. In order to support the
economic growth of the Puget Sound region and meet the forecasted
citizen cross-sound travel demand, the Washington state ferry system
must provide reliable ferry vessel operations that cannot be maintained
by the existing aging Steel Electric Class ferry capacity and other
noncomplying safety of life at sea vessels. The legislature further
finds that the new construction and financing methods available from
industry might provide knowledge that will result in cost savings and
efficiencies in the construction of the five vessels, and it is
essential for the welfare of the state and the economy to have the
advantage of these cost savings, procedures, and efficiencies that can
be achieved by the use of the design-build and possible finance
construction process if prudent. "Prudent" means using the least cost
method of financing when considered against available revenue.
(2) The legislature intends to procure up to five or more ferries
designated the San Juan Class to replace the four Steel Electric Class
ferries and continue service from Anacortes to Sidney by using
construction methods, equipment, techniques, and financing that
delivers the highest quality ferries to the taxpayers with a financing
program that allows the vessels to be procured at the best price.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the department shall enter into agreements for the construction and
acquisition of two auto-passenger ferries from current funds and two
auto-passenger ferries from new law budget and one ferry from
operational savings as outlined in this act and also procure an option
price to purchase additional boats for domestic use or resale. The
five ferries must be of comparable quality and design to the Jumbo Mark
II Class ferry and meet the certifications of the United States Coast
Guard, the American Bureau of Shipping, and safety of life at sea.
Operational savings are those funds saved from the normal day-to-day
operational costs of the four Steel Electric Class vessels minus the
actual operating costs of the San Juan Class ferries collected from the
four Steel Electric route farebox recovery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 When constructing the ferries under section
2 of this act, the department shall require that:
(1) Contractors comply with applicable laws, rules, and regulations
including, but not limited to, those pertaining to the environment,
worker health and safety, and prevailing wages;
(2) The ferries are constructed within the boundaries of the state
of Washington; except components, products, and systems that are
standard manufactured items are not subject to the in-state
requirement. For the purposes of this section, "constructed" means the
fabrication, by the joining together of welded or fastening of all
steel parts from which the total vessel is constructed, including, but
not limited to, all shell frames, longitudinals, bulkheads, webs,
piping runs, wire ways, and ducting. "Constructed" also means the
installation of all components and systems, as required by the
contract, including, but not limited to, equipment, machinery,
castings, electrical, electronics, deck covering, lining, paint, and
joiner work. "Constructed" also means the interconnection of all
equipment, machinery, and services, such as piping, wiring, and
ducting;
(3) All warranty work on the vessels is performed within the
boundaries of the state of Washington, insofar as practicable; and
(4) Other requirements that are mandated by state or federal law as
any requirements that are reasonably calculated to accomplish the
purpose of section 2 of this act and this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Washington State Ferries must adhere to the
criteria under this section when procuring new San Juan Class auto-passenger ferries to replace the four Steel Electric Class ferries
under the process contained in RCW 47.60.010. The procurement of these
vessels is authorized as required in RCW 47.60.010.
The request for proposals must include instructions requiring the
development of private placement of lease-backed certificates of
participation financing for each proposal. The financing component of
each proposal must be considered by Washington State Ferries as an
integral component of each request for proposals, response, and bid.
Washington State Ferries will use the office of financial management,
the office of the state treasurer, the Washington state transportation
commission, and the legislative transportation committee as advisers in
evaluating the financing benefits of each response.
The request for proposal must also contain:
(1) A functional specification created by Washington State Ferries.
The functional specification must include specification sufficient to
depict the ferries' characteristics and identify design criteria. The
development of the functional specification may not exceed a period of
thirty days nor a total cost of two hundred fifty thousand dollars;
(2) A provision that the construction of the ferries meets the
regulatory requirements and certifications of the United States Coast
Guard, the American Bureau of Shipping, and safety of life at sea;
(3) A provision that the constructed ferries can navigate all
scheduled routes, fit all existing terminals for auto-passenger ferries
throughout the system, and be capable of maintaining existing
schedules;
(4) A stipulation that funds appropriated to Washington State
Ferries for the purpose of this bid may not be used for honoraria for
the development of private sector responses for the request for
proposals; and
(5) Other requirements that are mandated by state or federal law,
as well as any requirements that are reasonably calculated to
accomplish the mission of the Washington state ferry system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The bidders seeking to construct the ferries
authorized under section 4 of this act are responsible to the state as
follows:
(1) Within ninety days of the publication of the functional
specification, bidders must respond with proposals containing
sufficient technical detail for the Washington state ferry system to
ascertain the technical viability of the proposal to meet the
functional specification; and
(2) The responsive bidder must take total responsibility for the
delivery of the ferries as agreed to at the signing of the contract.
The delivered ferries must meet all requirements of the contract
including, but not limited to, adherence to all the specifications,
certifications, and price, as agreed to at the signing of the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 47.60 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---