BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.84.092 and 2002 c 242 s 2, 2002 c 114 s 24, and
2002 c 56 s 402 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal
forest revolving account, the health services account, the public
health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
regional transportation investment district account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account,
the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund,
the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation equipment
fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account,
the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---