BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.04.170 and 1999 c 153 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of each association of municipal corporations
or municipal officers, which is recognized by law and utilized as an
official agency for the coordination of the policies and/or
administrative programs of municipal corporations, to submit
biennially, or ((oftener)) more often as necessary, to the governor and
to the legislature the joint recommendations of such participating
municipalities regarding changes which would affect the efficiency of
such municipal corporations. No public funds may be used directly or
indirectly for lobbying. Such associations shall include but shall not
be limited to the Washington state association of fire commissioners,
a state association of water/wastewater districts, and the Washington
state school directors' association.

--- END ---