BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of minority and women's business enterprises may receive
gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources that are
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit
of the purposes of the office of minority and women's business
enterprises and spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the
public or private sources according to their terms, unless the receipt
of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---