BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter and section 9 of this act unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Public agency" means any county, city, or other local
government agency or any state government agency, board, or commission.
(2) "Public transportation" means the same as "public
transportation service" as defined in RCW 36.57A.010 and includes
passenger services of the Washington state ferries.
(3) "Nonmotorized commuting" means commuting to and from the
workplace by an employee by walking or running or by riding a bicycle
or other device not powered by a motor.
(4) "Ride sharing" means the same as "flexible commuter ride
sharing" as defined in RCW 46.74.010, including ride sharing on
Washington state ferries.
(5) "Car sharing" means a membership program intended to offer an
alternative to car ownership under which persons or entities that
become members are permitted to use vehicles from a fleet on an hourly
basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 TAX CREDITS--BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION AND
PUBLIC UTILITY TAXES. (1) Employers in this state who are taxable
under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW and provide financial incentives to
their own or other employees for ride sharing, for using public
transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized
commuting before June 30, 2013, are allowed a credit against taxes
payable under chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW for amounts paid to or on
behalf of employees for ride sharing in vehicles carrying two or more
persons, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for
using nonmotorized commuting, not to exceed sixty dollars per employee
per year.
(2) Property managers who are taxable under chapter 82.04 or 82.16
RCW and provide financial incentives to persons employed at a worksite
in this state managed by the property manager for ride sharing, for
using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using
nonmotorized commuting before June 30, 2013, are allowed a credit
against taxes payable under chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW for amounts
paid to or on behalf of these persons for ride sharing in vehicles
carrying two or more persons, for using public transportation, for
using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting, not to exceed
sixty dollars per person per year.
(3) The credit under this section is equal to the amount paid to or
on behalf of each employee multiplied by fifty percent, but may not
exceed sixty dollars per employee per year. The credit may not exceed
the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under chapters 82.04 and
82.16 RCW.
(4) A person may not receive credit under this section for amounts
paid to or on behalf of the same employee under both chapters 82.04 and
82.16 RCW.
(5) A person may not take a credit under this section for amounts
claimed for credit by other persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 TAX CREDIT FILING. (1) Application for tax
credit under section 2 of this act may only be made in the form and
manner prescribed in rules adopted by the department.
(2) The credit under this section must be taken or deferred under
section 4 of this act against taxes due for the same calendar year in
which the amounts for which credit is claimed were paid to or on behalf
of employees for ride sharing, for using public transportation, for
using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting and must be
claimed by the due date of the last tax return for the calendar year in
which the payment is made.
(3) Any person who knowingly makes a false statement of a material
fact in the application for a credit under section 2 of this act is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 TAX CREDIT LIMITATIONS. (1) The department
shall keep a running total of all credits accrued under section 2 of
this act during each calendar year. No person is eligible for tax
credits under section 2 of this act if the credits would cause the
tabulation for the total amount of credits taken in any calendar year
to exceed two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars. This
limitation includes any credits carried forward under subsection (2)(b)
of this section from prior years.
(2)(a) No person is eligible for tax credits under section 2 of
this act in excess of the amount of tax that would otherwise be due
under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW.
(b) A person with taxes equal to or in excess of the credit under
section 2 of this act, and therefore not subject to the limitation in
(a) of this subsection, may defer tax credits for a period of not more
than three years after the year in which the credits accrue. A person
deferring tax credits under this subsection (2)(b) must submit an
application in the year in which the tax credits will be applied. This
application is subject to eligibility under subsection (1) of this
section for the calendar year in which the tax credits will be applied.
(3) No person is eligible for tax credits under section 2 of this
act in excess of two hundred thousand dollars in any calendar year.
This limitation does not apply to credits deferred in prior years under
subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(4) No person is eligible for tax credits, including deferred
credits authorized under subsection (2)(b) of this section, after June
30, 2013.
(5) Credits may not be carried forward or carried backward other
than as authorized in subsection (2)(b) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 FUND TRANSFER. (1) The director shall on
the 25th of February, May, August, and November of each year advise the
state treasurer of the amount of credit taken under section 2 of this
act during the preceding calendar quarter ending on the last day of
December, March, June, and September, respectively.
(2) On the last day of March, June, September, and December of each
year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the
department, shall deposit to the general fund a sum equal to the dollar
amount of the credit provided under section 2 of this act from the
multimodal transportation account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 COMMUTE TRIP REDUCTION REPORTING. The
commute trip reduction task force shall determine the effectiveness of
the tax credit under section 2 of this act, the grant program in
section 9 of this act, and the relative effectiveness of the tax credit
and the grant program as part of its ongoing evaluation of the commute
trip reduction law and report to the legislative transportation
committee and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives
and the senate. The report must include information on the amount of
tax credits claimed to date and recommendations on future funding
between the tax credit program and the grant program. The report must
be incorporated into the recommendations required in RCW 70.94.537(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 ADMINISTRATION. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies
to the administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 EXPIRATION. This chapter expires June 30,
2013, except for section 5 of this act, which expires December 31,
2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of transportation shall administer a
performance-based grant program for private employers, public agencies,
nonprofit organizations, developers, and property managers who provide
financial incentives for ride sharing in vehicles carrying two or more
persons, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for
using nonmotorized commuting, including telework, before June 30, 2013,
to their own or other employees.
(2) The amount of the grant will be determined based on the value
to the transportation system of the vehicle trips reduced. The commute
trip reduction task force shall develop an award rate giving priority
to applications achieving the greatest reduction in trips and commute
miles per public dollar requested and considering the following
criteria: The local cost of providing new highway capacity, congestion
levels, and geographic distribution.
(3) No private employer, public agency, nonprofit organization,
developer, or property manager is eligible for grants under this
section in excess of one hundred thousand dollars in any calendar year.
(4) The total of grants provided under this section may not exceed
seven hundred fifty thousand dollars in any calendar year.
(5) The department of transportation shall report to the department
of revenue by the 15th day of each month the aggregate monetary amount
of grants provided under this section in the prior month and the
identity of the recipients of those grants.
(6) The source of funds for this grant program is the multimodal
transportation account.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.04.4453 (Credit -- Ride-sharing, public transportation, or
nonmotorized commuting incentives -- Penalty -- Report to legislature) and
1999 c 402 s 1, 1996 c 128 s 1, & 1994 c 270 s 2;
(2) RCW 82.04.4454 (Credit -- Ride-sharing, public transportation, or
nonmotorized commuting incentives -- Ceiling) and 1999 c 402 s 3, 1996 c
128 s 2, & 1994 c 270 s 3;
(3) RCW 82.16.048 (Credit -- Ride-sharing, public transportation, or
nonmotorized commuting incentives -- Penalty -- Report to legislature) and
1999 c 402 s 2, 1996 c 128 s 3, & 1994 c 270 s 4; and
(4) RCW 82.16.049 (Credit -- Ride-sharing, public transportation, or
nonmotorized commuting incentives -- Ceiling) and 1999 c 402 s 4, 1996 c
128 s 4, & 1994 c 270 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The code reviser shall place cross-reference sections to chapter 82.-- RCW (sections 1 through 8 of this
act) in chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect January 1, 2004, but
only if legislation that provides additional revenues, excluding
transfers, for the multimodal transportation account is in effect on
that date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Captions used in this act are not part of
the law.

--- END ---