BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.046 and 1998 c 321 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning ((with distributions made to municipalities under RCW
82.44.150 on)) January 1, ((1996)) 2004, until December 31, 2013,
municipalities as defined in RCW 35.58.272 imposing local transit
taxes, which for purposes of this section include the sales and use tax
under RCW 82.14.045, the business and occupation tax under RCW
35.95.040, and excise taxes under RCW 35.95.040, shall be eligible for
quarterly sales and use tax equalization payments from ((motor vehicle
excise taxes distributed under RCW 82.44.150)) the multimodal
transportation account as follows:
(1) Prior to January 1st of each year the department of revenue
shall determine the total and the per capita levels of revenues for
each municipality imposing local transit taxes and the statewide
weighted average per capita level of sales and use tax revenues imposed
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW for the previous calendar year
calculated for a sales and use tax rate of one-tenth percent. For
purposes of this section, the department of revenue shall determine a
local transit tax rate for each municipality for the previous calendar
year. The tax rate shall be equivalent to the sales and use tax rate
for the municipality that would have generated an amount of revenue
equal to the amount of local transit taxes collected by the
municipality.
(2) For each tenth of one percent of the local transit tax rate,
the state treasurer shall apportion to each municipality receiving less
than eighty percent of the statewide weighted average per capita level
of sales and use tax revenues imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW as determined by the department of revenue under subsection (1) of
this section, an amount when added to the per capita level of revenues
received the previous calendar year by the municipality, to equal
eighty percent of the statewide weighted average per capita level of
revenues determined under subsection (1) of this section. In no event
may the sales and use tax equalization distribution to a municipality
in a single calendar year exceed: (a) Fifty percent of the amount of
local transit taxes collected during the prior calendar year; or (b)
the maximum amount of revenue that could have been collected at a local
transit tax rate of three-tenths percent in the prior calendar year.
(3) For a municipality established after January 1, 1995, sales and
use tax equalization distributions shall be made according to the
procedures in this subsection. Sales and use tax equalization
distributions to eligible new municipalities shall be made at the same
time as distributions are made under subsection (2) of this section.
The department of revenue shall follow the estimating procedures
outlined in this subsection until the new municipality has received a
full year's worth of local transit tax revenues as of the January sales
and use tax equalization distribution.
(a) Whether a newly established municipality determined to receive
funds under this subsection receives its first equalization payment at
the January, April, July, or October sales and use tax equalization
distribution shall depend on the date the system first imposes local
transit taxes.
(i) A newly established municipality imposing local transit taxes
taking effect during the first calendar quarter shall be eligible to
receive funds under this subsection beginning with the July sales and
use tax equalization distribution of that year.
(ii) A newly established municipality imposing local transit taxes
taking effect during the second calendar quarter shall be eligible to
receive funds under this subsection beginning with the October sales
and use tax equalization distribution of that year.
(iii) A newly established municipality imposing local transit taxes
taking effect during the third calendar quarter shall be eligible to
receive funds under this subsection beginning with the January sales
and use tax equalization distribution of the next year.
(iv) A newly established municipality imposing local transit taxes
taking effect during the fourth calendar quarter shall be eligible to
receive funds under this subsection beginning with the April sales and
use tax equalization distribution of the next year.
(b) For purposes of calculating the amount of funds the new
municipality should receive under this subsection, the department of
revenue shall:
(i) Estimate the per capita amount of revenues from local transit
taxes that the new municipality would have received had the
municipality received revenues from the tax the entire calendar year;
(ii) Calculate the amount provided under subsection (2) of this
section based on the per capita revenues determined under (b)(i) of
this subsection;
(iii) Prorate the amount determined under (b)(ii) of this
subsection by the number of months the local transit taxes have been
imposed.
(c) The department of revenue shall advise the state treasurer of
the amounts calculated under (b) of this subsection and the state
treasurer shall distribute these amounts to the new municipality from
((the motor vehicle excise tax deposited into the transportation fund
under RCW 82.44.110)) funds deposited into the multimodal
transportation account.
(4) If the amount of distributions are projected to exceed the
amount provided by the legislature for this purpose, the amounts must
be distributed in the following manner: (a) First, that amount
necessary to equalize up to eighty percent of a local tax rate of 0.3
percent, or eighty percent of the amount necessary to equalize the
local tax rate imposed by the municipality, whichever is less; and (b)
second, that amount necessary to equalize up to eighty percent of the
local tax rate imposed above 0.3 percent. In no event may the total
amount of distribution exceed six million dollars in any calendar year.
In no event may the amount of distribution to a municipality for (a) or
(a) and (b) of this subsection exceed the amount determined under
subsection (2) of this section. If the amount of funds provided are
less than needed for (a) and (b) of this subsection, then the amount
available must be prorated based on the share of each municipality's
portion of the total amounts for which those municipalities would
otherwise be eligible, first for (a) and then for (b) of this
subsection;
(5) A municipality whose governing body implements a tax change
that reduces its local transit tax rate after January 1, 1994, may not
receive distributions under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2004, but
only if legislation that provides additional revenues, excluding
transfers, for the multimodal transportation account is in effect on
that date.

--- END ---