BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I - INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that the state's
transportation system is in critical need of repair, restoration, and
enhancement. Bridges and major highway structures are at risk of
failure during a seismic episode; ferry vessels are aged and nearing
the end of their useful life; increased traffic congestion on state
highways and local roadways threatens the state's economic vitality and
quality of life; highways in some areas are experiencing high accident
rates; and the mobility of persons with special needs or who live in
rural areas has been greatly impaired by cuts in public transportation
services, thus threatening our citizens' ability to access health care,
job opportunities, and educational institutions. The revenues
generated by this act are dedicated to funds, accounts, and activities
that are critically necessary to improve the delivery of state
transportation projects and services.

PART II - LICENSE FEES
Sec. 201 RCW 46.16.070 and 1994 c 262 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In lieu of all other vehicle licensing fees, unless
specifically exempt, and in addition to ((the excise tax prescribed in
chapter 82.44 RCW and)) the mileage fees prescribed for buses and
stages in RCW 46.16.125, there shall be paid and collected annually for
each truck, motor truck, truck tractor, road tractor, tractor, bus,
auto stage, or for hire vehicle with seating capacity of more than six,
based upon the declared combined gross weight or declared gross weight
thereof pursuant to the provisions of chapter 46.44 RCW, the following
licensing fees by such gross weight:

DECLARED GROSS WEIGHT SCHEDULE A SCHEDULE B

4,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 37.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 37.00

6,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 44.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 44.00

8,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 55.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 55.00

10,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 62.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 62.00

((12,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 72.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 72.00

14,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 82.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 82.00

16,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 92.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 92.00

18,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 137.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 137.00

20,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 152.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 152.00

22,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 164.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 164.00

24,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 177.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 177.00

26,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 187.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 187.00

28,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 220.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 220.00

30,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 253.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 253.00

32,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 304.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 304.00

34,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 323.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 323.00

36,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 350.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 350.00

38,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 384.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 384.00

40,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 439.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 439.00

42,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 456.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 546.00

44,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 466.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 556.00

46,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 501.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 591.00

48,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 522.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 612.00

50,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 566.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 656.00

52,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 595.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 685.00

54,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 642.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 732.00

56,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 677.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 767.00

58,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 704.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 794.00

60,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 840.00

62,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 804.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 894.00

64,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 822.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 912.00

66,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 915.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,005.00

68,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 954.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,044.00

70,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,027.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,117.00

72,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,098.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,188.00

74,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,193.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,283.00

76,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,289.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,379.00

78,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,407.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,497.00

80,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,518.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,608.00

82,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,623.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,713.00

84,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,728.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,818.00

86,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,833.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,923.00

88,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,938.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,028.00

90,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,043.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,133.00

92,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,148.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,238.00

94,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,253.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,343.00

96,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,358.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,448.00

98,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,463.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,553.00

100,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,568.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,658.00

102,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,673.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,763.00

104,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,778.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,868.00

105,500 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,883.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,973.00))

12,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 79.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 79.00

14,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 90.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 90.00

16,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 102.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 102.00

18,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 154.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 154.00

20,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 171.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 171.00

22,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 185.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 185.00

24,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200.00

26,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 211.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 211.00

28,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249.00

30,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 287.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 287.00

32,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 346.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 346.00

34,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 368.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 368.00

36,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 399.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 399.00

38,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 438.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 438.00

40,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 501.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 501.00

42,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 521.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 611.00

44,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 532.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 622.00

46,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 572.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 662.00

48,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 596.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 686.00

50,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 647.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 737.00

52,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 680.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 770.00

54,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 734.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 824.00

56,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 775.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 865.00

58,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 806.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 896.00

60,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 859.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 949.00

62,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 921.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,011.00

64,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 941.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,031.00

66,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,048.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,138.00

68,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,093.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,183.00

70,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,177.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,267.00

72,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,259.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,349.00

74,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1, 368.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,458.00

76,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,478.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,568.00

78,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,614.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,704.00

80,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,742.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,832.00

82,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,863.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,953.00

84,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,983.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,073.00

86,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,104.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,194.00

88,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,225.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,315.00

90,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,346.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,436.00

92,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,466.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,556.00

94,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,587.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,677.00

96,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,708.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,798.00

98,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,829.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,919.00

100,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,949.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,039.00

102,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,070.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,160.00

104,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,191.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,281.00

105,500 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,312.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,402.00

Schedule A applies to vehicles either used exclusively for hauling
logs or that do not tow trailers. Schedule B applies to vehicles that
tow trailers and are not covered under Schedule A.
Every truck, motor truck, truck tractor, and tractor exceeding
6,000 pounds empty scale weight registered under chapter 46.16, 46.87,
or 46.88 RCW shall be licensed for not less than one hundred fifty
percent of its empty weight unless the amount would be in excess of the
legal limits prescribed for such a vehicle in RCW 46.44.041 or
46.44.042, in which event the vehicle shall be licensed for the maximum
weight authorized for such a vehicle or unless the vehicle is used only
for the purpose of transporting any well drilling machine, air
compressor, rock crusher, conveyor, hoist, donkey engine, cook house,
tool house, bunk house, or similar machine or structure attached to or
made a part of such vehicle.
The following provisions apply when increasing gross or combined
gross weight for a vehicle licensed under this section:
(a) The new license fee will be one-twelfth of the fee listed above
for the new gross weight, multiplied by the number of months remaining
in the period for which licensing fees have been paid, including the
month in which the new gross weight is effective.
(b) Upon surrender of the current certificate of registration or
cab card, the new licensing fees due shall be reduced by the amount of
the licensing fees previously paid for the same period for which new
fees are being charged.
(2) The proceeds from the fees collected under subsection (1) of
this section shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 46.68.035.

Sec. 202 RCW 46.68.035 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
All proceeds from combined vehicle licensing fees received by the
director for vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085 shall
be forwarded to the state treasurer to be distributed into accounts
according to the following method:
(1) The sum of two dollars for each vehicle shall be deposited into
the multimodal transportation account, except that for each vehicle
registered by a county auditor or agent to a county auditor pursuant to
RCW 46.01.140, the sum of two dollars shall be credited to the current
county expense fund.
(2) The remainder shall be distributed as follows:
(a) ((23.677)) 21.963 percent shall be deposited into the state
patrol highway account of the motor vehicle fund;
(b) ((1.521)) 1.411 percent shall be deposited into the Puget Sound
ferry operations account of the motor vehicle fund; and
(c) The remaining proceeds shall be deposited into the motor
vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 Revenues attributable to the increased
gross weight fees under section 201 of this act must be expended solely
on transportation projects that directly benefit the movement of
freight.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 The increased gross weight fees under
section 201 of this act apply to registrations that become payable
after July 1, 2003.

PART III - VEHICLE TRANSFER TAX
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 82.44
RCW to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected a vehicle transfer
tax on motor vehicles for the privilege of using the transportation
system in this state. The tax authorized by this section shall be in
addition to any other taxes authorized by law and shall be imposed on
any retail sale, lease, or use of a motor vehicle upon which a state
tax is imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. However, the tax
imposed by this section does not apply to the rental of a motor
vehicle. The rate of the tax shall equal forty-six one-hundredths of
one percent of the selling price when a state tax is imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW, or forty-six one-hundredths of one percent of the
value of the article used when a state tax is imposed under chapter
82.12 RCW. The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters
82.04, 82.08, and 82.12 RCW, insofar as applicable, have full force and
effect with respect to the tax imposed by this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "motor vehicle" has the
meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm tractors
or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181, off-road
and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and snowmobiles as
defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(3) The tax imposed in this section shall be collected and remitted
in the same manner as excise taxes collected under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall collect and administer the
tax imposed by this section. All administrative provisions in chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to
the tax imposed under this section. The department of revenue has the
power to adopt rules as may be necessary to administer the provisions
of this section. In the collection of tax imposed by this section, the
department of revenue may designate the county auditors of the several
counties of the state as its collecting agents. The county auditors
shall collect and remit the tax imposed by this section in the same
manner as the tax collected under RCW 82.12.045. No additional
collection fee shall be deductible by a county auditor remitting the
tax collected under this section. Any duties required by this section
to be performed by the county auditor may be performed by the director
of licensing but no collection fee shall be deductible by said director
in remitting the tax revenue to the state treasurer.
(4) The revenue collected under this section shall be deposited
into the multimodal transportation account created under RCW 47.66.070.

PART IV - MOTOR AND SPECIAL FUEL TAXES
Sec. 401 RCW 82.36.025 and 1999 c 269 s 16 and 1999 c 94 s 29 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A motor vehicle fuel tax rate of twenty-three cents per gallon
((shall apply)) applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor
vehicle fuel.
(2)(a) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative motor
fuel tax rate of one cent per gallon applies to the sale, distribution,
or use of motor vehicle fuel.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2004, an additional and cumulative motor fuel
tax rate of one cent per gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or
use of motor vehicle fuel.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2005, an additional and cumulative motor fuel
tax rate of one cent per gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or
use of motor vehicle fuel.
(d) Beginning July 1, 2006, an additional and cumulative motor fuel
tax rate of one cent per gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or
use of motor vehicle fuel.

Sec. 402 RCW 82.38.030 and 2002 c 183 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and imposed upon special fuel users a
tax at the rate ((computed in the manner provided in RCW 82.36.025 on
each)) of twenty-three cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one
hundred cubic feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard
pressure and temperature.
(2)(a) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative tax
rate of one cent per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel users.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2004, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of one cent per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet
of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel users.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2005, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of one cent per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet
of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel users.
(d) Beginning July 1, 2006, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of one cent per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet
of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel users.
(3) The tax is imposed ((by subsection (1) of this section is
imposed)) when:
(a) Special fuel is removed in this state from a terminal if the
special fuel is removed at the rack unless the removal is to a licensed
exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the state, or
the removal is to a special fuel distributor for direct delivery to an
international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320;
(b) Special fuel is removed in this state from a refinery if either
of the following applies:
(i) The removal is by bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of
the special fuel immediately before the removal is not a licensee; or
(ii) The removal is at the refinery rack unless the removal is to
a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the
state, or the removal is to a special fuel distributor for direct
delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW
82.38.320;
(c) Special fuel enters into this state for sale, consumption, use,
or storage if either of the following applies:
(i) The entry is by bulk transfer and the importer is not a
licensee; or
(ii) The entry is not by bulk transfer;
(d) Special fuel is sold or removed in this state to an unlicensed
entity unless there was a prior taxable removal, entry, or sale of the
special fuel;
(e) Blended special fuel is removed or sold in this state by the
blender of the fuel. The number of gallons of blended special fuel
subject to tax is the difference between the total number of gallons of
blended special fuel removed or sold and the number of gallons of
previously taxed special fuel used to produce the blended special fuel;
(f) Dyed special fuel is used on a highway, as authorized by the
internal revenue code, unless the use is exempt from the special fuel
tax;
(g) Dyed special fuel is held for sale, sold, used, or is intended
to be used in violation of this chapter;
(h) Special fuel purchased by an international fuel tax agreement
licensee under RCW 82.38.320 is used on a highway; and
(i) Special fuel is sold by a licensed special fuel supplier to a
special fuel distributor, special fuel importer, or special fuel
blender and the special fuel is not removed from the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(((3))) (4) The tax imposed by this chapter, if required to be
collected by the licensee, is held in trust by the licensee until paid
to the department, and a licensee who appropriates or converts the tax
collected to his or her own use or to any use other than the payment of
the tax to the extent that the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is
guilty of a felony, or gross misdemeanor in accordance with the theft
and anticipatory provisions of Title 9A RCW. A person, partnership,
corporation, or corporate officer who fails to collect the tax imposed
by this section, or who has collected the tax and fails to pay it to
the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter, is personally
liable to the state for the amount of the tax.

Sec. 403 RCW 46.68.090 and 1999 c 269 s 2 and 1999 c 94 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle
fund from the motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be
first expended for purposes enumerated in (a) and (b) of this
subsection. The remaining net tax amount shall be distributed monthly
by the state treasurer in ((the proportions set forth in (c) through
(l))) accordance with subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this
((subsection)) section.
(a) For payment of refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special
fuel tax that has been paid and is refundable as provided by law;
(b) For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to
appropriations for the administrative expenses of the offices of state
treasurer, state auditor, and the department of licensing of the state
of Washington in the administration of the motor vehicle fuel tax and
the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed monthly((;)).
(((c))) (2) All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(1) and 82.38.030(1) shall be distributed as set forth in (a)
through (j) of this section.
(a) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
44.387 percent to be expended for highway purposes of the state as
defined in RCW 46.68.130;
(((d))) (b) For distribution to the special category C account,
hereby created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609
percent to be expended for special category C projects. Special
category C projects are category C projects that, due to high cost
only, will require bond financing to complete construction.
The following criteria, listed in order of priority, shall be used
in determining which special category C projects have the highest
priority:
(i) Accident experience;
(ii) Fatal accident experience;
(iii) Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable
speeds without undue congestion; and
(iv) Continuity of development of the highway transportation
network.
Moneys deposited in the special category C account in the motor
vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the
proceeds of which are used to finance special category C projects under
this subsection (((1)(d))) (2)(b);
(((e))) (c) For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations
account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;
(((f))) (d) For distribution to the Puget Sound capital
construction account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
2.3726 percent;
(((g))) (e) For distribution to the urban arterial trust account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;
(((h))) (f) For distribution to the transportation improvement
account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and
expended in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;
(((i))) (g) For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor
vehicle fund an amount equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW
46.68.110;
(((j))) (h) For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there shall
be distributed from time to time, as directed by the department of
transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out the
provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to
the county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW
47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed
monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW
46.68.120;
(((k))) (i) For distribution to the county arterial preservation
account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
1.9565 percent. These funds shall be distributed by the county road
administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the
number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each
county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the structural,
safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road
administration board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies
to implement this program and to assure that a pavement management
system is used;
(((l))) (j) For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended
in accordance with RCW 36.79.020.
(((2))) (3) One hundred percent of the net tax amount collected
under RCW 82.36.025(2) and 82.38.030(2) shall be distributed to the
motor vehicle account.
(4) Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so
as to violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway
construction bond issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and
whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid from any excise
taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

Sec. 404 RCW 46.68.110 and 1999 c 269 s 3 and 1999 c 94 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Funds credited to the incorporated cities and towns of the state as
set forth in RCW 46.68.090(((1)(i))) (2)(g) shall be subject to
deduction and distribution as follows:
(1) One and one-half percent of such sums distributed under RCW
46.68.090(2)(g) shall be deducted monthly as such sums are credited and
set aside for the use of the department of transportation for the
supervision of work and expenditures of such incorporated cities and
towns on the city and town streets thereof, including the supervision
and administration of federal-aid programs for which the department of
transportation has responsibility: PROVIDED, That any moneys so
retained and not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium
to the incorporated cities and towns in proportion to deductions herein
made;
(2) Thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent of such funds
distributed under RCW 46.68.090(2)(g) shall be deducted monthly, as
such funds accrue, and set aside for the use of the department of
transportation for the purpose of funding the cities' share of the
costs of highway jurisdiction studies and other studies. Any funds so
retained and not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium
to the cities in proportion to the deductions made;
(3) One percent of such funds distributed under RCW 46.68.090(2)(g)
shall be deducted monthly, as such funds accrue, to be deposited in the
urban arterial trust account, to implement the city hardship assistance
program, as provided in RCW 47.26.164. However, any moneys so retained
and not required to carry out the program as of July 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter, shall be provided within sixty days to the
treasurer and distributed in the manner prescribed in subsection (5) of
this section;
(4) After making the deductions under subsections (1) through (3)
of this section and RCW 35.76.050, 31.86 percent of the fuel tax
distributed to the cities and towns in RCW 46.68.090(((1)(i))) (2)(g)
shall be allocated to the incorporated cities and towns in the manner
set forth in subsection (5) of this section and subject to deductions
in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, subject to RCW
35.76.050, to be used exclusively for: The construction, improvement,
chip sealing, seal-coating, and repair for arterial highways and city
streets as those terms are defined in RCW 46.04.030 and 46.04.120; the
maintenance of arterial highways and city streets for those cities with
a population of less than fifteen thousand; or the payment of any
municipal indebtedness which may be incurred in the construction,
improvement, chip sealing, seal-coating, and repair of arterial
highways and city streets; and
(5) The balance remaining to the credit of incorporated cities and
towns after such deduction shall be apportioned monthly as such funds
accrue among the several cities and towns within the state ratably on
the basis of the population last determined by the office of financial
management.

Sec. 405 RCW 82.38.035 and 2001 c 270 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A licensed supplier shall remit tax on special fuel to the
department as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2)(a))) (3)(a). On a two-party exchange, or buy-sell agreement between two licensed suppliers,
the receiving exchange partner or buyer shall remit the tax.
(2) A refiner shall remit tax to the department on special fuel
removed from a refinery as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2)(b))) (3)(b).
(3) An importer shall remit tax to the department on special fuel
imported into this state as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2)(c))) (3)(c).
(4) A blender shall remit tax to the department on the removal or
sale of blended special fuel as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2)(e)))
(3)(e).
(5) A dyed special fuel user shall remit tax to the department on
the use of dyed special fuel as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2)(f)))
(3)(f).

Sec. 406 RCW 82.38.047 and 1998 c 176 s 55 are each amended to
read as follows:
A terminal operator is jointly and severally liable for remitting
the tax imposed under RCW 82.38.030(((1))) if, in connection with the
removal of special fuel that is not dyed or marked in accordance with
internal revenue service requirements, the terminal operator provides
a person with a bill of lading, shipping paper, or similar document
indicating that the special fuel is dyed or marked in accordance with
internal revenue service requirements.

Sec. 407 RCW 46.09.170 and 1995 c 166 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on the tax rate ((in effect January 1, 1990)) of twenty cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel, less proper deductions for refunds and
costs of collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090. The treasurer shall
place these funds in the general fund as follows:
(a) Forty percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for planning, maintenance, and management of ORV recreation
facilities, nonhighway roads, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities. The funds under this subsection shall be expended in
accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than five percent may be expended for information
programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than ten percent and not more than fifty percent may
be expended for ORV recreation facilities;
(iii) Not more than twenty-five percent may be expended for
maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(iv) Not more than fifty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(v) Ten percent shall be transferred to the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation for grants to law enforcement agencies in those
counties where the department of natural resources maintains ORV
facilities. This amount is in addition to those distributions made by
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under (d)(i) of this
subsection;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of nonhighway roads and recreation
facilities;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the maintenance and management of ORV use areas and facilities; and
(d) Fifty-four and one-half percent, together with the funds
received by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under RCW
46.09.110, shall be credited to the nonhighway and off-road vehicle
activities program account to be administered by the committee for
planning, acquisition, development, maintenance, and management of ORV
recreation facilities and nonhighway road recreation facilities; ORV
user education and information; and ORV law enforcement programs. The
funds under this subsection shall be expended in accordance with the
following limitations:
(i) Not more than twenty percent may be expended for ORV education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than an amount equal to the funds received by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation under RCW 46.09.110 and
not more than sixty percent may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities;
(iii) Not more than twenty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities.
(2) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.

Sec. 408 RCW 46.10.170 and 1994 c 262 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
From time to time, but at least once each four years, the
department shall determine the amount of moneys paid to it as motor
vehicle fuel tax that is tax on snowmobile fuel. Such determination
shall use one hundred thirty-five gallons as the average yearly fuel
usage per snowmobile, the number of registered snowmobiles during the
calendar year under determination, and the fuel tax rate ((in effect
January 1, 1990)) of twenty cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel.

Sec. 409 RCW 79A.25.070 and 2000 c 11 s 73 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon expiration of the time limited by RCW 82.36.330 for claiming
of refunds of tax on marine fuel, the state of Washington shall succeed
to the right to such refunds. The director of licensing, after taking
into account past and anticipated claims for refunds from and deposits
to the marine fuel tax refund account and the costs of carrying out the
provisions of RCW 79A.25.030, shall request the state treasurer to
transfer monthly from the marine fuel tax refund account an amount
equal to the proportion of the moneys in the account representing the
motor vehicle fuel tax rate ((under RCW 82.36.025 in effect on January
1, 1990)) of twenty cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel, to the
recreation resource account and the remainder to the motor vehicle
fund.

PART V - CLEAN AIR FEE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 70.94
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to other fees and taxes required under this chapter,
registered owners of motor vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.320 shall
annually, upon renewal, pay a clean air fee of two dollars. The
proceeds of this clean air fee must be deposited in a segregated
subaccount of the air pollution control account created in RCW
70.94.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 A new section is added to chapter 70.94
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Money from the clean air fee under section 501 of this act may
be used for any purpose under this chapter, including but not limited
to the following:
(a) Retrofitting motor vehicles, including school buses and transit
fleets, with exhaust emission control devices;
(b) Reducing air contaminant emissions and cleaning up air
pollution;
(c) Reducing and eliminating toxic air contaminants;
(d) Providing funding for the differential costs of cleaner and
alternative fuels and vehicles that reduce air emissions and allow
advanced exhaust emission control devices to be used, including
ultralow sulfur diesel fuel, biodiesel, and natural gas;
(e) Providing funding for infrastructure necessary to allow fleets
to use alternative, cleaner fuels; and
(f) Administrative and operating costs of air pollution control
authorities and, where there is no air pollution control agency, the
department, to develop and oversee the air pollution cleanup programs
identified in this section.
(2) Money from the clean air fee under section 501 of this act is
subject to distribution as follows:
(a) Eighty percent of the money must be distributed to the air
pollution control authorities created under this chapter. The money
must be distributed in direct proportion with the amount of fees
imposed under section 501 of this act that are collected within the
boundaries of each authority. However, an amount in direct proportion
with those fees collected in counties for which no air pollution
control authority exists must be distributed to the department.
(b) Twenty percent of the money from the fee under section 501 of
this act must be distributed to the department and used by the
department for the following purposes:
(i) Retrofitting motor vehicles, including school buses and transit
fleets, with exhaust emission control devices;
(ii) Reducing air contaminant emissions and cleaning up air
pollution;
(iii) Reducing and eliminating toxic air contaminants;
(iv) Providing funding for the differential costs of cleaner and
alternative fuels and vehicles that reduce air emissions and allow
advanced exhaust emission control devices to be used, including
ultralow sulfur diesel fuel, biodiesel, and natural gas;
(v) Providing funding for infrastructure necessary to allow fleets
to use alternative, cleaner fuels; and
(vi) Administrative and operating costs of air pollution control
authorities and, where there is no air pollution control agency, the
department, to develop and oversee the air pollution cleanup programs
identified in this section.
(3) Money in the air pollution control account may be spent by the
department only after appropriation.

PART VI - SPECIAL LICENSE PLATES AND FUNDING
Sec. 601 RCW 46.16.233 and 2000 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for those license plates issued under RCW 46.16.305(1)
before January 1, 1987, under RCW 46.16.305(3), and to commercial
vehicles with a gross weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds,
effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1,
2001, the appearance of the background of all vehicle license plates
may vary in color and design, but must be ((issued on a standard
background)) legible and clearly identifiable as a Washington state
license plate, as designated by the department.
(2) Additionally, to ensure maximum legibility and reflectivity,
the department shall periodically provide for the replacement of
license plates, except for commercial vehicles with a gross weight in
excess of twenty-six thousand pounds. Frequency of replacement shall
be established in accordance with empirical studies documenting the
longevity of the reflective materials used to make license plates.
(3) In providing for the periodic replacement of license plates,
the department shall offer the vehicle's owner the option of retaining
the current license plate number. The department shall charge a
retention fee of twenty dollars if this option is exercised. Revenue
generated from the retention fee must be deposited into the multimodal
transportation account.

Sec. 602 RCW 46.01.140 and 2001 c 331 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county auditor, if appointed by the director of licensing
shall carry out the provisions of this title relating to the licensing
of vehicles and the issuance of vehicle license number plates under the
direction and supervision of the director and may with the approval of
the director appoint assistants as special deputies and recommend
subagents to accept applications and collect fees for vehicle licenses
and transfers and to deliver vehicle license number plates.
(2) A county auditor appointed by the director may request that the
director appoint subagencies within the county.
(a) Upon authorization of the director, the auditor shall use an
open competitive process including, but not limited to, a written
business proposal and oral interview to determine the qualifications of
all interested applicants.
(b) A subagent may recommend a successor who is either the
subagent's sibling, spouse, or child, or a subagency employee, as long
as the recommended successor participates in the open, competitive
process used to select an applicant. In making successor
recommendation and appointment determinations, the following provisions
apply:
(i) If a subagency is held by a partnership or corporate entity,
the nomination must be submitted on behalf of, and agreed to by, all
partners or corporate officers.
(ii) No subagent may receive any direct or indirect compensation or
remuneration from any party or entity in recognition of a successor
nomination. A subagent may not receive any financial benefit from the
transfer or termination of an appointment.
(iii) (a) and (b) of this subsection are intended to assist in the
efficient transfer of appointments in order to minimize public
inconvenience. They do not create a proprietary or property interest
in the appointment.
(c) The auditor shall submit all proposals to the director, and
shall recommend the appointment of one or more subagents who have
applied through the open competitive process. The auditor shall
include in his or her recommendation to the director, not only the name
of the successor who is a relative or employee, if applicable and if
otherwise qualified, but also the name of one other applicant who is
qualified and was chosen through the open competitive process. The
director has final appointment authority.
(3)(a) A county auditor who is appointed as an agent by the
department shall enter into a standard contract provided by the
director, developed with the advice of the title and registration
advisory committee.
(b) A subagent appointed under subsection (2) of this section shall
enter into a standard contract with the county auditor, developed with
the advice of the title and registration advisory committee. The
director shall provide the standard contract to county auditors.
(c) The contracts provided for in (a) and (b) of this subsection
must contain at a minimum provisions that:
(i) Describe the responsibilities, and where applicable, the
liability, of each party relating to the service expectations and
levels, equipment to be supplied by the department, and equipment
maintenance;
(ii) Require the specific type of insurance or bonds so that the
state is protected against any loss of collected motor vehicle tax
revenues or loss of equipment;
(iii) Specify the amount of training that will be provided by the
state, the county auditor, or subagents;
(iv) Describe allowable costs that may be charged to vehicle
licensing activities as provided for in (d) of this subsection;
(v) Describe the causes and procedures for termination of the
contract, which may include mediation and binding arbitration.
(d) The department shall develop procedures that will standardize
and prescribe allowable costs that may be assigned to vehicle licensing
and vessel registration and title activities performed by county
auditors.
(e) The contracts may include any provision that the director deems
necessary to ensure acceptable service and the full collection of
vehicle and vessel tax revenues.
(f) The director may waive any provisions of the contract deemed
necessary in order to ensure that readily accessible service is
provided to the citizens of the state.
(4)(a) At any time any application is made to the director, the
county auditor, or other agent pursuant to any law dealing with
licenses, registration, or the right to operate any vehicle or vessel
upon the public highways or waters of this state, excluding applicants
already paying such fee under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085, the applicant
shall pay to the director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of
three dollars for each application in addition to any other fees
required by law.
(b) Counties that do not cover the expenses of vehicle licensing
and vessel registration and title activities may submit to the
department a request for cost-coverage moneys. The request must be
submitted on a form developed by the department. The department shall
develop procedures to verify whether a request is reasonable. Payment
shall be made on requests found to be allowable from the licensing
services account.
(c) Applicants for certificates of ownership, including applicants
paying fees under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085, shall pay to the
director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of four dollars in
addition to any other fees required by law.
(d) The fees under (a) and (c) of this subsection, if paid to the
county auditor as agent of the director, or if paid to a subagent of
the county auditor, shall be paid to the county treasurer in the same
manner as other fees collected by the county auditor and credited to
the county current expense fund. If the fee is paid to another agent
of the director, the fee shall be used by the agent to defray his or
her expenses in handling the application.
(e) Applicants required to pay the three-dollar fee established
under (a) of this subsection, must pay an additional ((fifty)) seventy-five cents on registrations that are due or are to become due November
1, 2003, which must be collected and remitted to the state treasurer
((for deposit)) and distributed as follows:
(i) Fifty cents must be deposited into the department of licensing
services account of the motor vehicle fund((. Revenue deposited into
this account)) and must be used for agent and subagent support, which
is to include but not be limited to the replacement of department-owned
equipment in the possession of agents and subagents.
(ii) Twenty-five cents must be deposited into the license plate
technology account created under section 603 of this act.
(5) A subagent shall collect a service fee of (a) eight dollars and
fifty cents for changes in a certificate of ownership, with or without
registration renewal, or verification of record and preparation of an
affidavit of lost title other than at the time of the title application
or transfer and (b) three dollars and fifty cents for registration
renewal only, issuing a transit permit, or any other service under this
section.
(6) If the fee is collected by the state patrol as agent for the
director, the fee so collected shall be certified to the state
treasurer and deposited to the credit of the state patrol highway
account. If the fee is collected by the department of transportation
as agent for the director, the fee shall be certified to the state
treasurer and deposited to the credit of the motor vehicle fund. All
such fees collected by the director or branches of his office shall be
certified to the state treasurer and deposited to the credit of the
highway safety fund.
(7) Any county revenues that exceed the cost of providing vehicle
licensing and vessel registration and title activities in a county,
calculated in accordance with the procedures in subsection (3)(d) of
this section, shall be expended as determined by the county legislative
authority during the process established by law for adoption of county
budgets.
(8) The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 A new section is added to chapter 46.16
RCW to read as follows:
The license plate technology account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts collected under RCW 46.01.140(4)(e)(ii) must be
deposited into this account. Expenditures from this account must
support current and future license plate technology and systems
integration upgrades. Money in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 A new section is added to chapter 46.16
RCW to read as follows:
The department shall offer license plate design services to
organizations that are sponsoring a new special license plate series or
are seeking to redesign the appearance of an existing special license
plate series that they sponsored. In providing this service, the
department must work with the requesting organization in determining
the specific qualities of the new plate design and must provide full
design services to the organization. The department shall collect from
the requesting organization a fee of one thousand five hundred dollars
for providing license plate design services. This fee includes one
original license plate design and up to five additional renditions of
the original design. If the organization requests the department to
provide further renditions in addition to the five renditions provided
under the original fee, the department shall collect an additional fee
of five hundred dollars per rendition. All revenue collected under
this section must be deposited into the multimodal transportation
account.

PART VII - TIRE RECYCLING
Sec. 701 RCW 70.95.510 and 1989 c 431 s 92 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied a ((one dollar)) seventy-five cents per tire
fee on the retail sale of new replacement vehicle tires for a period of
five years, beginning ((October 1, 1989)) on the effective date of this
section. The fee imposed in this section shall be paid by the buyer to
the seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full
amount of the fee. The fee collected from the buyer by the seller,
less the ten percent amount retained by the seller as provided in ((RCW
70.95.535)) subsection (4) of this section, shall be paid to the
department of revenue in accordance with RCW 82.32.045, and the
proceeds remaining after the deposit required by subsection (3) of this
section, must be deposited into the vehicle tire recycling account
created under section 702 of this act. All other applicable provisions
of chapter 82.32 RCW have full force and application with respect to
the fee imposed under this section. The department of revenue shall
administer this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "new replacement vehicle
tires" means tires that are newly manufactured for vehicle purposes and
used tires available for resale, but does not include retreaded vehicle
tires.
(3) Of the seventy-five cent fee imposed in subsection (1) of this
section, twenty-five cents must be deposited into the motor vehicle
account and must be used by the department of transportation for road
maintenance, which may incorporate the use of material derived from
scrap tires.
(4) Every person engaged in making retail sales of new replacement
vehicle tires in this state shall retain ten percent of the collected
seventy-five cent fee imposed in subsection (1) of this section. The
moneys retained may be used for costs associated with the proper
management of the waste vehicle tires by the retailer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 A new section is added to chapter 70.95
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The vehicle tire recycling account is created within the state
treasury. After the deposit of funds into the motor vehicle account as
provided for in RCW 70.95.510(3), the remaining funds received under
RCW 70.95.510(1) must be deposited in the vehicle tire recycling
account and used by the department for purposes including but not
limited to those specified in RCW 70.95.535. Expenditures from the
account may occur only after appropriation by the legislature. The
department of revenue shall deduct two percent from the funds collected
under RCW 70.95.510 for the purpose of administering and collecting the
fee from new replacement tire retailers.
(2) Moneys in the vehicle tire recycling account may be
appropriated to the department for the purposes identified in RCW
70.95.535.
(3) To provide increased accountability, by January 1st of each
year, the department shall submit a report to the legislature outlining
how the revenues deposited into the vehicle tire recycling account were
used over the previous twelve-month period. The report must include,
but is not limited to, identifying the local jurisdictions that
received grant funding, the location and description of any illegal
tire piles cleaned up, a description of any scrap tire demonstration
projects funded, and the status of the statewide tire carrier tracking
system.

Sec. 703 RCW 70.95.535 and 1989 c 431 s 93 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Every person engaged in making retail sales of new
replacement vehicle tires in this state shall retain ten percent of the
collected one dollar fee. The moneys retained may be used for costs
associated with the proper management of the waste vehicle tires by the
retailer.
(2))) The department of ecology ((will)) may administer the funds
contained in the vehicle tire recycling account for ((the)) purposes
((specified in RCW 70.95.020(5))) including, but not limited to:
(a) ((Making grants to local governments for pilot demonstration
projects for on-site shredding and recycling of tires from unauthorized
dump sites;
(b))) Grants to local government for enforcement programs;
(((c))) (b) Implementation of a public information and education
program to include posters, signs, and informational materials to be
distributed to retail tire sales and tire service outlets;
(((d))) (c) Product marketing studies for recycled tires and
alternatives to land disposal;
(d) Scrap tire demonstration projects including those implemented
by state agencies;
(e) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, statewide
unlawful tire pile cleanups and local citizen scrap tire amnesty
events;
(f) Statewide tire carrier tracking, reporting, and enforcement of
the movement of tires within this state;
(g) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to
provide for funding to state and local governments for the removal of
discarded vehicle tires from unauthorized tire dump sites;
(h) To accomplish the other purposes of RCW 70.95.020(6).
(2) Prior to spending funds from the vehicle tire recycling account
for the removal or cleanup of unlawfully disposed tires, the department
must ensure that all legal remedies and cost recovery efforts available
against the owner of the unlawfully disposed tires, or the property on
which the unlawful tire piles are located, have been exhausted. The
department should assist local jurisdictions, where appropriate, with
enforcement actions against individuals unlawfully disposing of tires.
(3)(a) Local governments that are recipients of grant funding for
enforcement programs must submit an annual report to the department for
each year the grant funding is expended, detailing the uses of the
funds and including information on what enforcement activities were
supported with the grant funds.
(b) Local governments that are recipients of grant funding for
illegal tire pile cleanups shall submit an annual report to the
department for each year the grant funding is expended. The report
must, at a minimum, identify the owners of the tire piles, the
locations of the tire piles cleaned up, how many tires were removed,
where and how the tires were disposed, and why cost recovery could not
be obtained from the owners of the tire piles. The department shall
forward this information to the legislature on an annual basis.
(4) In spending funds in the account under this section, the
department shall identify communities with the most severe problems
with waste tires and provide funds first to those communities to remove
accumulations of waste tires.
(5) It is the intent of the legislature that in spending funds from
the vehicle tire recycling account, the department will not implement
a program or otherwise spend funds that competes with private
businesses that engage in tire recycling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 (1) The department of ecology shall
implement an educational campaign for a period of one year, beginning
no later than twelve months following the effective date of this
section, to inform and educate local jurisdictions and the various
vehicle tire industries who sell, dispose of, and recycle vehicle
tires, on the current laws related to vehicle tire disposal and
recycling, and the current vehicle tire recycling program administered
by the department.
(2) By September 1, 2003, the department shall submit a report to
the legislature on illegal tire piles located in the state. At a
minimum, the report must include information identifying every known
illegal tire pile in the state, the city and county where each illegal
tire pile is located, the estimated number of tires in each illegal
tire pile, and the expected cost associated with cleaning up each
illegal tire pile.
(3) Moneys from the vehicle tire recycling account may be used to
fund this section.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 RCW 70.95.530 (Vehicle tire recycling
account -- Use) and 1988 c 250 s 1 & 1985 c 345 s 7 are each repealed.

PART VIII - MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 Section 501 of this act expires June 30,
2030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 (1) Except for sections 601 through 604 of
this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2003.
(2) Sections 601 through 604 of this act take effect January 1,
2004.

--- END ---