BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
STATE AND LOCAL HIGHWAY IMPROVEMENTS - 2003 ACT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In order to provide funds necessary for the
location, design, right of way acquisition, and construction of
selected state and local highway improvements, there shall be issued
and sold upon the request of the transportation commission a total of
one billion three hundred fifteen million dollars of general obligation
bonds of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Upon the request of the transportation
commission or successor agency, as appropriate, the state finance
committee shall supervise and provide for the issuance, sale, and
retirement of the bonds authorized by section 1 of this act in
accordance with chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds authorized by this act shall
be sold in the manner, at times, in amounts, and at the price as the
state finance committee shall determine. No bonds may be offered for
sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the
sale of the bonds.
The state finance committee shall consider the issuance of short-term obligations in lieu of long-term obligations for the purposes of
more favorable interest rates, lower total interest costs, and
increased marketability and for the purpose of retiring the bonds
during the life of the project for which they were issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by section 1 of this act shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle account. The proceeds shall be available only for the purposes
enumerated in section 1 of this act, for the payment of bond
anticipation notes, if any, and for the payment of bond issuance costs,
including the costs of underwriting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Bonds issued under the authority of section
1 of this act shall distinctly state that they are a general obligation
of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of
the state to the payment of principal and interest, and shall contain
an unconditional promise to pay principal and interest as the same
shall become due. The principal and interest on the bonds shall be
first payable from the proceeds of the state excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels imposed by chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW.
Proceeds of these excise taxes are hereby pledged to the payment of any
bonds and the interest thereon issued under the authority of sections
1 through 6 of this act, and the legislature agrees to continue to
impose these excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels in amounts
sufficient to pay, when due, the principal and interest on all bonds
issued under the authority of section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Both principal and interest on the bonds
issued for the purposes of section 1 of this act shall be payable from
the highway bond retirement fund. The state finance committee may
provide that a special account be created in the fund to facilitate
payment of the principal and interest. The state finance committee
shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the state
treasurer the amount required for principal and interest on the bonds
in accordance with the bond proceedings. The state treasurer shall
withdraw revenues from the motor vehicle fund and deposit in the
highway bond retirement fund, or a special account in the fund, such
amounts, and at such times, as are required by the bond proceedings.
Any funds required for bond retirement or interest on the bonds
authorized by section 1 of this act shall be taken from that portion of
the motor vehicle fund that results from the imposition of excise taxes
on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is, or may be,
appropriated to the department of transportation for state highway
purposes. Funds required shall never constitute a charge against any
other allocations of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel tax revenues
to the state, counties, cities, and towns unless the amount arising
from excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels distributed to the
state in the motor vehicle fund proves insufficient to meet the
requirements for bond retirement or interest on the bonds.
Any payments for bond retirement or interest on the bonds taken
from other revenues from the motor vehicle fuel or special fuel taxes
that are distributable to the state, counties, cities, and towns shall
be repaid from the first revenues from the motor vehicle fuel or
special fuel taxes distributed to the motor vehicle fund not required
for bond retirement or interest on the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Bonds issued under the authority of this act
and any other general obligation bonds of the state of Washington that
have been or that may be authorized and that pledge motor vehicle and
special fuel excise taxes for the payment of principal and interest
thereon shall be an equal charge against the revenues from the motor
vehicle and special fuel excise taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 47.10 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The part heading in this act is not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---