BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) When the department performs a risk assessment pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.500, or to determine a person's conditions of supervision,
the risk assessment shall classify the offender into one of at least
four risk categories.
(b) The department shall supervise every offender:
(i) Sentenced to a term of community custody, community placement,
or community supervision whose risk assessment places that offender in
one of the two highest risk categories;
(ii) Sentenced to a term of community custody, community placement,
or community supervision, regardless of the offender's risk category,
for a violent offense, a sex offense, a crime against persons as
defined in RCW 9.94A.411, burglary in the first degree, burglary in the
second degree, or domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020; or
(iii) Sentenced to a term of community custody, community
placement, or community supervision, regardless of the offender's risk
category, who has a prior conviction for a violent offense, a sex
offense, a crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411, burglary
in the first degree, burglary in the second degree, or domestic
violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020.
(2) The department may supervise any offender sentenced to a term
of community custody, community placement, or community supervision
whose risk assessment places that offender in any risk category other
than the two highest and who is not required to be supervised under
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.700 and 2002 c 175 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a court sentences an offender to a term of total confinement
in the custody of the department for any of the offenses specified in
this section, the court shall also sentence the offender to a term of
community placement as provided in this section. The department shall
supervise any sentence of community placement imposed under this
section pursuant to section 1 of this act.
(1) The court shall order a one-year term of community placement
for the following:
(a) A sex offense or a serious violent offense committed after July
1, 1988, but before July 1, 1990; or
(b) An offense committed on or after July 1, 1988, but before July
25, 1999, that is:
(i) Assault in the second degree;
(ii) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(iii) A crime against persons where it is determined in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
deadly weapon at the time of commission; or
(iv) A felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW not
sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660.
(2) The court shall sentence the offender to a term of community
placement of two years or up to the period of earned release awarded
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728, whichever is longer, for:
(a) An offense categorized as a sex offense committed on or after
July 1, 1990, but before June 6, 1996, including those sex offenses
also included in other offense categories;
(b) A serious violent offense other than a sex offense committed on
or after July 1, 1990, but before July 1, 2000; or
(c) A vehicular homicide or vehicular assault committed on or after
July 1, 1990, but before July 1, 2000.
(3) The community placement ordered under this section shall begin
either upon completion of the term of confinement or at such time as
the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned
release. When the court sentences an offender to the statutory maximum
sentence then the community placement portion of the sentence shall
consist entirely of the community custody to which the offender may
become eligible. Any period of community custody actually served shall
be credited against the community placement portion of the sentence.
(4) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the terms of any
community placement imposed under this section shall include the
following conditions:
(a) The offender shall report to and be available for contact with
the assigned community corrections officer as directed;
(b) The offender shall work at department-approved education,
employment, or community restitution, or any combination thereof;
(c) The offender shall not possess or consume controlled substances
except pursuant to lawfully issued prescriptions;
(d) The offender shall pay supervision fees as determined by the
department; and
(e) The residence location and living arrangements shall be subject
to the prior approval of the department during the period of community
placement.
(5) As a part of any terms of community placement imposed under
this section, the court may also order one or more of the following
special conditions:
(a) The offender shall remain within, or outside of, a specified
geographical boundary;
(b) The offender shall not have direct or indirect contact with the
victim of the crime or a specified class of individuals;
(c) The offender shall participate in crime-related treatment or
counseling services;
(d) The offender shall not consume alcohol; or
(e) The offender shall comply with any crime-related prohibitions.
(6) An offender convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor
victim after June 6, 1996, shall comply with any terms and conditions
of community placement imposed by the department relating to contact
between the sex offender and a minor victim or a child of similar age
or circumstance as a previous victim.
(7) Prior to or during community placement, upon recommendation of
the department, the sentencing court may remove or modify any
conditions of community placement so as not to be more restrictive.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.705 and 2000 c 28 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for persons sentenced under RCW 9.94A.700(2) or 9.94A.710,
when a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the
custody of the department for a violent offense, any crime against
persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or any felony offense under chapter
69.50 or 69.52 RCW not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660, committed on or
after July 25, 1999, but before July 1, 2000, the court shall in
addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to
a one-year term of community placement beginning either upon completion
of the term of confinement or at such time as the offender is
transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2). When the court sentences
the offender under this section to the statutory maximum period of
confinement, then the community placement portion of the sentence shall
consist entirely of such community custody to which the offender may
become eligible, in accordance with RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2). Any
period of community custody actually served shall be credited against
the community placement portion of the sentence. The department shall
supervise any sentence of community placement or community custody
imposed under this section pursuant to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.715 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 302 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department for a sex offense not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, a
violent offense, any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or
a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or
after July 1, 2000, the court shall in addition to the other terms of
the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for the
community custody range established under RCW 9.94A.850 or up to the
period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2),
whichever is longer. The community custody shall begin: (a) Upon
completion of the term of confinement; (b) at such time as the offender
is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2); or (c) with regard to
offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660, upon failure to complete or
administrative termination from the special drug offender sentencing
alternative program. The department shall supervise any sentence of
community custody imposed under this section pursuant to section 1 of
this act.
(2)(a) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions of
community custody shall include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4).
The conditions may also include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5).
The court may also order the offender to participate in rehabilitative
programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct reasonably related to
the circumstances of the offense, the offender's risk of reoffending,
or the safety of the community, and the department shall enforce such
conditions pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(b) As part of any sentence that includes a term of community
custody imposed under this subsection, the court shall also require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department under
RCW 9.94A.720. The department shall assess the offender's risk of
reoffense and may establish and modify additional conditions of the
offender's community custody based upon the risk to community safety.
In addition, the department may require the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and
to obey all laws.
(c) The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to
those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court
imposed conditions. The department shall notify the offender in
writing of any such conditions or modifications. In setting,
modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the
department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.
(3) If an offender violates conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to this section during community custody, the
department may transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement
status and impose other available sanctions as provided in RCW
9.94A.737 and 9.94A.740.
(4) Except for terms of community custody under RCW 9.94A.670, the
department shall discharge the offender from community custody on a
date determined by the department, which the department may modify,
based on risk and performance of the offender, within the range or at
the end of the period of earned release, whichever is later.
(5) At any time prior to the completion or termination of a sex
offender's term of community custody, if the court finds that public
safety would be enhanced, the court may impose and enforce an order
extending any or all of the conditions imposed pursuant to this section
for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for the crime as it
is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a condition
extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of
the sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.631 and may be punishable as
contempt of court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040. If the court
extends a condition beyond the expiration of the term of community
custody, the department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender's compliance with the condition.
(6) Within the funds available for community custody, the
department shall determine conditions and duration of community custody
on the basis of risk to community safety, and shall supervise offenders
during community custody on the basis of risk to community safety and
conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this subsection.
(7) By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of
a condition imposed or modified by the department, an offender may
request an administrative review under rules adopted by the department.
The condition shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds
that it is not reasonably related to any of the following: (a) The
crime of conviction; (b) the offender's risk of reoffending; or (c) the
safety of the community.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.720 and 2002 c 175 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Pursuant to section 1 of this act, all offenders sentenced
to terms involving community supervision, community restitution,
community placement, community custody, or legal financial obligation
shall be under the supervision of the department and shall follow
explicitly the instructions and conditions of the department. The
department may require an offender to perform affirmative acts it deems
appropriate to monitor compliance with the conditions of the sentence
imposed.
(b) The instructions shall include, at a minimum, reporting as
directed to a community corrections officer, remaining within
prescribed geographical boundaries, notifying the community corrections
officer of any change in the offender's address or employment, and
paying the supervision fee assessment.
(c) For offenders sentenced to terms involving community custody
for crimes committed on or after June 6, 1996, the department may
include, in addition to the instructions in (b) of this subsection, any
appropriate conditions of supervision, including but not limited to,
prohibiting the offender from having contact with any other specified
individuals or specific class of individuals.
(d) For offenders sentenced to terms of community custody for
crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department may impose
conditions as specified in RCW 9.94A.715.
The conditions authorized under (c) of this subsection may be
imposed by the department prior to or during an offender's community
custody term. If a violation of conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.710 occurs during community custody,
it shall be deemed a violation of community placement for the purposes
of RCW 9.94A.740 and shall authorize the department to transfer an
offender to a more restrictive confinement status as provided in RCW
9.94A.737. At any time prior to the completion of an offender's term
of community custody, the department may recommend to the court that
any or all of the conditions imposed by the court or the department
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.710 or 9.94A.715 be continued beyond the
expiration of the offender's term of community custody as authorized in
RCW 9.94A.715 (3) or (5).
The department may require offenders to pay for special services
rendered on or after July 25, 1993, including electronic monitoring,
day reporting, and telephone reporting, dependent upon the offender's
ability to pay. The department may pay for these services for
offenders who are not able to pay.
(2) No offender sentenced to terms involving community supervision,
community restitution, community custody, or community placement under
the supervision of the department may own, use, or possess firearms or
ammunition. Offenders who own, use, or are found to be in actual or
constructive possession of firearms or ammunition shall be subject to
the violation process and sanctions under RCW 9.94A.634, 9.94A.737, and
9.94A.740. "Constructive possession" as used in this subsection means
the power and intent to control the firearm or ammunition. "Firearm"
as used in this subsection has the same definition as in RCW 9.41.010.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.545 and 2000 c 28 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
On all sentences of confinement for one year or less, the court may
impose up to one year of community custody, subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.715 and 9.94A.720. An offender
shall be on community custody as of the date of sentencing. However,
during the time for which the offender is in total or partial
confinement pursuant to the sentence or a violation of the sentence,
the period of community custody shall toll. The department shall
supervise any sentence of community custody imposed under this section
pursuant to section 1 of this act.

--- END ---