BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.34.010 and 1997 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The governor or the governor's designee, two members of the house
of representatives, one from each major caucus, appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, two members of the senate, one
from each major caucus, appointed by the president of the senate, the
((lieutenant governor, the secretary of state, and the)) commissioner
of public lands, ((ex officio)) and the state historic preservation
officer, shall constitute the state capitol committee. The statewide
elected officials and the state historic preservation officer shall be
ex officio. The voting members of the committee are the governor or
the governor's designee and the four legislative members; the
commissioner of public lands and the state historic preservation
officer shall be nonvoting members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state capitol committee has sole responsibility for
allocating internal space and establishing policy regarding the
preservation of the historic character of the interior and furnishings
for the Legislative building, the Cherberg building, the O'Brien
building, the Newhouse building, and the Pritchard building. This
responsibility includes but is not limited to offices, committee rooms,
hearing rooms, workrooms, public areas, the provision of office space
for the governor, and the provision of space for other statewide
elected officials and other state agencies as the committee deems
necessary.
(2) The state capitol committee may appoint ex officio members at
its discretion to assist the committee with historical, structural, or
architectural considerations related to interiors of the buildings
under its control, or, subject to funding in the omnibus appropriations
act, the committee may contract for such services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 27.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The actions of the capitol furnishings committee shall be
consistent with the policies established by the state capitol
committee.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.19.125 and 1965 c 8 s 43.19.125 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of general administration, through the division of
capitol buildings, shall have custody and control of the capitol
buildings and grounds, supervise and direct proper care, heating,
lighting and repairing thereof, and designate rooms in the capitol
buildings to be occupied by various state officials except as provided
in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---