BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following fees shall be collected by the department:
(a) For submitting an application for a permit to appropriate or to
store water, a minimum of forty dollars to be paid with the
application. For proposed diversion or withdrawal amounts exceeding
one-tenth of a cubic foot per second, the fee is payable at the rate of
four hundred dollars per cubic foot per second, or proportionally for
a fraction thereof. For proposed storage of water exceeding one
hundred acre feet, the fee is payable at the rate of forty cents per
acre foot or fraction thereof of water storage capacity. The minimum
fee paid with the application is a credit to the amount due whenever
the application fee totals more than forty dollars. The fee for
submitting an application to change, transfer, or amend a water right
or for a temporary permit or seasonal change is one-half the fee for
the same amount of water for a new water right. Within five working
days from the receipt of an application, the department shall send
notice to the applicant of any additional fees due under this
subsection (1)(a) and any additional fees must be paid to and received
by the department within sixty days from the date of receipt of the
notice of fees due, or the application must be rejected.
(b) For examining an application to appropriate or store water
leading to the issuance of a permit to appropriate water, a minimum of
one hundred sixty dollars. For proposed diversion or withdrawal amount
exceeding one-tenth of a cubic foot per second, the fee is payable at
the rate of one thousand six hundred dollars per cubic foot per second,
or proportionally for a fraction thereof. For proposed storage of
water exceeding one hundred acre feet, the fee is payable at the rate
of one dollar and sixty cents per acre foot or fraction thereof of
water storage capacity. The minimum permit examination fee paid is a
credit to the amount due whenever the fee totals more than one hundred
sixty dollars. The fee for examining an application to change,
transfer, or amend a water right or for a temporary permit or seasonal
change leading to an approval is one-half the fee for the same amount
of water for a new water right. The fee in this subsection must be
paid before the department initiates its formal examination of the
application. The department shall inform the applicant when the fee
required by this subsection (1)(b) is due and the fee must be paid to
and received by the department within sixty days from the date that
notice of the fee is received by the applicant, or the application must
be rejected. If the department determines that a permit or approval
must be denied, the department shall refund to the applicant one-half
of the amount of the fee that has been paid under this subsection
(1)(b).
(c) For preparing, issuing, and recording a water right certificate
for a new water right, three hundred dollars. For preparing, issuing,
and recording a superseding certificate or change certificate
documenting a change, transfer, or amendment of a water right or water
right claim respectively, one hundred fifty dollars. The department
shall also collect the applicable county recording fee from the
applicant and shall remit the recording fee to the county. The
department shall inform the applicant when the fee required by this
subsection (1)(c) is due and the fee must be paid to and received by
the department within sixty days from the date that notice of the fee
is received by the applicant, or the permit must be canceled and no
certificate will be issued.
(d) For granting each extension of time for beginning construction,
for completing construction, or for completing application of water to
a beneficial use under a permit to appropriate water, one-quarter of
the permit fee paid under (b) of this subsection must be paid for each
year that an extension is granted.
(e) For recording an assignment either of a permit to appropriate
water or of an application for a permit, a fee of sixty-five dollars.
(f) For filing and recording a protest against granting any
application, twenty-five dollars.
(g) For the inspection of any hydraulic works to ensure safety to
life and property, the actual cost of the inspection, including
expenses incurred by the inspector.
(h) For the examination of plans and specifications as to safety of
controlling works for storage of ten acre feet or more of water, a
minimum fee of one hundred thirty dollars or the actual cost.
(2) The department shall provide timely notification by certified
mail with return receipt requested to applicants that fees are due. No
action may be taken until the fee is paid in full. Failure to remit
fees within sixty days of the department's notification is grounds for
rejecting the application or canceling the permit. Fees must be paid
by check or money order and are nonrefundable except as provided in
this section.
(3) For purposes of calculating fees for ground water filings, one
cubic foot per second must be regarded as equivalent to four hundred
fifty gallons per minute.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.471 and 1987 c 109 s 99 are each amended to read
as follows:
All fees, collections, and revenues derived under ((RCW 90.03.470))
section 1 of this act or by virtue of RCW 90.03.180((,)) shall be used
exclusively for the purpose of carrying out the work and performing the
functions of the division of water resources of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of ecology shall investigate
and consult with key stakeholders regarding water right processing fee
schedule alternatives based on: (1) A predetermined set of complexity
factors for complex applications; and (2) direct reimbursement for
extraordinary work required in actually processing more complex
applications. By December 31, 2004, the department shall report the
results of its investigation and consultations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature with jurisdiction over water resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 90.03.470 (Schedule of fees) and 1993 c
495 s 2, 1987 c 109 s 98, 1965 ex.s. c 160 s 1, 1951 c 57 s 5, 1929 c
122 s 8, 1925 ex.s. c 161 s 2, & 1917 c 117 s 44 are each repealed.

--- END ---