BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the marine waters
located in and adjacent to the Strait of Juan de Fuca between the state
of Washington and Canada are some of the most pristine and diverse
marine waters in the United States and include irreplaceable natural
resources. The area includes such national treasures as the Olympic
coast national marine sanctuary and the Olympic national park, is home
to five federally recognized Indian reservations, holds one of the
largest sea bird colonies on the west coast, and contains habitat for
several threatened and endangered species.
The legislature also finds that the marine waters are of great
environmental and economic importance not only to the state of
Washington, but also to the people of Canada and the United States.
The legislature also recognizes that the marine vessel traffic on these
waters presents risks of accidents and oil spills that would be
devastating to the environment and to the economy. The safety of these
waters is currently substantially improved on a temporary basis by an
oil spill prevention tugboat stationed at the westward end of the
Strait of Juan de Fuca. Permanent funding for marine protection would
ensure that the marine waters of Washington could be protected for
generations to come. Therefore, it is the policy of the state to
create a dedicated account for funds to protect the marine waters on
the coast and in the Strait of Juan de Fuca.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of ecology shall complete
an evaluation of tug escort requirements for laden tankers to determine
if the current escort system requirements under RCW 88.16.190 should be
modified to recognize safety enhancements of new double hull tankers
deployed with redundant systems and recent enhancements to the
international tug of opportunity system. The department shall provide
a report with recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by January 1, 2005.
(2) This section expires January 31, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The marine protection account is created in the custody of the
state treasury. All receipts from federal funds provided for marine
protection, interest earnings from the oil spill prevention account and
the oil spill response account, vessel oil spill penalties assessed
under RCW 90.56.330, and any other moneys appropriated to the account
by the legislature must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account must be used for marine protection activities
including but not limited to vessel salvage, an oil spill prevention
tug, marine fire fighting activities, and other marine protection
measures approved by the department. Only the director of the
department of ecology or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.56.500 and 1991 c 200 s 805 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state oil spill response account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from RCW 82.23B.020(1) shall be deposited in
the account. Interest earnings from the account shall be transferred
by the state treasurer on a quarterly basis to the marine protection
account established in section 3 of this act. All costs reimbursed to
the state by a responsible party or any other person for responding to
a spill of oil shall also be deposited in the account. Moneys in the
account shall be spent only after appropriation. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. The account
shall be used exclusively to pay for the costs associated with the
response to spills of crude oil or petroleum products into the
navigable waters of the state. Payment of response costs under this
section shall be limited to spills which the director has determined
are likely to exceed fifty thousand dollars. Before expending moneys
from the account, the director shall make reasonable efforts to obtain
funding for response costs from the person responsible for the spill
and from other sources, including the federal government.
Reimbursement for response costs shall be allowed only for costs which
are not covered by funds appropriated to the agencies responsible for
response activities. Costs associated with the response to spills of
crude oil or petroleum products shall include:
(1) Natural resource damage assessment and related activities;
(2) Spill related response, containment, wildlife rescue, cleanup,
disposal, and associated costs;
(3) Interagency coordination and public information related to a
response; and
(4) Appropriate travel, goods and services, contracts, and
equipment.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.21B.300 and 2001 c 36 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and
90.56.330 shall be imposed by a notice in writing, either by certified
mail with return receipt requested or by personal service, to the
person incurring the penalty from the department or the local air
authority, describing the violation with reasonable particularity.
Within fifteen days after the notice is received, the person incurring
the penalty may apply in writing to the department or the authority for
the remission or mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt of the
application, the department or authority may remit or mitigate the
penalty upon whatever terms the department or the authority in its
discretion deems proper. The department or the authority may ascertain
the facts regarding all such applications in such reasonable manner and
under such rules as it may deem proper and shall remit or mitigate the
penalty only upon a demonstration of extraordinary circumstances such
as the presence of information or factors not considered in setting the
original penalty.
(2) Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the
appeal is filed with the hearings board and served on the department or
authority thirty days after receipt by the person penalized of the
notice imposing the penalty or thirty days after receipt of the notice
of disposition of the application for relief from penalty.
(3) A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:
(a) Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;
(b) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition on
application for relief from penalty, if such an application is made; or
(c) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the
hearings board if the penalty is appealed.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department
within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney
general, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in the
name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston
county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to
recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the
authority within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the
authority may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior
court of the county of the authority's main office or of any county in
which the violator does business. In these actions, the procedures and
rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil action.
(5) All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury
and credited to the general fund except those penalties imposed
pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, which shall be credited to the reclamation
account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7), RCW 70.94.431, the
disposition of which shall be governed by that provision, RCW
70.105.080, which shall be credited to the hazardous waste control and
elimination account, created by RCW 70.105.180, and RCW 90.56.330,
which shall be credited to the coastal protection fund created by RCW
90.48.390 and to the marine protection account created in section 3 of
this act as provided in subsection (6) of this section.
(6) Penalties assessed under RCW 90.56.330 against an owner or
operator of a ship as defined under RCW 90.56.010 shall be credited to
the marine protection account created in section 3 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.84.092 and 2002 c 242 s 2, 2002 c 114 s 24, and
2002 c 56 s 402 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
the federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the
oil spill response account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account,
the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice
assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement
account, the regional transportation investment district account, the
resource management cost account, the site closure account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state
employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation equipment
fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account,
the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2002 c 322 s 5, 2002 c 204 s 7, and
2002 c 61 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
Washington state combined fund drive account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game farm alternative
account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the marine protection account created
in section 3 of this act, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium
and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account,
and the children's trust fund. However, the earnings to be distributed
shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---