BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.42.070 and 2002 c 240 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On or after the effective date of this act, the treasurer shall
compute general state revenues for the three fiscal years immediately
preceding such date and shall determine the arithmetic mean thereof.
As soon as is practicable after the close of each fiscal year
thereafter, he or she shall do likewise. In determining the amount of
general state revenues, the treasurer shall include all state money
received in the treasury from each and every source whatsoever except:
(a) Fees and revenues derived from the ownership or operation of any
undertaking, facility or project; (b) moneys received as gifts, grants,
donations, aid or assistance or otherwise from the United States or any
department, bureau or corporation thereof, or any person, firm or
corporation, public or private, when the terms and conditions of such
gift, grant, donation, aid or assistance require the application and
disbursement of such moneys otherwise than for the general purposes of
the state of Washington; (c) moneys to be paid into and received from
retirement system funds, and performance bonds and deposits; (d) moneys
to be paid into and received from trust funds including but not limited
to moneys received from taxes levied for specific purposes and the
several permanent and irreducible funds of the state and the moneys
derived therefrom but excluding bond redemption funds; (e) proceeds
received from the sale of bonds or other evidences of indebtedness.
Upon computing general state revenues, the treasurer shall make and
file in the office of the secretary of state, a certificate containing
the results of such computations. Copies of said certificate shall be
sent to each elected official of the state and each member of the
legislature. The treasurer shall, at the same time, advise each
elected official and each member of the legislature of the current
available debt capacity of the state, and may make estimated
projections for one or more years concerning debt capacity.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, general state revenues shall also
include revenues that are deposited in the general fund under RCW
82.45.180(2) ((and)), lottery revenues as provided in RCW 67.70.240(3),
revenues paid into the general fund under RCW 84.52.067, and revenues
deposited into the student achievement fund and distributed to school
districts as provided in RCW 84.52.068.

--- END ---