BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.340 and 1991 c 238 s 49 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the powers conferred under RCW 28B.50.090, the
college board is authorized and shall have the power:
(1) To permit the district boards of trustees to contract for the
construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance,
demolition, and major alterations of buildings and other capital
assets, and the acquisition of sites, ((rights-of-way)) rights of way,
easements, improvements, or appurtenances of the college as approved by
the state board.
(2) To finance the same by the issuance of bonds secured by the
pledge of up to one hundred percent of the building fees.
(3) To permit the district board of trustees to contract for the
repair, modernization, or preservation of existing facilities and the
construction or repair of infrastructure necessary to support the
academic mission of the institutions as approved by the college board
and to finance these by the issuance of bonds secured by the pledge of
operating fees. The amount of bonds issued under this subsection is
limited as follows: No new bonds may be issued if the annual debt
service from outstanding bonds under this subsection and the annual
debt service on bonds being issued under this subsection will exceed
one percent of the operating fees received in the previous fiscal year.
(4) Without limitation of the foregoing, to accept grants from the
United States government, or any federal or state agency or
instrumentality, or private corporation, association, or person to aid
in defraying the costs of any such projects.
(((4))) (5) To retain bond counsel and professional bond
consultants to aid it in issuing bonds pursuant to RCW 28B.50.340
through 28B.50.400.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.350 and 1991 c 238 s 50 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of financing the cost of any projects, the college
board is hereby authorized to adopt the resolution or resolutions and
prepare all other documents necessary for the issuance, sale, and
delivery of the bonds or any part thereof at such time or times as it
shall deem necessary and advisable. Said bonds:
(1) Shall not constitute:
(a) An obligation, either general or special, of the state; or
(b) A general obligation of the college or of the college board;
(2) Shall be:
(a) Either registered or in coupon form; and
(b) Issued in denominations of not less than one hundred dollars;
and
(c) Fully negotiable instruments under the laws of this state; and
(d) Signed on behalf of the college board with the manual or
facsimile signature of the ((chairman)) chair of the board, attested by
the secretary of the board, have the seal of the college board
impressed thereon or a facsimile of such seal printed or lithographed
in the bottom border thereof, and the coupons attached thereto shall be
signed with the facsimile signatures of ((such chairman)) the chair and
the secretary;
(3) Shall state:
(a) The date of issue; and
(b) The series of the issue and be consecutively numbered within
the series; and
(c) That the bond is payable both principal and interest solely out
of the bond retirement fund created for retirement thereof;
(4) Each series of bonds shall bear interest, payable either
annually or semiannually, as the board may determine;
(5) Shall be payable both principal and interest out of the bond
retirement fund;
(6) Shall be payable at such times over a period of not to exceed
forty years from date of issuance, at such place or places, and with
such reserved rights of prior redemption, as the board may prescribe;
(7) Shall be sold in such manner and at such price as the board may
prescribe;
(8) Shall be issued under and subject to such terms, conditions,
and covenants providing for the payment of the principal thereof and
interest thereon and such other terms, conditions, covenants, and
protective provisions safeguarding such payment, not inconsistent with
RCW 28B.50.330 through 28B.50.400, and as found to be necessary by the
board for the most advantageous sale thereof, which may include but not
be limited to:
(a) A covenant that a reserve account shall be created in the bond
retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest
on all bonds issued and a provision made that certain amounts be set
aside and maintained therein;
(b) A covenant that sufficient moneys may be transferred from the
capital projects account of the college board issuing the bonds to the
bond retirement fund of the college board when ordered by the board in
the event there is ever an insufficient amount of money in the bond
retirement fund to pay any installment of interest or principal and
interest coming due on the bonds or any of them;
(c) A covenant fixing conditions under which bonds on a parity with
any bonds outstanding may be issued.
The proceeds of the sale of all bonds, exclusive of accrued
interest which shall be deposited in the bond retirement fund, shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the capital projects
account of the college board and shall be used solely for paying the
costs of the projects, the costs of bond counsel and professional bond
consultants incurred in issuing the bonds, and for the purposes set
forth in subsection (8)(b) of this section;
(9) Shall constitute a prior lien and charge against the building
fees of the community and technical colleges. For bonds issued under
RCW 28B.50.340(3), the bonds shall constitute a prior lien and charge
against operating fees necessary to cover debt service.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.50.370 and 1991 c 238 s 52 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of paying and securing the payment of the principal
of and interest on the bonds as the same shall become due, there shall
be paid into the state treasury and credited to the bond retirement
fund of the college board, the following:
(1) Amounts derived from building fees as are necessary to pay the
principal of and interest on the bonds and to secure the same;
(2) Amounts derived from operating fees necessary to pay the
principal of and interest on the bonds issued under RCW 28B.50.340(3)
and any related reserves;
(3) Any grants which may be made, or may become available for the
purpose of furthering the construction of any authorized projects, or
for the repayment of the costs thereof;
(((3))) (4) Such additional funds as the legislature may provide.
Said bond retirement fund shall be kept segregated from all moneys
in the state treasury and shall, while any of such bonds or any
interest thereon remains unpaid, be available solely for the payment
thereof. As a part of the contract of sale of such bonds, the college
board shall charge and collect building fees as established by this
chapter and deposit such fees in the bond retirement fund in amounts
which will be sufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal
of, and interest on all such bonds outstanding. For bonds issued under
RCW 28B.50.340(3), the college board shall deposit the appropriate
amount of operating fees in the bond retirement fund which will be
sufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of, and
interest on all such bonds outstanding.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.20.710 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.710 are each
amended to read as follows:
In addition to the powers conferred under existing law, the board
is authorized and shall have the power:
(1) To contract for the construction, completion, reconstruction,
remodeling, rehabilitation, and improvement of such buildings or other
facilities of the university as are and which may hereafter be
authorized by the legislature.
(2) To finance the same by the issuance of bonds secured by the
pledge of any or all of the revenues and receipts of the bond
retirement fund.
(3) To contract for the repair, modernization, or preservation of
existing facilities and the construction or repair of infrastructure
necessary to support the academic mission of the institutions and to
finance these by the issuance of bonds secured by the pledge of
operating fees. The amount of bonds issued under this subsection is
limited as follows: No new bonds may be issued if the annual debt
service from outstanding bonds under this subsection and the annual
debt service on bonds being issued under this subsection will exceed
one percent of the operating fees received in the previous fiscal year.
(4) Without limitation of the foregoing, to accept grants from the
United States government, or any federal or state agency or
instrumentality, or any public or private corporation, association, or
person to aid in defraying the costs of any such projects.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.20.715 and 1985 c 390 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of financing the cost of any projects, the board is
hereby authorized to adopt the resolution or resolutions and prepare
all other documents necessary for the issuance, sale, and delivery of
the bonds or any part thereof at such time or times as it shall deem
necessary and advisable. Said bonds:
(1) Shall not constitute
(a) An obligation, either general or special, of the state; or
(b) A general obligation of the University of Washington or of the
board;
(2) Shall be
(a) Either registered or in coupon form; and
(b) Issued in denominations of not less than one hundred dollars;
and
(c) Fully negotiable instruments under the laws of this state; and
(d) Signed on behalf of the university by the president of the
board, attested by the secretary of the board, have the seal of the
university impressed thereon or a facsimile of such seal printed or
lithographed in the bottom border thereof, and the coupons attached
thereto shall be signed with the facsimile signatures of such president
and secretary;
(3) Shall state
(a) The date of issue; and
(b) The series of the issue and be consecutively numbered within
the series; and
(c) That the bond is payable both principal and interest solely out
of the bond retirement fund;
(4) Each series of bonds shall bear interest, payable either
annually or semiannually, as the board may determine;
(5) Shall be payable both principal and interest out of the bond
retirement fund;
(6) Shall be payable at such times over a period of not to exceed
forty years from date of issuance, at such place or places, and with
such reserved rights of prior redemption, as the board may prescribe;
(7) Shall be sold in such manner and at such price as the board may
prescribe;
(8) Shall be issued under and subject to such terms, conditions,
and covenants providing for the payment of the principal thereof and
interest thereon and such other terms, conditions, covenants, and
protective provisions safeguarding such payment, not inconsistent with
this chapter, and as found to be necessary by the board for the most
advantageous sale thereof, which may include but not be limited to:
(a) A covenant that the building fees shall be established,
maintained, and collected in such amounts, and the appropriate amount
of operating fees for bonds issued under RCW 28B.20.710(3), that will
provide money sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on all
bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund, to set aside and
maintain the reserves required to secure the payment of such principal
and interest, and to maintain any coverage which may be required over
such principal and interest;
(b) A covenant that a reserve account shall be created in the bond
retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest
on all bonds issued and a provision made that certain amounts be set
aside and maintained therein;
(c) A covenant that sufficient moneys may be transferred from the
University of Washington building account to the bond retirement fund
when ordered by the board of regents in the event there is ever an
insufficient amount of money in the bond retirement fund to pay any
installment of interest or principal and interest coming due on the
bonds or any of them;
(d) A covenant fixing conditions under which bonds on a parity with
any bonds outstanding may be issued.
The proceeds of the sale of all bonds, exclusive of accrued
interest which shall be deposited in the bond retirement fund, shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the University of
Washington building account and shall be used solely for paying the
costs of the projects.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.20.720 and 1985 c 390 s 39 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of paying and securing the payment of the principal
of and interest on the bonds as the same shall become due, there shall
be paid into the state treasury and credited to a special trust fund to
be known as the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the
following:
(1) One-half of such building fees as the board may from time to
time determine, or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent
default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement
fund, and in no event shall such one-half be less than twelve dollars
and fifty cents per each resident student per quarter and less than
thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents per each nonresident student per
quarter;
(2) Amounts derived from operating fees necessary to pay the
principal of and interest on the bonds issued under RCW 28B.20.710(3)
and any related reserve requirements;
(3) Any gifts, bequests, or grants which may be made, or may become
available, for the purpose of furthering the construction of any
authorized projects, or for the repayment of the costs thereof;
(((3))) (4) Such additional funds as the legislature may provide.
Said bond retirement fund shall be kept segregated from all moneys
in the state treasury and shall, while any of such bonds or any
interest thereon remains unpaid, be available solely for the payment
thereof except as provided in RCW 28B.20.725(5). As a part of the
contract of sale of such bonds, the board undertakes to charge and
collect building fees and to deposit the portion of such fees in the
bond retirement fund in amounts which will be sufficient to pay the
principal of, and interest on all such bonds outstanding.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.30.720 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.720 are each
amended to read as follows:
In addition to the powers conferred under existing law, the board
is authorized and shall have the power:
(1) To contract for the construction, completion, reconstruction,
remodeling, rehabilitation, and improvement of such buildings or other
facilities of the university as are or may be authorized by the
legislature.
(2) To finance the same by the issuance of bonds secured by the
pledge of any or all of the revenues and receipts of the bond
retirement fund.
(3) To contract for the repair, modernization, or preservation of
existing facilities and the construction or repair of infrastructure
necessary to support the academic mission of the institutions and to
finance these by the issuance of bonds secured by the pledge of
operating fees. The amount of bonds issued under this subsection is
limited as follows: No new bonds may be issued if the annual debt
service from outstanding bonds under this subsection and the annual
debt service on bonds being issued under this subsection will exceed
one percent of the operating fees received in the previous fiscal year.
(4) Without limitation of the foregoing, to accept grants from the
United States government, or any federal or state agency or
instrumentality, or any public or private corporation, association, or
person to aid in defraying the costs of any such projects.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.30.730 and 2002 c 238 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of financing the cost of any projects, the board is
hereby authorized to adopt the resolution or resolutions and prepare
all other documents necessary for the issuance, sale, and delivery of
the bonds or any part thereof at such time or times as it shall deem
necessary and advisable. Said bonds:
(1) Shall not constitute
(a) An obligation, either general or special, of the state; or
(b) A general obligation of Washington State University or of the
board;
(2) Shall be
(a) Either registered or in coupon form; and
(b) Issued in denominations of not less than one hundred dollars;
and
(c) Fully negotiable instruments under the laws of this state; and
(d) Signed on behalf of the university by the president of the
board, attested by the secretary or the treasurer of the board, have
the seal of the university impressed thereon or a facsimile of such
seal printed or lithographed in the bottom border thereof, and the
coupons attached thereto shall be signed with the facsimile signatures
of such president and secretary;
(3) Shall state
(a) The date of issue; and
(b) The series of the issue and be consecutively numbered within
the series; and
(c) That the bond is payable both principal and interest solely out
of the bond retirement fund;
(4) Each series of bonds shall bear interest, payable either
annually or semiannually, as the board may determine;
(5) Shall be payable both principal and interest out of the bond
retirement fund;
(6) Shall be payable at such times over a period of not to exceed
forty years from date of issuance, at such place or places, and with
such reserved rights of prior redemption, as the board may prescribe;
(7) Shall be sold in such manner and at such price as the board may
prescribe;
(8) Shall be issued under and subject to such terms, conditions,
and covenants providing for the payment of the principal thereof and
interest thereon and such other terms, conditions, covenants, and
protective provisions safeguarding such payment, not inconsistent with
RCW 28B.30.700 through 28B.30.780, and as found to be necessary by the
board for the most advantageous sale thereof, which may include but not
be limited to:
(a) A covenant that the building fees shall be established,
maintained and collected in such amounts, and the appropriate amount of
operating fees for bonds issued under RCW 28B.30.720(3), that will
provide money sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on all
bonds payable out of the bond retirement account, to set aside and
maintain the reserves required to secure the payment of such principal
and interest, and to maintain any coverage which may be required over
such principal and interest;
(b) A covenant that a reserve account shall be created in the bond
retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest
on all bonds issued and a provision made that certain amounts be set
aside and maintained therein;
(c) A covenant that sufficient moneys may be transferred from the
Washington State University building account to the bond retirement
account when ordered by the board of regents in the event there is ever
an insufficient amount of money in the bond retirement account to pay
any installment of interest or principal and interest coming due on the
bonds or any of them;
(d) A covenant fixing conditions under which bonds on a parity with
any bonds outstanding may be issued.
The proceeds of the sale of all bonds shall be deposited in the
state treasury to the credit of the Washington State University
building account and shall be used solely for paying the costs of the
projects. The Washington State University building account shall be
credited with the investment income derived pursuant to RCW 43.84.080
on the ((investible)) investable balances of scientific permanent fund
and agricultural permanent fund, less the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the Washington
State University building account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.30.740 and 1985 c 390 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of paying and securing the payment of the principal
of and interest on the bonds as the same shall become due, there shall
be paid into the state treasury and credited to a special trust fund to
be known as the Washington State University bond retirement fund, which
fund is hereby created in the state treasury, the following:
(1) One-half of such building fees as the board may from time to
time determine, or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent
default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement
fund;
(2) Amounts derived from operating fees necessary to pay the
principal of and interest on the bonds issued under RCW 28B.30.720(3)
and any related reserve requirements;
(3) Any grants which may be made, or may become available, for the
purpose of furthering the construction of any authorized projects, or
for the repayment of the costs thereof;
(((3))) (4) Such additional funds as the legislature may provide.
Said bond retirement fund shall be kept segregated from all moneys
in the state treasury and shall, while any of such bonds or any
interest thereon remain unpaid, be available solely for the payment
thereof except as provided in ((subdivision (5) of)) RCW 28B.30.750(5).
As a part of the contract of sale of such bonds, the board shall
undertake to charge and collect building fees and to deposit the
portion of such fees in the bond retirement fund in amounts which will
be sufficient to pay the principal of, and interest on all such bonds
outstanding.

Sec. 10 RCW 28B.35.720 and 1985 c 390 s 50 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the powers conferred under existing law, each of the
boards is authorized and shall have the power:
(1) To contract for the construction, completion, reconstruction,
remodeling, rehabilitation, and improvement of such buildings or other
facilities of the university or college as are authorized by the
legislature to be financed by the issuance and sale of bonds.
(2) To finance the same by the issuance of bonds secured by the
pledge of any or all of the building fees.
(3) To contract for the repair, modernization, or preservation of
existing facilities and the construction or repair of infrastructure
necessary to support the academic mission of the institutions and to
finance these by the issuance of bonds secured by the pledge of
operating fees. The amount of bonds issued under this subsection is
limited as follows: No new bonds may be issued if the annual debt
service from outstanding bonds under this subsection and the annual
debt service on bonds being issued under this subsection will exceed
one percent of the operating fees received in the previous fiscal year.
(4) Without limitation of the foregoing, to accept grants from the
United States government, or any federal or state agency or
instrumentality, or private corporation, association, or person to aid
in defraying the costs of any such projects.

Sec. 11 RCW 28B.35.730 and 1985 c 390 s 51 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of financing the cost of any projects, each of the
boards is hereby authorized to adopt the resolution or resolutions and
prepare all other documents necessary for the issuance, sale, and
delivery of the bonds or any part thereof at such time or times as it
shall deem necessary and advisable. Said bonds:
(1) Shall not constitute:
(a) An obligation, either general or special, of the state; or
(b) A general obligation of the university or college or of the
board;
(2) Shall be:
(a) Either registered or in coupon form; and
(b) Issued in denominations of not less than one hundred dollars;
and
(c) Fully negotiable instruments under the laws of this state; and
(d) Signed on behalf of the university or college by the
((chairman)) chair of the board, attested by the secretary of the
board, have the seal of the university or college impressed thereon or
a facsimile of such seal printed or lithographed in the bottom border
thereof, and the coupons attached thereto shall be signed with the
facsimile signatures of ((such chairman)) the chair and the secretary;
(3) Shall state:
(a) The date of issue; and
(b) The series of the issue and be consecutively numbered within
the series; and
(c) That the bond is payable both principal and interest solely out
of the bond retirement fund;
(4) Each series of bonds shall bear interest, payable either
annually or semiannually, as the board may determine;
(5) Shall be payable both principal and interest out of the bond
retirement fund;
(6) Shall be payable at such times over a period of not to exceed
forty years from date of issuance, at such place or places, and with
such reserved rights of prior redemption, as the board may prescribe;
(7) Shall be sold in such manner and at such price as the board may
prescribe;
(8) Shall be issued under and subject to such terms, conditions,
and covenants providing for the payment of the principal thereof and
interest thereon and such other terms, conditions, covenants, and
protective provisions safeguarding such payment, not inconsistent with
RCW 28B.35.700 through 28B.35.790, as now or hereafter amended, and as
found to be necessary by the board for the most advantageous sale
thereof, which may include but not be limited to:
(a) A covenant that the building fees shall be established,
maintained, and collected in such amounts, and the appropriate amount
of operating fees for bonds issued under RCW 28B.35.720(3), that will
provide money sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on all
bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund, to set aside and
maintain the reserves required to secure the payment of such principal
and interest, and to maintain any coverage which may be required over
such principal and interest;
(b) A covenant that a reserve account shall be created in the bond
retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest
on all bonds issued and a provision made that certain amounts be set
aside and maintained therein;
(c) A covenant that sufficient moneys may be transferred from the
capital projects account of the university or college issuing the bonds
to the bond retirement fund of such university or college when ordered
by the board of trustees in the event there is ever an insufficient
amount of money in the bond retirement fund to pay any installment of
interest or principal and interest coming due on the bonds or any of
them;
(d) A covenant fixing conditions under which bonds on a parity with
any bonds outstanding may be issued.
The proceeds of the sale of all bonds, exclusive of accrued
interest which shall be deposited in the bond retirement fund, shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the capital projects
account of the university or college issuing the bonds and shall be
used solely for paying the costs of the projects.

Sec. 12 RCW 28B.35.750 and 1985 c 390 s 52 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of paying and securing the payment of the principal
of and interest on the bonds as the same shall become due, there shall
be paid into the state treasury and credited to the respective bond
retirement fund of each university or college issuing bonds, the
following:
(1) Amounts derived from building fees as the board shall certify
as necessary to prevent default in the payments required to be paid
into such bond retirement fund;
(2) Amounts derived from operating fees necessary to pay the
principal of and interest on the bonds issued under RCW 28B.35.720(3)
and any related reserve requirements;
(3) Any grants which may be made, or may become available, for the
purpose of furthering the construction of any authorized projects, or
for the repayment of the costs thereof;
(((3))) (4) Such additional funds as the legislature may provide.
Said bond retirement fund shall be kept segregated from all moneys
in the state treasury and shall, while any of such bonds or any
interest thereon remains unpaid, be available solely for the payment
thereof. As a part of the contract of sale of such bonds, the board
shall undertake to charge and collect building fees and to deposit the
portion of such fees in the bond retirement fund in amounts which will
be sufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of, and
interest on all such bonds outstanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---