BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.40.020 and 2003 c ... (Engrossed Senate Bill No.
5938) s 3 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Any barge that transports hazardous substances in bulk as
cargo, using any port or place in the state of Washington or the
navigable waters of the state shall establish evidence of financial
responsibility in the amount of the greater of five million dollars, or
three hundred dollars per gross ton of such vessel.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) or (c) of this subsection, a tank
vessel that carries oil as cargo in bulk shall demonstrate financial
responsibility to pay at least five hundred million dollars. The
amount of financial responsibility required under this subsection is
one billion dollars after January 1, 2004.
(b) The director by rule may establish a lesser standard of
financial responsibility for tank vessels of three hundred gross tons
or less. The standard shall set the level of financial responsibility
based on the quantity of cargo the tank vessel is capable of carrying.
The director shall not set the standard for tank vessels of three
hundred gross tons or less below that required under federal law.
(c) The owner or operator of a tank vessel who is a member of an
international protection and indemnity mutual organization and is
covered for oil pollution risks up to the amounts required under this
section is not required to demonstrate financial responsibility under
this chapter. The director may require the owner or operator of a tank
vessel to prove membership in such an organization.
(3)(a) A cargo vessel or passenger vessel that carries oil as fuel
shall demonstrate financial responsibility to pay at least three
hundred million dollars. However, a passenger vessel that transports
passengers and vehicles between Washington state and a foreign country
shall demonstrate financial responsibility to pay the greater of at
least six hundred dollars per gross ton or five hundred thousand
dollars.
(b) The owner or operator of a cargo vessel or passenger vessel who
is a member of an international protection and indemnity mutual
organization and is covered for oil pollution risks up to the amounts
required under this section is not required to demonstrate financial
responsibility under this chapter. The director may require the owner
or operator of a cargo vessel or passenger vessel to prove membership
in such an organization.
(4) A fishing vessel while on the navigable waters of the state
must demonstrate financial responsibility in the following amounts:
(a) For a fishing vessel carrying predominantly nonpersistent product,
one hundred thirty-three dollars and forty cents per incident, for each
barrel of total oil storage capacity, persistent and nonpersistent
product, on the vessel or one million three hundred thirty-four
thousand dollars, whichever is greater; or (b) for a fishing vessel
carrying predominantly persistent product, four hundred dollars and
twenty cents per incident, for each barrel of total oil storage
capacity, persistent product and nonpersistent product, on the vessel
or six million six hundred seventy thousand dollars, whichever is
greater.
(5) The documentation of financial responsibility shall demonstrate
the ability of the document holder to meet state and federal financial
liability requirements for the actual costs for removal of oil spills,
for natural resource damages, and for necessary expenses.
(6) This section shall not apply to a covered vessel owned or
operated by the federal government or by a state or local government.

--- END ---