BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
The legislature finds that under the state Constitution, making
ample provision for basic education is the state's paramount duty. The
legislature finds that under the state's current basic education
funding formulas, teacher salaries are the key component of basic
education funding, and thus the state's basic education funding
obligation requires the state to provide districts with an allocation
sufficient to hire and retain qualified providers of basic education
services. The legislature further finds that requiring predictable
cost-of-living increases is the best way to ensure that all educational
employees' salaries maintain pace with inflation.
Therefore, the legislature reaffirms the goal of ensuring that
cost-of-living increases are provided to all school district employees.
The legislature also intends that the state should be responsible for
funding the cost-of-living increase for the educational services for
which the state provides funding, and school districts should provide
the cost-of-living increase for employees hired by the district with
local levy funding or other nonstate sources. Further, for those
educational programs that are within the state's definition of basic
education, the legislature intends to clarify that these cost-of-living
increases are within the state's constitutional basic education funding
obligation.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.205 and 2001 c 4 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) School district employees shall be provided an annual salary
cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
(a) ((The cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying
the rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to any
state-funded salary base used in state funding formulas for teachers
and other school district employees. Beginning with the 2001-02 school
year, and for each subsequent school year, each school district shall
be provided a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to grant this cost-of-living increase for the salaries, including mandatory salary-related
benefits, of all employees of the district)) (i) Each school district's
total cost-of-living increase is calculated by applying the rate of the
yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to the district's salary
base for all employees of the district.
(ii) The state's portion of the cost-of-living increase is
calculated by applying the rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to the state-funded salary base used in state funding
formulas for teachers and other school employees. Beginning with the
2003-04 school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
distribute to each district the amount of the state's portion
attributable to that district.
(iii) Beginning with the 2003-04 school year, from amounts
distributed under (a)(ii) of this subsection and from other district
resources, each district shall provide a total cost-of-living
allocation sufficient to grant the district's cost-of-living increase
for the salaries, including mandatory salary-related benefits, of all
employees of the district.
(b) A school district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
compensation policies. No later than the end of the school year, each
school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) Any funded cost-of-living increase shall be included in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for all school
employees in subsequent years. For teachers and other certificated
instructional staff, the rate of the annual cost-of-living increase
funded for certificated instructional staff shall be applied to the
base salary used with the statewide salary allocation schedule
established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary models used
to recognize school district personnel costs.
(d) ((Beginning with the 2001-02 school year, the state shall fully
fund the cost-of-living increase in this section as part of its
obligation to meet the basic education requirements under Article IX of
the Washington Constitution)) For those programs within the state-funded salary base that are within the program of basic education, the
cost-of-living increase in (a)(ii) of this subsection is also within
the program of basic education. Beginning with the 2005-06 school
year, the state shall fully fund the cost-of-living increase in (a)(ii)
of this subsection for programs within the program of basic education
as a part of the state's basic education funding obligation under
Article IX of the state Constitution.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any school year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.250 and 1990 c 33 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
From those funds made available by the legislature for the current
use of the common schools, the superintendent of public instruction
shall distribute annually as provided in RCW 28A.510.250 to each school
district of the state operating a program approved by the state board
of education an amount which, when combined with an appropriate portion
of such locally available revenues, other than receipts from federal
forest revenues distributed to school districts pursuant to RCW
28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020, as the superintendent of public
instruction may deem appropriate for consideration in computing state
equalization support, excluding excess property tax levies, will
constitute a basic education allocation in dollars for each annual
average full time equivalent student enrolled, based upon one full
school year of one hundred eighty days, except that for kindergartens
one full school year shall be one hundred eighty half days of
instruction, or the equivalent as provided in RCW 28A.150.220.
Basic education shall be considered to be fully funded by those
amounts of dollars appropriated by the legislature pursuant to RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 to fund those program requirements
identified in RCW 28A.150.220 in accordance with the formula and ratios
provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and those amounts of dollars appropriated
by the legislature to fund the salary requirements of RCW 28A.150.100
((and)), 28A.150.410, and 28A.400.205(1)(d).
Operation of a program approved by the state board of education,
for the purposes of this section, shall include a finding that the
ratio of students per classroom teacher in grades kindergarten through
three is not greater than the ratio of students per classroom teacher
in grades four and above for such district: PROVIDED, That for the
purposes of this section, "classroom teacher" shall be defined as an
instructional employee possessing at least a provisional certificate,
but not necessarily employed as a certificated employee, whose primary
duty is the daily educational instruction of students: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the state board of education shall adopt rules and
regulations to insure compliance with the student/teacher ratio
provisions of this section, and such rules and regulations shall allow
for exemptions for those special programs and/or school districts which
may be deemed unable to practicably meet the student/teacher ratio
requirements of this section by virtue of a small number of students.
If a school district's basic education program fails to meet the
basic education requirements enumerated in RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.220, the state board of education shall
require the superintendent of public instruction to withhold state
funds in whole or in part for the basic education allocation until
program compliance is assured: PROVIDED, That the state board of
education may waive this requirement in the event of substantial lack
of classroom space.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.260 and 1997 c 13 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The basic education allocation for each annual average full time
equivalent student shall be determined in accordance with the following
procedures:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula based on a ratio of students
to staff for the distribution of a basic education allocation for each
annual average full time equivalent student enrolled in a common
school. The distribution formula shall have the primary objective of
equalizing educational opportunities and shall provide appropriate
recognition of the following costs among the various districts within
the state:
(a) Certificated instructional staff and their related costs;
(b) Certificated administrative staff and their related costs;
(c) Classified staff and their related costs;
(d) Nonsalary costs;
(e) Extraordinary costs of remote and necessary schools and small
high schools, including costs of additional certificated and classified
staff; ((and))
(f) The attendance of students pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and
28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district; and
(g) Cost-of-living adjustments as required by RCW
28A.400.205(1)(d).
(2)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall
be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature. The formula shall be for allocation
purposes only. While the legislature intends that the allocations for
additional instructional staff be used to increase the ratio of such
staff to students, nothing in this section shall require districts to
reduce the number of administrative staff below existing levels.
(b) The formula adopted by the legislature shall reflect the
following ratios at a minimum: (i) Forty-nine certificated
instructional staff to one thousand annual average full time equivalent
students enrolled in grades kindergarten through three; (ii) forty-six
certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average full
time equivalent students in grades four through twelve; (iii) four
certificated administrative staff to one thousand annual average full
time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through twelve; and
(iv) sixteen and sixty-seven one-hundredths classified personnel to one
thousand annual average full time equivalent students enrolled in
grades kindergarten through twelve.
(c) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect: PROVIDED, That the distribution formula developed
pursuant to this section shall be for state apportionment and
equalization purposes only and shall not be construed as mandating
specific operational functions of local school districts other than
those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 and
28A.150.100. The enrollment of any district shall be the annual
average number of full time equivalent students and part time students
as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of
each month and shall exclude full time equivalent students with
disabilities recognized for the purposes of allocation of state funds
for programs under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100. The definition
of full time equivalent student shall be determined by rules of the
superintendent of public instruction: PROVIDED, That the definition
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any revision of the present
definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the office of financial management shall make
a monthly review of the superintendent's reported full time equivalent
students in the common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.
(3)(a) Certificated instructional staff shall include those persons
employed by a school district who are nonsupervisory employees within
the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(8): PROVIDED, That in exceptional cases,
people of unusual competence but without certification may teach
students so long as a certificated person exercises general
supervision: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the hiring of such classified
people shall not occur during a labor dispute and such classified
people shall not be hired to replace certificated employees during a
labor dispute.
(b) Certificated administrative staff shall include all those
persons who are chief executive officers, chief administrative
officers, confidential employees, supervisors, principals, or assistant
principals within the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 3 and 4 of this act take effect
July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 2 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---