BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the great
sacrifices that residents of this state may make through military
service. The legislature also recognizes that out-of-state military
service might prevent a person from renewing a state-required license
in a timely manner. Persons serving their country in the military
should not be penalized in this manner for such service. It is the
intent of the legislature that persons who, because of military service
outside of this state, are unable to renew various licenses in a timely
manner, should be allowed to renew those licenses without incurring
monetary penalties that may ordinarily apply to the late renewal of a
license. It is the intent of the legislature that, under such
circumstances, each state agency or entity, and each local government
entity, be directed to renew any state-required licenses that are
issued or may be issued by the state or local entity. It is not the
intent of the legislature that any such renewal be allowed for a person
who is not at the time of the renewal fully qualified for the license
in question.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the department of licensing has authority to
issue a license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
department of licensing shall issue a license renewal to a person who
is a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed
forces reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license
because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for
out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her
license within ninety days after the person returns to this state from
out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military
service was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the
issuing authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the secretary of health has authority to
issue a license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
secretary of health shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a
member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed
forces reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license
because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for
out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her
license within ninety days after the person returns to this state from
out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military
service was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the
issuing authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the secretary of the department of social
and health services has authority to issue a license that must or may
be renewed by the license holder, the secretary of the department of
social and health services shall issue a license renewal to a person
who is a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and
armed forces reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her
license because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment
for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her
license within ninety days after the person returns to this state from
out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military
service was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the
issuing authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the city or town or officer, department, or
agency of a city or town has authority to issue a license that must or
may be renewed by the license holder, the city or town or officer,
department, or agency of a city or town shall issue a license renewal
to a person who is a member of the armed forces, including the national
guard and armed forces reserves, if the person was unable to renew his
or her license because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or
deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew
his or her license within ninety days after the person returns to this
state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state
military service was honorable, and if the person provides the
following to the issuing authority no later than ninety days after the
person's date of discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment
back to this state: (a) A copy of the person's original order
designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or
deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a
copy of the person's discharge or amended or subsequent assignment,
reassignment, or deployment order back to this state. A license so
renewed under this section shall take effect on the expiration date of
the prior license. A licensee renewing under this section shall pay
only the applicable renewal fee for the license and shall not be
required to pay a penalty or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the code city or officer, department, or
agency of a code city has authority to issue a license that must or may
be renewed by the license holder, the code city or officer, department,
or agency of a code city shall issue a license renewal to a person who
is a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed
forces reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license
because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for
out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her
license within ninety days after the person returns to this state from
out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military
service was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the
issuing authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 36.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the county officer has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the county
officer shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of
the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the county legislative authority has
authority to issue a license that must or may be renewed by the license
holder, the county legislative authority shall issue a license renewal
to a person who is a member of the armed forces, including the national
guard and armed forces reserves, if the person was unable to renew his
or her license because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or
deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew
his or her license within ninety days after the person returns to this
state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state
military service was honorable, and if the person provides the
following to the issuing authority no later than ninety days after the
person's date of discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment
back to this state: (a) A copy of the person's original order
designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or
deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a
copy of the person's discharge or amended or subsequent assignment,
reassignment, or deployment order back to this state. A license so
renewed under this section shall take effect on the expiration date of
the prior license. A licensee renewing under this section shall pay
only the applicable renewal fee for the license and shall not be
required to pay a penalty or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the commission has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
commission shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of
the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 18.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the board has authority to issue a license
that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the board shall
issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 18.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the director has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the director
shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 18.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the board has authority to issue a license
that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the board shall
issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the board has authority to issue a license
that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the board shall
issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the commission has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
commission shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of
the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 18.83 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the examining board has authority to issue
a license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
examining board shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a
member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed
forces reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license
because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for
out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her
license within ninety days after the person returns to this state from
out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military
service was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the
issuing authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the superintendent of public instruction has
authority to issue a license that must or may be renewed by the license
holder, the superintendent of public instruction shall issue a license
renewal to a person who is a member of the armed forces, including the
national guard and armed forces reserves, if the person was unable to
renew his or her license because of the person's assignment,
reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a
person may renew his or her license within ninety days after the person
returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the
person's out-of-state military service was honorable, and if the person
provides the following to the issuing authority no later than ninety
days after the person's date of discharge or assignment, reassignment,
or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy of the person's original
order designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or
deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a
copy of the person's discharge or amended or subsequent assignment,
reassignment, or deployment order back to this state. A license so
renewed under this section shall take effect on the expiration date of
the prior license. A licensee renewing under this section shall pay
only the applicable renewal fee for the license and shall not be
required to pay a penalty or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the board has authority to issue a license
that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the board shall
issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the governing board has authority to issue
a license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
governing board shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a
member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed
forces reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license
because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for
out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her
license within ninety days after the person returns to this state from
out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military
service was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the
issuing authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 39.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the office has authority to issue a license
that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the office shall
issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the director or board has authority to issue
a license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
director or board shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a
member of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed
forces reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license
because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for
out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her
license within ninety days after the person returns to this state from
out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military
service was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the
issuing authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 43.07 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the secretary has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
secretary shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of
the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the auditor has authority to issue a license
that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the auditor shall
issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 43.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the commissioner has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
commissioner shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member
of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the director has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the director
shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the board has authority to issue a license
that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the board shall
issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the director has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the director
shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 A new section is added to chapter 43.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the director has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the director
shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 A new section is added to chapter 43.23 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the director has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the director
shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the department, commissioner, or board has
authority to issue a license that must or may be renewed by the license
holder, the department, commissioner, or board shall issue a license
renewal to a person who is a member of the armed forces, including the
national guard and armed forces reserves, if the person was unable to
renew his or her license because of the person's assignment,
reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a
person may renew his or her license within ninety days after the person
returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the
person's out-of-state military service was honorable, and if the person
provides the following to the issuing authority no later than ninety
days after the person's date of discharge or assignment, reassignment,
or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy of the person's original
order designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or
deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a
copy of the person's discharge or amended or subsequent assignment,
reassignment, or deployment order back to this state. A license so
renewed under this section shall take effect on the expiration date of
the prior license. A licensee renewing under this section shall pay
only the applicable renewal fee for the license and shall not be
required to pay a penalty or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the chief of the state patrol has authority
to issue a license that must or may be renewed by the license holder,
the chief of the state patrol shall issue a license renewal to a person
who is a member of the armed forces, including the national guard and
armed forces reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her
license because of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment
for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her
license within ninety days after the person returns to this state from
out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military
service was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the
issuing authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 A new section is added to chapter 43.101
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the commission has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
commission shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of
the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-
state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 A new section is added to chapter 43.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the director has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the director
shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the secretary has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
secretary shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of
the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 A new section is added to chapter 48.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the commissioner has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
commissioner shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member
of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 A new section is added to chapter 50.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the commissioner has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
commissioner shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member
of the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the board has authority to issue a license
that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the board shall
issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 A new section is added to chapter 67.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the commission has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
commission shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of
the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the commission has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
commission shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of
the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-
state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the department has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
department shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of
the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the board has authority to issue a license
that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the board shall
issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 A new section is added to chapter 77.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the commission, department, or director has
authority to issue a license that must or may be renewed by the license
holder, the commission, department, or director shall issue a license
renewal to a person who is a member of the armed forces, including the
national guard and armed forces reserves, if the person was unable to
renew his or her license because of the person's assignment,
reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a
person may renew his or her license within ninety days after the person
returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the
person's out-of-state military service was honorable, and if the person
provides the following to the issuing authority no later than ninety
days after the person's date of discharge or assignment, reassignment,
or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy of the person's original
order designating the specific period of assignment, reassignment, or
deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a
copy of the person's discharge or amended or subsequent assignment,
reassignment, or deployment order back to this state. A license so
renewed under this section shall take effect on the expiration date of
the prior license. A licensee renewing under this section shall pay
only the applicable renewal fee for the license and shall not be
required to pay a penalty or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 A new section is added to chapter 80.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the commission has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
commission shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of
the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43 A new section is added to chapter 82.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the department has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
department shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of
the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 44 A new section is added to chapter 88.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the board has authority to issue a license
that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the board shall
issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of the armed
forces, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, if the
person was unable to renew his or her license because of the person's
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service. Such a person may renew his or her license within ninety days
after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military
service if the person's out-of-state military service was honorable,
and if the person provides the following to the issuing authority no
later than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or
assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy
of the person's original order designating the specific period of
assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military
service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's discharge or
amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order
back to this state. A license so renewed under this section shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable renewal fee
for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty or fee for
late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 45 A new section is added to chapter 89.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that the commission has authority to issue a
license that must or may be renewed by the license holder, the
commission shall issue a license renewal to a person who is a member of
the armed forces, including the national guard and armed forces
reserves, if the person was unable to renew his or her license because
of the person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service. Such a person may renew his or her license
within ninety days after the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service if the person's out-of-state military service
was honorable, and if the person provides the following to the issuing
authority no later than ninety days after the person's date of
discharge or assignment, reassignment, or deployment back to this
state: (a) A copy of the person's original order designating the
specific period of assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-
state military service, and (b) if applicable, a copy of the person's
discharge or amended or subsequent assignment, reassignment, or
deployment order back to this state. A license so renewed under this
section shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior license.
A licensee renewing under this section shall pay only the applicable
renewal fee for the license and shall not be required to pay a penalty
or fee for late renewal.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license" means a franchise,
permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form
of authorization required by state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 46 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 47 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---