BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.500.030 and 2002 c 317 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Allocation of state matching funds to eligible districts for local
effort assistance shall be determined as follows:
(1) Funds raised by the district through maintenance and operation
levies shall be matched with state funds using the following ratio of
state funds to levy funds:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; to
(b) The statewide average twelve percent levy rate.
(2) The maximum amount of state matching funds for districts
eligible for local effort assistance shall be the district's twelve
percent levy amount, multiplied by the following percentage:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; divided by
(b) The district's twelve percent levy rate.
(3) Calendar year 2003 allocations and maximum eligibility under
this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.99.
(4) Calendar year 2004 and 2005 allocations and maximum eligibility
under this chapter shall be multiplied by .883.

--- END ---