BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.04.045 and 2002 c 342 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for these
purposes, the state librarian shall be responsible and accountable for
the following functions:
(1) Establishing content-related standards for common formats and
agency indexes for state agency-produced information. In developing
these standards, the state librarian is encouraged to seek involvement
of, and comments from, public and private entities with an interest in
such standards;
(2) Managing and administering the state library;
(3) Exerting leadership in information access and the development
of library services;
(4) Acquiring library materials, equipment, and supplies by
purchase, exchange, gift, or otherwise((; and, as appropriate,
assisting the legislature, other state agencies, and other libraries in
the cost-effective purchase of information resources));
(5) Employing and terminating personnel in accordance with chapter
41.06 RCW as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this
chapter;
(6) Entering into agreements with other public or private entities
as a means of implementing the mission, goals, and objectives of the
state library and the entity with which it enters such agreements. In
agreements for services between the library and other state agencies,
the library may negotiate an exchange of services in lieu of monetary
reimbursement for the library's indirect or overhead costs, when such
an arrangement facilitates the delivery of library services;
(7) ((Maintaining a library at the state capitol grounds to
effectively provide library and information services to members of the
legislature, state officials, and state employees in connection with
their official duties;
(8))) Serving as the depository for newspapers published in the
state of Washington thus providing a central location for a valuable
historical record for scholarly, personal, and commercial reference and
circulation;
(((9))) (8) Promoting and facilitating electronic access to public
information and services, including providing, or providing for, a
service that identifies, describes, and provides location information
for government information through electronic means, and that assists
government agencies in making their information more readily available
to the public;
(((10))) (9) Collecting ((and distributing copies of)) state
publications, as defined in RCW 40.06.010, prepared by any state agency
for distribution. The state library shall maintain the state
publications distribution center, as provided in chapter 40.06 RCW.
The office of the secretary of state, on recommendation of the state
librarian, may provide by rule for deposit with the state library of up
to three copies of each publication;
(((11))) (10) Providing for the sale of library material in
accordance with RCW 27.12.305;
(((12) Providing advisory services to state agencies regarding
their information needs;
(13))) (11) Providing for library and information service to
residents and staff of state-supported residential institutions;
(((14))) (12) Providing for library and information services to
persons throughout the state who are blind and/or physically
handicapped;
(((15))) (13) Assisting individuals and groups such as libraries,
library boards, governing bodies, and citizens throughout the state
toward the establishment and development of library services;
(((16))) (14) Making studies and surveys of library needs in order
to provide, expand, enlarge, and otherwise improve access to library
facilities and services throughout the state;
(((17))) (15) Serving as an interlibrary loan, information,
reference, and referral resource for all libraries in the state. The
state library may charge lending fees to other libraries that charge
the state library for similar services. Money paid as fees shall be
retained by the state library as a recovery of costs; and
(((18))) (16) Accepting and expending in accordance with the terms
thereof grants of federal, state, local, or private funds. For the
purpose of qualifying to receive such grants, the state librarian is
authorized to make applications and reports required by the grantor.

Sec. 2 RCW 27.18.010 and 1982 c 123 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, except where the context otherwise
requires:
(1) "Compact" means the interstate library compact.
(2) "Public library agency", with reference to this state, means
the state library and any county or city library or any regional
library, rural county library district library, island library district
library, or intercounty rural library district library.
(((3) "State library agency", with reference to this state, means
the commissioners of the state library.))

Sec. 3 RCW 27.12.100 and 1965 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
An intercounty rural library district shall be established by joint
action of two or more counties proceeding by either of the following
alternative methods:
(1) The boards of county commissioners of any two or more counties
shall adopt identical resolutions proposing the formation of such a
district to include all of the areas outside of incorporated cities or
towns in such counties as may be designated in such resolutions. In
lieu of such resolutions a petition of like purport signed by ten
percent of the registered voters residing outside of incorporated
cities or towns of a county, may be filed with the county auditor
thereof, and shall have the same effect as a resolution. The
proposition for the formation of the district as stated on the petition
shall be prepared by the attorney general ((upon request of the state
library commission)). Action to initiate the formation of such a
district shall become ineffective in any county if corresponding action
is not completed within one year thereafter by each other county
included in such proposal. The county auditor in each county shall
check the validity of the signatures on the petition and shall certify
to the board of county commissioners the sufficiency of the signatures.
If each petition contains the signatures of ten percent of the
registered voters residing outside the incorporated cities and towns of
the county, each board of county commissioners shall pass a resolution
calling an election for the purpose of submitting the question to the
voters and setting the date of said election. When such action has
been taken in each of the counties involved, notification shall be made
by each board of county commissioners to the board of county
commissioners of the county having the largest population according to
the last federal census, who shall give proper notification to each
county auditor. At the next general or special election held in the
respective counties there shall be submitted to the voters in the areas
outside of incorporated cities and towns a question as to whether an
intercounty rural library district shall be established as outlined in
the resolutions or petitions. Notice of said election shall be given
the county auditor pursuant to RCW 29.27.080. The county auditor shall
provide for the printing of a separate ballot and shall provide for the
distribution of ballots to the polling places pursuant to RCW
29.04.020. The county auditor shall instruct the election boards in
split precincts. The respective county canvassing boards in each
county to be included within the intercounty rural library district
shall canvass the votes and certify the results to the county auditor
pursuant to chapter 29.62 RCW; the result shall then be certified by
each county auditor to the county auditor of the county having the
largest population according to the last federal census. If a majority
of the electors voting on the proposition in each of the counties
affected shall vote in favor of such district it shall thereby become
established, and the board of county commissioners of the county having
the largest population according to the last federal census shall
declare the intercounty rural library district established. If two or
more of the counties affected are in an existing intercounty rural
library district, then the electors in areas outside incorporated
cities and towns in those counties shall vote as a unit and the
electors in areas outside incorporated cities and towns in each of the
other affected counties shall vote as separate units. If a majority of
the electors voting on the proposition in the existing district and a
majority of the voters in any of the other affected counties shall vote
in favor of an expanded intercounty rural library district it shall
thereby become established.
(2) The county commissioners of two or more counties meeting in
joint session attended by a majority of the county commissioners of
each county may, by majority vote of those present, order the
establishment of an intercounty rural library district to include all
of the area outside of incorporated cities and towns in as many of the
counties represented at such joint meeting as shall be determined by
resolution of such joint meeting. If two or more counties are in an
existing intercounty rural library district, then a majority vote of
all of the commissioners present from those counties voting as a unit,
and a majority vote of the commissioners present from any other county
shall cause the joint session to order the establishment of an expanded
intercounty rural library district. No county, however, shall be
included in such district if a majority of its county commissioners
vote against its inclusion in such district.

Sec. 4 RCW 40.06.020 and 2002 c 342 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created as a division of the state library, and
under the direction of the state librarian, a state publications
distribution center. Subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for these purposes, the center shall utilize the
depository library system to permit citizens economical and convenient
access to state publications. To this end the secretary of state shall
make such rules as may be deemed necessary to carry out the provisions
of this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 17.15.040 and 1997 c 357 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The interagency integrated pest management coordinating
committee is created. The committee is composed of the integrated pest
management coordinator from each agency or institution listed under RCW
17.15.020 and the representatives designated under RCW 17.15.030. The
coordinator from the department of agriculture shall serve as chair of
the committee.
(2) The interagency integrated pest management coordinating
committee shall share information among the state agencies and
institutions and facilitate interagency coordination.
(3) The interagency integrated pest management coordinating
committee shall meet at least two times a year. All meetings of the
committee must be open to the public. The committee shall give public
notice of each meeting.
(4) By November 30th of each odd-numbered year up to and including
November 30th, 2001, the department of agriculture, with the advice of
the interagency integrated pest management coordinating committee,
shall prepare a report on the progress of integrated pest management
programs. ((The report is to be made available through the state
library and placed on the legislative alert list.))

Sec. 6 RCW 40.06.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Every state agency shall promptly deposit copies of each of its
state publications with the state library in quantities as certified by
the state librarian as required to meet the needs of the depository
library system. Upon consent of the issuing state agency such state
publications as are printed by the public printer shall be delivered
directly to the ((center)) library.
(2) In the interest of economy and efficiency, the state librarian
may specifically or by general rule exempt a given state publication or
class of publications from the requirements of this section in full or
in part.

Sec. 7 RCW 42.30.110 and 2001 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed to prevent
a governing body from holding an executive session during a regular or
special meeting:
(a) To consider matters affecting national security;
(b) To consider the selection of a site or the acquisition of real
estate by lease or purchase when public knowledge regarding such
consideration would cause a likelihood of increased price;
(c) To consider the minimum price at which real estate will be
offered for sale or lease when public knowledge regarding such
consideration would cause a likelihood of decreased price. However,
final action selling or leasing public property shall be taken in a
meeting open to the public;
(d) To review negotiations on the performance of publicly bid
contracts when public knowledge regarding such consideration would
cause a likelihood of increased costs;
(e) To consider, in the case of an export trading company,
financial and commercial information supplied by private persons to the
export trading company;
(f) To receive and evaluate complaints or charges brought against
a public officer or employee. However, upon the request of such
officer or employee, a public hearing or a meeting open to the public
shall be conducted upon such complaint or charge;
(g) To evaluate the qualifications of an applicant for public
employment or to review the performance of a public employee. However,
subject to RCW 42.30.140(4), discussion by a governing body of
salaries, wages, and other conditions of employment to be generally
applied within the agency shall occur in a meeting open to the public,
and when a governing body elects to take final action hiring, setting
the salary of an individual employee or class of employees, or
discharging or disciplining an employee, that action shall be taken in
a meeting open to the public;
(h) To evaluate the qualifications of a candidate for appointment
to elective office. However, any interview of such candidate and final
action appointing a candidate to elective office shall be in a meeting
open to the public;
(i) To discuss with legal counsel representing the agency matters
relating to agency enforcement actions, or to discuss with legal
counsel representing the agency litigation or potential litigation to
which the agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official
capacity is, or is likely to become, a party, when public knowledge
regarding the discussion is likely to result in an adverse legal or
financial consequence to the agency.
This subsection (1)(i) does not permit a governing body to hold an
executive session solely because an attorney representing the agency is
present. For purposes of this subsection (1)(i), "potential
litigation" means matters protected by RPC 1.6 or RCW 5.60.060(2)(a)
concerning:
(A) Litigation that has been specifically threatened to which the
agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official capacity
is, or is likely to become, a party;
(B) Litigation that the agency reasonably believes may be commenced
by or against the agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an
official capacity; or
(C) Litigation or legal risks of a proposed action or current
practice that the agency has identified when public discussion of the
litigation or legal risks is likely to result in an adverse legal or
financial consequence to the agency;
(j) To consider, in the case of the state library ((commission)) or
its advisory bodies, western library network prices, products,
equipment, and services, when such discussion would be likely to
adversely affect the network's ability to conduct business in a
competitive economic climate. However, final action on these matters
shall be taken in a meeting open to the public;
(k) To consider, in the case of the state investment board,
financial and commercial information when the information relates to
the investment of public trust or retirement funds and when public
knowledge regarding the discussion would result in loss to such funds
or in private loss to the providers of this information.
(2) Before convening in executive session, the presiding officer of
a governing body shall publicly announce the purpose for excluding the
public from the meeting place, and the time when the executive session
will be concluded. The executive session may be extended to a stated
later time by announcement of the presiding officer.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.95C.060 and 1988 c 177 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office shall establish a statewide waste reduction hot line
with the capacity to refer waste generators and the public to sources
of information on specific waste reduction techniques and procedures.
The hot line shall coordinate with all other state waste hot lines.
(2) The director shall ((work with the state library to)) establish
a data base system that shall include proven waste reduction techniques
and case studies of effective waste reduction. The data base system
shall be: (a) Coordinated with all other state agency data bases on
waste reduction; (b) administered in conjunction with the statewide
waste reduction hot line; and (c) readily accessible to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 43.105.290 (Electronic access to public
records -- Government information locator service pilot project) and 1996
c 171 s 13 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---