BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.45.035 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2001, the following long-term economic
assumptions shall be used by the state actuary for the purposes of RCW
41.45.030:
(a) The growth in inflation assumption shall be 3.5 percent;
(b) The growth in salaries assumption, exclusive of merit or
longevity increases, shall be 4.5 percent;
(c) The investment rate of return assumption shall be 8 percent;
and
(d) The growth in system membership assumption shall be 1.25
percent for the public employees' retirement system, the school
employees' retirement system, and the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system. The assumption shall be .90 percent
for the teachers' retirement system.
(2) Beginning with actuarial studies done after July 1, ((2001))
2003, changes to plan asset values that vary from the long-term
investment rate of return assumption shall be recognized over a ((four-year)) period that varies up to eight years depending on the magnitude
of the deviation of each year's investment rate of return relative to
the long-term rate of return assumption. Beginning April 1, 2004, the
council, by affirmative vote of four councilmembers, may adopt changes
to this asset value smoothing technique. Any changes adopted by the
council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.45.054 and 2002 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The basic employer and state contribution rates and plan 2 member
contribution rates are changed to reflect the 2000 actuarial valuation,
incorporating the 1995-2000 actuarial experience study conducted by the
office of the state actuary. The results of the ((2000)) 2001
actuarial valuation for the public employees' retirement system, the
teachers' retirement system, and the school employees' retirement
system shall be ((adjusted to reflect an April 1, 2002, implementation
date.)) restated as a result of the new asset smoothing method adopted
in RCW 41.45.035, and suspension of payments on the unfunded liability
in the public employees' retirement system and teachers' retirement
system, to collect the following contribution rates:
(1) Beginning ((April 1, 2002)) July 1, 2003, the following
employer contribution rates shall be charged:
(a) ((1.10)) 1.18 percent for the public employees' retirement
system; and
(b) ((2.64)) 3.03 percent for the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.
(2) Beginning ((April 1, 2002)) July 1, 2003, the basic state
contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 shall be ((1.75)) 2.02 percent.
(3) Beginning ((April 1, 2002)) September 1, 2003, the following
employer contribution rates shall be charged:
(a) ((0.96)) 0.84 percent for the school employees' retirement
system; and
(b) ((1.05)) 1.17 percent for the teachers' retirement system.
(4) Beginning ((April 1, 2002)) July 1, 2003, the following member
contribution rates shall be charged:
(a) ((0.65)) 1.18 percent for the public employees' retirement
system plan 2; and
(b) ((4.39)) 5.05 percent for the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.
(5) Beginning ((April 1, 2002)) September 1, 2003, the following
member contribution rates shall be charged:
(a) ((0.35)) 0.84 percent for the school employees' retirement
system plan 2; and
(b) ((0.15)) 0.87 percent for the teachers' retirement system plan
2.
(6) The contribution rates in this section shall be collected
through ((June 30, 2003)) June 30, 2005, for the public employees'
retirement system and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system, and August 31st, 2005, for the school employees'
retirement system and the teachers' retirement system.
(7) The July 1, 2003, contribution rate changes provided in this
section shall be implemented notwithstanding the thirty-day advanced
notice provisions of RCW 41.45.067.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.45.070 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 16 and 2001 2nd
sp.s. c 11 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the basic employer contribution rate established
in RCW 41.45.060 or ((41.45.053)) 41.45.054, the department shall also
charge employers of public employees' retirement system, teachers'
retirement system, school employees' retirement system, or Washington
state patrol retirement system members an additional supplemental rate
to pay for the cost of additional benefits, if any, granted to members
of those systems. Except as provided in subsections (6) and (7) of
this section, the supplemental contribution rates required by this
section shall be calculated by the state actuary and shall be charged
regardless of language to the contrary contained in the statute which
authorizes additional benefits.
(2) In addition to the basic state contribution rate established in
RCW 41.45.060 or ((41.45.053)) 41.45.054 for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2, the department
shall also establish a supplemental rate to pay for the cost of
additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2. Except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section, this supplemental rate
shall be calculated by the state actuary and the state treasurer shall
transfer the additional required contributions regardless of language
to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes the
additional benefits.
(3) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
benefit increases provided to active members of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
Washington state patrol retirement system, shall be calculated as the
level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund the cost of the
benefit not later than June 30, 2024.
(4) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
benefit increases provided to active and retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the school employees' retirement
system plan 2 and plan 3, or the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 2, shall be calculated as the level
percentage of all members' pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit,
as calculated under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, or 41.45.067.
(5) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
postretirement adjustments which are provided on a nonautomatic basis
to current retirees shall be calculated as the percentage of pay needed
to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the retirees. The
supplemental rate charged under this section to fund automatic
postretirement adjustments for active or retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 shall be calculated as the level percentage of pay needed to
fund the cost of the automatic adjustments not later than June 30,
2024.
(6) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws of
1998.
(7) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW;
section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998; or section 701, chapter 341,
Laws of 1998.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---