BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall collect a two-dollar surcharge on the
purchase of:
(a) All resident and nonresident shellfish and seaweed licenses
issued under RCW 77.32.520(2)(a); and
(b) All resident and nonresident adult combination licenses issued
under RCW 77.32.470(2)(a).
(2) The surcharge required by this section is in addition to any
other fees or charges authorized by this chapter.
(3) The surcharge collected under this section must be deposited in
the general fund--local account managed by the department of health,
and used by the department of health to fund biotoxin testing and
monitoring on beaches used for recreational shellfishing.
(4) Any amounts collected under this section that are in excess of
the annual cost of the recreational shellfish testing and monitoring
program shall be transferred by the department of health to the general
fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.32.520 and 2000 c 107 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A personal use shellfish and seaweed license is required for
all persons other than residents or nonresidents under fifteen years of
age to fish for, take, dig for, or possess seaweed or shellfish for
personal use from state waters or offshore waters including national
park beaches.
(2) The fees for annual personal use shellfish and seaweed licenses
are:
(a) For a resident fifteen years of age or older, seven dollars;
(b) For a nonresident fifteen years of age or older, twenty
dollars; and
(c) For a senior, five dollars.
(3) The license fee for a two-day personal use shellfish and
seaweed license is six dollars for residents or nonresidents fifteen
years of age or older.
(4) If applicable, the fees authorized in this section are in
addition to the surcharge authorized by section 1 of this act.
(5) The personal use shellfish and seaweed license shall be visible
on the licensee while harvesting shellfish or seaweed.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.32.470 and 1998 c 191 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A personal use saltwater, freshwater, combination, temporary,
or family fishing weekend license is required for all persons fifteen
years of age or older to fish for or possess fish taken for personal
use from state waters or offshore waters.
(2) The fees for annual personal use saltwater, freshwater, or
combination licenses are as follows:
(a) A combination license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish, shellfish, and seaweed from state waters or offshore waters. The
fee for this license is thirty-six dollars for residents, seventy-two
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.
(b) A saltwater license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish taken from saltwater areas. The fee for this license is eighteen
dollars for residents, thirty-six dollars for nonresidents, and five
dollars for resident seniors.
(c) A freshwater license allows the holder to fish for, take, or
possess food fish or game fish species in all freshwater areas. The
fee for this license is twenty dollars for residents, forty dollars for
nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors.
(3) If applicable, the fees authorized in this section are in
addition to the surcharge authorized by section 1 of this act.
(4) A temporary fishing license is valid for two consecutive days
and allows the holder to fish for or possess fish taken from state
waters or offshore waters. The fee for this temporary fishing license
is six dollars for both residents and nonresidents. This license is
not valid on game fish species for an eight-consecutive-day period
beginning on the opening day of the lowland lake fishing season.
(((4))) (5) A family fishing weekend license allows for a maximum
of six anglers: One resident and five youth; two residents and four
youth; or one resident, one nonresident, and four youth. This license
allows the holders to fish for or possess fish taken from state waters
or offshore waters. The fee for this license is twenty dollars. This
license is only valid during periods as specified by rule of the
department.
(((5))) (6) The commission may adopt rules to create and sell
combination licenses for all hunting and fishing activities at or below
a fee equal to the total cost of the individual license contained
within any combination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The surcharge required by section 1 of this
act must be implemented by the department of fish and wildlife upon the
effective date of this section and is applicable to the license year
that is in effect at that time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---