BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.165 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Contractors shall be required to submit with each annual
nursing facility cost report a proposed settlement report showing
underspending or overspending in each component rate during the cost
report year on a per-resident day basis. The department shall accept
or reject the proposed settlement report, explain any adjustments, and
issue a revised settlement report if needed.
(2) Contractors shall not be required to refund payments made in
the operations, variable return, property, and financing allowance
component rates in excess of the adjusted costs of providing services
corresponding to these components.
(3) The facility will return to the department any overpayment
amounts in each of the direct care, therapy care, and support services
rate components that the department identifies following the audit and
settlement procedures as described in this chapter((, provided that the
contractor may retain any overpayment that does not exceed 1.0% of the
facility's direct care, therapy care, and support services component
rate. However, no overpayments may be retained in a cost center to
which savings have been shifted to cover a deficit, as provided in
subsection (4) of this section. Facilities that are not in substantial
compliance for more than ninety days, and facilities that provide
substandard quality of care at any time, during the period for which
settlement is being calculated, will not be allowed to retain any
amount of overpayment in the facility's direct care, therapy care, and
support services component rate. The terms "not in substantial
compliance" and "substandard quality of care" shall be defined by
federal survey regulations)).
(4) Determination of unused rate funds, including the amounts of
direct care, therapy care, and support services to be recovered, shall
be done separately for each component rate, and, except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, neither costs nor rate payments shall be
shifted from one component rate or corresponding service area to
another in determining the degree of underspending or recovery, if any.
In computing a preliminary or final settlement, savings in the support
services cost center shall be shifted to cover a deficit in the direct
care or therapy cost centers up to the amount of any savings, but no
more than twenty percent of the support services component rate may be
shifted. In computing a preliminary or final settlement, savings in
direct care and therapy care may be shifted to cover a deficit in these
two cost centers up to the amount of savings in each, regardless of the
percentage of either component rate shifted. ((Contractor-retained
overpayments up to one percent of direct care, therapy care, and
support services rate components, as authorized in subsection (3) of
this section, shall be calculated and applied after all shifting is
completed.))
(5) Total and component payment rates assigned to a nursing
facility, as calculated and revised, if needed, under the provisions of
this chapter and those rules as the department may adopt, shall
represent the maximum payment for nursing facility services rendered to
medicaid recipients for the period the rates are in effect. No
increase in payment to a contractor shall result from spending above
the total payment rate or in any rate component.
(6) RCW 74.46.150 through 74.46.180, and rules adopted by the
department prior to July 1, 1998, shall continue to govern the medicaid
settlement process for periods prior to October 1, 1998, as if these
statutes and rules remained in full force and effect.
(7) For calendar year 1998, the department shall calculate split
settlements covering January 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, and
October 1, 1998, through December 31, 1998. For the period beginning
October 1, 1998, rules specified in this chapter shall apply. The
department shall, by rule, determine the division of calendar year 1998
adjusted costs for settlement purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.506 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The direct care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of nursing care for one resident of a nursing facility for
one day, including direct care supplies. Therapy services and
supplies, which correspond to the therapy care component rate, shall be
excluded. The direct care component rate includes elements of case mix
determined consistent with the principles of this section and other
applicable provisions of this chapter.
(2) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine and
update quarterly for each nursing facility serving medicaid residents
a facility-specific per-resident day direct care component rate
allocation, to be effective on the first day of each calendar quarter.
In determining direct care component rates the department shall
utilize, as specified in this section, minimum data set resident
assessment data for each resident of the facility, as transmitted to,
and if necessary corrected by, the department in the resident
assessment instrument format approved by federal authorities for use in
this state.
(3) The department may question the accuracy of assessment data for
any resident and utilize corrected or substitute information, however
derived, in determining direct care component rates. The department is
authorized to impose civil fines and to take adverse rate actions
against a contractor, as specified by the department in rule, in order
to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data transmission
requirements and to ensure accuracy.
(4) Cost report data used in setting direct care component rate
allocations shall be 1996 and 1999, for rate periods as specified in
RCW 74.46.431(4)(a).
(5) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall rebase each
nursing facility's direct care component rate allocation as described
in RCW 74.46.431, adjust its direct care component rate allocation for
economic trends and conditions as described in RCW 74.46.431, and
update its medicaid average case mix index, consistent with the
following:
(a) Reduce total direct care costs reported by each nursing
facility for the applicable cost report period specified in RCW
74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments, and to eliminate
reported resident therapy costs and adjustments, in order to derive the
facility's total allowable direct care cost;
(b) Divide each facility's total allowable direct care cost by its
adjusted resident days for the same report period, increased if
necessary to a minimum occupancy of eighty-five percent; that is, the
greater of actual or imputed occupancy at eighty-five percent of
licensed beds, to derive the facility's allowable direct care cost per
resident day;
(c) Adjust the facility's per resident day direct care cost by the
applicable factor specified in RCW 74.46.431(4) (b) and (c) to derive
its adjusted allowable direct care cost per resident day;
(d) Divide each facility's adjusted allowable direct care cost per
resident day by the facility average case mix index for the applicable
quarters specified by RCW 74.46.501(7)(b) to derive the facility's
allowable direct care cost per case mix unit;
(e) Effective for July 1, 2001, rate setting, divide nursing
facilities into at least two and, if applicable, three peer groups:
Those located in nonurban counties; those located in high labor-cost
counties, if any; and those located in other urban counties;
(f) Array separately the allowable direct care cost per case mix
unit for all facilities in nonurban counties; for all facilities in
high labor-cost counties, if applicable; and for all facilities in
other urban counties, and determine the median allowable direct care
cost per case mix unit for each peer group;
(g) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from October 1,
1998, through June 30, 2000, determine each facility's quarterly direct
care component rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per
case mix unit equal to eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group
median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to
the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group median, and
shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is
between eighty-five and one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group
median established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct
care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost
per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case
mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(h) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from July 1,
2000, forward, and for all future rate setting, determine each
facility's quarterly direct care component rate as follows:
(i) Through June 30, 2003, any facility whose allowable cost per
case mix unit is less than ninety percent of the facility's peer group
median established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a
cost per case mix unit equal to ninety percent of the facility's peer
group median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation
equal to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by
that facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable
quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c). From July 1, 2003, forward,
and for all future rate setting, any facility whose allowable cost per
case mix unit is less than or equal to one hundred ten percent of the
facility's peer group median established under (f) of this section
shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's allowable cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred ten percent of the peer group median established under
(f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit equal
to one hundred ten percent of the peer group median, and shall have a
direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's assigned
cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average
case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(iii) Through June 30, 2003, any facility whose allowable cost per
case mix unit is between ninety and one hundred ten percent of the peer
group median established under (f) of this subsection shall have a
direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable
cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average
case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(i)(i) Between October 1, 1998, and June 30, 2000, the department
shall compare each facility's direct care component rate allocation
calculated under (g) of this subsection with the facility's nursing
services component rate in effect on September 30, 1998, less therapy
costs, plus any exceptional care offsets as reported on the cost
report, adjusted for economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW
74.46.431. A facility shall receive the higher of the two rates.
(ii) Between July 1, 2000, and June 30, 2002, the department shall
compare each facility's direct care component rate allocation
calculated under (h) of this subsection with the facility's direct care
component rate in effect on June 30, 2000. A facility shall receive
the higher of the two rates. Between July 1, 2001, and June 30, 2002,
if during any quarter a facility whose rate paid under (h) of this
subsection is greater than either the direct care rate in effect on
June 30, 2000, or than that facility's allowable direct care cost per
case mix unit calculated in (d) of this subsection multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c), the facility shall be paid in that
and each subsequent quarter pursuant to (h) of this subsection and
shall not be entitled to the greater of the two rates.
(iii) Effective July 1, 2002, all direct care component rate
allocations shall be as determined under (h) of this subsection.
(6) The direct care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) Payments resulting from increases in direct care component
rates, granted under authority of RCW 74.46.508(1) for a facility's
exceptional care residents, shall be offset against the facility's
examined, allowable direct care costs, for each report year or partial
period such increases are paid. Such reductions in allowable direct
care costs shall be for rate setting, settlement, and other purposes
deemed appropriate by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---