BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.575 and 1989 c 87 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall promulgate rules consistent with the
treatment of resources provisions of section 1924 of the social
security act entitled "Treatment of Income and Resources for Certain
Institutionalized Spouses," in determining the allocation of resources
between the institutionalized and community spouse.
(2) In the interest of supporting the community spouse the
department shall allow the maximum resource allowance amount
permissible under the social security act for the community spouse for
persons institutionalized before August 1, 2003.
(3) For persons institutionalized on or after August 1, 2003, the
department, in the interest of supporting the community spouse, shall
allow up to a maximum of forty thousand dollars in resources for the
community spouse. For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2005, and
each fiscal biennium thereafter, the maximum resource allowance amount
for the community spouse shall be adjusted for economic trends and
conditions by increasing the amount allowable by the consumer price
index as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics. However,
in no case shall the amount allowable exceed the maximum resource
allowance permissible under the social security act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---