BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.225.015 and 1999 c 319 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a parent enrolls a child who is six or seven years of age in
a public school, the child is required to attend and that parent has
the responsibility to ensure the child attends for the full time that
school is in session. An exception shall be made to this requirement
for children whose parents formally remove them from enrollment if the
child is less than eight years old and a petition has not been filed
against the parent under subsection (3) of this section. The
requirement to attend school under this subsection does not apply to a
child enrolled in a public school part-time for the purpose of
receiving ancillary services. A child required to attend school under
this subsection may be temporarily excused upon the request of his or
her parent for purposes agreed upon by the school district and parent.
(2) If a six or seven year-old child is required to attend public
school under subsection (1) of this section and that child has
unexcused absences, the public school in which the child is enrolled
shall:
(a) Inform the child's custodial parent, parents, or guardian by a
notice in writing or by telephone whenever the child has failed to
attend school after one unexcused absence within any month during the
current school year;
(b) Request a conference or conferences with the custodial parent,
parents, or guardian and child at a time reasonably convenient for all
persons included for the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's
absences after two unexcused absences within any month during the
current school year. If a regularly scheduled parent-teacher
conference day is to take place within thirty days of the second
unexcused absence, then the school district may schedule this
conference on that day; and
(c) Take steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences. These
steps shall include, where appropriate, adjusting the child's school
program or school or course assignment, providing more individualized
or remedial instruction, offering assistance in enrolling the child in
available alternative schools or programs, or assisting the parent or
child to obtain supplementary services that may help eliminate or
ameliorate the cause or causes for the absence from school.
(3) If a child required to attend public school under subsection
(1) of this section has ((seven)) five unexcused absences in a month or
ten unexcused absences in a school year, the school district ((shall))
may file a petition for civil action as provided in RCW 28A.225.035
against the parent of the child provided that the local juvenile court
has designated within available resources a court, truancy board, or
other entity for processing such actions.
(4) This section does not require a six or seven year old child to
enroll in a public or private school or to receive home-based
instruction. This section only applies to six or seven year old
children whose parents enroll them full time in public school and do
not formally remove them from enrollment as provided in subsection (1)
of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.225.020 and 1999 c 319 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a child required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010
fails to attend school without valid justification, the public school
in which the child is enrolled shall:
(a) Inform the child's custodial parent, parents, or guardian by a
notice in writing or by telephone whenever the child has failed to
attend school after one unexcused absence within any month during the
current school year. School officials shall inform the parent of the
potential consequences of additional unexcused absences;
(b) Schedule a conference or conferences with the custodial parent,
parents, or guardian and child at a time reasonably convenient for all
persons included for the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's
absences after two unexcused absences within any month during the
current school year. If a regularly scheduled parent-teacher
conference day is to take place within thirty days of the second
unexcused absence, then the school district may schedule this
conference on that day; and
(c) Take steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences. These
steps shall include, where appropriate, adjusting the child's school
program or school or course assignment, providing more individualized
or remedial instruction, providing appropriate vocational courses or
work experience, ((referring the child to a community truancy board, if
available,)) requiring the child to attend an alternative school or
program, or assisting the parent or child to obtain supplementary
services that might eliminate or ameliorate the cause or causes for the
absence from school and may include referring the child to a community
truancy board. If the child's parent does not attend the scheduled
conference, the conference may be conducted with the student and school
official. However, the parent shall be notified of the steps to be
taken to eliminate or reduce the child's absence.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, an "unexcused absence" means that
a child:
(a) Has failed to attend the majority of hours or periods in an
average school day or has failed to comply with a more restrictive
school district policy; and
(b) Has failed to meet the school district's policy for excused
absences.
(3) If a child transfers from one school district to another during
the school year, the receiving school or school district shall include
the unexcused absences accumulated at the previous school or from the
previous school district for purposes of this section, RCW 28A.225.030,
and 28A.225.015.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.225.025 and 1999 c 319 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, "community truancy board" means a
board composed of members of the local community in which the child
attends school. Juvenile courts may establish and operate community
truancy boards. If the juvenile court and the school district agree,
a school district may establish and operate a community truancy board
under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. Juvenile courts may
create a community truancy board or may use other entities that exist
or are created, such as diversion units. However, a diversion unit or
other existing entity must agree before it is used as a truancy board.
Duties of a community truancy board ((shall)) may include((, but not be
limited to,)) recommending methods for improving school attendance such
as assisting the parent or the child to obtain supplementary services
that might eliminate or ameliorate the causes for the absences or
suggesting to the school district that the child enroll in another
school, an alternative education program, an education center, a skill
center, a dropout prevention program, or another public or private
educational program.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.225.030 and 1999 c 319 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a child is required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010
and if the actions taken by a school district under RCW 28A.225.020 are
not successful in substantially reducing an enrolled student's absences
from public school, ((not later than the seventh)) on or after the
fifth unexcused absence by a child within any month during the current
school year or ((not later than)) on or after the tenth unexcused
absence during the current school year the school district ((shall))
may, provided that the local juvenile court has designated within
available funds a court, truancy board, or other entity for processing
such actions, file a petition and supporting affidavit for a civil
action with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010:
(a) By the parent; (b) by the child; or (c) by the parent and the
child. Except as provided in this subsection, no additional documents
need be filed with the petition.
(2) ((The district shall not later than the fifth unexcused absence
in a month:
(a) Enter into an agreement with a student and parent that
establishes school attendance requirements;
(b) Refer a student to a community truancy board, if available, as
defined in RCW 28A.225.025. The community truancy board shall enter
into an agreement with the student and parent that establishes school
attendance requirements and take other appropriate actions to reduce
the child's absences; or
(c) File a petition under subsection (1) of this section.
(3))) The petition may be filed by a school district employee who
is not an attorney.
(((4))) (3) If the school district ((fails to)) does not file a
petition under this section, the parent of a child with five or more
unexcused absences in any month during the current school year or upon
the tenth unexcused absence during the current school year may,
provided that the local juvenile court has designated within available
funds a court, truancy board, or other entity for processing such
actions, file a petition with the juvenile court alleging a violation
of RCW 28A.225.010.
(((5))) (4) Petitions filed under this section may be served by
certified mail, return receipt requested. If such service is
unsuccessful, or the return receipt is not signed by the addressee,
personal service is required.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 28A.225.151 (Reports) and 1996 c 134 s
5 & 1995 c 312 s 72 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---