BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the number of
individuals with a developmental disability is increasing. This
growth, along with economic and social changes, presents opportunities
for the development of long-term community services and creates a need
for different approaches to long-term service programs. The
legislature recognizes that the primary resource for long-term support
continues to be family. However, family caregivers are increasingly
employed outside the home. In addition, many families continue to
support their sons and daughters when they are no longer legally
obligated to do so. The legislature finds that supporting caregivers
in a collaborative fashion can keep families together, prevent out-of-home placements, and leverage public and private support for people
with a developmental disability.
The legislature further finds the delivery of services to persons
with developmental disabilities should be prioritized based upon an
individual needs assessment. Limited state resources should be
allocated in a manner that complements and supports the use of
individual family and natural supports, enabling the individual to be
independent and not reliant upon institutional or residential care
services until such time as these services are required in order to
reasonably assure the health and safety of the individual.
It is the intent of the legislature that the provisions of this act
shall be applied to individuals currently and prospectively receiving
services under Title 71A RCW. The immediate implementation of this act
is necessary for the support of state government and its institutions
and programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 71A.10.020 and 1998 c 216 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this title, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Community residential support services," or "community support
services," and "in-home services" means one or more of the services
listed in RCW 71A.12.040.
(2) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(3) "Developmental disability" means a disability attributable to
mental retardation, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, or another
neurological or other condition of an individual found by the
((secretary)) department to be closely related to mental retardation or
to require treatment similar to that required for individuals with
mental retardation, which disability or other neurological or other
condition originates before the individual attains age eighteen, and
which has continued or can be expected to continue indefinitely, and
which constitutes a substantial handicap to the individual. ((By
January 1, 1989, the department shall promulgate rules which define
neurological or other conditions in a way that is not limited to
intelligence quotient scores as the sole determinant of these
conditions, and notify the legislature of this action.
(4) "Eligible person" means a person who has been found by the
secretary under RCW 71A.16.040 to be eligible for services.
(5))) (4) "Habilitative services" means those services ((provided
by program personnel)) to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining
life skills and to raise their levels of physical, mental, social, and
vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, supported employment, and therapy.
(((6))) (5) "Legal representative" means a parent of a person who
is under eighteen years of age, a person's legal guardian, a person's
limited guardian when the subject matter is within the scope of the
limited guardianship, a person's attorney at law, a person's attorney
in fact, or any other person who is authorized by law to act for
another person.
(6) "Natural supports" means the provision of nonpaid assistance,
support, or care which is conducted by mutual agreement between a
person with a developmental disability and any entity in the community
including, but not limited to, family, friends, neighbors, civic
groups, or religious organizations.
(7) "Notice" or "notification" of an action of the secretary means
notice in compliance with RCW 71A.10.060.
(8) "Residential habilitation center" means a state-operated
facility for persons with developmental disabilities governed by
chapter 71A.20 RCW.
(9) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services
or the secretary's designee.
(10) "Service" or "services" means services provided by state or
local government to carry out this title.
(11) "Vacancy" means an opening at a residential habilitation
center, which when filled, would not require the center to exceed its
((biannually [biennially])) biennially budgeted capacity.

Sec. 3 RCW 71A.10.030 and 1988 c 176 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The existence of developmental disabilities does not affect the
civil rights of the person with the developmental disability except as
otherwise provided by law.
(2) ((The secretary's determination under RCW 71A.16.040 that a
person is eligible for services under this title shall not deprive the
person of any civil rights or privileges. The secretary's
determination alone shall not constitute cause to declare the)) A
person ((to be)) is not legally incompetent solely because he or she is
receiving services under this title.
(3) The department shall emphasize to the persons and entities it
contracts with the importance of recognizing the rights of a person
with a developmental disability referenced in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 15009.
The department shall require contractees to post these rights and make
them readily available to persons who have a developmental disability.
(4) This title shall not be construed to deprive the parent or
parents of any parental rights with relation to a child residing in a
residential habilitation center, except as provided in this title for
the orderly operation of such residential habilitation centers.

Sec. 4 RCW 71A.10.050 and 1989 c 175 s 138 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An applicant or recipient or former recipient of a
developmental disabilities service under this title from the department
of social and health services has the right to appeal the following
department actions:
(a) A denial of ((an application for eligibility under RCW
71A.16.040)) a determination that a person has a developmental
disability;
(b) An unreasonable delay in acting on an application ((for
eligibility,)) for a service((,)) or for an alternative service under
RCW 71A.18.040;
(c) A denial, reduction, or termination of a service;
(d) A claim that the person owes a debt to the state for an
overpayment;
(e) A disagreement with an action of the secretary under RCW
71A.10.060 or 71A.10.070;
(f) A decision to return a resident of ((an [a])) a habilitation
center to the community; and
(g) A decision to change a person's placement from one category of
residential services to a different category of residential services.
The adjudicative proceeding is governed by the Administrative
Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) This subsection applies only to an adjudicative proceeding in
which the department action appealed is a decision to return a resident
of a habilitation center to the community. The resident or his or her
representative may appeal on the basis of whether the specific
placement decision is in the best interests of the resident. When the
resident or his or her representative files an application for an
adjudicative proceeding under this section the department has the
burden of proving that the specific placement decision is in the best
interests of the resident.
(3) When the department takes any action described in subsection
(1) of this section it shall give notice as provided by RCW 71A.10.060.
The notice must include a statement advising the recipient of the right
to an adjudicative proceeding and the time limits for filing an
application for an adjudicative proceeding. Notice of a decision to
return a resident of a habilitation center to the community under RCW
71A.20.080 must also include a statement advising the recipient of the
right to file a petition for judicial review of an adverse adjudicative
order as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 71A.12.020 and 1988 c 176 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((To the extent that state, federal, or other funds designated
for services to persons with developmental disabilities are available,
the secretary shall provide every eligible person with habilitative
services suited to the person's needs, regardless of age or degree of
developmental disability.
(2))) The secretary shall provide persons who receive services with
the opportunity for integration with ((nonhandicapped and less
handicapped persons)) people without disabilities to the greatest
extent possible.
(((3))) (2) The secretary shall establish minimum standards for
((habilitative)) services through the development of a quality
assurance system. Consumers, advocates, service providers, appropriate
professionals, and local government agencies shall be involved in the
development of the standards.

Sec. 6 RCW 71A.12.040 and 1988 c 176 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
Services that the secretary may provide or arrange with others to
provide, or the individual may self-direct, under this title include,
but are not limited to:
(1) Architectural services;
(2) Case management services;
(3) Early childhood intervention;
(4) Employment services, including supported employment;
(5) Family counseling;
(6) Family support;
(7) Information and referral;
(8) Health services and equipment;
(9) Legal services;
(10) Residential services and support, including voluntary
placement and community protection;
(11) Respite care;
(12) Therapy services and equipment;
(13) Transportation services; and
(14) Vocational services.

Sec. 7 RCW 71A.12.050 and 1988 c 176 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary may make payments for nonresidential services which
exceed the cost of caring for an average individual at home, and which
are reasonably necessary for the care, treatment, maintenance, support,
and training of persons with developmental disabilities, upon
application pursuant to RCW 71A.18.050. The secretary shall prioritize
nonresidential services to individuals identified as priorities in RCW
71A.12.090. The secretary shall adopt rules determining the extent and
type of care and training for which the department will pay all or a
portion of the costs.

Sec. 8 RCW 71A.12.090 and 1988 c 176 s 209 are each amended to
read as follows:
((If a person with developmental disabilities is the parent of a
child who is about to be placed for adoption or foster care by the
secretary, the parent shall be eligible to receive services in order to
promote the integrity of the family unit.)) For individuals with a
developmental disability who are waiting for service, the department
shall identify priority populations based upon assessed need. The
priorities shall be based on the severity of an individual's
disability; including whether the impact of the disability is profound,
severe, moderate, or mild, and shall include an evaluation of any
extraordinary behavioral issues and severe physical impairments, and
the conditions surrounding the individual's caregiver.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 71A.18 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that the department establish
a single point of referral for persons with developmental disabilities
and their families so that they may have a place of entry and
continuing contact for services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 71A.18
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop a tool for the comprehensive
assessment of need for services under this title. The department is
not required to meet all needs of a person with a developmental
disability. The tool shall identify natural supports and any services
that would supplement the natural supports. The assessment tool shall
be implemented by January 2004. Development of a computer-based system
may require additional time and funding, which should be reported to
the legislature by September 2003.
(2) The assessment shall include the identification of any specific
limitations of the primary caregiver; including low income, an aging
caregiver, a single caregiver, a caregiver with a disability, a
caregiver with multiple children with a disability, or no identified
caregiver. The assessment shall be based upon the developmental age
and the level of functioning of the individual with a developmental
disability.

Sec. 11 RCW 71A.18.010 and 1988 c 176 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order for a person with a developmental disability to access
services that the person with a developmental disability has been
assessed to need and has been authorized to receive, the secretary
((may)) shall produce and maintain an individual service plan for each
((eligible)) person with a developmental disability that is reviewed
annually and revised as needed. An individual service plan is a plan
that identifies the needs of a person for services and determines what
services will be in the best interests of the person and ((will meet
the person's needs)) which individuals and entities are responsible for
providing the identified services. The secretary is not required to
provide for all the needs identified in the individual service plan.
The service plan shall be developed collaboratively with the person
with a developmental disability and the person with a developmental
disability's natural supports, and any other person considered integral
to the service planning process. The service plan shall be developed
within a reasonable period of time following the department's needs
assessment and authorization that the person with a developmental
disability receive services.
(2) In reviewing the annual individual service plan of clients
currently receiving services, the department may modify the type,
level, and intensity of services provided, based on the assessment of
the client. The department shall ensure that intake, eligibility, and
the individual assessment process shall be implemented uniformly and
completed within established time frames.

Sec. 12 RCW 71A.18.020 and 1988 c 176 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((secretary may)) department's duty to provide a service to a
person ((eligible)) with a developmental disability under this title
((if)) is limited by the funds ((are available. If there is an
individual service plan, the secretary shall consider the need for
services as provided in that plan)) specifically appropriated to
administer this title.
Limitations in funding can be the basis for denying services to a
person with a developmental disability not enrolled in medicaid or a
federal medicaid waiver program, and limitations in funding can be the
basis for denying nonwaiver services to a person with a developmental
disability enrolled in medicaid or a federal medicaid waiver program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 71A.18
RCW to read as follows:
(1) An applicant enrolled in a medicaid waiver or receiving waiver
services must be ICF/MR eligible.
(2) Accessing medicaid for an applicant by enrolling an applicant
in a medicaid waiver is prohibited, unless the applicant is assessed to
need waiver services and is a person assessed to meet the criteria of
a priority population.
(3) The department shall evaluate medicaid cost-sharing options for
applicants enrolled in a medicaid waiver and report to the legislature
regarding its findings by September 2003.
(4) The department shall evaluate available cost-effective options
for covering an applicant assessed to need medical coverage and report
to the legislature regarding its findings by September 2003.
(5) The department shall comply with all federal requirements that
are necessary for the receipt of federal funds.

Sec. 14 RCW 71A.18.030 and 1988 c 176 s 602 are each amended to
read as follows:
((An eligible)) A person with a developmental disability or the
((person's)) person with a developmental disability's legal
representative may reject an authorized service. Rejection of an
authorized service shall not affect the person's eligibility for
services and shall not eliminate the person from consideration for
other services or for the same service at a different time or under
different circumstances.

Sec. 15 RCW 71A.18.050 and 1988 c 176 s 604 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When considering the discontinuance of a service that is being
provided to a person, the secretary shall consult as required in RCW
71A.10.070.
(2) ((The discontinuance of a service under this section does not
affect the person's eligibility for services.)) Other services may be
provided or the same service may be restored when it is again available
or when it is again needed.
(3) Except when the service is discontinued at the request of the
person receiving the service or that person's legal representative, the
secretary shall give notice as required in RCW 71A.10.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 71A.18
RCW to read as follows:
The department shall coordinate with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to access funding to the fullest
extent possible so that a person with a disability can achieve the
maximum level of self-sufficiency, including employability. The
department shall coordinate with all other state agencies to achieve
early intervention that may prevent the need for more complex and
costly services later in the person's development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 71A.10
RCW to read as follows:
The department may adopt rules to implement this act.

Sec. 18 RCW 35.82.285 and 1991 c 167 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Housing authorities created under this chapter may establish and
operate group homes or halfway houses to serve juveniles released from
state juvenile or correctional institutions, or to serve the
developmentally disabled as defined in RCW 71A.10.020(((2))).
Authorities may contract for the operation of facilities so
established, with qualified nonprofit organizations as agent of the
authority. Authorities may provide support or supportive services in
facilities serving juveniles, the developmentally disabled or other
persons under a disability, and the frail elderly, whether or not they
are operated by the authority.
Action under this section shall be taken by the authority only
after a public hearing as provided by chapter 42.30 RCW. In exercising
this power the authority shall not be empowered to acquire property by
eminent domain, and the facilities established shall comply with all
zoning, building, fire, and health regulations and procedures
applicable in the locality.

Sec. 19 RCW 71A.20.010 and 1988 c 176 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter covers the operation of residential habilitation
centers. The selection of persons to be served at the centers is
governed by ((chapters 71A.16 and 71A.18 RCW)) this title. The
purposes of this chapter are: To provide for those children and adults
who are exceptional in their needs for care, treatment, and education
by reason of developmental disabilities, residential care designed to
develop their individual capacities to their optimum; to provide for
admittance, withdrawal and discharge from state residential
habilitation centers upon application; and to insure a comprehensive
program for the education, guidance, care, treatment, and
rehabilitation of all persons admitted to residential habilitation
centers.

Sec. 20 RCW 84.36.042 and 1998 c 202 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All real and personal property owned or leased by a nonprofit
organization, corporation, or association to provide housing for
((eligible)) persons with developmental disabilities is exempt from
property taxation.
(a) To qualify for this exemption, the nonprofit organization,
corporation, or association must be qualified for exemption under
section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3)). It must also have been organized for charitable purposes
to create and preserve long-term affordable housing for low-income
developmentally disabled persons.
(b) The housing must be occupied by ((eligible)) persons with a
developmental disability who have a low income.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Developmental disability" means the same as defined in RCW
71A.10.020;
(b) (("Eligible person" means the same as defined in RCW
71A.10.020; and
(c))) "Low income" means the adjusted gross income of the resident
is at eighty percent or less of the median income adjusted for family
size, as most recently determined by the federal department of housing
and urban development for the county in which the housing is located
and in effect as of January 1st of the assessment year for which the
exemption is sought. "Adjusted gross income" is as defined in the
federal internal revenue code of 1986, as it exists on June 11, 1998,
or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent
with the purpose of this section.
(3) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used
exclusively for the purposes for which the exemption is granted, except
as provided in RCW 84.36.805.
(4) If the real or personal property for which exemption is sought
is leased, the benefit of the exemption must inure to the nonprofit
organization, corporation, or association leasing the property to
provide the housing for developmentally disabled persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 71A.10.010 (Legislative finding -- Intent -- 1988 c 176) and
1988 c 176 s 1;
(2) RCW 71A.10.800 (Application of Title 71A RCW to matters pending
as of June 9, 1988) and 1988 c 176 s 1008;
(3) RCW 71A.10.805 (Headings in Title 71A RCW not part of law) and
1988 c 176 s 1002;
(4) RCW 71A.10.900 (Severability -- 1988 c 176) and 1988 c 176 s
1003;
(5) RCW 71A.10.901 (Saving -- 1988 c 176) and 1988 c 176 s 1004;
(6) RCW 71A.10.902 (Continuation of existing law -- 1988 c 176) and
1988 c 176 s 1001;
(7) RCW 71A.16.020 (Eligibility for services -- Rules) and 1988 c 176
s 402;
(8) RCW 71A.16.030 (Outreach program--Determination of eligibility
for services -- Application) and 1998 c 216 s 4 & 1988 c 176 s 403;
(9) RCW 71A.16.040 (Determination of eligibility -- Notice -- Rules for
redetermination) and 1989 c 175 s 141 & 1988 c 176 s 404; and
(10) RCW 71A.16.050 (Determination of eligibility -- Effect--Determination of appropriate services) and 1988 c 176 s 405.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 RCW 71A.16.010 (Referral for services--Admittance to residential habilitation centers -- Expiration of
subsections) and 1998 c 216 s 3 & 1988 c 176 s 401 are each repealed,
effective June 30, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---