BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW
to read as follows:
After the effective date of this act, the gambling commission shall
neither accept nor consider any new application from any entity for a
license to operate a house-banked cardroom.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.46.0282 and 1997 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Social card game" as used in this chapter means a card game ((that
constitutes gambling and is authorized by the commission under RCW
9.46.070. Authorized card games may include a house-banked or a
player-funded banked card game. No one may participate in the card
game or have an interest in the proceeds of the card game who is not a
player or a person licensed by the commission to participate in social
card games. There shall be two or more participants in the card game
who are players or persons licensed by the commission. The card game
must be played in accordance with the rules adopted by the commission
under RCW 9.46.070, which shall include but not be limited to rules for
the collection of fees, limitation of wagers, and management of player
funds. The number of tables authorized shall be set by the commission
but shall not exceed a total of fifteen separate tables per
establishment)), including but not limited to the game commonly known
as "mah-jongg," which constitutes gambling and contains each of the
following characteristics:
(1) There are two or more participants, and each of them are
players. The number of card tables is set by the commission but does
not exceed a total of fifteen separate tables per establishment;
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a
player's success at winning money or other thing of value by overcoming
chance is in the long run largely determined by the skill of the
player;
(3) A cardroom may serve as the custodian of a player-supported
progressive prize contest, in any card game authorized by the
commission;
(4) No organization, corporation, or person, other than one
licensed by the commission to operate a cardroom, collects or obtains
any money or thing of value from, or charges or imposes any fee upon,
any person which either enables him or her to play or results in or
from his or her playing;
(5) The type of card game is one specifically approved by the
commission pursuant to RCW 9.46.070; and
(6) The extent of wagers, money, or other thing of value which may
be wagered or contributed by any player does not exceed the amount or
value specified by the commission pursuant to RCW 9.46.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2016.

--- END ---