BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The transportation budget of the state
is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several
amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish
the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices
for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and
for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final
judgments arising out of such activities, for the period ending June
30, 2005.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2004" or "FY 2004" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2004.
(b) "Fiscal year 2005" or "FY 2005" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2005.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---