BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.655 and 1990 c 33 s 569 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670,
28A.400.380, and section 7, chapter 93, Laws of 1989.
(1) "Employee" means any employee of the state, including employees
of school districts and educational service districts, who are entitled
to accrue sick leave or annual leave and for whom accurate leave
records are maintained.
(2) "Program" means the leave sharing program established in RCW
41.04.660.
(3) "Service in the uniformed services" means the performance of
duty on a voluntary or involuntary basis in a uniformed service under
competent authority and includes active duty, active duty for training,
initial active duty for training, inactive duty training, full-time
national guard duty including state-ordered active duty, and a period
for which a person is absent from a position of employment for the
purpose of an examination to determine the fitness of the person to
perform any such duty.
(4) "State agency" or "agency" means departments, offices,
agencies, or institutions of state government, the legislature,
institutions of higher education, school districts, and educational
service districts.
(((3) "Program" means the leave sharing program established in RCW
41.04.660.)) (5) "Uniformed services" means the armed forces, the army
national guard, and the air national guard of any state, territory,
commonwealth, possession, or district when engaged in active duty for
training, inactive duty training, full-time national guard duty, or
state active duty, the commissioned corps of the public health service,
the coast guard, and any other category of persons designated by the
president of the United States in time of war or national emergency.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.04.660 and 1996 c 176 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state leave sharing program is hereby created. The
purpose of the program is to permit state employees, at no
significantly increased cost to the state of providing annual leave,
sick leave, or personal holidays, to come to the aid of a fellow state
employee who is suffering from or has a relative or household member
suffering from an extraordinary or severe illness, injury, impairment,
or physical or mental condition, or who has been called to service in
the uniformed services, which has caused or is likely to cause the
employee to take leave without pay or terminate his or her employment.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.04.665 and 1999 c 25 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An agency head may permit an employee to receive leave under
this section if:
(a) The employee has been called to service in the uniformed
services, or the employee suffers from, or has a relative or household
member suffering from, an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or
mental condition which is of an extraordinary or severe nature ((and
which has)). The service or illness, injury, impairment, or condition
must have caused, or is likely to cause, the employee to:
(i) Go on leave without pay status; or
(ii) Terminate state employment;
(b) The employee's absence and the use of shared leave are
justified;
(c) The employee has depleted or will shortly deplete his or her
annual leave and sick leave reserves, and military leave allowed under
RCW 38.40.060 if applicable;
(d) The employee has abided by agency rules regarding sick leave
and, if applicable, military leave use; and
(e) The employee has diligently pursued and been found to be
ineligible for benefits under chapter 51.32 RCW.
(2) The agency head shall determine the amount of leave, if any,
which an employee may receive under this section. However, an employee
shall not receive a total of more than two hundred sixty-one days of
leave.
(3) An employee may transfer annual leave, sick leave, and his or
her personal holiday, as follows:
(a) An employee who has an accrued annual leave balance of more
than ten days may request that the head of the agency for which the
employee works transfer a specified amount of annual leave to another
employee authorized to receive leave under subsection (1) of this
section. In no event may the employee request a transfer of an amount
of leave that would result in his or her annual leave account going
below ten days. For purposes of this subsection (3)(a), annual leave
does not accrue if the employee receives compensation in lieu of
accumulating a balance of annual leave.
(b) An employee may transfer a specified amount of sick leave to an
employee requesting shared leave only when the donating employee
retains a minimum of ((four hundred eighty)) one hundred seventy-six
hours of sick leave after the transfer. ((In no event may such an
employee request a transfer of more than six days of sick leave during
any twelve-month period.))
(c) An employee may transfer, under the provisions of this section
relating to the transfer of leave, all or part of his or her personal
holiday, as that term is defined under RCW 1.16.050, or as such
holidays are provided to employees by agreement with a school
district's board of directors if the leave transferred under this
subsection does not exceed the amount of time provided for personal
holidays under RCW 1.16.050.
(4) An employee of an institution of higher education under RCW
28B.10.016, school district, or educational service district who does
not accrue annual leave but does accrue sick leave and who has an
accrued sick leave balance of more than ((sixty)) twenty-two days may
request that the head of the agency for which the employee works
transfer a specified amount of sick leave to another employee
authorized to receive leave under subsection (1) of this section. In
no event may such an employee ((request a transfer of more than six
days of sick leave during any twelve month period, or)) request a
transfer that would result in his or her sick leave account going below
((sixty)) twenty-two days. Transfers of sick leave under this
subsection are limited to transfers from employees who do not accrue
annual leave. Under this subsection, "sick leave" also includes leave
accrued pursuant to RCW 28A.400.300(2) or 28A.310.240(1) with
compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies.
(5) Transfers of leave made by an agency head under subsections (3)
and (4) of this section shall not exceed the requested amount.
(6) Leave transferred under this section may be transferred from
employees of one agency to an employee of the same agency or, with the
approval of the heads of both agencies, to an employee of another state
agency. However, leave transferred to or from employees of school
districts or educational service districts is limited to transfers to
or from employees within the same employing district.
(7) While an employee is on leave transferred under this section,
he or she shall continue to be classified as a state employee and shall
receive the same treatment in respect to salary, wages, and employee
benefits as the employee would normally receive if using accrued annual
leave or sick leave.
(a) All salary and wage payments made to employees while on leave
transferred under this section shall be made by the agency employing
the person receiving the leave. The value of leave transferred shall
be based upon the leave value of the person receiving the leave.
(b) In the case of leave transferred by an employee of one agency
to an employee of another agency, the agencies involved shall arrange
for the transfer of funds and credit for the appropriate value of
leave.
(i) Pursuant to rules adopted by the office of financial
management, funds shall not be transferred under this section if the
transfer would violate any constitutional or statutory restrictions on
the funds being transferred.
(ii) The office of financial management may adjust the
appropriation authority of an agency receiving funds under this section
only if and to the extent that the agency's existing appropriation
authority would prevent it from expending the funds received.
(iii) Where any questions arise in the transfer of funds or the
adjustment of appropriation authority, the director of financial
management shall determine the appropriate transfer or adjustment.
(8) Leave transferred under this section shall not be used in any
calculation to determine an agency's allocation of full time equivalent
staff positions.
(9) The value of any leave transferred under this section which
remains unused shall be returned at its original value to the employee
or employees who transferred the leave when the agency head finds that
the leave is no longer needed or will not be needed at a future time in
connection with the illness or injury for which the leave was
transferred. To the extent administratively feasible, the value of
unused leave which was transferred by more than one employee shall be
returned on a pro rata basis.
(10) An employee who uses leave that is transferred to him or her
under this section may not be required to repay the value of the leave
that he or she used.

--- END ---