BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The legislature finds that the people
of Washington want their children to be healthy and well-educated. In
2000, the voters overwhelmingly passed Initiative Measure No. 728,
creating the student achievement account. School districts around the
state use critical Initiative Measure No. 728 funds to improve student
achievement by reducing class size, providing early childhood
education, and expanding before-and-after school programs. Education
is the key to a vital economy and a prosperous future for our children.
(b) This act improves funding for education by providing dedicated
revenue from the following sources:
(i) Eliminating the tax deductions for insurance guarantee funds;
(ii) Additional taxes on liquor;
(iii) Shortening the holding period for unclaimed property; and
increasing penalties on underpayments of state excise taxes.
(c) The revenues from these sources are deposited in the student
achievement account and will provide three hundred dollars per pupil
funding in school year 2005.
(2)(a) In order for children to succeed in school they also need
adequate health care. Washington has been a national leader in
providing medical insurance for children.
(b) This act improves funding for health care by providing
dedicated revenue from the following sources:
(i) An additional tax on cigarettes of fifty cents per pack; and
(ii) Repealing the sales and use tax exemptions for candy and gum.
(c) The revenues from these sources are deposited in the health
services account and will provide funding for children's medical
coverage up to two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level
and enrollment in the basic health plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected by the
department of revenue from the persons mentioned in and in the manner
provided by this chapter, an additional tax upon the sale, use,
consumption, handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes in an
amount equal to the rate of twenty-five mills per cigarette.
(2) The revenue collected under this section shall be deposited in
the health services account. To ensure continued availability of
previously dedicated revenues for existing programs, each fiscal year
eight million five hundred thousand dollars shall be transferred to the
general fund, two million nine hundred thousand dollars shall be
transferred to the water quality account, and three million nine
hundred thousand dollars shall be transferred to the violence reduction
and drug enforcement account.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.32A.125 and 2001 c 50 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) A member insurer may offset against its premium tax liability
to this state an assessment described in RCW 48.32A.085(8) to the
extent of twenty percent of the amount of the assessment for each of
the five calendar years following the year in which the assessment was
paid. In the event a member insurer ceases doing business, all
uncredited assessments may be credited against its premium tax
liability for the year it ceases doing business.
(2))) Any sums that are acquired by refund, under RCW
48.32A.085(6), from the association by member insurers, and that have
been offset against premium taxes ((as provided in subsection (1) of
this section)), must be paid by the insurers to the commissioner and
then deposited with the state treasurer for credit to the general fund
of the state of Washington. The association shall notify the
commissioner that refunds have been made.

Sec. 4 RCW 63.29.020 and 1992 c 122 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, all intangible
property, including any income or increment derived therefrom, less any
lawful charges, that is held, issued, or owing in the ordinary course
of the holder's business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for
more than ((five)) three years after it became payable or distributable
is presumed abandoned.
(2) Property, with the exception of unredeemed Washington state
lottery tickets and unpresented winning parimutuel tickets, is payable
and distributable for the purpose of this chapter notwithstanding the
owner's failure to make demand or to present any instrument or document
required to receive payment.
(3) This chapter does not apply to claims drafts issued by
insurance companies representing offers to settle claims unliquidated
in amount or settled by subsequent drafts or other means.
(4) This chapter does not apply to property covered by chapter
63.26 RCW.
(5) This chapter does not apply to used clothing, umbrellas, bags,
luggage, or other used personal effects if such property is disposed of
by the holder as follows:
(a) In the case of personal effects of negligible value, the
property is destroyed; or
(b) The property is donated to a bona fide charity.

Sec. 5 RCW 63.29.050 and 1983 c 179 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any sum payable on a check, draft, or similar instrument,
except those subject to RCW 63.29.040, on which a banking or financial
organization is directly liable, including a cashier's check and a
certified check, which has been outstanding for more than ((five))
three years after it was payable or after its issuance if payable on
demand, is presumed abandoned, unless the owner, within ((five)) three
years, has communicated in writing with the banking or financial
organization concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as
evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an
employee thereof.
(2) A holder may not deduct from the amount of any instrument
subject to this section any charge imposed by reason of the failure to
present the instrument for payment unless there is a valid and
enforceable written contract between the holder and the owner of the
instrument pursuant to which the holder may impose a charge, and the
holder regularly imposes such charges and does not regularly reverse or
otherwise cancel them.

Sec. 6 RCW 63.29.060 and 1983 c 179 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any demand, savings, or matured time deposit with a banking or
financial organization, including a deposit that is automatically
renewable, and any funds paid toward the purchase of a share, a mutual
investment certificate, or any other interest in a banking or financial
organization is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within ((five))
three years, has:
(a) In the case of a deposit, increased or decreased its amount or
presented the passbook or other similar evidence of the deposit for the
crediting of interest;
(b) Communicated in writing with the banking or financial
organization concerning the property;
(c) Otherwise indicated an interest in the property as evidenced by
a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the
banking or financial organization;
(d) Owned other property to which subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) of
this section applies and if the banking or financial organization
communicates in writing with the owner with regard to the property that
would otherwise be presumed abandoned under this subsection at the
address to which communications regarding the other property regularly
are sent; or
(e) Had another relationship with the banking or financial
organization concerning which the owner has:
(i) In the case of a deposit, increased or decreased the amount of
the deposit or presented the passbook or other similar evidence of the
deposit for the crediting of interest;
(ii) Communicated in writing with the banking or financial
organization; or
(iii) Otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum
or other record on file prepared by an employee of the banking or
financial organization and if the banking or financial organization
communicates in writing with the owner with regard to the property that
would otherwise be abandoned under this subsection at the address to
which communications regarding the other relationship regularly are
sent.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section property
includes interest and dividends.
(3) This chapter shall not apply to deposits made by a guardian or
decedent's personal representative with a banking organization when the
deposit is subject to withdrawal only upon the order of the court in
the guardianship or estate proceeding.
(4) A holder may not impose with respect to property described in
subsection (1) of this section any charge due to dormancy or inactivity
or cease payment of interest unless:
(a) There is an enforceable written contract between the holder and
the owner of the property pursuant to which the holder may impose a
charge or cease payment of interest;
(b) For property in excess of ten dollars, the holder, no more than
three months before the initial imposition of those charges or
cessation of interest, has given written notice to the owner of the
amount of those charges at the last known address of the owner stating
that those charges will be imposed or that interest will cease, but the
notice provided in this section need not be given with respect to
charges imposed or interest ceased before June 30, 1983; and
(c) The holder regularly imposes such charges or ceases payment of
interest and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel them or
retroactively credit interest with respect to the property.
(5) Any property described in subsection (1) of this section that
is automatically renewable is matured for purposes of subsection (1) of
this section upon the expiration of its initial time period, or after
one year if the initial period is less than one year, but in the case
of any renewal to which the owner consents at or about the time of
renewal by communicating in writing with the banking or financial
organization or otherwise indicating consent as evidenced by a
memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the
organization, the property is matured upon the expiration of the last
time period for which consent was given. If, at the time provided for
delivery in RCW 63.29.190, a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of
interest would result from the delivery of the property, the time for
delivery is extended until the time when no penalty or forfeiture would
result.

Sec. 7 RCW 63.29.100 and 1996 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (5) of this section,
stock or other intangible ownership interest in a business association,
the existence of which is evidenced by records available to the
association, is presumed abandoned and, with respect to the interest,
the association is the holder, if a dividend, distribution, or other
sum payable as a result of the interest has remained unclaimed by the
owner for ((five)) three years and the owner within ((five)) three
years has not:
(a) Communicated in writing with the association regarding the
interest or a dividend, distribution, or other sum payable as a result
of the interest; or
(b) Otherwise communicated with the association regarding the
interest or a dividend, distribution, or other sum payable as a result
of the interest, as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file
with the association prepared by an employee of the association.
(2) At the expiration of a ((five-year)) three-year period
following the failure of the owner to claim a dividend, distribution,
or other sum payable to the owner as a result of the interest, the
interest is not presumed abandoned unless there have been at least five
dividends, distributions, or other sums paid during the period, none of
which has been claimed by the owner. If five dividends, distributions,
or other sums are paid during the ((five-year)) three-year period, the
period leading to a presumption of abandonment commences on the date
payment of the first such unclaimed dividend, distribution, or other
sum became due and payable. If five dividends, distributions, or other
sums are not paid during the presumptive period, the period continues
to run until there have been five dividends, distributions, or other
sums that have not been claimed by the owner.
(3) The running of the ((five-year)) three-year period of
abandonment ceases immediately upon the occurrence of a communication
referred to in subsection (1) of this section. If any future dividend,
distribution, or other sum payable to the owner as a result of the
interest is subsequently not claimed by the owner, a new period of
abandonment commences and relates back to the time a subsequent
dividend, distribution, or other sum became due and payable.
(4) At the time any interest is presumed abandoned under this
section, any dividend, distribution, or other sum then held for or
owing to the owner as a result of the interest, and not previously
presumed abandoned, is presumed abandoned.
(5) This chapter shall not apply to any stock or other intangible
ownership interest enrolled in a plan that provides for the automatic
reinvestment of dividends, distributions, or other sums payable as a
result of the interest unless:
(a) The records available to the administrator of the plan show,
with respect to any intangible ownership interest not enrolled in the
reinvestment plan, that the owner has not within ((five)) three years
communicated in any manner described in subsection (1) of this section;
or
(b) ((Five)) Three years have elapsed since the location of the
owner became unknown to the association, as evidenced by the return of
official shareholder notifications or communications by the postal
service as undeliverable, and the owner has not within those ((five))
three years communicated in any manner described in subsection (1) of
this section. The ((five-year)) three-year period from the return of
official shareholder notifications or communications shall commence
from the earlier of the return of the second such mailing or the date
the holder discontinues mailings to the shareholder.

Sec. 8 RCW 63.29.120 and 1983 c 179 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Intangible property and any income or increment derived
therefrom held in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of another
person is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within ((five)) three
years after it has become payable or distributable, has increased or
decreased the principal, accepted payment of principal or income,
communicated concerning the property, or otherwise indicated an
interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared
by the fiduciary.
(2) Funds in an individual retirement account or a retirement plan
for self-employed individuals or similar account or plan established
pursuant to the internal revenue laws of the United States are not
payable or distributable within the meaning of subsection (1) of this
section unless, under the terms of the account or plan, distribution of
all or part of the funds would then be mandatory.
(3) For the purpose of this section, a person who holds property as
an agent for a business association is deemed to hold the property in
a fiduciary capacity for that business association alone, unless the
agreement between him and the business association provides otherwise.
(4) For the purposes of this chapter, a person who is deemed to
hold property in a fiduciary capacity for a business association alone
is the holder of the property only insofar as the interest of the
business association in the property is concerned, and the business
association is the holder of the property insofar as the interest of
any other person in the property is concerned.

Sec. 9 RCW 63.29.140 and 1983 c 179 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A gift certificate or a credit memo issued in the ordinary
course of an issuer's business which remains unclaimed by the owner for
more than ((five)) three years after becoming payable or distributable
is presumed abandoned.
(2) In the case of a gift certificate, the amount presumed
abandoned is the price paid by the purchaser for the gift certificate.
In the case of a credit memo, the amount presumed abandoned is the
amount credited to the recipient of the memo.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.08.0293 and 1988 c 103 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
food products for human consumption.
"Food products" include cereals and cereal products, oleomargarine,
meat and meat products including livestock sold for personal
consumption, fish and fish products, eggs and egg products, vegetables
and vegetable products, fruit and fruit products, spices and salt,
sugar and sugar products, coffee and coffee substitutes, tea, cocoa and
cocoa products.
"Food products" include milk and milk products, milk shakes, malted
milks, and any other similar type beverages which are composed at least
in part of milk or a milk product and which require the use of milk or
a milk product in their preparation.
"Food products" include all fruit juices, vegetable juices, and
other beverages except bottled water, spirituous, malt or vinous
liquors or carbonated beverages, whether liquid or frozen.
"Food products" do not include medicines and preparations in
liquid, powdered, granular, tablet, capsule, lozenge, and pill form
sold as dietary supplements or adjuncts.
"Food products" do not include candy. "Candy" means a preparation
of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners in
combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or other ingredients or
flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or pieces. "Candy" does not
include any preparation containing flour or any product that requires
refrigeration.
(2) The exemption of "food products" provided for in subsection (1)
of this section shall not apply: (a) When the food products are
ordinarily sold for immediate consumption on or near a location at
which parking facilities are provided primarily for the use of patrons
in consuming the products purchased at the location, even though such
products are sold on a "takeout" or "to go" order and are actually
packaged or wrapped and taken from the premises of the retailer, or (b)
when the food products are sold for consumption within a place, the
entrance to which is subject to an admission charge, except for
national and state parks and monuments, or (c) to a food product, when
sold by the retail vendor, which by law must be handled on the vendor's
premises by a person with a food and beverage service worker's permit
under RCW 69.06.010, including but not be limited to sandwiches
prepared or chicken cooked on the premises, deli trays, home-delivered
pizzas or meals, and salad bars but excluding:
(i) Raw meat prepared by persons who slaughter animals, including
fish and fowl, or dress or wrap slaughtered raw meat such as fish
mongers, butchers, or meat wrappers;
(ii) Meat and cheese sliced and/or wrapped, in any quantity
determined by the buyer, sold by vendors such as meat markets,
delicatessens, and grocery stores;
(iii) Bakeries which only sell baked goods;
(iv) Combination bakery businesses, as prescribed by rule of the
department, to the extent that sales of baked goods are separately
accounted for and the baked goods claimed for exemption are not sold as
part of meals or with beverages in unsealed containers; or
(v) Bulk food products sold from bins or barrels, including but not
limited to flour, fruits, vegetables, sugar, salt, ((candy,)) chips,
and cocoa.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food products" provided in this section shall apply to
food products which are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6); or
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, disabled persons, or
low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under
chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail sale
of food products is subject to sales tax under RCW 82.08.020 if the
food products are sold through a vending machine, and in this case the
selling price for purposes of RCW 82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of
the gross receipts.
This subsection does not apply to hot prepared food products, other
than food products which are heated after they have been dispensed from
the vending machine.
For tax collected under this subsection, the requirements that the
tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be stated as
a separate item are waived.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.08.0293 and 2003 c . . . s 10 (section 10 of this
act) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
food ((products for human consumption.
"Food products" include cereals and cereal products, oleomargarine,
meat and meat products including livestock sold for personal
consumption, fish and fish products, eggs and egg products, vegetables
and vegetable products, fruit and fruit products, spices and salt,
sugar and sugar products, coffee and coffee substitutes, tea, cocoa and
cocoa products.
"Food products" include milk and milk products, milk shakes, malted
milks, and any other similar type beverages which are composed at least
in part of milk or a milk product and which require the use of milk or
a milk product in their preparation.
"Food products" include all fruit juices, vegetable juices, and
other beverages except bottled water, spirituous, malt or vinous
liquors or carbonated beverages, whether liquid or frozen.
"Food products" do not include medicines and preparations in
liquid, powdered, granular, tablet, capsule, lozenge, and pill form
sold as dietary supplements or adjuncts.
"Food products" do not include candy. "Candy" means a preparation
of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners in
combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or other ingredients or
flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or pieces. "Candy" does not
include any preparation containing flour or any product that requires
refrigeration)) and food ingredients. "Food and food ingredients"
means substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen,
dried, or dehydrated form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by
humans and are consumed for their taste or nutritional value. "Food
and food ingredients" does not include:
(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable
for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of
alcohol by volume; and
(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe
tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.
(2) The exemption of "food ((products)) and food ingredients"
provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall not apply((: (a)
When the food products are ordinarily sold for immediate consumption on
or near a location at which parking facilities are provided primarily
for the use of patrons in consuming the products purchased at the
location, even though such products are sold on a "takeout" or "to go"
order and are actually packaged or wrapped and taken from the premises
of the retailer, or (b) when the food products are sold for consumption
within a place, the entrance to which is subject to an admission
charge, except for national and state parks and monuments, or (c) to a
food product, when sold by the retail vendor, which by law must be
handled on the vendor's premises by a person with a food and beverage
service worker's permit under RCW 69.06.010, including but not be
limited to sandwiches prepared or chicken cooked on the premises, deli
trays, home-delivered pizzas or meals, and salad bars but excluding:
(i) Raw meat prepared by persons who slaughter animals, including
fish and fowl, or dress or wrap slaughtered raw meat such as fish
mongers, butchers, or meat wrappers;
(ii) Meat and cheese sliced and/or wrapped, in any quantity
determined by the buyer, sold by vendors such as meat markets,
delicatessens, and grocery stores;
(iii) Bakeries which only sell baked goods;
(iv) Combination bakery businesses, as prescribed by rule of the
department, to the extent that sales of baked goods are separately
accounted for and the baked goods claimed for exemption are not sold as
part of meals or with beverages in unsealed containers; or
(v) Bulk food products sold from bins or barrels, including but not
limited to flour, fruits, vegetables, sugar, salt, chips, and cocoa))
to prepared food, soft drinks, dietary supplements, or candy.
(a) "Prepared food" means:
(i) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;
(ii) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item; or
(iii) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or
straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food.
(b) "Prepared food" in (a)(ii) of this subsection, does not include
food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller and raw
eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal foods
requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the federal food
and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of the food code,
published by the food and drug administration, as amended or renumbered
as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness; or bakery
items, including bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants,
pastries, donuts, danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars,
cookies, or tortillas.
(c) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural
or artificial sweeteners. "Soft drinks" do not include beverages that
contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk
substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice
by volume.
(d) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that:
(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients: A
vitamin; a mineral; an herb or other botanical; an amino acid; a
dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by
increasing the total dietary intake; or a concentrate, metabolite,
constituent, extract, or combination of any ingredient described in
this subsection; and is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule,
powder, softgel, gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for
ingestion in such form, is not represented as conventional food and is
not represented for use as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and
(ii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as
of January 1, 2003.
(e) "Candy" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural
or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts,
or other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or
pieces. "Candy" does not include any preparation containing flour or
any product that requires refrigeration.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food ((products)) and food ingredients" provided in this
section shall apply to food ((products)) and food ingredients which are
furnished, prepared, or served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6); or
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, disabled persons, or
low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under
chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.
(4)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail
sale of food ((products)) and food ingredients is subject to sales tax
under RCW 82.08.020 if the food ((products)) and food ingredients are
sold through a vending machine, and in this case the selling price for
purposes of RCW 82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.
(b) This subsection does not apply to hot prepared food
((products)) and food ingredients, other than food ((products)) and
food ingredients which are heated after they have been dispensed from
the vending machine.
(c) For tax collected under this subsection, the requirements that
the tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be
stated as a separate item are waived.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.12.0293 and 1988 c 103 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of food products for human consumption.
"Food products" include cereals and cereal products, oleomargarine,
meat and meat products including livestock sold for personal
consumption, fish and fish products, eggs and egg products, vegetables
and vegetable products, fruit and fruit products, spices and salt,
sugar and sugar products, coffee and coffee substitutes, tea, cocoa and
cocoa products.
"Food products" include milk and milk products, milk shakes, malted
milks, and any other similar type beverages which are composed at least
in part of milk or a milk product and which require the use of milk or
a milk product in their preparation.
"Food products" include all fruit juices, vegetable juices, and
other beverages except bottled water, spirituous, malt or vinous
liquors or carbonated beverages, whether liquid or frozen.
"Food products" do not include medicines and preparations in
liquid, powdered, granular, tablet, capsule, lozenge, and pill form
sold as dietary supplements or adjuncts.
"Food products" do not include candy. "Candy" means a preparation
of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners in
combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or other ingredients or
flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or pieces. "Candy" does not
include any preparation containing flour or any product that requires
refrigeration.
(2) The exemption of "food products" provided for in subsection (1)
of this section shall not apply: (a) When the food products are
ordinarily sold for immediate consumption on or near a location at
which parking facilities are provided primarily for the use of patrons
in consuming the products purchased at the location, even though such
products are sold on a "takeout" or "to go" order and are actually
packaged or wrapped and taken from the premises of the retailer, or (b)
when the food products are sold for consumption within a place, the
entrance to which is subject to an admission charge, except for
national and state parks and monuments, or (c) to a food product, when
sold by the retail vendor, which by law must be handled on the vendor's
premises by a person with a food and beverage service worker's permit
under RCW 69.06.010, including but not be limited to sandwiches
prepared or chicken cooked on the premises, deli trays, home-delivered
pizzas or meals, and salad bars but excluding:
(i) Raw meat prepared by persons who slaughter animals, including
fish and fowl, or dress or wrap slaughtered raw meat such as fish
mongers, butchers, or meat wrappers;
(ii) Meat and cheese sliced and/or wrapped, in any quantity
determined by the buyer, sold by vendors such as meat markets,
delicatessens, and grocery stores;
(iii) Bakeries which only sell baked goods;
(iv) Combination bakery businesses, as prescribed by rule of the
department, to the extent that sales of baked goods are separately
accounted for and the baked goods claimed for exemption are not sold as
part of meals or with beverages in unsealed containers; or
(v) Bulk food products sold from bins or barrels, including but not
limited to flour, fruits, vegetables, sugar, salt, ((candy,)) chips,
and cocoa.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food products" provided in this section shall apply to
food products which are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6); or
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, disabled persons, or
low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under
chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.12.0293 and 2003 c . . . s 12 (section 12 of this
act) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of food ((products)) and food ingredients for human
consumption. "Food and food ingredients" has the same meaning as in
RCW 82.08.0293.
(("Food products" include cereals and cereal products,
oleomargarine, meat and meat products including livestock sold for
personal consumption, fish and fish products, eggs and egg products,
vegetables and vegetable products, fruit and fruit products, spices and
salt, sugar and sugar products, coffee and coffee substitutes, tea,
cocoa and cocoa products.
"Food products" include milk and milk products, milk shakes, malted
milks, and any other similar type beverages which are composed at least
in part of milk or a milk product and which require the use of milk or
a milk product in their preparation.
"Food products" include all fruit juices, vegetable juices, and
other beverages except bottled water, spirituous, malt or vinous
liquors or carbonated beverages, whether liquid or frozen.
"Food products" do not include medicines and preparations in
liquid, powdered, granular, tablet, capsule, lozenge, and pill form
sold as dietary supplements or adjuncts.
"Food products" do not include candy. "Candy" means a preparation
of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners in
combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or other ingredients or
flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or pieces. "Candy" does not
include any preparation containing flour or any product that requires
refrigeration.))
(2) The exemption of "food ((products)) and food ingredients"
provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall not apply((: (a)
When the food products are ordinarily sold for immediate consumption on
or near a location at which parking facilities are provided primarily
for the use of patrons in consuming the products purchased at the
location, even though such products are sold on a "takeout" or "to go"
order and are actually packaged or wrapped and taken from the premises
of the retailer, or (b) when the food products are sold for consumption
within a place, the entrance to which is subject to an admission
charge, except for national and state parks and monuments, or (c) to a
food product, when sold by the retail vendor, which by law must be
handled on the vendor's premises by a person with a food and beverage
service worker's permit under RCW 69.06.010, including but not be
limited to sandwiches prepared or chicken cooked on the premises, deli
trays, home-delivered pizzas or meals, and salad bars but excluding:
(i) Raw meat prepared by persons who slaughter animals, including
fish and fowl, or dress or wrap slaughtered raw meat such as fish
mongers, butchers, or meat wrappers;
(ii) Meat and cheese sliced and/or wrapped, in any quantity
determined by the buyer, sold by vendors such as meat markets,
delicatessens, and grocery stores;
(iii) Bakeries which only sell baked goods;
(iv) Combination bakery businesses, as prescribed by rule of the
department, to the extent that sales of baked goods are separately
accounted for and the baked goods claimed for exemption are not sold as
part of meals or with beverages in unsealed containers; or
(v) Bulk food products sold from bins or barrels, including but not
limited to flour, fruits, vegetables, sugar, salt, chips, and cocoa))
to prepared food, soft drinks, or dietary supplements. "Prepared
food," "soft drinks," "dietary supplements," and "candy" have the same
meanings as in RCW 82.08.0293.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food ((products)) and food ingredients" provided in this
section shall apply to food ((products)) and food ingredients which are
furnished, prepared, or served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6); or
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, disabled persons, or
low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under
chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.

Sec. 14 RCW 82.08.150 and 1998 c 126 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each retail
sale of spirits, or strong beer in the original package at the rate of
fifteen percent of the selling price. The tax imposed in this
subsection shall apply to all such sales including sales by the
Washington state liquor stores and agencies, but excluding sales to
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(2) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each sale of
spirits, or strong beer in the original package at the rate of ten
percent of the selling price on sales by Washington state liquor stores
and agencies to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(3) There is levied and shall be collected an additional tax upon
each retail sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of one
dollar and seventy-two cents per liter. The additional tax imposed in
this subsection shall apply to all such sales including sales by
Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(4) An additional tax is imposed equal to fourteen percent
multiplied by the taxes payable under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of
this section.
(5) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of seven cents per liter. The
additional tax imposed in this subsection shall apply to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and
including sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(6)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in
the original package at the rate of one and seven-tenths percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, two and six-tenths percent of the
selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, and
three and four-tenths of the selling price thereafter. This additional
tax applies to all such sales including sales by Washington state
liquor stores and agencies, but excluding sales to spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant licensees.
(b) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in the
original package at the rate of one and one-tenth percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, one and seven-tenths percent of
the selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and two and three-tenths of the selling price thereafter. This
additional tax applies to all such sales to spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant licensees.
(c) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of twenty cents per liter through
June 30, 1995, thirty cents per liter for the period July 1, 1995,
through June 30, 1997, and forty-one cents per liter thereafter. This
additional tax applies to all such sales including sales by Washington
state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant licensees.
(d) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection shall be deposited in the health services account
created under RCW 43.72.900 by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(7)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in
the original package at the rate of three and nine-tenths percent of
the selling price. This additional tax applies to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, but
excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(b) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in the
original package at the rate of two and six-tenths percent of the
selling price. This additional tax applies to all such sales to
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(c) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of forty-six cents per liter. This
additional tax applies to all such sales including sales by Washington
state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant licensees.
(d) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection shall be deposited in the student achievement
fund.
(8) The tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
spirits or strong beer in the original package.
(((8))) (9) The taxes imposed in this section shall be paid by the
buyer to the seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the
full amount of the tax payable in respect to each taxable sale under
this section. The taxes required by this section to be collected by
the seller shall be stated separately from the selling price and for
purposes of determining the tax due from the buyer to the seller, it
shall be conclusively presumed that the selling price quoted in any
price list does not include the taxes imposed by this section.
(((9))) (10) As used in this section, the terms, "spirits((,"
"strong beer,))" and "package" shall have the meaning ascribed to them
in chapter 66.04 RCW.

Sec. 15 RCW 82.32.090 and 2000 c 229 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If payment of any tax due on a return to be filed by a taxpayer
is not received by the department of revenue by the due date, there
shall be assessed a penalty of five percent of the amount of the tax;
and if the tax is not received on or before the last day of the month
following the due date, there shall be assessed a total penalty of
((ten)) fifteen percent of the amount of the tax; and if the tax is not
received on or before the last day of the second month following the
due date, there shall be assessed a total penalty of ((twenty)) twenty-five percent of the amount of the tax. No penalty so added shall be
less than five dollars.
(2) If payment of any tax assessed by the department of revenue is
not received by the department by the due date specified in the notice,
or any extension thereof, the department shall add a penalty of ten
percent of the amount of the additional tax found due. No penalty so
added shall be less than five dollars.
(3) If a warrant be issued by the department of revenue for the
collection of taxes, increases, and penalties, there shall be added
thereto a penalty of five percent of the amount of the tax, but not
less than ten dollars.
(4) If upon any examination of any returns or other information,
the department finds that a taxpayer has collected but not remitted
retail sales taxes due, the department shall add a penalty of twenty-five percent of the amount of the retail sales tax collected but not
remitted. No penalty added shall be less than ten dollars.
(5) If the department finds that a taxpayer has substantially
underpaid the tax due, the department shall add a penalty of fifteen
percent of the underpaid amount. No penalty added shall be less than
ten dollars. "Substantially underpaid" means that the taxpayer paid
less than ninety percent of the taxes found to be due.
(6) If the department finds that all or any part of a deficiency
resulted from the disregard of specific written instructions as to
reporting or tax liabilities, the department shall add a penalty of
((ten)) fifteen percent of the amount of the additional tax found due
because of the failure to follow the instructions. A taxpayer
disregards specific written instructions when the department of revenue
has informed the taxpayer in writing of the taxpayer's tax obligations
and the taxpayer fails to act in accordance with those instructions
unless the department has not issued final instructions because the
matter is under appeal pursuant to this chapter or departmental
regulations. The department shall not assess the penalty under this
section upon any taxpayer who has made a good faith effort to comply
with the specific written instructions provided by the department to
that taxpayer. Specific written instructions may be given as a part of
a tax assessment, audit, determination, or closing agreement, provided
that such specific written instructions shall apply only to the
taxpayer addressed or referenced on such documents. ((Any specific
written instructions by the department of revenue shall be clearly
identified as such and shall inform the taxpayer that failure to follow
the instructions may subject the taxpayer to the penalties imposed by
this subsection.
(5))) (7) If the department finds that all or any part of the
deficiency resulted from an intent to evade the tax payable hereunder,
a further penalty of fifty percent of the additional tax found to be
due shall be added.
(((6))) (8) The aggregate of penalties imposed under subsections
(1), (2), and (3) of this section shall not exceed ((thirty-five))
forty percent of the tax due, or twenty dollars, whichever is greater.
This subsection does not prohibit or restrict the application of other
penalties authorized by law.
(((7))) (9) The department of revenue may not impose:
(a) Both the evasion penalty and the penalty for disregarding
specific written instructions on the same tax found to be due;
(b) Both the evasion penalty and the failure to remit retail sales
tax penalty on the same tax found to be due;
(c) Both the evasion penalty and the substantial underpayment
penalty on the same tax found to be due;
(d) Both the substantial underpayment penalty and the failure to
remit retail sales tax penalty on the same tax found to be due.
(((8))) (10) For the purposes of this section, "return" means any
document a person is required by the state of Washington to file to
satisfy or establish a tax or fee obligation that is administered or
collected by the department of revenue, and that has a statutorily
defined due date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The changes in this act are intended to provide dedicated
revenue sources for the student achievement fund and health services
account. Since it is not practical to determine precisely the revenues
derived from some of these changes, portions of sales tax revenue is
dedicated in lieu thereof.
(2)(a) During the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, one and three one-hundredths of one percent of all revenue from the tax imposed in RCW
82.08.020(1) shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(b) During the 2005-07 fiscal biennium and thereafter, seven
hundred thirty-eight one-thousandths of one percent of all revenue from
the tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020(1) shall be deposited in the student
achievement fund.
(3) Twenty-six one-hundredths of one percent of all revenue from
the tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020(1) shall be deposited in the health
services account.
(4) On or before January 1st of each year, the department of
revenue shall provide the legislature with an updated estimate of the
percentages of sales tax revenue attributable as dedicated revenue
under this section. The updated estimates are not effective until
adopted by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 43.135
RCW to read as follows:
RCW 43.135.035(4) does not apply to section 16 of this act.

Sec. 18 RCW 82.08.064 and 2000 c 104 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sales and use tax rate change under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW shall be imposed (1) no sooner than seventy-five days after
its enactment into law and (2) only on the first day of January, April,
July, or October.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the tax rate
changes in chapter ..., Laws of 2003 (this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 RCW 48.32.145 (Credit against premium tax
for assessments paid pursuant to RCW 48.32.060(1)(c)) and 1997 c 300 s
1, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 901, 1977 ex.s. c 183 s 1, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c
109 s 11 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The amendatory changes in sections 11 and
13 of this act, to RCW 82.08.0293 and 82.12.0293, are intended to
supersede any other acts that amend the same sections during the 2003
legislative session. The rule of construction in RCW 1.12.025 does not
apply to multiple amendments to these sections during the 2003
legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Section 15 of this act applies to all
penalties added after July 1, 2003, regardless of the due date of the
taxes subject to the penalty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 (1) Sections 1 through 3, 10, 12, and 14
through 21 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of
the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government
and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2003.
(2) Sections 11 and 13 of this act take effect January 1, 2004.
(3) Sections 4 through 9 of this act take effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---