BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 63.29.020 and 1992 c 122 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, all intangible
property, including any income or increment derived therefrom, less any
lawful charges, that is held, issued, or owing in the ordinary course
of the holder's business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for
more than ((five)) three years after it became payable or distributable
is presumed abandoned.
(2) Property, with the exception of unredeemed Washington state
lottery tickets and unpresented winning parimutuel tickets, is payable
and distributable for the purpose of this chapter notwithstanding the
owner's failure to make demand or to present any instrument or document
required to receive payment.
(3) This chapter does not apply to claims drafts issued by
insurance companies representing offers to settle claims unliquidated
in amount or settled by subsequent drafts or other means.
(4) This chapter does not apply to property covered by chapter
63.26 RCW.
(5) This chapter does not apply to used clothing, umbrellas, bags,
luggage, or other used personal effects if such property is disposed of
by the holder as follows:
(a) In the case of personal effects of negligible value, the
property is destroyed; or
(b) The property is donated to a bona fide charity.

Sec. 2 RCW 63.29.050 and 1983 c 179 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any sum payable on a check, draft, or similar instrument,
except those subject to RCW 63.29.040, on which a banking or financial
organization is directly liable, including a cashier's check and a
certified check, which has been outstanding for more than ((five))
three years after it was payable or after its issuance if payable on
demand, is presumed abandoned, unless the owner, within ((five)) three
years, has communicated in writing with the banking or financial
organization concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as
evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an
employee thereof.
(2) A holder may not deduct from the amount of any instrument
subject to this section any charge imposed by reason of the failure to
present the instrument for payment unless there is a valid and
enforceable written contract between the holder and the owner of the
instrument pursuant to which the holder may impose a charge, and the
holder regularly imposes such charges and does not regularly reverse or
otherwise cancel them.

Sec. 3 RCW 63.29.060 and 1983 c 179 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any demand, savings, or matured time deposit with a banking or
financial organization, including a deposit that is automatically
renewable, and any funds paid toward the purchase of a share, a mutual
investment certificate, or any other interest in a banking or financial
organization is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within ((five))
three years, has:
(a) In the case of a deposit, increased or decreased its amount or
presented the passbook or other similar evidence of the deposit for the
crediting of interest;
(b) Communicated in writing with the banking or financial
organization concerning the property;
(c) Otherwise indicated an interest in the property as evidenced by
a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the
banking or financial organization;
(d) Owned other property to which subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) of
this section applies and if the banking or financial organization
communicates in writing with the owner with regard to the property that
would otherwise be presumed abandoned under this subsection at the
address to which communications regarding the other property regularly
are sent; or
(e) Had another relationship with the banking or financial
organization concerning which the owner has:
(i) In the case of a deposit, increased or decreased the amount of
the deposit or presented the passbook or other similar evidence of the
deposit for the crediting of interest;
(ii) Communicated in writing with the banking or financial
organization; or
(iii) Otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum
or other record on file prepared by an employee of the banking or
financial organization and if the banking or financial organization
communicates in writing with the owner with regard to the property that
would otherwise be abandoned under this subsection at the address to
which communications regarding the other relationship regularly are
sent.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section property
includes interest and dividends.
(3) This chapter shall not apply to deposits made by a guardian or
decedent's personal representative with a banking organization when the
deposit is subject to withdrawal only upon the order of the court in
the guardianship or estate proceeding.
(4) A holder may not impose with respect to property described in
subsection (1) of this section any charge due to dormancy or inactivity
or cease payment of interest unless:
(a) There is an enforceable written contract between the holder and
the owner of the property pursuant to which the holder may impose a
charge or cease payment of interest;
(b) For property in excess of ten dollars, the holder, no more than
three months before the initial imposition of those charges or
cessation of interest, has given written notice to the owner of the
amount of those charges at the last known address of the owner stating
that those charges will be imposed or that interest will cease, but the
notice provided in this section need not be given with respect to
charges imposed or interest ceased before June 30, 1983; and
(c) The holder regularly imposes such charges or ceases payment of
interest and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel them or
retroactively credit interest with respect to the property.
(5) Any property described in subsection (1) of this section that
is automatically renewable is matured for purposes of subsection (1) of
this section upon the expiration of its initial time period, or after
one year if the initial period is less than one year, but in the case
of any renewal to which the owner consents at or about the time of
renewal by communicating in writing with the banking or financial
organization or otherwise indicating consent as evidenced by a
memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the
organization, the property is matured upon the expiration of the last
time period for which consent was given. If, at the time provided for
delivery in RCW 63.29.190, a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of
interest would result from the delivery of the property, the time for
delivery is extended until the time when no penalty or forfeiture would
result.

Sec. 4 RCW 63.29.070 and 1983 c 179 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Funds held or owing under any life or endowment insurance
policy or annuity contract that has matured or terminated are presumed
abandoned if unclaimed for more than ((five)) three years after the
funds became due and payable as established from the records of the
insurance company holding or owing the funds, but property described in
subsection (3)(b) of this section is presumed abandoned if unclaimed
for more than two years.
(2) If a person other than the insured or annuitant is entitled to
the funds and an address of the person is not known to the company or
it is not definite and certain from the records of the company who is
entitled to the funds, it is presumed that the last known address of
the person entitled to the funds is the same as the last known address
of the insured or annuitant according to the records of the company.
(3) For purposes of this chapter, a life or endowment insurance
policy or annuity contract not matured by actual proof of the death of
the insured or annuitant according to the records of the company is
matured and the proceeds due and payable if:
(a) The company knows that the insured or annuitant has died; or
(b)(i) The insured has attained, or would have attained if he were
living, the limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve
is based;
(ii) The policy was in force at the time the insured attained, or
would have attained, the limiting age specified in subparagraph (i) of
this subsection; and
(iii) Neither the insured nor any other person appearing to have an
interest in the policy within the preceding two years, according to the
records of the company, has assigned, readjusted, or paid premiums on
the policy, subjected the policy to a loan, corresponded in writing
with the company concerning the policy, or otherwise indicated an
interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared
by an employee of the company.
(4) For purposes of this chapter, the application of an automatic
premium loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision contained in an
insurance policy does not prevent a policy from being matured or
terminated under subsection (1) of this section if the insured has died
or the insured or the beneficiaries of the policy otherwise have become
entitled to the proceeds thereof before the depletion of the cash
surrender value of a policy by the application of those provisions.
(5) If the laws of this state or the terms of the life insurance
policy require the company to give notice to the insured or owner that
an automatic premium loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision
has been exercised and the notice, given to an insured or owner whose
last known address according to the records of the company is in this
state, is undeliverable, the company shall make a reasonable search to
ascertain the policyholder's correct address to which the notice must
be mailed.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the company
learns of the death of the insured or annuitant and the beneficiary has
not communicated with the insurer within four months after the death,
the company shall take reasonable steps to pay the proceeds to the
beneficiary.
(7) Commencing two years after June 30, 1983, every change of
beneficiary form issued by an insurance company under any life or
endowment insurance policy or annuity contract to an insured or owner
who is a resident of this state must request the following information:
(a) The name of each beneficiary, or if a class of beneficiaries is
named, the name of each current beneficiary in the class;
(b) The address of each beneficiary; and
(c) The relationship of each beneficiary to the insured.

Sec. 5 RCW 63.29.100 and 1996 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (5) of this section,
stock or other intangible ownership interest in a business association,
the existence of which is evidenced by records available to the
association, is presumed abandoned and, with respect to the interest,
the association is the holder, if a dividend, distribution, or other
sum payable as a result of the interest has remained unclaimed by the
owner for ((five)) three years and the owner within ((five)) three
years has not:
(a) Communicated in writing with the association regarding the
interest or a dividend, distribution, or other sum payable as a result
of the interest; or
(b) Otherwise communicated with the association regarding the
interest or a dividend, distribution, or other sum payable as a result
of the interest, as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file
with the association prepared by an employee of the association.
(2) At the expiration of a ((five-year)) three-year period
following the failure of the owner to claim a dividend, distribution,
or other sum payable to the owner as a result of the interest, the
interest is not presumed abandoned unless there have been at least five
dividends, distributions, or other sums paid during the period, none of
which has been claimed by the owner. If five dividends, distributions,
or other sums are paid during the ((five-year)) three-year period, the
period leading to a presumption of abandonment commences on the date
payment of the first such unclaimed dividend, distribution, or other
sum became due and payable. If five dividends, distributions, or other
sums are not paid during the presumptive period, the period continues
to run until there have been five dividends, distributions, or other
sums that have not been claimed by the owner.
(3) The running of the ((five-year)) three-year period of
abandonment ceases immediately upon the occurrence of a communication
referred to in subsection (1) of this section. If any future dividend,
distribution, or other sum payable to the owner as a result of the
interest is subsequently not claimed by the owner, a new period of
abandonment commences and relates back to the time a subsequent
dividend, distribution, or other sum became due and payable.
(4) At the time any interest is presumed abandoned under this
section, any dividend, distribution, or other sum then held for or
owing to the owner as a result of the interest, and not previously
presumed abandoned, is presumed abandoned.
(5) This chapter shall not apply to any stock or other intangible
ownership interest enrolled in a plan that provides for the automatic
reinvestment of dividends, distributions, or other sums payable as a
result of the interest unless:
(a) The records available to the administrator of the plan show,
with respect to any intangible ownership interest not enrolled in the
reinvestment plan, that the owner has not within ((five)) three years
communicated in any manner described in subsection (1) of this section;
or
(b) ((Five)) Three years have elapsed since the location of the
owner became unknown to the association, as evidenced by the return of
official shareholder notifications or communications by the postal
service as undeliverable, and the owner has not within those ((five))
three years communicated in any manner described in subsection (1) of
this section. The ((five-year)) three-year period from the return of
official shareholder notifications or communications shall commence
from the earlier of the return of the second such mailing or the date
the holder discontinues mailings to the shareholder.

Sec. 6 RCW 63.29.120 and 1983 c 179 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Intangible property and any income or increment derived
therefrom held in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of another
person is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within ((five)) three
years after it has become payable or distributable, has increased or
decreased the principal, accepted payment of principal or income,
communicated concerning the property, or otherwise indicated an
interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared
by the fiduciary.
(2) Funds in an individual retirement account or a retirement plan
for self-employed individuals or similar account or plan established
pursuant to the internal revenue laws of the United States are not
payable or distributable within the meaning of subsection (1) of this
section unless, under the terms of the account or plan, distribution of
all or part of the funds would then be mandatory.
(3) For the purpose of this section, a person who holds property as
an agent for a business association is deemed to hold the property in
a fiduciary capacity for that business association alone, unless the
agreement between him and the business association provides otherwise.
(4) For the purposes of this chapter, a person who is deemed to
hold property in a fiduciary capacity for a business association alone
is the holder of the property only insofar as the interest of the
business association in the property is concerned, and the business
association is the holder of the property insofar as the interest of
any other person in the property is concerned.

Sec. 7 RCW 63.29.140 and 1983 c 179 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A gift certificate or a credit memo issued in the ordinary
course of an issuer's business which remains unclaimed by the owner for
more than ((five)) three years after becoming payable or distributable
is presumed abandoned.
(2) In the case of a gift certificate, the amount presumed
abandoned is the price paid by the purchaser for the gift certificate.
In the case of a credit memo, the amount presumed abandoned is the
amount credited to the recipient of the memo.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.32.045 and 1999 c 357 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, payments of the
taxes imposed under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 82.16 RCW,
along with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department,
are due monthly within ((twenty-five)) twenty days after the end of the
month in which the taxable activities occur.
(2) The department of revenue may relieve any taxpayer or class of
taxpayers from the obligation of remitting monthly and may require the
return to cover other longer reporting periods, but in no event may
returns be filed for a period greater than one year. For these
taxpayers, tax payments are due on or before the last day of the month
next succeeding the end of the period covered by the return.
(3) The department of revenue may also require verified annual
returns from any taxpayer, setting forth such additional information as
it may deem necessary to correctly determine tax liability.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
department may relieve any person of the requirement to file returns if
the following conditions are met:
(a) The person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or
gross income of the business, from all business activities taxable
under chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than twenty-eight thousand dollars per
year;
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twenty-four thousand
dollars per year; and
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to
collect.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.23B.020 and 2000 c 69 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An oil spill response tax is imposed on the privilege of
receiving crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal within
this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the navigable
waters of this state. The tax imposed in this section is levied upon
the owner of the crude oil or petroleum products immediately after
receipt of the same into the storage tanks of a marine terminal from a
waterborne vessel or barge at the rate of one cent per barrel of crude
oil or petroleum product received.
(2) In addition to the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this
section, an oil spill administration tax is imposed on the privilege of
receiving crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal within
this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the navigable
waters of this state. The tax imposed in this section is levied upon
the owner of the crude oil or petroleum products immediately after
receipt of the same into the storage tanks of a marine terminal from a
waterborne vessel or barge at the rate of four cents per barrel of
crude oil or petroleum product.
(3) The taxes imposed by this chapter shall be collected by the
marine terminal operator from the taxpayer. If any person charged with
collecting the taxes fails to bill the taxpayer for the taxes, or in
the alternative has not notified the taxpayer in writing of the
imposition of the taxes, or having collected the taxes, fails to pay
them to the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter,
whether such failure is the result of the person's own acts or the
result of acts or conditions beyond the person's control, he or she
shall, nevertheless, be personally liable to the state for the amount
of the taxes. Payment of the taxes by the owner to a marine terminal
operator shall relieve the owner from further liability for the taxes.
(4) Taxes collected under this chapter shall be held in trust until
paid to the department. Any person collecting the taxes who
appropriates or converts the taxes collected shall be guilty of a gross
misdemeanor if the money required to be collected is not available for
payment on the date payment is due. The taxes required by this chapter
to be collected shall be stated separately from other charges made by
the marine terminal operator in any invoice or other statement of
account provided to the taxpayer.
(5) If a taxpayer fails to pay the taxes imposed by this chapter to
the person charged with collection of the taxes and the person charged
with collection fails to pay the taxes to the department, the
department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the
taxpayer for collection of the taxes.
(6) The taxes shall be due from the marine terminal operator, along
with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department, within
((twenty-five)) twenty days after the end of the month in which the
taxable activity occurs.
(7) The amount of taxes, until paid by the taxpayer to the marine
terminal operator or to the department, shall constitute a debt from
the taxpayer to the marine terminal operator. Any person required to
collect the taxes under this chapter who, with intent to violate the
provisions of this chapter, fails or refuses to do so as required and
any taxpayer who refuses to pay any taxes due under this chapter, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(8) Upon prior approval of the department, the taxpayer may pay the
taxes imposed by this chapter directly to the department. The
department shall give its approval for direct payment under this
section whenever it appears, in the department's judgment, that direct
payment will enhance the administration of the taxes imposed under this
chapter. The department shall provide by rule for the issuance of a
direct payment certificate to any taxpayer qualifying for direct
payment of the taxes. Good faith acceptance of a direct payment
certificate by a terminal operator shall relieve the marine terminal
operator from any liability for the collection or payment of the taxes
imposed under this chapter.
(9) All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this
section shall be deposited into the state oil spill response account.
All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (2) of this section
shall be deposited into the oil spill prevention account.
(10) Within forty-five days after the end of each calendar quarter,
the office of financial management shall determine the balance of the
oil spill response account as of the last day of that calendar quarter.
Balance determinations by the office of financial management under this
section are final and shall not be used to challenge the validity of
any tax imposed under this chapter. The office of financial management
shall promptly notify the departments of revenue and ecology of the
account balance once a determination is made. For each subsequent
calendar quarter, the tax imposed by subsection (1) of this section
shall be imposed during the entire calendar quarter unless:
(a) Tax was imposed under subsection (1) of this section during the
immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly
balance is more than nine million dollars; or
(b) Tax was not imposed under subsection (1) of this section during
the immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent
quarterly balance is more than eight million dollars.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.27.060 and 1990 c 214 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The taxes levied by this chapter shall be due for payment monthly
and remittance therefor shall be made within ((twenty-five)) twenty
days after the end of the month in which the taxable activity occurs.
The taxpayer on or before the due date shall make out a signed return,
setting out such information as the department of revenue may require,
including the gross measure of the tax, any deductions, credits, or
exemptions claimed, and the amount of tax due for the preceding monthly
period, which amount shall be transmitted to the department along with
the return.
The department may relieve any taxpayer from the obligation of
filing a monthly return and may require the return to cover other
periods, but in no event may periodic returns be filed for a period
greater than one year. In such cases tax payments are due on or before
the last day of the month next succeeding the end of the period covered
by the return.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.04.180 and 1985 c 414 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Successor" means:
(a) Any person to whom a taxpayer quitting, selling out,
exchanging, or disposing of a business sells or otherwise conveys,
directly or indirectly, in bulk and not in the ordinary course of the
taxpayer's business, ((a major part of the materials, supplies,
merchandise, inventory, fixtures, or equipment)) more than fifty
percent of the fair market value of either the (i) tangible assets or
(ii) intangible assets of the taxpayer; or
(b) A surviving corporation of a statutory merger.
(2) Any person obligated to fulfill the terms of a contract shall
be deemed a successor to any contractor defaulting in the performance
of any contract as to which such person is a surety or guarantor.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.32.140 and 1985 c 414 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any taxpayer quits business, or sells out, exchanges,
or otherwise disposes of ((his business or his stock of goods)) more
than fifty percent of the fair market value of either its tangible or
intangible assets, any tax payable hereunder shall become immediately
due and payable, and such taxpayer shall, within ten days thereafter,
make a return and pay the tax due((; and)).
(2) Any person who becomes a successor shall ((become liable for
the full amount of the tax and)) withhold from the purchase price a sum
sufficient to pay any tax due from the taxpayer until such time as the
taxpayer shall produce a receipt from the department of revenue showing
payment in full of any tax due or a certificate that no tax is due
((and, if such)). If any tax is not paid by the taxpayer within ten
days from the date of such sale, exchange, or disposal, the successor
shall become liable for the payment of the full amount of tax((, and
the payment thereof by such)). If the fair market value of the assets
acquired by a successor is less than fifty thousand dollars, the
successor's liability for payment of the unpaid tax is limited to the
fair market value of the assets acquired from the taxpayer. The burden
of establishing the fair market value of the assets acquired is on the
successor.
(3) The payment of any tax by a successor shall, to the extent
thereof, be deemed a payment upon the purchase price((,)); and if such
payment is greater in amount than the purchase price the amount of the
difference shall become a debt due ((such)) the successor from the
taxpayer.
(4) No successor shall be liable for any tax due from the person
from whom ((he)) the successor has acquired a business or stock of
goods if ((he)) the successor gives written notice to the department of
revenue of such acquisition and no assessment is issued by the
department of revenue within six months of receipt of such notice
against the former operator of the business and a copy thereof mailed
to ((such)) the successor.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.32.090 and 2000 c 229 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If payment of any tax due on a return to be filed by a taxpayer
is not received by the department of revenue by the due date, there
shall be assessed a penalty of five percent of the amount of the tax;
and if the tax is not received on or before the last day of the month
following the due date, there shall be assessed a total penalty of
((ten)) fifteen percent of the amount of the tax under this subsection;
and if the tax is not received on or before the last day of the second
month following the due date, there shall be assessed a total penalty
of ((twenty)) twenty-five percent of the amount of the tax under this
subsection. No penalty so added shall be less than five dollars.
(2) If the department of revenue determines that any tax is due,
there shall be assessed a penalty of five percent of the amount of the
tax determined by the department to be due; and if payment of any tax
((assessed)) determined by the department ((of revenue)) to be due is
not received by the department by the due date specified in the notice,
or any extension thereof, ((the department shall add a penalty of ten
percent of the amount of the additional tax found due)) there shall be
assessed a total penalty of fifteen percent of the amount of the tax
under this subsection; and if the tax is not received on or before the
thirtieth day following the due date specified in the notice of tax
due, or any extension thereof, there shall be assessed a total penalty
of twenty-five percent of the amount of the tax under this subsection.
No penalty so added shall be less than five dollars.
(3) If a warrant be issued by the department of revenue for the
collection of taxes, increases, and penalties, there shall be added
thereto a penalty of ((five)) ten percent of the amount of the tax, but
not less than ten dollars.
(4) If the department finds that a person has engaged in any
business or performed any act upon which a tax is imposed under this
title and that person has not obtained from the department a
registration certificate as required by RCW 82.32.030, the department
shall impose a penalty of five percent of the amount of tax due from
that person for the period that the person was not registered as
required by RCW 82.32.030. The department shall not impose the penalty
under this subsection (4) if a person who has engaged in business
taxable under this title without first having registered as required by
RCW 82.32.030, prior to any notification by the department of the need
to register, obtains a registration certificate from the department.
(5) If the department finds that all or any part of a deficiency
resulted from the disregard of specific written instructions as to
reporting or tax liabilities, the department shall add a penalty of ten
percent of the amount of the additional tax found due because of the
failure to follow the instructions. A taxpayer disregards specific
written instructions when the department of revenue has informed the
taxpayer in writing of the taxpayer's tax obligations and the taxpayer
fails to act in accordance with those instructions unless the
department has not issued final instructions because the matter is
under appeal pursuant to this chapter or departmental regulations. The
department shall not assess the penalty under this section upon any
taxpayer who has made a good faith effort to comply with the specific
written instructions provided by the department to that taxpayer.
Specific written instructions may be given as a part of a tax
assessment, audit, determination, or closing agreement, provided that
such specific written instructions shall apply only to the taxpayer
addressed or referenced on such documents. Any specific written
instructions by the department of revenue shall be clearly identified
as such and shall inform the taxpayer that failure to follow the
instructions may subject the taxpayer to the penalties imposed by this
subsection.
(((5))) (6) If the department finds that all or any part of the
deficiency resulted from an intent to evade the tax payable hereunder,
a further penalty of fifty percent of the additional tax found to be
due shall be added.
(((6))) (7) The ((aggregate of)) penalties imposed under
subsections (1)((, (2), and (3))) through (4) of this section ((shall
not exceed thirty-five percent of the tax due, or twenty dollars,
whichever is greater)) can each be imposed on the same tax found to be
due. This subsection does not prohibit or restrict the application of
other penalties authorized by law.
(((7))) (8) The department of revenue may not impose both the
evasion penalty and the penalty for disregarding specific written
instructions on the same tax found to be due.
(((8))) (9) For the purposes of this section, "return" means any
document a person is required by the state of Washington to file to
satisfy or establish a tax or fee obligation that is administered or
collected by the department of revenue, and that has a statutorily
defined due date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Except as otherwise provided in this
section, section 13 of this act applies to all penalties imposed after
June 30, 2003. The five percent penalty imposed in section 13(2) of
this act applies to all assessments originally issued after June 30,
2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A promoter of a special event within the state of Washington
shall not permit a vendor to make or solicit retail sales of tangible
personal property or services at the special event unless the promoter
obtains verification that the vendor has obtained a certificate of
registration from the department.
(2) A promoter of a special event shall:
(a) Keep, in addition to the records required under RCW 82.32.070,
a record of the dates and place of each special event, and the name,
address, and registration certificate number of vendors permitted to
make or solicit retail sales of tangible personal property or services
at the special event; and
(b) Provide to the department, within twenty days of receipt of a
written request from the department, a list of vendors permitted to
make or solicit retail sales of tangible personal property or services.
The list shall be in a form and contain such information as the
department may require, and shall include the date and place of the
event, and the name, address, and registration certificate number of
each vendor.
(3) If a promoter fails to comply with the provisions of this
section, the promoter is liable for the penalties provided in this
subsection (3).
(a) If a promoter fails to comply with the provisions of subsection
(1) of this section, the department shall impose a penalty of one
hundred dollars for each vendor permitted to make or solicit retail
sales of tangible personal property or services at the special event.
(b) If a promoter fails to comply with the provisions of subsection
(2)(b) of this section, the department shall impose a penalty of:
(i) Two hundred fifty dollars if the information requested is not
received by the department within twenty days of the department's
written request; and
(ii) One hundred dollars for each vendor for whom the information
as required by subsection (2)(b) of this section is not provided to the
department.
(4) The aggregate of penalties imposed under subsection (3) of this
section may not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars for a special
event if the promoter has not previously been penalized under this
section. Under no circumstances is a promoter liable for sales tax or
business and occupation tax not remitted to the department by a vendor
at a special event.
(5) The department shall notify a promoter by mail of any penalty
imposed under this section, and the penalty shall be due within thirty
days from the date of the notice. If any penalty imposed under this
section is not received by the department by the due date, there shall
be assessed interest on the unpaid amount beginning the day following
the due date until the penalty is paid in full. The rate of interest
shall be computed on a daily basis on the amount of outstanding penalty
at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate computed
shall be adjusted annually in the same manner as provided in RCW
82.32.050(1)(c).
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Promoter" means a person who organizes, operates, or sponsors
a special event and who contracts with vendors for participation in the
special event.
(b) "Special event" means an entertainment, amusement,
recreational, educational, or marketing event, whether held on a
regular or irregular basis, at which more than one vendor makes or
solicits retail sales of tangible personal property or services. The
term includes, but is not limited to: Auto shows, recreational vehicle
shows, boat shows, home shows, garden shows, hunting and fishing shows,
stamp shows, comic book shows, sports memorabilia shows, craft shows,
art shows, antique shows, flea markets, exhibitions, festivals,
concerts, swap meets, bazaars, carnivals, athletic contests, circuses,
fairs, or other similar activities. "Special event" does not include
an event that is organized for the exclusive benefit of any nonprofit
organization as defined in RCW 82.04.3651. An event is organized for
the exclusive benefit of a nonprofit organization if all of the gross
proceeds of retail sales of all vendors at the event inure to the
benefit of the nonprofit organization on whose behalf the event is
being held. "Special event" does not include athletic contests that
involve competition between teams, when such competition consists of
more than five contests in a calendar year by at least one team at the
same facility or site.
(c) "Vendor" means a person who, at a special event, makes or
solicits retail sales of tangible personal property or services.
(7) This section does not apply to:
(a) A special event whose promoter does not charge more than two
hundred dollars for a vendor to participate in a special event;
(b) A special event whose promoter charges a percentage of sales
instead of, or in addition to, a flat charge for a vendor to
participate in a special event if the promoter, in good faith, believes
that no vendor will pay more than two hundred dollars to participate in
the special event; or
(c) A person who does not organize, operate, or sponsor a special
event, but only provides a venue, supplies, furnishings, fixtures,
equipment, or services to a promoter of a special event.

Sec. 16 RCW 82.32.020 and 1983 c 3 s 220 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
The meaning attributed in chapters 82.01 through 82.27 RCW to the
words and phrases "tax year," "taxable year," "person," "company,"
"gross proceeds of sales," "gross income of the business," "business,"
"engaging in business," "successor," "gross operating revenue," "gross
income," "taxpayer," "retail sale," and "value of products" shall apply
equally to the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) Sections 8 through 10 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect August 1, 2003.
(2) Sections 11 through 16 of this act are necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and take effect July 1, 2003.
(3) Sections 1 through 7 of this act take effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---