BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.068 and 2001 c 3 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) A portion of the proceeds of the state property tax levy shall
be distributed to school districts in the amounts and in the manner
provided in this section.
(2) The amount of the distribution to each school district shall be
based upon the average number of full-time equivalent students in the
school district during the previous school year, and shall be
calculated as follows:
(a) Out of taxes collected in calendar years 2001 through and
including 2003, an annual amount equal to one hundred forty dollars per
each full-time equivalent student in all school districts shall be
deposited in the student achievement fund to be distributed to each
school district based on one hundred forty dollars per full-time
equivalent student in the school district for each year beginning with
the school year 2001-2002 and through the end of the 2003-04 school
year.
(b) ((Out of taxes collected in calendar year 2004, an annual
amount equal to four hundred fifty dollars per full-time equivalent
student in all school districts shall be deposited in the student
achievement fund to be distributed to each school district based on
four hundred fifty dollars per full-time equivalent student for each
year beginning with the school year 2004-2005.)) In fiscal year 2006,
out of taxes collected in calendar year 2005, an annual amount equal to
one hundred forty-nine dollars per full-time equivalent student in all
school districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund to
be distributed to each school district based on one hundred forty-nine
dollars per full-time equivalent student for school year 2005-06.
(c) In fiscal year 2007, out of taxes collected in calendar year
2006, an annual amount equal to one hundred ninety-one dollars per
full-time equivalent student in all school districts shall be deposited
in the student achievement fund to be distributed to each school
district based on one hundred ninety-one dollars per full-time
equivalent student for school year 2006-07.
(d) In fiscal year 2008, out of taxes collected in calendar year
2007, an annual amount equal to two hundred thirty-two dollars per
full-time equivalent student in all school districts shall be deposited
in the student achievement fund to be distributed to each school
district based on two hundred thirty-two dollars per full-time
equivalent student for school year 2007-08. Each subsequent year
following the 2007-08 school year, the amount deposited and distributed
shall be adjusted for inflation as defined in RCW 43.135.025(((7)))
(8).
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
verify the average number of full-time equivalent students in each
school district from the previous school year to the state treasurer by
August 1st of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The student achievement fund is created in the state treasury.
Appropriations from the student achievement fund may be made for the
following purposes:
(1) Distributions to school districts based on the average number
of full-time equivalent students in the school district during the
previous school year for the purposes set forth in RCW 28A.505.210 as
follows:
(a) For the 2003-04 school year, moneys in the student achievement
fund shall be distributed on the basis of an equal amount per full-time
equivalent student as provided in RCW 84.52.068 and 43.135.045(5);
(b) For the 2004-05 school year, the legislature shall appropriate
an annual amount equal to three hundred sixteen dollars per full-time
equivalent student to the superintendent of public instruction for
distribution to each school district based on three hundred sixteen
dollars per full-time equivalent student from the sales tax established
for deposit in the student achievement fund in RCW 82.08.020 as amended
by chapter . . ., Laws of 2003 (H-2947/03) and from the lottery game
created under chapter . . . (HB 2213), Laws of 2003. If sufficient
revenue is not generated from these sources, the amount provided per
full-time equivalent student under this subsection (1)(b) shall be
reduced;
(c) For the 2005-06 school year, the legislature shall appropriate:
(i) An annual amount equal to one hundred forty-nine dollars per full-time equivalent student from the property tax as provided in RCW
84.52.068 and (ii) two hundred one dollars per full-time equivalent
student from the sales tax established for deposit in the student
achievement fund in RCW 82.08.020 as amended by chapter ..., Laws of
2003 (H-2947/03) and from the lottery game created under chapter . . .
(HB 2213), Laws of 2003. If sufficient revenue is not generated from
these sources, the amount provided per full-time equivalent student
under (c)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced;
(d) For the 2006-07 school year, the legislature shall appropriate:
(i) An annual amount equal to one hundred ninety-one dollars per full-time equivalent student from the property tax as provided in RCW
84.52.068 and (ii) two hundred nine dollars per full-time equivalent
student from the sales tax established for deposit in the student
achievement fund in RCW 82.08.020 as amended by chapter ..., Laws of
2003 (H-2947/03) and from the lottery game created under chapter. . .
(HB 2213), Laws of 2003. If sufficient revenue is not generated from
these sources, the amount provided per full-time equivalent student
under (d)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced;
(e) For the 2007-08 school year, the legislature shall appropriate:
(i) An annual amount equal to two hundred thirty-two dollars per full-time equivalent student from the property tax as provided in RCW
84.52.068 and (ii) two hundred eighteen dollars per full-time
equivalent student from the sales tax established for deposit in the
student achievement fund in RCW 82.08.020 as amended by chapter ...,
Laws of 2003 (H-2947/03) and from the lottery game created under
chapter . . . (HB 2213), Laws of 2003. If sufficient revenue is not
generated from these sources, the amount provided per full-time
equivalent student under (e)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced;
(f) Each subsequent year following the 2007-08 school year, the per
student distributions from the property tax and the sales tax shall
each be adjusted for inflation as defined in RCW 43.135.025(8);
(2) Beginning with school year 2004-05, allocations to school
districts for the better schools program, subject to any conditions,
limitations, and formulae in the omnibus operating appropriations act;
(3) Beginning with school year 2004-05, appropriations to the
higher education coordinating board and two-year and four-year
institutions of higher education for programs that increase access to
higher education, including but not limited to the Washington promise
scholarship program and high-demand enrollments, and subject to any
conditions or limitations in the omnibus operating appropriations act;
and
(4) The legislature, in the omnibus operating appropriations act,
may transfer unappropriated balances in the student achievement fund to
the general fund.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.505.210 and 2001 c 3 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((School)) For student achievement fund moneys distributed to
school districts pursuant to RCW 84.52.068 and section 2(1) of this
act, the districts shall have the authority to decide the best use of
student achievement funds to assist students in meeting and exceeding
the new, higher academic standards in each district consistent with the
provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2001.
(1) Student achievement funds shall be allocated for the following
uses:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators,
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school;
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection.
(2) Annually on or before May 1st, the school district board of
directors shall meet at the time and place designated for the purpose
of a public hearing on the proposed use of these funds to improve
student achievement for the coming year. Any person may appear or by
written submission have the opportunity to comment on the proposed plan
for the use of these funds. No later than August 31st, as a part of
the process under RCW 28A.505.060, each school district shall adopt a
plan for the use of these funds for the upcoming school year.
Annually, each school district shall provide to the citizens of their
district a public accounting of the funds made available to the
district during the previous school year under chapter 3, Laws of 2001,
how the funds were used, and the progress the district has made in
increasing student achievement, as measured by required state
assessments and other assessments deemed appropriate by the district.
Copies of this report shall be provided to the superintendent of public
instruction and to the academic achievement and accountability
commission.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.380 and 2001 c 3 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state legislature shall, at each regular session in an odd-numbered year, appropriate from the state general fund for the current
use of the common schools such amounts as needed for state support to
the common schools during the ensuing biennium as provided in this
chapter, RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.210, 28A.300.170, and
28A.500.010.
(2) The state legislature shall also, at each regular session in an
odd-numbered year, appropriate from the student achievement fund ((and
education construction fund solely for the purposes of and in
accordance with the provisions of the student achievement act during
the ensuing biennium)) as provided in RCW 84.52.068 and section 2 of
this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 67.70.240 and 2001 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
The moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:
(1) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery
tickets or shares;
(2) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account
created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260;
(3) For purposes of making deposits into the education construction
fund and student achievement fund created in RCW 43.135.045. For the
transition period from July 1, 2001, until and including June 30, 2002,
fifty percent of the moneys not otherwise obligated under this section
shall be placed in the student achievement fund and fifty percent of
these moneys shall be placed in the education construction fund. On
and after July 1, 2002, until June 30, 2004, seventy-five percent of
these moneys shall be placed in the student achievement fund and
twenty-five percent shall be placed in the education construction fund,
except for moneys generated from the game created under chapter . . .
(HB 2213), Laws of 2003 which shall be placed into the student
achievement fund. On and after July 1, 2004, all deposits not
otherwise obligated under this section shall be placed in the education
construction fund, except for moneys generated from the game created
under chapter . . . (HB 2213), Laws of 2003 which shall be placed into
the student achievement fund. However, after July 1, 2004, the
legislature may direct the transfer of lottery deposits from the
education construction fund to the state general fund in the omnibus
operating appropriations act. Moneys in the state lottery account
deposited in the education construction fund and the student
achievement fund are included in "general state revenues" under RCW
39.42.070;
(4) For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the
principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to
construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including
reasonably necessary preconstruction costs. Three million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during calendar year 1996.
During subsequent years, such distributions shall equal the prior
year's distributions increased by four percent. Distributions under
this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued for the construction
of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than twenty years
after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;
(5) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account,
created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW
43.99N.070, six million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent years,
such distribution shall equal the prior year's distributions increased
by four percent. No distribution may be made under this subsection
after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of the
bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this
subsection shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than
December 31, 2020;
(6) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and
(7) For the payment of agent compensation.
The office of financial management shall require the allotment of
all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes
in the allotments.

Sec. 6 RCW 67.70.340 and 2002 c 349 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that creating a shared game lottery
could result in less revenue being raised by the existing state lottery
ticket sales. The legislature further recognizes that the two funds
most impacted by this potential event are the student achievement fund
and the education construction account. Therefore, it is the intent of
the legislature to use some of the proceeds from the shared game
lottery to make up the difference that the potential state lottery
revenue loss would have on the student achievement fund and the
education construction account.
(2) The student achievement fund and the education construction
account are expected to collectively receive one hundred two million
dollars annually from state lottery games other than the shared game
lottery and from the lottery game created under chapter . . . (HB
2213), Laws of 2003. For fiscal year 2003 and thereafter, if the
amount of lottery revenues, other than revenues generated under the
lottery game created under chapter . . . (HB 2213), Laws of 2003,
earmarked for the student achievement fund and the education
construction account are less than one hundred two million dollars, the
commission must transfer sufficient moneys from revenues derived from
the shared game lottery into the student achievement fund and the
education construction account to bring the total revenue up to one
hundred two million dollars. The funds transferred from the shared
game lottery account under this subsection must be divided between the
student achievement fund and the education construction account in a
manner consistent with RCW 67.70.240(3).
(3) For fiscal year 2003, the commission shall transfer from
revenues derived from the shared game lottery to the violence reduction
and drug enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520 five hundred thousand
dollars exclusively for the treatment of pathological gambling as
prescribed by RCW 67.70.350.
(4) The remaining net revenues, if any, in the shared game lottery
account after the transfers shall be deposited into the general fund.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.135.045 and 2001 c 3 s 9, 2000 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1,
and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit
in the emergency reserve fund all general fund -- state revenues in
excess of the state expenditure limit for that fiscal year. Deposits
shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on projections of
state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall
make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and
thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter.
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to the student achievement fund ((hereby
created in the state treasury)) and twenty-five percent to the general
fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter.
(4) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction or, after July 1, 2004, for transfer to the state general
fund.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(5) Until June 30, 2004, funds from the student achievement fund
shall be appropriated to the superintendent of public instruction
strictly for distribution to school districts to meet the provisions
set out in the student achievement act. Allocations shall be made on
an equal per full-time equivalent student basis to each school
district.
(6) Earnings of the emergency reserve fund under RCW
43.84.092(4)(a) shall be transferred quarterly to the multimodal
transportation account, except for those earnings that are in excess of
thirty-five million dollars each fiscal year. Within thirty days
following any fiscal year in which earnings transferred to the
multimodal transportation account under this subsection did not total
thirty-five million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the emergency reserve fund an amount necessary to bring the total
deposited in the multimodal transportation account under this
subsection to thirty-five million dollars. The revenues to the
multimodal transportation account reflected in this subsection provide
ongoing support for the transportation programs of the state. However,
it is the intent of the legislature that any new long-term financial
support that may be subsequently provided for transportation programs
will be used to replace and supplant the revenues reflected in this
subsection, thereby allowing those revenues to be returned to the
purposes to which they were previously dedicated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---