BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that large regional
airports are facilities of statewide benefit that qualify as essential
public facilities as described in the growth management act. The
legislature further finds that the continued public and private use of
large regional airports provides numerous benefits to commerce and
individuals as a job maker by moving goods to and from markets, and by
fostering travel for personal, recreational, and business-related
pursuits. However beneficial to regional and statewide interests, the
large regional airports create substantial impacts to local
communities, impacts that often prove financially disadvantageous and
detrimental to the quality of life for residents in the surrounding
areas.
In recognition of the inequitable burden borne by such residents,
the legislature intends to establish a mechanism to mitigate the
impacts of large regional airports for the residents most affected by
the activities traditionally associated with those airports.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On or before October 1, 2003, the department shall establish an
aviation mitigation zone for any large regional airport located in the
state of Washington. An aviation mitigation zone shall only include
the following:
(a) Cities with a population fewer than forty thousand adjacent to
the city within which the large regional airport is located;
(b) Cities with a population fewer than ten thousand adjacent to a
city qualifying for inclusion in the mitigation zone according to the
criteria established by (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any portion of any incorporated or unincorporated area that is
within a 60 Ldn noise level contour of the large regional airport as
determined by the aircraft noise measurement methodology described in
14 C.F.R., Appendix A to Part 150 -- Noise Exposure Maps, as of the
effective date of this act.
(2)(a) For the purposes of this section, "Ldn" means yearly
day-night average sound level.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "large regional airport"
means an airport serving more than twenty scheduled jet aircraft
flights per day operated by a port district in a county with a
population greater than one million.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 84.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of establishing aviation mitigation zones in
accordance with the provisions of section 2 of this act, on or before
September 15, 2003, the department shall develop a noise exposure map
for any large regional airport meeting the criteria established by
section 2 of this act. The noise exposure map shall be prepared in
accordance with the methodology described in 14 C.F.R., Appendix A to
Part 150 -- Noise Exposure Maps, as of the effective date of this act.
The noise exposure map shall include a 60 Ldn noise level contour. The
department may use noise exposure data collected or produced by an
applicable port district when developing a noise exposure map required
by this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "Ldn" has the same meaning as
in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If any portion of a tract or parcel of real property is within
an aviation mitigation zone established under section 2 of this act,
the entire tract or parcel is exempt from port taxes.
(2) If any portion of a tract or parcel of real property is within
an aviation mitigation zone established under section 2 of this act,
the entire tract or parcel is exempt from property taxes levied for any
state purpose.
(3) The county assessor shall not require an exemption application
for properties that the assessor knows are eligible for exemption under
this section based on an aviation mitigation zone established under
section 2 of this act. However, a property owner may submit a written
request to the assessor requesting exemption under this section. After
determining whether the property is eligible for exemption under this
section, the assessor shall give written notice of denial or approval
to the property owner within thirty days of the date the request was
received. A denial may be appealed to the board of equalization of the
county in which the property is located within thirty days of the date
the denial notice is mailed.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "port taxes" means taxes
imposed by a port district that operates a large regional airport for
which an aviation mitigation zone is established under section 2 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW
to read as follows:
The levy for a taxing district in any year shall be reduced as
necessary to prevent exemptions under section 4(1) of this act from
resulting in a higher tax rate than would have occurred in the absence
of the exemptions under section 4(1) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The aviation mitigation account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for aviation mitigation
purposes within the following:
(a) Any city included wholly or partially within the aviation
mitigation zone established by section 2 of this act; and
(b) Any unincorporated territory included within the aviation
mitigation zone established by section 2 of this act.
(2) Only the director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account established by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 4 of this act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2004 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---