BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The airport impact mitigation account is created in the custody
of the state treasury. Moneys deposited in the account, including
moneys received from the port of Seattle for purposes of this section,
may be used only for airport mitigation purposes as provided in this
section. Only the director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall establish a competitive process to prioritize applications for
airport impact mitigation assistance through the account created in
subsection (1) of this section. The department shall conduct a
solicitation of project applications in the airport impact area as
defined in subsection (4) of this section. Eligible applicants include
public entities such as cities, counties, schools, parks, fire
districts, and shall include organizations eligible to apply for grants
under RCW 43.63A.125. The department of community, trade, and economic
development shall evaluate and rank applications in conjunction with
the airport impact mitigation advisory board established in subsection
(3) of this section using objective criteria developed by the
department in conjunction with the airport impact mitigation advisory
board. At a minimum, the criteria must consider: The extent to which
the applicant is impacted by the airport; and the other resources
available to the applicant to mitigate the impact, including other
mitigation funds. The director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development shall award grants annually to the extent
funds are available in the account created in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall establish the airport impact mitigation
advisory board comprised of persons in the airport impact area to
assist the director in developing criteria and ranking applications
under this section. The advisory board shall include representation of
local governments, the public in general, businesses, schools,
community services organizations, parks and recreational activities,
and others at the discretion of the director. The advisory board shall
be weighted toward those communities closest to the airport that are
more adversely impacted by airport activities.
(4) The airport impact area includes the incorporated areas of
Burien, Normandy Park, Des Moines, SeaTac, Tukwilla, Kent, and Federal
Way, and the unincorporated portion of west King county.
(5) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall report on its activities related to the account created in this
section by January 1, 2004, and each January 1st thereafter.

--- END ---