BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.112.100 and 1992 c 101 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An authority shall have and exercise all rights with respect to
the construction, acquisition, maintenance, operation, extension,
alteration, repair, control and management of high capacity
transportation system facilities that are identified in the system plan
developed pursuant to RCW 81.104.100 that any city, county, county
transportation authority, metropolitan municipal corporation, or public
transportation benefit area within the authority boundary has been
previously empowered to exercise and such powers shall not thereafter
be exercised by such agencies without the consent of the authority.
Nothing in this chapter shall restrict development, construction, or
operation of a personal rapid transit system by a city or county.
(2) If an authority has a reimbursement agreement with any public
or private utility provider for the costs associated with removal,
adjustment, protection, relocation, restoration, or replacement of
utility facilities affected by the construction, alteration, or repair
of a rail fixed guideway system as defined in RCW 81.104.015, the
authority shall make available the same terms and conditions to all
affected utilities. If there is more than one agreement, each utility
may choose the terms and conditions of any one agreement. For
purposes of this subsection, "utility facilities" include, but are not
limited to, cable television, gas, electric, and telecommunications
facilities.
(3) An authority may adopt, in whole or in part, and may complete,
modify, or terminate any planning, environmental review, or procurement
processes related to the high capacity transportation system that had
been commenced by a joint regional policy committee or a city, county,
county transportation authority, metropolitan municipality, or public
transportation benefit area prior to the formation of the authority.

--- END ---