BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.380 and 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen
State College may exempt the following students from the payment of all
or a portion of tuition fees and services and activities fees:
(1) All veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.005: PROVIDED, That such
persons are no longer entitled to federal vocational or educational
benefits conferred by virtue of their military service: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That if any such veterans have not resided in this state for
one year prior to registration, the board may exempt the student from
paying up to fifty percent of the nonresident tuition fees
differential. Such exemptions may be provided only to those persons
otherwise covered who were enrolled in universities on or before
October 1, 1977.
(2) Children of any law enforcement officer ((or)), fire fighter,
or member of the organized militia of Washington who lost his or her
life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by
any public law enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire
department in this state, or while in active state service, inactive
duty, or the service of the United States as defined in RCW 38.04.010:
PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the exemption only if they
begin their course of study at a state-supported college or university
within ten years of their graduation from high school.
(3) The spouse of any member of the organized militia of Washington
who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty
while in active state service, inactive duty, or the service of the
United States as defined in RCW 38.04.010: PROVIDED, That such person
may not receive the exemption more than seven years after the date of
the member's death or total disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 38.40 RCW
to read as follows:
If any member of the organized militia dies from disease contracted
or injury received, or is killed while in active state service,
inactive duty, or the service of the United States, a one hundred fifty
thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or
to such person, persons, trust, or organization as the member has
nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the
adjutant general. If no such designated person or persons are still
living at the time of the member's death, the member's death benefit
shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact the spouse
had been nominated by written designation, or if there is no surviving
spouse, then to the member's legal representatives. The determination
of eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with RCW
38.40.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---