BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Under the current regulatory and statutory
authority, electronic scratch ticket gaming is authorized, but has
failed to maximize revenues that are generated from this form of
entertainment because the games are not issued by the state. Current
budgetary constraints compel review of existing regulatory processes to
assure implementation of state laws in both a fiscally accountable
manner, and in a manner that protects public health, safety, and
welfare. The public health, safety, and welfare benefit by limiting
electronic scratch ticket gaming to venues that already are licensed to
conduct gaming and where the presence of minors is prohibited.
In furtherance of this purpose, the legislature declares that
electronic scratch tickets are a legal form of gambling in the state of
Washington. In addition, any electronic games approved under RCW
9.46.360 are authorized to the same extent and in the same manner as
electronic scratch tickets are owned, operated, and regulated under
this act.
The legislature finds this act will assist in job creation and
retention, and is necessary for the immediate preservation of public
health and safety and the support of state government and its existing
public institutions as it is intended to generate revenue appropriated
in the 2003-2005 biennium. The additional revenue forecasted under
this act is intended to provide for the health, education, and welfare
of the residents of the state of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.70.010 and 2002 c 349 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Cashless transaction system" means the method by which a
player obtains, transfers, and redeems game play credits. The cashless
transaction system permits a player to play the electronic scratch
system without inserting cash, including coins, tokens, or paper
currency, into, and to win game play credits from, the player terminal.
The player terminal shall not dispense cash, but shall only dispense
game play credits available to the player and game result information;
(2) "Central accounting and auditing computer system" means a
computer system or systems operated by the commission that provide a
secure means to monitor, receive, store and access data, and record
critical functions and activities of the player terminals;
(3) "Central computer" means a computer or computers that conduct
random drawings for electronic scratch ticket games and stores and
dispenses electronic scratch tickets from scratch ticket game subsets
that have been loaded into it from a manufacturing computer and are
maintained in a secure manner;
(4) "Commission" means the state lottery commission established by
this chapter;
(((2))) (5) "Director" means the director of the state lottery
established by this chapter;
(((3))) (6) "Electronic scratch ticket" means a predetermined
winning or losing outcome in electronic form. Each electronic scratch
ticket represents a chance from among the finite set of chances that
comprise an electronic scratch ticket game set;
(7) "Electronic scratch ticket game" means a scratch ticket lottery
game, together with its respective operating system or systems, that is
played in an electronic environment. A game has a specific set of
rules including: The theme and types of symbols used; the total number
of tickets in the game; the ratio or mix of winning and losing tickets;
the prize structure, including number and dollar value of each prize;
and the price of a single ticket. The game is played by use of
computer hardware and software to manufacture, store, distribute, sell,
and display scratch tickets to players. An electronic scratch ticket
game includes: The licensed systems that are connected to an
electronic central accounting and auditing computer system within the
commission's control; a cashless transaction system; player terminals
with video displays that allow players to purchase chances and obtain
game result information; a manufacturing computer that securely creates
the finite set of chances used in the scratch ticket portion of the
system; and a central computer containing an electronic accounting
system. The electronic scratch ticket game contains preexisting
scratch tickets that are dispensed in an electronic format to players
through the player terminals on an on-demand basis;
(8) "Electronic scratch ticket game set" means a finite set of
electronic scratch tickets that is based on a template that has been
designed in accordance with a specific set of rules, including the
basic requirements of game sets and subsets, governing the structure of
an electronic scratch ticket game. Based on that template, an
electronic scratch ticket game set is created in a manufacturing
computer in a secure and verifiable electronic form before the play of
an electronic scratch ticket game. Each electronic scratch ticket game
set is uniquely identifiable, by serial number or otherwise, so that it
can be distinguished from other game sets manufactured from the same
template. All electronic scratch tickets in a particular game set
shall be of the same price, not to exceed five dollars, but a single
ticket may offer more than one opportunity to win a prize on the same
wager;
(9) "Electronic scratch ticket game subset" means a defined group
of electronic scratch tickets that has been randomly selected from an
electronic scratch ticket game set and transmitted to a central
computer in a fixed order for play. Each electronic scratch ticket
game subset is uniquely identifiable from all other subsets selected
from the game set;
(10) "Game play credits" means the method of representing value
obtained from the exchange of cash or cash equivalents, or earned as a
prize, that is used to effectuate play. Game play credits may be
redeemed for cash or a cash equivalent;
(11) "Lottery" or "state lottery" means the lottery established and
operated pursuant to this chapter;
(((4))) (12) "Net win" means gross wagers received by a licensee
from the operation of an electronic scratch ticket game system less the
amount paid to players for winning wagers, the actual cost of
merchandise prizes awarded, accrual of prizes for progressive jackpot
contests, and repayment of amounts used to seed guaranteed progressive
jackpot prizes;
(13) "On-line game" means a lottery game in which a player pays a
fee to a lottery retailer and selects a combination of digits, numbers,
or symbols, type and amount of play, and receives a computer-generated
ticket with those selections, and the lottery separately draws or
selects the winning combination or combinations;
(((5))) (14) "Shared game lottery" means any lottery activity in
which the commission participates under written agreement between the
commission, on behalf of the state, and any other state or states.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.70.040 and 1994 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall have the power, and it shall be its duty:
(1) To promulgate such rules governing the establishment and
operation of a state lottery as it deems necessary and desirable in
order that such a lottery be initiated at the earliest feasible and
practicable time, and in order that such lottery produce the maximum
amount of net revenues for the state consonant with the dignity of the
state and the general welfare of the people. Such rules shall include,
but shall not be limited to, the following:
(a) The type of lottery to be conducted which may include the
selling of tickets or shares. The use of electronic or mechanical
devices or video terminals which allow for individual play against such
devices or terminals shall be prohibited. Approval of the legislature
shall be required before entering any agreement with other state
lotteries to conduct shared games;
(b) The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;
(c) The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or
shares;
(d) The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares;
(e) The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder of
winning tickets or shares which, at the director's option, may be paid
in lump sum amounts or installments over a period of years;
(f) The frequency of the drawings or selections of winning tickets
or shares. Approval of the legislature is required before conducting
any on-line game in which the drawing or selection of winning tickets
occurs more frequently than once every twenty-four hours;
(g) Without limit as to number, the type or types of locations at
which tickets or shares may be sold. Electronic scratch ticket sales
are subject to the limits and locations specified in section 8 of this
act;
(h) The method to be used in selling tickets or shares;
(i) The licensing of agents to sell or distribute tickets or
shares, except that a person under the age of eighteen shall not be
licensed as an agent;
(j) The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid to
licensed sales agents necessary to provide for the adequate
availability of tickets or shares to prospective buyers and for the
convenience of the public. Compensation to licensees of electronic
scratch tickets shall be governed by section 6 of this act;
(k) The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale
of lottery tickets or shares and from all other sources among: (i) The
payment of prizes to the holders of winning tickets or shares, which
shall not be less than forty-five percent of the gross annual revenue
from such lottery or the percent specified in section 6 of this act for
electronic scratch tickets, (ii) transfers to the lottery
administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260, and (iii) transfer to
the state's general fund. Transfers to the state general fund shall be
made in compliance with RCW 43.01.050. The apportionment of total
revenues from electronic scratch ticket sales shall be governed by
section 6 of this act;
(l) Such other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and
economical operation and administration of the lottery and for the
convenience of the purchasers of tickets or shares and the holders of
winning tickets or shares.
(2) To ensure that in each place authorized to sell lottery tickets
or shares, on the back of the ticket or share, and in any advertising
or promotion there shall be conspicuously displayed an estimate of the
probability of purchasing a winning ticket.
(3) To amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules from time to
time as it deems necessary or desirable.
(4) To advise and make recommendations to the director for the
operation and administration of the lottery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1)(a) The maximum number of player
terminals per licensed location is as follows:
(i) To the top forty gross receipt charitable or nonprofit
operations conducting bingo games, one hundred twenty-five player
terminals per licensed location;
(ii) To house-banked card rooms operating at least five house-banked card tables and to class 1 horse racing facilities, one hundred
twenty-five player terminals per licensed location;
(iii) To persons, associations, or organizations primarily engaged
in the selling of food or drink for consumption on the premises and
bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations that conduct bingo
games, or use punch boards, or pull-tabs other than those in (a)(i) of
this subsection as follows:

ANNUAL GROSS
GAMBLING RECEIPTS
MAXIMUM NUMBER OF
PLAYER TERMINALS
ALLOWED PER
LICENSED LOCATION

$0 - 200,000 4 (All licensees in this
license class shall be
guaranteed a minimum
of 4 player terminals)

$200,001 - 300,000 5

$300,001 - 400,000 6

$400,001 - 500,000 7

$500,001 - 600,000 8

$600,001 - 700,000 10

$700,001 - 800,000 12

$800,001 - 1,000,000 14

$1,000,001 - 1,250,000 16

$1,250,001 - 2,000,000 18

$2,000,001 - 2,500,000 20

$2,500,001 - 3,000,000 22

$3,000,001 and up 24

(b) For purposes of the initial allocation of player terminals
under section 5(1) (a) and (b) of this act and (a)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection, the number of available machines in each category will be
divided by the number of eligible licensees in that category, and no
licensee can be awarded more than the resulting arithmetic average in
their category.
(c) For purposes of the initial allocation of player terminals to
licensees under section 5(1)(c) of this act and (a)(iii) of this
subsection, gross gambling receipts shall be calculated and determined
by the commission using a licensee's annual gross gambling receipts for
any active years of operation in 1999 through 2002. However, licensees
who operated for partial years or less than the full four years during
this period shall have their gross gambling receipts annualized and
calculated accordingly.
(2) For purposes of player terminal allocations after the initial
January 1, 2003, allocation, the commission shall determine on January
1st of every year the total available number of player terminals to be
allocated to licensees in each category established in subsection
(1)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section in each allocation pool created in
section 5(1) of this act. The number of player terminals that may be
awarded to any applicant in that ensuing year shall be determined by
dividing the number of available player terminals in an allocation pool
by the number of qualified applicants in that pool. Each allocation
pool consists of those player terminals not allocated in previous
years, forfeited player terminals, plus additional player terminals, if
any, that become available as a result of new tribal-state compacts or
by amendments to tribal compacts. However, licensees that become
eligible for player terminals after January 1st of any given year may
be awarded player terminals by the commission only to the extent there
are player terminals available for allocation within the particular
category. Such a licensee may not receive more than the arithmetic
average of player terminals as determined by the commission on the
immediately preceding January 1st.
(3) Within each category established under subsection (1)(a)(i) and
(ii) of this section, no licensee can be awarded more than the
arithmetic average of all the applications divided into the number of
player terminals available in the allocation pool. Licensees shall be
prioritized within each category established under section 5(1) of this
act for review for new or additional player terminals under this
section based upon the effective date of their underlying gambling
license issued by the gambling commission. Electronic scratch ticket
game licensees within each category established under section 5(1) of
this act may continue to request additional player terminals subject to
the maximum number of player terminals per licensed location
established in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The maximum number of electronic scratch
ticket game player terminals shall be determined as of January 1, 2003,
for the initial allocation and January 1st of every year thereafter for
future allocations as set forth in section 4 of this act and is set at
the number authorized at any given time based upon the cumulative
number of electronic scratch ticket game player terminals authorized
under all current tribal-state class III gaming compacts in the state.
Of this maximum number, the following distribution is established:
(a) Fifteen percent of the player terminals to the top forty gross
receipt charitable or nonprofit operations conducting bingo games
licensed as of January 1, 2003, with an established maximum number of
player terminals per licensed location as set forth in section 4 of
this act;
(b) Thirty-six percent of the player terminals to house-banked card
rooms operating at least five house-banked card tables and to class I
horse racing facilities with an established maximum number of player
terminals per licensed location as set forth in section 4 of this act;
and
(c) Forty-nine percent of the player terminals to: (i) Persons,
associations, or organizations primarily engaged in the selling of food
or drink for consumption on the premises using punch boards or pull-tabs; and (ii) bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations
conducting bingo games other than those in subsection (a) of this
section, or using punch boards or pull-tabs with an established maximum
number of player terminals per licensed location as set forth in
section 4 of this act.
(2) Electronic scratch ticket licensed locations under this chapter
shall not be licensed for player terminals under more than one of the
three categories described in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The payment of prizes to the holders of
winning tickets or shares shall not be less than seventy-five percent
of the gross annual revenue from electronic scratch ticket games.
(2) The net win, less the licensee's proportionate share set forth
in subsection (4) of this section, shall be transferred into the
electronic scratch ticket account.
(3) The money in the electronic scratch ticket account shall be
used as follows:
(a) One percent of the net win shall be dedicated exclusively for
distribution to a contractee under section 9(3) of this act subject to
appropriation.
(b) Seven percent of the net win shall be dedicated exclusively for
distribution to counties and cities as follows:
(i) Four and one-half percent shall be distributed to the cities
and counties that generate revenue from electronic scratch ticket games
generated in each jurisdiction;
(ii) Two percent shall be distributed to cities that lost more than
ten percent of their unrestricted operating revenues based upon the
annual loss of revenue from the repeal of the motor vehicle excise tax.
This distribution shall be based upon the motor vehicle excise tax
revenue that a city would have received in 2001 as measured by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program adjusted to the
current fiscal year using the Initiative Measure No. 601 fiscal growth
factor. This figure shall be the revenue loss. Based upon the amount
of revenue loss adjusted for the current fiscal year, a city shall
receive additional funds that ensure it loses no more than ten percent
of its unrestricted operating revenues for fiscal year 2000, as defined
by the state auditor local government reporting system. If the level
of revenues exceed the amount necessary to make the required
distributions under this subsection (3)(b)(ii), the additional revenues
shall be distributed under (b)(iii) of this subsection. If inadequate
revenues exist to make the distributions under this subsection, the
distributions shall be reduced ratably among the qualifying cities; and
(iii) One-half percent shall be distributed as follows:
(A) Three hundred thousand dollars shall be distributed to each of
the following counties: Asotin, Columbia, Douglas, Ferry, Garfield,
Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille, Skamania, Stevens,
and Wahkiakum;
(B) Any revenues that exceed the total amount necessary to make the
distributions under (b)(iii)(A) of this subsection shall be distributed
among the same counties on a per capita basis;
(C) If there are insufficient revenues for the distributions under
(b)(iii)(A) of this subsection, the distributions to the counties shall
be reduced on a per capita basis.
(c) Thirty-two percent of the net win shall be used only for:
(i) Making deposits into the reserve account created by RCW
67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account created by RCW
67.70.260;
(ii) Making deposits into the general fund of the money not
otherwise obligated under this subsection; and
(iii) The purchase and promotion of electronic scratch ticket games
and electronic scratch ticket game-related services, including the
electronic scratch ticket central computer and central accounting and
auditing systems.
(d) Sixty percent of the net win shall remain with the individual
electronic scratch ticket licensees from which the licensee is
obligated to pay its licensing fees and other expenses, including costs
associated with owning and operating electronic scratch ticket player
terminals.
(4) The office of financial management shall require the allotment
of all expenses paid from the electronic scratch ticket account and
shall report to the ways and means committee of the senate and
appropriations committee of the house of representatives any changes in
the allotments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Play of all electronic scratch ticket
games is restricted to players who are twenty-one years of age or
older. Electronic scratch ticket licenses shall not be issued to
agents registered to sell lottery tickets in venues such as convenience
stores or other locations readily accessible to minors, but shall be
restricted to the authority granted by this chapter.
(2) Placement of player terminals for electronic scratch ticket
games shall only be allowed on premises and in areas of premises
meeting the liquor control board's requirements for barrier and signage
as contained in WAC 314-02-050(1) as it exists on the effective date of
this act and on the premises or portion of the premises where persons
under twenty-one are not permitted.
(3) Duties of employees who are under twenty-one shall comply with
the provisions of chapter 66.44 RCW and the rules adopted by the liquor
control board under that chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Electronic scratch ticket sales are
limited to bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations that conduct
bingo games, punch boards, or pull-tabs, as authorized under RCW
9.46.0311; an association or organization primarily engaged in the
selling of food and beverages for on-premise consumption that uses
punch boards, pull-tabs, or house-banked card games operating at least
five house-banked card tables as authorized under RCW 9.46.0325; and
class I horse racing facilities. An electronic scratch ticket license
may be revoked if the licensee fails to maintain a license in good
standing pursuant to RCW 9.46.070.
(2) Electronic scratch ticket game player terminals must use a
cashless transaction system. Electronic scratch ticket game player
terminals must operate off the central computer linked to a central
accounting and auditing computer system. Licensees for electronic
scratch tickets may own and operate the player terminals as long as the
equipment meets certification requirements under this chapter.
(3) The commission shall issue a license to sell or distribute
electronic scratch tickets only if the licensee has a valid license
issued under RCW 9.46.070 and is operating bingo, or using punch boards
or pull-tabs under RCW 9.46.0311, using punch boards or pull-tabs or
operating social card games of at least five house-banked card tables
under RCW 9.46.0325, or is a class I horse racing facility under
chapter 67.16 RCW. An applicant for licensee of electronic scratch
tickets must have maintained a valid license issued under RCW 9.46.070
or have been a valid class I horse racing facility for six months
consecutively preceding issuance of a license under this chapter.
(4) The commission may contract with private testing laboratories
or with a laboratory on contract with the gambling commission for
certification that electronic scratch ticket game equipment meets the
requirements of this chapter. The manufacturer has the burden of
establishing that its equipment meets certification requirements.
(5) Electronic scratch ticket licensees may lease and/or revenue-share with persons or entities, including route operators,
distributors, and manufacturers licensed by the commission to engage in
such activity. Contracts between a route operator and a licensee must
be in writing, signed by the parties, and submitted to the commission
before the installation of player terminals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The commission may enforce the
provisions of RCW 9.46.071 and 9.46.072 relative to licenses issued for
electronic scratch tickets.
(2) The commission shall require a label on each player terminal
that prominently displays the Washington problem gambling helpline
number.
(3) The department of social and health services shall contract
with a nonprofit entity incorporated in Washington state dedicated to
the provision of public awareness, education, prevention, helpline
services, treatment, professional training, counselor certification,
research, and other services necessary to address problem and
pathological gambling in Washington to implement a program that
addresses problem or pathological gambling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 There is hereby created and established a
separate account, to be known as the electronic scratch ticket account.
Such account shall be managed, maintained, and controlled by the
commission and shall consist of all net wins received from the sale of
electronic scratch tickets or shares, and all other money credited or
transferred thereto from any other fund or source pursuant to law, less
the percentage distribution to electronic scratch ticket licensees
specified in section 6(3)(d) of this act. The account shall be a
separate account outside the state treasury. No appropriation is
required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the
account, except that percentage distributions to problem gambling and
to the local jurisdictions are subject to appropriation as specified in
section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The commission shall immediately suspend
any certification of licensure issued for electronic scratch tickets if
the holder of the certificate has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for certification during the
suspension, reissuance of the certificate of licensure shall be
automatic upon the commission's receipt of a release issued by the
department of social and health services stating that the person is in
compliance with the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Information obtained by the gambling
commission pursuant to its background check investigation under RCW
9.46.070 shall be provided to the commission for each applicant for an
electronic scratch ticket license. Applicants for an electronic
scratch ticket license are subject to the background check
investigation requirements of the gambling commission under RCW
9.46.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The commission shall develop rules to
implement this act, which include, but are not limited to, rules
applicable to circumstances where pending applications within each
category established under section 5(1) of this act request more player
terminals than are arithmetically available for allocation; rules
regarding prizes over six hundred dollars; and implementation
provisions that enable the intent of the act to take effect. It is the
intent of the legislature to expeditiously implement this act and
maximize revenue through operation of electronic scratch ticket games
in limited regulated venues, which should not be hampered through the
rule-making processes. Rule making shall be expedited in order to meet
this intent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 4 through 13 of this act are each
added to chapter 67.70 RCW.

--- END ---