BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.055 and 1993 c 492 s 231 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department is authorized to establish copayment, deductible,
((or)) coinsurance, or other cost-sharing requirements for recipients
of any medical programs defined in RCW 74.09.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---