BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.12.060 and 1994 c 130 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall adopt rules as may be
necessary or appropriate for effecting the provisions of this chapter,
and not in conflict with this chapter, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the state higher education
administrative procedure act. Such rules shall include provisions
designed to make employment under the work-study program reasonably
available, to the extent of available funds, to all eligible students
in eligible post-secondary institutions in need thereof. The rules
shall include:
(1) Providing work under the state work-study program that will not
result in the displacement of employed workers or impair existing
contracts for services;
(2) Furnishing work only to a student who:
(a) Is capable, in the opinion of the eligible institution, of
maintaining good standing in such course of study while employed under
the program covered by the agreement; and
(b) Has been accepted for enrollment as at least a half-time
student at the eligible institution or, in the case of a student
already enrolled in and attending the eligible institution, is in good
standing and in at least half-time attendance there either as an
undergraduate, graduate or professional student; ((and
(c) Is not pursuing a degree in theology;))
(3) Placing priority on providing:
(a) Work opportunities for students who are residents of the state
of Washington as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013 except
resident students defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2)(((e))) (g);
(b) Job placements in fields related to each student's academic or
vocational pursuits, with an emphasis on off-campus job placements
whenever appropriate; and
(c) Off-campus community service placements;
(4) Provisions to assure that in the state institutions of higher
education, utilization of this work-study program:
(a) Shall only supplement and not supplant classified positions
under jurisdiction of chapter 41.06 RCW;
(b) That all positions established which are comparable shall be
identified to a job classification under the Washington personnel
resources board's classification plan and shall receive equal
compensation;
(c) Shall not take place in any manner that would replace
classified positions reduced due to lack of funds or work; and
(d) That work study positions shall only be established at entry
level positions of the classified service unless the overall scope and
responsibilities of the position indicate a higher level; and
(5) Provisions to encourage job placements in occupations that meet
Washington's economic development goals, especially those in
international trade and international relations. The board shall
permit appropriate job placements in other states and other countries.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.12.060 and 2002 c 354 s 224 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall adopt rules as may be
necessary or appropriate for effecting the provisions of this chapter,
and not in conflict with this chapter, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the state higher education
administrative procedure act. Such rules shall include provisions
designed to make employment under the work-study program reasonably
available, to the extent of available funds, to all eligible students
in eligible post-secondary institutions in need thereof. The rules
shall include:
(1) Providing work under the state work-study program that will not
result in the displacement of employed workers or impair existing
contracts for services;
(2) Furnishing work only to a student who:
(a) Is capable, in the opinion of the eligible institution, of
maintaining good standing in such course of study while employed under
the program covered by the agreement; and
(b) Has been accepted for enrollment as at least a half-time
student at the eligible institution or, in the case of a student
already enrolled in and attending the eligible institution, is in good
standing and in at least half-time attendance there either as an
undergraduate, graduate or professional student; ((and
(c) Is not pursuing a degree in theology;))
(3) Placing priority on providing:
(a) Work opportunities for students who are residents of the state
of Washington as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013 except
resident students defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2)(((f))) (g);
(b) Job placements in fields related to each student's academic or
vocational pursuits, with an emphasis on off-campus job placements
whenever appropriate; and
(c) Off-campus community service placements;
(4) Provisions to assure that in the state institutions of higher
education, utilization of this work-study program:
(a) Shall only supplement and not supplant classified positions
under jurisdiction of chapter 41.06 RCW;
(b) That all positions established which are comparable shall be
identified to a job classification under the director of personnel's
classification plan and shall receive equal compensation;
(c) Shall not take place in any manner that would replace
classified positions reduced due to lack of funds or work; and
(d) That work study positions shall only be established at entry
level positions of the classified service unless the overall scope and
responsibilities of the position indicate a higher level; and
(5) Provisions to encourage job placements in occupations that meet
Washington's economic development goals, especially those in
international trade and international relations. The board shall
permit appropriate job placements in other states and other countries.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.80.245 and 1999 c 159 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Recipients of the Washington scholars award or the Washington
scholars-alternate award under RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 who
choose to attend an independent college or university in this state, as
defined in subsection (((4))) (3) of this section, and recipients of
the award named after June 30, 1994, who choose to attend a public
college or university in the state may receive grants under this
section if moneys are available. The higher education coordinating
board shall distribute grants to eligible students under this section
from moneys appropriated for this purpose. The individual grants shall
not exceed, on a yearly basis, the yearly, full-time, resident,
undergraduate tuition and service and activities fees in effect at the
state-funded research universities. Grants to recipients attending an
independent institution shall be contingent upon the institution
matching on at least a dollar-for-dollar basis, either with actual
money or by a waiver of fees, the amount of the grant received by the
student from the state. The higher education coordinating board shall
establish procedures, by rule, to disburse the awards as direct grants
to the students.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall establish rules
that provide for the annual awarding of grants, if moneys are
available, to three Washington scholars per legislative district; and,
if not used by an original recipient, to the Washington scholars-alternate from the same legislative district.
Beginning with scholars selected in the year 2000, if the
recipients of grants fail to demonstrate in a timely manner that they
will enroll in a Washington institution of higher education in the fall
term of the academic year following the award of the grant or are
deemed by the higher education coordinating board to have withdrawn
from college during the first academic year following the award, then
the grant shall be considered relinquished. The higher education
coordinating board may then award any remaining grant amounts to the
Washington scholars-alternate from the same legislative district if the
grants are awarded within one calendar year of the recipient being
named a Washington scholars-alternate. Washington scholars-alternates
named as recipients of the grant must also demonstrate in a timely
manner that they will enroll in a Washington institution of higher
education during the next available term, as determined by the higher
education coordinating board. The board may accept appeals and grant
waivers to the enrollment requirements of this section based on
exceptional mitigating circumstances of individual grant recipients.
To maintain eligibility for the grants, recipients must maintain a
minimum grade point average at the college or university equivalent to
3.30. Students shall be eligible to receive a maximum of twelve
quarters or eight semesters of grants for undergraduate study and may
transfer among in-state public and independent colleges and
universities during that period and continue to receive the grant as
provided under RCW 28B.80.246. If the student's cumulative grade point
average falls below 3.30 during the first three quarters or two
semesters, that student may petition the higher education coordinating
board which shall have the authority to establish a probationary period
until such time as the student's grade point average meets required
standards.
(3) ((No grant shall be awarded to any student who is pursuing a
degree in theology.
(4))) As used in this section, "independent college or university"
means a private, nonprofit educational institution, the main campus of
which is permanently situated in the state, open to residents of the
state, providing programs of education beyond the high school level
leading at least to the baccalaureate degree, and accredited by the
northwest association of schools and colleges as of June 9, 1988, and
other institutions as may be developed that are approved by the higher
education coordinating board as meeting equivalent standards as those
institutions accredited under this section.
(((5))) (4) As used in this section, "public college or university"
means an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.101.040 and 2002 c 186 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Grants may be used by eligible participants to attend any public or
private college or university in the state of Washington that is
accredited by an accrediting association recognized by rule of the
higher education coordinating board and that has an existing unused
capacity. Grants shall not be used to attend any branch campus or
educational program established under chapter 28B.45 RCW. The
participant shall not be eligible for a grant if it will be used for
any programs that include religious worship, exercise, or instruction
((or to pursue a degree in theology)). Each participating student may
receive up to two thousand five hundred dollars per academic year, not
to exceed the student's demonstrated financial need for the course of
study. Resident students as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2)(((f))) (g)
are not eligible for grants under this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.119.010 and 2002 c 204 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall design the Washington
promise scholarship program based on the following parameters:
(1) Scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating from
public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW and
students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter
28A.200 RCW who meet both an academic and a financial eligibility
criteria.
(a) Academic eligibility criteria shall be defined as follows:
(i) Beginning with the graduating class of 2002, students
graduating from public and approved private high schools under chapter
28A.195 RCW must be in the top fifteen percent of their graduating
class, as identified by each respective high school at the completion
of the first term of the student's senior year; or
(ii) Students graduating from public high schools, approved private
high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, and students participating in
home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW must equal or
exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment test I score of twelve
hundred on their first attempt or must equal or exceed a composite
American college test score of twenty-seven on their first attempt.
(b) To meet the financial eligibility criteria, a student's family
income shall not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent of the state
median family income adjusted for family size, as determined by the
higher education coordinating board for each graduating class.
Students not meeting the eligibility requirements for the first year of
scholarship benefits may reapply for the second year of benefits, but
must still meet the income standard set by the board for the student's
graduating class.
(2) Promise scholarships are not intended to supplant any grant,
scholarship, or tax program related to postsecondary education. If the
board finds that promise scholarships supplant or reduce any grant,
scholarship, or tax program for categories of students, then the board
shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of
scholarship to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.
(3) Within available funds, each qualifying student shall receive
two consecutive annual awards, the value of each not to exceed the
full-time annual resident tuition rates charged by Washington's
community colleges. The higher education coordinating board shall
award scholarships to as many students as possible from among those
qualifying under this section.
(4) By October 15th of each year, the board shall determine the
award amount of the scholarships, after taking into consideration the
availability of funds.
(5) The scholarships may only be used for undergraduate coursework
at accredited institutions of higher education in the state of
Washington.
(6) The scholarships may be used for undergraduate coursework at
Oregon institutions of higher education that are part of the border
county higher education opportunity project in RCW 28B.80.806 when
those institutions offer programs not available at accredited
institutions of higher education in Washington state.
(7) The scholarships may be used for college-related expenses,
including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books, and
materials.
(8) ((The scholarships may not be awarded to any student who is
pursuing a degree in theology.
(9))) The higher education coordinating board may establish
satisfactory progress standards for the continued receipt of the
promise scholarship.
(((10))) (9) The higher education coordinating board shall
establish the time frame within which the student must use the
scholarship.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 28B.10.814 (State student financial aid
program -- Theology student denied aid) and 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 15 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 1 of this act expires March 15,
2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 2 of this act takes effect March 15,
2005.

--- END ---