BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2000 c 103 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit is equal to the greater of the amount of qualified
research and development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of
amounts received by a person other than a public educational or
research institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified
research and development, multiplied by the rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(3) in the case of a nonprofit corporation or nonprofit
association engaging within this state in research and development, and
the rate provided in RCW 82.04.290(2) for every other person.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, shall be taken against taxes due for
the same calendar year in which the qualified research and development
expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any credit assigned
to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for each calendar
year shall not exceed the lesser of two million dollars or the amount
of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year.
(5) Any person taking the credit, including any credit assigned to
a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose research and
development spending during the calendar year in which the credit is
claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount
during the same calendar year shall be liable for payment of the
additional taxes represented by the amount of credit taken together
with interest, but not penalties. Interest shall be due at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes retroactively to the date the
credit was taken until the taxes are paid. Any credit assigned to a
person under subsection (3) of this section that is disallowed as a
result of this section may be taken by the person who performed the
qualified research and development subject to the limitations set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) Any person claiming the credit, and any person assigning a
credit as provided in subsection (3) of this section, shall file an
affidavit form prescribed by the department which shall include the
amount of the credit claimed, an estimate of the anticipated qualified
research and development expenditures during the calendar year for
which the credit is claimed, an estimate of the taxable amount during
the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, and such additional
information as the department may prescribe.
(7) A person claiming the credit shall agree to supply the
department with information necessary to measure the results of the tax
credit program for qualified research and development expenditures.
(8) The department shall use the information required under
subsection (7) of this section to perform three assessments on the tax
credit program authorized under this section. The assessments will
take place in 1997, 2000, and 2003. The department shall prepare
reports on each assessment and deliver their reports by September 1,
1997, September 1, 2000, and September 1, 2003. The assessments shall
measure the effect of the program on job creation, the number of jobs
created for Washington residents, company growth, the introduction of
new products, the diversification of the state's economy, growth in
research and development investment, the movement of firms or the
consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and such other
factors as the department selects.
(9) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(b) "Qualified research and development" shall have the same
meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.
(c) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution to
conduct qualified research and development.
(d) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns during the year in which the credit is
claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(((10) This section expires December 31, 2004.))

Sec. 2 RCW 82.63.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 5 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for
state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment project.
(2) No certificate may be issued for an investment project that has
already received a deferral under chapter 82.60 or 82.61 RCW or this
chapter, except that an investment project for qualified research and
development that has already received a deferral may also receive an
additional deferral certificate for adapting the investment project for
use in pilot scale manufacturing.
(((3) This section shall expire July 1, 2004.))

--- END ---