BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.03.300 and 1986 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby declares it to be the policy of this state
to base salaries of elected state officials on realistic standards in
order that such officials may be paid according to the duties of their
offices and so that citizens of the highest quality may be attracted to
public service. It is the purpose of RCW 43.03.300 through 43.03.310
to effectuate this policy by creating a citizens' commission to
establish proper salaries for such officials((, thus removing political
considerations in fixing the appropriateness of the amount of such
salaries)).

Sec. 2 RCW 43.03.310 and 1998 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials
shall study the relationship of salaries to the duties of members of
the legislature, all elected officials of the executive branch of state
government, and all judges of the supreme court, court of appeals,
superior courts, and district courts, and shall fix the salary for each
respective position.
(2) Except as provided otherwise in RCW 43.03.305 and this section,
the commission shall be solely responsible for its own organization,
operation, and action and shall enjoy the fullest cooperation of all
state officials, departments, and agencies.
(3) Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for
their services, but shall be eligible to receive a subsistence
allowance and travel expenses pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The members of the commission shall elect a chair from among
their number. The commission shall set a schedule of salaries by an
affirmative vote of not less than nine members of the commission.
(5) The commission shall file its initial schedule of salaries for
the elected officials with the secretary of state no later than the
first Monday in June, 1987, and shall file a schedule biennially
thereafter. Each such schedule shall be filed in legislative bill
form, shall be assigned a chapter number and published with the session
laws of the legislature, and shall be codified by the statute law
committee. The signature of the chair of the commission shall be
affixed to each schedule submitted to the secretary of state. The
chair shall certify that the schedule has been adopted in accordance
with the provisions of state law and with the rules, if any, of the
commission. Such schedules shall become effective ((ninety days)) on
the first day after the ((filing thereof)) next regular session, except
as provided in Article XXVIII, section 1 of the state Constitution.
State laws regarding referendum petitions shall apply to such schedules
to the extent consistent with Article XXVIII, section 1 of the state
Constitution.
(6) Before the filing of any salary schedule, the commission shall
first develop a proposed salary schedule and then hold no fewer than
four regular meetings as defined by chapter 42.30 RCW to take public
testimony on the proposed schedule within the four months immediately
preceding the filing. At the last public hearing that is held as a
regular meeting on the proposed schedule, the commission shall adopt
the salary schedule as originally proposed or as amended at that
meeting that will be filed with the secretary of state.
(7) All meetings, actions, hearings, and business of the commission
shall be subject in full to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30
RCW.
(8) Salaries of the officials referred to in subsection (1) of this
section that are in effect on January 12, 1987, shall continue until
modified by the commission under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2004, if
the proposed amendment to Article XXVIII, section 1 of the state
Constitution implementing salary changes by the citizens' commission on
salaries for elected officials is validly submitted to and is approved
and ratified by the voters at the next general election. If the
proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void in
its entirety.

--- END ---