BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.0531 and 1997 c 259 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) and (4)
of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as
defined in subsection (((4))) (5) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (((4))) (5) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; ((and))
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes;
(d) Beginning with calendar year 2005 calculations, the federal
allocations received directly by a district for purposes of this
subsection (3) shall be the allocations from the second prior school
year. The federal revenues shall be adjusted by inflation as
determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
For purposes of this subsection, "second prior school year" means the
school year completed two years prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected; and
(e) Revenues included in the levy base shall be reduced for
revenues received as a fiscal agent. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall adopt rules defining "revenues received as
a fiscal agent".
(4) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2004 and
thereafter, in addition to the allocations included under subsection
(3)(a) through (c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also
include the difference between the state allocations under subsection
(3)(a) and (b) of this section and the amount the district would have
received if (a) the district's base salary for certificated
instructional staff for purposes of determining state basic education
allocations had been the same as the highest base salary for that
school year on the supporting LEAP salary document referenced in the
omnibus appropriations act; and (b) the district's salaries for
certificated administrators and classified staff for purposes of
determining state basic education allocations had been the same as the
highest certificated administrator and classified staff salaries for
that school year on the supporting LEAP salary document referenced in
the omnibus appropriations act. The additional amounts provided under
this subsection shall not be used in the calculation of levy base for
the purpose of determining local effort assistance allocations under
chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(5) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section
that are to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(((5))) (6) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state
funds from the prior school year for programs included under
subsections (3) and (4) of this section: (a) That are not attributable
to enrollment changes, compensation increases, or inflationary
adjustments; and (b) that are or were specifically identified as levy
reduction funds in the appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are
dependent on formula factors which would not be finalized until after
the start of the current school year, the superintendent of public
instruction shall estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by
using prior school year data in place of current school year data.
Levy reduction funds shall not include moneys received by school
districts from cities or counties.
(((6))) (7) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year"
means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which
the levies are to be collected.
(((7))) (8) For the purposes of this section, "current school year"
means the year immediately following the prior school year.
(((8))) (9) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax
levies shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(((9))) (10) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
rules and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2003 1st sp.s. c ... s 1 (section 1 of
this act) are each amended to read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection((s)) (3)
((and (4))) of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy
percentage as defined in subsection (((5))) (4) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (((5))) (4) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs;
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes;
(d) Beginning with calendar year 2005 calculations, the federal
allocations received directly by a district for purposes of this
subsection (3) shall be the allocations from the second prior school
year. The federal revenues shall be adjusted by inflation as
determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
For purposes of this subsection, "second prior school year" means the
school year completed two years prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected; and
(e) Revenues included in the levy base shall be reduced for
revenues received as a fiscal agent. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall adopt rules defining "revenues received as
a fiscal agent."
(4) ((For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2004 and
thereafter, in addition to the allocations included under subsection
(3)(a) through (c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also
include the difference between the state allocations under subsection
(3)(a) and (b) of this section and the amount the district would have
received if (a) the district's base salary for certificated
instructional staff for purposes of determining state basic education
allocations had been the same as the highest base salary for that
school year on the supporting LEAP salary document referenced in the
omnibus appropriations act; and (b) the district's salaries for
certificated administrators and classified staff for purposes of
determining state basic education allocations had been the same as the
highest certificated administrator and classified staff salaries for
that school year on the supporting LEAP salary document referenced in
the omnibus appropriations act. The additional amounts provided under
this subsection shall not be used in the calculation of levy base for
the purpose of determining local effort assistance allocations under
chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(5))) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (((6))) (5) of this section
that are to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(((6))) (5) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state
funds from the prior school year for programs included under
subsection((s)) (3) ((and (4))) of this section: (a) That are not
attributable to enrollment changes, compensation increases, or
inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are or were specifically
identified as levy reduction funds in the appropriations act. If levy
reduction funds are dependent on formula factors which would not be
finalized until after the start of the current school year, the
superintendent of public instruction shall estimate the total amount of
levy reduction funds by using prior school year data in place of
current school year data. Levy reduction funds shall not include
moneys received by school districts from cities or counties.
(((7))) (6) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year"
means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which
the levies are to be collected.
(((8))) (7) For the purposes of this section, "current school year"
means the year immediately following the prior school year.
(((9))) (8) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax
levies shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(((10))) (9) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
rules and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act takes effect August 1,
2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect August 1,
2005.

--- END ---