BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
JOINT AND SEVERAL
Sec. 101 RCW 4.22.070 and 1993 c 496 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In all actions involving fault of more than one entity, the
trier of fact shall determine the percentage of the total fault which
is attributable to every entity which caused the claimant's damages
except entities immune from liability to the claimant under Title 51
RCW. The sum of the percentages of the total fault attributed to at-
fault entities shall equal one hundred percent. The entities whose
fault shall be determined include the claimant or person suffering
personal injury or incurring property damage, defendants, third-party
defendants, entities ((released by)) who have entered into a release,
covenant not to sue, covenant not to enforce judgment, or similar
agreement with the claimant, entities with any other individual defense
against the claimant, and entities immune from liability to the
claimant, but shall not include those entities immune from liability to
the claimant under Title 51 RCW. Judgment shall be entered against
each defendant except those entities who have ((been released by))
entered into a release, covenant not to sue, covenant not to enforce
judgment, or similar agreement with the claimant or are immune from
liability to the claimant or have prevailed on any other individual
defense against the claimant in an amount which represents that party's
proportionate share of the claimant's total damages. The liability of
each defendant shall be several only and shall not be joint except:
(a) A party shall be responsible for the fault of another person or
for payment of the proportionate share of another party where both were
acting in concert or when a person was acting as an agent or servant of
the party.
(b) If the trier of fact determines that the claimant or party
suffering bodily injury or incurring property damages was not at fault,
the defendants against whom judgment is entered shall be jointly and
severally liable for the sum of their proportionate shares of the
((claimants [claimant's])) claimant's total damages.
(2)(a) A defendant who is jointly and severally liable under one of
the exceptions listed in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section on
the basis of negligent or reckless acts or omissions shall be jointly
liable for no more than twice the percentage of fault allocated to that
defendant but in no case more than one hundred percent of the sum of
the proportionate shares.
(b) A defendant who is jointly and severally liable under one of
the exceptions listed in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section on
the basis of intentional acts or omissions shall be jointly liable for
the sum of the proportionate shares of the claimant's total damages.
(c) If a defendant is jointly and severally liable under one of the
exceptions listed in subsection((s)) (1)(a) or (((1)))(b) of this
section, such defendant's rights to contribution against another
jointly and severally liable defendant, and the effect of settlement by
either such defendant, shall be determined under RCW 4.22.040,
4.22.050, and 4.22.060.
(3)(a) Nothing in this section affects any cause of action relating
to hazardous wastes or substances or solid waste disposal sites.
(b) Nothing in this section shall affect a cause of action arising
from the tortious interference with contracts or business relations.
(c) Nothing in this section shall affect any cause of action
arising from the manufacture or marketing of a fungible product in a
generic form which contains no clearly identifiable shape, color, or
marking.

Sec. 102 RCW 4.22.015 and 1981 c 27 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Fault" includes acts or omissions, including misuse of a product,
that are in any measure negligent ((or)), reckless, or intentional
toward the person or property of the actor or others, or that subject
a person to strict tort liability or liability on a product liability
claim. The term also includes breach of warranty, unreasonable
assumption of risk, and unreasonable failure to avoid an injury or to
mitigate damages. Legal requirements of causal relation apply both to
fault as the basis for liability and to contributory fault.
A comparison of fault for any purpose under RCW 4.22.005 through
((4.22.060)) 4.22.070 shall involve consideration of both the nature of
the conduct of the parties to the action and the extent of the causal
relation between such conduct and the damages.

PART 2
EMPLOYMENT REFERENCE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The legislature finds that employers are
becoming increasingly discouraged from disclosing job reference
information. The legislature further finds that full disclosure of
such information will increase productivity, enhance the safety of the
workplace, and provide greater opportunities to disadvantaged groups
who may not have the educational background or resumes of other
workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
An employer who discloses information about a former or current
employee's job performance, conduct, or other work-related information
to a prospective employer, or employment agency as defined by RCW
49.60.040, at the specific request of that individual employer or
employment agency, is presumed to be acting in good faith and is immune
from civil liability for such disclosure or its consequences. For
purposes of this section, the presumption of good faith may only be
rebutted upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence that the
information disclosed by the employer was knowingly false or
deliberately misleading.

PART 3
POSTJUDGMENT INTEREST RATE
Sec. 301 RCW 4.56.115 and 1983 c 147 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Judgments founded on the tortious conduct of the state of
Washington or of the political subdivisions, municipal corporations,
and quasi municipal corporations of the state, whether acting in their
governmental or proprietary capacities, shall bear interest from the
date of entry at two percentage points above the ((maximum rate
permitted under RCW 19.52.020 on)) equivalent coupon issue yield (as
published by the board of governors of the federal reserve system) of
the average bill rate for twenty-six week treasury bills as determined
at the first bill market auction conducted during the calendar month
immediately preceding the date of entry thereof((: PROVIDED, That)).
In any case where a court is directed on review to enter judgment on a
verdict or in any case where a judgment entered on a verdict is wholly
or partly affirmed on review, interest on the judgment or on that
portion of the judgment affirmed shall date back to and shall accrue
from the date the verdict was rendered. Interest does not accrue on
that portion of a judgment that is subject to appropriation by the
legislature under RCW 4.92.090 or by a local legislative authority
under RCW 4.96.010 until the appropriation has been made by the
legislature or local legislative authority.

Sec. 302 RCW 4.56.110 and 1989 c 360 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
Interest on judgments shall accrue as follows:
(1) Judgments founded on written contracts, providing for the
payment of interest until paid at a specified rate, shall bear interest
at the rate specified in the contracts: PROVIDED, That said interest
rate is set forth in the judgment.
(2) All judgments for unpaid child support that have accrued under
a superior court order or an order entered under the administrative
procedure act shall bear interest at the rate of twelve percent.
(3) Judgments founded on the tortious conduct of individuals or
other entities, whether acting in their personal or representative
capacities, shall bear interest from the date of entry at two
percentage points above the equivalent coupon issue yield, as published
by the board of governors of the federal reserve system, of the average
bill rate for twenty-six week treasury bills as determined at the first
bill market auction conducted during the calendar month immediately
preceding the date of entry. In any case where a court is directed on
review to enter judgment on a verdict or in any case where a judgment
entered on a verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on review, interest
on the judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed shall date
back to and shall accrue from the date the verdict was rendered.
(4) Except as provided under subsections (1) ((and)), (2), and (3)
of this section, judgments shall bear interest from the date of entry
at the maximum rate permitted under RCW 19.52.020 on the date of entry
thereof((: PROVIDED, That)). In any case where a court is directed on
review to enter judgment on a verdict or in any case where a judgment
entered on a verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on review, interest
on the judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed shall date
back to and shall accrue from the date the verdict was rendered. The
method for determining an interest rate prescribed by this subsection
is also the method for determining the "rate applicable to civil
judgments" for purposes of RCW 10.82.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 The rate of interest required by sections
301 and 302(3), chapter . . ., Laws of 2003 (sections 301 and 302(3) of
this act) applies to the accrual of interest as of the date of entry of
judgment with respect to a judgment that is entered on or after the
effective date of this act.

Sec. 304 RCW 19.52.025 and 1986 c 60 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each month the state treasurer shall compute the highest rate of
interest permissible under RCW 19.52.020(1), and the rate of interest
required by RCW 4.56.110(3) and 4.56.115, for the succeeding calendar
month. The treasurer shall file ((this rate)) these rates with the
state code reviser for publication in the next available issue of the
Washington State Register in compliance with RCW 34.08.020(8).

PART 4
MEDICAL LIABILITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 The legislature finds that it is in the
best interest of the people of the state of Washington to contain the
significantly increasing costs of malpractice insurance for licensed
health care professionals and institutions and to ensure the continued
availability and affordability of health care services in this state by
enacting further reforms to the health care tort liability system.
The legislature finds that, notwithstanding the tort reform
measures it has enacted in the past, the amounts being paid out in
judgments and settlements have continued to increase inordinately, and
that as a result there have been dramatic increases in the cost of
health care professional liability insurance coverage. The legislature
further finds that the upward pressures on already high malpractice
insurance premiums threaten the public's health by discouraging
physicians and other health care professionals from initiating or
continuing their practice in this state.
The legislature further finds that the state of California, largely
as a result of its enactment of the "medical injury compensation reform
act" in 1975, has been able to successfully stabilize the health care
professional liability insurance market, maintain access to affordable
quality health care services, and avert the kind of crisis now facing
the residents of Washington.
The legislature finds that such reforms are rationally related to
the legitimate goals of reducing the costs associated with the health
care tort liability system while ensuring adequate and appropriate
compensation for persons injured as a result of health care, ensuring
the continued availability and affordability of health care services in
this state, preventing the curtailment of health care services in this
state, stabilizing insurance and health care costs, preventing stale
health care liability claims, and protecting and preserving the public
health, safety, and welfare as a whole.

Sec. 402 RCW 4.56.250 and 1986 c 305 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Economic damages" means objectively verifiable monetary
losses, including medical expenses, loss of earnings, burial costs,
loss of use of property, cost of replacement or repair, cost of
obtaining substitute domestic services, loss of employment, and loss of
business or employment opportunities.
(b) "Noneconomic damages" means subjective, nonmonetary losses,
including((,)) but not limited to pain, suffering, inconvenience,
mental anguish, disability or disfigurement incurred by the injured
party, loss of ability to enjoy life, emotional distress, loss of
society and companionship, loss of consortium, injury to reputation and
humiliation, ((and)) destruction of the parent-child relationship, and
other nonpecuniary damages of any type.
(c) "Bodily injury" means physical injury, sickness, or disease,
including death.
(d) "Average annual wage" means the average annual wage in the
state of Washington as determined under RCW 50.04.355.
(2) In no action seeking damages for personal injury or death may
a claimant recover a judgment for noneconomic damages exceeding an
amount determined by multiplying 0.43 by the average annual wage and by
the life expectancy of the person incurring noneconomic damages, as the
life expectancy is determined by the life expectancy tables adopted by
the insurance commissioner. For purposes of determining the maximum
amount allowable for noneconomic damages, a claimant's life expectancy
shall not be less than fifteen years. The limitation contained in this
subsection applies to all claims for noneconomic damages made by a
claimant who incurred bodily injury. Claims for loss of consortium,
loss of society and companionship, destruction of the parent-child
relationship, and all other derivative claims asserted by persons who
did not sustain bodily injury are to be included within the limitation
on claims for noneconomic damages arising from the same bodily injury.
(3) If a case is tried to a jury, the jury shall not be informed of
the limitation contained in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 A new section is added to chapter 4.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action or arbitration for damages for injury or death
occurring as a result of health care, or arranging for the provision of
health care, whether brought under chapter 7.70 RCW, or under RCW
4.20.010, 4.20.020, 4.20.046, 4.20.060, 4.24.010, or 48.43.545(1), or
any combination thereof, the total amount of noneconomic damages may
not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(2) The limitation on noneconomic damages contained in subsection
(1) of this section includes all noneconomic damages claimed by or on
behalf of the person whose injury or death occurred as a result of
health care or arranging for the provision of health care, as well as
all claims for loss of consortium, loss of society and companionship,
destruction of the parent-child relationship, and other derivative
claims asserted by or on behalf of others arising from the same injury
or death. If the jury's assessment of noneconomic damages exceeds the
limitation contained in subsection (1) of this section, nothing in RCW
4.44.450 precludes the court from entering a judgment that limits the
total amount of noneconomic damages to three hundred fifty thousand
dollars.

Sec. 404 RCW 7.70.100 and 1993 c 492 s 419 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No action based upon a health care provider's professional
negligence may be commenced unless the defendant has been given at
least ninety days' notice of the intention to commence the action. If
the notice is served within ninety days of the expiration of the
applicable statute of limitations, the time for the commencement of the
action must be extended ninety days from the service of the notice.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are not
applicable with respect to any defendant whose name is unknown to the
plaintiff at the time of filing the complaint and who is identified
therein by a fictitious name.
(3) After the filing of the ninety-day presuit notice, and before
a superior court trial, all causes of action, whether based in tort,
contract, or otherwise, for damages arising from injury occurring as a
result of health care provided after July 1, 1993, shall be subject to
mandatory mediation prior to trial.
(((2))) (4) The supreme court shall by rule adopt procedures to
implement mandatory mediation of actions under this chapter. The rules
shall require mandatory mediation without exception and address, at a
minimum:
(a) Procedures for the appointment of, and qualifications of,
mediators. A mediator shall have experience or expertise related to
actions arising from injury occurring as a result of health care, and
be a member of the state bar association who has been admitted to the
bar for a minimum of five years or who is a retired judge. The parties
may stipulate to a nonlawyer mediator. The court may prescribe
additional qualifications of mediators;
(b) Appropriate limits on the amount or manner of compensation of
mediators;
(c) The number of days following the filing of a claim under this
chapter within which a mediator must be selected;
(d) The method by which a mediator is selected. The rule shall
provide for designation of a mediator by the superior court if the
parties are unable to agree upon a mediator;
(e) The number of days following the selection of a mediator within
which a mediation conference must be held;
(f) A means by which mediation of an action under this chapter may
be waived by a mediator who has determined that the claim is not
appropriate for mediation; and
(g) Any other matters deemed necessary by the court.
(((3))) (5) Mediators shall not impose discovery schedules upon the
parties.
(6) The supreme court shall by rule also adopt procedures for the
parties to certify to the court the manner of mediation used by the
parties to comply with this section.

Sec. 405 RCW 4.16.350 and 1998 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil action for damages for injury or death occurring as
a result of health care which is provided after June 25, 1976, against:
(((1))) (a) A person licensed by this state to provide health care
or related services, including, but not limited to, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician
and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist,
pharmacist, optician, physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's
assistant, nurse practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive
care paramedic, including, in the event such person is deceased, his
estate or personal representative;
(((2))) (b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of
this subsection (((1) of this section)), acting in the course and scope
of his or her employment, including, in the event such employee or
agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative; or
(((3))) (c) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in (a) of this
subsection (((1) of this section)), including, but not limited to, a
hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or
an officer, director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course
and scope of his or her employment, including, in the event such
officer, director, employee, or agent is deceased, his or her estate or
personal representative;
based upon alleged professional negligence shall be commenced within
three years of the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition, or one year of the time the patient or his or her
representative or custodial parent or guardian discovered or reasonably
should have discovered that the injury or condition was caused by said
act or omission, whichever period ((expires later, except that in no
event shall an action be commenced more than eight years after said act
or omission: PROVIDED, That the time for commencement of an action is
tolled upon proof of fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence of
a foreign body not intended to have a therapeutic or diagnostic purpose
or effect, until the date the patient or the patient's representative
has actual knowledge of the act of fraud or concealment, or of the
presence of the foreign body; the patient or the patient's
representative has one year from the date of the actual knowledge in
which to commence a civil action for damages.
For purposes of this section, notwithstanding RCW 4.16.190, the
knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall be imputed to a
person under the age of eighteen years, and such imputed knowledge
shall operate to bar the claim of such minor to the same extent that
the claim of an adult would be barred under this section. Any action
not commenced in accordance with this section shall be barred.
For purposes of this section, with respect to care provided after
June 25, 1976, and before August 1, 1986, the knowledge of a custodial
parent or guardian shall be imputed as of April 29, 1987, to persons
under the age of eighteen years)) occurs first.
(2) In no event may an action be commenced more than three years
after the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition except:
(a) Upon proof of fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence
of a foreign body not intended to have a therapeutic or diagnostic
purpose or effect, in which case the patient or the patient's
representative has one year from the date the patient or the patient's
representative or custodial parent or guardian has actual knowledge of
the act of fraud or concealment or of the presence of the foreign body
in which to commence a civil action for damages.
(b) In the case of a minor, for any period during minority, but
only for such period during minority in which the minor's custodial
parent or guardian and the defendant or the defendant's insurer have
committed fraud or collusion in the failure to bring an action on
behalf of the minor.
(c) In the case of a minor under the full age of six years, in
which case the action on behalf of the minor must be commenced within
three years or prior to the minor's eighth birthday, whichever provides
a longer period.
(3) Any action not commenced in accordance with this section is
barred.
(4) For purposes of this section, the tolling provisions of RCW
4.16.190 do not apply.
(5) This section does not apply to a civil action based on
intentional conduct brought against those individuals or entities
specified in this section by a person for recovery of damages for
injury occurring as a result of childhood sexual abuse as defined in
RCW 4.16.340(5).

Sec. 406 RCW 7.70.080 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any party may present evidence to the trier of fact that the
((patient)) plaintiff has already been, or will be, compensated for the
injury complained of from ((any source except the assets of the
patient, his representative, or his immediate family, or insurance
purchased with such assets. In the event such evidence is admitted,
the plaintiff may present evidence of an obligation to repay such
compensation. Insurance bargained for or provided on behalf of an
employee shall be considered insurance purchased with the assets of the
employee)) a collateral source. In the event the evidence is admitted,
the other party may present evidence of any amount that was paid or
contributed to secure the right to any compensation. Compensation as
used in this section shall mean payment of money or other property to
or on behalf of the patient, rendering of services to the patient free
of charge to the patient, or indemnification of expenses incurred by or
on behalf of the patient. Notwithstanding this section, evidence of
compensation by a defendant health care provider may be offered only by
that provider.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by statute, there is no right of
subrogation or reimbursement from a plaintiff's tort recovery with
respect to compensation covered in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 407 RCW 7.70.060 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
If a patient while legally competent, or his or her representative
if he or she is not competent, signs a consent form which sets forth
the following, the signed consent form shall constitute prima facie
evidence that the patient gave his or her informed consent to the
treatment administered and the patient has the burden of rebutting this
by ((a preponderance of the)) clear, cogent, and convincing evidence:
(1) A description, in language the patient could reasonably be
expected to understand, of:
(a) The nature and character of the proposed treatment;
(b) The anticipated results of the proposed treatment;
(c) The recognized possible alternative forms of treatment; and
(d) The recognized serious possible risks, complications, and
anticipated benefits involved in the treatment and in the recognized
possible alternative forms of treatment, including nontreatment;
(2) Or as an alternative, a statement that the patient elects not
to be informed of the elements set forth in subsection (1) of this
section.
Failure to use a form shall not be admissible as evidence of
failure to obtain informed consent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 A new section is added to chapter 7.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A contract for health care services that contains a provision
for arbitration of a dispute as to professional negligence of a health
care provider under chapter 7.70 RCW must have the provision as the
first article of the contract and must be expressed in the following
language:
"It is understood that any dispute as to medical malpractice that
is as to whether any medical services rendered under this contract were
unnecessary or unauthorized or were improperly, negligently, or
incompetently rendered, will be determined by submission to arbitration
as provided by Washington law, and not by a lawsuit or resort to court
process except as Washington law provides for judicial review of
arbitration proceedings. Both parties to this contract, by entering
into it, are giving up their constitutional right to have such a
dispute decided in a court of law before a jury, and instead are
accepting the use of arbitration."
(2) Immediately before the signature line provided for the
individual contracting for the medical services, there must appear the
following in at least ten-point bold red type:
"NOTICE: BY SIGNING THIS CONTRACT YOU ARE AGREEING TO HAVE ANY
ISSUE OF MEDICAL MALPRACTICE DECIDED BY NEUTRAL ARBITRATION AND YOU ARE
GIVING UP YOUR RIGHT TO A JURY OR COURT TRIAL. SEE ARTICLE ONE OF THIS
CONTRACT."
(3) Once signed, such a contract governs all subsequent open-book
account transactions for medical services for which the contract was
signed until or unless rescinded by written notice within thirty days
of signature. Written notice of such rescission may be given by a
guardian or other legal representative of the patient if the patient is
incapacitated or a minor.
(4) Where the contract is one for medical services to a minor, it
may not be disaffirmed if signed by the minor's parent or legal
guardian.
(5) Such a contract is not a contract of adhesion, nor
unconscionable, nor otherwise improper, where it complies with
subsections (1) through (3) of this section.
(6) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to any
health benefit plan contract offered by an organization regulated under
Title 48 RCW that has been negotiated to contain an arbitration
agreement with subscribers and enrollees under such a contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 7.70.100, 7.70.110, 7.70.120, and 7.70.130 do not apply if
there is a contract for binding arbitration under section 408 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Future damages" includes damages for future medical treatment,
care or custody, loss of future earnings, loss of bodily function, or
future pain and suffering of the judgment creditor.
(b) "Periodic payments" means the payment of money or delivery of
other property to the judgment creditor at regular intervals.
(2) In any action for damages for injury occurring as a result of
health care, the court shall, at the request of either party, enter a
judgment ordering that money damages or its equivalent for future
damages of the judgment creditor be paid in whole or in part by
periodic payments rather than by a lump-sum payment if the award equals
or exceeds fifty thousand dollars in future damages. In entering a
judgment ordering the payment of future damages by periodic payments,
the court shall make a specific finding as to the dollar amount of
periodic payments which will compensate the judgment creditor for such
future damages. As a condition to authorizing periodic payments of
future damages, the court shall require the judgment debtor who is not
adequately insured to post security adequate to ensure full payment of
such damages awarded by the judgment. Upon termination of periodic
payments of future damages, the court shall order the return of this
security, or so much as remains, to the judgment debtor.
(3)(a) The judgment ordering the payment of future damages by
periodic payments must specify the recipient or recipients of the
payments, the dollar amount of the payments, the interval between
payments, and the number of payments or the period of time over which
payments must be made. The payments are only subject to modification
in the event of the death of the judgment creditor.
(b) In the event that the court finds that the judgment debtor has
exhibited a continuing pattern of failing to make the payments, as
specified in (a) of this subsection, the court shall find the judgment
debtor in contempt of court and, in addition to the required periodic
payments, shall order the judgment debtor to pay the judgment creditor
all damages caused by the failure to make such periodic payments,
including court costs and attorneys' fees.
(4) However, money damages awarded for loss of future earnings may
not be reduced or payments terminated by reason of the death of the
judgment creditor, but must be paid to persons to whom the judgment
creditor owed a duty of support, as provided by law, immediately prior
to his or her death. In such cases the court that rendered the
original judgment, may, upon petition of any party in interest, modify
the judgment to award and apportion the unpaid future damages in
accordance with this subsection (4).
(5) Following the occurrence or expiration of all obligations
specified in the periodic payment judgment, any obligation of the
judgment debtor to make further payments ceases and any security given
under subsection (2) of this section reverts to the judgment debtor.
(6) For purposes of this section, the provisions of RCW 4.56.250 do
not apply.
(7) It is the intent of the legislature in enacting this section to
authorize, in actions for damages for injury occurring as a result of
health care, the entry of judgments that provide for the payment of
future damages through periodic payments rather than lump-sum payments.
By authorizing periodic payment judgments, it is the further intent of
the legislature that the courts will utilize such judgments to provide
compensation sufficient to meet the needs of an injured plaintiff and
those persons who are dependent on the plaintiff for whatever period is
necessary while eliminating the potential windfall from a lump-sum
recovery that was intended to provide for the care of an injured
plaintiff over an extended period who then dies shortly after the
judgment is paid, leaving the balance of the judgment award to persons
and purposes for which it was not intended. It is also the intent of
the legislature that all elements of the periodic payment program be
specified with certainty in the judgment ordering such payments and
that the judgment not be subject to modification at some future time
that might alter the specifications of the original judgment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 411 A new section is added to chapter 4.56 RCW
to read as follows:
In the event that the Washington state supreme court or other court
of competent jurisdiction rules or affirms that section 403 of this act
is unconstitutional, then the prescribed cap on noneconomic damages
takes effect upon the ratification of a state constitutional amendment
that empowers the legislature to place limits on the amount of
noneconomic damages recoverable in any or all civil causes of action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 412 Unless otherwise provided in this act,
this act applies to all causes of action filed on or after the
effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 413 The Washington state department of health,
in conjunction with the Washington state medical quality assurance
commission and appropriate professional associations, shall evaluate
the effectiveness of the quality improvement and medical malpractice
prevention program, as implemented in state hospitals. Representatives
of the following professional associations shall be included in the
evaluation process: The Washington state hospital association; the
Washington state nurses association; the Washington state bar
association; the Washington state medical association; and other
professional health care provider associations, as appropriate. The
Washington state department of health shall present a report to the
legislature by December 1, 2003.

PART 5
CONSTRUCTION LIABILITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 4.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Persons engaged in any activity defined in RCW 4.16.300 may be
excused, in whole or in part, from any obligation, damage, loss, or
liability for those defined activities under the principles of
comparative fault for the following affirmative defenses:
(a) To the extent it is caused by an unforeseen act of nature that
caused, prevented, or precluded the activities defined in RCW 4.16.300
from meeting the applicable building codes, regulations, and ordinances
in effect at the commencement of construction. For purposes of this
section an "unforeseen act of nature" means any weather condition,
earthquake, or manmade event such as war, terrorism, or vandalism;
(b) To the extent it is caused by a homeowner's unreasonable
failure to minimize or prevent those damages in a timely manner,
including the failure of the homeowner to allow reasonable and timely
access for inspections and repairs under this section. This includes
the failure to give timely notice to the builder after discovery of a
violation, but does not include damages due to the untimely or
inadequate response of a builder to the homeowner's claim;
(c) To the extent it is caused by the homeowner or his or her
agent, employee, subcontractor, independent contractor, or consultant
by virtue of their failure to follow the builder's or manufacturer's
maintenance recommendations, or commonly accepted homeowner maintenance
obligations. In order to rely upon this defense as it relates to a
builder's recommended maintenance schedule, the builder shall show that
the homeowner had written notice of the schedule, the schedule was
reasonable at the time it was issued, and the homeowner failed to
substantially comply with the written schedule;
(d) To the extent it is caused by the homeowner or his or her
agent's or an independent third party's alterations, ordinary wear and
tear, misuse, abuse, or neglect, or by the structure's use for
something other than its intended purpose;
(e) To the extent that a cause of action does not accrue within the
statute of repose pursuant to RCW 4.16.310 or that an actionable cause
as set forth in RCW 4.16.300 is not filed within the applicable statute
of limitations. In contract actions, the applicable contract statute
of limitations expires, regardless of discovery, six years after
substantial completion of construction, or during the period within six
years after the termination of the services enumerated in RCW 4.16.300,
whichever is later;
(f) As to a particular violation for which the builder has obtained
a valid release;
(g) To the extent that the builder's repair corrected the alleged
violation or defect;
(h) To the extent that the builder making the improvement did so in
conformity with all applicable state, county, and municipal building
and construction codes;
(i) As to any causes of action to which this section does not
apply, all applicable affirmative defenses are preserved.
(2) This section does not apply to any civil action in tort
alleging personal injury or wrongful death to a person or persons
resulting from a construction defect.

PART 6
SEATBELT DEFENSE
Sec. 601 RCW 46.61.688 and 2003 c 353 (ESB 5450) s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, the term "motor vehicle"
includes:
(a) "Buses," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except
trailers, designed to carry more than ten passengers;
(b) "Multipurpose passenger vehicles," meaning motor vehicles with
motive power, except trailers, designed to carry ten persons or less
that are constructed either on a truck chassis or with special features
for occasional off-road operation;
(c) "Neighborhood electric vehicle," meaning a self-propelled,
electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle whose speed attainable
in one mile is more than twenty miles per hour and not more than
twenty-five miles per hour and conforms to federal regulations under
Title 49 C.F.R. Part 571.500;
(d) "Passenger cars," meaning motor vehicles with motive power,
except multipurpose passenger vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers,
designed for carrying ten passengers or less; and
(e) "Trucks," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except
trailers, designed primarily for the transportation of property.
(2) This section only applies to motor vehicles that meet the
manual seat belt safety standards as set forth in federal motor vehicle
safety standard 208 and to neighborhood electric vehicles. This
section does not apply to a vehicle occupant for whom no safety belt is
available when all designated seating positions as required by federal
motor vehicle safety standard 208 are occupied.
(3) Every person sixteen years of age or older operating or riding
in a motor vehicle shall wear the safety belt assembly in a properly
adjusted and securely fastened manner.
(4) No person may operate a motor vehicle unless all child
passengers under the age of sixteen years are either: (a) Wearing a
safety belt assembly or (b) are securely fastened into an approved
child restraint device.
(5) A person violating this section shall be issued a notice of
traffic infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW. A finding that a person
has committed a traffic infraction under this section shall be
contained in the driver's abstract but shall not be available to
insurance companies or employers.
(6) Failure to comply with ((the)) any requirements of this section
((does not constitute negligence, nor may failure to wear a safety belt
assembly)) may be admissible as evidence of negligence in any civil
action.
(7) This section does not apply to an operator or passenger who
possesses written verification from a licensed physician that the
operator or passenger is unable to wear a safety belt for physical or
medical reasons.
(8) The state patrol may adopt rules exempting operators or
occupants of farm vehicles, construction equipment, and vehicles that
are required to make frequent stops from the requirement of wearing
safety belts.

PART 7
GOVERNMENTAL ACTIVITIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 While the common law doctrine of sovereign
immunity declares that the state is immune from liability for the
tortious conduct of its employees and officers, Article II, section 26
of the state Constitution allows the legislature to waive its immunity
and specify by statute "in what manner, and in what courts, suit may be
brought against the state." In the granting or withholding of
sovereign immunity, there are limitations, gradations, and competing
interests to be balanced by the legislature, including fairness to the
citizens of the state, the preservation of proper and essential
functions of government, and the conservation of scarce public
resources.
In balancing these competing interests, the legislature must also
balance the traditional role of the jury in determining damages in
civil cases and the legislature's constitutional mandate under Article
VIII, section 4 of the state Constitution to protect the state treasury
through the appropriation process.
The legislature finds that these constitutional principles are not
adequately served by either complete sovereign immunity or the complete
waiver of sovereign immunity. Pursuant to the express authority of
Article II, section 26 of the state Constitution, the purpose of
sections 701 through 707 of this act is to recognize and implement
these fundamental constitutional principles while providing a fair and
equitable means of recovery against governmental entities for the
negligent acts of their employees and officers.
The legislature further finds that government agencies administer
programs, in the exercise of their constitutional, statutory, and moral
obligations, that inherently create a significant risk of tort
liability in the absence of sovereign immunity. This potential
liability is unique to the governmental function. As a result, state
and local governments are not similarly situated to individual and
private organizations, who are not under legal or moral obligations to
provide for the public health, safety, and welfare. For these reasons,
the legislature finds it necessary and appropriate to distinguish
between the civil liability of private entities and governmental
agencies.

Sec. 702 RCW 4.92.005 and 1985 c 217 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 4.92.060, 4.92.070, 4.92.090, 4.92.130,
((4.92.140,)) and 4.92.150, volunteer is defined in RCW 51.12.035.

Sec. 703 RCW 4.96.010 and 2001 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All local governmental entities, whether acting in a
governmental or proprietary capacity, shall be liable for damages
arising out of their tortious conduct, or the tortious conduct of their
past or present officers, employees, or volunteers while performing or
in good faith purporting to perform their official duties, to the same
extent as if they were a private person or corporation, subject to the
limitations provided in subsection (2) of this section. Filing a claim
for damages within the time allowed by law shall be a condition
precedent to the commencement of any action claiming damages. The laws
specifying the content for such claims shall be liberally construed so
that substantial compliance therewith will be deemed satisfactory.
(2)(a) Subject to the further limitation applicable to rural public
hospital districts in this subsection, neither local government
entities, nor their officers, employees, or volunteers are liable to
pay a claim or a judgment for noneconomic damages as defined in RCW
4.56.250 by any one person that exceeds the sum of one million dollars
or any claim or judgment, or portions thereof, that, when totaled with
all other claims or judgments paid by the local government entities,
officers, employees, or volunteers arising out of the same incident or
occurrence, exceeds the sum of two million dollars. Neither rural
public hospital districts, nor their officers, employees, or volunteers
are liable to pay a claim or a judgment by any one person that exceeds
the sum of five hundred thousand dollars or any claim or judgment, or
portions thereof, that, when totaled with all other claims or judgments
paid by the rural public hospital district, officers, employees, or
volunteers arising out of the same incident or occurrence, exceeds the
sum of one million dollars. However, a judgment or judgments may be
claimed and rendered in excess of these amounts and may be settled and
paid under this section up to five hundred thousand dollars, one
million dollars, or two million dollars, as the case may be, and that
portion of the judgment that exceeds these amounts may be reported to
the local legislative authority, but may be paid in part or in whole
only by further act of the local legislative authority.
Notwithstanding the limited waiver of sovereign immunity provided in
this section, the local government entities, officers, employees, or
volunteers may agree, within the limits of insurance coverage provided,
to settle a claim made or a judgment rendered against it without
further action by the local legislative authority, but the local
government entities, officers, employees, or volunteers have not waived
any defense of sovereign immunity or increased the limits of its
liability as a result of its obtaining insurance coverage for tortious
acts in excess of the waiver provided in this section.
(b) The liability of the local government entities, officers,
employees, or volunteers is several only and is not joint.
(c) No attorney may charge, demand, receive, or collect, for
services rendered, fees in excess of twenty-five percent of any
judgment or settlement under this section.
(d) Subsection (2)(a) of this section does not apply in cases in
which the local government entity or its officers, employees, or
volunteers are held liable for civil damages resulting from any
negligent act or omission in the rendering of community placement,
community supervision, community custody, parole supervision, probation
supervision, or supervision of suspended sentences if (i) the offender
under supervision has ever been convicted of the crime of first or
second degree rape, first or second degree rape of a child, or first or
second degree homicide, and (ii) the civil damages resulted from the
subsequent commission of one of these specified offenses.
(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, for the purposes
of this chapter((,)):
(a) "Local governmental entity" means a county, city, town, special
district, municipal corporation as defined in RCW 39.50.010, quasi-municipal corporation, or public hospital.
(((3))) (b) "Rural public hospital district" has the meaning
specified in RCW 70.44.460.
(4) For the purposes of this chapter, "volunteer" is defined
according to RCW 51.12.035.

Sec. 704 RCW 4.92.040 and 2002 c 332 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No execution shall issue against the state on any judgment.
(2) Whenever a final judgment against the state is obtained in an
action on a claim arising out of tortious conduct, the claim shall be
paid from the liability account, subject to the limitations of RCW
4.92.090.
(3) Whenever a final judgment against the state shall have been
obtained in any other action, the clerk of the court shall make and
furnish to the risk management division a duly certified copy of such
judgment; the risk management division shall thereupon audit the amount
of damages and costs therein awarded, and the same shall be paid from
appropriations specifically provided for such purposes by law.
(4) Final judgments for which there are no provisions in state law
for payment shall be transmitted by the risk management division to the
senate and house of representatives committees on ways and means as
follows:
(a) On the first day of each session of the legislature, the risk
management division shall transmit judgments received and audited since
the adjournment of the previous session of the legislature.
(b) During each session of legislature, the risk management
division shall transmit judgments immediately upon completion of audit.
(5) All claims, other than judgments, made to the legislature
against the state of Washington for money or property, shall be
accompanied by a statement of the facts on which such claim is based
and such evidence as the claimant intends to offer in support of the
claim and shall be filed with the risk management division, which shall
retain the same as a record. All claims of two thousand dollars or
less shall be approved or rejected by the risk management division, and
if approved shall be paid from appropriations specifically provided for
such purpose by law. Such decision, if adverse to the claimant in
whole or part, shall not preclude the claimant from seeking relief from
the legislature. If the claimant accepts any part of his or her claim
which is approved for payment by the risk management division, such
acceptance shall constitute a waiver and release of the state from any
further claims relating to the damage or injury asserted in the claim
so accepted. The risk management division shall submit to the house
and senate committees on ways and means, at the beginning of each
regular session, a comprehensive list of all claims paid pursuant to
this subsection during the preceding year. For all claims not approved
by the risk management division, the risk management division shall
recommend to the legislature whether such claims should be approved or
rejected. Recommendations shall be submitted to the senate and house
of representatives committees on ways and means not later than the
thirtieth day of each regular session of the legislature. Claims which
cannot be processed for timely submission of recommendations shall be
held for submission during the following regular session of the
legislature. The recommendations shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) A summary of the facts alleged in the claim, and a statement as
to whether these facts can be verified by the risk management division;
(b) An estimate by the risk management division of the value of the
loss or damage which was alleged to have occurred;
(c) An analysis of the legal liability, if any, of the state for
the alleged loss or damage; and
(d) A summary of equitable or public policy arguments which might
be helpful in resolving the claim.
(6) The legislative committees to whom such claims are referred
shall make a transcript, recording, or statement of the substance of
the evidence given in support of such a claim. If the legislature
approves a claim the same shall be paid from appropriations
specifically provided for such purpose by law.
(7) Subsections (3) through (6) of this section do not apply to
judgments or claims against the state housing finance commission
created under chapter 43.180 RCW.

Sec. 705 RCW 4.92.090 and 1963 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state of Washington, whether acting in its governmental or
proprietary capacity, shall be liable for damages arising out of its
tortious conduct to the same extent as if it were a private person or
corporation, subject to the limitations provided in this section.
(1) Neither the state nor its agencies, institutions, officers,
employees, or volunteers are liable to pay a claim or a judgment for
noneconomic damages as defined in RCW 4.56.250 by any one person that
exceeds the sum of one million dollars or any claim or judgment, or
portions thereof, that, when totaled with all other claims or judgments
paid by the state or its agencies, institutions, officers, employees,
or volunteers arising out of the same incident or occurrence, exceeds
the sum of two million dollars. However, a judgment or judgments may
be claimed and rendered in excess of these amounts and may be settled
and paid under this section up to one million dollars or two million
dollars, as the case may be, and that portion of the judgment that
exceeds these amounts may be reported to the legislature, but may be
paid in part or in whole only by further act of the legislature.
Notwithstanding the limited waiver of sovereign immunity provided in
this section, the state or an agency, institution, or any officer,
employee, or volunteer may agree, within the limits of insurance
coverage provided, to settle a claim made or a judgment rendered
against it without further action by the legislature, but the state or
agency has not waived any defense of sovereign immunity or increased
the limits of its liability as a result of its obtaining insurance
coverage for tortious acts in excess of the waiver provided in this
section.
(2) The liability of the state, its agencies, and institutions is
several only and is not joint.
(3) No attorney may charge, demand, receive, or collect, for
services rendered, fees in excess of twenty-five percent of any
judgment or settlement under this section.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply in cases in which
the state or its agencies, institutions, officers, employees, or
volunteers are held liable for civil damages resulting from any
negligent act or omission in the rendering of community placement,
community supervision, community custody, parole supervision, probation
supervision, or supervision of suspended sentences if (a) the offender
under supervision has ever been convicted of the crime of first or
second degree rape, first or second degree rape of a child, or first or
second degree homicide, and (b) the civil damages resulted from the
subsequent commission of one of these specified offenses.

Sec. 706 RCW 4.92.130 and 2002 c 332 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
A liability account in the custody of the treasurer is hereby
created as a nonappropriated account to be used solely and exclusively
for the payment of liability settlements and judgments against the
state under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq. or for the tortious conduct of
its officers, employees, and volunteers and all related legal defense
costs. Legislative appropriation is required for expenditures from the
liability account to the extent specified in RCW 4.92.090.
(1) The purpose of the liability account is to: (a) Expeditiously
pay legal liabilities and defense costs of the state resulting from
tortious conduct; (b) promote risk control through a cost allocation
system which recognizes agency loss experience, levels of self-retention, and levels of risk exposure; and (c) establish an
actuarially sound system to pay incurred losses, within defined limits.
(2) The liability account shall be used to pay claims for injury
and property damages and legal defense costs exclusive of agency-retained expenses otherwise budgeted.
(3) No money shall be paid from the liability account, except for
defense costs, unless all proceeds available to the claimant from any
valid and collectible liability insurance shall have been exhausted and
unless:
(a) The claim shall have been reduced to final judgment in a court
of competent jurisdiction and legislative appropriation has been made
to the extent required by RCW 4.92.090; or
(b) The claim has been approved for payment.
(4) The liability account shall be financed through annual premiums
assessed to state agencies, based on sound actuarial principles, and
shall be for liability coverage in excess of agency-budgeted self-retention levels.
(5) Annual premium levels shall be determined by the risk manager,
with the consultation and advice of the risk management advisory
committee. An actuarial study shall be conducted to assist in
determining the appropriate level of funding.
(6) Disbursements for claims from the liability account shall be
made to the claimant, or to the clerk of the court for judgments, upon
written request to the state treasurer from the risk manager.
(7) The director may direct agencies to transfer moneys from other
funds and accounts to the liability account if premiums are delinquent.
(8) The liability account shall not exceed fifty percent of the
actuarial value of the outstanding liability as determined annually by
the risk management division. If the account exceeds the maximum
amount specified in this section, premiums may be adjusted by the risk
management division in order to maintain the account balance at the
maximum limits. If, after adjustment of premiums, the account balance
remains above the limits specified, the excess amount shall be prorated
back to the appropriate funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 Sections 701 through 706 of this act apply
to all claims that have not been reduced to judgment on the effective
date of this section.

PART 8
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 A new section is added to chapter 4.28 RCW
to read as follows:
In any action for personal injuries, wrongful deaths, or damage to
property, in which the harm is alleged to have been caused by an act
which violates the appropriate standard of care to be exercised by an
individual licensed, certified, or registered by the state under Title
18 or 19 RCW or by the supreme court, the person initiating the action
shall serve upon each defendant an affidavit within ninety days of
service of process initiating the action. The affidavit shall be
executed by a person whose license, certification, or registration is
identical to the defendant. If there is more than one defendant, there
shall be an affidavit for each defendant. Each affidavit shall contain
a statement that the affiant believes there is a reasonable probability
that the defendant's conduct does not meet the standard of care
required to be exercised by the defendant. The affiant shall have no
financial interest in the outcome of the trial and have at least five
years of professional experience in the same vocation as the defendant
who is the subject of the affidavit. The affidavit shall be filed
within sixty days of the defendant answering the initial complaint.
In the event a defendant refuses to provide information necessary
to allow the execution of an affidavit, the court may, upon motion of
the plaintiff, waive the requirement following a hearing on the motion.
No hearing on the motion shall be held in fewer than forty-five days
following the receipt by the defendant of the request to provide the
information.
The court may, upon motion by the defendant and a showing of good
cause, grant only one additional period of forty-five days, following
the motion to waive the requirement of an affidavit, for the defendant
to provide the information required under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---