BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the people of the
state have benefited from the presence of the aerospace industry in
Washington state. The aerospace industry provides good wages and
benefits for the thousands of engineers, mechanics, and support staff
working directly in the industry throughout the state. The suppliers
and vendors that support the aerospace industry in turn provide a range
of jobs. The legislature declares that it is in the public interest to
encourage the continued presence of this industry through the provision
of tax incentives. The comprehensive tax incentives in this act
address the cost of doing business in Washington state compared to
locations in other states.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.250 and 1998 c 343 s 5 and 1998 c 312 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260
(5) or (13), 82.04.272, or subsection (2) of this section engaging
within this state in the business of making sales at retail, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(13), as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.260 and 2003 c 261 (2SHB 1240) s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits and vegetables, or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and
vegetables canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated by the
seller and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who
transports in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state,
the seller shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by
the department and retain the statement as a business record;
(d) Dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in
21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including byproducts
from the manufacturing of the dairy products such as whey and casein;
or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports
in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller
shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by the
department and retain the statement as a business record; and
(e) Alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, as those
terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol
fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock manufactured, multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. This subsection (1)(e) expires July 1,
2009.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales, at retail or wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the assemblies multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing nuclear fuel assemblies, as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(11) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to
such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income of such
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(12) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(13)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
section 17 of this act; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under section 17 of this act.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of
commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, manufactured by
that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the airplanes
or components multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
section 17 of this act; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under section 17 of this act.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (13), "commercial
airplane," "component," and "final assembly of a superefficient
airplane" have the meanings given in section 17 of this act.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (13) must report
as required under section 16 of this act.
(e) This subsection (13) does not apply after the earlier of: July
1, 2024; or December 31, 2007, if assembly of a superefficient airplane
does not begin by December 31, 2007, as determined under section 17 of
this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.260 and 2003 c 339 (EHB 2146) s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits and vegetables, or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and
vegetables canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated by the
seller and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who
transports in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state,
the seller shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by
the department and retain the statement as a business record;
(d) Dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in
21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including byproducts
from the manufacturing of the dairy products such as whey and casein;
or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports
in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller
shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by the
department and retain the statement as a business record; and
(e) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales, at retail or wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the assemblies multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing nuclear fuel assemblies, as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(11) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to
such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income of such
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(12) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(13)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
section 17 of this act; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under section 17 of this act.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of
commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, manufactured by
that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the airplanes
or components multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
section 17 of this act; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under section 17 of this act.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (13), "commercial
airplane," "component," and "final assembly of a superefficient
airplane" have the meanings given in section 17 of this act.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (13) must report
as required under section 16 of this act.
(e) This subsection (13) does not apply after the earlier of: July
1, 2024; or December 31, 2007, if assembly of a superefficient airplane
does not begin by December 31, 2007, as determined under section 17 of
this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.270 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 9 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
Upon every person except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260 (5) or
(13), 82.04.298, or 82.04.272 engaging within this state in the
business of making sales at wholesale; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds
of sales of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.440 and 1998 c 312 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities which are within the purview
of the provisions of two or more of sections RCW 82.04.230 to
82.04.290, inclusive, shall be taxable under each paragraph applicable
to the activities engaged in.
(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.250, 82.04.270, or 82.04.260
(4) or (13) with respect to selling products in this state shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes
paid with respect to the manufacturing of products so sold in this
state, and/or (b) extracting taxes paid with respect to the extracting
of products so sold in this state or ingredients of products so sold in
this state. Extracting taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of
this section may also be taken under this subsection, if otherwise
allowable under this subsection. The amount of the credit shall not
exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter with respect to the
sale of those products.
(3) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260(1)(b) shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with
respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured
in this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing
of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, or 82.04.260
(1), (2), (4), ((or)) (6), or (13) with respect to extracting or
manufacturing products in this state shall be allowed a credit against
those taxes for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to another state with
respect to the sales of the products so extracted or manufactured in
this state, (ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the
manufacturing of products using ingredients so extracted in this state,
or (iii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing
activities completed in another state for products so manufactured in
this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the extraction or
manufacturing of those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240 and 82.04.260 (1), (2),
((and)) (4), and (13), and (ii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to
other states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes the
tax imposed in RCW 82.04.230 and similar gross receipts taxes paid to
other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person for preproduction development spending
occurring after the effective date of this act.
(b) Before July 1, 2005, any credits earned under this section must
be accrued and carried forward and may not be used until July 1, 2005.
These carryover credits may be used at any time thereafter, and may be
carried over until used. Refunds may not be granted in the place of a
credit.
(2) The credit is equal to the amount of qualified preproduction
development expenditures of a person, multiplied by the rate of 1.5
percent.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section the
credit shall be taken against taxes due for the same calendar year in
which the qualified preproduction development expenditures are
incurred. Credit earned on or after July 1, 2005, may not be carried
over. The credit for each calendar year shall not exceed the amount of
tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year. Refunds
may not be granted in the place of a credit.
(4) Any person claiming the credit shall file an affidavit form
prescribed by the department that shall include the amount of the
credit claimed, an estimate of the anticipated preproduction
development expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, an estimate of the taxable amount during the calendar year
for which the credit is claimed, and such additional information as the
department may prescribe.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Aeronautics" means the study of flight and the science of
building and operating commercial aircraft.
(b) "Person" means a person as defined in RCW 82.04.030, who is a
manufacturer or processor for hire of commercial airplanes, or
components of such airplanes, as those terms are defined in section 17
of this act.
(c) "Preproduction development" means research, design, and
engineering activities performed in relation to the development of a
product, product line, model, or model derivative, including prototype
development, testing, and certification. The term includes the
discovery of technological information, the translating of
technological information into new or improved products, processes,
techniques, formulas, or inventions, and the adaptation of existing
products and models into new products or new models, or derivatives of
products or models. The term does not include manufacturing activities
or other production-oriented activities, however the term does include
tool design and engineering design for the manufacturing process. The
term does not include surveys and studies, social science and
humanities research, market research or testing, quality control, sale
promotion and service, computer software developed for internal use,
and research in areas such as improved style, taste, and seasonal
design.
(d) "Preproduction development spending" means qualified
preproduction development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified preproduction development.
(e) "Qualified preproduction development" means preproduction
development performed within this state in the field of aeronautics.
(f) "Qualified preproduction development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined by the department, benefits,
supplies, and computer expenses, directly incurred in qualified
preproduction development by a person claiming the credit provided in
this section. The term does not include amounts paid to a person other
than a public educational or research institution to conduct qualified
preproduction development. The term does not include capital costs and
overhead, such as expenses for land, structures, or depreciable
property.
(g) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's tax
returns during the year in which the credit is claimed, less any
taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under RCW 82.04.440.
(6) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person taking the credit under this section must report as required
under section 16 of this act.
(7) Credit may not be claimed for expenditures for which a credit
is claimed under RCW 82.04.4452.
(8) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for the investment related to design and preproduction
development computer software and hardware acquired between July 1,
1995, and the effective date of this act, and used by an eligible
person primarily for the digital design and development of commercial
airplanes. The credit shall be equal to the purchase price of such
property, multiplied by 8.44 percent. Credit taken in any one calendar
year may not exceed ten million dollars, and total lifetime credit
taken under this section by any one person may not exceed twenty
million dollars. Credit may be carried over until used.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Commercial airplane" has the meaning given in section 17 of
this act.
(b) "Design and preproduction development computer software and
hardware" means computer-aided three-dimensional interactive
applications and other solid modeling computer technology that allow
for electronic design and testing during product development.
(c) "Eligible person" means a person as defined in RCW 82.04.030,
who is a manufacturer of commercial airplanes.
(3) An application must be made to the department before taking the
credit under this section. The application shall be made to the
department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
application shall contain information regarding the uses of the
computer software and hardware, purchase price, dates of acquisition,
and other information required by the department. The department shall
rule on the application within sixty days. All applications must be
received by the department within one year of the effective date of
this act.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
computer hardware, computer peripherals, or software, not otherwise
eligible for exemption under RCW 82.08.02565, to a manufacturer or
processor for hire of commercial airplanes or components of such
airplanes, used primarily in the development, design, and engineering
of such products, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing the computer hardware, computer
peripherals, or software. The exemption is available only when the
buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of
the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) As used in this section, "commercial airplane" and "component"
have the meanings given in section 17 of this act. "Peripherals"
includes keyboards, monitors, mouse devices, and other accessories that
operate outside of the computer, excluding cables, conduit, wiring, and
other similar property.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of computer hardware, computer peripherals, or software, not
otherwise eligible for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565, by a
manufacturer or processor for hire of commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, used primarily in the development,
design, and engineering of such products, or to the use of labor and
services rendered in respect to installing the computer hardware,
computer peripherals, or software.
(2) As used in this section, "commercial airplane" and "component"
have the meanings given in section 17 of this act. "Peripherals"
includes keyboards, monitors, mouse devices, and other accessories that
operate outside of the computer, excluding cables, conduit, wiring, and
other similar property.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing of new
buildings by a manufacturer engaged in the manufacturing of
superefficient airplanes or by a port district, to be leased to a
manufacturer engaged in the manufacturing of superefficient airplanes,
to sales of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of such buildings during the course of the
constructing, or to labor and services rendered in respect to
installing, during the course of constructing, building fixtures not
otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW 82.08.02565(2)(b). The
exemption is available only when the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(2) No application is necessary for the tax exemption in this
section, however in order to qualify under this section before starting
construction the port district must have entered into an agreement with
the manufacturer to build such a facility. A person taking the
exemption under this section is subject to all the requirements of
chapter 82.32 RCW. In addition, the person must report as required
under section 16 of this act.
(3) The exemption in this section applies to buildings, or parts of
buildings, that are used exclusively in the manufacturing of
superefficient airplanes, including buildings used for the storage of
raw materials and finished product.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "superefficient airplane" has
the meaning given in section 17 of this act.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of new buildings by a manufacturer engaged in
the manufacturing of superefficient airplanes or owned by a port
district and to be leased to a manufacturer engaged in the
manufacturing of superefficient airplanes, during the course of
constructing such buildings, or to labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, during the course of constructing, building
fixtures not otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW
82.08.02565(2)(b).
(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in
section 11 of this act apply to this section.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 82.29A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) All leasehold interests in port district facilities exempt from
tax under section 11 or 12 of this act and used by a manufacturer
engaged in the manufacturing of superefficient airplanes, as defined in
section 17 of this act, are exempt from tax under this chapter. A
person taking the credit under section 15 of this act is not eligible
for the exemption under this section.
(2) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person taking the exemption under this section must report as required
under section 16 of this act.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2005, all buildings, machinery, equipment,
and other personal property of a lessee of a port district eligible
under sections 11 and 12 of this act, used exclusively in manufacturing
superefficient airplanes, are exempt from property taxation. A person
taking the credit under section 15 of this act is not eligible for the
exemption under this section. For the purposes of this section,
"superefficient airplane" and "component" have the meanings given in
section 17 of this act.
(2) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person taking the exemption under this section must report as required
under section 16 of this act.
(3) Claims for exemption authorized by this section shall be filed
with the county assessor on forms prescribed by the department and
furnished by the assessor. The assessor shall verify and approve
claims as the assessor determines to be justified and in accordance
with this section. No claims may be filed after December 31, 2023.
The department may adopt rules, under the provisions of chapter 34.05
RCW, as necessary to properly administer this section.
(4) This section applies to taxes levied for collection in 2006 and
thereafter.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for property taxes paid during the calendar year.
(2) The credit is equal to:
(a)(i) Property taxes paid on new buildings, and land upon which
this property is located, built after the effective date of this act,
and used in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such
airplanes; or
(ii) Property taxes attributable to an increase in assessed value
due to the renovation or expansion, after the effective date of this
act, of a building used in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes; and
(b) Property taxes paid on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 used in manufacturing commercial airplanes
or components of such airplanes and acquired after the effective date
of this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "commercial passenger
airplane" and "component" have the meanings given in section 17 of this
act.
(4) A person taking the credit under this section is subject to all
the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In addition, the person must
report as required under section 16 of this act. A credit earned
during one calendar year may be carried over to be credited against
taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried
over a second year. No refunds may be granted for credits under this
section.
(5) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person taking the credit under this section must report as required
under section 16 of this act.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under RCW 82.04.260(13) or who
claims an exemption or credit under sections 7 and 11 through 15 of
this act shall make an annual report to the department detailing
employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits
per job at the manufacturing site. The report shall not include names
of employees. The report shall also detail employment by the total
number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions. The first
report filed under this subsection shall include employment, wage, and
benefit information for the twelve-month period immediately before
first use of a preferential tax rate under RCW 82.04.260(13), or tax
exemption or credit under sections 7 and 11 through 15 of this act.
The report is due by March 31st following any year in which a
preferential tax rate under RCW 82.04.260(13) is used, or tax exemption
or credit under sections 7 and 11 through 15 of this act is taken.
This information is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of
RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection by the due date of the report, the department shall declare
the amount of taxes exempted or credited, or reduced in the case of the
preferential business and occupation tax rate, for that year to be
immediately due and payable. Excise taxes payable under this
subsection are subject to interest but not penalties, as provided under
this chapter. This information is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon
request.
(3) By November 1, 2010, and by November 1, 2023, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, shall report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of chapter . . ., Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. (this
act) in regard to keeping Washington competitive. The report shall
measure the effect of chapter . . ., Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. (this
act) on job retention, net jobs created for Washington residents,
company growth, diversification of the state's economy, cluster
dynamics, and other factors as the committees select. The reports
shall include a discussion of principles to apply in evaluating whether
the legislature should reenact any or all of the tax preferences in
chapter . . ., Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. (this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Chapter . . ., Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. (this act) takes
effect on the first day of the month in which the governor and a
manufacturer of commercial airplanes sign a memorandum of agreement
regarding an affirmative final decision to site a significant
commercial airplane final assembly facility in Washington state. The
department shall provide notice of the effective date of chapter . . .,
Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. (this act) to affected taxpayers, the
legislature, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(b) Chapter . . ., Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. (this act) is
contingent upon the siting of a significant commercial airplane final
assembly facility in the state of Washington. If a memorandum of
agreement under subsection (1) of this section is not signed by June
30, 2005, chapter . . ., Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. (this act) is null
and void.
(c)(i) The department shall make a determination regarding the date
final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington state.
The rates in RCW 82.04.260(13)(a)(ii) and (b)(ii) take effect the first
day of the month such assembly begins, or July 1, 2007, whichever is
later. The department shall provide notice of the effective date of
such rates to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed
appropriate by the department.
(ii) If on December 31, 2007, final assembly of a superefficient
airplane has not begun in Washington state, the department shall
provide notice of such to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and
others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Commercial airplane" has its ordinary meaning, which is an
airplane certified by the federal aviation administration for
transporting persons or property, and any military derivative of such
an airplane.
(b) "Component" means a part or system certified by the federal
aviation administration for installation or assembly into a commercial
airplane.
(c) "Final assembly of a superefficient airplane" means the
activity of assembling an airplane from components parts necessary for
its mechanical operation such that the finished commercial airplane is
ready to deliver to the ultimate consumer.
(d) "Significant commercial airplane final assembly facility" means
a location with the capacity to produce at least thirty-six
superefficient airplanes a year.
(e) "Siting" means a final decision by a manufacturer to locate a
significant commercial airplane final assembly facility in Washington
state.
(f) "Superefficient airplane" means a twin aisle airplane that
carries between two hundred and three hundred fifty passengers, with a
range of more than seven thousand two hundred nautical miles, a
cruising speed of approximately mach .85, and that uses fifteen to
twenty percent less fuel than other similar airplanes on the market.

--- END ---