BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature intends to
authorize the establishment of public charter schools within the
general and uniform system of public schools for the primary purpose of
providing more high-quality learning environments to assist
educationally disadvantaged students and other students in meeting the
state's academic standards. The legislature intends for charter
schools to function as an integral element of the public school system
maintained at public expense, free from discrimination, and open to all
students in the state, and to be subject to the same or greater
academic standards and performance outcomes as other public schools.
The legislature intends to encourage school districts to consider using
the chartering process as an optional tool to achieve state and federal
academic accountability goals. The legislature finds that in addition
to providing more high-quality public school choices for families,
teachers, and students, public charter schools may be a tool to improve
schools in which significant numbers of students persistently fail to
meet state or federal standards. The legislature also intends to
authorize the use of the chartering process as a state intervention
strategy, consistent with the provisions of the federal no child left
behind act of 2001, to provide assistance to schools in which
significant numbers of students persistently fail to meet state and
federal standards. The legislature also intends to ensure
accountability of charter schools through the use of performance audits
and a comprehensive study of charter schools, and to use the
information generated to demonstrate how charter schools can contribute
to existing education reform efforts focused on raising student
academic achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Alternate sponsor" means: (a) The board of directors of an
educational service district that has agreed to assume the rights and
responsibilities of an alternate sponsor and to implement and
administer a charter approved by the superintendent of public
instruction under section 7 of this act; or (b) the superintendent of
public instruction if the superintendent has approved a charter under
section 7 of this act.
(2) "Applicant" means a nonprofit corporation that has submitted an
application to a sponsor or has filed an appeal with the superintendent
of public instruction to obtain approval to operate a charter school.
The nonprofit corporation must be either a public benefit nonprofit
corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.490, or a nonprofit corporation as
defined in RCW 24.03.005 that has applied for tax-exempt status under
section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3)). The nonprofit corporation may not be a sectarian or
religious organization and must meet all of the requirements for a
public benefit nonprofit corporation before receiving any funding under
section 12 of this act.
(3) "Charter school board" means the board of directors appointed
or elected by the applicant to manage and operate the charter school,
and may include one member of the local school district board of
directors who may serve as an ex officio member.
(4) "Charter" means a five-year contract between an applicant and
a sponsor or an alternate sponsor. The charter establishes, in
accordance with this chapter, the terms and conditions for the
management, operation, and educational program of the charter school.
(5) "Charter school" means a public school managed by a charter
school board and operating according to the terms of a charter approved
under this chapter and includes a new charter school and a conversion
charter school.
(6) "Conversion charter school" means a charter school created by
converting an existing public school in its entirety to a charter
school under this chapter.
(7) "Educationally disadvantaged students" includes students with
limited English proficiency; students with special needs, including
students with disabilities; economically disadvantaged students,
including students who qualify for free and reduced priced meals;
students exercising choice options and seeking supplemental services
under the federal no child left behind act of 2001; and other students
who may be at risk of failing to meet state and federal academic
performance standards.
(8) "New charter school" means any charter school created under
this chapter that is not a conversion charter school.
(9) "Sponsor" means the board of directors of the school district
in which the proposed charter school will be located, if the board has
approved a charter or if the board has agreed to administer and
implement a charter approved and authorized by the superintendent of
public instruction under the appeal process in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 CHARTER SCHOOLS--POWERS. (1) To carry out
its duty to manage and operate the charter school, the charter school
board may:
(a) Hire, manage, and discharge any charter school employee in
accordance with the terms of this chapter and that school's charter;
(b) Enter into a contract with any school district, or any other
public or private entity, also empowered to enter into contracts, for
any and all real property, equipment, goods, supplies, and services,
including educational instructional services; however, this authority
does not permit assigning, delegating, or contracting out the
administration and management of a charter school to a for-profit
entity;
(c) Rent, lease, or own property, but may not acquire property by
eminent domain. All charters and charter school contracts with other
public and private entities must include provisions regarding the
disposition of the property if the charter school fails to open as
planned or closes, or the charter is revoked or not renewed;
(d) Issue secured and unsecured debt to manage cash flow, improve
operations, or finance the acquisition of real property or equipment.
The issuance is not a general, special, or moral obligation of the
state, the charter school sponsor, the school district in which the
charter school is located, or any other political subdivision or agency
of the state. Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power
of the state, the charter school sponsor, the school district in which
the charter school is located, or any other political subdivision or
agency of the state may be pledged for the payment of the debt;
(e) Accept and administer for the benefit of the charter school and
its students, gifts, grants, and donations from other governmental and
private entities, excluding sectarian or religious organizations.
Charter schools may not accept any gifts or donations the conditions of
which violate this chapter.
(2) A charter school may not charge tuition, levy taxes, or issue
tax-backed bonds, however it may charge fees for optional noncredit
extracurricular events.
(3) Neither a charter school sponsor nor an alternate sponsor is
liable for acts or omissions of a charter school or its charter school
board, including but not limited to acts or omissions related to the
application, the charter, the operation, the performance, and the
closure of the charter school.
(4) A local school district board may appoint one of its directors
to serve as an ex officio member of the board of directors of a charter
school located in the school district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 LEGAL STATUS. A charter school is a public
school including one or more of grades kindergarten through twelve,
operated by a board of directors appointed or elected by a charter
school applicant, according to the terms of a renewable five-year
contract granted by a sponsor or an alternate sponsor. A charter
school may offer any program or course of study that another public
school may offer. A charter school must allow students who are
receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW to
participate in its programs on a part-time basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 CHARTER SCHOOLS--EXEMPTIONS. (1) A charter
school shall operate according to the terms of a charter approved by a
sponsor or by the superintendent of public instruction under this
chapter.
(2) Charter schools are exempt from all state statutes and rules
applicable to school districts and school district boards of directors,
including but not limited to rules regarding the expenditure of state
allocations as provided in section 12 of this act, except those
statutes and rules as provided for and made applicable to charter
schools in accordance with this chapter and in the school's approved
charter.
(3) A charter school's board of directors shall implement a quality
management system and conduct annual self-assessments.
(4) All approved charter schools shall:
(a) Comply with state and federal health, safety, parents' rights,
civil rights, and nondiscrimination laws, including, but not limited
to, the family educational rights and privacy act (20 U.S.C. 1232g),
chapter 28A.640 RCW (sexual equality), and Title IX of the education
amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) applicable to school
districts, and to the same extent as school districts;
(b) Participate in free and reduced priced meal programs to the
same extent as is required for other public schools;
(c) Participate in nationally normed standardized achievement tests
as required in RCW 28A.230.190, 28A.230.193, and 28A.230.230 and the
elementary, middle school, and high school standards, requirements, and
assessment examinations as required in chapter 28A.655 RCW;
(d) Employ certificated instructional staff as required in RCW
28A.410.010, however charter schools may hire noncertificated
instructional staff of unusual competence and in exceptional cases as
specified in RCW 28A.150.260;
(e) Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW
28A.400.303;
(f) Be subject to financial examinations and audits as determined
by the state auditor, including annual audits for legal and fiscal
compliance;
(g) Be subject to independent performance audits by a qualified
contractor selected jointly by the state auditor and the joint
legislative audit and review committee beginning at the conclusion of
the third year of the school's operation, and at least once every three
years thereafter; however, a charter school is not required to bear the
expense of the audits;
(h) Comply with the annual performance report under RCW
28A.655.110;
(i) Follow the performance improvement goals and requirements
adopted by the academic achievement and accountability commission by
rule under RCW 28A.655.030;
(j) Be subject to the accountability requirements of the federal no
child left behind act of 2001, including Title I requirements;
(k) Comply with and be subject to the requirements under the
individuals with disabilities education act, as amended in 1997;
(l) Comply with and be subject to the requirements under the
federal educational rights and privacy act;
(m) Report at least annually to the board of directors of the
school district in which the charter school is located, to the school's
alternate sponsor if the school is not sponsored by a school district,
and to parents of children enrolled at the charter school on progress
toward the student performance goals specified in the charter;
(n) Comply with the open public meetings act in chapter 42.30 RCW
and open public records requirements in RCW 42.17.250;
(o) Be subject to and comply with legislation enacted after the
effective date of this section governing the operation and management
of charter schools; and
(p) Conduct annual self assessments of its quality management
program.
(5) A member of a board of directors of a charter school is a board
member of a school district for the purposes of public disclosure
requirements and must comply with the reporting requirements in RCW
42.17.240.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 ADMISSION REQUIREMENTS. (1) To effectuate
the primary purpose for which the legislature established charter
schools, a charter school must be willing to enroll educationally
disadvantaged students and may not limit admission on any basis other
than age group and grade level. Consistent with the legislative intent
of this chapter, a charter school shall conduct timely outreach and
marketing efforts to educationally disadvantaged students in the school
district in which the charter school will be located.
(2) A conversion charter school must be structured to provide
sufficient capacity to enroll all students who wish to remain enrolled
in the school after its conversion to a charter school, and may not
displace students enrolled before the chartering process. If, after
enrollment of these students, capacity is insufficient to enroll all
other students remaining who have submitted a timely application, the
charter school must give enrollment priority to siblings of students
who are currently enrolled in the school. Students selected to fill
any remaining spaces must be selected only through an equitable
selection process, such as a lottery.
(3) A new charter school must enroll all students who submit a
timely application if capacity is sufficient. If capacity is
insufficient to enroll all students who apply, students must be
selected to fill any remaining spaces only through an equitable
selection process, such as a lottery. Siblings of enrolled students
must be given priority in enrollment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 CHARTER APPLICATION--CHARTERING PROCESS.
(1) An applicant may apply to a sponsor or may appeal to the
superintendent of public instruction for approval to establish a
charter school under this section. An application may not be submitted
earlier than eighteen months before, nor later than four months before,
the proposed date of opening the school.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall establish
guidelines for the timely receipt and approval of applications to
facilitate the efficient implementation of this act. Guidelines
established under this subsection shall reflect efficient processes for
the expeditious and orderly start-up of charter schools in a timely
manner for the purpose of serving students.
(3) An application for a charter school must be submitted first to
the board of directors of the school district in which the proposed
charter school will be located, allowing for the board's consideration
of the application in accordance with subsections (4) and (5) of this
section, before an appeal may be filed with the superintendent of
public instruction. A copy of each application submitted to a sponsor
also must be provided to the superintendent of public instruction.
(4) The school district board of directors must decide, within
forty-five days of receipt of the application, whether to hold a public
hearing in the school district to take public comment on the
application and, if a hearing is to be held, must schedule it within
seventy-five days of receipt of the application. If the school board
intends to accept the application, one or more public hearings must be
held before granting a charter; however a school board is not required
to hold a public hearing before rejecting an application. The school
board must either accept or reject the application within one hundred
five days after receipt of the application. The one hundred five-day
deadline for accepting or rejecting the charter school application may
be extended for an additional thirty days if both parties agree in
writing.
(5) If the school board does not hold a public hearing or rejects
the application after holding one or more public hearings, the school
board must notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for that
decision. The applicant may submit a revised application for the
school board's reconsideration and the school board may provide
assistance to improve the application. If the school board rejects the
application after a revised application is submitted, the school board
must notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the rejection.
(6) At the request of the applicant or the sponsor, the
superintendent of public instruction may review the charter application
and provide technical assistance.
(7) If a school district board does not approve an application to
start a new charter school, the applicant may file an appeal to the
superintendent of public instruction for further review of the
application.
(8) Upon receipt of a request for review, the superintendent must
attempt to mediate a resolution between the applicant and the school
district board, and may recommend to the applicant and school district
board revisions to the application.
(9) If the school district board does not accept the revisions and
does not approve the application, the superintendent must review the
application. The superintendent, after exercising due diligence and
good faith, must approve the application if the superintendent finds:
(a) The criteria in section 9 of this act have been met; (b) the
approval will be within the annual limits in section 16 (1) and (2) of
this act; and (c) the approval is consistent with the legislative
intent for which charter schools are authorized and is in the best
interests of the children of the proposed school. The superintendent
may permit the board of directors of an educational service district to
assume the rights and responsibilities of implementing and
administering a charter approved under this section, but if no such
board agrees to assume the role of alternate sponsor, the
superintendent of public instruction shall assume the rights and
responsibilities of implementing and administering the charter and
shall become the alternate sponsor.
(10) The superintendent must reject the application if the
superintendent finds: (a) The criteria in section 9 of this act have
not been met; (b) the approval will not be within the annual limits
established in section 16 (1) and (2) of this act; or (c) the approval
is inconsistent with the legislative intent for which charter schools
are authorized and is not in the best interests of the children of the
proposed school. If the superintendent rejects the application, the
superintendent must notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for
the rejection.
(11) Educational service districts and the superintendent of public
instruction are encouraged to assist schools and school districts in
which significant numbers of students persistently fail to meet state
standards with completing the chartering process. Assistance from an
educational service district or from the superintendent of public
instruction may include, but is not limited to, identifying potential
eligible applicants, and assisting with the charter application and
approval processes.
(12) Consistent with the corrective action provisions in the
federal no child left behind act of 2001, the superintendent of public
instruction may use the chartering process as an intervention strategy
to meet federal student achievement and accountability requirements.
The superintendent may require a local school district board of
directors to convert a public school to a charter public school or, if
the superintendent determines it would be more appropriate, may require
a local school district board of directors to consent to conversion of
the school by an educational service district board of directors or the
superintendent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS. The charter
school application is a proposed contract and must include:
(1) The identification and description of the nonprofit corporation
submitting the application, including the names, descriptions,
curriculum vitae, and qualifications of the individuals who will
operate the school, all of which are subject to verification and
review;
(2) The nonprofit corporation's articles of incorporation, bylaws,
and most recent financial statement and balance sheet;
(3) A mission statement for the proposed school, consistent with
the description of legislative intent in this chapter, including a
statement of whether the proposed charter school's primary purpose is
to serve educationally disadvantaged students;
(4) A description of the school's educational program, curriculum,
and instructional strategies, including but not limited to how the
charter school will assist its students, including educationally
disadvantaged students, in meeting the state's academic standards;
(5) A description of the school's admissions policy and marketing
program, and its deadlines for applications and admissions, including
its program for community outreach to families of educationally
disadvantaged students;
(6) A description of the school's student performance standards and
requirements that must meet or exceed those determined under chapter
28A.655 RCW, and be measured according to the assessment system
determined under chapter 28A.655 RCW;
(7) A description of the school's plan to evaluate student
performance and the procedures for taking corrective action if student
performance at the charter school falls below standards established in
its charter;
(8) A description of the financial plan for the school. The plan
shall include: (a) A proposed five-year budget of projected revenues
and expenditures; (b) a plan for starting the school; (c) a five-year
facilities plan; (d) evidence supporting student enrollment projections
of at least twenty students; and (e) a description of major contracts
planned for administration, management, equipment, and services,
including consulting services, leases, improvements, real property
purchases, and insurance;
(9) A description of the proposed financial management procedures
and administrative operations, which shall meet or exceed generally
accepted standards of management and public accounting;
(10) An assessment of the school's potential legal liability and a
description of the types and limits of insurance coverage the nonprofit
corporation plans to obtain. A liability insurance policy of at least
five million dollars is required;
(11) A description of the procedures to discipline, suspend, and
expel students;
(12) A description of procedures to assure the health and safety of
students, employees, and guests of the school and to comply with
applicable federal and state health and safety laws and regulations;
(13) A description of the school's program for parent involvement
in the charter school;
(14) Documentation sufficient to demonstrate that the charter
school will have the liquid assets available to operate the school on
an ongoing and sound financial basis;
(15) Supporting documentation for any additional requirements that
are appropriate and reasonably related to operating the charter school
that a sponsor or alternate sponsor may impose as a condition of
approving the charter; and
(16) A description of the quality management plan for the school,
including its specific components.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 APPROVAL CRITERIA. A sponsor or alternate
sponsor may approve an application for a charter school, if in the
sponsor's or alternate sponsor's reasonable judgment, after exercising
due diligence and good faith, the sponsor or alternate sponsor finds:
(1) The applicant is an eligible public benefit nonprofit
corporation and the individuals it proposes to manage and operate the
school are qualified to operate a charter school and implement the
proposed educational program that is free from religious or sectarian
influence;
(2) The public benefit nonprofit corporation has been approved or
conditionally approved by the internal revenue service for tax exempt
status under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26
U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3));
(3) The mission statement is consistent with the description of
legislative intent and restrictions on charter school operations in
this chapter. The sponsor or alternate sponsor must make a finding of
whether or not the charter school's primary purpose is to serve
educationally disadvantaged students;
(4) The school's educational program, including its curriculum and
instructional strategies, is likely to assist its students, including
its educationally disadvantaged students, in meeting the state's
academic standards;
(5) The school's admissions policy and marketing program is
consistent with state and federal law, and includes community outreach
to families of educationally disadvantaged students;
(6) The school's proposed educational program includes student
academic performance standards and requirements that meet or exceed
those determined under chapter 28A.655 RCW and are measured according
to the assessment system determined under chapter 28A.655 RCW;
(7) The application includes a viable plan to evaluate pupil
performance and procedures to take appropriate corrective action if
pupil performance at the charter school falls below standards
established in its charter;
(8) The financial plan for the school is designed to reasonably
support the charter school's educational program based on a review of
the proposed five-year budget of projected revenues, expenditures, and
facilities;
(9) The school's financial and administrative operations, including
its audits, meet or exceed generally accepted standards of accounting
and management;
(10) The assessment of the school's potential legal liability, and
the types and limits of insurance coverage the school plans to obtain,
are adequate. A minimum liability insurance policy of five million
dollars is required;
(11) The procedures the school plans to follow to discipline,
suspend, and expel students are reasonable and comply with state and
federal law;
(12) The procedures the school plans to follow to assure the health
and safety of students, employees, and guests of the school comply with
applicable state and federal health and safety laws and regulations;
(13) The school has developed a program for parent involvement in
the charter school;
(14) The charter school will have the liquid assets available to
operate the school on an ongoing and sound financial basis;
(15) The applicant has met any additional requirements that are
appropriate and reasonably related to the operation of a charter school
that a sponsor or alternate sponsor imposed as a condition for approval
of the charter; and
(16) The quality management plan for the school is adequate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 CHARTER AGREEMENT--AMENDMENT. (1) A
charter application approved by a sponsor or an alternate sponsor with
any changes or additions, and signed by an authorized representative of
the applicant and the sponsor or alternate sponsor, constitutes a
charter. A charter to convert a public school must include provisions
for the disposition, including assignment or reassignment, of the
employees of the school before its conversion and after conversion.
(2) A charter may be amended during its term at the request of the
charter school board of directors and on the approval of the sponsor or
alternate sponsor.
(3) A charter may not prohibit and must provide for the application
of laws applicable to charter schools or to charter school boards of
directors enacted after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 CHARTER RENEWAL AND REVOCATION. (1) An
approved plan to establish a charter school is effective for five years
from the first day of operation. At the conclusion of the first three
years of operation, the charter school may apply to the original
sponsor or alternate sponsor for renewal. A request for renewal must
be submitted no later than six months before the expiration of the
charter.
(2) A charter school renewal application must include:
(a) A report on the progress of the charter school in achieving the
goals; student performance standards, including the student performance
standards adopted by rule by the academic achievement and
accountability commission in accordance with RCW 28A.655.030; the
number and percentage of educationally disadvantaged students served;
and other terms of the charter;
(b) A financial statement that discloses the costs of
administration, instruction, and other expenditure objects and
activities of the charter school; and
(c) All audit information from independent sources regarding the
charter school, if available, and all self assessments and
corresponding corrective action plans.
(3) The sponsor or alternate sponsor shall reject the application
for renewal if the academic progress of students in the charter school,
as measured by the standards and assessments in chapter 28A.655 RCW, is
inferior, for the most recent two consecutive years, to the average
progress of students in the district in which the charter school is
located when similar student populations are compared.
(4) The sponsor or alternate sponsor may reject the application for
renewal if any of the following occurred:
(a) The charter school materially violated its charter with the
sponsor or alternate sponsor;
(b) The students enrolled in the charter school failed to meet
student performance standards identified in the charter, including the
student performance standards adopted by rule by the academic
achievement and accountability commission in accordance with RCW
28A.655.030;
(c) The charter school failed to meet generally accepted standards
of fiscal management; or
(d) The charter school violated provisions in law that have not
been waived in accordance with this chapter.
(5) A sponsor or alternate sponsor shall give written notice of its
intent not to renew the charter school's request for renewal to the
charter school within three months of the request for renewal in order
to allow the charter school an opportunity to correct identified
deficiencies in its operation. At the request of the board of
directors of the charter school, the sponsor or alternate sponsor shall
review its decision for nonrenewal within forty-five days of receiving
a request for review and supporting documentation sufficient to
demonstrate that any deficiencies have been corrected.
(6)(a) The sponsor or alternate sponsor may revoke a previously
approved charter before the expiration of the term of the charter, and
before application for renewal, if any of the following occurred:
(i) The charter school materially violated its charter with the
sponsor or alternate sponsor;
(ii) The charter school failed to meet generally accepted standards
of fiscal management; or
(iii) The charter school violated provisions in law that have not
been waived in accordance with this chapter.
(b) Except in cases of emergency where the health and safety of
children are at risk, a charter may not be revoked unless the sponsor
or alternate sponsor first provides:
(i) Written notice to the charter school of the specific violations
alleged;
(ii) One or more public hearings in the school district in which
the charter school is located; and
(iii) A reasonable opportunity and a sufficient period of time for
the charter school to correct the identified deficiencies.
(c) If, after following the procedures in (b) of this subsection,
the sponsor or alternate sponsor determines that revoking the charter
is necessary to further the intent of this chapter, the sponsor or
alternate sponsor may revoke the charter. The sponsor or alternate
sponsor shall provide for an appeal process upon such a determination.
(d) If a sponsor or alternate sponsor revokes the charter, the
sponsor or alternate sponsor, upon a request by the charter school,
shall provide technical assistance to the charter school to complete
the plan required and carry out the tasks identified in subsection (7)
of this section.
(7) A charter school planning to close or anticipating revocation
or nonrenewal of its charter shall provide a plan setting forth a
timeline and the responsible parties for disposition of students and
student records and disposition of finances.
(a) Immediately following the decision to close a school, the
school must:
(i) Submit to the sponsor or alternate sponsor a list of parent
addresses and proof that the school has communicated the impending
closure of the school to all parents and staff;
(ii) Assign staff responsible for transition of student records and
for providing assistance to students and parents in transferring from
the charter school to the district public, private, or home school
chosen by the family;
(iii) Provide the names and contact information for staff
responsible for transfer of student records, as well as the projected
transition tasks and timelines to the sponsor or alternate sponsor, and
upon completion of student transition, provide a list of students and
a brief description of the disposition of their student records to the
sponsor or alternate sponsor.
(b) Before closing the charter school the charter school board of
directors shall:
(i) Identify a trustee who will, through the process of closing the
school and for a term of ten years after closing, assume responsibility
for school and student records, and notify the sponsor or alternate
sponsor of the name and contact information for the trustee;
(ii) Determine the amount of anticipated revenue due to the school
as well as anticipated liabilities, and provide a complete asset and
liability report to the sponsor or alternate sponsor;
(iii) Create a current and projected payroll and payroll benefits
commitment;
(iv) List each employee, job, and the funds necessary to complete
the educational calendar balance of the year, the transition of
students and records, and the administrative close-down tasks;
(v) Determine the total moneys required to complete contracts;
(vi) Schedule an audit and set aside funds to cover costs; and
(vii) Provide the sponsor or alternate sponsor with a plan to close
the school and to dispose of all property owned by the charter school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 FUNDING. (1) The superintendent of public
instruction shall provide prompt and timely funding for a charter
school including regular apportionment, special education, categorical,
student achievement, and other nonbasic education moneys. Allocations
shall be based on the statewide average staff mix ratio of all
noncharter public schools from the prior school year and the school's
actual FTE enrollment, except that vocational education funding for
grades nine through twelve shall be provided based on eighteen and one-half percent of the charter school's actual FTE enrollment for grades
nine through twelve. Enhanced staff ratio funding provided to school
districts through the omnibus appropriations act shall be allocated to
a charter school regardless of whether the school maintains the
enhanced staffing ratio. A charter school is not eligible for enhanced
small school assistance funding. Categorical funding shall be
allocated to a charter school based on the same funding criteria used
for noncharter public schools, except that the charter school is exempt
from rules and statutes regarding the expenditure of these funds. A
charter school is eligible to apply for state grants on the same basis
as a school district. Those allocations to a charter school that are
included in RCW 84.52.0531(3) (a) through (c) shall be included in the
levy base of the district in which the charter school is located.
(2) For charter schools sponsored by a school district:
(a) Conversion charter schools are eligible for local levy moneys
approved by the voters before the start-up date of the school as
determined by the sponsor, and the school district shall allocate levy
moneys to a conversion charter school.
(b) New charter schools are not eligible for local levy moneys
approved by the voters before the start-up date of the school as
determined by the sponsor, and the district shall not allocate those
levy moneys to a new school.
(c) For levies submitted to voters after the start-up date of a
charter school, the school shall be included in levy planning, budgets,
and funding distribution in the same manner as other district-sponsored
public schools.
(d) A conversion charter school is eligible for state matching
funds for common school construction if a sponsoring school district
determines it has received voter approval of local capital funds for
the project.
(e) A conversion charter school is entitled to the continued rent-free use of its existing facility, regardless of whether the conversion
school is sponsored by the local school district or by an alternate
sponsor. The district remains responsible for major repairs and safety
upgrades that may be required for the continued use of the facility as
a public school. The charter school is responsible for routine
maintenance of the facility, including but not limited to, cleaning,
painting, gardening, and landscaping.
(3) No local levy money may be allocated to a charter school if the
charter school is sponsored by an alternate sponsor.
(4) Within available funds as the legislature may appropriate, new
charter schools operating for the primary purpose of serving
educationally disadvantaged students under section 16(2) of this act
that are not otherwise eligible for levy money shall receive state
funding in an amount not greater than the amount the school would have
received if eligible.
(5) Sponsors and alternate sponsors shall submit, by November 1st
of each year, to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, annual year-end financial information, as prescribed by
the superintendent, for each charter school sponsored in the previous
school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 ADMINISTRATION FEE. To offset costs to
oversee and administer the charter, a sponsor or an alternate sponsor
may retain up to three percent of state funding and local excess levy
funding, if applicable, allocated to the charter school. Except for
the administration fee in this section, no other offsets or deductions
are allowed, whether for central administration or other off-site
support services, from a charter school's per-pupil share of state
appropriations, local levies, or other funds, unless the charter school
has contracted with a school district to obtain specific additional
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 LEAVES OF ABSENCE. If a school district
employee makes a written request for an extended leave of absence to
work at a charter school, the school district shall grant the request.
The school district may require that the request for leave be made up
to ninety days before the employee would otherwise have to report for
duty. The leave shall be granted for any request for up to two years.
If the employee returns to the school district within the two-year
period, the employee shall be hired before the district hires anyone
else with fewer years of statewide service, with respect to any
position for which the returning employee is certificated or otherwise
qualified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 STUDY OF CHARTER SCHOOLS. Subject to
funding, the Washington institute for public policy shall study the
implementation and effectiveness of this act. The institute shall
report to the legislature on the effectiveness of charter schools in
raising student achievement and the impact of charter schools. The
institute also shall examine and discuss whether and how charter
schools have enhanced education reform efforts and recommend whether
relaxing or eliminating certain regulatory requirements for other
public schools could result in improved school performance at those
schools. The institute shall recommend changes to this chapter
including improvements that could be made to the application and
approval process. A preliminary report of the study is due to the
legislature by March 1, 2007, and a final report is due September 1,
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 NUMBER OF CHARTER SCHOOLS. (1) A maximum
of forty-five new charter schools may be established statewide during
the six consecutive years in which new charter schools are authorized
to be created under this chapter.
(a) For purposes of this section, a year begins on July 1st and
ends on June 30th. In each of the three years beginning July 1, 2004,
and ending June 30, 2007, not more than five new charter schools may be
established. In each of the three years beginning July 1, 2007, and
ending June 30, 2010, not more than ten new charter schools may be
established.
(b) These annual allocations are cumulative so that if the maximum
number of allowable new charters is not reached in any given year the
maximums are increased accordingly for the successive years, but in no
case shall the total number exceed forty-five without further
legislative authorization.
(c) Applications for charter schools may be submitted on the
effective date of this section.
(d) The superintendent of public instruction shall maintain copies
of all approved charter applications. An applicant may obtain copies
of those applications from the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(2) Consistent with the legislative intent of this chapter, a
majority of the annual number of new charter schools that may be
established under subsection (1) of this section are reserved to
implement charter schools established for the primary purpose of
serving educationally disadvantaged students, and that are located in,
or accessible to students who live in, geographic areas in which a
large proportion of the students have difficulty meeting state academic
content and student achievement standards, or geographic areas,
including urban and rural areas, in which a large proportion or number
of public schools have been identified for improvement, corrective
action, or restructuring under the federal no child left behind act of
2001, as follows:
(a) For new schools allowed during the first year beginning July 1,
2004, a majority are reserved until the thirty-first day after the
effective date of this section; and
(b) For new schools allowed during the second through sixth years,
a majority are reserved until March 31st of each year.
(3) To ensure compliance with the annual limits for establishing
new charter schools, authorization from the superintendent of public
instruction must be obtained before implementing an approved charter
for a new school. Sponsors and alternate sponsors shall promptly
notify the superintendent of public instruction when a charter is
approved, and shall indicate whether the charter school's primary
purpose is to serve educationally disadvantaged students. Upon the
receipt of notice from a sponsor or alternate sponsor that a charter
has been approved, the superintendent shall authorize implementing the
approved charter establishing the school in compliance with the limits
on the maximum number of new charters allowed under subsection (1) of
this section and in compliance with the dates until which the majority
of new charters each year are reserved under subsection (2) of this
section. If the superintendent receives simultaneous notification of
approved charters that exceed the annual allowable limits in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the superintendent shall
select approved charters for authorization through a lottery process,
and shall assign implementation dates accordingly.
(4) If the number of charters reserved each year under subsection
(2) of this section is not reached by the thirty-first day after the
effective date of this section, or by March 31st of the second through
sixth years, the superintendent of public instruction shall notify the
sponsors or alternate sponsors of any other approved charters for which
authorization has not been granted under subsection (3) of this
section, and shall authorize implementing those charters within the
annual limits, regardless of whether those charters meet the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall notify eligible
sponsors and eligible alternate sponsors when the maximum allowable
number of new charters has been reached each year. If the maximum
number is not reached by the thirty-first day after the effective date
of this section, or by March 31st of the second through sixth years,
the superintendent shall report on the number of charters approved.
(6) A school district board of directors may establish a conversion
charter school during the six consecutive years in which charter
schools are authorized under this chapter for any school, including an
alternative school, that has failed to make adequate yearly progress
for the most recent three consecutive years, or is eligible for school
improvement assistance. Determinations regarding adequate yearly
progress and eligibility for school improvement assistance must be made
by the superintendent of public instruction.
(7) A new charter school or a conversion charter school operating
according to the terms of its charter to the satisfaction of its
sponsor or alternate sponsor may continue to operate after June 30,
2010, under a charter renewed by its sponsor or alternate sponsor under
section 11 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter
applies to new charter schools created under chapter 28A.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 16 and 25 of this act). Notwithstanding RCW
41.56.060 and 41.56.070, the bargaining units of classified employees
of a new charter school must be limited to the employees of the new
charter school and must be separate from other bargaining units in the
school district or educational service district for at least the first
five years of operation of the new charter school. After the five-year
period, the employees in a bargaining unit of a new charter school may
indicate by a majority vote that they desire to become members of a
bargaining unit in the school district in which the new charter school
is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
At the time of creation of a conversion charter school under
chapter 28A.-- RCW (sections 1 through 16 and 25 of this act), the
employees of a conversion charter school remain in any existing
appropriate bargaining unit of employees of the school district in
which the conversion charter school is located. If an applicant for a
charter school or a charter school board requests one or more variances
from a collective bargaining agreement that applies to the relevant
school district bargaining unit to address needs that are specific to
the charter school and the employees of the charter school, the
following applies:
(1) At the request of either party, the public employer, in
consultation with the applicant or charter school board, and the
bargaining representative of the bargaining unit shall negotiate
concerning the issues raised in the variance request.
(2) If the parties are unable to conclude an agreement regarding
the variance request within twenty days of negotiations, either party
may declare an impasse and submit the dispute to the commission for
mediation. The commission shall appoint a mediator within two days of
the submission. Mediation under this subsection shall continue for up
to ten days unless the parties agree otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to school districts, this chapter applies to new
charter schools created under chapter 28A.-- RCW (sections 1 through 16
and 25 of this act). Notwithstanding RCW 41.59.070 and 41.59.080, the
bargaining units of educational employees of a new charter school must
be limited to the educational employees of the new charter school and
must be separate from the bargaining units in the school district or
educational service district for at least the first five years of
operation of the new charter school. After the five-year period, the
employees in a bargaining unit of a new charter school may indicate by
a majority vote that they desire to become members of a bargaining unit
in the school district in which the new charter school is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
At the time of creation of a conversion charter school under
chapter 28A.-- RCW (sections 1 through 16 and 25 of this act), the
employees of a conversion charter school remain in any existing
appropriate bargaining unit of employees of the school district in
which the conversion charter school is located. If an applicant for a
charter school or a charter school board requests one or more variances
from a collective bargaining agreement that applies to the relevant
school district bargaining unit to address needs that are specific to
the charter school and the employees of the charter school, the
following applies:
(1) At the request of either party, the employer, in consultation
with the applicant or charter school board, and the exclusive
bargaining representative of the bargaining unit shall negotiate
concerning the issues raised in the variance request.
(2) If the parties are unable to conclude an agreement regarding
the variance request within twenty days of negotiations, either party
may declare an impasse and submit the dispute to the commission for
mediation. The commission shall appoint a mediator within two days of
the submission. Mediation under this subsection shall continue for up
to ten days unless the parties agree otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
to read as follows:
This section designates charter schools as employers and charter
school employees as members, and applies only if the department of
retirement systems receives determinations from the internal revenue
service and the United States department of labor that participation
does not jeopardize the status of these retirement systems as
governmental plans under the federal employees' retirement income
security act and the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
to read as follows:
This section designates charter schools as employers and charter
school employees as members, and applies only if the department of
retirement systems receives determinations from the internal revenue
service and the United States department of labor that participation
does not jeopardize the status of these retirement systems as
governmental plans under the federal employees' retirement income
security act and the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
to read as follows:
This section designates charter schools as employers and charter
school employees as members, and applies only if the department of
retirement systems receives determinations from the internal revenue
service and the United States department of labor that participation
does not jeopardize the status of these retirement systems as
governmental plans under the federal employees' retirement income
security act and the internal revenue code.

Sec. 24 RCW 28A.150.010 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.055 are
each amended to read as follows:
Public schools ((shall)) means the common schools as referred to in
Article IX of the state Constitution and those schools and institutions
of learning having a curriculum below the college or university level
as now or may be established by law and maintained at public expense,
including charter schools under chapter 28A.-- RCW (sections 1 through
16 and 25 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 Sections 1 through 16 and 25 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---