BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.57 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director may adopt rules:
(a) To support the agriculture industry in meeting federal
requirements for the country-of-origin labeling of meat; and
(b) To implement federal requirements for animal identification
needed to trace the source of livestock for disease control and
response purposes.
(2) The director may cooperate with and enter into agreements with
other states and agencies of federal government to carry out such a
system and to promote consistency of regulation.

--- END ---