BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.650 and 2000 c 11 s 54 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) Except as provided in RCW 79A.05.655 and 79A.05.660, ((a
total of forty percent of the length of the beach subject to the
recreation management plan shall be)) all ocean beaches are reserved
for pedestrian use ((under this section and RCW 79A.05.665.
Restrictions on motorized traffic under this section shall be from
April 15th to the day following Labor day of each year. Local
jurisdictions may adopt provisions within recreation management plans
that exceed the requirements of this section. The commission shall not
require that a plan designate for pedestrian use more than forty
percent of the land subject to the plan.
(2) In designating areas to be reserved for pedestrian use, the
plan shall consider the following:
(a) Public safety;
(b) Statewide interest in recreational use of the ocean beaches;
(c) Protection of shorebird and marine mammal habitats;
(d) Preservation of native beach vegetation;
(e) Protection of sand dune topography;
(f) Prudent management of clam beds;
(g) Economic impacts to the local community; and
(h) Public access and parking availability)) and vehicular traffic
is prohibited.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.655 and 2000 c 11 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 79A.05.650(((1))), recreation management plans
may make provision for vehicular traffic on areas otherwise reserved
for pedestrian use in order to:
(1) ((Facilitate clam digging;
(2) Accommodate organized recreational events of not more than
seven consecutive days duration;
(3))) Provide for removal of wood debris under RCW 4.24.210 and
79A.05.035(5); and
(((4))) (2) Accommodate removal of sand located upland from the
Seashore Conservation Area or removal of sand within the Seashore
Conservation Area under the terms of a covenant, easement, or deed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 79A.05.693 (Ocean beaches in Seashore
Conservation Area declared public highways) and 2000 c 11 s 58 & 1988
c 75 s 14 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---