BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Approved immobilization device" means a device approved by the
Washington state patrol that is attached to the exterior of a vehicle
to prohibit the movement or removal of the vehicle from its location.
(2) "Licensee" means a registered vehicle immobilizer having
possession of a registration certificate issued by the department.
(3) "Parking charge" means a posted monetary fee charged to an
individual wishing to park a vehicle in a parking facility for a given
amount of time, including a posted surcharge that is of a reasonable
and customary amount resulting from nonpayment, insufficient payment,
overtime parking, or improper parking of a vehicle.
(4) "Public or private garage or parking lot" means a parking lot
or garage that is owned and operated by either a public or private
entity that charges a monetary fee to an individual wishing to park a
vehicle in the parking facility for a given amount of time.
(5) "Registered vehicle immobilizer" means a person registered and
licensed with the department to engage in the activity of immobilizing
vehicles.
(6) "Vehicle immobilizer" means a registered vehicle immobilizer
and an agent, employee, or contractor of the registered vehicle
immobilizer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 REGISTRATION REQUIRED. A person may not
engage or offer to engage in the activity of immobilizing vehicles
without a current registration certificate from the department
authorizing the person to engage in those activities. A person
engaging in or offering to engage in the activity of immobilizing
vehicles without the registration certificate required by this chapter
is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 APPLICATION--CONTENTS, BOND, INSURANCE, FEE,
CERTIFICATE. (1) Application for licensing as a registered vehicle
immobilizer must be made on forms furnished by the department,
accompanied by an inspection certificate from the Washington state
patrol, signed by the applicant or an agent, and include the following
information:
(a) The name and address of the person, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation under whose name the business is to be
conducted;
(b) The names and addresses of all persons having an interest in
the business, or if the owner is a corporation, the names and addresses
of the officers of the corporation;
(c) The names and addresses of all employees who serve as vehicle
immobilizers;
(d) Proof of minimum insurance required by subsection (3) of this
section;
(e) Any other information the department may require; and
(f) A certificate of approval from the Washington state patrol
certifying that:
(i) The applicant has an established place of business and that
mail is received at the address shown on the application; and
(ii) Immobilization devices to be used meet standards established
by the Washington state patrol.
(2) Before issuing a registration certificate to an applicant, the
department shall require the applicant to file with the department a
surety bond in the amount of five thousand dollars running to the state
and executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this
state. The bond must be approved as to form by the attorney general
and conditioned that the registered vehicle immobilizer shall conduct
the business in conformity with this chapter and shall compensate any
person, company, or the state for failure to comply with this chapter
or the rules adopted under it, or for fraud, negligence, or
misrepresentation in the handling of immobilized vehicles. A person
injured by the registered vehicle immobilizer's failure to fully
perform duties imposed by this chapter and the rules adopted under it,
or an ordinance or resolution adopted by a city, town, or county is
entitled to recover actual damages, including reasonable attorneys'
fees against the surety and the registered vehicle immobilizer.
Successive recoveries against the bond must be permitted, but the
aggregate liability of the surety to all persons may not exceed the
amount of the bond. As a condition of authority to do business, the
registered vehicle immobilizer shall keep the bond in full force and
effect. Failure to maintain the penalty value of the bond or
cancellation of the bond by the surety automatically cancels the
registered vehicle immobilizer's registration.
(3) Before the department may issue a registration certificate to
an applicant, the applicant shall provide proof of minimum insurance
requirements of:
(a) One hundred thousand dollars for liability for bodily injury or
property damage per occurrence; and
(b) Fifty thousand dollars of legal liability per occurrence, to
protect against vehicle damage, including but not limited to fire and
theft, from the time a vehicle is immobilized until it is redeemed or
impounded.
Cancellation of or failure to maintain the insurance required by
(a) and (b) of this subsection automatically cancels the operator's
registration.
(4) The fee for each original registration and annual renewal is
one hundred dollars. The department shall forward the registration fee
to the state treasurer for deposit in the motor vehicle fund.
(5) The applicant must submit an inspection certificate from the
state patrol before the department may issue or renew a vehicle
immobilizer's registration certificate.
(6) Upon approval of the application, the department shall issue a
registration certificate to the registered vehicle immobilizer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 IMMOBILIZATION DEVICES--ALLOWABLE USES,
AUTHORIZATION REQUIRED. (1) It is unlawful for a person to remove or
cause to be removed a part from a vehicle to immobilize the vehicle in
order to secure payment for a delinquent parking fee or charge, and it
is unlawful to restrict the movement of or immobilize a vehicle parked
or stored in a public or private garage or parking lot in any manner
except as provided for in this section.
(2) Vehicle immobilizers may place an approved immobilization
device upon a vehicle located in a public or private garage or parking
lot at the request of the legal owner or an employee or agent of the
legal owner of the garage or parking lot. Placement of the approved
immobilization device may occur only as an enforcement measure when
there are delinquent or unpaid parking fees or charges resulting from
the parking, keeping, or storing of a vehicle within the parking
facility.
(3) The legal owner or an employee or agent of the legal owner of
the garage or parking lot must provide a signed authorization for the
immobilization at the time and place of the immobilization to the
registered vehicle immobilizer before he or she may immobilize the
vehicle.
(4) The approved immobilization device may be attached only to the
exterior of a vehicle so as to prevent the removal of the vehicle but
without causing any damage to the vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 IMMOBILIZATION NOTICE REQUIREMENTS. (1)
When immobilizing a vehicle, registered vehicle immobilizers, or their
agents, employees, or contractors, must affix conspicuously to the
immobilized vehicle a written notice stating the name and address of
the person or business who immobilized the vehicle and the address and
telephone number of the person authorized and available to release the
vehicle.
(2) The person authorized to release the vehicle must be accessible
at all times at the address and telephone number indicated on the
written notice and must be able to release the vehicle within one hour
after the vehicle's owner, operator, or person entitled to its
possession requests its release.
(3) The immobilized vehicle must be released immediately after
tender of payment of the posted parking charges due and unpaid at the
time of the request for release, together with the posted
immobilization fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 IMMOBILIZATION DEVICE REMOVAL FEE. The fee
that a registered vehicle immobilizer may charge to remove an
immobilization device may not exceed one hundred dollars per removal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 POSTING REQUIREMENTS. (1) No person may
immobilize or otherwise disturb an unauthorized vehicle standing or
parking in a public or private garage or parking lot unless a sign is
posted near each entrance and on the property in a location clearly
conspicuous and visible to all who park on such property that clearly
indicates:
(a) The times and circumstances in which a vehicle may be
immobilized as an unauthorized vehicle;
(b) The fee to remove the immobilization device; and
(c) The name, telephone number, and address of the person or
business who is the registered vehicle immobilizer.
(2) The department shall adopt rules relating to the size of the
sign required by subsection (1) of this section, its lettering,
placement, and the number of signs required.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 REDEEMING IMMOBILIZED PROPERTY. (1)
Vehicles that are immobilized by registered vehicle immobilizer under
this chapter may be redeemed only under the following circumstances:
(a) Only the legal owner, the registered owner, a person authorized
in writing by the registered owner or the vehicle's insurer, or a
person who is determined and verified by the vehicle immobilizer to
have the permission of the registered owner of the vehicle may redeem
an immobilized vehicle.
(b) A rental car business may immediately redeem a rental vehicle
it owns by payment of the costs of the removal fee provided for in
section 6 of this act.
(c) A motor vehicle dealer or lender with a perfected security
interest in the vehicle may redeem or lawfully repossess a vehicle
immediately by payment of the costs of the removal fee provided for in
section 6 of this act.
(2)(a) The vehicle immobilizer shall give to each person who seeks
to redeem an immobilized vehicle written notice of the right of
redemption and opportunity for a hearing, which notice must be
accompanied by a form to be used for requesting a hearing, the name of
the person or agency authorizing the immobilization, and a copy of the
immobilization invoice. The registered vehicle immobilizer shall
maintain a record evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that
the notification was provided.
(b) Any person seeking to redeem an immobilized vehicle under this
chapter has a right to a hearing in the district or municipal court for
the jurisdiction in which the vehicle was immobilized to contest the
validity of the immobilization or the amount of immobilization charges.
The district court has jurisdiction to determine the issues involving
all immobilizations including those authorized by the state or its
agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine the issues
involving immobilizations authorized by agents of the municipality. A
request for a hearing must be made in writing on the form provided for
that purpose and must be received by the appropriate court within ten
days of the date the opportunity was provided for in (a) of this
subsection. At the time of the filing of the hearing request, the
petitioner shall pay to the court clerk a filing fee in the same amount
required for the filing of a suit in district court. If the hearing
request is not received by the court within the ten-day period, the
right to a hearing is waived and the registered owner is liable for any
immobilization charges permitted under this chapter. Upon receipt of
a timely hearing request, the court shall proceed to hear and determine
the validity of the immobilization.
(3)(a) The court, within five days after the request for a hearing,
shall notify the registered vehicle immobilizer, the person requesting
the hearing if not the owner, the registered and legal owners of the
vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, and the person or agency authorizing the immobilization
in writing of the hearing date and time.
(b) At the hearing, the person or persons requesting the hearing
may produce any relevant evidence to show that the immobilization fee
charged was not proper.
(c) At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine
whether the immobilization was proper, whether the fee charged was in
compliance with the posted rate, and who is responsible for payment of
the fee. The court may not adjust fees or charges that are in
compliance with the posted or contracted rates.
(d) If the immobilization is found proper, the immobilization fee
as permitted under this chapter together with court costs will be
assessed against the person or persons requesting the hearing.
(e) If the immobilization is determined to be in violation of this
chapter, then the registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other
item of personal property registered or titled with the department will
bear no immobilization fee, and any security must be returned or
discharged as appropriate, and the person or agency who authorized the
immobilization is liable for any immobilization fee permitted under
this chapter. The court shall enter judgment in favor of the
registered and legal owners of the vehicle, or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, for the amount of
the filing fee required by law for the immobilization hearing petition
as well as reasonable damages for loss of the use of the vehicle during
the time it was immobilized, for not less than fifty dollars per day,
against the person or agency authorizing the immobilization. If a
judgment entered is not paid within fifteen days of notice in writing
of its entry, the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees and
costs against the defendant in an action to enforce the judgment.
Notice of entry of judgment may be made by registered or certified
mail, and proof of mailing may be made by affidavit of the party
mailing the notice. Notice of the entry of the judgment must read
essentially as follows:

TO: . . . . . .

YOU ARE NOTIFIED THAT JUDGMENT was entered against you in the
. . . . . . . . Court located at . . . . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled . . . . . . . ., Case No.
. . . . . . YOU ARE FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys' fees and
costs will be awarded against you under RCW . . . . . . if the
judgment is not paid within 15 days of the date of this notice.

DATED this . . . . day of . . . . . . , (year) . . . .

Signature . . . . . . . . . . . .

Typed name and address
of party mailing notice

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 IMMOBILIZATION DEVICE STANDARDS. The
Washington state patrol may adopt and amend rules under the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, concerning the
standards and procedures for immobilization devices and their use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 AVAILABILITY OF RECORDS AND EQUIPMENT FOR
AUDIT AND INSPECTION. Records and equipment of a registered vehicle
immobilizer must be available during normal business hours for audit or
inspection by the department of licensing, the Washington state patrol,
or any law enforcement agency having jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 COMPLAINTS, WHERE FORWARDED. (1) All law
enforcement agencies or local licensing agents that receive complaints
involving registered vehicle immobilizers shall forward the complaints,
along with any supporting documents including all results from local
investigations, to the department.
(2) Complaints involving deficiencies of equipment must be
forwarded to the Washington state patrol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 PRESIDING OFFICER AT LICENSING HEARING.
The director or the chief of the state patrol may use a hearings
officer or administrative law judge for presiding over a hearing
regarding licensing under this chapter or rules adopted under it. All
hearings and orders by the director or the chief of the state patrol
made under this chapter are subject to chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RULES. The director shall adopt rules that
carry out the provisions and intent of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 PENALTIES FOR CERTAIN ACTS OR OMISSIONS.
A registered vehicle immobilizer's license may be denied, suspended, or
revoked, or the licensee may be ordered to pay a monetary penalty of a
civil nature, not to exceed one thousand dollars per violation, or the
licensee may be subjected to any combination of license and monetary
penalty, whenever the director has reason to believe the licensee has
committed, or is at the time committing, a violation of this chapter or
rules adopted under it or any other statute or rule relating to this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 REFUSAL TO ISSUE LICENSE, GROUNDS FOR. If
an application for a license to conduct business as a registered
vehicle immobilizer is filed by a person whose license has previously
been canceled for cause by the department, or if the department is of
the opinion that the application is not filed in good faith or that the
application is filed by some person as a subterfuge for the real person
in interest whose license has previously been canceled for cause, the
department, after a hearing, of which the applicant has been given
twenty days' notice in writing and at which the applicant may appear in
person or by counsel and present testimony, may refuse to issue such a
person a license to conduct business as a registered vehicle
immobilizer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this chapter
are not part of the law.

Sec. 17 RCW 46.63.020 and 2003 c 33 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(2) RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(3) RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or
habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(4) RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of ownership and
registration and markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed
or declared a total loss;
(6) RCW 46.16.010 relating to initial registration of motor
vehicles;
(7) RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(8) RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(9) RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or
license plate for disabled persons' parking;
(10) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's
license;
(11) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a
driver's license or instruction permit;
(12) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of
a driver's license;
(13) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked
license or status;
(14) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;
(15) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational driver's license;
(16) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without
an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that
the device is required;
(17) RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another person to start a
vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device;
(18) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;
(19) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;
(20) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(21) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(22) RCW 46.37.--- (section 2, chapter 33, Laws of 2003) relating
to the sale, resale, distribution, or installation of a previously
deployed air bag;
(23) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot
vehicles;
(24) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous
articles;
(25) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(26) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(27) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen,
and appraisers;
(28) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving
record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer, and an
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(29) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a
registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(30) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck
operators;
(31) Section 2 of this act relating to immobilizing vehicles
without being a registered vehicle immobilizer;
(32) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers,
flaggers, or fire fighters;
(((32))) (33) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information
to or cooperate with an officer;
(((33))) (34) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(((34))) (35) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude
pursuing police vehicles;
(((35))) (36) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(((36))) (37) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(((37))) (38) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(((38))) (39) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor
vehicle;
(((39))) (40) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(((40))) (41) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent
driving;
(((41))) (42) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of
roadway workers;
(((42))) (43) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on
highways;
(((43))) (44) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an
unattended vehicle with the motor running;
(((44))) (45) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle
fuel;
(((45))) (46) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or
attempt to cancel a traffic citation;
(((46))) (47) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding,
abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(((47))) (48) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic
offenders;
(((48))) (49) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to
obtain a refund;
(((49))) (50) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle
business practices, except where that chapter provides for the
assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(((50))) (51) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of
passengers in for hire vehicles;
(((51))) (52) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier
insurance;
(((52))) (53) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine
without a vehicle certificate;
(((53))) (54) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a
limousine carrier;
(((54))) (55) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(((55))) (56) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training
schools;
(((56))) (57) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a
cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued
under chapter 46.87 RCW;
(((57))) (58) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an
unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 16 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 46 RCW.

--- END ---