BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.115 and 2003 c ... (ESHB 1001) s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Intimate areas" means any portion of a person's body or
undergarments that is covered by clothing and intended to be protected
from public view;
(b) "Photographs" or "films" means the making of a photograph,
motion picture film, videotape, digital image, or any other recording
or transmission of the image of a person;
(c) "Place where he or she would have a reasonable expectation of
privacy" means:
(i) A place where a reasonable person would believe that he or she
could disrobe in privacy, without being concerned that his or her
undressing was being photographed or filmed by another; or
(ii) A place where one may reasonably expect to be safe from casual
or hostile intrusion or surveillance;
(d) "Surveillance" means secret observation of the activities of
another person for the purpose of spying upon and invading the privacy
of the person;
(e) "Views" means the intentional looking upon of another person
for more than a brief period of time, in other than a casual or cursory
manner, with the unaided eye or with a device designed or intended to
improve visual acuity.
(2) A person commits the crime of voyeurism if, for the purpose,
whether private or commercial, of arousing or gratifying the sexual
desire of any person, he or she knowingly views, photographs, or films:
(a) Another person without that person's knowledge and consent
while the person being viewed, photographed, or filmed is in a place
where he or she would have a reasonable expectation of privacy; or
(b) The intimate areas of another person without that person's
knowledge and consent and under circumstances where the person has a
reasonable expectation of privacy, whether in a public or private
place.
(3) Voyeurism is a class C felony.
(4) This section does not apply to viewing, photographing, or
filming by personnel of the department of corrections or of a local
jail or correctional facility for security purposes or during
investigation of alleged misconduct by a person in the custody of the
department of corrections or the local jail or correctional facility.
(5) If a person is convicted of a violation of this section, the
court may order the destruction of any photograph, motion picture film,
digital image, videotape, or any other recording of an image that was
made by the person in violation of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who distributes, disseminates, or otherwise discloses any
photograph, motion picture film, digital image, videotape, or any other
recording that the person knows was made or acquired in violation of
RCW 9A.44.115 is guilty of a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---