BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.16.060 and 2002 c 111 s 5 and 2002 c 86 s 214 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to engage in a practice listed in
subsection (2) of this section unless the person has a license in good
standing as required by this chapter.
(2) The director may take action under RCW 18.235.150 and
18.235.160 against any person who does any of the following without
first obtaining, and maintaining in good standing, the license required
by this chapter:
(a) Except as provided in subsection (((2))) (3) of this section,
engages in the commercial practice of cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, or manicuring((, or instructing));
(b) Instructs in a school;
(c) Operates a school; or
(d) Operates a salon/shop, personal services, or mobile unit.
(((2))) (3) A person who receives a license as an instructor may
engage in the commercial practice for which he or she held a license
when applying for the instructor license without also renewing the
previously held license. However, a person licensed as an instructor
whose license to engage in a commercial practice is not or at any time
was not renewed ((cannot)) may not engage in the commercial practice
previously permitted under that license unless that person renews the
previously held license.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.16.110 and 2002 c 111 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall issue the appropriate license to any
applicant who meets the requirements as outlined in this chapter.
(2) Failure to renew a license before its expiration date subjects
the holder to a penalty fee and payment of each year's renewal fee, at
the current rate. Except as provided in RCW 18.16.260(1), a person
whose license has not been renewed within one year after its expiration
date shall have the license canceled and shall be required to submit an
application, pay the license fee, meet current licensing requirements,
and pass any applicable examination or examinations, in addition to the
other requirements of this chapter, before the license may be
reinstated. This subsection does not permit a person whose license has
expired to engage in a practice prohibited under RCW 18.16.060(1) until
the license is renewed or reinstated.
(3) Upon request and payment of an additional fee to be established
by rule by the director, the director shall issue a duplicate license
to an applicant.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.16.200 and 2002 c 111 s 12 and 2002 c 86 s 217 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW
18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action against any
applicant or licensee under this chapter ((may be subject to
disciplinary action by the director)) if the licensee or applicant:
(1) Has been found to have violated any provisions of chapter 19.86
RCW;
(2) Has engaged in ((the commercial)) a practice ((of cosmetology,
barbering, manicuring, esthetics, or instructed in or operated a
school)) prohibited under RCW 18.16.060(1) without first obtaining, and
maintaining in good standing, the license required by this chapter;
(((2))) (3) Has engaged in the commercial practice of cosmetology,
barbering, manicuring, or esthetics in a school;
(((3))) (4) Has not provided a safe, sanitary, and good moral
environment for students ((and)) in a school or the public;
(5) Has failed to display licenses required in this chapter; or
(((4))) (6) Has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule
adopted under it.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.16.260 and 2002 c 111 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to July 1, ((2003)) 2005, a cosmetology licensee((s)) who
held a license in good standing that expired on or after June 30, 1999,
may request a renewal of the license or an additional license in
barbering, manicuring, and/or esthetics. A license renewal fee must be
paid prior to issuance of each type of license requested. After June
30, ((2003)) 2005, any cosmetology licensee wishing to renew an expired
license or obtain additional licenses must meet the applicable renewal,
training, and examination requirements of this chapter. The director
may, as provided in RCW 43.24.140, modify the duration of any
additional license granted under this subsection to make all licenses
issued to a person expire on the same date.
(2) Prior to July 1, 2003, students enrolled in a licensed school
in an approved cosmetology curriculum may apply for the examination in
cosmetology, manicuring, and esthetics. An examination fee must be
paid for each examination selected. After June 30, 2003, students
enrolled in a licensed school in an approved cosmetology curriculum may
not apply for examination in manicuring and esthetics without meeting
the training requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department of licensing shall:
(1) Within ninety days after the effective date of this section,
notify each licensee under this chapter and each person holding a
cosmetology license as of June 30, 1999, of the provisions of this act
by mailing a notice as specified in this section to the licensee's last
known mailing address;
(2) Include in the notice required by this section:
(a) A summary of this act, including a summary of the requirements
for renewing and obtaining additional licenses;
(b) A telephone number within the department for obtaining further
information;
(c) The department's internet address; and
(d) On the outside of the notice, a facsimile of the state seal,
the department's return address, and the words "Notice of Legislative
Changes -- Cosmetology, Barbering, Manicuring, and Esthetics Licensing
Information Enclosed" in conspicuous bold face type.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.16.030 and 2002 c 111 s 3 and 2002 c 86 s 213 are
each reenacted to read as follows:
In addition to any other duties imposed by law, including RCW
18.235.030 and 18.235.040, the director shall have the following powers
and duties:
(1) To set all license, examination, and renewal fees in accordance
with RCW 43.24.086;
(2) To adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter;
(3) To prepare and administer or approve the preparation and
administration of licensing examinations;
(4) To establish minimum safety and sanitation standards for
schools, instructors, cosmetologists, barbers, manicurists,
estheticians, salons/shops, personal services, and mobile units;
(5) To establish curricula for the training of students under this
chapter;
(6) To maintain the official department record of applicants and
licensees;
(7) To establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an
examination failure;
(8) To set license expiration dates and renewal periods for all
licenses consistent with this chapter; and
(9) To make information available to the department of revenue to
assist in collecting taxes from persons required to be licensed under
this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.16.160 and 1991 c 324 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other legal remedy, any student or instructor-trainee having a claim against a school may bring suit upon the
approved security required in RCW 18.16.140(1)(((e))) (d) in the
superior or district court of Thurston county or the county in which
the educational services were offered by the school. Action upon the
approved security shall be commenced by filing the complaint with the
clerk of the appropriate superior or district court within one year
from the date of the cancellation of the approved security: PROVIDED,
That no action shall be maintained upon the approved security for any
claim which has been barred by any nonclaim statute or statute of
limitations of this state. Service of process in an action upon the
approved security shall be exclusively by service upon the director.
Two copies of the complaint shall be served by registered or certified
mail upon the director at the time the suit is started. Such service
shall constitute service on the approved security and the school. The
director shall transmit the complaint or a copy thereof to the school
at the address listed in the director's records and to the surety
within forty-eight hours after it has been received. The approved
security shall not be liable in an aggregate amount in excess of the
amount named in the approved security. In any action on an approved
security, the prevailing party is entitled to reasonable attorney's
fees and costs.
The director shall maintain a record, available for public
inspection, of all suits commenced under this chapter upon approved
security.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---