BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.03.305 and 1999 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created a commission to be known as the Washington
citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials((, to consist of
sixteen members appointed by the governor as provided in this
section)). Membership and composition shall be according to the
provisions of subsection (2) of this section until July 1, 2006, and
according to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section beginning
July 1, 2006.
(((1))) (2)(a) Until July 1, 2006, the commission shall consist of
sixteen members. Nine of the sixteen commission members shall be
selected by lot by the secretary of state from among those registered
voters eligible to vote at the time persons are selected for
appointment to full terms on the commission under subsection (((3)))
(2)(c) of this section. One member shall be selected from each
congressional district. The secretary shall establish policies and
procedures for conducting the selection by lot. The policies and
procedures shall include, but not be limited to, those for notifying
persons selected and for providing a new selection from a congressional
district if a person selected from the district declines appointment to
the commission or if, following the person's appointment, the person's
position on the commission becomes vacant before the end of the
person's term of office.
(((2))) (b) The remaining seven of the sixteen commission members,
all residents of this state, shall be selected jointly by the speaker
of the house of representatives and the president of the senate. The
persons selected under this subsection shall have had experience in the
field of personnel management. Of these seven members, one shall be
selected from each of the following five sectors in this state:
Private institutions of higher education; business; professional
personnel management; legal profession; and organized labor. Of the
two remaining members, one shall be a person recommended to the speaker
and the president by the chair of the Washington personnel resources
board and one shall be a person recommended by majority vote of the
presidents of the state's four-year institutions of higher education.
(((3))) (c) The secretary of state shall forward the names of
persons selected under subsection (((1))) (2)(a) of this section and
the speaker of the house of representatives and president of the senate
shall forward the names of persons selected under subsection (2)(b) of
this section to the governor who shall appoint these persons to the
commission. Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
names of persons selected for appointment to the commission shall be
forwarded to the governor not later than February 15, 1987, and not
later than the fifteenth day of February every four years through 1999.
The terms of the members selected in 1999 shall terminate July 1, 2002,
and the names of persons selected for appointment to the commission
shall be forwarded to the governor not later than July 1, 2002. Of the
sixteen names forwarded to the governor in 2002, the governor shall by
lot select four of the persons selected under subsection (((1))) (2)(a)
of this section and four of the persons selected under subsection
(2)(b) of this section to serve two-year terms, with the rest of the
members serving four-year terms. ((Thereafter)) Until July 1, 2006,
except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, all members shall
serve four-year terms and the names of eight persons selected for
appointment to the commission shall be forwarded to the governor not
later than the first day of July every two years. The terms of the
members selected in 2004 shall terminate July 1, 2006.
(3)(a) For terms beginning July 1, 2006, the commission shall
consist of two members from each congressional district. The
commission members shall be selected by lot by the secretary of state
from among those registered voters eligible to vote at the time persons
are selected for appointment. The secretary must establish policies
and procedures for conducting the selection by lot, to include, but not
be limited to, notifying persons selected and providing a new selection
process if a person selected declines appointment to the commission or
a position on the commission becomes vacant before the end of the term.
The secretary of state shall forward the names of persons selected to
the governor not later than the first day of July, who shall appoint
these persons to the commission.
(b) Of the names forwarded to the governor for appointment in 2006,
the governor shall by lot select one person from each congressional
district to serve a two-year term, with the other person from each
congressional district to serve a four-year term. Thereafter, except
as provided in subsection (6) of this section, all members shall serve
four-year terms, and the name of one person from each congressional
district shall be forwarded to the governor not later than the first
day of July every two years.
(4)(a) No person may be appointed to more than two terms. No
member of the commission may be removed by the governor during his or
her term of office unless for cause of incapacity, incompetence,
neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office or for a disqualifying change
of residence.
(b) The unexcused absence of any person who is a member of the
commission from two consecutive meetings of the commission shall
constitute the relinquishment of that person's membership on the
commission. Such a relinquishment creates a vacancy in that person's
position on the commission. A member's absence may be excused by the
chair of the commission upon the member's written request if the chair
believes there is just cause for the absence. Such a request must be
received by the chair before the meeting for which the absence is to be
excused. A member's absence from a meeting of the commission may also
be excused during the meeting for which the member is absent by the
affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the commission present
at the meeting.
(5)(a) No state official, public employee, or lobbyist subject to
the registration requirements of chapter 42.17 RCW, or immediate family
member of the official, employee, or lobbyist((, subject to the
registration requirements of chapter 42.17 RCW)) is eligible for
membership on the commission.
(b) As used in this subsection the phrase "immediate family" means
the parents, spouse, siblings, children, or dependent relative of the
official, employee, or lobbyist whether or not living in the household
of the official, employee, or lobbyist.
(6) Upon a vacancy in any position on the commission, a successor
shall be selected and appointed to fill the unexpired term. The
selection and appointment shall be concluded within thirty days of the
date the position becomes vacant and shall be conducted in the same
manner as originally provided.

--- END ---