BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to ensure that
counties have a sufficient portion of their citizenry eligible to serve
as commissioners of water conservancy boards to enable the appointing
legislative authorities to fill positions on the boards in both urban
and rural counties.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.80.050 and 2001 c 237 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A water conservancy board constitutes a public body corporate
and politic and a separate unit of local government in the state. Each
board shall consist of three commissioners appointed by the county
legislative authority or authorities as applicable for six-year terms.
The county legislative authority or authorities shall stagger the
initial appointment of commissioners so that the first commissioners
who are appointed shall serve terms of two, four, and six years,
respectively, from the date of their appointment. The county
legislative authority or authorities may appoint two additional
commissioners, for a total of five. If the county or counties elect to
appoint five commissioners, the initial terms of the additional
commissioners shall be for three and five-year terms respectively. All
vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term.
(2) The county legislative authority or authorities shall consider,
but are not limited in appointing, nominations to the board by people
or entities petitioning or requesting the creation of the board. The
county legislative authority or authorities shall ensure that at least
one commissioner is an individual water right holder who diverts or
withdraws water for use within the area served by the board. The
county legislative authority or authorities must appoint one person who
is not a water right holder, except as provided in subsection (4) of
this section. If the county legislative authority or authorities
choose not to appoint five commissioners, and as of May 10, 2001, there
is no commissioner on an existing board who is not a water right
holder, the county or counties are not required to appoint a new
commissioner until the first vacancy occurs. In making appointments to
the board, the county legislative authority or authorities shall choose
from among persons who are residents of the county or counties or a
county that is contiguous to the county that the water conservancy
board is to serve.
(3) No commissioner may participate in a record of decision of a
board until he or she has successfully completed the necessary training
required under RCW 90.80.040. Commissioners shall serve without
compensation, but are entitled to reimbursement for necessary travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and costs
incident to receiving training.
(4) For the purposes determining a person's eligibility to be
appointed as a commissioner who is not a water right holder under this
section, a person is not considered to be a water right holder: (a) By
virtue of the person's receiving water from a municipal water supplier
as defined in RCW 90.03.015, or (b) if the only water right held by the
person is a right to the type of residential use of water that is
exempted from permit requirements by RCW 90.44.050 and that right is
for water from a well located in a county with a population that is not
greater than one hundred fifty thousand people.

--- END ---