BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95.030 and 2002 c 299 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:
(1) "City" means every incorporated city and town.
(2) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(3) "Committee" means the state solid waste advisory committee.
(4) "Composted material" means organic solid waste that has been
subjected to controlled aerobic degradation at a solid waste facility
in compliance with the requirements of this chapter. Natural decay of
organic solid waste under uncontrolled conditions does not result in
composted material.
(5) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(7) "Disposal site" means the location where any final treatment,
utilization, processing, or deposit of solid waste occurs.
(8) "Energy recovery" means a process operating under federal and
state environmental laws and regulations for converting solid waste
into usable energy and for reducing the volume of solid waste.
(9) "Functional standards" means criteria for solid waste handling
expressed in terms of expected performance or solid waste handling
functions.
(10) "Incineration" means a process of reducing the volume of solid
waste operating under federal and state environmental laws and
regulations by use of an enclosed device using controlled flame
combustion.
(11) "Inert waste landfill" means a landfill that receives only
inert waste, as determined under section 2 of this act, and includes
facilities that use inert wastes as a component of fill.
(12) "Jurisdictional health department" means city, county, city-county, or district public health department.
(((12))) (13) "Landfill" means a disposal facility or part of a
facility at which solid waste is placed in or on land and which is not
a land treatment facility.
(((13))) (14) "Local government" means a city, town, or county.
(((14))) (15) "Modify" means to substantially change the design or
operational plans including, but not limited to, removal of a design
element previously set forth in a permit application or the addition of
a disposal or processing activity that is not approved in the permit.
(((15))) (16) "Multiple family residence" means any structure
housing two or more dwelling units.
(((16))) (17) "Person" means individual, firm, association,
copartnership, political subdivision, government agency, municipality,
industry, public or private corporation, or any other entity
whatsoever.
(((17))) (18) "Recyclable materials" means those solid wastes that
are separated for recycling or reuse, such as papers, metals, and
glass, that are identified as recyclable material pursuant to a local
comprehensive solid waste plan. Prior to the adoption of the local
comprehensive solid waste plan, adopted pursuant to RCW 70.95.110(2),
local governments may identify recyclable materials by ordinance from
July 23, 1989.
(((18))) (19) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing
waste materials into usable or marketable materials for use other than
landfill disposal or incineration.
(((19))) (20) "Residence" means the regular dwelling place of an
individual or individuals.
(((20))) (21) "Sewage sludge" means a semisolid substance
consisting of settled sewage solids combined with varying amounts of
water and dissolved materials, generated from a wastewater treatment
system, that does not meet the requirements of chapter 70.95J RCW.
(((21))) (22) "Soil amendment" means any substance that is intended
to improve the physical characteristics of the soil, except composted
material, commercial fertilizers, agricultural liming agents,
unmanipulated animal manures, unmanipulated vegetable manures, food
wastes, food processing wastes, and materials exempted by rule of the
department, such as biosolids as defined in chapter 70.95J RCW and
wastewater as regulated in chapter 90.48 RCW.
(((22))) (23) "Solid waste" or "wastes" means all putrescible and
nonputrescible solid and semisolid wastes including, but not limited
to, garbage, rubbish, ashes, industrial wastes, swill, sewage sludge,
demolition and construction wastes, abandoned vehicles or parts
thereof, and recyclable materials.
(((23))) (24) "Solid waste handling" means the management, storage,
collection, transportation, treatment, utilization, processing, and
final disposal of solid wastes, including the recovery and recycling of
materials from solid wastes, the recovery of energy resources from
solid wastes or the conversion of the energy in solid wastes to more
useful forms or combinations thereof.
(((24))) (25) "Source separation" means the separation of different
kinds of solid waste at the place where the waste originates.
(((25))) (26) "Vehicle" includes every device physically capable of
being moved upon a public or private highway, road, street, or
watercourse and in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may
be transported or drawn upon a public or private highway, road, street,
or watercourse, except devices moved by human or animal power or used
exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.
(((26))) (27) "Waste-derived soil amendment" means any soil
amendment as defined in this chapter that is derived from solid waste
as defined in RCW 70.95.030, but does not include biosolids or
biosolids products regulated under chapter 70.95J RCW or wastewaters
regulated under chapter 90.48 RCW.
(((27))) (28) "Waste reduction" means reducing the amount or
toxicity of waste generated or reusing materials.
(((28))) (29) "Yard debris" means plant material commonly created
in the course of maintaining yards and gardens, and through
horticulture, gardening, landscaping, or similar activities. Yard
debris includes but is not limited to grass clippings, leaves,
branches, brush, weeds, flowers, roots, windfall fruit, vegetable
garden debris, holiday trees, and tree prunings four inches or less in
diameter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall, as part of the minimum functional
standards for solid waste handling required under RCW 70.95.060,
develop specific criteria for the types of solid wastes that are
allowed to be received by inert waste landfills that seek to continue
operation after February 10, 2003.
(2) The criteria for inert waste developed under this section must,
at a minimum, contain a list of substances that an inert waste landfill
located in a county with fewer than forty-five thousand residents is
permitted to receive if it was operational before February 10, 2003,
and is located at a site with a five-year annual rainfall of twenty-five inches or less. The substances permitted for the inert waste
landfills satisfying the criteria listed in this subsection must
include the following types of solid waste if the waste has not been
tainted, through exposure from chemical, physical, biological, or
radiological substances, such that it presents a threat to human health
or the environment greater than that inherent to the material:
(a) Cured concrete, including any embedded steel reinforcing and
wood;
(b) Asphaltic materials, including road construction asphalt;
(c) Brick and masonry;
(d) Ceramic materials produced from fired clay or porcelain;
(e) Glass;
(f) Stainless steel and aluminum; and
(g) Other materials as defined in chapter 173-350 WAC.
(3) The department shall work with the owner or operators of
landfills that do not meet the minimum functional standards for inert
waste landfills to explore and implement appropriate means of
transition into a limited purpose landfill that is able to accept
additional materials as specified in WAC 173-350-400.

--- END ---