BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that bail bond
agents and bail bond recovery agents serve a necessary and important
purpose in the criminal justice system by locating, apprehending, and
surrendering fugitive criminal defendants. The legislature also
recognizes that locating, apprehending, and surrendering fugitives
requires special skills and expertise; that bail bond agents and bail
bond recovery agents are often required to perform their duties under
stressful and demanding conditions; and that it serves the public
interest to have qualified people performing such essential functions.
Therefore, bail bond agencies that use the services of bail bond
recovery agents must, in the interest of public safety, use bail bond
recovery agents who possess the knowledge and competence necessary for
the job.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.185.010 and 2000 c 171 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(3) "Commission" means the criminal justice training commission.
(4) "Collateral or security" means property of any kind given as
security to obtain a bail bond.
(((4))) (5) "Bail bond agency" means a business that sells and
issues corporate surety bail bonds or that provides security in the
form of personal or real property to ((insure)) ensure the appearance
of a criminal defendant before the courts of this state or the United
States.
(((5))) (6) "Qualified agent" means an owner, sole proprietor,
partner, manager, officer, or chief operating officer of a corporation
who meets the requirements set forth in this chapter for obtaining a
bail bond agency license.
(((6))) (7) "Bail bond agent" means a person who is employed by a
bail bond agency and engages in the sale or issuance of bail bonds, but
does not mean a clerical, secretarial, or other support person who does
not participate in the sale or issuance of bail bonds.
(((7))) (8) "Licensee" means a bail bond agency ((or)), a bail bond
agent ((or both)), a qualified agent, or a bail bond recovery agent.
(((8))) (9) "Branch office" means any office physically separated
from the principal place of business of the licensee from which the
licensee or an employee or ((agents conduct)) agent of the licensee
conducts any activity meeting the criteria of a bail bond agency.
(10) "Bail bond recovery agent" means a person who is under
contract with a bail bond agent to receive compensation, reward, or any
other form of lawful consideration for locating, apprehending, and
surrendering a fugitive criminal defendant for whom a bail bond has
been posted. "Bail bond recovery agent" does not include a general
authority Washington peace officer or a limited authority Washington
peace officer.
(11) "Contract" means a written agreement between a bail bond agent
or qualified agent and a bail bond recovery agent for the purpose of
locating, apprehending, and surrendering a fugitive criminal defendant
in exchange for lawful consideration.
(12) "Planned forced entry" means a premeditated forcible entry
into a dwelling, building, or other structure without the occupant's
knowledge or consent for the purpose of apprehending a fugitive
criminal defendant subject to a bail bond. "Planned forced entry" does
not include situations where, during an imminent or actual chase or
pursuit of a fleeing fugitive criminal defendant, or during a casual or
unintended encounter with the fugitive, the bail bond recovery agent
forcibly enters into a dwelling, building, or other structure without
advanced planning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.185 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant must meet the following requirements to obtain a bail
bond recovery agent license:
(1) Submit a fully completed application that includes proper
identification on a form prescribed by the director;
(2) Pass an examination determined by the director to measure his
or her knowledge and competence in the bail recovery business;
(3) Be at least twenty-one years old;
(4) Be a citizen or legal resident alien of the United States;
(5) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction, if the
director determines that the applicant's particular crime directly
relates to a capacity to perform the duties of a bail bond recovery
agent, and that the license should be withheld to protect the citizens
of Washington state. The director shall make the director's
determination to withhold a license because of previous convictions
notwithstanding the restoration of employment rights act, chapter 9.96A
RCW;
(6) Submit a receipt showing payment for a background check through
the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation;
(7) Have a current firearms certificate issued by the commission if
carrying a firearm in the performance of his or her duties as a bail
bond recovery agent;
(8)(a) Have a current license to carry a concealed pistol if
carrying a firearm in the performance of his or her duties as a bail
bond recovery agent;
(b) A resident alien must provide a copy of his or her alien
firearm license if carrying a firearm in the performance of his or her
duties as a bail bond recovery agent; and
(9)(a) Pay the required nonrefundable fee for each application for
a bail bond recovery agent license;
(b) A bail bond agent or qualified agent who wishes to perform the
duties of a bail bond recovery agent must first obtain a bail bond
recovery agent endorsement to his or her bail bond agent or agency
license in order to act as a bail bond recovery agent, and pay the
required nonrefundable fee for each application for a bail bond
recovery agent endorsement.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.185.040 and 1993 c 260 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Applications for licenses required under this chapter shall be
filed with the director on a form provided by the director. The
director may require any information and documentation that reasonably
relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the
criteria, ((which may include)) including fingerprints.
(2) ((After receipt of an application for a license, the director
may conduct an investigation to determine whether the facts set forth
in the application are true.)) Applicants for licensure or endorsement
as a bail bond recovery agent must complete a records check through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through the
federal bureau of investigation at the applicant's expense. Such
record check shall include a fingerprint check using a Washington state
patrol approved fingerprint card. The Washington state patrol shall
forward the fingerprints of applicants to the federal bureau of
investigation for a national criminal history records check. The
director may accept proof of a recent national crime information
center/III criminal background report or any national or interstate
criminal background report in addition to fingerprints to accelerate
the licensing and endorsement process. The director is authorized to
periodically perform a background investigation of licensees to
identify criminal convictions subsequent to the renewal of a license or
endorsement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.185 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall adopt rules establishing prelicense training
and testing requirements, which shall include a minimum of four hours
of classes. The director may establish, by rule, continuing education
requirements for bail bond recovery agents.
(2) The director shall consult with representatives of the bail
bond industry and associations before adopting or amending the
prelicensing training or continuing education requirements of this
section.
(3) A bail bond recovery agent need not fulfill the prelicensing
training requirements of this chapter if he or she, within sixty days
prior to July 1, 2005, provides proof to the director that he or she
previously has met the training requirements of this chapter.
(4) The director, or the director's designee, with the advice of
representatives of the bail bond industry and associations, law
enforcement agencies and associations, and prosecutors' associations,
shall adopt rules establishing prelicense training and testing
requirements and shall establish minimum exam standards necessary for
a bail bond recovery agent to qualify for licensure or endorsement.
(5) The standards shall be limited to the following:
(a) A minimum level of education or experience appropriate for
performing the duties of a bail bond recovery agent;
(b) A minimum level of knowledge in relevant areas of criminal and
civil law;
(c) A minimum level of knowledge regarding the appropriate use of
force and different degrees of the use of force; and
(d) Adequate training of the use of firearms from the criminal
justice training commission or from an instructor who has been trained
or certified by the criminal justice training center.
(6) The legislature does not intend, and nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to restrict or limit in any way the powers of bail
bond agents as recognized in and derived from the United States Supreme
Court case of Taylor v. Taintor, 16 Wall. 366 (1872).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.185 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each fugitive criminal defendant to be recovered will be
treated as an individual contract between the bail bond agent and the
bail bond recovery agent. A bail bond agent shall provide a bail bond
recovery agent a copy of each individual contract. A bail bond
recovery agent must carry, in addition to the license issued by the
department, a copy of the contract and, if requested, must present a
copy of the contract and the license to the fugitive criminal
defendant, the owner or manager of the property in which the agent
entered in order to locate or apprehend the fugitive, other residents,
if any, of the residence in which the agent entered in order to locate
or apprehend the fugitive, and to the local law enforcement agency or
officer. If presenting a copy of the contract or the license at the
time of the request would unduly interfere with the location or
apprehension of the fugitive, the agent shall present the copy of the
contract or the license within a reasonable period of time after the
exigent circumstances expire.
(2) The director, or the director's designee, with the advice of
the bail bond industry and associations, law enforcement agencies and
associations, and prosecutors' associations shall develop a format for
the contract. At a minimum, the contract must include the following:
(a) The name, address, phone number, and license number of the bail
bond agency or bail bond agent contracting with the bail bond recovery
agent;
(b) The name, address, phone number, and license number of the bail
bond recovery agent; and
(c) The name, last known address, and phone number of the fugitive.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.185.090 and 1993 c 260 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A bail bond agency shall notify the director within thirty days
after the death or termination of employment of any employee who is a
licensed bail bond agent.
(2) A bail bond agency shall notify the director within seventy-two
hours upon receipt of information affecting a licensed bail bond
agent's continuing eligibility to hold a license under the provisions
of this chapter.
(3) A bail bond agent or bail bond recovery agent shall notify the
director within seventy-two hours upon receipt of information affecting
the bail bond recovery agent's continuing eligibility to hold a bail
bond recovery agent's license under the provisions of this chapter.
(4) A bail bond agent or bail bond recovery agent shall notify the
local law enforcement agency whenever the bail bond recovery agent
discharges his or her firearm while on duty, other than on a supervised
firearms range. The notification must be made within ten business days
of the date the firearm is discharged.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.185.100 and 1996 c 242 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every qualified agent shall keep adequate records for three
years of all collateral and security received, all trust accounts
required by this section, and all bail bond transactions handled by the
bail bond agency, as specified by rule. The records shall be open to
inspection without notice by the director or authorized representatives
of the director.
(2) Every qualified agent who receives collateral or security is a
fiduciary of the property and shall keep adequate records for three
years of the receipt, safekeeping, and disposition of the collateral or
security. Every qualified agent shall maintain a trust account in a
federally insured financial institution located in this state. All
moneys, including cash, checks, money orders, wire transfers, and
credit card sales drafts, received as collateral or security or
otherwise held for a bail bond agency's client shall be deposited in
the trust account not later than the third banking day following
receipt of the funds or money. A qualified agent shall not in any way
encumber the corpus of the trust account or commingle any other moneys
with moneys properly maintained in the trust account. Each qualified
agent required to maintain a trust account shall report annually under
oath to the director the account number and balance of the trust
account, and the name and address of the institution that holds the
trust account, and shall report to the director within ten business
days whenever the trust account is changed or relocated or a new trust
account is opened.
(3) Whenever a bail bond is exonerated by the court, the qualified
agent shall, within five business days after written notification of
exoneration ((and upon written demand)), return all collateral or
security to the person entitled thereto.
(4) Records of contracts for fugitive apprehension must be retained
by the bail bond agent and by the bail bond recovery agent for a period
of three years.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.185.110 and 2002 c 86 s 251 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW
18.235.130, the following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute
unprofessional conduct:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter;
(2) Failing to meet the qualifications set forth in RCW 18.185.020
and 18.185.030;
(3) Knowingly committing, or being a party to, any material fraud,
misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme,
or device whereby any other person lawfully relies upon the word,
representation, or conduct of the licensee. However, this subsection
(3) does not prevent a bail bond recovery agent from using any pretext
to locate or apprehend a fugitive criminal defendant or gain any
information regarding the fugitive;
(4) Assigning or transferring any license issued pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter, except as provided in RCW 18.185.030;
(5) Conversion of any money or contract, deed, note, mortgage, or
other evidence of title, to his or her own use or to the use of his or
her principal or of any other person, when delivered to him or her in
trust or on condition, in violation of the trust or before the
happening of the condition; and failure to return any money or
contract, deed, note, mortgage, or other evidence of title within
thirty days after the owner is entitled to possession, and makes demand
for possession, shall be prima facie evidence of conversion;
(6) Failing to keep records, maintain a trust account, or return
collateral or security, as required by RCW 18.185.100;
(7) Any conduct in a bail bond transaction which demonstrates bad
faith, dishonesty, or untrustworthiness; ((or))
(8) Violation of an order to cease and desist that is issued by the
director under this chapter;
(9) Wearing, displaying, holding, or using law enforcement-style
badges;
(10) Making any statement that would reasonably cause another
person to believe that the bail bond recovery agent is a sworn peace
officer;
(11) Failing to carry a copy of the contract or to present a copy
of the contract as required under section 6(1) of this act;
(12) Using a dog in the apprehension of a fugitive criminal
defendant;
(13) Using the services of an unlicensed bail bond recovery agent
or using the services of a bail bond recovery agent without issuing the
proper contract;
(14) Misrepresenting or knowingly making a material misstatement or
omission in the application for a license;
(15) Using the services of a person performing the functions of a
bail bond recovery agent who has not been licensed by the department as
required by this chapter; or
(16) Performing the functions of a bail bond recovery agent without
being both (a) licensed under this chapter or supervised by a licensed
bail bond recovery agent under section 11 of this act; and (b) under
contract with a bail bond agent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 18.185
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A person may not perform the functions of a bail bond recovery
agent unless the person is licensed by the department under this
chapter.
(2) A bail bond agent may contract with a person to perform the
functions of a bail bond recovery agent. Before contracting with the
bail bond recovery agent, the bail bond agent must check the license
issued by the department under this chapter. The requirements
established by the department under this chapter do not prevent the
bail bond agent from imposing additional requirements that the bail
bond agent considers appropriate.
(3) A contract entered into under this chapter is authority for the
person to perform the functions of a bail bond recovery agent as
specifically authorized by the contract and in accordance with
applicable law. A contract entered into by a bail bond agent with a
bail bond recovery agent is not transferable by the bail bond recovery
agent to another bail bond recovery agent.
(4) Whenever a person licensed by the department as a bail bond
recovery agent is engaged in the performance of the person's duties as
a bail bond recovery agent, the person must carry a copy of the
license.
(5) A license or endorsement issued by the department under this
chapter is valid from the date the license or endorsement is issued
until its expiration date unless it is suspended or revoked by the
department prior to its expiration date.
(6) No person may perform the functions of a bail bond recovery
agent after December 31, 2005, unless the person has first complied
with the provisions of this chapter.
(7) Nothing in this chapter is meant to prevent a bail bond agent
from contacting a fugitive criminal defendant for the purpose of
requesting the surrender of the fugitive, or from accepting the
voluntary surrender of the fugitive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 18.185
RCW to read as follows:
A bail bond recovery agent from another state who is not licensed
under this chapter may not perform the functions of a bail bond
recovery agent in this state unless the agent is working under the
direct supervision of a licensed bail bond recovery agent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 18.185
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Before a bail bond recovery agent may apprehend a person
subject to a bail bond in a planned forced entry, the bail bond
recovery agent must notify an appropriate law enforcement agency in the
local jurisdiction in which the apprehension is expected to occur.
Notification must include, at a minimum: The name of the defendant;
the address, or the approximate location if the address is
undeterminable, of the dwelling, building, or other structure where the
planned forced entry is expected to occur; the name of the bail bond
recovery agent; the name of the contracting bail bond agent; and the
alleged offense or conduct the defendant committed that resulted in the
issuance of a bail bond.
(2) During the actual planned forced entry, a bail bond recovery
agent shall wear a shirt, vest, or other garment with the words "BAIL
BOND RECOVERY AGENT" displayed in at least two-inch-high reflective
print letters across the front and back of the garment and in a
contrasting color to that of the garment.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.185.170 and 2002 c 86 s 254 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((After June 30, 1994,)) Any person who performs the functions
and duties of a bail bond agent in this state without being licensed in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or any person
presenting or attempting to use as his or her own the license of
another, or any person who gives false or forged evidence of any kind
to the director in obtaining a license, or any person who falsely
impersonates any other licensee, or any person who attempts to use an
expired or revoked license, or any person who violates any of the
provisions of this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) ((After January 1, 1994,)) A person is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor if ((he or she)) the person owns or operates a bail bond
agency in this state without first obtaining a bail bond agency
license.
(3) ((After June 30, 1994,)) The owner or qualified agent of a bail
bond agency is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if ((he or she)) the owner
or qualified agent employs any person to perform the duties of a bail
bond agent without the employee having in ((his or her)) the employee's
possession a permanent bail bond agent license issued by the
department.
(4) After December 31, 2005, a person is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor if the person:
(a) Performs the functions of a bail bond recovery agent without
first obtaining a license from the department and entering into a
contract with a bail bond agent as required by this chapter; or, in the
case of a bail bond recovery agent from another state, the person
performs the functions of a bail bond recovery agent without operating
under the direct supervision of a licensed bail bond recovery agent as
required by this chapter; or
(b) Conducts a planned forced entry without first complying with
the requirements of this chapter.

--- END ---