BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the existing
state and federal regulatory framework for wetland and aquatic resource
mitigation is an important tool used to offset impacts to aquatic
lands.
(2) The legislature further finds that because impacts to wetlands
and aquatic resources often affect state-owned aquatic lands, the
department should work within established state and federal regulatory
mitigation processes to ensure that individual compensatory mitigation
sites and mitigation bank sites on state-owned aquatic lands are
properly planned for and protected over the long term.
(3) The intent of this chapter is to establish the proprietary
mechanisms for the department, on state-owned aquatic lands, to: Serve
as the long-term manager of compensatory mitigation sites; utilize in-
lieu fee mitigation funds for habitat improvement projects; and
develop, implement, and manage mitigation banks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Compensatory mitigation" means the process of restoring,
creating, enhancing, or, in exceptional circumstances, preserving
uplands, wetlands, or other aquatic resources for the purposes of
compensating for the unavoidable adverse environmental impacts of a
project that remain after all appropriate and practicable avoidance and
minimization has been achieved.
(2) "Credit" means a unit of trade representing the increase in the
ecological value of a site due to improvements made to the habitat
conditions of the site, as measured by acreage, functions, or values,
or by some other assessment method.
(3) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(4) "In-lieu compensatory mitigation" means payment from a sponsor
to a natural resource management entity for the purpose of designing,
implementing, and managing compensatory mitigation projects to offset
unavoidable impacts from a project.
(5) "Mitigation" means the sequential process of avoiding impacts,
minimizing impacts, and compensating for the remaining unavoidable
impacts of a project.
(6) "Mitigation bank" means a site where either wetlands or aquatic
resources, or both, are restored, created, enhanced, or in exceptional
circumstances, preserved expressly for the purpose of providing
compensatory mitigation in advance of authorized project impacts to
similar resources.
(7) "Mitigation banking agreement" means a legal agreement between
the department and a public or private entity under which the parties
to the agreement agree to jointly develop, implement, and manage a
mitigation bank that is located on state-owned aquatic lands and is
approved through state or federal regulatory mitigation processes.
(8) "Mitigation partners" means public or private entities with
which the department has entered into mitigation banking agreements
under section 4 of this act.
(9) "Project" means a physical construction project that develops
or redevelops land in a way that creates unavoidable adverse
environmental impacts that remain after all appropriate and practicable
avoidance and minimization has been achieved.
(10) "Site" means a mitigation bank site, or a site where
compensatory mitigation has or will occur.
(11) "Sponsor" means the person or entity that is proposing,
financing, designing, or constructing a project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department may create an endowment
for the purpose of generating funds that are to be used for the long-term monitoring, maintenance, and management of proprietary
compensatory mitigation sites and mitigation bank sites.
(2) Any endowment created by the department may accept money from
public or private entities. However, the department may only accept
money for an endowment that will fund compensatory mitigation sites and
compensatory mitigation bank sites that are:
(a) Developed by the public or private entities that donate the
money;
(b) Are located on state-owned aquatic lands; and
(c) Are approved through state or federal regulatory mitigation
processes.
(3)(a) Before the department may assume management responsibility
for a site, the amount of money necessary to establish an endowment
that will adequately cover the costs of long-term monitoring,
maintenance, and management must be determined by the department and
approved through state or federal regulatory mitigation processes.
(b) The amount of money necessary to establish an endowment must be
based on the specific conditions of the compensatory mitigation site or
mitigation bank site being considered by the department, and the long-term management plan for the site, as approved through state or federal
regulatory mitigation processes.
(c) Moneys collected by the department to establish an endowment
must be deposited into the aquatic lands compensatory mitigation
endowment account established in section 6 of this act.
(4)(a) The department may accept in-lieu fee payments, from public
or private entities, for the purpose of designing, implementing, and
managing in-lieu compensatory mitigation projects that are located on
state-owned aquatic lands and approved through state or federal
regulatory mitigation processes.
(b) In-lieu fee payments collected by the department must be
deposited into the aquatic lands compensatory mitigation management
account established in section 7 of this act.
(5)(a) The department shall keep separate accounting records of all
moneys received under this section for:
(i) The long-term management of compensatory mitigation sites;
(ii) The long-term management of mitigation bank sites; and
(iii) The design, implementation, and management of in-lieu fee
compensatory mitigation projects.
(b) The department shall ensure, through its accounting records,
that the funds for each site are fully secured and expended as approved
through state or federal regulatory mitigation processes.
(6) Consistent with state and federal regulatory mitigation
policies, state-owned aquatic lands utilized as compensatory mitigation
sites to offset long-term unavoidable project impacts and mitigation
banks shall not be available for other uses that will compromise the
ecological functions of the sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department is authorized to enter into
mitigation banking agreements with public or private entities to
develop, implement, and manage mitigation banks that are located on
state-owned aquatic lands and are approved through state or federal
regulatory mitigation processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department is authorized to:
(a) Sell mitigation bank credits from a department mitigation bank
that is located on state-owned aquatic lands and approved through state
or federal regulatory mitigation processes; and
(b) Receive revenues from the sale of mitigation bank credits sold
by public or private entities with which the department has entered
into mitigation banking agreements.
(2)(a) State or federal regulatory agencies must determine the
ecological value of the mitigation bank credits through mitigation bank
certification processes developed by those agencies. The ecological
value may not be determined by the department.
(b) The department and its mitigation partners must determine the
economic value of the credits. The department and its mitigation
partners shall sell the credits for no less than market value, as
determined using appropriate mitigation credit market appraisal
techniques. The economic value of the mitigation bank credits may
include the value associated with the use of state-owned aquatic lands
for the mitigation bank.
(3) Revenue from the sale of mitigation bank credits generated by
a department mitigation bank on state-owned aquatic lands must be
deposited into the aquatic lands compensatory mitigation endowment
account established in section 6 of this act. All moneys received by
the department from the sale of mitigation bank credits from a specific
mitigation bank on state-owned aquatic lands, in excess of the revenues
to mitigation partners and in excess of the long-term management
endowment for that particular site, must be deposited according to RCW
79.90.245 and 79.64.040, and paid to towns according to RCW 79.92.110.
(4) The department shall keep separate accounting records of all
moneys received from the sale of mitigation bank credits from
department mitigation banks to ensure that funding for the long-term
management of particular mitigation bank sites are fully secured and
expended as approved through state or federal regulatory mitigation
processes.
(5) Consistent with state and federal regulatory mitigation
processes, state-owned aquatic lands utilized as department mitigation
banks are not available for other uses that will compromise the
ecological functions of the mitigation banks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The aquatic lands compensatory
mitigation endowment account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from moneys received by the department for the
sole purpose of creating long-term management endowments under sections
3 and 5 of this act must be deposited into the account.
(2) The moneys in the account must be pooled and invested for the
benefit of all compensatory mitigation sites and mitigation bank sites
that the department has agreed to manage under this chapter.
(3) The account must be administered by the state investment board.
The principal of the account is irreducible. Disbursements of the
interest and investment earnings from the account, less the allocations
to the state investment board expense account under RCW 43.33A.160,
must be made to the aquatic lands compensatory mitigation management
account, created in section 7 of this act, upon authorization of the
commissioner of public lands, and the director of the state investment
board. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The aquatic lands compensatory
mitigation management account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from interest and investment earnings from the
aquatic lands compensatory mitigation endowment account created in
section 6 of this act and in-lieu compensation payments for completing
compensatory mitigation projects on state-owned aquatic lands received
under section 3 of this act must be deposited into the account.
(2) Expenditures from the account may be used solely by the
department for the purpose of designing, implementing, and managing
in-lieu compensatory mitigation projects and performing long-term
monitoring, maintenance, and management of compensatory mitigation
sites and mitigation bank sites that are located on state-owned aquatic
lands.
(3) The moneys in the account shall be pooled and expended solely
for the benefit of compensatory mitigation sites, under sections 3 and
5 of this act, that the department has agreed to manage under this
chapter. Only the commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The authority granted in this chapter for
the use of state-owned aquatic lands for compensatory mitigation or
mitigation bank sites is intended to be voluntarily agreed to by the
department and a public or private third-party entity. The department
is prohibited from conditioning a third party's use of state-owned
aquatic lands with the provisions of this chapter unless the conditions
are agreed to by both the department and the third party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Nothing in this chapter affects the
authority of the department to exchange state-owned tidelands and
shorelands under RCW 79.90.457.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2003 c 403 s 9, 2003 c 313 s 10, 2003
c 191 s 7, 2003 c 148 s 15, 2003 c 92 s 8, and 2003 c 19 s 12 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism
promotion account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural
rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the
youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the
sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's trust fund, ((and))
the ((investing in innovation)) aquatic lands compensatory mitigation
endowment account, and the aquatic lands compensatory mitigation
management account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 79 RCW.

--- END ---