BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.101.080 and 2001 c 166 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall have all of the following powers:
(1) To meet at such times and places as it may deem proper;
(2) To adopt any rules and regulations as it may deem necessary;
(3) To contract for services as it deems necessary in order to
carry out its duties and responsibilities;
(4) To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of any department,
agency, or instrumentality in state, county, and city government, and
other commissions affected by or concerned with the business of the
commission;
(5) To do any and all things necessary or convenient to enable it
fully and adequately to perform its duties and to exercise the power
granted to it;
(6) To select and employ an executive director, and to empower him
to perform such duties and responsibilities as it may deem necessary;
(7) To assume legal, fiscal, and program responsibility for all
training conducted by the commission;
(8) To establish, by rule and regulation, standards for the
training of criminal justice personnel where such standards are not
prescribed by statute;
(9) To own, establish, and operate, or to contract with other
qualified institutions or organizations for the operation of, training
and education programs for criminal justice personnel and to purchase,
lease, or otherwise acquire, subject to the approval of the department
of general administration, a training facility or facilities necessary
to the conducting of such programs;
(10) To establish, by rule and regulation, minimum curriculum
standards for all training programs conducted for employed criminal
justice personnel;
(11) To review and approve or reject standards for instructors of
training programs for criminal justice personnel, and to employ
personnel on a temporary basis as instructors without any loss of
employee benefits to those instructors;
(12) To direct the development of alternative, innovate, and
interdisciplinary training techniques;
(13) To review and approve or reject training programs conducted
for criminal justice personnel and rules establishing and prescribing
minimum training and education standards recommended by the training
standards and education boards;
(14) To allocate financial resources among training and education
programs conducted by the commission;
(15) To allocate training facility space among training and
education programs conducted by the commission;
(16) To issue diplomas certifying satisfactory completion of any
training or education program conducted or approved by the commission
to any person so completing such a program;
(17) To provide for the employment of such personnel as may be
practical to serve as temporary replacements for any person engaged in
a basic training program as defined by the commission;
(18) To establish rules and regulations recommended by the training
standards and education boards prescribing minimum standards relating
to physical, mental and moral fitness which shall govern the
recruitment of criminal justice personnel where such standards are not
prescribed by statute or constitutional provision;
(19) To require that each applicant that has been offered a
conditional offer of employment as a fully commissioned peace officer
or a fully commissioned reserve officer to take and successfully pass
a psychological examination and a polygraph test or similar assessment
procedure as administered by county, city, or state law enforcement
agencies as a condition of employment as a peace officer. The
employing county, city, or state law enforcement agency may require
that each peace officer or reserve officer who is required to take a
psychological examination and a polygraph or similar test pay a portion
of the testing fee based on the actual cost of the test or four hundred
dollars, whichever is less. County, city, and state law enforcement
agencies may establish a payment plan if they determine that the peace
officer or reserve officer does not readily have the means to pay for
his or her portion of the testing fee.
All rules and regulations adopted by the commission shall be
adopted and administered pursuant to the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW, and the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.101.095 and 2001 c 167 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As a condition of continuing employment as peace officers, all
Washington peace officers: (a) Shall timely obtain certification as
peace officers, or timely obtain certification or exemption therefrom,
by meeting all requirements of RCW 43.101.200, as that section is
administered under the rules of the commission, as well by meeting any
additional requirements under this chapter; and (b) shall maintain the
basic certification as peace officers under this chapter. As a
condition of continuing employment for any applicant that has been
offered a conditional offer of employment as a fully commissioned peace
officer or a reserve officer after the effective date of this act,
including any person whose certification has lapsed as a result of a
break of more than twenty-four consecutive months in the officer's
service as a fully commissioned peace officer or reserve officer, he or
she shall successfully pass a psychological examination and a polygraph
or similar test as administered by the county, city, or state law
enforcement agency. The commission shall certify peace officers who
have satisfied, or have been exempted by statute or by rule from, the
basic training requirements of RCW 43.101.200 on or before January 1,
2002. Thereafter, the commission may revoke certification pursuant to
this chapter.
(2) The commission shall allow a peace officer to retain status as
a certified peace officer as long as the officer: (a) Timely meets the
basic law enforcement training requirements, or is exempted therefrom,
in whole or in part, under RCW 43.101.200 or under rule of the
commission; (b) meets or is exempted from any other requirements under
this chapter as administered under the rules adopted by the commission;
(c) is not denied certification by the commission under this chapter;
and (d) has not had certification revoked by the commission.
(3) As a prerequisite to certification, as well as a prerequisite
to pursuit of a hearing under RCW 43.101.155, a peace officer must, on
a form devised or adopted by the commission, authorize the release to
the commission of his or her personnel files, termination papers,
criminal investigation files, or other files, papers, or information
that are directly related to a certification matter or decertification
matter before the commission.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.101.105 and 2001 c 167 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon request by a peace officer's employer or on its own
initiative, the commission may deny or revoke certification of any
peace officer, after written notice and hearing, if a hearing is timely
requested by the peace officer under RCW 43.101.155, based upon a
finding of one or more of the following conditions:
(((1))) (a) The peace officer has failed to timely meet all
requirements for obtaining a certificate of basic law enforcement
training, a certificate of basic law enforcement training equivalency,
or a certificate of exemption from the training;
(((2))) (b) The peace officer has knowingly falsified or omitted
material information on an application for training or certification to
the commission;
(((3))) (c) The peace officer has been convicted at any time of a
felony offense under the laws of this state or has been convicted of a
federal or out-of-state offense comparable to a felony under the laws
of this state; except that if a certified peace officer was convicted
of a felony before being employed as a peace officer, and the
circumstances of the prior felony conviction were fully disclosed to
his or her employer before being hired, the commission may revoke
certification only with the agreement of the employing law enforcement
agency;
(((4))) (d) The peace officer has been discharged for disqualifying
misconduct, the discharge is final, and some or all of the acts or
omissions forming the basis for the discharge proceedings occurred on
or after January 1, 2002;
(((5))) (e) The peace officer's certificate was previously issued
by administrative error on the part of the commission; or
(((6))) (f) The peace officer has interfered with an investigation
or action for denial or revocation of certificate by: (((a))) (i)
Knowingly making a materially false statement to the commission; or
(((b))) (ii) in any matter under investigation by or otherwise before
the commission, tampering with evidence or tampering with or
intimidating any witness.
(2) After the effective date of this act, the commission shall deny
certification of any applicant that has lost his or her certification
as result of a break in service of more than twenty-four consecutive
months if that applicant failed to successfully pass the psychological
examination and the polygraph test or similar assessment procedure, as
administered by county, city, or state law enforcement agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
Before a person may be appointed or hired to act as a fully
commissioned peace officer or a reserve officer, the person shall meet
the minimum standards for employment with the hiring local law
enforcement agency, including: (1) Successful completion of a
psychological examination and polygraph examination administered by
county, city, or state law enforcement agencies; and (2) meeting the
requirements of RCW 43.101.200.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.43.020 and 1983 c 144 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall
appoint the chief of the Washington state patrol, determine his
compensation, and may remove him at will.
The chief shall appoint a sufficient number of competent persons to
act as Washington state patrol officers, may remove them for cause, as
provided in this chapter, and shall make promotional appointments,
determine their compensation, and define their rank and duties, as
hereinafter provided. Before a person may be appointed to act as a
Washington state patrol officer, the person shall meet the minimum
standards for employment with the Washington state patrol, including
successful completion of a psychological examination and polygraph
examination or similar assessment procedure administered by the chief
or his or her designee.
The chief may appoint employees of the Washington state patrol to
serve as special deputies, with such restricted police authority as the
chief shall designate as being necessary and consistent with their
assignment to duty. Such appointment and conferral of authority shall
not qualify said employees for membership in the Washington state
patrol retirement system, nor shall it grant tenure of office as a
regular officer of the Washington state patrol.
The chief may personally appoint, with the consent of the state
treasurer, employees of the office of the state treasurer who are
qualified under the standards of the criminal justice training
commission, or who have comparable training and experience, to serve as
special deputies. The law enforcement powers of any special deputies
appointed in the office of the state treasurer shall be designated by
the chief and shall be restricted to those powers necessary to provide
for statewide security of the holdings or property of or under the
custody of the office of the state treasurer. These appointments may
be revoked by the chief at any time and shall be revoked upon the
written request of the state treasurer or by operation of law upon
termination of the special deputy's employment with the office of the
state treasurer or thirty days after the chief who made the appointment
leaves office. The chief shall be civilly immune for the acts of such
special deputies. Such appointment and conferral of authority shall
not qualify such employees for membership in the Washington state
patrol retirement system, nor shall it grant tenure of office as a
regular officer of the Washington state patrol.

--- END ---