BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The uniform disciplinary act provides a
uniform process for addressing acts of unprofessional conduct affecting
fifty-seven health professions regulated by the state. The
disciplinary authorities include the secretary of health and sixteen
boards and commissions charged with protecting the health and safety of
patients from unprofessional conduct. It is recognized nationally as
a model law and has worked well over time to provide uniformity and
efficiency to the disciplinary process.
The legislature finds that it is necessary to further streamline
the disciplinary process and ensure more equitable case dispositions
among health care providers. An efficient division of responsibilities
between the secretary of health with authority over preliminary
complaint investigations and charging decisions reserves to the health
professionals sitting on the boards and commissions the final authority
on case dispositions. These measures will ensure that investigations
and charging decisions are free of any potential conflicts of interest
and that sanctions are uniform across professional lines.
The legislature further finds that this act does not intend to
change or modify, in any way, the relationship as it exists on the
effective date of this section between boards and commissions and
contractors providing services to impaired providers.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.050 and 1995 c 336 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The disciplining authority has the following authority:
(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind such rules as are deemed necessary
to carry out this chapter;
(2) To ((investigate)) provide consultation and assistance with
investigations of all complaints or reports of unprofessional conduct
as defined in this chapter ((and)) as requested by the secretary.
However, the secretary must consult with the disciplining authority in
those matters:
(a) Pertaining to standards of practice; and
(b) Where clinical expertise is necessary;
(3) To hold hearings as provided in this chapter;
(((3))) (4) To issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection
with any investigation, hearing, or proceeding held under this chapter;
(((4))) (5) To take or cause depositions to be taken and use other
discovery procedures as needed in any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding held under this chapter;
(((5))) (6) To compel attendance of witnesses at hearings;
(((6))) (7) In the course of ((investigating)) consulting and
assisting with the investigation of a complaint or report of
unprofessional conduct, to conduct practice reviews as requested by the
secretary;
(((7) To take emergency action ordering summary suspension of a
license, or restriction or limitation of the licensee's practice
pending proceedings by the disciplining authority;))
(8) To use a presiding officer as authorized in RCW 18.130.095(3)
or the office of administrative hearings as authorized in chapter 34.12
RCW to conduct hearings. The disciplining authority shall make the
final decision regarding disposition of the license unless the
disciplining authority elects to delegate in writing the final decision
to the presiding officer;
(9) To use individual members of the boards to ((direct)) provide
consultation and assistance with investigations as requested by the
secretary. However, the member of the board shall not subsequently
participate in the hearing of the case;
(10) To enter into contracts for professional services determined
to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;
(11) To contract with licensees or other persons or organizations
to provide services necessary for the monitoring and supervision of
licensees who are placed on probation, whose professional activities
are restricted, or who are for any authorized purpose subject to
monitoring by the disciplining authority;
(12) To adopt standards of professional conduct or practice;
(13) To grant or deny license applications, and in the event of a
finding of unprofessional conduct by an applicant or license holder, to
impose any sanction against a license applicant or license holder
provided by this chapter;
(14) To designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and
statements of charges;
(15) To establish panels consisting of three or more members of the
board to perform any duty or authority within the board's jurisdiction
under this chapter;
(16) To review and audit the records of licensed health facilities'
or services' quality assurance committee decisions in which a
licensee's practice privilege or employment is terminated or
restricted. Each health facility or service shall produce and make
accessible to the disciplining authority the appropriate records and
otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall
not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil
action pursuant to RCW 70.41.200(3).

Sec. 3 RCW 18.130.060 and 2001 c 101 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the authority specified in RCW 18.130.050, the
secretary has the following additional authority:
(1) To employ such investigative, administrative, and clerical
staff as necessary for the enforcement of this chapter;
(2) Upon the request of a board, to appoint pro tem members to
participate as members of a panel of the board in connection with
proceedings specifically identified in the request. Individuals so
appointed must meet the same minimum qualifications as regular members
of the board. Pro tem members appointed for matters under this chapter
are appointed for a term of no more than one year. No pro tem member
may serve more than four one-year terms. While serving as board
members pro tem, persons so appointed have all the powers, duties, and
immunities, and are entitled to the emoluments, including travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, of regular
members of the board. The chairperson of a panel shall be a regular
member of the board appointed by the board chairperson. Panels have
authority to act as directed by the board with respect to all matters
((concerning the review, investigation, and adjudication of all
complaints, allegations, charges, and matters)) subject to the
jurisdiction of the board or commission. The authority to act through
panels does not restrict the authority of the board to act as a single
body at any phase of proceedings within the board's jurisdiction.
Board panels may ((make interim orders and)) issue final orders and
decisions with respect to matters and cases delegated to the panel by
the board. Final decisions may be appealed as provided in chapter
34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act;
(3) To establish fees to be paid for witnesses, expert witnesses,
and consultants used in any investigation and to establish fees to
witnesses in any agency adjudicative proceeding as authorized by RCW
34.05.446;
(4) To conduct investigations and practice reviews ((at the
direction of the disciplining authority)) and to issue subpoenas,
administer oaths, and take depositions in the course of conducting
those investigations and practice reviews at the direction of the
disciplining authority. The secretary must consult with the relevant
disciplining authority in an investigation relating to the breach of a
standard of practice or in a matter where clinical expertise is
necessary;
(5) To review results of investigations conducted under this
chapter and determine the appropriate disposition, which may include
closure, notice of correction, stipulations permitted by RCW
18.130.172, or issuance of a statement of charges;
(6) To take emergency action ordering summary suspension of a
license, or restriction or limitation of the licensee's practice
pending proceedings by the disciplining authority;
(7) To have the health professions regulatory program establish a
system to recruit potential public members, to review the
qualifications of such potential members, and to provide orientation to
those public members appointed pursuant to law by the governor or the
secretary to the boards and commissions specified in RCW
18.130.040(2)(b), and to the advisory committees and ((councils)) for
professions specified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(a).

Sec. 4 RCW 18.130.080 and 1998 c 132 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person, including but not limited to consumers, licensees,
corporations, organizations, health care facilities, impaired
practitioner programs, or voluntary substance abuse monitoring programs
approved by disciplining authorities, and state and local governmental
agencies, may submit a written complaint to the ((disciplining
authority)) secretary charging a license holder or applicant with
unprofessional conduct and specifying the grounds therefor or to report
information to the ((disciplining authority)) secretary, or voluntary
substance abuse monitoring program, or an impaired practitioner program
approved by the ((disciplining authority)) secretary, which indicates
that the license holder may not be able to practice his or her
profession with reasonable skill and safety to consumers as a result of
a mental or physical condition. If the ((disciplining authority))
secretary determines that the complaint merits investigation, or if the
((disciplining authority)) secretary has reason to believe, without a
formal complaint, that a license holder or applicant may have engaged
in unprofessional conduct, the ((disciplining authority)) secretary
shall investigate to determine whether there has been unprofessional
conduct. A person who files a complaint or reports information under
this section in good faith is immune from suit in any civil action
related to the filing or contents of the complaint.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.130.090 and 1993 c 367 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the ((disciplining authority)) secretary determines, upon
investigation, that there is reason to believe a violation of RCW
18.130.180 has occurred, a statement of charge or charges shall be
prepared and served upon the license holder or applicant at the
earliest practical time. The statement of charge or charges shall be
accompanied by a notice that the license holder or applicant may
request a hearing to contest the charge or charges. The license holder
or applicant must file a request for hearing with the disciplining
authority within twenty days after being served the statement of
charges. If the twenty-day limit results in a hardship upon the
license holder or applicant, he or she may request for good cause an
extension not to exceed sixty additional days. If the disciplining
authority finds that there is good cause, it shall grant the extension.
The failure to request a hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the
disciplining authority may enter a decision on the basis of the facts
available to it.
(2) If a hearing is requested, the time of the hearing shall be
fixed by the disciplining authority as soon as convenient, but the
hearing shall not be held earlier than thirty days after service of the
charges upon the license holder or applicant.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.130.160 and 2001 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon a finding, after hearing, that a license holder or applicant
has committed unprofessional conduct or is unable to practice with
reasonable skill and safety due to a physical or mental condition, the
disciplining authority may issue an order providing for one or any
combination of the following:
(1) Revocation of the license;
(2) Suspension of the license for a fixed or indefinite term;
(3) Restriction or limitation of the practice;
(4) Requiring the satisfactory completion of a specific program of
remedial education or treatment;
(5) The monitoring of the practice by a supervisor approved by the
disciplining authority;
(6) Censure or reprimand;
(7) Compliance with conditions of probation for a designated period
of time;
(8) Payment of a fine for each violation of this chapter, not to
exceed five thousand dollars per violation. Funds received shall be
placed in the health professions account;
(9) Denial of the license request;
(10) Corrective action;
(11) Refund of fees billed to and collected from the consumer;
(12) A surrender of the practitioner's license in lieu of other
sanctions, which must be reported to the federal data bank.
Except as otherwise provided in section 9 of this act, any of the
actions under this section may be totally or partly stayed by the
disciplining authority. In determining what action is appropriate, the
disciplining authority must first consider what sanctions are necessary
to protect or compensate the public. Only after such provisions have
been made may the disciplining authority consider and include in the
order requirements designed to rehabilitate the license holder or
applicant. All costs associated with compliance with orders issued
under this section are the obligation of the license holder or
applicant.
The licensee or applicant may enter into a stipulated disposition
of charges that includes one or more of the sanctions of this section,
but only after a statement of charges has been issued and the licensee
has been afforded the opportunity for a hearing and has elected on the
record to forego such a hearing. The stipulation shall either contain
one or more specific findings of unprofessional conduct or inability to
practice, or a statement by the licensee acknowledging that evidence is
sufficient to justify one or more specified findings of unprofessional
conduct or inability to practice. The stipulation entered into
pursuant to this subsection shall be considered formal disciplinary
action for all purposes.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.130.170 and 1995 c 336 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the ((disciplining authority)) secretary believes a license
holder or applicant may be unable to practice with reasonable skill and
safety to consumers by reason of any mental or physical condition, a
statement of charges in the name of the ((disciplining authority))
secretary shall be served on the license holder or applicant and notice
shall also be issued providing an opportunity for a hearing. The
hearing shall be limited to the sole issue of the capacity of the
license holder or applicant to practice with reasonable skill and
safety. If the disciplining authority determines that the license
holder or applicant is unable to practice with reasonable skill and
safety for one of the reasons stated in this subsection, the
disciplining authority shall impose such sanctions under RCW 18.130.160
as is deemed necessary to protect the public.
(2)(a) In investigating or adjudicating a complaint or report that
a license holder or applicant may be unable to practice with reasonable
skill or safety by reason of any mental or physical condition, the
((disciplining authority)) secretary may require a license holder or
applicant to submit to a mental or physical examination by one or more
licensed or certified health professionals designated by the
((disciplining authority)) secretary. The license holder or applicant
shall be provided written notice of the ((disciplining authority's))
secretary's intent to order a mental or physical examination, which
notice shall include: (i) A statement of the specific conduct, event,
or circumstances justifying an examination; (ii) a summary of the
evidence supporting the ((disciplining authority's)) secretary's
concern that the license holder or applicant may be unable to practice
with reasonable skill and safety by reason of a mental or physical
condition, and the grounds for believing such evidence to be credible
and reliable; (iii) a statement of the nature, purpose, scope, and
content of the intended examination; (iv) a statement that the license
holder or applicant has the right to respond in writing within twenty
days to challenge the ((disciplining authority's)) secretary's grounds
for ordering an examination or to challenge the manner or form of the
examination; and (v) a statement that if the license holder or
applicant timely responds to the notice of intent, then the license
holder or applicant will not be required to submit to the examination
while the response is under consideration.
(b) Upon submission of a timely response to the notice of intent to
order a mental or physical examination, the license holder or applicant
shall have an opportunity to respond to or refute such an order by
submission of evidence or written argument or both. The evidence and
written argument supporting and opposing the mental or physical
examination shall be reviewed by either a panel of the disciplining
authority members who have not been involved with the allegations
against the license holder or applicant or a neutral decision maker
approved by the disciplining authority. The reviewing panel of the
disciplining authority or the approved neutral decision maker may, in
its discretion, ask for oral argument from the parties. The reviewing
panel of the disciplining authority or the approved neutral decision
maker shall prepare a written decision as to whether: There is
reasonable cause to believe that the license holder or applicant may be
unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety by reason of a
mental or physical condition, or the manner or form of the mental or
physical examination is appropriate, or both.
(c) Upon receipt by the ((disciplining authority)) secretary of the
written decision, or upon the failure of the license holder or
applicant to timely respond to the notice of intent, the ((disciplining
authority)) secretary may issue an order requiring the license holder
or applicant to undergo a mental or physical examination. All such
mental or physical examinations shall be narrowly tailored to address
only the alleged mental or physical condition and the ability of the
license holder or applicant to practice with reasonable skill and
safety. An order of the ((disciplining authority)) secretary requiring
the license holder or applicant to undergo a mental or physical
examination is not a final order for purposes of appeal. The cost of
the examinations ordered by the ((disciplining authority)) secretary
shall be paid out of the health professions account. In addition to
any examinations ordered by the ((disciplining authority)) secretary,
the licensee may submit physical or mental examination reports from
licensed or certified health professionals of the license holder's or
applicant's choosing and expense.
(d) If the disciplining authority finds that a license holder or
applicant has failed to submit to a properly ordered mental or physical
examination, then the disciplining authority may order appropriate
action or discipline under RCW 18.130.180(9), unless the failure was
due to circumstances beyond the person's control. However, no such
action or discipline may be imposed unless the license holder or
applicant has had the notice and opportunity to challenge the
((disciplining authority's)) secretary's grounds for ordering the
examination, to challenge the manner and form, to assert any other
defenses, and to have such challenges or defenses considered by either
a panel of the disciplining authority members who have not been
involved with the allegations against the license holder or applicant
or a neutral decision maker approved by the disciplining authority, as
previously set forth in this section. Further, the action or
discipline ordered by the disciplining authority shall not be more
severe than a suspension of the license, certification, registration or
application until such time as the license holder or applicant complies
with the properly ordered mental or physical examination.
(e) Nothing in this section shall restrict the power of ((a
disciplining authority)) the secretary to act in an emergency under RCW
34.05.422(4), 34.05.479, and ((18.130.050(7))) 18.130.060(6).
(f) A determination by a court of competent jurisdiction that a
license holder or applicant is mentally incompetent or mentally ill is
presumptive evidence of the license holder's or applicant's inability
to practice with reasonable skill and safety. An individual affected
under this section shall at reasonable intervals be afforded an
opportunity, at his or her expense, to demonstrate that the individual
can resume competent practice with reasonable skill and safety to the
consumer.
(3) For the purpose of subsection (2) of this section, an applicant
or license holder governed by this chapter, by making application,
practicing, or filing a license renewal, is deemed to have given
consent to submit to a mental, physical, or psychological examination
when directed in writing by the ((disciplining authority)) secretary
and further to have waived all objections to the admissibility or use
of the examining health professional's testimony or examination reports
by the ((disciplining authority)) secretary on the ground that the
testimony or reports constitute privileged communications.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.130.172 and 2000 c 171 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for those acts of unprofessional conduct specified in
section 9 of this act, prior to serving a statement of charges under
RCW 18.130.090 or 18.130.170, the ((disciplinary authority)) secretary
may furnish a statement of allegations to the licensee or applicant
along with a detailed summary of the evidence relied upon to establish
the allegations and a proposed stipulation for informal resolution of
the allegations. These documents shall be exempt from public
disclosure until such time as the allegations are resolved either by
stipulation or otherwise.
(2) The ((disciplinary authority)) secretary and the applicant or
licensee may stipulate that the allegations may be disposed of
informally in accordance with this subsection. The stipulation shall
contain a statement of the facts leading to the filing of the
complaint; the act or acts of unprofessional conduct alleged to have
been committed or the alleged basis for determining that the applicant
or licensee is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety; a
statement that the stipulation is not to be construed as a finding of
either unprofessional conduct or inability to practice; an
acknowledgement that a finding of unprofessional conduct or inability
to practice, if proven, constitutes grounds for discipline under this
chapter; and an agreement on the part of the licensee or applicant that
the sanctions set forth in RCW 18.130.160, except RCW 18.130.160 (1),
(2), (6), and (8), may be imposed as part of the stipulation, except
that no fine may be imposed but the licensee or applicant may agree to
reimburse the ((disciplinary authority)) secretary the costs of
investigation and processing the complaint up to an amount not
exceeding one thousand dollars per allegation; and an agreement on the
part of the ((disciplinary authority)) secretary to forego further
disciplinary proceedings concerning the allegations. A stipulation
entered into pursuant to this subsection shall not be considered formal
disciplinary action.
(3) If the licensee or applicant declines to agree to disposition
of the charges by means of a stipulation pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, the ((disciplinary authority)) secretary may proceed to
formal disciplinary action pursuant to RCW 18.130.090 or 18.130.170.
(4) Upon execution of a stipulation under subsection (2) of this
section by both the licensee or applicant and the ((disciplinary
authority)) secretary, the complaint is deemed disposed of and shall
become subject to public disclosure on the same basis and to the same
extent as other records of the ((disciplinary authority)) secretary.
Should the licensee or applicant fail to pay any agreed reimbursement
within thirty days of the date specified in the stipulation for
payment, the ((disciplinary authority)) secretary may seek collection
of the amount agreed to be paid in the same manner as enforcement of a
fine under RCW 18.130.165.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The disciplining authority shall revoke the license of a
license holder who has any combination of three findings that he or she
has committed any of the following acts of unprofessional conduct
within a ten-year period:
(a) Any act defined in RCW 18.130.180(4) that causes the death of
or severe injury to a patient or creates a significant risk of harm to
the public;
(b) Any act defined in RCW 18.130.180(6);
(c) Any act defined in RCW 18.130.180(7) that causes the death of
or severe injury to a patient or creates a significant risk of harm to
the public;
(d) Any act defined in RCW 18.130.180(17);
(e) Any act defined in RCW 18.130.180(23) that causes the death of
or severe injury to a patient or creates a significant risk of harm to
the public;
(f) Any act of abuse to a client or patient as defined in RCW
18.130.180(24); and
(g) Any sexual contact with a client or patient as defined in RCW
18.130.180(24) where the client or patient did not consent.
(2) A finding of mitigating circumstance for an act of
unprofessional conduct specified in this section may be issued and
applied one time for any license holder or applicant for a license.
After a finding of mitigating circumstances is issued and applied, no
subsequent findings under this section may consider any mitigating
circumstances. The following mitigating circumstances may be
considered:
(a) For subsection (1)(a) of this section, the act involved a high-risk procedure, there was no lower-risk alternative to that procedure,
the patient was aware of the risks of the procedure, and prior to the
institution of disciplinary actions the license holder took appropriate
remedial measures;
(b) There is a strong potential for rehabilitation of the license
holder; or
(c) There is a strong potential for remedial education and training
to prevent future harm to the public.
(3) Nothing in this section limits the authority of the
disciplining authority to revoke a license or take other disciplinary
action when the license holder has committed only one or two acts of
unprofessional conduct instead of three.

--- END ---