BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.208 and 2002 c 319 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Disabled employee" means ((an individual)) a person eligible
to receive a disability retirement allowance from the public employees'
retirement system.
(b) (("Health plan" means a contract, policy, fund, trust, or other
program established jointly or individually by a county, municipality,
or other political subdivision of the state that provides for all or a
part of hospitalization or medical aid for its employees and their
dependents under RCW 41.04.180.
(c))) "Retired employee" means a public employee meeting the
retirement eligibility, years of service requirements, and other
criteria ((set forth in)) of the public employees' retirement system.
(((2) A county, municipality, or other political subdivision that
provides a health plan for its employees shall permit retired and
disabled employees and their dependents to continue participation in a
plan subject to the exceptions, limitations, and conditions set forth
in this section. However, this section does not apply to a county,
municipality, or other political subdivision participating in an
insurance program administered under chapter 41.05 RCW if retired and
disabled employees and their dependents of the participating county,
municipality, or other political subdivision are covered under an
insurance program administered under chapter 41.05 RCW. Nothing in
this subsection or chapter 319, Laws of 2002 precludes the local
government employer from offering retired or disabled employees a
health plan with a benefit structure, copayment, deductible,
coinsurance, lifetime benefit maximum, and other plan features which
differ from those offered through a health plan provided to active
employees. Further, nothing in this subsection precludes a local
government employer from joining with other public agency employers,
including interjurisdictional benefit pools and multi-employer
associations or consortiums, to fulfill its obligations under chapter
319, Laws of 2002.
(3) A county, municipality, or other political subdivision has full
authority to require a person who requests continued participation in
a health plan under subsection (2) of this section to pay the full cost
of such participation, including any amounts necessary for
administration. However, this subsection does not require an employer
who is currently paying for all or part of a health plan for its
retired and disabled employees to discontinue those payments.
(4) Payments for continued participation in a former employer's
health plan may be assigned to the underwriter of the health plan from
public pension benefits or may be paid to the former employer, as
determined by the former employer, so that an underwriter of the health
plan that is an insurance company, health care service contractor, or
health maintenance organization is not required to accept individual
payments from persons continuing participation in the employer's health
plan.
(5) After an initial open enrollment period of ninety days after
January 1, 2003, an employer may not be required to permit a person to
continue participation in the health plan if the person is responsible
for a lapse in coverage under the plan. In addition, an employer may
not be required to permit a person to continue participation in the
employer's health plan if the employer offered continued participation
in a health plan that meets the requirements of chapter 319, Laws of
2002.
(6) If a person continuing participation in the former employer's
health plan has medical coverage available through another employer,
the medical coverage of the other employer is the primary coverage for
purposes of coordination of benefits as provided for in the former
employer's health plan.
(7) If a person's continued participation in a health plan was
permitted because of the person's relationship to a retired or disabled
employee of the employer providing the health plan and the retired or
disabled employee dies, then that person is permitted to continue
participation in the health plan for a period of not more than six
months after the death of the retired or disabled employee. However,
the employer providing the health plan may permit continued
participation beyond that time period.
(8) An employer may offer one or more health plans different from
that provided for active employees and designed to meet the needs of
persons requesting continued participation in the employer's health
plan. An employer, in designing or offering continued participation in
a health plan, may utilize terms or conditions necessary to administer
the plan to the extent the terms and conditions do not conflict with
this section.
(9) If an employer changes the underwriter of a health plan, the
replaced underwriter has no further responsibility or obligation to
persons who continued participation in a health plan of the replaced
underwriter. However, the employer shall permit those persons to
participate in any new health plan.
(10) The benefits granted under this section are not considered a
matter of contractual right. Should the legislature, a county,
municipality, or other political subdivision of the state revoke or
change any benefits granted under this section, an affected person is
not entitled to receive the benefits as a matter of contractual right.
(11) This section does not affect any health plan contained in a
collective bargaining agreement in existence as of January 1, 2003.
However, any plan contained in future collective bargaining agreements
shall conform to this section. In addition, this section does not
affect any health plan contract or policy in existence as of January 1,
2003. However, any renewal of the contract or policy shall conform to
this section.))
(c) "Individual health benefit plan" means a health plan offered to
individuals by a carrier under chapter 48.43, 48.44, or 48.46 RCW.
(2) Counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions must
assist disabled employees and retired employees in applying for health
insurance coverage through an individual health benefit plan.
Assistance may include developing and distributing standardized
information on the availability and cost of individual health benefit
plans, application packages, and health benefit fairs.
(3) The office of the insurance commissioner, in cooperation with
carriers licensed to offer individual health benefit plans, shall
develop and distribute to counties, municipalities, and political
subdivisions the following information:
(a) Standardized information on the availability and cost of
individual health benefit plans;
(b) Application procedures for individual health benefit plans; and
(c) Assistance in organizing health benefit fairs for their
disabled or retired employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 41.04.212 (Local government retirees -- Health care--Administration) and 2002 c 319 s 3;
(2) 2002 c 319 s 1 (uncodified);
(3) 2002 c 319 s 4; and
(4) 2002 c 319 s 5 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---