BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.34.042 and 1998 c 296 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An evaluation and treatment facility may admit for evaluation,
diagnosis, or treatment any minor under thirteen years of age for whom
application is made by the minor's parent or guardian. The consent of
the minor under the age of thirteen is not required.
(2) A minor thirteen years or older may admit himself or herself to
an evaluation and treatment facility for inpatient mental treatment,
without parental consent. The admission shall occur only if the
professional person in charge of the facility concurs with the need for
inpatient treatment.
(((2))) (3) When, in the judgment of the professional person in
charge of an evaluation and treatment facility, there is reason to
believe that a minor is in need of inpatient treatment because of a
mental disorder, and the facility provides the type of evaluation and
treatment needed by the minor, and it is not feasible to treat the
minor in any less restrictive setting or the minor's home, the minor
may be admitted to an evaluation and treatment facility.
(((3))) (4) Written renewal of voluntary consent must be obtained
from the applicant no less than once every twelve months. The minor's
need for continued inpatient treatments shall be reviewed and
documented no less than every one hundred eighty days.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.34.052 and 1998 c 296 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A parent may bring, or authorize the bringing of, his or her
minor child, age thirteen or older, to an evaluation and treatment
facility and request that the professional person examine the minor to
determine whether the minor has a mental disorder and is in need of
inpatient treatment.
(2) The consent of the minor is not required for admission,
evaluation, and treatment if the parent brings the minor to the
facility.
(3) An appropriately trained professional person may evaluate
whether the minor has a mental disorder. The evaluation shall be
completed within twenty-four hours of the time the minor was brought to
the facility, unless the professional person determines that the
condition of the minor necessitates additional time for evaluation. In
no event shall a minor be held longer than seventy-two hours for
evaluation. If, in the judgment of the professional person, it is
determined it is a medical necessity for the minor to receive inpatient
treatment, the minor may be held for treatment. The facility shall
limit treatment to that which the professional person determines is
medically necessary to stabilize the minor's condition until the
evaluation has been completed. Within twenty-four hours of completion
of the evaluation, the professional person shall notify the department
if the child is held for treatment and of the date of admission.
(4) No provider is obligated to provide treatment to a minor under
the provisions of this section. No provider may admit a minor to
treatment under this section unless it is medically necessary.
(5) No minor receiving inpatient treatment under this section may
be discharged from the facility based solely on his or her request.
(6) Prior to the review conducted under RCW 71.34.025, the
professional person shall notify the minor of his or her right to
petition superior court for release from the facility.
(((7) For the purposes of this section "professional person" does
not include a social worker, unless the social worker is certified
under RCW 18.19.110 and appropriately trained and qualified by
education and experience, as defined by the department, in psychiatric
social work.))

Sec. 3 RCW 71.34.054 and 1998 c 296 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A parent may bring, or authorize the bringing of, his or her
minor child, age thirteen or older, to a provider of outpatient mental
health treatment and request that an appropriately trained professional
person examine the minor to determine whether the minor has a mental
disorder and is in need of outpatient treatment.
(2) The consent of the minor is not required for evaluation if the
parent brings the minor to the provider.
(3) The professional person may evaluate whether the minor has a
mental disorder and is in need of outpatient treatment.
(4) Any minor admitted to inpatient treatment under RCW 71.34.042
or 71.34.052 shall be discharged immediately from inpatient treatment
upon written request of the parent.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.34.025 and 1998 c 296 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall assure that, for any minor admitted to
inpatient treatment under RCW 71.34.052, a review is conducted by a
physician or other mental health professional who is employed by the
department, or an agency under contract with the department, and who
neither has a financial interest in continued inpatient treatment of
the minor nor is affiliated with the facility providing the treatment.
The physician or other mental health professional shall conduct the
review not less than ((seven)) three nor more than ((fourteen)) seven
days following the date the minor was brought to the facility under RCW
71.34.052 to determine whether it is a medical necessity to continue
the minor's treatment on an inpatient basis.
(2) In making a determination under subsection (1) of this section,
the department shall consider the opinion of the treatment provider,
the safety of the minor, and the likelihood the minor's mental health
will deteriorate if released from inpatient treatment. The department
shall consult with the parent in advance of making its determination.
(3) If, after any review conducted by the department under this
section, the department determines it is no longer a medical necessity
for a minor to receive inpatient treatment, the department shall
immediately notify the parents and the facility. The facility shall
release the minor to the parents within twenty-four hours of receiving
notice. If the professional person in charge and the parent believe
that it is a medical necessity for the minor to remain in inpatient
treatment, the minor shall be released to the parent on the second
judicial day following the department's determination in order to allow
the parent time to file an at-risk youth petition under chapter 13.32A
RCW. If the department determines it is a medical necessity for the
minor to receive outpatient treatment and the minor declines to obtain
such treatment, such refusal shall be grounds for the parent to file an
at-risk youth petition.
(4) If the evaluation conducted under RCW 71.34.052 is done by the
department, the reviews required by subsection (1) of this section
shall be done by contract with an independent agency.
(5) The department may, subject to available funds, contract with
other governmental agencies to conduct the reviews under this section.
The department may seek reimbursement from the parents, their
insurance, or medicaid for the expense of any review conducted by an
agency under contract.
(6) In addition to the review required under this section, the
department may periodically determine and redetermine the medical
necessity of treatment for purposes of payment with public funds.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.34.162 and 1998 c 296 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
Following the review conducted under RCW 71.34.025, a minor child
may petition the superior court for his or her release from the
facility. ((The petition may be filed not sooner than five days
following the review.)) The court shall release the minor unless it
finds, upon a preponderance of the evidence, that it is a medical
necessity for the minor to remain at the facility.

Sec. 6 RCW 71.34.270 and 1985 c 354 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
No public or private agency or governmental entity, nor officer of
a public or private agency, nor the superintendent, or professional
person in charge, his or her professional designee or attending staff
of any such agency, nor any public official performing functions
necessary to the administration of this chapter, nor peace officer
responsible for detaining a person under this chapter, nor any county
designated mental health professional, nor professional person, nor
evaluation and treatment facility, shall be civilly or criminally
liable for performing his or her duties under this chapter with regard
to the decision of whether to admit, release, or detain a person for
evaluation and treatment: PROVIDED, That such duties were performed in
good faith and without gross negligence.

--- END ---