BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.84.030 and 1987 c 202 s 121 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In any action under Title 26 RCW in the superior court of
Washington the prevailing party shall be entitled to his or her costs
and disbursements; but the plaintiff shall in no case be entitled to
costs taxed as attorneys' fees in actions within the jurisdiction of
the district court when commenced in the superior court.
(2) In any action in a court of record in Washington other than
actions under Title 26 RCW, the prevailing or substantially prevailing
party is entitled to his or her costs and disbursements, including
reasonable attorneys' fees. The court shall determine and award the
amount of reasonable attorneys' fees and costs under this chapter. A
party is considered to prevail if it obtains substantial relief on a
material issue or material issues sought. Reasonable attorneys' fees
must be determined by multiplying the total number of attorneys' hours
necessary to prevail on the material issue or material issues by a
reasonable hourly rate of compensation. The hourly rate of
compensation is presumed reasonable if it is substantially similar to
fees charged by other attorneys in the same area for work of similar
substance and complexity. This subsection does not apply to the award
of attorneys' fees pursuant to any other statutory provision.

--- END ---