BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.63.110 and 2003 c 380 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and
fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or
title.
(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.55.105(2) is two
hundred fifty dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this
subsection (2) may be reduced.
(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of
monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall
also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise
discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions.
The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this
schedule every two years for inflation.
(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction
relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to
this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not
to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty
set by the local legislative body.
(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are
civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of
chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles
are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties
which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this
chapter it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at
that time the court may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the
period in which the penalty may be paid. If ((the penalty is not paid
on or before the time established for payment)) a person is not able to
pay a monetary penalty in full, the court shall enter into a payment
plan with the person. "Payment plan," as used in this section, means
a plan that requires a person to pay an initial payment of not less
than five percent of the total owed, followed by reasonable payments in
an amount established by the court. The initial payment amount
required by the court may be no greater than thirty dollars, but the
person may voluntarily pay a higher amount. No required payment may
exceed ten percent of the original amount owed; however, the person may
voluntarily pay any amount at any time in addition to these payments.
(a) If a payment required to be made under the payment plan is
delinquent by thirty days, the court shall notify the department of the
failure to pay the penalty, and the department shall suspend the
person's driver's license or driving privilege until the penalty has
been paid ((and)), including the penalty provided in subsection (4) of
this section ((has been paid)).
(b) If a person has not entered into a payment plan with the court
and has not paid the penalty in full on or before the time established
for payment, the court shall notify the department of the delinquency,
and the department shall suspend the person's driver's license or
driving privilege until the penalty has been paid, including the
penalty provided in subsection (3) of this section, or until the person
has entered into a payment plan under this section and has paid the
initial payment.
(c) If a community service program for offenders is available in
the jurisdiction, the court shall offer to convert all or part of the
monetary penalties due under this subsection (5) to community service
if the person is unable to make reasonable time payments.
(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed
a fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances shall
this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040.
(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this
section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this
section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other
than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be assessed an additional penalty of twenty
dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend the additional
penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If a
community restitution program for offenders is available in the
jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to offset all or a part
of the penalty due under this subsection (8) by participation in the
community restitution program.
(b) Eight dollars and fifty cents of the additional penalty under
(a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The
remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under
chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited as
provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of the revenue received by the
county or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into
the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city
or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.64.025 and 1999 c 86 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person violates his or her written promise to
appear in court, ((or)) fails to appear for a scheduled court hearing,
or fails to comply with the terms of a citation, the court in which the
defendant failed to appear or comply shall promptly give notice of such
fact to the department of licensing. Whenever thereafter the case in
which the defendant failed to appear or comply is adjudicated, the
court hearing the case shall promptly file with the department a
certificate showing that the case has been adjudicated.
(2) Where compliance with the terms of a misdemeanor citation is
limited to the payment of a monetary penalty, and a person is not able
to pay the monetary penalty in full, the court shall enter into a
payment plan with the person. "Payment plan," as used in this section,
means a plan that requires a person to pay an initial payment of not
less than five percent of the total owed, followed by reasonable
payments in an amount established by the court. No required payment
may exceed ten percent of the original amount owed. The person may
voluntarily pay any amount at any time in addition to these payments.
If a person has entered into a payment plan under this subsection, the
court shall not notify the department of licensing that the person has
failed to comply with the terms of a citation as it applies to payment
of the monetary penalty unless a payment required to be made under the
payment plan is delinquent by thirty days.

--- END ---