BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The department, the Washington state patrol, and the Washington
state council for the prevention of child abuse and neglect shall work
cooperatively to create and design a special keep kids safe license
plate for motor vehicles required to display two motor vehicle license
plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon
terms and conditions established by the department.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee of no more than forty
dollars for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section
5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration
of this program. ((Until December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed
thirty-five dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations due or to
become due on January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to no
more than forty dollars.)) This fee is in addition to all other fees
required to register and license the vehicle for which the plates have
been requested. All such additional special license plate fees
collected by the department shall be deposited in the state treasury
and credited to the motor vehicle fund.
(2) ((Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application, registration, and renewal
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license
plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder
of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(((4) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(((5))) (4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(((6))) (5) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a special
baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be distributed
to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest
payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium,
as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a special
keep kids safe license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty-five
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The department shall remit the
remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the children's trust fund created under RCW 43.121.100.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a special keep
kids safe license plate shall pay a fee of thirty-five dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The department shall remit the remaining
proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the children's trust fund created under RCW 43.121.100.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.290 and 1997 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In any case of a valid sale or transfer of the ownership of any
vehicle, the right to the certificates properly transferable therewith,
except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, and to the vehicle license plates,
except as provided in RCW 46.16.316, passes to the purchaser or
transferee. It is unlawful for the holder of such certificates, except
as provided in RCW 46.16.280, or vehicle license plates, except as
provided in RCW 46.16.316, to fail, neglect, or refuse to endorse the
certificates and deliver the vehicle license plates to the purchaser or
transferee. If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed by the
state or any county, city, town, school district, or other political
subdivision entitled to exemption as provided by law, or, if the
vehicle is licensed with personalized plates, amateur radio operator
plates, medal of honor plates, disabled person plates, disabled veteran
plates, prisoner of war plates, or other special license plates issued
under RCW 46.16.301 or 46.16.313 as now existing or as it existed
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, the vehicle
license plates therefor ((shall)) may be transferred as provided in RCW
46.16.316, in which case they may be retained and ((may be)) displayed
upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of the vehicle so sold or
transferred.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.316 and 1997 c 291 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.16.305:
(1) When a person who has been issued a special license plate or
plates under RCW 46.16.301 or 46.16.313 as now existing or as it
existed before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997,
sells, trades, or otherwise transfers or releases ownership of the
vehicle upon which the special license plate or plates have been
displayed, he or she shall immediately report the transfer of such
plate or plates to an acquired vehicle or vehicle eligible for such
plates pursuant to departmental rule, or he or she shall surrender such
plates to the department immediately if such surrender is required by
departmental rule. If a person applies for a transfer of the plate or
plates to another eligible vehicle, a transfer fee of five dollars
shall be charged in addition to all other applicable fees. Such
transfer fees shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Failure to
surrender the plates when required is a traffic infraction.
(2) If the special license plate or plates issued by the department
become lost, defaced, damaged, or destroyed, application for a
replacement special license plate or plates shall be made and fees paid
as provided by law for the replacement of regular license plates.

--- END ---