BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21C.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 109 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature authorizes and directs that, to the fullest
extent possible((: (1))), the policies, regulations, and laws of the
state of Washington shall be interpreted and administered in accordance
with the policies set forth in this chapter((, and (2))).
(2) The legislature authorizes and directs that, to the fullest
extent possible, all branches of government of this state, including
state agencies, municipal and public corporations, and counties shall:
(a) Utilize a systematic, interdisciplinary approach which will
insure the integrated use of the natural and social sciences and the
environmental design arts in planning and in decision making which may
have an impact on man's environment;
(b) Identify and develop methods and procedures, in consultation
with the department of ecology ((and the ecological commission)),
((which)) that will insure ((that)) presently unquantified
environmental amenities and values will be given appropriate
consideration in decision making along with economic and technical
considerations;
(c) Include in every recommendation or report on proposals for
legislation and other major actions significantly affecting the quality
of the environment((,)) a detailed statement, to be known as an
environmental impact statement, by the ((responsible official)) lead
agency on:
(i) The environmental impact of the proposed action;
(ii) Any adverse environmental effects ((which)) that cannot be
avoided should the proposal be implemented;
(iii) Alternatives to the proposed action;
(iv) The relationship between local short-term uses of man's
environment and the maintenance and enhancement of long-term
productivity; and
(v) Any irreversible and irretrievable commitments of resources
((which)) that would be involved in the proposed action should it be
implemented;
(d) ((Prior to making any detailed statement, the responsible
official shall consult with and obtain the comments of any public
agency which has jurisdiction by law or special expertise with respect
to any environmental impact involved. Copies of such statement and the
comments and views of the appropriate federal, province, state, and
local agencies, which are authorized to develop and enforce
environmental standards, shall be made available to the governor, the
department of ecology, the ecological commission, and the public, and
shall accompany the proposal through the existing agency review
processes)) Cooperate in designating a lead agency other than the
agency that is the primary sponsor or proponent of a project or
proposal, as required by section 3 of this act, from the other agencies
with jurisdiction by law or special expertise with respect to any
environmental impact involved;
(e) Study, develop, and describe appropriate alternatives to
recommended courses of action in any proposal ((which)) that involves
unresolved conflicts concerning alternative uses of available
resources;
(f) Recognize the world-wide and long-range character of
environmental problems and, where consistent with state policy, lend
appropriate support to initiatives, resolutions, and programs designed
to maximize international cooperation in anticipating and preventing a
decline in the quality of mankind's world environment;
(g) Make available to the federal government, other states,
provinces of Canada, municipalities, institutions, and individuals,
advice and information useful in restoring, maintaining, and enhancing
the quality of the environment; and
(h) Initiate and utilize ecological information in the planning and
development of natural resource-oriented projects.
(3) Before completing an environmental impact statement required by
subsection (2)(c) of this section, the responsible official shall
consult with and obtain the comments of any public agency that has
jurisdiction by law or special expertise with respect to any
environmental impact involved. Copies of the environmental impact
statement and the comments and views of the appropriate federal,
province, state, and local agencies that are authorized to develop and
enforce environmental standards shall be made available to the
governor, the department of ecology, and the public and shall accompany
the proposal through the existing agency review processes.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21C.110 and 1997 c 429 s 47 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty and function of the department of ecology:
(1) To adopt and amend thereafter rules of interpretation and
implementation of this chapter, subject to the requirements of chapter
34.05 RCW, for the purpose of providing uniform rules and guidelines to
all branches of government, including state agencies, political
subdivisions, public and municipal corporations, and counties. The
proposed rules shall be subject to full public hearings requirements
associated with rule promulgation. Suggestions for modifications of
the proposed rules shall be considered on their merits, and the
department shall have the authority and responsibility for full and
appropriate independent promulgation and adoption of rules, assuring
consistency with this chapter ((as amended)) and with the preservation
of protections afforded by this chapter. The rule-making powers
authorized in this section shall include, but shall not be limited to,
the following phases of interpretation and implementation of this
chapter:
(a) Categories of governmental actions ((which)) that are not to be
considered as potential major actions significantly affecting the
quality of the environment, including categories pertaining to
applications for water right permits pursuant to chapters 90.03 and
90.44 RCW. The types of actions included as categorical exemptions in
the rules shall be limited to those types ((which)) that are not major
actions significantly affecting the quality of the environment. The
rules shall provide for certain circumstances where actions ((which))
that potentially are categorically exempt require environmental review.
An action that is categorically exempt under the rules adopted by the
department may not be conditioned or denied under this chapter((.));
(b) Rules for criteria and procedures applicable to the
determination of when an act of a branch of government is a major
action significantly affecting the quality of the environment for which
a detailed statement is required to be prepared pursuant to RCW
43.21C.030((.));
(c) Rules and procedures applicable to the preparation of detailed
statements and other environmental documents, including but not limited
to rules for timing of environmental review, obtaining comments, data
and other information, and providing for and determining areas of
public participation which shall include the scope and review of draft
environmental impact statements((.));
(d) Scope of coverage and contents of detailed statements assuring
that such statements:
(i) Are simple, uniform, and as short as practicable;
((statements))
(ii) Are required to analyze only reasonable alternatives and
probable adverse environmental impacts ((which)) that are
significant((,)); and
(iii) May analyze beneficial impacts((.));
(e) Rules and procedures for public notification of actions taken
and documents prepared((.));
(f) Definition of terms relevant to the implementation of this
chapter, including the establishment of a list of elements of the
environment. The rules shall specify that analysis of environmental
considerations under RCW 43.21C.030(2) may be required only for those
subjects listed as elements of the environment (or portions thereof).
The list of elements of the environment shall consist of the "natural"
and "built" environment. The elements of the built environment shall
consist of public services and utilities (such as water, sewer,
schools, fire and police protection), transportation, environmental
health (such as explosive materials and toxic waste), and land and
shoreline use (including housing, and a description of the
relationships with land use and shoreline plans and designations,
including population)((.));
(g) Rules for determining the obligations and powers under this
chapter of two or more branches of government involved in the same
project significantly affecting the quality of the environment. These
rules shall include criteria and procedures for designating a lead
agency other than the agency that is the primary sponsor or proponent
of a project or proposal, as required by section 3 of this act, from
the other agencies with jurisdiction by law or special expertise with
respect to any environmental impact involved;
(h) Methods to assure adequate public awareness of the preparation
and issuance of ((detailed)) environmental impact statements required
by RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c)((.));
(i) ((To prepare)) Rules for projects setting forth the time limits
within which the governmental entity responsible for the action shall
comply with the provisions of this chapter((.));
(j) Rules for utilization of ((a detailed)) an environmental impact
statement for more than one action and rules improving environmental
analysis of nonproject proposals and encouraging better interagency
coordination and integration between this chapter and other
environmental laws((.));
(k) Rules relating to actions ((which)) that shall be exempt from
the provisions of this chapter in situations of emergency((.));
(l) Rules relating to the use of environmental documents in
planning and decision making and the implementation of the substantive
policies and requirements of this chapter, including procedures for
appeals under this chapter((.)); and
(m) Rules and procedures that provide for the integration of
environmental review with project review as provided in RCW 43.21C.240.
The rules and procedures shall be jointly developed with the department
of community, trade, and economic development and shall be applicable
to the preparation of environmental documents for actions in counties,
cities, and towns planning under RCW 36.70A.040. The rules and
procedures shall also include procedures and criteria to analyze
planned actions under RCW 43.21C.031(2) and revisions to the rules
adopted under this section to ensure that they are compatible with the
requirements and authorizations of chapter 347, Laws of 1995, as
amended by chapter 429, Laws of 1997. Ordinances or procedures adopted
by a county, city, or town to implement the provisions of chapter 347,
Laws of 1995 prior to the effective date of rules adopted under this
subsection (1)(m) shall continue to be effective until the adoption of
any new or revised ordinances or procedures that may be required. If
any revisions are required as a result of rules adopted under this
subsection (1)(m), those revisions shall be made within the time limits
specified in RCW 43.21C.120.
(2) In exercising its powers, functions, and duties under this
section, the department may:
(a) Consult with the state agencies and with representatives of
science, industry, agriculture, labor, conservation organizations,
state and local governments, and other groups, as it deems advisable;
and
(b) Utilize, to the fullest extent possible, the services,
facilities, and information (including statistical information) of
public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals, in order
to avoid duplication of effort and expense, overlap, or conflict with
similar activities authorized by law and performed by established
agencies.
(3) Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall be subject to the
review procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
An agency that is the primary sponsor or proponent of a project or
proposal subject to review under this chapter shall not serve as the
lead agency responsible for complying with the requirements of this
chapter. For such a public project or proposal, the lead agency shall
be determined by an agreement developed according to the rules adopted
according to RCW 43.21C.110(1)(g) among all agencies with jurisdiction
by law and agencies with special expertise with respect to any
environmental impact involved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Agency with jurisdiction by law" means an agency with
authority to approve, veto, or finance all or part of a project or
proposal; and
(2) "Agency with special expertise" means an agency with special
expertise on the environmental impacts involved in a proposal or
alternative significantly affecting the environment.

--- END ---