BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) An estimated one hundred twenty-eight million Americans suffer
from chronic, degenerative, and acute diseases, including diabetes,
Alzheimer's disease, cancer, Huntington's disease, Parkinson's disease,
heart disease, and spinal cord injury. The crippling economic and
psychological burdens of such diseases result in billions of dollars
every year in costs of treatment and lost productivity as well as
extreme human loss and emotional suffering.
(2) Stem cell research offers immense promise for developing new
medical therapies for these debilitating diseases and a critical means
to explore fundamental questions of biology. Stem cell research could
lead to unprecedented treatments and potential cures for diabetes,
Alzheimer's disease, cancer, Huntington's disease, Parkinson's disease,
heart disease, spinal cord injury, and other diseases.
(3) Washington state is home to several large medical research
institutions and an expanding biomedical research industry. These
organizations are committed to improving the lives of Americans
suffering from chronic, degenerative, and acute diseases. Encouraging
stem cell research is essential to realizing the promise of stem cell
research.
(4) Stem cell research, including the use of embryonic stem cells
for medical research, raises significant ethical concerns that must be
balanced with medical considerations.
(5) While therapeutic cloning stem cell research holds enormous
potential for treating or even curing some diseases, the reproductive
cloning of human beings is morally and ethically unacceptable.
Furthermore, the reproductive cloning of human beings poses grave
health risks to any child who may be produced in this manner. Any
attempt to clone a human being is in direct conflict with the policies
of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 It is the policy of Washington state that
research involving the derivation of human embryonic stem cells, by any
method, including somatic cell nuclear transplantation, and the use of
human embryonic stem cells derived after August 1, 2001, shall be
reviewed by an institutional review board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Nuclear transplantation" means transferring the nucleus of a
human somatic cell into an oocyte from which the nucleus has been or
will be removed or inactivated.
(3) "Human somatic cell" means a diploid cell obtained or derived
from a living or deceased human at any stage of development.
(4) "Institutional review board" means an institutional review
board registered with the United States department of health and human
services office of human research protections.
(5) "Oocyte" means the unfertilized human ovum.
(6) "Reproductive cloning of a human being" means asexual
reproduction by implanting or attempting to implant the product of
nuclear transplantation into a uterus or substitute for a uterus with
the purpose of producing a human being.
(7) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(8) "Therapeutic cloning" means the transplantation of a patient's
DNA into an unfertilized egg to replicate stem cells for curing
disease. The process involves no sperm and no transplantation into a
uterus or substitute for a uterus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department must develop guidelines
for research involving the derivation or use of human embryonic stem
cells in Washington by January 1, 2006.
(2) To develop the guidelines, the department may consider other
applicable guidelines developed or used in the United States and in
other countries, including the guidelines for research using human
pluripotent stem cells developed by the national institutes of health
published in August 2000, and corrected in November 2000.
(3) The department must confer with institutional review boards,
and may revise the guidelines, as necessary.
(4) The department must report annually to the legislature on human
embryonic stem cell research activity.
(5) The department may contract with a public or private
organization for assistance in developing the guidelines.
(6) The human stem cell research advisory committee is established
consisting of thirteen members appointed by the secretary, as follows:
(a) Seven scientists with experience in biomedical research in the
fields of cell differentiation, nuclear reprogramming, tissue formation
and regeneration, stem cell biology, developmental biology,
regenerative medicine, or related fields;
(b) Two medical ethicists;
(c) Two persons with backgrounds in legal issues related to human
embryonic stem cell research, in vitro fertilization, or family law, as
it applies to the donation of embryos and oocytes; and
(d) Two members of the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 All research projects involving the
derivation or use of human embryonic stem cells must be reviewed and
approved by an institutional review board before being undertaken. The
institutional review board must consider and apply the guidelines
developed by the department pursuant to section 4 of this act. The
institutional review board may require modifications to the plan or
design of a proposed human embryonic stem cell research project as a
condition of approving the research project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department must establish and
maintain an anonymous registry of embryos that are available for
research. The purpose of the registry is to provide researchers with
access to embryos that are available for research purposes.
(2) The department may contract with the University of Washington,
private organizations, or public entities to establish and administer
the registry.
(3) The department may adopt rules to implement the registry
including methods for reporting embryos available for research to the
registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A health care provider delivering
fertility treatment must provide his or her patient with timely,
relevant, and appropriate information to allow the patient to make an
informed and voluntary choice about the disposition of any human
embryos remaining following the fertility treatment.
(2) Any person to whom information is provided pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section must be presented with the option of
storing any unused embryos, donating unused embryos to another
individual, discarding unused embryos, or donating unused embryos for
research. When providing fertility treatment, the health care provider
must provide a form to the male and female partner, or the person
without a partner, as applicable, that sets forth advanced written
directives regarding the disposition of unused embryos. The form must
indicate the time limit on storage of the embryos at the clinic or
storage facility and provide, at a minimum, the following choices for
disposition of the embryos based on the following circumstances:
(a) Upon the death of a patient or their partner, the embryos must
be disposed of by one of the following actions:
(i) Making the embryos available to the living partner, if any;
(ii) Donating the embryos for research purposes;
(iii) Thawing the embryos without any further action;
(iv) Donating the embryos to another person; or
(v) Disposing of the embryos in any other clearly stated method.
(b) Upon separation or divorce of the partners, the embryos must be
disposed of by any of the following actions:
(i) Making the embryos available to the female partner;
(ii) Making the embryos available to the male partner;
(iii) Donating the embryos for research purposes;
(iv) Thawing the embryos without any further action;
(v) Donating the embryos to another person; or
(vi) Disposing of the embryos in any other clearly stated method.
(c) Upon the partners' decision, or the decision of a patient who
is without a partner, to abandon the embryos by request or a failure to
pay storage fees, the embryos must be disposed of by one of the
following actions:
(i) Donating the embryos for research purposes;
(ii) Thawing the embryos without any further action;
(iii) Donating the embryos to another person; or
(iv) Disposing of the embryos in any other clearly stated method.
(3) A health care provider delivering fertility treatment must
obtain written consent from any person who elects to donate embryos
remaining after fertility treatment for research. To obtain informed
consent, the health care provider must provide the following
information to the person:
(a) That the early human embryos will be used to derive human
pluripotent stem cells for research and that the cells may be used, at
some future time, for human transplantation research;
(b) That all identifiers associated with the embryos will be
removed before the derivation of human pluripotent stem cells;
(c) That donors will not receive any information about subsequent
testing on the embryos or the derived human pluripotent cells;
(d) That derived cells or cell lines, with all identifiers removed,
may be kept for many years;
(e) That the donor material may have commercial potential, and the
donor will not receive financial or any other benefits from any future
commercial development;
(f) That the human pluripotent stem cell research is not intended
to provide direct medical benefit to the donor; and
(g) That early human embryos that are donated will not be
transferred to a woman's uterus, will not survive the human pluripotent
stem cell derivation process, and will be handled respectfully, as is
appropriate for all human tissue used in research.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A person may donate human embryonic
tissue or human cadaveric fetal tissue for research purposes.
(2) A person may not knowingly, for valuable consideration,
purchase or sell human embryonic tissue or human cadaveric fetal tissue
for research purposes.
(3) "Valuable consideration" does not include reasonable payment
for the removal, processing, disposal, preservation, quality control,
storage, transportation, or implantation of human embryonic tissue or
human cadaveric tissue.
(4) A person who violates this section is guilty of a felony and
upon conviction is subject to a fine not to exceed fifty thousand
dollars or imprisonment not to exceed five years, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) No person may knowingly engage or assist
in reproductive cloning or attempting reproductive cloning of a human
being.
(2) The attorney general may bring an action to enjoin any person
from violating subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section is
subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars
for each violation. Civil penalties authorized by this subsection may
be imposed in any civil action brought by the attorney general.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict areas of
biomedical, agricultural, and scientific research not specifically
prohibited by this section, including somatic cell nuclear transfer or
other cloning technologies to clone molecules, DNA, cells, and tissues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 No person may use human eggs or human sperm
that have been donated for purposes of assisted reproduction, as these
terms are defined in chapter 26.26 RCW, to create human embryonic stem
cells for use in research, without the written consent of the donor to
use the eggs or sperm for research purposes after receiving the
information specified in section 7(3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 4 and 5 of this act expire January
1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---