BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.50.010 and 2001 c 214 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the present and predicted growth in
energy demands in the state of Washington requires the development of
a procedure for the selection and utilization of sites for energy
facilities and the identification of a state position with respect to
each proposed site. The legislature recognizes that the selection of
sites will have a significant impact upon the welfare of the
population, the location and growth of industry and the use of the
natural resources of the state.
The legislature further finds that as federally licensed
hydroelectric projects seek to be relicensed, the demand for affordable
and reliable electricity requires that a process be developed for
identification of a state position on mitigation recommendations
submitted under the federal licensing process.
It is the policy of the state of Washington to recognize the
pressing need for increased energy facilities, and to ensure through
available and reasonable methods, that the location and operation of
such facilities will produce minimal adverse effects on the
environment, ecology of the land and its wildlife, and the ecology of
state waters and their aquatic life.
It is the intent to seek courses of action that will balance the
increasing demands for energy facility location and operation in
conjunction with the broad interests of the public. Such action will
be based on these premises:
(1) To assure Washington state citizens that, where applicable,
operational safeguards are at least as stringent as the criteria
established by the federal government and are technically sufficient
for their welfare and protection.
(2) To preserve and protect the quality of the environment; to
enhance the public's opportunity to enjoy the esthetic and recreational
benefits of the air, water and land resources; to promote air
cleanliness; and to pursue beneficial changes in the environment.
(3) To provide abundant energy at reasonable cost.
(4) To avoid costs of complete site restoration and demolition of
improvements and infrastructure at unfinished nuclear energy sites, and
to use unfinished nuclear energy facilities for public uses, including
economic development, under the regulatory and management control of
local governments and port districts.
(5) To avoid costly duplication in the siting process and in the
determination of mitigation recommendations by state and local
governments for the licensing of nonfederal hydroelectric projects
under the federal energy regulatory commission and to ensure that
decisions are made timely and without unnecessary delay.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.50.020 and 2001 c 214 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means any person who makes application for a site
certification pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or who makes
application for a federal hydropower license through the federal energy
regulatory commission using the alternative licensing process.
(2) "Application" means any request for approval of a particular
site or sites filed in accordance with the procedures established
pursuant to this chapter or any request to determine mitigation
recommendations for major existing nonfederal dams under the federal
energy regulatory commission using the alternative licensing process,
unless the context otherwise requires.
(3) "Person" means an individual, partnership, joint venture,
private or public corporation, association, firm, public service
company, political subdivision, municipal corporation, government
agency, public utility district, or any other entity, public or
private, however organized.
(4) "Site" means any proposed or approved location of an energy
facility.
(5) "Certification" means a binding agreement between an applicant
and the state which shall embody compliance to the siting guidelines,
in effect as of the date of certification, which have been adopted
pursuant to RCW 80.50.040 as now or hereafter amended as conditions to
be met prior to or concurrent with the construction or operation of any
energy facility.
(6) "Associated facilities" means storage, transmission, handling,
or other related and supporting facilities connecting an energy plant
with the existing energy supply, processing, or distribution system,
including, but not limited to, communications, controls, mobilizing or
maintenance equipment, instrumentation, and other types of ancillary
transmission equipment, off-line storage or venting required for
efficient operation or safety of the transmission system and overhead,
and surface or subsurface lines of physical access for the inspection,
maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission facility and new
transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal voltages in excess
of 200,000 volts to connect a thermal power plant to the northwest
power grid: PROVIDED, That common carrier railroads or motor vehicles
shall not be included.
(7) "Transmission facility" means any of the following together
with their associated facilities:
(a) Crude or refined petroleum or liquid petroleum product
transmission pipeline of the following dimensions: A pipeline larger
than six inches minimum inside diameter between valves for the
transmission of these products with a total length of at least fifteen
miles;
(b) Natural gas, synthetic fuel gas, or liquified petroleum gas
transmission pipeline of the following dimensions: A pipeline larger
than fourteen inches minimum inside diameter between valves, for the
transmission of these products, with a total length of at least fifteen
miles for the purpose of delivering gas to a distribution facility,
except an interstate natural gas pipeline regulated by the United
States federal power commission.
(8) "Independent consultants" means those persons who have no
financial interest in the applicant's proposals and who are retained by
the council to evaluate the applicant's proposals, supporting studies,
or to conduct additional studies.
(9) "Thermal power plant" means, for the purpose of certification,
any electrical generating facility using any fuel, including nuclear
materials, for distribution of electricity by electric utilities.
(10) "Energy facility" means an energy plant ((or)), transmission
facilities, or a major existing nonfederal dam: PROVIDED, That the
following are excluded from the provisions of this chapter:
(a) Facilities for the extraction, conversion, transmission or
storage of water, other than water specifically consumed or discharged
by energy production or conversion for energy purposes; and
(b) Facilities operated by and for the armed services for military
purposes or by other federal authority for the national defense.
(11) "Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council
created by RCW 80.50.030.
(12) "Counsel for the environment" means an assistant attorney
general or a special assistant attorney general who shall represent the
public in accordance with RCW 80.50.080.
(13) "Construction" means on-site improvements, excluding
exploratory work, which cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars.
(14) "Energy plant" means the following facilities together with
their associated facilities:
(a) Any stationary thermal power plant with generating capacity of
three hundred fifty thousand kilowatts or more, measured using maximum
continuous electric generating capacity, less minimum auxiliary load,
at average ambient temperature and pressure, and floating thermal power
plants of one hundred thousand kilowatts or more, including associated
facilities. For the purposes of this subsection, "floating thermal
power plants" means a thermal power plant that is suspended on the
surface of water by means of a barge, vessel, or other floating
platform;
(b) Facilities which will have the capacity to receive liquified
natural gas in the equivalent of more than one hundred million standard
cubic feet of natural gas per day, which has been transported over
marine waters;
(c) Facilities which will have the capacity to receive more than an
average of fifty thousand barrels per day of crude or refined petroleum
or liquified petroleum gas which has been or will be transported over
marine waters, except that the provisions of this chapter shall not
apply to storage facilities unless occasioned by such new facility
construction;
(d) Any underground reservoir for receipt and storage of natural
gas as defined in RCW 80.40.010 capable of delivering an average of
more than one hundred million standard cubic feet of natural gas per
day; and
(e) Facilities capable of processing more than twenty-five thousand
barrels per day of petroleum into refined products.
(15) "Land use plan" means a comprehensive plan or land use element
thereof adopted by a unit of local government pursuant to chapters
35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW.
(16) "Zoning ordinance" means an ordinance of a unit of local
government regulating the use of land and adopted pursuant to chapters
35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW or Article XI of the state Constitution.
(17) "Alternative energy resource" means: (a) Wind; (b) solar
energy; (c) geothermal energy; (d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal
action; or (f) biomass energy based on solid organic fuels from wood,
forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not
include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives
such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.
(18) "Major existing nonfederal dam" means a licensed or unlicensed
hydroelectric project that has a total installed generating capacity of
more than one and one-half megawatts.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.50.030 and 2001 c 214 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created and established the energy facility site
evaluation council.
(2)(a) The chair of the council shall be appointed by the governor
with the advice and consent of the senate, shall have a vote on matters
before the council, shall serve for a term coextensive with the term of
the governor, and is removable for cause. The chair may designate a
member of the council to serve as acting chair in the event of the
chair's absence. The salary of the chair shall be determined under RCW
43.03.040. The chair is a "state employee" for the purposes of chapter
42.52 RCW. As applicable, when attending meetings of the council,
members may receive reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and are eligible for compensation
under RCW 43.03.250.
(b) The chair or a designee shall execute all official documents,
contracts, and other materials on behalf of the council. The
Washington state department of community, trade, and economic
development shall provide all administrative and staff support for the
council. The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development has supervisory authority over the staff of the
council and shall employ such personnel as are necessary to implement
this chapter. Not more than three such employees may be exempt from
chapter 41.06 RCW.
(3)(a) The council shall consist of the directors, administrators,
or their designees, of the following departments, agencies,
commissions, and committees or their statutory successors:
(i) Department of ecology;
(ii) Department of fish and wildlife;
(iii) Department of community, trade, and economic development;
(iv) Utilities and transportation commission; and
(v) Department of natural resources.
(b) The directors, administrators, or their designees, of the
following departments, agencies, and commissions, or their statutory
successors, may participate as councilmembers at their own discretion
provided they elect to participate no later than sixty days after an
application is filed:
(i) Department of agriculture;
(ii) Department of health;
(iii) Military department; and
(iv) Department of transportation.
(c) In addition to those departments, agencies, and commissions
designated in (a) of this subsection, the parks and recreation
commission shall participate as a council member for purposes of
determining mitigation recommendations for the licensing of a major
existing nonfederal dam under the federal energy regulatory commission.
(d) Council membership is discretionary for agencies that choose to
participate under (b) of this subsection only for applications that are
filed with the council on or after May 8, 2001. For applications filed
before May 8, 2001, council membership is mandatory for those agencies
listed in (b) of this subsection.
(4) The appropriate county legislative authority of every county
wherein an application for a proposed site is filed, or where
mitigation recommendations may be submitted as conditions for granting
a federal hydropower license, shall appoint a member or designee as a
voting member to the council. The member or designee so appointed
shall sit with the council only at such times as the council considers
the proposed site, or proposed mitigation recommendations for a federal
hydropower license, for the county which he or she represents, and such
member or designee shall serve until there has been a final acceptance
or rejection of the proposed site or proposed mitigation
recommendations for a federal hydropower license.
(5) The city legislative authority of every city within whose
corporate limits an energy plant is proposed to be located, or where a
major existing nonfederal dam is located, shall appoint a member or
designee as a voting member to the council. The member or designee so
appointed shall sit with the council only at such times as the council
considers the proposed site, or proposed mitigation recommendations for
a federal hydropower license, for the city which he or she represents,
and such member or designee shall serve until there has been a final
acceptance or rejection of the proposed site or proposed mitigation
recommendations for a federal hydropower license.
(6) For any port district wherein an application for a proposed
port facility is filed subject to this chapter, the port district shall
appoint a member or designee as a nonvoting member to the council. The
member or designee so appointed shall sit with the council only at such
times as the council considers the proposed site for the port district
which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall serve
until there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed
site. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the port
district is the applicant, either singly or in partnership or
association with any other person.

Sec. 4 RCW 80.50.040 and 2001 c 214 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The council shall have the following powers:
(1) To adopt, promulgate, amend, or rescind suitable rules and
regulations, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, to carry out the provisions
of this chapter, and the policies and practices of the council in
connection therewith;
(2) To develop and apply environmental and ecological guidelines in
relation to the type, design, location, construction, and operational
conditions of certification of energy facilities subject to this
chapter;
(3) To establish rules of practice for the conduct of public
hearings pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure
Act, as found in chapter 34.05 RCW;
(4) To prescribe the form, content, and necessary supporting
documentation for site certification or for mitigation recommendations
made for a major existing nonfederal dam under a federal alternative
licensing process;
(5) To receive applications for energy facility locations and to
investigate the sufficiency thereof;
(6) To make and contract, when applicable, for independent studies
of sites proposed by the applicant or of mitigation recommendations
made for a major existing nonfederal dam under a federal alternative
licensing process;
(7) To conduct hearings on the proposed location of the energy
facilities or on proposed mitigation recommendations for a major
existing nonfederal dam under a federal alternative licensing process;
(8) To prepare written reports to the governor which shall include:
(a) A statement indicating whether the application is in compliance
with the council's guidelines, (b) criteria specific to the site and
transmission line routing, (c) a council recommendation as to the
disposition of the application, and (d) a draft certification agreement
when the council recommends approval of the application;
(9) To prescribe the means for monitoring of the effects arising
from the construction and the operation of energy facilities to assure
continued compliance with terms of certification and/or permits issued
by the council pursuant to chapter 90.48 RCW or subsection (12) of this
section: PROVIDED, That any on-site inspection required by the council
shall be performed by other state agencies pursuant to interagency
agreement: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the council may retain authority for
determining compliance relative to monitoring;
(10) To integrate its site evaluation activity, or its
consideration of mitigation recommendations for a major existing
nonfederal dam under a federal alternative licensing process, with
activities of federal agencies having jurisdiction in such matters to
avoid unnecessary duplication;
(11) To present state concerns and interests to other states,
regional organizations, and the federal government on the location,
construction, and operation of any energy facility which may affect the
environment, health, or safety of the citizens of the state of
Washington;
(12) To issue permits in compliance with applicable provisions of
the federally approved state implementation plan adopted in accordance
with the Federal Clean Air Act, as now existing or hereafter amended,
for the new construction, reconstruction, or enlargement or operation
of energy facilities: PROVIDED, That such permits shall become
effective only if the governor approves an application for
certification and executes a certification agreement pursuant to this
chapter: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That all such permits be conditioned
upon compliance with all provisions of the federally approved state
implementation plan which apply to energy facilities covered within the
provisions of this chapter; and
(13) To serve as an interagency coordinating body for energy-related issues.

Sec. 5 RCW 80.50.060 and 2001 c 214 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall apply to the construction
of energy facilities which includes the new construction of energy
facilities and the reconstruction or enlargement of existing energy
facilities where the net increase in physical capacity or dimensions
resulting from such reconstruction or enlargement meets or exceeds
those capacities or dimensions set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (7) and (14).
No construction of such energy facilities may be undertaken, except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, after July 15, 1977, without first
obtaining certification in the manner provided in this chapter.
(2) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction,
reconstruction, or enlargement of a new or existing energy facility
that exclusively uses alternative energy resources and chooses to
receive certification under this chapter, regardless of the generating
capacity of the project.
(3) The provisions of this chapter apply to the determination of
mitigation recommendations by state agencies and local governments as
a condition to the granting of a federal hydropower license where the
applicant for the hydropower license is proceeding under the
alternative licensing process and chooses to have the mitigation
recommendations determined under this chapter.
(4) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to normal
maintenance and repairs which do not increase the capacity or
dimensions beyond those set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (7) and (14).
(((4))) (5) Applications for certification of energy facilities
made prior to July 15, 1977 shall continue to be governed by the
applicable provisions of law in effect on the day immediately preceding
July 15, 1977 with the exceptions of RCW 80.50.190 and 80.50.071 which
shall apply to such prior applications and to site certifications
prospectively from July 15, 1977.
(((5))) (6) Applications for certification shall be upon forms
prescribed by the council and shall be supported by such information
and technical studies as the council may require.

Sec. 6 RCW 80.50.071 and 1977 ex.s. c 371 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The council shall receive all applications for energy facility
site certification and applications to determine mitigation
recommendations for a major existing nonfederal dam under a federal
alternative licensing process. The following fees or charges for
application processing or certification monitoring shall be paid by the
applicant or certificate holder:
(a) A fee of twenty-five thousand dollars for each proposed site,
to be applied toward the cost of the independent consultant study
authorized in this subsection, shall accompany the application and
shall be a condition precedent to any further consideration or action
on the application by the council. The council shall commission its
own independent consultant study to measure the consequences of the
proposed energy facility on the environment for each site application.
The council shall direct the consultant to study any matter which it
deems essential to an adequate appraisal of the site. The full cost of
the study shall be paid by the applicant: PROVIDED, That said costs
exceeding a total of the twenty-five thousand dollars paid pursuant to
subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be payable subject to the
applicant giving prior approval to such excess amount.
(b) Each applicant shall, in addition to the costs of the
independent consultant provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section,
pay such reasonable costs as are actually and necessarily incurred by
the council in processing the application. Such costs shall include,
but are not limited to, costs of a hearing examiner, a court reporter,
additional staff salaries, wages and employee benefits, goods and
services, travel expenses within the state and miscellaneous expenses,
as arise directly from processing such application.
Each applicant shall, at the time of application submission,
deposit twenty thousand dollars, or such lesser amount as may be
specified by council rule, to cover costs provided for by subsection
(1)(b) of this section. Reasonable and necessary costs of the council
directly attributable to application processing shall be charged
against such deposit.
The council shall submit to each applicant a statement of such
expenditures actually made during the preceding calendar quarter which
shall be in sufficient detail to explain such expenditures. The
applicant shall pay the state treasurer the amount of such statement to
restore the total amount on deposit to the originally established
level: PROVIDED, That such applicant may, at the request of the
council, increase the amount of funds on deposit to cover anticipated
expenses during peak periods of application processing. Any funds
remaining unexpended at the conclusion of application processing shall
be refunded to the applicant, or at the applicant's option, credited
against required deposits of certificate holders.
(c) Each certificate holder shall pay such reasonable costs as are
actually and necessarily incurred by the council for inspection and
determination of compliance by the certificate holder with the terms of
the certification relative to monitoring the effects of construction
and operation of the facility.
Each certificate holder, within thirty days of execution of the
site certification agreement, shall deposit twenty thousand dollars, or
such other amount as may be specified by council rule, to cover costs
provided for by subsection (1)(c) of this section. Reasonable and
necessary costs of the council directly attributable to inspection and
determination of compliance by the certificate holder with the terms of
the certification relative to monitoring the effects of construction
and operation of the facility shall be charged against such deposit.
The council shall submit to each certificate holder a statement of
such expenditures actually made during the preceding calendar quarter
which shall be in sufficient detail to explain such expenditures. The
certificate holder shall pay the state treasurer the amount of such
statement to restore the total amount on deposit to the originally
established level: PROVIDED, That if the actual, reasonable, and
necessary expenditures for inspection and determination of compliance
in the preceding calendar quarter have exceeded the amount of funds on
deposit, such excess costs shall be paid by the certificate holder.
(2) If an applicant or certificate holder fails to provide the
initial deposit, or if subsequently required payments are not received
within thirty days following receipt of the statement from the council,
the council may (a) in the case of the applicant, suspend processing of
the application until payment is received; or (b) in the case of a
certificate holder, suspend the certification.
(3) All payments required of the applicant or certificate holder
under this section are to be made to the state treasurer who shall make
payments as instructed by the council from the funds submitted. All
such funds shall be subject to state auditing procedures. Any
unexpended portions thereof shall be returned to the applicant or
certificate holder.

Sec. 7 RCW 80.50.080 and 1977 ex.s. c 371 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
After the council has received a site application or an application
to determine mitigation recommendations for a major existing nonfederal
dam under a federal alternative licensing process, the attorney general
shall appoint an assistant attorney general as a counsel for the
environment. The counsel for the environment shall represent the
public and its interest in protecting the quality of the environment.
Costs incurred by the counsel for the environment in the performance of
these duties shall be charged to the office of the attorney general,
and shall not be a charge against the appropriation to the energy
facility site evaluation council. He shall be accorded all the rights,
privileges and responsibilities of an attorney representing a party in
a formal action. This section shall not be construed to prevent any
person from being heard or represented by counsel in accordance with
the other provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 80.50.085 and 2001 c 214 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After the council has received a site application or an
application to determine mitigation recommendations for a major
existing nonfederal dam under a federal alternative licensing process,
council staff shall assist applicants in identifying issues presented
by the application.
(2) Council staff shall review all information submitted and
recommend resolutions to issues in dispute that would allow site
approval or determination of mitigation recommendations.
(3) Council staff may make recommendations to the council on
conditions that would allow site approval or determination of
mitigation recommendations.

Sec. 9 RCW 80.50.090 and 2001 c 214 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The council shall conduct an informational public hearing in
the county of the proposed site or in the county of the location of a
major existing nonfederal dam as soon as practicable but not later than
sixty days after receipt of an application for site certification or
determination of mitigation recommendations for a major existing
nonfederal dam under a federal alternative licensing process:
PROVIDED, That the place of such public hearing shall be as close as
practical to the proposed site.
(2) Subsequent to the informational public hearing, the council
shall conduct a public hearing to determine whether or not the proposed
site is consistent and in compliance with county or regional land use
plans or zoning ordinances. If it is determined that the proposed site
does conform with existing land use plans or zoning ordinances in
effect as of the date of the application, the county or regional
planning authority shall not thereafter change such land use plans or
zoning ordinances so as to affect the proposed site.
(3) Prior to the issuance of a council recommendation to the
governor under RCW 80.50.100 a public hearing, conducted as an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative
Procedure Act, shall be held. At such public hearing any person shall
be entitled to be heard in support of or in opposition to the
application for certification or an application to determine mitigation
recommendations for a major existing nonfederal dam under a federal
alternative licensing process.
(4) Additional public hearings shall be held as deemed appropriate
by the council in the exercise of its functions under this chapter.

Sec. 10 RCW 80.50.100 and 1989 c 175 s 174 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The council shall report to the governor its recommendations as
to the approval or rejection of an application for certification, or an
application to determine mitigation recommendations for a major
existing nonfederal dam under a federal alternative licensing process,
within twelve months of receipt by the council of such an application,
or such later time as is mutually agreed by the council and the
applicant. If the council recommends approval of an application for
certification, it shall also submit a draft certification agreement
with the report. The council shall include conditions in the draft
certification agreement to implement the provisions of this chapter,
including, but not limited to, conditions to protect state or local
governmental or community interests affected by the construction or
operation of the energy facility, and conditions designed to recognize
the purpose of laws or ordinances, or rules or regulations promulgated
thereunder, that are preempted or superseded pursuant to RCW 80.50.110
as now or hereafter amended.
(2) Within sixty days of receipt of the council's report the
governor shall take one of the following actions:
(a) Approve the application and execute the draft certification
agreement or approve the proposed mitigation recommendations; ((or))
(b) Reject the application; or
(c) Direct the council to reconsider certain aspects of the draft
certification agreement or the proposed mitigation recommendations.
The council shall reconsider such aspects of the draft
certification agreement or the proposed mitigation recommendations by
reviewing the existing record of the application or, as necessary, by
reopening the adjudicative proceeding for the purposes of receiving
additional evidence. Such reconsideration shall be conducted
expeditiously. The council shall resubmit the draft certification or
the proposed mitigation recommendations to the governor incorporating
any amendments deemed necessary upon reconsideration. Within sixty
days of receipt of such draft certification agreement or proposed
mitigation recommendations, the governor shall either approve the
application and execute the certification agreement or reject the
application. The certification agreement shall be binding upon
execution by the governor and the applicant.
(3) The rejection of an application for certification by the
governor shall be final as to that application but shall not preclude
submission of a subsequent application for the same site on the basis
of changed conditions or new information.

Sec. 11 RCW 80.50.110 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 108 s 37 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) If any provision of this chapter is in conflict with any other
provision, limitation, or restriction which is now in effect under any
other law of this state, or any rule or regulation promulgated
thereunder, this chapter shall govern and control and such other law or
rule or regulation promulgated thereunder shall be deemed superseded
for the purposes of this chapter.
(2) The state hereby preempts the regulation and certification of
the location, construction, and operational conditions of certification
of the energy facilities included under RCW 80.50.060 as now or
hereafter amended.
(3) For applications where the applicant chooses to determine
mitigation recommendations under this chapter, only those state and
local government mitigation recommendations determined under this
chapter may be submitted as part of the federal hydropower licensing
process.

--- END ---