BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds it is in the public
interest to adopt this chapter to simplify the process of
interconnecting distributed generation facilities that will be used for
net metered customers. This chapter is intended to both identify a
class of distributed generators that, because of their selected point
of common coupling, can be interconnected with ease and expedition as
well as the standards to be used for ordinary interconnections by all
utilities subject to commission regulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means a person who has filed an application to
interconnect a customer-generator facility to an electric delivery
system.
(2) "Annualized period" means a period of twelve consecutive
monthly billing periods. A customer-generator's first annualized
period begins on the first day of the first full monthly billing period
after which the customer-generator's facility is interconnected and is
generating electricity.
(3) "Area network" means a type of electric delivery system served
by multiple transformers interconnected in an electrical network
circuit generally used in large metropolitan areas that are densely
populated to provide high reliability of service and having the same
definition as the term "secondary grid network" as defined in the
institute of electrical and electronic engineers standards.
(4) "Class I energy" means electrical energy generation. It may
include all types of generation or be limited to certain types of
renewable and/or combined heat and power systems.
(5) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(6) "Customer-generator" means a residential or commercial customer
that generates electricity, typically on the customer's side of the
meter.
(7) "Customer-generator facility" means the equipment used by a
customer-generator to generate, manage, and monitor electricity. A
customer-generator facility typically includes an electric generator
and/or an equipment package.
(8) "Electric delivery system" means the infrastructure constructed
and maintained by an electric distribution company to deliver electric
service to end-users.
(9) "Electric generation service" means the provision of retail
electric energy that is generated off-site from the location at which
the consumption of the electric energy and capacity is metered for
retail billing purposes, including agreements and arrangements for the
provision of electric generation service.
(10) "Electric power supplier" means a person or entity that is
licensed by the commission to offer and to assume the contractual and
legal responsibility to provide electric generation service to retail
customers. This includes load serving entities, marketers, and brokers
that offer or provide electric generation service to retail customers.
This term does not include electric distribution companies.
(11) "Equipment package" means a group of components connecting an
electric generator with an electric delivery system, and includes all
interface equipment including switchgear, inverters, or other interface
devices. An equipment package may include an integrated generator or
electric source.
(12) "Fault current" means electrical current that flows through a
circuit and is produced by an electrical fault, such as to ground,
double-phase to ground, three-phase to ground, phase-to-phase, and
three-phase. A fault current is several times larger in magnitude than
the current that normally flows through a circuit.
(13) "Good utility practice" means a practice, method, policy, or
action engaged in and/or accepted by a significant portion of the
electric industry in a region that accomplishes the desired result
reliably, safely, and expeditiously consistent with this chapter.
(14) "Interconnection agreement" means an agreement between a
customer-generator and an electric distribution company, that governs
the connection of the customer-generator facility to the electric
delivery system, as well as the ongoing operation of the customer-generator facility after it is connected to the system.
(15) "Net metering" means that the customer-generator is billed
according to the difference between the amount of electricity supplied
by the electric power supplier or basic generation service provider in
a given billing period and the electricity delivered from the
customers' side of the meter using class I energy systems, with
customer generation in excess of electricity supplied credited over an
annualized period.
(16) "Minor system modifications" include activities such as
changing the fuse in a fuse holder cut-out, changing the settings on a
circuit recloser, and other activities that usually entail less than
four hours of work and one thousand dollars in materials.
(17) "Point of common coupling" means the point in the
interconnection of a customer-generator facility with an electric
delivery system at which the harmonic limits are applied.
(18) "Spot network" means a type of electric delivery system that
uses two or more intertied transformers to supply an electrical network
circuit. A spot network is generally used to supply power to a single
customer or a small group of customers.
(19) "Supplier/provider" means an electric power supplier of
competitive electricity supply in a retail competition market.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All electric distribution companies and
electric power suppliers shall offer net metering at nondiscriminatory
rates to their customers that generate electricity, on the customer's
side of the meter, using class I energy.
(2) A customer-generator may not net meter if the capacity of the
customer-generator's generating facility exceeds two megawatts.
(3) The commission shall develop a standard tariff providing for
net metering. Each supplier and electric distribution company shall
make the tariff available to eligible customer-generators on a first-come, first-served basis.
(4) When the amount of electricity delivered by the customer-generator plus any kilowatt hour credits held over from previous
billing periods exceed the electricity supplied by the supplier or
electric distribution company, the supplier or electric distribution
company shall credit the customer-generator for the excess kilowatt
hours until the end of the annualized period at which point the
customer-generator will be compensated for any remaining credits at the
supplier's avoided cost of wholesale power. When a customer-generator
switches electric suppliers, the supplier with whom service is
terminating shall treat the end of the service period as if it were the
end of the annualized period.
(5) Each supplier shall submit an annual net metering report to the
commission. The report shall include:
(a) The total number of systems and the total estimated rated
generating capacity of its net metering customer-generators; and
(b) The total estimated net kilowatt hours received from customer-generators.
(6) A customer-generator owns any renewable attributes of the
electricity it generates, and may sell any renewable energy
certificates created as a result of that generation, individually or
through an aggregator, or through a certificate trading program
authorized by the commission. A customer-generator that wishes to
estimate the generation resulting from a facility for purposes of this
subsection shall do so using commission-approved estimation procedures
for facilities smaller than ten kilowatts.
(7) The metering used to effectuate net metering shall be capable
of measuring the flow of electricity in both directions, typically
through the use of a single bidirectional meter. A customer may use
their existing electric revenue meter if it is capable of measuring the
bidirectional flow of electricity and is within plus or minus five
percent tolerance when measuring electricity flowing from the customer
to the supplier or electric distribution company.
(8) If the existing customer's electricity revenue meter is not
capable of measuring the bidirectional flow of electricity within the
tolerances specified in subsection (7) of this section, an electric
distribution company shall install a new meter for the customer-generator, at the company's expense.
(9) The electric distribution company may not require more than one
meter per customer-generator. However, an additional meter may be
installed under either of the following circumstances:
(a) The electric distribution company may install an additional
meter at its own expense if the customer-generator consents; or
(b) The customer-generator may request that the company install an
additional meter at the customer-generator's expense. The cost for the
meter is limited to the actual cost of the meter and its installation.
(10) A supplier or electric distribution company may not charge a
net metered customer any fee or charges or require additional
equipment, insurance or any other requirement unless the same would be
required of the customer if the customer were not a net metered
customer. However, a supplier or electric distribution company may use
a special load profile for the customer that incorporates the
customer's real time generation provided the special load profile is
approved by the commission.
(11) Future revisions to the requirements of this section may be
made by commission rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) There are three interconnection review
paths for interconnection of customer-sited generation.
(a) Simplified. This is for qualified inverter-based facilities
with a power rating of ten kilowatts or less on radial or spot network
systems under certain conditions.
(b) Expedited. This is for certified generating facilities that
pass certain prespecified screens and have a power rating of two
megawatts or less.
(c) Standard. This is for all generating facilities not qualifying
for either the simplified or expedited interconnection review processes
that have a power rating of twenty megawatts or less.
(2) To qualify for simplified or expedited interconnection
procedures, generators no larger than two megawatts must be certified
under subsection (3) of this section to comply with the following codes
and standards as applicable:
(a) The institute of electrical and electronic engineers' 1547
standard for interconnecting distributed resources with electric power
systems or 929 standard for inverters less than ten kilowatts in size;
and
(b) UL 1741 inverters, converters, and controllers for use in
independent power systems.
(3) An equipment package is certified for interconnected operation
if it has been submitted by a manufacturer, tested and listed by a
nationally recognized testing and certification laboratory for
continuous interactive operation with a utility grid in compliance with
the applicable codes and standards listed in subsection (2) of this
section. An "equipment package" includes all interface components
including switchgear, inverters, or other interface devices and may
include an integrated generator or electric source. If the equipment
package has been tested and listed as an integrated package, which
includes a generator or other electric source, it shall not require
further design review, testing, or additional equipment to meet the
certification requirements of this interconnection procedure. If the
equipment package includes only the interface components such as
switchgear, inverters, or other interface devices, then an
interconnection applicant must show that the generator or other
electric source being used with the equipment package is compatible
with the equipment package and consistent with the testing and listing
specified for the package. If the generator or electric source
combined with the equipment package is consistent with the testing and
listing performed by the nationally recognized testing and
certification laboratory, no further design review, testing, or
additional equipment is required to meet the certification requirements
of this interconnection procedure. A certified equipment package does
not include equipment provided by the utility.
(4) A proposed interconnection that meets the following applicable
screening criteria shall be processed by the electric distribution
company under expedited procedures for interconnection and, if
qualified, for net metering.
(a) For interconnection of a proposed generator to a radial
distribution circuit, the aggregated generation, including the proposed
generator, on the circuit will not exceed ten percent or fifteen
percent for solar based generation, of the total circuit annual peak
load as most recently measured at the substation.
(b) The proposed generator, in aggregation with other generation on
the distribution circuit, will not contribute more than ten percent to
the distribution circuit's maximum fault current at the point on the
high voltage primary level nearest the proposed point of common
coupling.
(c) The proposed generator, in aggregate with other generation on
the distribution circuit, will not cause any distribution protective
devices and equipment including but not limited to substation breakers,
fuse cutouts, and line reclosers, or customer equipment on the system,
to exceed ninety percent of the short circuit interrupting capability;
nor is the interconnection proposed for a circuit that already exceeds
ninety percent of the short circuit interrupting capability.
(d) The proposed generator, in aggregate with other generation
interconnected to the distribution low voltage side of the substation
transformer feeding the distribution circuit where the generator
proposes to interconnect, will not exceed ten megawatts in an area
where there are known or posted transient stability limitations to
generating units located in the general electrical vicinity.
(e) The proposed generator is interconnected to the electric power
supplier as follows:
(i) If the primary distribution line configuration is three-phase,
three wire, interconnection must be phase-to-phase; and
(ii) If the primary distribution line configuration is three-phase,
four wire, interconnection must be line-to-neutral.
(f) If the proposed generator is to be interconnected on single-phase shared secondary, the aggregate generation capacity on the shared
secondary, including the proposed generator, may not exceed twenty
kilovolt amps.
(g) If the proposed generator is single-phase and is to be
interconnected on a transformer center tap neutral of a two hundred
forty volt service, its addition will not create an imbalance between
the two sides of the two hundred forty volt service of more than twenty
percent of nameplate rating of the service transformer.
(h) The proposed generator's point of common coupling may not be on
a transmission line.
(5) The screening criteria under this subsection is in addition to
the applicable screens in subsection (4) of this section.
(a) For interconnection of a proposed generator to a spot network
circuit where the generator or aggregate of total generation exceeds
five percent of the spot network's maximum load, the generator must use
a protective scheme that ensures that its current flow will not affect
the network protective devices including reverse power relays or a
comparable function.
(b) For interconnection of a proposed generator that uses inverter
based protective functions to an area network, the generator, in
aggregate with other exporting generators interconnected on the load
side of network protective devices, will not exceed the lesser of ten
percent of the minimum annual load on the network or five hundred
kilowatts. For a solar photovoltaic customer-generator facility, the
ten percent minimum shall be determined as a function of the minimum
load occurring during an off-peak daylight period.
(c) For interconnection of generators to area networks that do not
use inverter based protective functions or inverter based generators
that do not meet the requirements of (b) of this subsection, the
generator must use reverse power relays or other protection devices
that ensure no export of power from the customer's site including any
inadvertent export, under fault conditions, that could adversely affect
protective devices on the network circuit.
(6) Each electric distribution company shall have a simplified
interconnection procedure for inverter based generators not exceeding
ten kilowatts in capacity, which shall require the following steps:
(a) The customer submits an application filled out properly and
completely indicating which certified generator or equipment package
the customer intends to use;
(b) The electric distribution company acknowledges to the customer
receipt of the application within three business days of receipt;
(c) The electric distribution company evaluates the application for
completeness and notifies the customer within ten days of receipt that
the application is or is not complete and whether the generating
facility equipment passes screens in subsection (4)(a), (f), (g), and
(h) of this section. If incomplete, the application is rejected and
returned to the customer with a list of items needed to make it
complete;
(d) Within three days of the customer notification under (c) of
this subsection, the electric distribution company will execute and
send a simplified interconnection agreement to the customer unless an
agreement is not required by the electric distribution company;
(e) Upon receipt of a signed application/agreement and completion
of installation, the electric distribution company may inspect a
generating facility for compliance with standards and may arrange for
a witness test;
(f) If the inspection/test is satisfactory, the electric
distribution company will notify the customer in writing that
interconnection is allowed and approved. Customers who do not receive
any notice from the electric distribution company within fifteen days
are deemed approved for interconnection. Final interconnection of the
generator is subject to approval by the appropriate electrical code
officials.
(g) The simplified interconnection is provided at a total cost to
the customer not to exceed twenty-five dollars. Additional protection
equipment not included with the certified generator or interconnection
equipment package may be added at the electric distribution company's
discretion if the performance of the system is not negatively impacted
in any way and the customer is not charged for equipment in addition to
that which is included in the certified equipment package.
(7) Each electric distribution company shall have an expedited
interconnection procedure for customer-sited generators not exceeding
two megawatts in capacity that will use existing customer facilities,
which shall require the following steps:
(a) To assist customers in the interconnection process the electric
distribution company will designate an employee or office from which
basic information on the application can be obtained through an
informal process. On request, the electric distribution company will
provide the applicant with all relevant forms, documents, and technical
requirements for filing a complete application for interconnection of
generators not exceeding two megawatts to the electric distribution
company's electric power system. Upon the customer's request, the
electric distribution company will meet with the customer before
submission of an application for expedited interconnection.
(b) The customer shall submit an application for expedited
interconnection to the electric distribution company and may, at the
same time, submit an interconnection agreement executed by the
customer.
(c) A customer will be notified by the electric distribution
company within three business days of its receipt of an interconnection
application.
(d) The electric distribution company will notify the customer
within eight business days of its receipt of the application whether it
is complete or incomplete. If the application is incomplete, the
electric distribution company will at the same time provide the
customer a written list detailing all information that must be provided
to complete the application. An applicant will have ten business days
to submit the listed information following receipt of the notice. If
the applicant does not submit the listed information to the electric
distribution company within the ten business days, the application
shall be deemed withdrawn. An application will be complete upon the
applicant's submission of the information identified in the electric
distribution company's written list.
(e) Within ten business days after the electric distribution
company notifies the applicant it received a complete application, the
electric distribution company shall perform an initial review of the
proposed interconnection, which shall consist of an application of the
screening criteria set forth in subsections (4) and (5) of this
section. The electric distribution company shall notify the applicant
of the results, providing copies of the analysis and data underlying
the electric distribution company's determinations under the screens.
During the initial review, the electric distribution company may
conduct, at its own expense, any additional studies or tests it deems
necessary to evaluate the proposed interconnection.
(f) If the initial review determines that the proposed
interconnection passes the screens set forth in subsections (4) and (5)
of this section as applicable, the interconnection application will be
approved and the electric distribution company will provide the
applicant an executable interconnection agreement within five business
days after the determination.
(g) If the initial review determines that the proposed
interconnection fails one or more screens in subsections (4) and (5) of
this section, but the electric distribution company determines through
the initial review that the small generator may nevertheless be
interconnected consistent with safety, reliability, and power quality
standards, with or without minor system modifications, the electric
distribution company will provide the applicant an executable
interconnection agreement within five business days after the
determination. The generator is responsible for the cost of any minor
system modifications required.
(h) If the initial review determines that the proposed
interconnection fails one or more screens in subsections (4) and (5) of
this section, and the electric distribution company does not or cannot
determine from the initial review that the generator may nevertheless
be interconnected consistent with safety, reliability, and power
quality standards, then the electric distribution company will offer to
perform an additional review if the electric distribution company
concludes that an additional review might determine that the generator
could qualify for interconnection pursuant to the expedited procedures.
The electric distribution company will provide a nonbinding, but good
faith estimate of the costs of the additional review when it notifies
the customer its proposed interconnection has failed one or more
screens in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
(i) Each electric distribution company will include in its net
metering and interconnection compliance tariff the procedure it will
follow for any additional review including the allocation of cost
responsibility to the customer.
(j) Final interconnection of the customer's generator is subject to
commissioning tests as set forth in subsection (2)(a) of this section
and approval by the appropriate local electrical code officials.
(k) An application and processing fee may be imposed on customers
proposing interconnection of generators under expedited interconnection
procedures if the total of all fees to complete the interconnection
does not exceed fifty dollars plus one dollar per kilowatt of the
capacity of the proposed generator. Additional fees may only be
charged to customers if their generator interconnection requires minor
system modifications under (g) of this subsection or additional review
under (h) of this subsection. Costs for minor system modifications or
additional review will be based on quotations for services from the
electric distribution company and subject to review by the commission
or its designee for such review. Hourly engineering fees for
additional review may not exceed one hundred dollars per hour.
(8) An electric distribution company may not require an eligible
customer-generator whose system meets the simplified or expedited
interconnection standards in subsections (2) through (7) of this
section, as applicable, to install additional controls, perform, or pay
for additional tests or purchase additional liability insurance, except
as agreed to by the customer in subsection (7) of this section.
(9) Each customer generator approved for interconnection shall
affix to their electric revenue meter a standard warning sign as
approved by the commission that notifies utility personnel of the
existence of customer sited parallel generation.
(10) Each electric distribution company shall have a standard
interconnection procedure available for generators not exceeding twenty
megawatts in capacity interconnecting to distribution level voltages
that do not qualify for simplified or expedited interconnection
procedures, which shall consist of the following:
(a) The customer submits an application for standard
interconnection review, or a customer's interconnection application is
transferred from the simplified or expedited interconnection procedures
for failure to meet all of the requirements of those procedures;
(b) The electric distribution company acknowledges to the
interconnecting customer receipt of the application or the transfer
from the simplified or expedited interconnection procedures within
three business days;
(c) The electric distribution company evaluates the application for
completeness and notifies the customer within ten days of receipt that
the application is or is not complete and, if not, advises what is
missing;
(d) The electric distribution company will conduct an initial
review that may include a scoping meeting or discussion with the
customer to review the application. At the scoping meeting the
electric distribution company will provide pertinent information such
as: The available fault current at the proposed location; the existing
peak loading on the lines in the general vicinity of the proposed
generator; and the configuration of the distribution lines at the
proposed point of interconnection;
(e) At the customer's request, the electric distribution company
will undertake a feasibility study that provides a preliminary review
of the potential impacts on the distribution system that will result
from the proposed interconnection. The feasibility study may be
combined with any feasibility study conducted to determine transmission
impacts. The feasibility study will preliminarily review short circuit
currents including contribution from the proposed generator as well as
coordination of and potential overloading of distribution circuit
protection devices. If no violations are found in the feasibility
study, the impact study in (f) of this subsection may be waived;
(f) The electric distribution company provides an impact study
agreement, including a cost estimate for the impact study. Where the
proposed interconnection may affect electric transmission or
distribution systems other than that of the electric distribution
company where the interconnection is proposed, the electric
distribution company shall coordinate, but not be responsible for the
timing of any studies required to determine the impact of the
interconnection request on other potentially affected electric systems.
The customer will be responsible to any other affected systems for all
costs of any additional studies incurred by any other affected system
to evaluate the impact of the proposed generator interconnection.
(i) For generators greater than two megawatts, the interconnection
study may require analysis of power flows and other impacts on the
transmission system if the utility has a reasonable belief that the
interconnection of the generator will create power flows that reach the
transmission system.
(ii) Transmission system interconnection studies will be governed
by separate procedures that may include submission of an application
into a transmission interconnection queue.
(iii) Each electric distribution company will identify the
circumstances under which generators larger than two megawatts must
submit their application into a transmission interconnection queue;
(g) For generators that are certified pursuant to subsection (2) or
(3) of this section, no review of the generator's protection equipment
is required. While a utility may review a certified generator's
protection scheme, it cannot charge for such review;
(h) Each electric distribution company will include in its
compliance tariff a description of the various elements of an impact
study it would typically undertake under this section including:
(i) Load flow study;
(ii) Short-circuit study;
(iii) Circuit protection and coordination study;
(iv) Impact on system operation;
(v) Stability study and the conditions that would justify including
this element in the impact study; and
(vi) Voltage collapse study and the conditions that would justify
including this element in the impact study;
(i) Once the interconnecting customer executes the impact study
agreement and pays pursuant to the good faith estimate contained in the
agreement, the electric distribution company will conduct the
interconnection impact study;
(j) If the electric distribution company determines, in accordance
with good utility practices, that the electric distribution company
electric system modifications required to accommodate the proposed
interconnection are not substantial, the impact study will identify the
scope and cost of the modifications as defined in the study results;
(k) If the electric distribution company determines, in accordance
with good utility practices, that the system modifications to the
electric distribution company's electric system are substantial, the
results of the impact study will produce an estimate for the
modification costs. The detailed costs of, and the electric power
supplier's modifications necessary to interconnect the customer's
proposed generator will be identified in a facilities study to be
completed by the electric distribution company;
(l) A facilities study agreement, with a good faith estimate of the
cost of completing the facilities study shall be submitted to the
customer for the customer's approval;
(m) Once the interconnecting customer executes the facilities study
agreement and pays pursuant to the terms thereof, the electric
distribution company will conduct the facilities study;
(n) Upon completion of the impact or facilities study, the electric
distribution company shall send the customer an executable
interconnection agreement including a quote for any required electric
power supplier system modifications;
(o) The customer returns the signed interconnection agreement;
(p) The customer completes installation of its generator and the
electric distribution company completes any electric power supplier
system modifications;
(q) The electric distribution company inspects the completed
generator installation for compliance with requirements and attends any
required commissioning tests; and
(r) Provided any required commissioning tests are satisfactory, the
electric distribution company shall notify the customer in writing that
interconnection is approved.
(11) Fees for standard interconnection review shall include an
application fee not to exceed one hundred dollars plus two dollars per
kilowatt capacity, as well as charges for actual time spent on the
interconnection study. Costs for the engineering review may not exceed
one hundred dollars per hour. Costs for the electric distribution
company's facilities necessary to accommodate the customer's generator
interconnection will be the responsibility of the customer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An electric distribution company that
charges a fee for an interconnection study shall provide the customer-generator with a bill that includes a clear explanation of all charges.
In addition, the electric distribution company shall provide to the
customer-generator, before the start of the interconnection study, a
good faith estimate of the number of hours that will be needed to
complete the interconnection study, and an estimate of the total
interconnection study fee.
(2) If a customer-generator's facility complies with all applicable
standards under section 4 of this act, the facility shall be presumed
to comply with the technical requirements of this chapter. In such a
case, the electric distribution company shall not require a customer-generator to install additional controls, including but not limited to
a utility accessible disconnect switch, perform or pay for additional
tests, or purchase additional liability insurance in order to obtain
approval to interconnect.
(3) Once an interconnection has been approved under this chapter,
the electric distribution company shall not require a customer-generator to test its facility except for the following:
(a) An annual test in which the customer-generator's facility is
disconnected from the electric distribution company's equipment to
ensure that the generator stops delivering power to the grid; and
(b) Any manufacturer-recommended testing.
(4) An electric distribution company may inspect a customer-generator's facility both before and after interconnection approval is
granted, at reasonable hours and with reasonable advance notice to the
customer-generator. If the electric distribution company discovers the
customer-generator's facility is not in compliance with the
requirements of section 4 of this act and the noncompliance adversely
affects the safety or reliability of the electric system, the electric
distribution company may require disconnection of the customer-generator's facility until it complies with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The commission may from time to time
designate a technical master for the resolution of interconnection
disputes. The parties shall use the technical master to resolve
disputes related to interconnection and such resolution is binding on
the parties.
(2) The commission may designate a department of energy national
laboratory; college or university; or an approved federal energy
regulatory commission regional transmission organization with
distribution system engineering expertise as the technical master.
Should the federal energy regulatory commission identify a national
technical dispute resolution team, the commission may designate the
team as its technical master.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

--- END ---