BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.59.020 and 1989 c 11 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) ((The term)) "Employee organization" means any organization,
union, association, agency, committee, council, or group of any kind in
which employees participate, and which exists for the purpose, in whole
or in part, of collective bargaining with employers.
(2) ((The term)) "Collective bargaining" or "bargaining" means the
performance of the mutual obligation of the representatives of the
employer and the exclusive bargaining representative to meet at
reasonable times in light of the time limitations of ((the budget-making process,)) section 2 of this act and to bargain in good faith in
an effort to reach agreement with respect to the wages, hours, and
terms and conditions of employment: PROVIDED, That prior law, practice
or interpretation shall be neither restrictive, expansive, nor
determinative with respect to the scope of bargaining. A written
contract incorporating any agreements reached shall be executed if
requested by either party. The obligation to bargain does not compel
either party to agree to a proposal or to make a concession.
In the event of a dispute between an employer and an exclusive
bargaining representative over the matters that are terms and
conditions of employment, the commission shall decide which item(s) are
mandatory subjects for bargaining and which item(s) are nonmandatory.
(3) ((The term)) "Commission" means the public employment relations
commission established by RCW 41.58.010.
(4) ((The terms)) "Employee" and "educational employee" means any
certificated employee of a school district, except:
(a) The chief executive officer of the employer.
(b) The chief administrative officers of the employer, which shall
mean the superintendent of the district, deputy superintendents,
administrative assistants to the superintendent, assistant
superintendents, and business manager. Title variation from all
positions enumerated in this subsection (4)(b) may be appealed to the
commission for determination of inclusion in, or exclusion from, the
term "educational employee".
(c) Confidential employees, which shall mean:
(i) Any person who participates directly on behalf of an employer
in the formulation of labor relations policy, the preparation for or
conduct of collective bargaining, or the administration of collective
bargaining agreements, except that the role of such person is not
merely routine or clerical in nature but calls for the consistent
exercise of independent judgment; and
(ii) Any person who assists and acts in a confidential capacity to
such person.
(d) Unless included within a bargaining unit pursuant to RCW
41.59.080, any supervisor, which means any employee having authority,
in the interest of an employer, to hire, assign, promote, transfer,
layoff, recall, suspend, discipline, or discharge other employees, or
to adjust their grievances, or to recommend effectively such action, if
in connection with the foregoing the exercise of such authority is not
merely routine or clerical in nature but calls for the consistent
exercise of independent judgment, and shall not include any persons
solely by reason of their membership on a faculty tenure or other
governance committee or body. The term "supervisor" shall include only
those employees who perform a preponderance of the above-specified acts
of authority.
(e) Unless included within a bargaining unit pursuant to RCW
41.59.080, principals and assistant principals in school districts.
(5) ((The term)) "Employer" means any school district.
(6) ((The term)) "Exclusive bargaining representative" means any
employee organization which has:
(a) Been selected or designated pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter as the representative of the employees in an appropriate
collective bargaining unit; or
(b) Prior to January 1, 1976, been recognized under a predecessor
statute as the representative of the employees in an appropriate
collective bargaining or negotiations unit.
(7) ((The term)) "Person" means one or more individuals,
organizations, unions, associations, partnerships, corporations,
boards, committees, commissions, agencies, or other entities, or their
representatives.
(8) ((The term)) "Nonsupervisory employee" means all educational
employees other than principals, assistant principals and supervisors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that the uninterrupted and dedicated
service of educational employees is vital to the welfare and public
safety and health of this state, and that to promote such dedicated and
uninterrupted public service there should exist an effective and
adequate means of settling collective bargaining disputes.
(2) With respect to contracts for the 2004-05 school year or
beyond, negotiations between an employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative of a unit of employees under this chapter must commence
at least five months prior to adoption of the employer's budget. After
the effective date of this section, renegotiation of an existing
contract must commence as required by the contract, or if not specified
by the contract, within twenty days of receipt by one party of a
written notice requesting negotiations, served as required under the
contract.
(3) If the employer and exclusive bargaining representative have
not reached an agreement within sixty days after commencing
negotiations, then at any time thereafter either party may declare that
an impasse exists and may submit the dispute to the commission for
mediation, with or without the concurrence of the other party. The
commission shall appoint a mediator, who shall forthwith meet with the
representatives of the parties, either jointly or separately, and shall
take such other steps as he or she may deem appropriate in order to
persuade the parties to resolve their differences and effect an
agreement. The mediator does not have a power of compulsion.
(4)(a) If an agreement has not been reached following a reasonable
period of mediation, and the executive director of the commission, upon
the recommendation of the assigned mediator, finds that the parties
remain at impasse, then an interest arbitration panel shall be created
to resolve the dispute. The issues for determination by the
arbitration panel are limited to the issues certified by the executive
director of the commission.
(b) Within seven days following the issuance of the determination
of the executive director of the commission, each party shall name one
person to serve as its arbitrator on the arbitration panel. The two
members so appointed shall meet within seven days following the
appointment of the later appointed member to attempt to choose a third
member to act as the neutral chair of the arbitration panel. Upon the
failure of the arbitrators to select a neutral chair within seven days,
the two appointed members shall use one of the two following options in
the appointment of the third member, who shall act as chair of the
panel:
(i) By mutual consent, the two appointed members may jointly
request the commission, and the commission shall appoint a third member
within two days of such request. Costs of each party's appointee shall
be borne by each party respectively; other costs of the arbitration
proceedings shall be borne by the commission; or
(ii) Either party may apply to the commission, the federal
mediation and conciliation service, or the American arbitration
association to provide a list of five qualified arbitrators from which
the neutral chair shall be chosen. Each party shall pay the fees and
expenses of its arbitrator, and the fees and expenses of the neutral
chair shall be shared equally between the parties.
(c)(i) The arbitration panel so constituted under this section
shall promptly establish a date, time, and place for a hearing and
shall provide reasonable notice thereof to the parties to the dispute.
A hearing, which shall be informal, shall be held, and each party shall
have the opportunity to present evidence and make argument. No member
of the arbitration panel may present the case for a party to the
proceedings.
(ii) The rules of evidence prevailing in judicial proceedings may
be considered, but are not binding, and any oral testimony or
documentary evidence or other data deemed relevant by the chair of the
arbitration panel may be received in evidence. A recording of the
proceedings shall be taken.
(iii) The arbitration panel has the power to administer oaths,
require the attendance of witnesses, and require the production of such
books, papers, contracts, agreements, and documents as may be deemed by
the panel to be material to a just determination of the issues in
dispute. If any person refuses to obey a subpoena issued by the
arbitration panel, or refuses to be sworn or to make an affirmation to
testify, or any witness, party, or attorney for a party is guilty of
any contempt while in attendance at any hearing held hereunder, the
arbitration panel may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court in
the county in which the labor dispute exists, and the court has
jurisdiction to issue an appropriate order. Any failure to obey the
order may be punished by the court as a contempt of court under chapter
7.21 RCW.
(iv) The hearing conducted by the arbitration panel shall be
concluded within twenty-five days following the selection or
designation of the neutral chair of the arbitration panel, unless the
parties agree to a longer period.
(d) The neutral chair shall consult with the other members of the
arbitration panel, and, within thirty days following the conclusion of
the hearing, the neutral chair shall make written findings of fact and
a written determination of the issues in dispute, based on the evidence
presented. A copy of the determination shall be served on the
commission, on each of the other members of the arbitration panel, and
on each of the parties to the dispute. The determination shall be
final and binding upon both parties, subject to review by the superior
court for the county in which the labor dispute exists upon the
application of either party solely upon the question of whether the
decision of the panel was arbitrary or capricious. The determination
may be enforced at the instance of either party, the arbitration panel,
or the commission in the superior court for the county in which the
dispute exists.
(5) An interest arbitration panel created under this section, in
the performance of its duties under this chapter, exercises a state
function and is, for the purposes of this chapter, a state agency.
Chapter 34.05 RCW does not apply to proceedings before an interest
arbitration panel under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In making the determination required under section 2 of this
act, the arbitration panel shall be mindful of the legislative purpose
enumerated in section 2(1) of this act and, as additional standards or
guidelines to aid it in reaching a decision, it shall take into
consideration the following factors:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) Stipulations of the parties;
(c) Comparison of the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
employees involved in the proceedings with the wages, hours, and
conditions of employment of like employees of similarly situated public
schools in this state;
(d) The average consumer prices for goods and services, commonly
known as the cost of living;
(e) The interest and welfare of the public;
(f) The ability of the employer to finance economic adjustments;
(g) Changes in any of the circumstances under (a) through (f) of
this subsection during the pendency of the proceedings; and
(h) Such other factors, not confined to the factors under (a)
through (f) of this subsection, that are normally or traditionally
taken into consideration in the determination of wages, hours, and
conditions of employment.
(2) The arbitration panel is not authorized to make a determination
regarding salary or compensation increases in excess of those
authorized in accordance with RCW 28A.150.410 and 28A.400.200. The
state has no liability for funding the arbitration panel's award in
excess of the funding resulting from state funding formulae or
allocations in effect during the term of the contract. The arbitration
panel's determination, or its implementation, may not be inconsistent
with any statutory limitation on the employer's revenues or allocations
of revenues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
During the pendency of the proceedings before the arbitration panel
created under section 2 of this act, existing wages, hours, and other
conditions of employment shall not be changed by action of either party
without the consent of the other but a party may so consent without
prejudice to its rights or position under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
If the representative of either or both the exclusive bargaining
representative and the employer refuse to submit to the procedures set
forth in section 2 of this act, the parties, or the commission on its
own motion, may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court for the
county in which the labor dispute exists and the court has jurisdiction
to issue an appropriate order. A failure to obey such an order may be
punished by the court as a contempt of court under chapter 7.21 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The right of educational employees to engage in any strike,
work slowdown, or work stoppage is prohibited. The right of a school
district to engage in a lockout is prohibited.
(2) An organization recognized as the exclusive bargaining
representative of employees subject to this chapter that willfully
disobeys a lawful order of enforcement by a superior court pursuant to
this section or section 2 or 5 of this act or that willfully offers
resistance to such an order, whether by strike or otherwise, is in
contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW. An employer that
willfully disobeys a lawful order of enforcement by a superior court
under this section or section 2 or 5 of this act or willfully offers
resistance to such an order is in contempt of court as provided in
chapter 7.21 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 41.59.120 (Resolving impasses in
collective bargaining -- Mediation -- Fact-finding with recommendations--Other) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 13 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---