BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington is the
home to entrepreneurs and innovative technologies. The legislature
further finds that the availability of private equity for the start-up
and subsequent expansion of new businesses is critical to the continued
growth and development of Washington's economy. The legislature also
finds that investment in Washington firms would help accelerate
economic growth and increase the tax base. The legislature finds that
pension funds managed by the Washington state investment board
constitute a major financial resource of the state, and that such funds
may be prudently invested in start-up and emerging growth businesses in
this state under policies established by the Washington state
investment board. The legislature further finds that the goals of
maximizing investment returns, prudent levels of risk, fulfilling
fiduciary duties, ensuring adequate investment diversification,
promoting job creation, and strengthening the state's economy are
compatible and mutually beneficial. Therefore, the legislature
declares that the state investment board should sustain a level of
capital investment in Washington companies to foster economic growth
and the growth of the state employee's pension portfolio.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.33A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In making and implementing investment decisions related to
private equity, the state investment board, its executive officer, and
the board's investment designees under RCW 43.33A.035 have a duty to
look first at Washington opportunities for diversification unless,
under the circumstances, it is not prudent to do so. This includes,
but is not limited to, providing seed capital to start-up or emerging
businesses or placing money with Washington private equity firms for
investment by the private equity firms in Washington start-up and
emerging businesses.
(2) The state investment board shall report biennially to the
legislative fiscal and economic development committees on the
implementation of this section and its impact on the economic
development of this state. The first report shall be delivered
December 1, 2004.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Emerging business" means a new or small company that has the
capacity, upon obtaining the appropriate capital, to generate
significant high skill, high wage employment.
(b) "Private equity" means equity financing that is provided for
starting up, expanding, or relocating a company, or related purposes
such as financing for seed capital, research and development,
introduction of a product or process into the marketplace, or similar
needs requiring risk capital.
(c) "Seed capital" means financing that is provided for the initial
phases of development, refinement or commercialization of a product,
process, or innovation, including but not limited to facilitating
technology transfers related to academic research, discoveries, or
developments for the purpose of commercialization of a product,
process, or innovation.
(d) "Start-up business" means a business in the act or instance of
being set in operation around a technology, product, or service based
on a sound business plan.
(e) "Washington private equity firm" means an entity that has a
majority of its employees in this state or that has at least one
managing partner domiciled in this state that has made significant
capital investment in Washington companies and that provides equity
financing for starting up or expanding a company, or related purposes
such as financing for seed capital, research and development,
introduction of a product or process into the marketplace, or similar
needs requiring risk capital.

--- END ---