BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.65 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is prohibited from entering or reentering into
any management plan with either a state or nonstate entity that would
allow for the harvest of naturally occurring geoduck in Hood Canal
below the mean low tide line until the commission adopts an
administrative rule canceling or modifying the restriction. For the
purposes of this section only, Hood Canal means the area bounded by a
line projected from Tala Point in Jefferson county to Foulweather Bluff
in Kitsap county, and includes all marine waters south of this line and
the associated aquatic lands.
(2) The commission may adopt a rule allowing the department to
enter into management agreements with state or nonstate entities that
allow for the harvest of naturally occurring geoduck in Hood Canal
below the mean low tide line only if a majority of the members of the
commission vote to affirm that substantial, peer-reviewed research
strongly indicates that the commercial harvest of geoduck in Hood Canal
does not have either a significant short-term adverse effect or
significant long-term adverse effect on the environmental health of
Hood Canal, including water quality and dissolved oxygen levels. Any
research considered must be specifically tailored to the unique
conditions of Hood Canal and must address the effect of removing a
large quantity of geoducks from Hood Canal.
(3) If a majority of the members of the commission vote
affirmatively on a rule under subsection (2) of this section, a summary
of the research considered must be presented to the appropriate
standing committees of both the house of representatives and the
senate. No rule may take effect until thirty days after the
adjournment of the session during which the research is presented.
(4) The department of natural resources is prohibited from entering
or reentering into a management plan with either a state or nonstate
entity that allows for the harvest of naturally occurring geoduck in
Hood Canal below the mean low tide line unless the department of fish
and wildlife is authorized by the commission to enter into such a
management plan.

--- END ---