BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.14.315 and 1987 c 20 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person may engage in small scale prospecting and mining, as
that term is defined in RCW 77.55.270, on shorelands and the beds of
navigable lakes and rivers not subject to tidal flows where both the
surface and mineral rights are possessed by the state or where the
surface rights are possessed by the state and the mineral rights are
possessed by the person engaging in the small scale prospecting and
mining activity without first obtaining a permit, lease, license, or
other form of permission from the department, and without being charged
a rent or fee.
(2) The department may issue permits for recreational mineral
prospecting that does not meet the definition of "small scale
prospecting and mining," as that term is defined in RCW 77.55.270 in
designated areas containing noneconomic mineral deposits. The term of
a permit shall not exceed one year. Designated areas, equipment
allowed, methods of prospecting, as well as other appropriate permit
conditions, shall be set in rules adopted by the department. Fees
shall be set by the board of natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79.90 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must allow small scale prospecting and mining, as
that term is defined in RCW 77.55.270, on shorelands and the beds of
navigable lakes and rivers not subject to tidal flows where both the
surface and mineral rights are possessed by the state or where the
surface rights are possessed by the state and the mineral rights are
possessed by the person engaging in the small scale prospecting and
mining activity without first obtaining a permit, lease, license, or
other form of permission from the department, and without being charged
a rent or fee.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.300 and 2000 c 107 s 239 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person, except for a person engaging in small scale
prospecting and mining, as that term is defined in RCW 77.55.270, is
guilty of unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities if the
person constructs any form of hydraulic project or performs other work
on a hydraulic project and:
(a) Fails to have a hydraulic project approval required under
chapter 77.55 RCW for such construction or work; or
(b) Violates any requirements or conditions of the hydraulic
project approval for such construction or work.
(2) Unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities is a gross
misdemeanor.
(3) A person engaging in small scale prospecting and mining, as
that term is defined in RCW 77.55.270, may be charged with a class 1
civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW if that person satisfies either
criteria listed in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.55.270 and 1997 c 415 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Small scale prospecting and mining shall not require written
approval under this chapter if the prospecting is conducted in
accordance with provisions established by the department.
(2) By December 31, 1998, the department shall adopt rules
applicable to small scale prospecting and mining activities subject to
this section. The department shall develop the rules in cooperation
with the recreational mining community and other interested parties.
(3) Within two months of adoption of the rules, the department
shall distribute an updated gold and fish pamphlet that describes
methods of mineral prospecting that are consistent with the
department's rule. The pamphlet shall be written to clearly indicate
the prospecting methods that require written approval under this
chapter and the prospecting methods that require compliance with the
pamphlet. To the extent possible, the department shall use the
provisions of the gold and fish pamphlet to minimize the number of
specific provisions of a written approval issued under this chapter.
(4) For the purposes of this chapter, "small scale prospecting and
mining" means only the use of the following methods: Pans, which can
include battery-operated rotating open metal or plastic dishes without
pumped or gravity-fed water supplies, nonmotorized sluice boxes,
concentrators, and minirocker boxes for the discovery and recovery of
minerals. The term "small scale prospecting and mining" does not
include any motorized or battery-operated methods of prospecting and
mining, except as provided for by this subsection.

--- END ---