BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Contact center" means a physical or electronic operation that
uses telephonic or electronic communications in one or more of the
following activities: (a) Providing customer services, including
information about customer accounts; (b) soliciting sales; (c)
reactivating dormant accounts; (d) conducting surveys or research; (e)
collecting receivables; (f) taking or receiving reservations; or (g)
taking or receiving orders.
(2) "Personal information" means personally identifiable
information that is provided by a person to a contact center, which
includes, but is not limited to, a person's name, address, telephone
number, electronic mail address, social security number, or credit or
other financial information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 At the request of a party using telephonic
or electronic communications with an employee of a contact center, the
employee must identify: (1) Himself or herself, by stating his or her
name; (2) the name of his or her employer; (3) the location of the
municipality, state, and country in which he or she is located; and (4)
if applicable, the name and telephone number of the entity contracting
with the contact center. In addition, if the contact center is located
in a foreign country, the party may request that a telephonic
communication be rerouted to a contact center located in the United
States. The contact center must comply with any such request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 An employee at a contact center operating in
a foreign country may not solicit any personal information, whether
using telephonic or electronic communications, unless the employee
first informs the party that disclosing that information to the
employee is optional and receives the affirmative consent of the party
to whom the information relates. If telephonic communications are
used, the employee may not solicit any personal information unless he
or she also informs the party that the contact center is located in a
foreign country and that the party may request that the communication
be rerouted to a contact center located in the United States. The
contact center must comply with any such request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. Violations of this chapter are not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business. A violation
of this chapter is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and
an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the
consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---