BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer may not order a layoff of workers who were required
to train other persons to perform their job duties within ninety days
of the date on which the workers began training the other persons
unless, ten days before the date on which the workers began training
the other persons, the employer gave written notice of the layoff to:
(a) The workers affected by the layoff; and (b) the department.
(2) The written notice must specify: (a) The number of affected
positions; (b) the number of affected positions being relocated or
outsourced to a different location one hundred miles or more away; (c)
the job titles and wages of the affected positions; (d) the locations
to which the affected positions are being relocated or outsourced; and
(e) any additional information specified in rule by the department.
(3)(a) An employer who fails to give notice as required by
subsection (1) of this section is liable to each employee entitled to
notice who lost his or her employment for:
(i) The value of wages at the average regular rate of compensation
received by the employee during the last three years of his or her
employment, or the employee's final rate of compensation, whichever is
higher; and
(ii) The value of any benefits to which the employee would have
been entitled had his or her employment not been lost, including, but
not limited to: (A) The value of any sick leave or other paid time off
as defined in RCW 49.12.265; (B) the value of any pension, profit
sharing, stock bonus, stock purchase, and stock option plans; and (C)
the cost of any medical expenses incurred by the employee that would
have been covered under an employee benefit plan.
(b) Liability under this subsection (3) is calculated for the
period of the employer's violation, up to a maximum of ninety days, or
one-half the number of days that the employee was employed by the
employer, whichever period is smaller.
(4) An employer who fails to give notice as required by subsection
(1) of this section is also subject to a civil penalty of not more than
one hundred dollars per employee entitled to notice for each day of the
employer's violation. Civil penalties collected under this section
shall be paid into the unemployment trust fund.
(5) The department shall administer and investigate violations of
this section. In an investigation or proceeding under this section,
the director has, in addition to all other powers granted by law, the
authority to examine the books and records of an employer. The
department shall adopt rules necessary to carry out this section.
(6) A person, including an employee representative, seeking to
establish liability against an employer may bring a civil action on
behalf of the person, other persons similarly situated, or both, in any
court of competent jurisdiction. The court may award reasonable
attorneys' fees as part of costs to a plaintiff who prevails in a civil
action brought under this section.
(7) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Employer" means an employer that has one hundred or more
workers.
(b) "Layoff" means a separation from employment of a person engaged
in the employment of an employer or a termination of a person who is
working under an independent contract, the essence of which is his or
her personal labor.
(c) "Worker" has the meaning provided in RCW 51.08.180.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.20.050 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
January 4, 2004:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual shall not be considered to have left work
voluntarily without good cause when:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was because of the illness or disability of the
claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a member of the
claimant's immediate family if the claimant took all reasonable
precautions, in accordance with any regulations that the commissioner
may prescribe, to protect his or her employment status by having
promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence and by
having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment: PROVIDED, That these precautions need not have been taken
when they would have been a futile act, including those instances when
the futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system;
(iii) He or she has left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that is due to an employer-initiated mandatory transfer that
is outside the existing labor market area if the claimant remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move; or
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110.
(c) In determining under this subsection whether an individual has
left work voluntarily without good cause, the commissioner shall only
consider work-connected factors such as the degree of risk involved to
the individual's health, safety, and morals, the individual's physical
fitness for the work, the individual's ability to perform the work, and
such other work connected factors as the commissioner may deem
pertinent, including state and national emergencies. Good cause shall
not be established for voluntarily leaving work because of its distance
from an individual's residence where the distance was known to the
individual at the time he or she accepted the employment and where, in
the judgment of the department, the distance is customarily traveled by
workers in the individual's job classification and labor market, nor
because of any other significant work factor which was generally known
and present at the time he or she accepted employment, unless the
related circumstances have so changed as to amount to a substantial
involuntary deterioration of the work factor or unless the commissioner
determines that other related circumstances would work an unreasonable
hardship on the individual were he or she required to continue in the
employment.
(d) Subsection (1)(a) and (c) of this section shall not apply to an
individual whose marital status or domestic responsibilities cause him
or her to leave employment. Such an individual shall not be eligible
for unemployment insurance benefits beginning with the first day of the
calendar week in which he or she left work and thereafter for seven
calendar weeks and until he or she has requalified, either by obtaining
bona fide work in employment covered by this title and earning wages in
that employment equal to seven times his or her weekly benefit amount
or by reporting in person to the department during ten different
calendar weeks and certifying on each occasion that he or she is ready,
able, and willing to immediately accept any suitable work which may be
offered, is actively seeking work pursuant to customary trade
practices, and is utilizing such employment counseling and placement
services as are available through the department. This subsection does
not apply to individuals covered by (b)(ii) or (iii) of this
subsection.
(2) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual is not disqualified from benefits under (a) of
this subsection when:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was necessary because of the illness or
disability of the claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a
member of the claimant's immediate family if:
(A) The claimant pursued all reasonable alternatives to preserve
his or her employment status by requesting a leave of absence, by
having promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence,
and by having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment. These alternatives need not be pursued, however, when they
would have been a futile act, including those instances when the
futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system; and
(B) The claimant terminated his or her employment status, and is
not entitled to be reinstated to the same position or a comparable or
similar position;
(iii) He or she: (A) Left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that, due to a mandatory military transfer: (I) Is outside
the existing labor market area; and (II) is in Washington or another
state that, pursuant to statute, does not consider such an individual
to have left work voluntarily without good cause; and (B) remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move;
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;
(v) The individual's usual compensation was reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vi) The individual's usual hours were reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vii) The individual's worksite changed, such change caused a
material increase in distance or difficulty of travel, and, after the
change, the commute was greater than is customary for workers in the
individual's job classification and labor market;
(viii) The individual's worksite safety deteriorated, the
individual reported such safety deterioration to the employer, and the
employer failed to correct the hazards within a reasonable period of
time;
(ix) The individual left work because of illegal activities in the
individual's worksite, the individual reported such activities to the
employer, and the employer failed to end such activities within a
reasonable period of time; ((or))
(x) The individual's usual work was changed to work that violates
the individual's religious convictions or sincere moral beliefs; or
(xi) The individual left work because:
(A) He or she received written notice of a layoff as described in
section 1 of this act; or
(B) He or she was required to train other persons to perform his or
her job duties, he or she reasonably expected to be laid off within
ninety days of the date on which he or she began training the other
persons, and his or her position was relocated or outsourced to a
different location one hundred miles or more away.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Payments to a person under section 1 of this act may not be
construed as wages or used to deny or reduce benefits under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---