BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the
Washington state supreme court held in Thurston County v. Western
Washington Growth Management Hearings Board, 148 Wn.2d 1 (2002), that
a more restrictive interpretation of the term "necessary" is
appropriate and consistent with the legislative policy of the growth
management act when interpreting a provision that specifies, in part,
that urban governmental services may only be extended or expanded in
rural areas in those limited circumstances shown to be necessary to
protect basic public health and safety and the environment. The
legislature also recognizes that appropriate extensions or expansions
of urban governmental services must be financially supportable and must
not permit urban development.
The legislature further recognizes that coordinated planning and
growth, including appropriate and locally approved extensions or
expansions of urban governmental services, are in the public interest
and are consistent with stated policy goals of citizen participation
and protecting basic public health, safety, and the environment.
The legislature, therefore, intends to provide new policy guidance
and mechanisms by which, for a specified amount of time, urban
governmental services may be appropriately extended or expanded in
response to local level actions and consent.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.110 and 2003 c 299 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall designate an urban growth area or areas within which
urban growth shall be encouraged and outside of which growth can occur
only if it is not urban in nature. Each city that is located in such
a county shall be included within an urban growth area. An urban
growth area may include more than a single city. An urban growth area
may include territory that is located outside of a city only if such
territory already is characterized by urban growth whether or not the
urban growth area includes a city, or is adjacent to territory already
characterized by urban growth, or is a designated new fully contained
community as defined by RCW 36.70A.350.
(2) Based upon the growth management population projection made for
the county by the office of financial management, the county and each
city within the county shall include areas and densities sufficient to
permit the urban growth that is projected to occur in the county or
city for the succeeding twenty-year period. Each urban growth area
shall permit urban densities and shall include greenbelt and open space
areas. An urban growth area determination may include a reasonable
land market supply factor and shall permit a range of urban densities
and uses. In determining this market factor, cities and counties may
consider local circumstances. Cities and counties have discretion in
their comprehensive plans to make many choices about accommodating
growth.
Within one year of July 1, 1990, each county that as of June 1,
1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, shall begin
consulting with each city located within its boundaries and each city
shall propose the location of an urban growth area. Within sixty days
of the date the county legislative authority of a county adopts its
resolution of intention or of certification by the office of financial
management, all other counties that are required or choose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall begin this consultation with each city
located within its boundaries. The county shall attempt to reach
agreement with each city on the location of an urban growth area within
which the city is located. If such an agreement is not reached with
each city located within the urban growth area, the county shall
justify in writing why it so designated the area an urban growth area.
A city may object formally with the department over the designation of
the urban growth area within which it is located. Where appropriate,
the department shall attempt to resolve the conflicts, including the
use of mediation services.
(3) Urban growth should be located first in areas already
characterized by urban growth that have adequate existing public
facility and service capacities to serve such development, second in
areas already characterized by urban growth that will be served
adequately by a combination of both existing public facilities and
services and any additional needed public facilities and services that
are provided by either public or private sources, and third in the
remaining portions of the urban growth areas. Urban growth may also be
located in designated new fully contained communities as defined by RCW
36.70A.350.
(4)(a) In general, cities are the units of local government most
appropriate to provide urban governmental services. In general, it is
not appropriate that urban governmental services be extended to or
expanded in rural areas except as follows:
(i) In those limited circumstances shown to be necessary to protect
basic public health and safety and the environment ((and));
(ii) When such services are financially supportable at rural
densities; and
(iii) When such services do not permit urban development.
(b)(i) For the purposes of this subsection (4), circumstances shall
be deemed as necessary to protect basic public health and safety and
the environment upon compliance with one or more of the following:
(A) The issuance of findings by a local health officer specifying
the necessity for the urban governmental service extension or expansion
and approval of a concurring vote by the majority of the local board of
health;
(B) The filing of a sufficient petition with the county legislative
authority specifying the necessity for the urban governmental service
extension or expansion signed by the owners of not less than ten
percent of the acreage in the area proposed for the service extension
or expansion and approval of a concurring resolution by the county
legislative authority;
(C) The certification of an election in the area proposed for the
urban governmental service extension or expansion conducted according
to the general election laws of the state whereby a majority of the
voters casting ballots on a ballot measure to allow the service
extension or expansion in the subject area approve the measure; or
(D) The approval of a resolution allowing an urban governmental
service extension or expansion in the subject area by the county
legislative authority.
(ii) In accordance with the provisions of this subsection (4), any
urban governmental service extensions or expansions deemed as necessary
to protect basic public health and safety and the environment shall not
be considered urban growth or development and shall be considered in
compliance with the requirements of (a)(iii) of this subsection.
(iii) This subsection (4)(b) shall expire December 31, 2010.
(5) On or before October 1, 1993, each county that was initially
required to plan under RCW 36.70A.040(1) shall adopt development
regulations designating interim urban growth areas under this chapter.
Within three years and three months of the date the county legislative
authority of a county adopts its resolution of intention or of
certification by the office of financial management, all other counties
that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt
development regulations designating interim urban growth areas under
this chapter. Adoption of the interim urban growth areas may only
occur after public notice; public hearing; and compliance with the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, and RCW 36.70A.110.
Such action may be appealed to the appropriate growth management
hearings board under RCW 36.70A.280. Final urban growth areas shall be
adopted at the time of comprehensive plan adoption under this chapter.
(6) Each county shall include designations of urban growth areas in
its comprehensive plan.
(7) An urban growth area designated in accordance with this section
may include within its boundaries urban service areas or potential
annexation areas designated for specific cities or towns within the
county.

--- END ---