BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.66.045 and 1999 c 334 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every issuer of a medicare supplement insurance policy or
certificate providing coverage to a resident of this state issued on or
after January 1, 1996, shall:
(1) Issue coverage under its standardized benefit plans B, C, D, E,
F, and G without evidence of insurability to any resident of this state
who is eligible for both medicare hospital and physician services by
reason of age or by reason of disability or end-stage renal disease, if
the medicare supplement policy replaces another medicare supplement
standardized benefit plan policy or certificate B, C, D, E, F, or G, or
other more comprehensive coverage than the replacing policy;
(2) Issue coverage under its standardized plans A, H, I, and J
without evidence of insurability to any resident of this state who is
eligible for both medicare hospital and physician services by reason of
age or by reason of disability or end-stage renal disease, if the
medicare supplement policy replaces another medicare supplement policy
or certificate which is the same standardized plan as the replaced
policy; and
(3) Set rates only on a community-rated basis. Premiums shall be
equal for all policyholders and certificate holders under a
standardized medicare supplement benefit plan form, except that an
issuer may vary premiums based on spousal discounts, frequency of
payment, and method of payment including automatic deposit of premiums
and may develop no more than two rating pools that distinguish between
an insured's eligibility for medicare by reason of:
(a) Age; or
(b) Disability or end-stage renal disease.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---