BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Based upon a comprehensive report by the
national institute of medicine and other studies, including a study
published by the New England Journal of Medicine, it is evident that
millions of Americans are presently receiving a substantial volume of
health care services from complementary and alternative health care
practitioners. Those studies further indicate that individuals
utilizing complementary and alternative health care services cut across
a wide variety of age, ethnic, socioeconomic, and other demographic
categories.
(2) Notwithstanding the widespread utilization of complementary and
alternative medical services by Washingtonians, the provision of many
of these services may be in technical violation of the uniform
disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW. Complementary and alternative
health care practitioners could therefore be subject to fines,
penalties, and the restriction of their practice under the uniform
disciplinary act even though there is no demonstration that their
practices are harmful to the public.
(3) The legislature intends, by enactment of this act, to allow
access by Washington residents to complementary and alternative health
care practitioners who are not providing services that require medical
training and credentials. The legislature further finds that, with
proper disclosure, these nonmedical complementary and alternative
services do not pose a known risk to the health and safety of
Washington residents, and that restricting access to those services is
not warranted.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.190 and 2003 c 53 s 141 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 3 of this act, the secretary
shall investigate complaints concerning practice by unlicensed persons
of a profession or business for which a license is required by the
chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040. In the investigation of the
complaints, the secretary shall have the same authority as provided the
secretary under RCW 18.130.050.
(2) The secretary may issue a notice of intention to issue a cease
and desist order to any person whom the secretary has reason to believe
is engaged in the unlicensed practice of a profession or business for
which a license is required by the chapters specified in RCW
18.130.040. The person to whom such notice is issued may request an
adjudicative proceeding to contest the charges. The request for
hearing must be filed within twenty days after service of the notice of
intention to issue a cease and desist order. The failure to request a
hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the secretary may enter a
permanent cease and desist order, which may include a civil fine. All
proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) If the secretary makes a final determination that a person has
engaged or is engaging in unlicensed practice, the secretary may issue
a cease and desist order. In addition, the secretary may impose a
civil fine in an amount not exceeding one thousand dollars for each day
upon which the person engaged in unlicensed practice of a business or
profession for which a license is required by one or more of the
chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040. The proceeds of such fines shall
be deposited to the health professions account.
(4) If the secretary makes a written finding of fact that the
public interest will be irreparably harmed by delay in issuing an
order, the secretary may issue a temporary cease and desist order. The
person receiving a temporary cease and desist order shall be provided
an opportunity for a prompt hearing. The temporary cease and desist
order shall remain in effect until further order of the secretary. The
failure to request a prompt or regularly scheduled hearing constitutes
a default, whereupon the secretary may enter a permanent cease and
desist order, which may include a civil fine.
(5) Neither the issuance of a cease and desist order nor payment of
a civil fine shall relieve the person so practicing or operating a
business without a license from criminal prosecution therefor, but the
remedy of a cease and desist order or civil fine shall be in addition
to any criminal liability. The cease and desist order is conclusive
proof of unlicensed practice and may be enforced under RCW 7.21.060.
This method of enforcement of the cease and desist order or civil fine
may be used in addition to, or as an alternative to, any provisions for
enforcement of agency orders set out in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) The attorney general, a county prosecuting attorney, the
secretary, a board, or any person may in accordance with the laws of
this state governing injunctions, maintain an action in the name of
this state to enjoin any person practicing a profession or business for
which a license is required by the chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040
without a license from engaging in such practice or operating such
business until the required license is secured. However, the
injunction shall not relieve the person so practicing or operating a
business without a license from criminal prosecution therefor, but the
remedy by injunction shall be in addition to any criminal liability.
(7)(a) Unlicensed practice of a profession or operating a business
for which a license is required by the chapters specified in RCW
18.130.040, unless otherwise exempted by law, constitutes a gross
misdemeanor for a single violation.
(b) Each subsequent violation, whether alleged in the same or in
subsequent prosecutions, is a class C felony punishable according to
chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(8) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or
assessed by a court because of a violation of this section shall be
remitted to the health professions account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who provides health services and complies with the
requirements of subsection (3) of this section is not in violation of
any provision of this chapter relating to the unlicensed practice of a
health profession unless the person engages in any of the following
activities without a proper license:
(a) Conducts surgery or any other procedure on another person that
severs or penetrates the tissues of human beings;
(b) Administers or prescribes x-ray radiation to another person;
(c) Prescribes or administers legend drugs or controlled substances
to another person;
(d) Recommends the discontinuance of legend drugs or controlled
substances prescribed by an appropriately licensed practitioner;
(e) Willfully diagnoses and treats a physical or mental condition
of any person under circumstances or conditions that cause or create a
risk of great bodily harm, serious physical or mental illness, or
death;
(f) Sets fractures;
(g) Treats lacerations or abrasions through electrotherapy; or
(h) Holds out, states, indicates, advertises, or implies to a
client or prospective client that he or she holds a license to practice
any health care profession that he or she does not have.
(2) A person who advertises any services that are not prohibited by
subsection (1) of this section shall disclose in the advertisement that
he or she is not licensed by the state as a health care provider.
(3) A person who provides services under subsection (1) of this
section shall, prior to providing those services, do the following:
(a) Disclose to the client in a written statement using plain
language the following:
(i) That he or she is not a licensed physician;
(ii) That the treatment is alternative or complementary to health
care services requiring a license by the state;
(iii) That the services to be provided do not require a license by
the state;
(iv) The nature of the services to be provided;
(v) The theory of treatment upon which the services are based; and
(vi) His or her education, training, experience, and other
qualifications regarding the services to be provided; and
(b) Obtain a written acknowledgment from the client stating that he
or she has been provided with the information described in this
subsection (3). The client must be provided with a copy of the written
acknowledgment. The person providing the service must retain a copy of
the signed written acknowledgment for a period of three years.
(4) The information required by subsection (3) of this section must
be provided in a language that the client understands.
(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to:
(a) Affect the scope of practice of licensed physicians and
surgeons; or
(b) Limit the right of any person to seek relief for negligence or
any other civil remedy against a person providing services subject to
the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---