BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.24.300 and 2001 c 323 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
A county authority or a group of county authorities whose combined
population is no less than forty thousand may enter into a joint
operating agreement to form a regional support network. Upon the
request of a tribal authority or authorities within a regional support
network the joint operating agreement or the county authority shall
allow for the inclusion of the tribal authority to be represented as a
party to the regional support network. The roles and responsibilities
of the county and tribal authorities shall be determined by the terms
of that agreement including a determination of membership on the
governing board and advisory committees, the number of tribal
representatives to be party to the agreement, and the provisions of law
and shall assure the provision of culturally competent services to the
tribes served. The state mental health authority may not determine the
roles and responsibilities of county authorities as to each other under
regional support networks by rule, except to assure that all duties
required of regional support networks are assigned and that counties
and the regional support network do not duplicate functions and that a
single authority has final responsibility for all available resources
and performance under the regional support network's contract with the
secretary.
(1) Regional support networks shall submit an overall six-year
operating and capital plan, timeline, and budget and submit progress
reports and an updated two-year plan biennially thereafter, to assume
within available resources all of the following duties:
(a) Administer and provide for the availability of all resource
management services, residential services, and community support
services.
(b) Assume the powers and duties of county authorities within its
area as described in RCW 71.24.045 (1) through (7).
(c) Administer and provide for the availability of all
investigation, transportation, court-related, and other services
provided by the state or counties pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW.
(d) Provide within the boundaries of each regional support network
evaluation and treatment services for at least eighty-five percent of
persons detained or committed for periods up to seventeen days
according to chapter 71.05 RCW. Regional support networks with
populations of less than one hundred fifty thousand may contract to
purchase evaluation and treatment services from other networks.
Insofar as the original intent of serving persons in the community is
maintained, the secretary is authorized to approve exceptions on a
case-by-case basis to the requirement to provide evaluation and
treatment services within the boundaries of each regional support
network. Such exceptions are limited to contracts with neighboring or
contiguous regions.
(e) Administer a portion of funds appropriated by the legislature
to house mentally ill persons in state institutions from counties
within the boundaries of any regional support network, with the
exception of persons currently confined at, or under the supervision
of, a state mental hospital pursuant to chapter 10.77 RCW, and provide
for the care of all persons needing evaluation and treatment services
for periods up to seventeen days according to chapter 71.05 RCW in
appropriate residential services, which may include state institutions.
The regional support networks shall reimburse the state for use of
state institutions at a rate equal to that assumed by the legislature
when appropriating funds for such care at state institutions during the
biennium when reimbursement occurs. The secretary shall submit a
report to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives on the efforts to implement this section by October 1,
2002. The duty of a state hospital to accept persons for evaluation
and treatment under chapter 71.05 RCW is limited by the
responsibilities assigned to regional support networks under this
section. Regional support networks who are in excess of their
individual allocated census at the state hospital shall be assessed
liquidated damages. The amount of liquidated damages shall be the
number of beds over the individual allocated census multiplied by three
hundred percent of the state hospital daily bed charge established
under RCW 43.20B.325.
(f) Administer and provide for the availability of all other mental
health services, which shall include patient counseling, day treatment,
consultation, education services, employment services as defined in RCW
71.24.035, and mental health services to children as provided in this
chapter ((designed to achieve the outcomes specified in section 5 of
this act)).
(g) Establish standards and procedures for reviewing individual
service plans and determining when that person may be discharged from
resource management services.
(2) Regional support networks shall assume all duties assigned to
county authorities by this chapter and chapter 71.05 RCW.
(3) A regional support network may request that any state-owned
land, building, facility, or other capital asset which was ever
purchased, deeded, given, or placed in trust for the care of the
mentally ill and which is within the boundaries of a regional support
network be made available to support the operations of the regional
support network. State agencies managing such capital assets shall
give first priority to requests for their use pursuant to this chapter.
(4) Each regional support network shall appoint a mental health
advisory board which shall review and provide comments on plans and
policies developed under this chapter. The composition of the board
shall be broadly representative of the demographic character of the
region and the mentally ill persons served therein. Length of terms of
board members shall be determined by the regional support network.
(5) Regional support networks shall assume all duties specified in
their plans and joint operating agreements through biennial contractual
agreements with the secretary.
(6) Counties or groups of counties participating in a regional
support network are not subject to RCW 71.24.045(6).
(7) Regional support networks may receive technical assistance from
the housing trust fund and may identify and submit projects for housing
and housing support services to the housing trust fund established
under chapter 43.185 RCW. Projects identified or submitted under this
subsection must be fully integrated with the regional support network
six-year operating and capital plan, timeline, and budget required by
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Liquidated damages collected under RCW 71.24.300(1)(e) shall be
collected by the department and shall be used in the following order:
(a) To reimburse the state for use of state hospitals at a rate
equal to that assumed by the legislature when appropriating funds for
such care at state hospitals during the biennium when reimbursement
occurs;
(b) To reimburse regional support networks who have not exceeded
and are unable to utilize their individual allocated census at the
state hospital, for the costs associated with providing inpatient
treatment in a community hospital; and, to the extent any funds remain,
(c) To allow regional support networks who have exceeded their
individual allocated census at the state hospital, to apply for funds
to develop local inpatient or hospital diversion capacity to reduce
their over reliance on the state hospital.
(2) If the state hospital admits patients in excess of their funded
capacity, first priority shall be given to regional support networks
who are under their individual allocated census.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of social and health services
shall adopt rules implementing the provisions of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---