BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Offenders who committed crimes while armed with deadly weapons
pose a serious threat to public safety and should therefore be punished
more severely than offenders who committed crimes without deadly
weapons;
(b) Extra time is currently added to the sentences of all offenders
who were armed with deadly weapons when they committed their crimes;
(c) Since 2003, in addition to the extra time added to their
sentences, offenders convicted of certain drug-related crimes while
armed with deadly weapons have had the seriousness level of their
crimes automatically increased to the highest seriousness level
available for such crimes; and
(d) This increased seriousness level has resulted in the sentences
for such armed drug offenders being enhanced twice -- a duplicative
enhancement that does not exist for any other type of crime, including
violent crime.
(2) The legislature therefore intends to:
(a) Continue to punish criminals armed with deadly weapons more
severely than criminals who are not so armed; and
(b) Remove the duplicative deadly weapon sentence enhancement for
drug-related crimes thereby enhancing their punishments in the same
manner as any other crime involving a deadly weapon.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.518 and 2002 c 290 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:

TABLE 4

DRUG OFFENSES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH
SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

III ((Any felony offense under chapter
69.50 RCW with a deadly weapon
special verdict under RCW
9.94A.602))

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW
69.50.415)

Delivery of imitation controlled
substance by person eighteen or
over to person under eighteen
(RCW 69.52.030(2))

Involving a minor in drug dealing
(RCW 69.50.401(f))

Manufacture of methamphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over 18 and deliver heroin,
methamphetamine, a narcotic
from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
to someone under 18 (RCW
69.50.406)

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or a
nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam
or methamphetamine, from
Schedule I-V to someone under 18
and 3 years junior (RCW
69.50.406)

Possession of Ephedrine,
Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous
Ammonia with intent to
manufacture methamphetamine
(RCW 69.50.440)

Selling for profit (controlled or
counterfeit) any controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.410)

II Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(b))

Deliver or possess with intent to
deliver methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Delivery of a material in lieu of a
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(c))

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for
Controlled Substances (RCW
69.50.402(a)(6))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver amphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam
from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule III, IV, or V or
nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or
flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess
with intent to distribute an
imitation controlled substance
(RCW 69.52.030(1))

I Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled
Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver marijuana (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Possess Controlled Substance that is a
Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or
V or Nonnarcotic from Schedule
I-V (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Controlled Substance
that is either heroin or narcotics
from Schedule I or II (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug
Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.518 and 2003 c 53 s 57 are each amended to read
as follows:

TABLE 4

DRUG OFFENSES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH
SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

III ((Any felony offense under chapter
69.50 RCW with a deadly weapon
special verdict under RCW
9.94A.602))

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW
69.50.415)

Delivery of imitation controlled
substance by person eighteen or
over to person under eighteen
(RCW 69.52.030(2))

Involving a minor in drug dealing
(RCW 69.50.4015)

Manufacture of methamphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(2)(b))

Over 18 and deliver heroin,
methamphetamine, a narcotic
from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
to someone under 18 (RCW
69.50.406)

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or a
nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam
or methamphetamine, from
Schedule I-V to someone under 18
and 3 years junior (RCW
69.50.406)

Possession of Ephedrine,
Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous
Ammonia with intent to
manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.440)

Selling for profit (controlled or
counterfeit) any controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.410)

II Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.4011)

Deliver or possess with intent to
deliver methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(2)(b))

Delivery of a material in lieu of a
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.4012)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for
Controlled Substances (RCW
69.50.402(1)(f))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver amphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(2)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam
from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(2)(a))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule III, IV, or V or
nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or
flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(2) (c) through (e))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess
with intent to distribute an
imitation controlled substance
(RCW 69.52.030(1))

I Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled
Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver marijuana (RCW
69.50.401(2)(c))

Possess Controlled Substance that is a
Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or
V or Nonnarcotic from Schedule
I-V (RCW 69.50.4013)

Possession of Controlled Substance
that is either heroin or narcotics
from Schedule I or II (RCW
69.50.4013)

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug
Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) This act applies retroactively to
offenses committed between July 1, 2003, and the effective date of this
section. To this extent, this act applies retroactively, but in all
other respects it applies prospectively to offenses committed on or
after the effective date of this section.
(2)(a) The legislature intends that every offender serving, on or
after the effective date of this section, a term of total confinement
within the standard range for an offense that has a seriousness level
of III under RCW 9.94A.518 solely because the offense had a deadly
weapon special verdict under RCW 9.94A.602 shall be resentenced, as
promptly as practicable, pursuant to the amendments made in sections 2
and 3 of this act.
(b) Such an offender shall be resentenced as follows:
(i) An offender who was originally sentenced to total confinement
for a period within the standard range under RCW 9.94A.517 for an
offense that has a seriousness level of III solely because the offense
had a deadly weapon special verdict under RCW 9.94A.602 shall be
resentenced to total confinement within the standard range under RCW
9.94A.517 if the amendments made in section 2 or 3 of this act would
result in the seriousness level of the offense being lowered.
(ii) The new term of confinement shall be calculated at the same
relative point within the new standard range that the original term of
confinement occupied within the original standard range, so that the
new term corresponds to the original term as a percentage of the
interval between the top and bottom of the applicable range.
(c) The department of corrections and agencies operating county
jails shall identify offenders eligible for resentencing under this
section and in each case notify the sentencing court and the offender.
To facilitate resentencing of offenders under this section, the
legislature requests that the supreme court authorize one or more
superior court judges to perform judicial duties in other superior
courts, under Article III, section (2)(a) of the state Constitution.
(3) If resentencing under this section results in a term of
confinement of twelve months or less for an offender who was confined
in the custody of the department of corrections under the original
sentence, the offender shall serve the remainder of the new term in the
custody of the department of corrections.
(4) In no case shall the resentencing under this section result in
the offender serving a greater term of total confinement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1,
2004.

--- END ---