BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.92.151 and 1990 c 3 s 201 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The sentence of a prisoner confined in a county jail facility
for a felony, gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor conviction may be
reduced by earned release credits in accordance with procedures that
shall be developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction. The earned early release time shall be for good behavior
and good performance as determined by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction. Any program established pursuant to this section shall
allow an offender to earn early release credits for presentence
incarceration. The correctional agency shall not credit the offender
with earned early release credits in advance of the offender actually
earning the credits.
(2) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense or a sex offense that is a class A felony committed on or after
July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2004, the aggregate earned early
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In the
case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense or a sex
offense that is a class A felony committed on or after July 1, 2004,
the aggregate earned release time may not exceed ten percent of the
sentence.
(3)(a) In the case of an offender who qualifies under (b) of this
subsection, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed fifty
percent.
(b) An offender may be granted up to fifty percent of aggregate
earned release time under this subsection (3) if he or she:
(i) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(A) A sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(B) A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) An offense that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
and
(ii) Has no prior conviction for:
(A) A sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(B) A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) An offense that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor).
(c) The correctional agency having jurisdiction may recalculate the
earned release time and reschedule the expected release date for each
qualified offender under this subsection (3).
(d) This subsection (3) applies retroactively to eligible offenders
serving terms of total confinement in a county jail facility as of July
1, 2004.
(4) In no other case may the aggregate earned early release time
exceed one-third of the total sentence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature declares that the changes to the maximum
percentages of earned release time in this act do not create any
expectation that the percentage of earned release time cannot be
revised and offenders have no reason to conclude that the maximum
percentage of earned release time is an entitlement or creates any
liberty interest. The legislature retains full control over the right
to revise the percentages of earned release time available to offenders
at any time. This section applies to persons convicted on or after the
effective date of this section.

--- END ---