BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that contact between
children in foster care and their biological families is an important
component of the well-being and successful development of children.
Visitation can help to alleviate the fears and anxieties that many
children in foster care experience, and thereby can improve relations
and interactions between the children and both their foster and
biological families. Visitation can also improve the likelihood of
successful, lasting reunifications by providing the framework for the
development of appropriate parent-child relationships.
In all cases, the best interest of the child shall be the primary
concern in planning visitation with families. When planning visitation
with families, appropriate levels of visitation should be determined
for each family, taking into consideration their individual
circumstances, including parental follow-through and the parent-child
bond, among other factors, and consistent with the health, safety, and
welfare of the child. Under no circumstances should visitation be used
as a sanction for a parent's failure to engage in other court-ordered
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall develop
consistent policies and protocols, based on current relevant research,
concerning visitation for children in foster care to be implemented
consistently throughout the state. The department shall develop the
policies and protocols in consultation with researchers in the field,
community-based agencies, court-appointed special advocates, and court
representatives. The policies and protocols shall include, but not be
limited to: The structure and quality of visitations; and training for
caseworkers, visitation supervisors, and foster parents related to
visitation.
The policies and protocols shall be consistent with the provisions
of this chapter and implementation of the policies and protocols shall
be consistent with relevant orders of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of social and health services
shall report on the policies and protocols required under section 2 of
this act to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1,
2005.

--- END ---