BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that families of
children who are involved in the child welfare system should play an
integral role in the decision-making process surrounding planning for
those children. It is anticipated that involving families in decision
making will result in better outcomes for children, specifically by
reducing the number of out-of-home placements, reducing the incidence
of behavioral, physical, and mental health problems for individual
children, and, for those children in out-of-home placements, reducing
the number of placements for individual children, increasing the
likelihood of placing individual children with siblings, and increasing
successful reunifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 2 through
6 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Family member" means any person to whom the child is related
by blood, adoption, or marriage, including marriages that have been
dissolved, or any other individual to whom the child is not related but
who has been identified as having a significant relationship with the
child. "Family member" includes, but is not limited to: Parents;
stepparents; any person denoted by the prefix "grand" or "great";
siblings, whether full, half, or step; aunts and uncles; nephews and
nieces; and cousins. "Family member" includes a child twelve years of
age or older or, when appropriate, a child younger than twelve years of
age.
(2) "Family team decision meeting" means a family-focused
intervention facilitated by dedicated professional staff that is
designed to build and strengthen the natural caregiving system for the
child. Family team decision meetings may include family group
conferences, family unity meetings, family mediation, or other
professionally recognized interventions that include extended family
and rely upon the family to make decisions about planning for its
children. The purpose of the family team decision meeting is to
establish a plan that provides for the safety, attachment, and
permanency needs of the child.
(3) "Reasonable inquiries" means efforts that involve reviewing the
case file for relevant information, contacting the parents or guardians
of the child, and contacting additional sources of information that may
lead to ascertaining the whereabouts of family members, if necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall establish as
a goal the use of a family team decision meeting in each case in which
a child is involved in the child welfare system.
(2) When the department determines that the use of a family team
decision meeting is appropriate, an initial meeting shall be held as
soon as possible following a child's involvement in the child welfare
system with subsequent meetings being held at key decision points
relating to the child, as appropriate.
(3) If the department elects not to conduct a family team decision
meeting, the reasons for that decision shall be clearly documented in
the written service plan of the child developed by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the department of social and health services determines that
the use of a family team decision meeting is appropriate, the
department shall conduct and document reasonable inquiries to promptly
locate and notify the parents, grandparents, and any other family
members who have a significant relationship with the child.
(2) All family members notified by the department may attend the
meeting unless the department determines that the safety of any
attendee will be compromised by the attendance of any family member.
(3) Any family member who the department deems a safety risk may
provide written statements that address the subject of any family team
decision meeting, including the determination of placement of the child
or components of a service plan for the child and family members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the department of social and health services conducts a
family team decision meeting, the meeting shall result in the
development of a written family plan that may include service
recommendations, placement recommendations, and a permanency plan. The
family plan shall include the following:
(a) The expectations of the parents of the child and other family
members;
(b) Services the department will provide;
(c) Timelines for implementation of the plan;
(d) The benefits of compliance with the plan;
(e) The consequences of noncompliance with the plan; and
(f) A schedule of subsequent meetings, if appropriate.
(2) Any family member participating in a family team decision
meeting shall sign a written acknowledgment of the content of the
family plan developed at the family team decision meeting and that
family member's attendance at the meeting.
(3) The department shall incorporate the family plan developed at
the family team decision meeting into the department's service plan for
the child to the extent that the family plan protects the child, builds
on family strengths, and is focused on achieving permanency for the
child within a reasonable time.
(4) If the family plan is not incorporated into the department's
service plan for the child, the department shall document the reasons
in the service plan.
(5) The department shall send a copy of the family plan to the
family participants, including those family members who participated by
written statement pursuant to section 4(3) of this act, no later than
twenty-one days after the conclusion of the family team decision
meeting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
Family team decision meetings shall be conducted in accordance with
sections 2 through 5 of this act throughout the state by January 1,
2005.

--- END ---