BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
An insurer licensed to write homeowner's insurance in this state
shall not deny an application for a homeowner's insurance policy, or
cancel, refuse to renew, or modify an existing homeowner's insurance
policy for the principal reason that the applicant or insured is a
foster parent licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.

--- END ---