BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.28.170 and 2002 c 290 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties may establish and operate drug courts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "drug court" means a court
that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a reduction
in recidivism and substance abuse among nonviolent, substance abusing
offenders by increasing their likelihood for successful rehabilitation
through early, continuous, and intense judicially supervised treatment;
mandatory periodic drug testing; and the use of appropriate sanctions
and other rehabilitation services.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
drug court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding received from the office of
national drug control policy that is available to support the
operations of its drug court and associated services; and
(ii) Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated
for drug court programs with local cash or in-kind resources. Moneys
allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant, other
federal, state, and local funds for drug court operations and
associated services.
(b) Any county that establishes a drug court pursuant to this
section shall establish minimum requirements for the participation of
offenders in the program. The drug court may adopt local requirements
that are more stringent than the minimum. The minimum requirements
are:
(i) The offender would benefit from substance abuse treatment;
(ii) The offender has not previously been convicted of a serious
violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and
(iii) Without regard to whether proof of any of these elements is
required to convict, the offender is not currently charged with or
convicted of an offense:
(A) That is a sex offense;
(B) That is a serious violent offense;
(C) During which the defendant used a firearm; or
(D) During which the defendant caused substantial or great bodily
harm or death to another person.
(4) Subject to the requirements established by the drug court under
subsection (3)(b) of this section, an offender may make a motion to a
court for admission into drug court.

--- END ---