BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the support of
Washington's agriculture industry and its family farms by the citizens
of the state of Washington is beneficial to the economy of the state.
The legislature also finds that Washington farmers produce a variety of
wholesome, quality products and are good stewards of the land.
The legislature also finds that the from the heart of Washington
program, developed by the Washington state department of agriculture
with one-time federal grant moneys, is a valuable tool to convey
important messages about Washington agriculture and to encourage
Washington citizens to buy Washington-grown and Washington-processed
food and agricultural products. With the exhaustion of the one-time
federal grant funding, the legislature finds that the program would
benefit from a new governance structure that will allow the necessary
operational flexibility to enable the program to expand and to
encourage private investment in the program, and that the continuance
of the program as a private, nonprofit corporation is the best method
to achieve these goals.
The legislature further finds that the continuation of the from the
heart of Washington program will provide both direct and indirect
economic benefits to the people of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "From the heart of Washington" or "program" means that program
created by the department to encourage Washington citizens to purchase
Washington food and agricultural products and to promote the value of
agriculture and family farms to Washington state.
(2) "Successor organization" means a private, nonprofit corporation
created specifically to assume responsibility for carrying out the from
the heart of Washington program that is now part of the department.
The private, nonprofit corporation must qualify as a tax-exempt,
nonprofit corporation under section 501(c) of the federal internal
revenue code; the majority of members on its board of directors must be
from Washington commodity commissions, nonprofit associations organized
for the promotion of Washington agricultural products, and other
agricultural industry groups; and the corporation must carry forward
with the work of the current program.
(3) "Department" means the Washington state department of
agriculture.
(4) "Director" means the director of the Washington state
department of agriculture.
(5) "Fiscal agent" means the Washington state fruit commission, as
a contractor of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department may cooperate with other
agencies, boards, commissions, and associations in the state of
Washington to establish a private, nonprofit corporation for the
purpose of carrying out the program. The nonprofit corporation must be
organized under chapter 24.03 RCW and has the powers granted under that
chapter. However, this chapter does not prohibit the department or
other agencies, boards, commissions, and associations from separately
continuing to promote Washington products under their existing
authorities.
(2) The department may contract with the successor organization to
carry out the program. The contract must require the successor
organization to aggressively seek to fund its continued operation from
nonstate funding sources.
(3) The successor organization must report to the department each
January 1st on the amounts it has secured from both nonstate and state
funding sources, its operations, and its programs.
(4) Debts and other liabilities of the successor organization are
successor organization debts and liabilities only and may be satisfied
only from the resources of the successor organization. The state of
Washington is not liable for the debts or liabilities of the successor
organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In order to accomplish the establishment of
a successor organization, the department and its fiscal agent may take
all necessary and proper steps, including:
(1) Transferring any equipment, software, data base, other assets
except the logo of the program, or contracts for services to the
successor organization under appropriate terms and conditions,
including reasonable compensation deemed appropriate by the department.
The department shall retain the right to repossess any property
transferred to the successor organization in the event that the
successor organization dissolves, becomes bankrupt, insolvent, or is
otherwise unable to carry out the program, or if the successor
organization fails to comply with any contract with the department. In
the event that the department exercises its right to repossess under
this section, any property returned to the department becomes the
property of the state and is administered by the department;
(2) Unless otherwise provided by agreement, assigning any contracts
and other duties and responsibilities to the successor organization
related to the program; and
(3) Providing necessary support services to the successor
organization under contract for up to a two-year period after the
effective date of a contract between a successor organization and the
department for the delivery of program services. The successor
organization shall provide full reimbursement for all costs of services
contracted for under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department shall designate one or
more persons to serve in the capacity of a member of the board of
directors of the successor organization. The state is not liable under
any circumstances for the acts of the successor organization, any
member of its board of directors, or its employees.
(2) The department may pay an annual membership fee to the
successor organization not to exceed the value of services received.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The logo of the program is the property of
the department. The department may license the use of the logo to the
successor organization and others, as it deems appropriate. The
department retains the right to cancel any license to use the logo.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department may receive gifts, grants, or
endowments from private or public sources that are made from time to
time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of
the program. The department may spend or contract with the successor
organization to spend the gifts, grants, or endowments or income from
the private or public sources according to their terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---