BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 8.24.010 and 1913 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An owner, or one entitled to the beneficial use, of land which
is so situate with respect to the land of another that it is necessary
for its proper use and enjoyment to have and maintain a private way of
necessity or to construct and maintain any drain, flume or ditch, on,
across, over or through the land of such other, for agricultural,
domestic or sanitary purposes, may condemn and take lands of such other
sufficient in area for the construction and maintenance of such private
way of necessity, or for the construction and maintenance of such
drain, flume or ditch, as the case may be.
(2) The term "private way of necessity," as used in this chapter,
shall mean and include a right of way on, across, over or through the
land of another for means of ingress and egress, and the construction
and maintenance thereon of roads, logging roads, flumes, canals,
ditches, tunnels, tramways and other structures upon, over and through
which timber, stone, minerals or other valuable materials and products
may be transported and carried.
(3) The term "land," as used in this chapter, includes state-owned
land that is administered, managed, or operated by the department of
natural resources, department of fish and wildlife, or state parks and
recreation commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 8.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An owner, or one entitled to the beneficial use, of land who
has condemned state-owned land as defined in RCW 79.02.010 according to
the requirements of this chapter may bring an action for acts that
wrongfully preclude or interfere with the use of the private way of
necessity obtained according to this chapter. The action authorized by
this section may be brought against the department of natural
resources, department of fish and wildlife, state parks and recreation
commission, or any employee, official, or agent of these state agencies
acting in his or her official capacity or within the scope of his or
her duties.
(2) An owner, or one entitled to the beneficial use, of land who
prevails in an action authorized by this section shall be awarded
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

--- END ---