BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.32.200 and 1988 c 192 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The declaration ((may)) shall (a) provide for the collection of
all sums assessed by the association of apartment owners for the share
of the common expenses chargeable to any apartment, and (b) state the
formulas or methods used in establishing the allocation of these
expenses among the apartment owners. The formulas or methods required
under this subsection must result in an allocation of the common
expenses among the apartment owners that is reasonable and equitable.
(2) The collection of the assessments for common expenses allowed
under subsection (1) of this section may be enforced in any manner
provided in the declaration including but not limited to (a) ten days
notice shall be given the delinquent apartment owner to the effect that
unless such assessment is paid within ten days any or all utility
services will be forthwith severed and shall remain severed until such
assessment is paid, or (b) collection of such assessment may be made by
such lawful method of enforcement, judicial or extra-judicial, as may
be provided in the declaration and/or bylaws.
(((2))) (3) All sums assessed by the association of apartment
owners but unpaid for the share of the common expenses chargeable to
any apartment shall constitute a lien on such apartment prior to all
other liens except only (a) tax liens on the apartment in favor of any
assessing unit and/or special district, and (b) all sums unpaid on all
mortgages of record. Such lien is not subject to the ban against
execution or forced sales of homesteads under RCW 6.13.080 and may be
foreclosed by suit by the manager or board of directors, acting on
behalf of the apartment owners, in like manner as a mortgage of real
property. In any such foreclosure the apartment owner shall be
required to pay a reasonable rental for the apartment, if so provided
in the bylaws, and the plaintiff in such foreclosures shall be entitled
to the appointment of a receiver to collect the same. The manager or
board of directors, acting on behalf of the apartment owners, shall
have power, unless prohibited by the declaration, to bid on the
apartment at foreclosure sale, and to acquire and hold, lease, mortgage
and convey the same. Upon an express waiver in the complaint of any
right to a deficiency judgment, the period of redemption shall be eight
months after the sale. Suit to recover any judgment for any unpaid
common expenses shall be maintainable without foreclosing or waiving
the liens securing the same.
(((3))) (4) Where the mortgagee of a mortgage of record or other
purchaser of an apartment obtains possession of the apartment as a
result of foreclosure of the mortgage, such possessor, his successors
and assigns shall not be liable for the share of the common expenses or
assessments by the association of apartment owners chargeable to such
apartment which became due prior to such possession. Such unpaid share
of common expenses of assessments shall be deemed to be common expenses
collectible from all of the apartment owners including such possessor,
his successors and assigns.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 64.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The principles of law and equity, including the law of corporations
and unincorporated associations, the law of real property, and the law
relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, condemnation,
estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake,
receivership, substantial performance, or other validating or
invalidating cause supplement the provisions of this chapter, except to
the extent inconsistent with this chapter.

--- END ---