BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.192 and 2001 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 77.15.194
through 77.15.198 and sections 5 and 6 of this act.
(1) "Animal" means any nonhuman vertebrate.
(2) "Body-gripping trap" means a trap that grips an animal's body
or body part. Body-gripping trap includes, but is not limited to,
steel-jawed leghold traps, padded-jaw leghold traps, Conibear traps,
neck snares, and nonstrangling foot snares. Cage and box traps,
suitcase-type live beaver traps, and common rat ((and)), mouse, gopher,
and mole traps are not considered body-gripping traps.
(3) "Person" means a human being and, where appropriate, a public
or private corporation, an unincorporated association, a partnership,
a government, or a governmental instrumentality.
(4) "Raw fur" means a pelt that has not been processed for purposes
of retail sale.
(5) "Animal problem" means any animal that threatens or damages
either timber or public or private property or threatens or injures
livestock or any other domestic animal.
(6) "Mountain beaver" means the species Aplodontia rufa.
(7) "Conibear trap" includes traps sold under the brand name
"Conibear," as well as traps with similar function and design sold
under a different brand name.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.194 and 2001 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) It is unlawful to use or authorize the use of any steel-jawed
leghold trap, neck snare, or other body-gripping trap to capture any
mammal for recreation or commerce in fur.
(2) It is unlawful to knowingly buy, sell, barter, or otherwise
exchange, or offer to buy, sell, barter, or otherwise exchange the raw
fur of a mammal or a mammal that has been trapped in this state with a
steel-jawed leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap, whether or
not pursuant to permit.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section,
and sections 5 and 6 of this act, it is unlawful to use or authorize
the use of any steel-jawed leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap
to capture any animal((, except as provided in subsections (4) and (5)
of this section)).
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the use of a Conibear trap in
water, a padded leghold trap, or a nonstrangling type foot snare with
a special permit granted by (([the])) the director under (a) through
(d) of this subsection. Issuance of the special permits shall be
governed by rules adopted by the department and in accordance with the
requirements of this section. Every person granted a special permit to
use a trap or device listed in this subsection shall check the trap or
device at least every twenty-four hours.
(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the director, in consultation
with the department of social and health services or the United States
department of health and human services from granting a permit to use
traps listed in this subsection for the purpose of protecting people
from threats to their health and safety.
(b) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to use traps listed in this subsection to a person who
applies for such a permit in writing, and who establishes that there
exists on a property an animal problem that has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by the use of nonlethal control tools, including but
not limited to guard animals, electric fencing, or box and cage traps,
or if such nonlethal means cannot be reasonably applied. Upon making
a finding in writing that the animal problem has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by nonlethal control tools or if the tools cannot be
reasonably applied, the director may authorize the use, setting,
placing, or maintenance of the traps for a period not to exceed thirty
days.
(c) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to department employees or agents to use traps listed in
this subsection where the use of the traps is the only practical means
of protecting threatened or endangered species as designated under RCW
77.08.010.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from issuing a
permit to use traps listed in this subsection, excluding Conibear
traps, for the conduct of legitimate wildlife research.
(5) Nothing in this section prohibits the United States fish and
wildlife service, its employees or agents, from using a trap listed in
subsection (4) of this section where the fish and wildlife service
determines, in consultation with the director, that the use of such
traps is necessary to protect species listed as threatened or
endangered under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec.
1531 et seq.).

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.194 and 2003 c 53 s 374 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful to use or authorize the use of any steel-jawed
leghold trap, neck snare, or other body-gripping trap to capture any
mammal for recreation or commerce in fur.
(2) It is unlawful to knowingly buy, sell, barter, or otherwise
exchange, or offer to buy, sell, barter, or otherwise exchange the raw
fur of a mammal or a mammal that has been trapped in this state with a
steel-jawed leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap, whether or
not pursuant to permit.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section,
and sections 5 and 6 of this act, it is unlawful to use or authorize
the use of any steel-jawed leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap
to capture any animal((, except as provided in subsections (4) and (5)
of this section)).
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the use of a Conibear trap in
water, a padded leghold trap, or a nonstrangling type foot snare with
a special permit granted by the director under (a) through (d) of this
subsection. Issuance of the special permits shall be governed by rules
adopted by the department and in accordance with the requirements of
this section. Every person granted a special permit to use a trap or
device listed in this subsection shall check the trap or device at
least every twenty-four hours.
(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the director, in consultation
with the department of social and health services or the United States
department of health and human services from granting a permit to use
traps listed in this subsection for the purpose of protecting people
from threats to their health and safety.
(b) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to use traps listed in this subsection to a person who
applies for such a permit in writing, and who establishes that there
exists on a property an animal problem that has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by the use of nonlethal control tools, including but
not limited to guard animals, electric fencing, or box and cage traps,
or if such nonlethal means cannot be reasonably applied. Upon making
a finding in writing that the animal problem has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by nonlethal control tools or if the tools cannot be
reasonably applied, the director may authorize the use, setting,
placing, or maintenance of the traps for a period not to exceed thirty
days.
(c) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to department employees or agents to use traps listed in
this subsection where the use of the traps is the only practical means
of protecting threatened or endangered species as designated under RCW
77.08.010.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from issuing a
permit to use traps listed in this subsection, excluding Conibear
traps, for the conduct of legitimate wildlife research.
(5) Nothing in this section prohibits the United States fish and
wildlife service, its employees or agents, from using a trap listed in
subsection (4) of this section where the fish and wildlife service
determines, in consultation with the director, that the use of such
traps is necessary to protect species listed as threatened or
endangered under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec.
1531 et seq.).
(6) A person violating this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
Any trapping allowed under RCW 77.15.194 or section 6 or 7 of this
act must be consistent with other applicable provisions of this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director may issue a special trapping permit during the
livestock birthing season to a person who applies for such a permit in
writing, and establishes that there exists on his or her property an
individual coyote, or an identified group of coyotes, that is either
causing injury, or is a threat to cause injury, to commercial livestock
during the birthing season of that species of livestock.
(2) The special trapping permit authorized by this section may be
issued upon a written finding by the director that a threat of injury
to livestock exists, and may authorize the use, setting, placing, or
maintenance of a padded leghold trap or a nonstrangling type foot snare
for a period not to exceed thirty days in order to capture the
identified coyote or coyotes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The owner or operator of commercial timber, as those terms are
defined in RCW 76.09.020, may use a number 110 Conibear trap to trap
mountain beaver if nonlethal control tools, including but not limited
to fencing, electrical fencing, or tree-wrapping, cannot be reasonably
applied.
(2) Any individual mountain beavers trapped under this section, and
the approximate location of the trapping, must be reported to the
department on an annual basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this act prohibits the buying, selling, bartering, or
other exchange of the raw fur of a mammal that has been trapped in this
state under this title and the rules adopted by the commission, unless
the mammal was captured by a body-gripping trap, as that term is
defined in RCW 77.15.192.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The department of fish and wildlife
shall conduct a series of statewide public outreach and education
efforts during the 2004 calendar year that explain the availability and
function of the special permits allowed under RCW 77.15.194 and
sections 5 and 6 of this act.
(2) By December 31, 2004, the department of fish and wildlife must
report back to the appropriate committees of the legislature with a
summary of the educational and outreach efforts undertaken under this
section and a summary of the data collected on all catch reports. In
order to satisfy the reporting requirement of this subsection, the
department of fish and wildlife must collect from each permitted
trapper in the state information relating to trapping success,
including the number, general location, and species of all animals
captured, and a count of those animals captured that were not covered
by the permit.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The legislative furbearer study group is
created to meet during the interim between the 2004 and 2005
legislative sessions.
(2) The study group is composed of four members, appointed as
follows:
(a) One member from each caucus of the Washington state house of
representatives, selected by the speaker of the house of
representatives, from the membership of the house of representatives
fisheries, ecology, and parks committee; and
(b) One member from each caucus of the Washington state senate,
selected by the president of the senate, from the membership of the
senate parks, fish, and wildlife committee.
(3) The study group shall limit its activities to investigating the
issues and options associated with the proper treatment and ultimate
disposition of animal pelts and carcasses lawfully captured and killed
by a body-gripping trap. Issues that the study group may explore
include the proper ownership of pelts captured by body-gripping traps,
the role of such pelts in modern commerce, the costs associated with
prohibitions on pelt sales, and the possibility of creating economic
incentives that favor lethal trapping methods over nonlethal methods if
pelts obtained from use of a body-gripping trap were allowed to be sold
by the trapper or landowner.
(4) The study group will report to the legislature by December 31,
2004, with its recommendations, if any, in the form of suggested
legislation.
(5) Staff to the study group will be provided by the office of
program research and senate committee services.
(6) This section expires January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Section 2 of this act expires July 1,
2004.
(2) Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Except for section 3 of this act, this act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---