BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the bundling of
state contracts provides an impediment for many of the state's small
businesses to compete for state contracts. The legislature further
finds that the development of the state's economy depends on the
nurturing and growth of the state's small businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall require the competitive bidding of all
subcontracts on public construction projects of at least ten million
dollars that are awarded to general contractors based on a competitive
bid process.
(2) The department shall work with general contractors on
advertising subcontract bid opportunities to Washington businesses,
including providing access to the state contractor prequalification
list and the office of minority and women's business enterprises
certified minority and women's businesses list.

--- END ---