BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No county or city may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance,
development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy,
or administrative practice that prohibits the owner of a residential
dwelling with potentially flammable roofing material from trimming or
removing trees or vegetation surrounding the dwelling in all directions
in an area equal to the maximum site potential tree height for fire
suppression purposes.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "site potential tree height"
means a distance equal to the height of the tallest tree that can grow
on that site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No city or town may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance,
development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy,
or administrative practice that prohibits the owner of a residential
dwelling with potentially flammable roofing material from trimming or
removing trees or vegetation surrounding the dwelling in all directions
in an area equal to the maximum site potential tree height for fire
suppression purposes.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "site potential tree height"
means a distance equal to the height of the tallest tree that can grow
on that site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No county or city may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance,
development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy,
or administrative practice that prohibits the owner of a residential
dwelling with potentially flammable roofing material from trimming or
removing trees or vegetation surrounding the dwelling in all directions
in an area equal to the maximum site potential tree height for fire
suppression purposes.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "site potential tree height"
means a distance equal to the height of the tallest tree that can grow
on that site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No city may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance,
development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy,
or administrative practice that prohibits the owner of a residential
dwelling with potentially flammable roofing material from trimming or
removing trees or vegetation surrounding the dwelling in all directions
in an area equal to the maximum site potential tree height for fire
suppression purposes.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "site potential tree height"
means a distance equal to the height of the tallest tree that can grow
on that site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No county may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance,
development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy,
or administrative practice that prohibits the owner of a residential
dwelling with potentially flammable roofing material from trimming or
removing trees or vegetation surrounding the dwelling in all directions
in an area equal to the maximum site potential tree height for fire
suppression purposes.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "site potential tree height"
means a distance equal to the height of the tallest tree that can grow
on that site.

--- END ---