BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.28.010 and 1965 c 92 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The sheriff is the chief executive officer and conservator of the
peace of the county. In the execution of his office, he and his
deputies:
(1) Shall arrest and commit to prison all persons who break the
peace, or attempt to break it, and all persons guilty of public
offenses;
(2) Shall defend the county against those who, by riot or
otherwise, endanger the public peace or safety;
(3) Shall execute the process and orders of the courts of justice
or judicial officers, when delivered for that purpose, according to
law;
(4) Shall execute all warrants delivered for that purpose by other
public officers, according to the provisions of particular statutes;
(5) Shall attend the sessions of the courts of record held within
the county, and obey their lawful orders or directions;
(6) Shall keep and preserve the peace in their respective counties,
and quiet and suppress all affrays, riots, unlawful assemblies and
insurrections, for which purpose, and for the service of process in
civil or criminal cases, and in apprehending or securing any person for
felony or breach of the peace, they may call to their aid such persons,
or power of their county as they may deem necessary;
(7) Shall investigate, upon formal request by a county executive,
county prosecutor, or county legislative body, or by a municipal
executive, municipal attorney, or municipal legislative body,
allegations of bribery, corruption, fraud, or other forms of crimes,
malfeasance, or misconduct on the part of any elected or appointed
official or officer of the county or municipality.

--- END ---