BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the people of
this state do not yield their sovereignty to the agencies that serve
them, that one of the most fundamental principles of a free people is
that citizens are presumed innocent of wrongdoing until proven guilty,
and that due process requires that government bear the burden of
establishing a person's guilt, not that the citizen bears the burden of
proving his or her innocence. The legislature further finds that
citizens generally lack the resources that state agencies have at their
disposal to defend administrative rules that may have been adopted
unlawfully and are therefore invalid because of agency noncompliance
with proper administrative procedures, that may violate constitutional
provisions, that may exceed the agency's statutory authority, or that
may be arbitrary and capricious. The legislature further finds that in
order to enhance the faith, credibility, and trust of the people in
government, it is necessary and proper to place the burden upon state
agencies, not individual citizens, to demonstrate that the
administrative rules they adopt are lawful and valid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An agency may not adopt a proposed rule unless the legislature
has had the opportunity to consider the proposed rule during a regular
session or special legislative session as defined in Article II,
section 12 of the state Constitution. For purposes of this section,
the legislature has had the opportunity to consider a proposed rule
after the adjournment of:
(a) For proposed rules published in the state register on or before
the first day of November in a calendar year, the regular session and
any special legislative session in the calendar year after the year in
which the rule was published; or
(b) For proposed rules published in the state register after the
first day of November in a calendar year, the regular session and any
special legislative session in the second calendar year after the year
in which the rule was published.
(2) An agency seeking to adopt a proposed rule shall submit a copy
of the rule, along with the summary and responses required by RCW
34.05.325(6), to the chief clerk of the house of representatives and
the secretary of the senate by the fifteenth day of January after the
convening of the regular session in the calendar year required by
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) This section does not apply to:
(a) Emergency rules adopted in accordance with RCW 34.05.350; and
(b) Rules adopted by the department of fish and wildlife
establishing hunting and fishing seasons under RCW 77.12.047 and
77.12.150.
(4) This section applies only to proposed rules that are published
in the state register after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
When delegating authority to an agency through legislation, the
legislature, unless it specifically states otherwise, limits its
delegation of authority to:
(1) The minimum delegation necessary to administer the
legislation's clear and unambiguous directives; and
(2) The administration of circumstances and behaviors foreseeable
at the time of the legislation's enactment.

Sec. 4 RCW 34.05.570 and 1995 c 403 s 802 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Generally. Except to the extent that this chapter or another
statute provides otherwise:
(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and except
that an agency bears the burden of demonstrating that the agency action
was authorized by law, the burden of demonstrating the invalidity of
agency action is on the party asserting invalidity;
(b) The validity of agency action shall be determined in accordance
with the standards of review provided in this section, as applied to
the agency action at the time it was taken;
(c) The court shall make a separate and distinct ruling on each
material issue on which the court's decision is based; and
(d) The court shall grant relief only if it determines that a
person seeking judicial relief has been substantially prejudiced by the
action complained of.
(2) Review of rules. (a) A rule may be reviewed by petition for
declaratory judgment filed pursuant to this subsection or in the
context of any other review proceeding under this section. In an
action challenging the validity of a rule, the agency shall be made a
party to the proceeding.
(b) The validity of any rule may be determined upon petition for a
declaratory judgment addressed to the superior court of ((Thurston))
any county, when it appears that the rule, or its threatened
application, interferes with or impairs or immediately threatens to
interfere with or impair the legal rights or privileges of the
petitioner. When the validity of a rule is challenged, after the
petitioner has identified probable defects in the rule, the burden of
going forward with the evidence is on the agency to establish validity.
The declaratory judgment order may be entered whether or not the
petitioner has first requested the agency to pass upon the validity of
the rule in question.
(c) In a proceeding involving review of a rule, the court shall
declare the rule invalid only if it finds that: The rule violates
constitutional provisions; the rule exceeds the statutory authority of
the agency; the rule was adopted without compliance with statutory
rule-making procedures; or the rule is arbitrary and capricious.
(3) Review of agency orders in adjudicative proceedings. The court
shall grant relief from an agency order in an adjudicative proceeding
only if it determines that:
(a) The order, or the statute or rule on which the order is based,
is in violation of constitutional provisions on its face or as applied;
(b) The order is outside the statutory authority or jurisdiction of
the agency conferred by any provision of law;
(c) The agency has engaged in unlawful procedure or decision-making
process, or has failed to follow a prescribed procedure;
(d) The agency has erroneously interpreted or applied the law;
(e) The order is not supported by evidence that is substantial when
viewed in light of the whole record before the court, which includes
the agency record for judicial review, supplemented by any additional
evidence received by the court under this chapter;
(f) The agency has not decided all issues requiring resolution by
the agency;
(g) A motion for disqualification under RCW 34.05.425 or 34.12.050
was made and was improperly denied or, if no motion was made, facts are
shown to support the grant of such a motion that were not known and
were not reasonably discoverable by the challenging party at the
appropriate time for making such a motion;
(h) The order is inconsistent with a rule of the agency unless the
agency explains the inconsistency by stating facts and reasons to
demonstrate a rational basis for inconsistency; ((or))
(i) The order is arbitrary or capricious; or
(j) The order is based on a de facto rule.
(4) Review of other agency action.
(a) All agency action not reviewable under subsection (2) or (3) of
this section shall be reviewed under this subsection.
(b) A person whose rights are violated by an agency's failure to
perform a duty that is required by law to be performed may file a
petition for review pursuant to RCW 34.05.514, seeking an order
pursuant to this subsection requiring performance. Within twenty days
after service of the petition for review, the agency shall file and
serve an answer to the petition, made in the same manner as an answer
to a complaint in a civil action. The court may hear evidence,
pursuant to RCW 34.05.562, on material issues of fact raised by the
petition and answer.
(c) Relief for persons aggrieved by the performance of an agency
action, including the exercise of discretion, or an action under (b) of
this subsection can be granted only if the court determines that the
action is:
(i) Unconstitutional;
(ii) Outside the statutory authority of the agency or the authority
conferred by a provision of law;
(iii) Arbitrary or capricious; ((or))
(iv) Taken by persons who were not properly constituted as agency
officials lawfully entitled to take such action; or
(v) Based on a de facto rule.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.300.040 and 1999 c 348 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the
powers and duties of the superintendent of public instruction shall be:
(1) To have supervision over all matters pertaining to the public
schools of the state;
(2) To report to the governor and the legislature such information
and data as may be required for the management and improvement of the
schools;
(3) To prepare and have printed such forms, registers, courses of
study, rules for the government of the common schools, and such other
material and books as may be necessary for the discharge of the duties
of teachers and officials charged with the administration of the laws
relating to the common schools, and to distribute the same to
educational service district superintendents;
(4) To travel, without neglecting his or her other official duties
as superintendent of public instruction, for the purpose of attending
educational meetings or conventions, of visiting schools, of consulting
educational service district superintendents or other school officials;
(5) To prepare and from time to time to revise a manual of the
Washington state common school code, copies of which shall be provided
in such numbers as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction at no cost to those public agencies within the common
school system and which shall be sold at approximate actual cost of
publication and distribution per volume to all other public and
nonpublic agencies or individuals, said manual to contain Titles 28A
and 28C RCW, rules related to the common schools, and such other matter
as the state superintendent or the state board of education shall
determine. Proceeds of the sale of such code shall be transmitted to
the public printer who shall credit the state superintendent's account
within the state printing plant revolving fund by a like amount;
(6) To act as ex officio member and the chief executive officer of
the state board of education;
(7) To file all papers, reports and public documents transmitted to
the superintendent by the school officials of the several counties or
districts of the state, each year separately. Copies of all papers
filed in the superintendent's office, and the superintendent's official
acts, may, or upon request, shall be certified by the superintendent
and attested by the superintendent's official seal, and when so
certified shall be evidence of the papers or acts so certified to;
(8) To require annually, on or before the 15th day of August, of
the president, manager, or principal of every educational institution
in this state, a report as required by the superintendent of public
instruction; and it is the duty of every president, manager, or
principal, to complete and return such forms within such time as the
superintendent of public instruction shall direct;
(9) To keep in the superintendent's office a record of all teachers
receiving certificates to teach in the common schools of this state;
(10) To issue certificates as provided by law;
(11) To keep in the superintendent's office at the capital of the
state, all books and papers pertaining to the business of the
superintendent's office, and to keep and preserve in the
superintendent's office a complete record of statistics, as well as a
record of the meetings of the state board of education;
(12) With the assistance of the office of the attorney general, to
decide all points of law which may be submitted to the superintendent
in writing by any educational service district superintendent, or that
may be submitted to the superintendent by any other person, upon appeal
from the decision of any educational service district superintendent;
and the superintendent shall publish his or her rulings and decisions
from time to time for the information of school officials and teachers;
and the superintendent's decision shall be final unless set aside by a
court of competent jurisdiction;
(13) To administer oaths and affirmations in the discharge of the
superintendent's official duties;
(14) To deliver to his or her successor, at the expiration of the
superintendent's term of office, all records, books, maps, documents
and papers of whatever kind belonging to the superintendent's office or
which may have been received by the superintendent's for the use of the
superintendent's office;
(15) To administer family services and programs to promote the
state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025;
(16) To perform such other duties as may be required by law.
For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July
1, 2004, the superintendent of public instruction may only adopt rules
derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must
include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant
of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.50.050 and 1995 c 239 s 317 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall:
(1) Have the authority to organize the department into not more
than four divisions, each headed by an assistant director;
(2) Have free access to all files and records of various funds
assigned to the department and inspect and audit the files and records
as deemed necessary;
(3) Employ personnel to carry out the general administration of the
department;
(4) Submit an annual written report of the activities of the
department to the governor and the chairs of the appropriate
legislative committees with one copy to the staff of each of the
committees, including recommendations for statutory changes the
director believes to be desirable;
(5) Adopt ((such)) rules ((and regulations)) as are necessary to
carry out the powers, duties, and functions of the department pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW. For rules adopted under the
provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2004, the director may only
adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority.
The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from
which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a
section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general
enabling provisions establishing the department.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.06A.030 and 1996 c 131 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ombudsman shall perform the following duties:
(1) Provide information as appropriate on the rights and
responsibilities of individuals receiving family and children's
services, and on the procedures for providing these services;
(2) Investigate, upon his or her own initiative or upon receipt of
a complaint, an administrative act alleged to be contrary to law, rule,
or policy, imposed without an adequate statement of reason, or based on
irrelevant, immaterial, or erroneous grounds; however, the ombudsman
may decline to investigate any complaint as provided by rules adopted
under this chapter;
(3) Monitor the procedures as established, implemented, and
practiced by the department to carry out its responsibilities in
delivering family and children's services with a view toward
appropriate preservation of families and ensuring children's health and
safety;
(4) Review periodically the facilities and procedures of state
institutions serving children, and state-licensed facilities or
residences;
(5) Recommend changes in the procedures for addressing the needs of
families and children;
(6) Submit annually to the committee and to the governor by
November 1st a report analyzing the work of the office including
recommendations;
(7) Grant the committee access to all relevant records in the
possession of the ombudsman unless prohibited by law; and
(8) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter. For rules
adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2004, the
ombudsman may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of
legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory
section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and
may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or
purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the department
or the ombudsman's office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July
1, 2004, the director of each department may only adopt rules derived
from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include
the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing each department.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.19.011 and 1999 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of general administration shall supervise and
administer the activities of the department of general administration
and shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to
matters under the jurisdiction of the department.
(2) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director,
the director shall have the following powers and duties:
(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the
purposes of this chapter;
(b) Accept and expend gifts and grants that are related to the
purposes of this chapter, whether such grants be of federal or other
funds;
(c) Appoint a deputy director and such assistant directors and
special assistants as may be needed to administer the department.
These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;
(d) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform
all other functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of
this chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter
after July 1, 2004, the director may only adopt rules derived from a
specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the
specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the department of general administration;
(e) Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems
necessary for efficient administration, but the director shall be
responsible for the official acts of the officers and employees of the
department; and
(f) Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.
(3) The director may establish additional advisory groups as may be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(4) The internal affairs of the department shall be under the
control of the director in order that the director may manage the
department in a flexible and intelligent manner as dictated by changing
contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically limited by law, the
director shall have complete charge and supervisory powers over the
department. The director may create such administrative structures as
the director deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law,
and the director may employ such personnel as may be necessary in
accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.21A.064 and 1997 c 443 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to RCW 43.21A.068, the director of the department of
ecology shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) The supervision of public waters within the state and their
appropriation, diversion, and use, and of the various officers
connected therewith;
(2) Insofar as may be necessary to ((assure)) ensure safety to life
or property, the director shall inspect the construction of all dams,
canals, ditches, irrigation systems, hydraulic power plants, and all
other works, systems, and plants pertaining to the use of water, and
may require such necessary changes in the construction or maintenance
of said works, to be made from time to time, as will reasonably secure
safety to life and property;
(3) The director shall regulate and control the diversion of water
in accordance with the rights thereto;
(4) The director shall determine the discharge of streams and
springs and other sources of water supply, and the capacities of lakes
and of reservoirs whose waters are being or may be utilized for
beneficial purposes;
(5) The director shall, if requested, provide assistance to an
applicant for a water right in obtaining or developing an adequate and
appropriate supply of water consistent with the land use permitted for
the area in which the water is to be used and the population forecast
for the area under RCW 43.62.035. If the applicant is a public water
supply system, the supply being sought must be used in a manner
consistent with applicable land use, watershed and water system plans,
and the population forecast for that area provided under RCW 43.62.035;
(6) The director shall keep such records as may be necessary for
the recording of the financial transactions and statistical data
thereof, and shall procure all necessary documents, forms, and blanks.
The director shall keep a seal of the office, and all certificates
covering any of the director's acts or the acts of the director's
office, or the records and files of that office, under such seal, shall
be taken as evidence thereof in all courts;
(7) The director shall render when required by the governor, a full
written report of the office's work with such recommendations for
legislation as the director deems advisable for the better control and
development of the water resources of the state;
(8) The director and duly authorized deputies may administer oaths;
(9) The director shall establish and ((promulgate)) adopt rules
governing the administration of chapter 90.03 RCW. For rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2004, the director
may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative
authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or
sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely
solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the
general enabling provisions establishing the department;
(10) The director shall perform such other duties as may be
prescribed by law.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.24.016 and 1999 c 240 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of licensing shall supervise and administer the
activities of the department of licensing and shall advise the governor
and the legislature with respect to matters under the jurisdiction of
the department.
(2) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director,
the director has the following powers and duties:
(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the
responsibilities of the department;
(b) Accept and expend gifts and grants, whether such grants be of
federal or other funds;
(c) Appoint a deputy director and such assistant directors, special
assistants, and administrators as may be needed to administer the
department. These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter
41.06 RCW;
(d) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform
all other functions necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the
department. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter
after July 1, 2004, the director may only adopt rules derived from a
specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the
specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the department;
(e) Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems
necessary for efficient administration, but the director is responsible
for the official acts of the officers and employees of the department;
and
(f) Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.
(3) The director may establish advisory groups as may be necessary
to carry out the responsibilities of the department.
(4) The internal affairs of the department shall be under the
control of the director in order that the director may manage the
department in a flexible and intelligent manner as dictated by changing
contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically limited by law, the
director shall have complete charge and supervisory powers over the
department. The director may create such administrative structures as
the director deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law,
and the director may employ such personnel as may be necessary in
accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.27A.090 and 1988 c 127 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall be empowered as follows:
(1) To represent the state at, and fully participate in, the
activities of any basin or regional commission, interagency committee,
or any other joint interstate or federal-state agency, committee or
commission, or publicly financed entity engaged in the planning,
development, administration, management, conservation or preservation
of the water resources of the state.
(2) To prepare the views and recommendations of the state of
Washington on any project, plan or program relating to the planning,
development, administration, management, conservation and preservation
of any waters located in or affecting the state of Washington,
including any federal permit or license proposal, and appear on behalf
of, and present views and recommendations of the state at any
proceeding, negotiation or hearing conducted by the federal government,
interstate agency, state or other agency.
(3) To cooperate with, assist, advise and coordinate plans with the
federal government and its officers and agencies, and serve as a state
liaison agency with the federal government in matters relating to the
use, conservation, preservation, quality, disposal or control of water
and activities related thereto.
(4) To cooperate with appropriate agencies of the federal
government and/or agencies of other states, to enter into contracts,
and to make appropriate contributions to federal or interstate projects
and programs and governmental bodies to carry out the provisions of
this chapter.
(5) To apply for, accept, administer and expend grants, gifts and
loans from the federal government or any other entity to carry out the
purposes of this chapter and make contracts and do such other acts as
are necessary insofar as they are not inconsistent with other
provisions hereof.
(6) To develop and maintain a coordinated and comprehensive state
water and water resources related development plan, and adopt, with
regard to such plan, such policies as are necessary to ((insure))
ensure that the waters of the state are used, conserved and preserved
for the best interest of the state. There shall be included in the
state plan a description of developmental objectives and a statement of
the recommended means of accomplishing these objectives. To the extent
the director deems desirable, the plan shall integrate into the state
plan, the plans, programs, reports, research and studies of other state
agencies.
(7) To assemble and correlate information relating to water supply,
power development, irrigation, watersheds, water use, future
possibilities of water use and prospective demands for all purposes
served through or affected by water resources development.
(8) To assemble and correlate state, local and federal laws,
regulations, plans, programs and policies affecting the beneficial use,
disposal, pollution, control or conservation of water, river basin
development, flood prevention, parks, reservations, forests, wildlife
refuges, drainage and sanitary systems, waste disposal, water works,
watershed protection and development, soil conservation, power
facilities and area and municipal water supply needs, and recommend
suitable legislation or other action to the legislature, the congress
of the United States, or any city, municipality, or to responsible
state, local or federal executive departments or agencies.
(9) To cooperate with federal, state, regional, interstate and
local public and private agencies in the making of plans for drainage,
flood control, use, conservation, allocation and distribution of
existing water supplies and the development of new water resource
projects.
(10) To encourage, assist and advise regional, and city and
municipal agencies, officials or bodies responsible for planning in
relation to water aspects of their programs, and coordinate local water
resources activities, programs, and plans.
(11) To ((promulgate such)) adopt rules ((and regulations)) as are
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. For rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2004, the department
may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative
authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or
sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely
solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the
general enabling provisions establishing the department.
(12) To hold public hearings, and make such investigations, studies
and surveys as are necessary to carry out the purposes of the chapter.
(13) To subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, administer
oaths, take the testimony of any person under oath and require the
production of any books or papers when the department deems such
measures necessary in the exercise of its rule-making power or in
determining whether or not any license, certificate, or permit shall be
granted or extended.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.30.215 and 2003 c 334 s 112 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall:
(1) Perform duties relating to appraisal, appeal, approval, and
hearing functions as provided by law;
(2) Establish policies to ensure that the acquisition, management,
and disposition of all lands and resources within the department's
jurisdiction are based on sound principles designed to achieve the
maximum effective development and use of such lands and resources
consistent with laws applicable thereto;
(3) Constitute the board of appraisers provided for in Article 16,
section 2 of the state Constitution;
(4) Constitute the commission on harbor lines provided for in
Article 15, section 1 of the state Constitution as amended;
(5) Adopt and enforce rules as may be deemed necessary and proper
for carrying out the powers, duties, and functions imposed upon it by
this chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter
after July 1, 2004, the board may only adopt rules derived from a
specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the
specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the board or the department.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.31C.060 and 2000 c 212 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department must administer this chapter and has the following
powers and duties:
(1) To monitor the implementation of chapter 212, Laws of 2000 and
submit reports evaluating the effectiveness of the program and any
suggestions for legislative changes to the governor and legislature by
December 1, 2000;
(2) To develop evaluation and performance measures for local
governments to measure the effectiveness of the program at the local
level on meeting the objectives of this chapter;
(3) To provide information and appropriate assistance to persons
desiring to locate and operate a business in a community empowerment
zone;
(4) To work with appropriate state agencies to coordinate the
delivery of programs, including but not limited to housing, community
and economic development, small business assistance, social service,
and employment and training programs which are carried on in a
community empowerment zone; and
(5) To develop rules necessary for the administration of this
chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after
July 1, 2004, the department may only adopt rules derived from a
specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the
specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the department.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.33.040 and 1965 c 8 s 43.33.040 are each amended
to read as follows:
The state finance committee may ((make)) adopt appropriate rules
((and regulations)) for the performance of its duties. The state
treasurer shall act as ((chairman)) chair of the committee. For rules
adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2004, the
state finance committee may only adopt rules derived from a specific
grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific
statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is
derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a
statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions
establishing the state finance committee.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.33A.110 and 1994 c 154 s 310 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state investment board may ((make)) adopt appropriate rules
((and regulations)) for the performance of its duties. The board shall
establish investment policies and procedures designed exclusively to
maximize return at a prudent level of risk. However, in the case of
the department of labor and industries' accident, medical aid, and
reserve funds, the board shall establish investment policies and
procedures designed to attempt to limit fluctuations in industrial
insurance premiums and, subject to this purpose, to maximize return at
a prudent level of risk. The board shall adopt rules to ensure that
its members perform their functions in compliance with chapter 42.52
RCW. Rules adopted by the board shall be adopted pursuant to chapter
34.05 RCW.
For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July
1, 2004, the state investment board may only adopt rules derived from
a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the
specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the state investment board.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.59.070 and 1967 ex.s. c 147 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
The director shall be secretary of the commission and shall be
responsible for carrying into effect the commission's orders and rules
((and regulations promulgated)) adopted by the commission. The
director shall also be authorized to employ such staff as is necessary
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW. The commission shall
adopt ((such)) rules ((and regulations)) as shall be necessary to carry
into effect the purposes of this chapter.
For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July
1, 2004, the Washington state traffic safety commission may only adopt
rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The
rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from
which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a
section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general
enabling provisions establishing the commission.

Sec. 18 RCW 43.61.040 and 1977 c 75 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director of veterans affairs shall ((make such)) adopt rules
((and regulations)) as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of
this chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter
after July 1, 2004, the director of veterans affairs may only adopt
rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The
rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from
which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a
section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general
enabling provisions establishing the department of veterans affairs.
The department shall furnish information, advice, and assistance to
veterans and coordinate all programs and services in the field of
veterans' claims service, education, health, vocational guidance and
placement, and services not provided by some other agency of the state
or by the federal government. The director shall submit a report of
the departments' activities hereunder each year to the governor.

Sec. 19 RCW 43.63A.475 and 1993 c 124 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall adopt all rules under chapter 34.05 RCW
necessary to implement chapter 124, Laws of 1993, giving due
consideration to standards and regulations adopted by the secretary of
housing and urban development under the National Manufactured Housing
Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C.
Secs. 5401-5426) for manufactured housing construction and safety
standards. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter
after July 1, 2004, the department of community, trade, and economic
development may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of
legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory
section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and
may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or
purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the department
of community, trade, and economic development.

Sec. 20 RCW 43.70.580 and 1995 c 43 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The primary responsibility of the public health system, is to take
those actions necessary to protect, promote, and improve the health of
the population. In order to accomplish this, the department shall:
(1) Identify, as part of the public health improvement plan, the
key health outcomes sought for the population and the capacity needed
by the public health system to fulfill its responsibilities in
improving health outcomes.
(2)(a) Distribute state funds that, in conjunction with local
revenues, are intended to improve the capacity of the public health
system. The distribution methodology shall encourage system-wide
effectiveness and efficiency and provide local health jurisdictions
with the flexibility both to determine governance structures and
address their unique needs.
(b) Enter into with each local health jurisdiction performance-based contracts that establish clear measures of the degree to which
the local health jurisdiction is attaining the capacity necessary to
improve health outcomes. The contracts negotiated between the local
health jurisdictions and the department of health must identify the
specific measurable progress that local health jurisdictions will make
toward achieving health outcomes. A community assessment conducted by
the local health jurisdiction according to the public health
improvement plan, which shall include the results of the comprehensive
plan prepared according to RCW 70.190.130, will be used as the basis
for identifying the health outcomes. The contracts shall include
provisions to encourage collaboration among local health jurisdictions.
State funds shall be used solely to expand and complement, but not to
supplant city and county government support for public health programs.
(3) Develop criteria to assess the degree to which capacity is
being achieved and ensure compliance by public health jurisdictions.
(4) Adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of chapter 43,
Laws of 1995. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter
after July 1, 2004, the department may only adopt rules derived from a
specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the
specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the department.
(5) Biennially, within the public health improvement plan, evaluate
the effectiveness of the public health system, assess the degree to
which the public health system is attaining the capacity to improve the
status of the public's health, and report progress made by each local
health jurisdiction toward improving health outcomes.

Sec. 21 RCW 43.101.085 and 2001 c 167 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to its other powers granted under this chapter, the
commission has authority and power to:
(1) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules as necessary to carry out this
chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after
July 1, 2004, the commission may only adopt rules derived from a
specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the
specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the commission;
(2) Issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with
investigations, hearings, or other proceedings held under this chapter;
(3) Take or cause to be taken depositions and other discovery
procedures as needed in investigations, hearings, and other proceedings
held under this chapter;
(4) Appoint members of a hearings board as provided under RCW
43.101.380;
(5) Enter into contracts for professional services determined by
the commission to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this
chapter;
(6) Grant, deny, or revoke certification of peace officers under
the provisions of this chapter;
(7) Designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and
statements of charges under the provisions of this chapter; and
(8) Employ such investigative, administrative, and clerical staff
as necessary for the enforcement of this chapter.

Sec. 22 RCW 43.115.040 and 1993 c 261 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) Elect one of its members to serve as ((chairman)) chair;
(2) Adopt rules ((and regulations)) pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1,
2004, the commission may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant
of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific
statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is
derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a
statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions
establishing the commission;
(3) Examine and define issues pertaining to the rights and needs of
Hispanics, and make recommendations to the governor and state agencies
for changes in programs and laws;
(4) Advise the governor and state agencies on the development and
implementation of policies, plans, and programs that relate to the
special needs of Hispanics;
(5) Advise the legislature on issues of concern to the Hispanic
community;
(6) Establish relationships with state agencies, local governments,
and private sector organizations that promote equal opportunity and
benefits for Hispanics; and
(7) Receive gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private
sources that are made for the use or benefit of the commission and
expend, without appropriation, the same or any income from the gifts,
grants, or endowments according to their terms.

Sec. 23 RCW 43.117.050 and 1974 ex.s. c 140 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Elect one of its members to serve as ((chairman)) chair; and
also such other officers as necessary to form an executive committee;
(2) Adopt rules ((and regulations)) pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1,
2004, the commission may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant
of legislative authority. The rules must include the specific
statutory section or sections from which the grant of authority is
derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law stating a
statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling provisions
establishing the commission;
(3) Meet at the call of the ((chairman)) chair or the call of a
majority of its members, but in no case less often than once during any
three month period;
(4) Be authorized to appoint such citizen task force as it deems
appropriate.

Sec. 24 RCW 43.121.050 and 1988 c 278 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
To carry out the purposes of this chapter, the council may:
(1) Contract with public or private nonprofit organizations,
agencies, schools, or with qualified individuals for the establishment
of community-based educational and service programs designed to:
(a) Reduce the occurrence of child abuse and neglect; and
(b) Provide for parenting skills which include: Consistency in
parenting; providing children with positive discipline that provides
firm order without hurting children physically or emotionally; and
preserving and nurturing the family unit. Programs to provide these
parenting skills may include the following:
(i) Programs to teach positive methods of disciplining children;
(ii) Programs to educate parents about the physical, mental, and
emotional development of children;
(iii) Programs to enhance the skills of parents in providing for
their children's learning and development; and
(iv) Learning experiences for children and parents to help prepare
parents and children for the experiences in school. Contracts also may
be awarded for research programs related to primary and secondary
prevention of child abuse and neglect, and to develop and strengthen
community child abuse and neglect prevention networks. Each contract
entered into by the council shall contain a provision for the
evaluation of services provided under the contract. Contracts for
services to prevent child abuse and child neglect shall be awarded as
demonstration projects with continuation based upon goal attainment.
Contracts for services to prevent child abuse and child neglect shall
be awarded on the basis of probability of success based in part upon
sound research data.
(2) Facilitate the exchange of information between groups concerned
with families and children.
(3) Consult with applicable state agencies, commissions, and boards
to help determine the probable effectiveness, fiscal soundness, and
need for proposed educational and service programs for the prevention
of child abuse and neglect.
(4) Establish fee schedules to provide for the recipients of
services to reimburse the state general fund for the cost of services
received.
(5) Adopt its own bylaws.
(6) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions
of this chapter after July 1, 2004, the council may only adopt rules
derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must
include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant
of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the council.

Sec. 25 RCW 43.155.040 and 1985 c 446 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board may:
(1) Accept from any state or federal agency, loans or grants for
the planning or financing of any public works project and enter into
agreements with any such agency concerning the loans or grants;
(2) Provide technical assistance to local governments;
(3) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or
financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms
and conditions which are not in conflict with this chapter;
(4) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions
of this chapter after July 1, 2004, the board may only adopt rules
derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must
include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant
of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the board;
(5) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the
powers expressly granted or implied under this chapter.

Sec. 26 RCW 43.160.050 and 1996 c 51 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board may:
(1) Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct
of its business.
(2) Adopt an official seal and alter the seal at its pleasure.
(3) Utilize the services of other governmental agencies.
(4) Accept from any federal agency loans or grants for the planning
or financing of any project and enter into an agreement with the agency
respecting the loans or grants.
(5) Conduct examinations and investigations and take testimony at
public hearings of any matter material for its information that will
assist in determinations related to the exercise of the board's lawful
powers.
(6) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or
financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms
and conditions which are not in conflict with this chapter.
(7) Exercise all the powers of a public corporation under chapter
39.84 RCW.
(8) Invest any funds received in connection with industrial
development revenue bond financing not required for immediate use, as
the board considers appropriate, subject to any agreements with owners
of bonds.
(9) Arrange for lines of credit for industrial development revenue
bonds from and enter into participation agreements with any financial
institution.
(10) Issue industrial development revenue bonds in one or more
series for the purpose of defraying the cost of acquiring or improving
any industrial development facility or facilities and securing the
payment of the bonds as provided in this chapter.
(11) Enter into agreements or other transactions with and accept
grants and the cooperation of any governmental agency in furtherance of
this chapter.
(12) Sell, purchase, or insure loans to finance the costs of
industrial development facilities.
(13) Service, contract, and pay for the servicing of loans for
industrial development facilities.
(14) Provide financial analysis and technical assistance for
industrial development facilities when the board reasonably considers
it appropriate.
(15) Collect, with respect to industrial development revenue bonds,
reasonable interest, fees, and charges for making and servicing its
lease agreements, loan agreements, mortgage loans, notes, bonds,
commitments, and other evidences of indebtedness. Interest, fees, and
charges are limited to the amounts required to pay the costs of the
board, including operating and administrative expenses and reasonable
allowances for losses that may be incurred.
(16) Procure insurance or guarantees from any party as allowable
under law, including a governmental agency, against any loss in
connection with its lease agreements, loan agreements, mortgage loans,
and other assets or property.
(17) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions
of this chapter after July 1, 2004, the board may only adopt rules
derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must
include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant
of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the board.
(18) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out
the powers expressly granted or implied under this chapter.

Sec. 27 RCW 43.163.100 and 1990 c 53 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to accomplishing the economic development finance
programs specifically authorized in this chapter, the authority may:
(1) Maintain an office or offices;
(2) Sue and be sued in its own name, and plead and be impleaded;
(3) Engage consultants, agents, attorneys, and advisers, contract
with federal, state, and local governmental entities for services, and
hire such employees, agents and other personnel as the authority deems
necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(4) Make and execute all manner of contracts, agreements and
instruments and financing documents with public and private parties as
the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its
purposes;
(5) Acquire and hold real or personal property, or any interest
therein, in the name of the authority, and to sell, assign, lease,
encumber, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of the same in such manner as
the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its
purposes;
(6) Open and maintain accounts in qualified public depositaries and
otherwise provide for the investment of any funds not required for
immediate disbursement, and provide for the selection of investments;
(7) Appear in its own behalf before boards, commissions,
departments, or agencies of federal, state, or local government;
(8) Procure such insurance in such amounts and from such insurers
as the authority deems desirable, including, but not limited to,
insurance against any loss or damage to its property or other assets,
public liability insurance for injuries to persons or property, and
directors and officers liability insurance;
(9) Apply for and accept subventions, grants, loans, advances, and
contributions from any source of money, property, labor, or other
things of value, to be held, used and applied as the authority deems
necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(10) Establish guidelines for the participation by eligible banking
organizations in programs conducted by the authority under this
chapter;
(11) Act as an agent, by agreement, for federal, state, or local
governmental entities to carry out the programs authorized in this
chapter;
(12) Establish, revise, and collect such fees and charges as the
authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its
purposes;
(13) Make such expenditures as are appropriate for paying the
administrative costs and expenses of the authority in carrying out the
provisions of this chapter: PROVIDED, That expenditures with respect
to the economic development financing programs of the authority shall
not be made from funds of the state;
(14) Establish such reserves and special funds, and controls on
deposits to and disbursements from them, as the authority deems
necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(15) Give assistance to public bodies by providing information,
guidelines, forms, and procedures for implementing their financing
programs;
(16) Prepare, publish and distribute, with or without charge, such
studies, reports, bulletins, and other material as the authority deems
necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(17) Delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the
purposes of this chapter;
(18) Adopt rules concerning its exercise of the powers authorized
by this chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions of this
chapter after July 1, 2004, the authority may only adopt rules derived
from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include
the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the authority; and
(19) Exercise any other power the authority deems necessary,
useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes and exercise the
powers expressly granted in this chapter.

Sec. 28 RCW 43.180.040 and 1995 c 399 s 98 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is ((hereby)) established a public body corporate and
politic, with perpetual corporate succession, to be known as the
Washington state housing finance commission. The commission is an
instrumentality of the state exercising essential government functions
and, for purposes of the code, acts as a constituted authority on
behalf of the state when it issues bonds pursuant to this chapter. The
commission is a "public body" within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.
(2) The commission shall consist of the following voting members:
(a) The state treasurer, ex officio;
(b) The director of community, trade, and economic development, ex
officio;
(c) An elected local government official, ex officio, with
experience in local housing programs, who shall be appointed by the
governor with the consent of the senate;
(d) A representative of housing consumer interests, appointed by
the governor with the consent of the senate;
(e) A representative of labor interests, appointed by the governor,
with the consent of the senate, after consultation with representatives
of organized labor;
(f) A representative of low-income persons, appointed by the
governor with the consent of the senate;
(g) Five members of the public appointed by the governor, with the
consent of the senate, on the basis of geographic distribution and
their expertise in housing, real estate, finance, energy efficiency, or
construction, one of whom shall be appointed by the governor as chair
of the commission and who shall serve on the commission and as chair of
the commission at the pleasure of the governor.
The term of the persons appointed by the governor, other than the
chair, shall be four years from the date of their appointment, except
that the terms of three of the initial appointees shall be for two
years from the date of their appointment. The governor shall designate
the appointees who will serve the two-year terms. An appointee may be
removed by the governor for cause pursuant to RCW 43.06.070 and
43.06.080. The governor shall fill any vacancy in an appointed
position by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term. If
the department of community, trade, and economic development is
abolished, the resulting vacancy shall be filled by a state official
who shall be appointed to the commission by the governor. If this
official occupies an office or position for which senate confirmation
is not required, then his or her appointment to the commission shall be
subject to the consent of the senate. The members of the commission
shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and may be
reimbursed, solely from the funds of the commission, for expenses
incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter, subject
to the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. A majority of the
commission constitutes a quorum. Designees shall be appointed in such
manner and shall exercise such powers as are specified by the rules of
the commission.
(3) The commission may adopt an official seal and may select from
its membership a vice-chair, a secretary, and a treasurer. The
commission shall establish rules concerning its exercise of the powers
authorized by this chapter. The rules shall be adopted in conformance
with chapter 34.05 RCW. For rules adopted under the provisions of this
chapter after July 1, 2004, the commission may only adopt rules derived
from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include
the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the commission.

Sec. 29 RCW 43.200.070 and 1989 c 322 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of ecology shall adopt such rules as are necessary
to carry out responsibilities under this chapter. The department of
ecology is authorized to adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out
its responsibilities under chapter 43.145 RCW. For rules adopted under
the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2004, the department of
ecology may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of
legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory
section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and
may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or
purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the department
of ecology.

Sec. 30 RCW 43.210.060 and 1995 c 399 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of community, trade, and economic development or its
statutory successor shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. For rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2004, the department
of community, trade, and economic development may only adopt rules
derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must
include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant
of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the department of community, trade, and
economic development.

Sec. 31 RCW 43.250.090 and 1986 c 294 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state finance committee shall administer this chapter and adopt
appropriate rules. For rules adopted under the provisions of this
chapter after July 1, 2004, the state finance committee may only adopt
rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The
rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from
which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a
section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general
enabling provisions establishing the state finance committee.

Sec. 32 RCW 43.320.040 and 1993 c 472 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of financial institutions may adopt any rules, under
chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to implement the powers and duties of the
director under this chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions of
this chapter after July 1, 2004, the director of financial institutions
may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative
authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or
sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely
solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the
general enabling provisions establishing the department of financial
institutions.

Sec. 33 RCW 43.330.040 and 1993 c 280 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall supervise and administer the activities of
the department and shall advise the governor and the legislature with
respect to community and economic development matters affecting the
state.
(2) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director,
the director shall have the following powers and duties:
(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the
purposes of this chapter;
(b) Act for the state in the initiation of or participation in any
multigovernmental program relative to the purpose of this chapter;
(c) Accept and expend gifts and grants, whether such grants be of
federal or other funds;
(d) Appoint such deputy directors, assistant directors, and up to
seven special assistants as may be needed to administer the department.
These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;
(e) Prepare and submit budgets for the department for executive and
legislative action;
(f) Submit recommendations for legislative actions as are deemed
necessary to further the purposes of this chapter;
(g) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform
all other functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of
this chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter
after July 1, 2004, the director may only adopt rules derived from a
specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include the
specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the department;
(h) Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems
necessary for efficient administration, but the director shall be
responsible for the official acts of the officers and employees of the
department; and
(i) Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.
(3) When federal or other funds are received by the department,
they shall be promptly transferred to the state treasurer and
thereafter expended only upon the approval of the director.
(4) The director may request information and assistance from all
other agencies, departments, and officials of the state, and may
reimburse such agencies, departments, or officials if such a request
imposes any additional expenses upon any such agency, department, or
official.
(5) The director shall, in carrying out the responsibilities of
office, consult with governmental officials, private groups, and
individuals and with officials of other states. All state agencies and
their officials and the officials of any political subdivision of the
state shall cooperate with and give such assistance to the department,
including the submission of requested information, to allow the
department to carry out its purposes under this chapter.
(6) The director may establish additional advisory or coordinating
groups with the legislature, within state government, with state and
other governmental units, with the private sector and nonprofit
entities or in specialized subject areas as may be necessary to carry
out the purposes of this chapter.
(7) The internal affairs of the department shall be under the
control of the director in order that the director may manage the
department in a flexible and intelligent manner as dictated by changing
contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically limited by law, the
director shall have complete charge and supervisory powers over the
department. The director may create such administrative structures as
the director deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law,
and the director may employ such personnel as may be necessary in
accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

Sec. 34 RCW 47.01.071 and 1981 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The transportation commission shall have the following functions,
powers, and duties:
(1) To propose policies to be adopted by the legislature designed
to ((assure)) ensure the development and maintenance of a comprehensive
and balanced statewide transportation system which will meet the needs
of the people of this state for safe and efficient transportation
services. Wherever appropriate the policies shall provide for the use
of integrated, intermodal transportation systems to implement the
social, economic, and environmental policies, goals, and objectives of
the people of the state, and especially to conserve nonrenewable
natural resources including land and energy. To this end the
commission shall:
(a) Develop transportation policies which are based on the
policies, goals, and objectives expressed and inherent in existing
state laws;
(b) Inventory the adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the
local and area-wide governmental bodies of the state and define the
role of the state, regional, and local governments in determining
transportation policies, in transportation planning, and in
implementing the state transportation plan;
(c) Propose a transportation policy for the state, and after notice
and public hearings, submit the proposal to the legislative
transportation committee and the senate and house transportation
committees by January 1, 1978, for consideration in the next
legislative session;
(d) Establish a procedure for review and revision of the state
transportation policy and for submission of proposed changes to the
legislature;
(e) To integrate the statewide transportation plan with the needs
of the elderly and handicapped, and to coordinate federal and state
programs directed at assisting local governments to answer such needs;
(2) To establish the policy of the department to be followed by the
secretary on each of the following items:
(a) To provide for the effective coordination of state
transportation planning with national transportation policy, state and
local land use policies, and local and regional transportation plans
and programs;
(b) To provide for public involvement in transportation designed to
elicit the public's views both with respect to adequate transportation
services and appropriate means of minimizing adverse social, economic,
environmental, and energy impact of transportation programs;
(c) To provide for the administration of grants in aid and other
financial assistance to counties and municipal corporations for
transportation purposes;
(d) To provide for the management, sale, and lease of property or
property rights owned by the department which are not required for
transportation purposes;
(3) To direct the secretary to prepare and submit to the commission
a comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation plan which shall
be based on the transportation policy adopted by the legislature and
applicable state and federal laws. After public notice and hearings,
the commission shall adopt the plan and submit it to the legislative
transportation committee and to the house and senate standing
committees on transportation before January 1, 1980, for consideration
in the 1980 regular legislative session. The plan shall be reviewed
and revised prior to each regular session of the legislature during an
even-numbered year thereafter. A preliminary plan shall be submitted
to such committees by January 1, 1979.
The plan shall take into account federal law and regulations
relating to the planning, construction, and operation of transportation
facilities;
(4) To propose to the governor and the legislature prior to the
convening of each regular session held in an odd-numbered year a
recommended budget for the operations of the commission as required by
RCW 47.01.061;
(5) To approve and propose to the governor and to the legislature
prior to the convening of each regular session during an odd-numbered
year a recommended budget for the operation of the department and for
carrying out the program of the department for the ensuing biennium.
The proposed budget shall separately state the appropriations to be
made from the motor vehicle fund for highway purposes in accordance
with constitutional limitations and appropriations and expenditures to
be made from the general fund, or accounts thereof, and other available
sources for other operations and programs of the department;
(6) To review and authorize all departmental requests for
legislation;
(7) To approve the issuance and sale of all bonds authorized by the
legislature for capital construction of state highways, toll
facilities, Columbia Basin county roads (for which reimbursement to the
motor vehicle fund has been provided), urban arterial projects, and
aviation facilities;
(8) To adopt ((such)) rules((, regulations,)) and policy directives
as may be necessary to carry out reasonably and properly those
functions expressly vested in the commission by statute. For rules
adopted under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2004, the
commission may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of
legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory
section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and
may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or
purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the department;
(9) To delegate any of its powers to the secretary of
transportation whenever it deems it desirable for the efficient
administration of the department and consistent with the purposes of
this title;
(10) To exercise such other specific powers and duties as may be
vested in the transportation commission by this or any other provision
of law.

Sec. 35 RCW 48.02.060 and 1947 c 79 s .02.06 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall have the authority expressly conferred
upon him or her by or reasonably implied from the provisions of this
code.
(2) The commissioner shall execute his or her duties and shall
enforce the provisions of this code.
(3) The commissioner may:
(a) ((Make)) Adopt reasonable rules ((and regulations)) for
effectuating any provision of this code, except those relating to his
or her election, qualifications, or compensation. No ((such)) rules
((and regulations shall be)) are effective prior to their being filed
for public inspection in the commissioner's office. For rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2004, the
commissioner may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of
legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory
section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and
may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or
purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the office of
the insurance commissioner.
(b) Conduct investigations to determine whether any person has
violated any provision of this code.
(c) Conduct examinations, investigations, hearings, in addition to
those specifically provided for, useful and proper for the efficient
administration of any provision of this code.

Sec. 36 RCW 48.44.050 and 1947 c 268 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The insurance commissioner shall ((make)) adopt reasonable
((regulations)) rules in aid of the administration of this chapter
which may include, but shall not be limited to ((regulations)) rules
concerning the maintenance of adequate insurance, bonds, or cash
deposits, information required of registrants, and methods of
expediting speedy and fair payments to claimants. For rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2004, the insurance
commissioner may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of
legislative authority. The rules must include the specific statutory
section or sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and
may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or
purpose or the general enabling provisions establishing the office of
the insurance commissioner.

Sec. 37 RCW 48.46.200 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 290 s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:
The commissioner may, in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, ((promulgate)) adopt
rules ((and regulations)) as necessary or proper to carry out the
provisions of this chapter. For rules adopted under the provisions of
this chapter after July 1, 2004, the commissioner may only adopt rules
derived from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must
include the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant
of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the office of the insurance commissioner.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the commissioner
from requiring changes in procedures previously approved by him.

Sec. 38 RCW 66.08.0501 and 1997 c 321 s 56 are each amended to
read as follows:
The liquor control board may adopt appropriate rules pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of
chapter 321, Laws of 1997. For rules adopted under the provisions of
this chapter after July 1, 2004, the liquor control board may only
adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative authority.
The rules must include the specific statutory section or sections from
which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a
section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general
enabling provisions establishing the liquor control board.

Sec. 39 RCW 77.04.055 and 2000 c 107 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In establishing policies to preserve, protect, and perpetuate
wildlife, fish, and wildlife and fish habitat, the commission shall
meet annually with the governor to:
(a) Review and prescribe basic goals and objectives related to
those policies; and
(b) Review the performance of the department in implementing fish
and wildlife policies.
The commission shall maximize fishing, hunting, and outdoor
recreational opportunities compatible with healthy and diverse fish and
wildlife populations.
(2) The commission shall establish hunting, trapping, and fishing
seasons and prescribe the time, place, manner, and methods that may be
used to harvest or enjoy game fish and wildlife.
(3) The commission shall establish provisions regulating food fish
and shellfish as provided in RCW 77.12.047.
(4) The commission shall have final approval authority for tribal,
interstate, international, and any other department agreements relating
to fish and wildlife.
(5) The commission shall adopt rules to implement the state's fish
and wildlife laws. For rules adopted under the provisions of this
chapter after July 1, 2004, the commission may only adopt rules derived
from a specific grant of legislative authority. The rules must include
the specific statutory section or sections from which the grant of
authority is derived, and may not rely solely on a section of law
stating a statute's intent or purpose or the general enabling
provisions establishing the commission or the department.
(6) The commission shall have final approval authority for the
department's budget proposals.
(7) The commission shall select its own staff and shall appoint the
director of the department. The director and commission staff shall
serve at the pleasure of the commission.

Sec. 40 RCW 80.01.040 and 1985 c 450 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The utilities and transportation commission shall:
(1) Exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed
therefor by this title and by Title 81 RCW, or by any other law.
(2) Regulate in the public interest, as provided by the public
service laws, the rates, services, facilities, and practices of all
persons engaging in the transportation by whatever means of persons or
property within this state for compensation, and related activities;
including, but not limited to, air transportation companies, auto
transportation companies, express companies, freight and freight line
companies, motor freight companies, motor transportation agents,
private car companies, railway companies, sleeping car companies,
steamboat companies, street railway companies, toll bridge companies,
storage warehousemen, and wharfingers and warehousemen.
(3) Regulate in the public interest, as provided by the public
service laws, the rates, services, facilities, and practices of all
persons engaging within this state in the business of supplying any
utility service or commodity to the public for compensation, and
related activities; including, but not limited to, electrical
companies, gas companies, irrigation companies, telecommunications
companies, and water companies.
(4) ((Make such)) Adopt rules ((and regulations)) as may be
necessary to carry out its other powers and duties. For rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter after July 1, 2004, the commission
may only adopt rules derived from a specific grant of legislative
authority. The rules must include the specific statutory section or
sections from which the grant of authority is derived, and may not rely
solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose or the
general enabling provisions establishing the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---