BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.85.020 and 1996 c 305 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board:
(a) Shall adopt by rule minimum standards for degree-granting
institutions concerning granting of degrees, quality of education,
unfair business practices, financial stability, and other necessary
measures to protect citizens of this state against substandard,
fraudulent, or deceptive practices. The rules may require that an
institution be accredited or be making progress toward accreditation by
an accrediting agency recognized by the United States department of
education. The board shall adopt the rules in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW;
(b) May investigate any entity the board reasonably believes to be
subject to the jurisdiction of this chapter. In connection with the
investigation, the board may administer oaths and affirmations, issue
subpoenas and compel attendance, take evidence, and require the
production of any books, papers, correspondence, memorandums, or other
records which the board deems relevant or material to the
investigation. The board, including its staff and any other authorized
persons, may conduct site inspections, the cost of which shall be borne
by the institution, and examine records of all institutions subject to
this chapter;
(c) Shall develop an interagency agreement with the work force
training and education coordinating board to regulate degree-granting
private vocational schools with respect to degree and nondegree
programs; and
(d) Shall develop and disseminate information to the public about
entities that sell or award degrees without requiring appropriate
academic achievement at the postsecondary level, including but not
limited to, a description of the substandard and potentially fraudulent
practices of these entities, and advice about how the public can
recognize and avoid the entities. To the extent feasible, the
information shall include links to additional resources that may assist
the public in identifying specific institutions offering substandard or
fraudulent degree programs.
(2) Financial disclosures provided to the board by degree-granting
private vocational schools are not subject to public disclosure under
chapter 42.17 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.85.040 and 1996 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An institution or person shall not advertise, offer, sell, or
award a degree or any other type of educational credential unless the
student has enrolled in and successfully completed a prescribed program
of study, as outlined in the institution's publications. This
prohibition shall not apply to honorary credentials clearly designated
as such on the front side of the diploma or certificate and awarded by
institutions offering other educational credentials in compliance with
state law.
(2) No exemption granted under this chapter is permanent. The
board shall periodically review exempted degree-granting institutions,
and continue exemptions only if an institution meets the statutory
requirements for exemption in effect on the date of the review.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, this
chapter shall not apply to:
(a) Any public college, university, community college, technical
college, or institute operating as part of the public higher
educational system of this state;
(b) Institutions that have been accredited by an accrediting
association recognized by the agency for the purposes of this chapter:
PROVIDED, That those institutions meet minimum exemption standards
adopted by the agency; and PROVIDED FURTHER, That an institution,
branch, extension, or facility operating within the state of Washington
which is affiliated with an institution operating in another state must
be a separately accredited member institution of any such accrediting
association to qualify for this exemption;
(c) Institutions of a religious character, but only as to those
education programs devoted exclusively to religious or theological
objectives if the programs are represented in an accurate manner in
institutional catalogs and other official publications; ((or))
(d) Honorary credentials clearly designated as such on the front
side of the diploma or certificate awarded by institutions offering
other educational credentials in compliance with state law; or
(e) Institutions not otherwise exempt which offer only workshops or
seminars ((lasting no longer than three calendar days and for which
academic credit is not awarded)) and institutions offering only credit-bearing workshops or seminars lasting no longer than three calendar
days.

--- END ---