BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that community and
technical colleges play a vital role for students obtaining
baccalaureate degrees. In 2002, more than forty percent of students
graduating with a baccalaureate degree had transferred from a community
or technical college.
(2) The legislature also finds that demand continues to grow for
baccalaureate degrees. Increased demand comes from larger numbers of
students seeking access to higher education and greater expectations
from employers for the knowledge and skills needed to expand the
state's economy. Community and technical colleges are an essential
partner in meeting this demand.
(3) However, the legislature also finds that current policies and
procedures do not provide for efficient transfer of courses, credits,
or prerequisites for academic majors. Furthermore, the state's public
higher education system must expand its capacity to enroll transfer
students in baccalaureate education. The higher education coordinating
board must take a leadership role in working with the community and
technical colleges and four-year institutions to ensure efficient and
seamless transfer across the state.
(4) Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to build clearer
pathways to baccalaureate degrees, improve statewide coordination of
transfer and articulation, and ensure long-term capacity in the state's
higher education system for transfer students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The higher education coordinating board
must convene work groups to develop transfer associate degrees that
will satisfy lower division requirements at public four-year
institutions of higher education for specific academic majors. Work
groups must include representatives from the state board for community
and technical colleges and the council of presidents, as well as
faculty from two and four-year institutions. Work groups may include
representatives from independent four-year institutions.
(2) Each transfer associate degree developed under this section
must enable a student to complete the lower-division courses or
competencies for general education requirements and preparation for the
major that a direct-entry student would typically complete in the
freshman and sophomore years for that academic major.
(3) Completion of a transfer associate degree does not guarantee a
student admission into an institution of higher education or admission
into a major, minor, or professional program at an institution of
higher education that has competitive admission standards for the
program based on grade point average or other performance criteria.
(4) During the 2004-05 academic year, the work groups must develop
transfer degrees for elementary education, engineering, and nursing.
Each year thereafter, the higher education coordinating board must
convene additional groups to identify and develop additional transfer
degrees. The board must give priority to majors in high demand by
transfer students and majors that the general direct transfer agreement
associate degree does not adequately prepare students to enter
automatically upon transfer.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, in collaboration with
the intercollege relations commission, must collect and maintain lists
of courses offered by each community and technical college and public
four-year institution of higher education that fall within each
transfer associate degree.
(6) The higher education coordinating board must monitor
implementation of transfer associate degrees by public four-year
institutions to ensure compliance with subsection (2) of this section.
(7) Beginning January 10, 2005, the higher education coordinating
board must submit a progress report on the development of transfer
associate degrees to the higher education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate. The first progress report must include
measurable benchmark indicators to monitor the effectiveness of the
initiatives in improving transfer and baseline data for those
indicators before the implementation of the initiatives. Subsequent
reports must be submitted by January 10 of each odd-numbered year and
must monitor progress on the indicators, describe development of
additional transfer associate degrees, and provide other data on
improvements in transfer efficiency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The higher education coordinating board
must create a statewide system of course equivalency for public
institutions of higher education, so that courses from one institution
can be transferred and applied toward academic majors and degrees in
the same manner as equivalent courses at the receiving institution.
(2) The board must convene a work group including representatives
from the state board for community and technical colleges and the
council of presidents, as well as faculty from two and four-year
institutions, to:
(a) Identify equivalent courses between community and technical
colleges and public four-year institutions and among public four-year
institutions, including identifying how courses meet requirements for
academic majors and degrees; and
(b) Develop strategies for communicating course equivalency to
students, faculty, and advisors.
(3) The work group may include representatives from independent
four-year institutions. The work group must take into account the
unique nature of the curriculum of The Evergreen State College in
developing the course equivalency system.
(4) The higher education coordinating board must make a progress
report on the development of the course equivalency system to the
higher education committees of the senate and house of representatives
by January 10, 2005. The report must include options and cost
estimates for ongoing maintenance of the system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The higher education coordinating board
must conduct a gap analysis of upper division capacity in the public
higher education system to accommodate transfer students. The analysis
must address the total number of enrollment slots, specific academic
majors, and geographic location of demand and supply of upper division
capacity.
(2) The board must examine the full range of options, including
costs, to close the gap between demand and supply of upper division
capacity. Options include expansion of main campuses, branch campuses,
off-campus education centers, distance learning, and other strategies.
(3) The board must make a progress report by January 10, 2005, and
a final report by December 10, 2006, with recommendations to the higher
education committees of the senate and house of representatives for how
the state should expand upper division capacity in various locations
across the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 28B.80 RCW.

--- END ---