BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature recognizes the
state's paramount duty to provide a basic education to all students
residing in Washington. The legislature also recognizes that various
state courts have ruled teachers do not have a right to strike. The
legislature recognizes further that when an unlawful teacher strike
occurs, it creates significant impacts to students and families.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to ensure that during a
teacher strike, a basic education is provided to all students without
significant interruption. The legislature intends that during a
strike, the superintendent of public instruction must ensure that
schools are opened in a timely fashion to mitigate the impact of a
teacher strike on students and families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.
(1) "Strike" means a concerted work stoppage by one or more
teachers in a school district for all or part of a regularly scheduled
school day.
(2) "Strike curriculum" means a program of instruction developed
and adopted by a school district for use during a teacher strike and
approved by the state board of education for the purpose of providing
students a basic education in accordance with the goals defined in RCW
28A.150.210.
(3) "Strike substitute" means a person qualified under RCW
28A.410.010 for duty as a strike substitute and hired for one hundred
eighty days or less by a school district during a strike for the
purpose of providing students a basic education by implementing the
district's strike curriculum.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 STRIKE CURRICULUM REQUIRED. (1) The
superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the state
board of education must provide oversight and support to school
districts in identifying available and economical resources to develop
strike curriculum.
(2) Not later than August 31, 2004, each school district board of
directors must adopt or amend as necessary a strike curriculum for each
grade in which the district offers instruction. A district's strike
curriculum must be readily available for implementation by a substitute
teacher if there is a teacher strike. In developing its strike
curriculum, a district may incorporate existing long-term substitute
plans, web-based curricula, thematic and interdisciplinary units, and
other suitable programs of instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 BASIC EDUCATION DURING A STRIKE. (1) The
superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the state
board of education must develop a voluntary prescreening process to
maintain a confidential list of persons qualified and willing to serve
as substitute teachers during a strike. Upon request from a school
district board of directors during a strike, the superintendent of
public instruction must assist the district with completing the tasks
necessary to open the school within the time required in subsection (3)
of this section.
(2) The state board of education must establish rules for
eligibility for a strike substitute permit under RCW 28A.410.010.
Rules must reflect the legislative intent to ensure that a district can
meet the requirements under this section to hire substitutes and open
school, and harmonize the need for appropriate minimum qualifications
and safeguards based on age, good moral character, and personal
fitness, with the need for flexibility in making hiring decisions based
on shortages of certificated persons during a strike.
(3) Beginning on the first regularly scheduled school day following
the fifth regularly scheduled school day during which a teacher strike
is in effect, a school district must provide a program of instruction
by employing strike substitute teachers to implement the district's
strike curriculum. Strike days are counted cumulatively for each
school calendar year. A district may extend the date for opening
school under this section for up to two days to use up to two
nonstudent days for the training and orientation of strike substitutes.
However, a district may not extend the school calendar more than five
days past the previously published one hundred eighty student days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 STRIKE SUBSTITUTES. (1) A person employed
as a strike substitute will be compensated for the duration of
employment in the capacity of a strike substitute based on the first
year of service under the statewide salary schedule for certificated
employees, unless one of the following conditions is present, in which
case compensation for service as a strike substitute will be the
greater of the two compensation amounts:
(a) The strike substitute is entitled to compensation under the
statewide salary schedule for certificated employees at a rate higher
than the first year of service under the schedule; or
(b) The strike substitute is employed in an administrative or
support services capacity in a school district and is entitled to
compensation at a rate higher than the first year of service under the
statewide salary schedule.
(2) In making its hiring decisions a school district must comply
with RCW 28A.400.303 and the rules adopted by the state board under RCW
28A.410.010.
(3) A school district must inform parents of children enrolled in
the district in writing when a strike substitute is employed who does
not meet the requirements to be defined as highly qualified under the
federal no child left behind act of 2001.
(4) To meet the intent of this act, public and private employers
are encouraged, but not required, to grant leave to employees to
support employees who wish to serve as substitutes during a teacher
strike.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2002 c 353 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors ((shall)) must fix,
alter, allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section.
(2)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff ((shall)) may
not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and
(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a masters
degree ((shall)) may not be less than the salary provided in the
appropriations act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an
employee with a masters degree and zero years of service;
(3)(a) The actual average salary paid to certificated instructional
staff ((shall)) may not exceed the district's average certificated
instructional staff salary used for the state basic education
allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410.
(b) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional
staff ((shall)) must be included as salary under (a) of this subsection
only to the extent that the district's actual average benefit
contribution exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation
provided per certificated instructional staff unit in the state
operating appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is
payable. For purposes of this section, fringe benefits ((shall)) do
not include payment for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW
28A.400.210; employer contributions for old age survivors insurance,
workers' compensation, unemployment compensation, and retirement
benefits under the Washington state retirement system; or employer
contributions for health benefits in excess of the insurance benefits
allocation provided per certificated instructional staff unit in the
state operating appropriations act in effect at the time the
compensation is payable. A school district may not use state funds to
provide employer contributions for such excess health benefits.
(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education ((shall)) must be consistent with
the salary and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the
basic education program.
(4) Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may
exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by
separate contract for additional time, additional responsibilities, or
incentives. Supplemental contracts ((shall)) may not cause the state
to incur any present or future funding obligation. Supplemental
contracts ((shall be)) are subject to the collective bargaining
provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240,
((shall)) may not exceed one year, and if not renewed ((shall)) do not
constitute adverse change in accordance with RCW 28A.405.300 through
28A.405.380. No district may enter into a supplemental contract under
this subsection for the provision of services which are a part of the
basic education program required by Article IX, section 3 of the state
Constitution.
(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district ((shall)) must
comply with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.
(6) No moneys appropriated under this section may be expended for
sick leave benefits, compensation, or health benefits during the time
an employee engages in a strike or work stoppage. During a strike or
work stoppage, a school district board of directors may require a
signed statement from a licensed health care provider certifying that
an employee's absence was due to illness or injury.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.410.010 and 2001 c 263 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state board of education ((shall)) must establish, publish, and
enforce rules and regulations determining eligibility for and
certification of personnel employed in the common schools of this
state, including certification for emergency or temporary, substitute
or provisional duty, and duty as a strike substitute consistent with
section 4 of this act, and under such certificates or permits as the
board ((shall)) deems proper or as otherwise prescribed by law. The
rules ((shall require)) must provide that the initial application for
certification ((shall)) requires a record check of the applicant
through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system and
through the federal bureau of investigation at the applicant's expense.
The record check ((shall)) must include a fingerprint check using a
complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card.
The superintendent of public instruction may waive the record check for
any applicant who has had a record check within the two years before
application. The rules ((shall)) must permit a holder of a lapsed
certificate but not a revoked or suspended certificate to be employed
on a conditional basis by a school district with the requirement that
the holder ((must)) complete any certificate renewal requirements
established by the state board of education within two years of initial
reemployment. The rules must permit a person otherwise qualified for
duty as a strike substitute to be employed on a provisional basis by a
school district during a strike pending the results of the record check
required under this section.
In establishing rules pertaining to the qualifications of
instructors of American sign language the state board shall consult
with the national association of the deaf, "sign instructors guidance
network" (s.i.g.n.), and the Washington state association of the deaf
for evaluation and certification of sign language instructors.
The superintendent of public instruction ((shall)) acts as the
administrator of any such rules and regulations and ((have the power
to)) may issue any certificates or permits and revoke the same in
accordance with board rules and regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section captions used in this act constitute
no part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

--- END ---