BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.140 and 1990 c 98 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If any provision of this chapter conflicts with the provisions of
any other statute, the provisions of this chapter shall control:
PROVIDED, That this chapter shall not apply to:
(1) The proceedings concerned with the formal issuance of an order
granting, suspending, revoking, or denying any license, permit, or
certificate to engage in any business, occupation, or profession or to
any disciplinary proceedings involving a member of such business,
occupation, or profession, or to receive a license for a sports
activity or to operate any mechanical device or motor vehicle where a
license or registration is necessary; or
(2) That portion of a meeting of a quasi-judicial body which
relates to a quasi-judicial matter between named parties as
distinguished from a matter having general effect on the public or on
a class or group; or
(3) Matters governed by chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative
Procedure Act; or
(4)(a) Collective bargaining sessions with employee organizations,
including contract negotiations, grievance meetings, and discussions
relating to the interpretation or application of a labor agreement,
however, contract negotiations conducted between school districts and
educational employees under chapter 41.59 RCW are subject to this
chapter beginning no later than seven days after negotiations have
commenced; or (b) that portion of a meeting during which the governing
body is planning or adopting the strategy or position to be taken by
the governing body during the course of any collective bargaining,
professional negotiations, or grievance or mediation proceedings, or
reviewing the proposals made in the negotiations or proceedings while
in progress.

--- END ---