BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that graduating from
high school is an important indicator of how students will fare later
in life. High school graduates are almost twice as likely as dropouts
to be gainfully employed. Salaries of working graduates are nearly
twice as high as those enjoyed by dropouts who work. Students who fail
to graduate from high school are also significantly more likely to
become single parents and have children at young ages. Students who do
not graduate from high school are significantly more likely to rely
upon public assistance or be in prison.
The legislature finds that there is a correlation between the
dropout rates of youth and the rate of truancy within the educational
system. The state must have as a priority the reduction in the rates
of truancy and dropouts in the state educational system. The state
must encourage the districts to adopt policies which reduce the rates
of truancy and dropouts within the schools in their districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A school district may choose to utilize the procedure set out
in subsection (2) of this section to increase the district's funding
allocated under RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350.
(2) A school district shall receive increased funding under RCW
28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350 if the district increases its
attendance percentage. For every percentage increase in attendance
percentage for the prior school year compared to the attendance
percentage for the school year immediately preceding the prior school
year, the allocation received by the district under RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350 shall be increased by one-half of one
percent. For every percentage decrease in the attendance percentage
for the prior school year compared to the year immediately preceding
the prior school year, the district's allocation under RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350 shall be decreased by one-half of one
percent except that in no case shall the adjustment under this
subsection result in an allocation that is less than the allocation
under RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) Average daily attendance means the aggregate attendance of a
district during a school year divided by the number of days a district
is in session.
(b) Average daily enrollment means the aggregate enrollment of a
district during a school year divided by the number of days a district
is in session.
(c) Attendance percentage means the average daily attendance
divided by the average daily enrollment.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.225.010 and 1998 c 244 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All parents in this state of any child eight years of age and
under eighteen years of age shall cause such child to attend the public
school of the district in which the child resides and such child shall
have the responsibility to and therefore shall attend for the full time
when such school may be in session unless:
(a) The child is attending an approved private school for the same
time or is enrolled in an extension program as provided in RCW
28A.195.010(4);
(b) The child is receiving home-based instruction as provided in
subsection (((4))) (5) of this section;
(c) The child is attending an education center as provided in
chapter 28A.205 RCW;
(d) The ((school district superintendent of the district in which
the)) child ((resides shall have excused such child from attendance
because the child is physically or mentally unable to attend school,))
is attending a residential school operated by the department of social
and health services((,));
(e) The child is incarcerated in an adult correctional facility((,
or has been temporarily excused upon the request of his or her parents
for purposes agreed upon by the school authorities and the parent:
PROVIDED, That such excused absences shall not be permitted if deemed
to cause a serious adverse effect upon the student's educational
progress: PROVIDED FURTHER, That students excused for such temporary
absences may be claimed as full time equivalent students to the extent
they would otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and shall not affect school district
compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220));
(f) The child's absence qualifies under one of the following
excused absences and, if the absence qualifies, a student shall be
allowed one makeup day for each day of absence:
(i) Participation in school-approved activity is excused if this
absence is authorized by a staff member and the affected teacher is
notified prior to the absence unless it is clearly impossible to do so;
(ii) An absence due to illness, health condition, or family
emergency is excused if the parent notifies the school office on the
morning of the first day of the absence and sends a signed note of
explanation with the student upon his or her return to school unless
the parent is unable to comply with this requirement. Students over
eighteen and students who have been emancipated by court action shall
notify the school office of their absences with a signed note of
explanation;
(iii) An absence for religious purposes is excused if a parent
requests that a student be excused from attending school in observance
of a religious holiday. In addition, a student, upon the request of
his or her parent, may be excused for a portion of a school day to
participate in religious instruction provided such is not conducted on
school property;
(iv) An absence for parental-approved activities is excused if it
is agreed to by the principal and the parent. An absence may not be
approved if it causes a serious adverse effect on the student's
educational progress. In participation-type classes, including certain
music and physical education classes, the student may not be able to
achieve the objectives of the unit of instruction as a result of
absence from class. In such a case, a parent-approved absence would
have an adverse effect on the student's educational progress which
would ultimately be reflected in the grade for such a course;
(v) An absence resulting from disciplinary actions, or short-term
suspensions;
(vi) An absence due to an extended illness or health condition; or
(((e))) (g) The child is sixteen years of age or older and:
(i) The child is regularly and lawfully employed and either the
parent agrees that the child should not be required to attend school or
the child is emancipated in accordance with chapter 13.64 RCW;
(ii) The child has already met graduation requirements in
accordance with state board of education rules and regulations; or
(iii) The child has received a certificate of educational
competence under rules and regulations established by the state board
of education under RCW 28A.305.190.
(2) A child's absence from school is unexcused if it does not meet
the definition of an excused absence in this section.
(3) A parent for the purpose of this chapter means a parent,
guardian, or person having legal custody of a child.
(((3))) (4) An approved private school for the purposes of this
chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be one approved under regulations
established by the state board of education pursuant to RCW
28A.305.130.
(((4))) (5) For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200
RCW, instruction shall be home-based if it consists of planned and
supervised instructional and related educational activities, including
a curriculum and instruction in the basic skills of occupational
education, science, mathematics, language, social studies, history,
health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of an
appreciation of art and music, provided for a number of hours
equivalent to the total annual program hours per grade level
established for approved private schools under RCW 28A.195.010 and
28A.195.040 and if such activities are:
(a) Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only
and are supervised by a certificated person. A certificated person for
purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be a person
certified under chapter 28A.410 RCW. For purposes of this section,
"supervised by a certificated person" means: The planning by the
certificated person and the parent of objectives consistent with this
subsection; a minimum each month of an average of one contact hour per
week with the child being supervised by the certificated person; and
evaluation of such child's progress by the certificated person. The
number of children supervised by the certificated person shall not
exceed thirty for purposes of this subsection; or
(b) Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only
and who has either earned forty-five college level quarter credit hours
or its equivalent in semester hours or has completed a course in home-based instruction at a postsecondary institution or a vocational-technical institute; or
(c) Provided by a parent who is deemed sufficiently qualified to
provide home-based instruction by the superintendent of the local
school district in which the child resides.
(((5))) (6) The legislature recognizes that home-based instruction
is less structured and more experiential than the instruction normally
provided in a classroom setting. Therefore, the provisions of
subsection (((4))) (5) of this section relating to the nature and
quantity of instructional and related educational activities shall be
liberally construed.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.200.010 and 1995 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each parent whose child is receiving home-based instruction under
RCW 28A.225.010(((4))) (5) shall have the duty to:
(1) File annually a signed declaration of intent that he or she is
planning to cause his or her child to receive home-based instruction.
The statement shall include the name and age of the child, shall
specify whether a certificated person will be supervising the
instruction, and shall be written in a format prescribed by the
superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the
statement by September 15 of the school year or within two weeks of the
beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with the
superintendent of the public school district within which the parent
resides or the district that accepts the transfer, and the student
shall be deemed a transfer student of the nonresident district.
Parents may apply for transfer under RCW 28A.225.220;
(2) Ensure that test scores or annual academic progress assessments
and immunization records, together with any other records that are kept
relating to the instructional and educational activities provided, are
forwarded to any other public or private school to which the child
transfers. At the time of a transfer to a public school, the
superintendent of the local school district in which the child enrolls
may require a standardized achievement test to be administered and
shall have the authority to determine the appropriate grade and course
level placement of the child after consultation with parents and review
of the child's records; and
(3) Ensure that a standardized achievement test approved by the
state board of education is administered annually to the child by a
qualified individual or that an annual assessment of the student's
academic progress is written by a certificated person who is currently
working in the field of education. The state board of education shall
not require these children to meet the student learning goals, master
the essential academic learning requirements, to take the assessments,
or to obtain a certificate of mastery pursuant to RCW ((28A.630.885))
28A.655.060. The standardized test administered or the annual academic
progress assessment written shall be made a part of the child's
permanent records. If, as a result of the annual test or assessment,
it is determined that the child is not making reasonable progress
consistent with his or her age or stage of development, the parent
shall make a good faith effort to remedy any deficiency.
Failure of a parent to comply with the duties in this section shall
be deemed a failure of such parent's child to attend school without
valid justification under RCW 28A.225.020. Parents who do comply with
the duties set forth in this section shall be presumed to be providing
home-based instruction as set forth in RCW 28A.225.010(((4))) (5).

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.200.020 and 1990 c 33 s 179 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state hereby recognizes that parents who are causing their
children to receive home-based instruction under RCW 28A.225.010(((4)))
(5) shall be subject only to those minimum state laws and regulations
which are necessary to insure that a sufficient basic educational
opportunity is provided to the children receiving such instruction.
Therefore, all decisions relating to philosophy or doctrine, selection
of books, teaching materials and curriculum, and methods, timing, and
place in the provision or evaluation of home-based instruction shall be
the responsibility of the parent except for matters specifically
referred to in this chapter.

--- END ---