BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the waters of the
state are among the most valuable and fragile of the public's natural
resources and that there is great concern throughout the state relating
to their utilization, protection, restoration, and preservation. In
addition it finds that ever increasing pressures of additional
consumptive uses are being placed on the rivers, streams, and ground
waters, necessitating increased coordination in the management of the
waters of the state. The legislature declares that the common interest
of all of the people, as the owners of the waters of the state, shall
be paramount in the management of water; and that the department's role
as steward of the state's water resources require it to have the
ability to exercise sound planning and oversight powers that will
enable it to protect the interests of today's and tomorrow's citizens.
In the implementation of this policy the public's opportunity to enjoy
the physical and aesthetic qualities of the waters of the state shall
be preserved to the greatest extent feasible consistent with the
overall best interest of the state and the people generally. To this
end, uses shall be preferred that are consistent with water resource
sustainability, control of pollution, and prevention of damage to the
natural environment.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.85.040 and 2000 c 107 s 94 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor shall request the national academy of sciences,
the American fisheries society, or a comparable institution to screen
candidates to serve as members on the independent science panel. The
institution that conducts the screening of the candidates shall submit
a list of the nine most qualified candidates to the governor, the
speaker of the house of representatives, and the majority leader of the
senate. The candidates shall reflect expertise in habitat requirements
of salmon, protection and restoration of salmon populations, artificial
propagation of salmon, hydrology, or geomorphology.
(2) The speaker of the house of representatives and the majority
leader in the senate may each remove one name from the nomination list.
The governor shall consult with tribal representatives and the governor
shall appoint five scientists from the remaining names on the
nomination list.
(3) The members of the independent science panel shall serve four-year terms. Vacant positions on the panel shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointments. Members shall serve no more than
two full terms. The independent science panel members shall elect the
chair of the panel among themselves every two years. Based upon
available funding, the governor's salmon recovery office may contract
for services with members of the independent science panel for
compensation under chapter 39.29 RCW.
(4) The independent science panel shall be governed by generally
accepted guidelines and practices governing the activities of
independent science boards such as the national academy of sciences.
The purpose of the independent science panel is to help ensure that
sound science is used in salmon recovery efforts. The governor's
salmon recovery office shall request review of salmon recovery plans by
the science review panel. The science panel does not have the
authority to review individual projects or habitat project lists
developed under RCW 77.85.050, 77.85.060, and 75.46.080 or to make
policy decisions. The panel shall periodically submit its findings and
recommendations under this subsection to the legislature and the
governor.
(5) The independent science panel, in conjunction with the
technical review team, shall recommend standardized monitoring
indicators and data quality guidelines for use by entities involved in
habitat projects and salmon recovery activities across the state.
(6) The independent science panel, in conjunction with the
technical review team, shall also recommend criteria for the systematic
and periodic evaluation of monitoring data in order for the state to be
able to answer critical questions about the effectiveness of the
state's salmon recovery efforts.
(7) The recommendations on monitoring as required in this section
shall be provided in a report to the governor and to the legislature by
the independent science panel, in conjunction with the salmon recovery
office, no later than December 31, 2000. The report shall also include
recommendations on the level of effort needed to sustain monitoring of
salmon projects and other recovery efforts, and any other
recommendations on monitoring deemed important by the independent
science panel and the technical review team. The report may be
included in the biennial state of the salmon report required under RCW
77.85.020.
(8) An instream flow committee must be established consisting of
five individuals with the expertise to provide scientific and technical
review of the state's instream flow program. Candidates must possess
expertise in hydrology, fluvial geomorphology, fisheries biology,
aquatic ecology, or a similar scientific discipline that confers
expertise on instream flow. The instream flow committee must include
members who have expertise in instream flow assessment methodologies.
The purpose of the instream flow committee is to assess and provide
recommendations on the state's program to establish and achieve
instream flows. The instream flow committee will provide
recommendations to ensure the state's instream flow program relies on
generally accepted, peer-reviewed methods, and that appropriate
applications are identified, and that policies are scientifically
defensible and credible. The instream flow committee will review
instream flow rules submitted before the enactment of an instream flow
guidance rule adopted by the department. The instream flow committee
also will review those instream flow rules and streamflow
implementation performance programs that are appealed and are part of
the formal record of a program or rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By December 2007, the department must adopt
by rule instream flow standards that must be used in developing or
modifying instream flows established by the department by rule. In
developing the standards, the department must consult with the
department of fish and wildlife. Instream flow rules must establish
flow requirements for normal, low, and high water years that achieve
hydrologic integrity, considering both the biology and hydrology of the
watershed. Once guidance has been provided by the instream flow
committee under RCW 77.85.040(8), the standards must be consistent with
that guidance and subsequently must be updated to be consistent with
any further guidance provided by the committee.
Until such time as the standards required by this section are
adopted, the department must use the policies provided in the guidance
document the department published in response to the requirements of
RCW 90.82.085 in establishing instream flows by rule or amending the
rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Once standards have been adopted under
section 3 of this act, the department must review all minimum water
flows or base flows established by rule prior to the effective date of
this section under chapter 90.22 or 90.54 RCW to determine whether they
are consistent with the standards. By 2009, the department must modify
any such flow requirements that are inconsistent with the standards so
that they are consistent with the standards.
(2) By the end of 2010, the department must establish by rule
instream flows that are consistent with the standards adopted under
section 3 of this act for all mainstems and key tributaries of the
streams in the state. The order of priority for doing so is the
schedule for setting instream flows contained in the December 12, 2002,
document prepared by the department entitled "Work Plan for Instream
Flow Setting Through 2010" for the streams scheduled in the work plan.
For any mainstem stream or key tributary for which flows are not
scheduled to be developed in the work plan or under RCW 90.82.080, the
department must establish the order of priority for establishing such
flows.
The key tributaries to streams must be identified by the department
of fish and wildlife, in consultation with tribes, and must include
streams important to the protection of fish and other environmental
values.
(3) Once instream flows have been established or amended by rule
under this section or existing flows have been found to be consistent
with the standards adopted under section 3 of this act, the terms
"minimum water flows" as used in chapter 90.22 RCW, "base flows" as
used in RCW 90.54.020, "minimum instream flows" as used in chapter
90.82 RCW, and "instream flows" as used in this chapter are to be
considered to be synonymous with regard to the flows necessary for
fish.
(4) After 2011, the instream flows established by rule shall be
reviewed at least every seven years and updated as necessary to be
consistent with any further guidance provided by the instream flow
committee under RCW 77.85.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A streamflow implementation performance
program must be developed for each watershed in the state. The program
may be developed by a planning unit conducting planning under chapter
90.82 RCW, a locally based entity requested by the department to advise
it under RCW 90.54.040(1), or by the department. Each plan must
satisfy the requirements of the rules adopted under section 6(1) of
this act by providing implementation, maintenance, and assurance
measures to achieve the instream flows established or amended for
streams in the watershed under section 3 of this act or flows reviewed
and found to satisfy state standards under section 3 of this act.
(2)(a) Except as provided in section 8(1) of this act and (b) of
this subsection, such a plan must be developed for each watershed
within one year of adoption of a new or amended instream flow rule.
Each program must be consistent with the rules adopted by the
department under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) If neither a planning unit created under chapter 90.82 RCW nor
a locally based entity providing advice to the department under RCW
90.54.040(1) is developing a streamflow implementation performance
program for a stream's watershed, the department must develop such a
program within one year of the date an instream flow for a stream is
established, amended, or reviewed and found to be consistent with state
standards under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department, in consultation with the
board, and the departments of fish and wildlife, health, and community,
trade, and economic development, must adopt rules to ensure streamflow
implementation performance programs are consistent with the
requirements of this section and will be adequate to achieve designated
instream flows according to the schedule set forth in this chapter.
The instream flow committee of the independent science panel
established in RCW 77.85.040(8) must evaluate the draft rule to ensure
that it is technically sound, and relies on accepted, proven, and
effective practices. The department and department of fish and
wildlife must formally respond to the findings and recommendations of
the committee in their written determination accepting or rejecting a
proposed rule. The rules must be adopted by December 2007. As a
minimum, each streamflow implementation performance program must
contain the following elements:
(a) Actions to be taken to achieve instream flows, and the schedule
for those actions;
(b) The estimated quantity of streamflows to result from each
action;
(c) Actions that will improve instream flows upon approval of the
streamflow implementation performance program;
(d) The roles and responsibilities for each action, and the funding
amount and source;
(e) Performance benchmarks to be achieved over time, the monitoring
of performance, and periodic reporting;
(f) Provisions for streamflow implementation performance program
review and change;
(g) Provisions for the collection and reporting of information on
streamflow and water use measurement, including a description of how
the information will be made accessible to the public;
(h) A summary of current information and an analysis of the effect
of land use on streamflows, an identification of gaps in information,
and an assessment program to fill those data gaps. The analysis shall
focus on whether and to what extent urbanization and development in
urban and urbanizing counties and forest practices, development, and
agricultural practices in rural counties affect streamflows;
(i) A summary of existing and planned water use conservation and
efficiency programs and projects, and an assessment program for
determining the conservation potential within the watershed;
(j) Supplemental actions that would be taken if planned actions do
not meet the identified benchmarks; and
(k) Water use compliance requirements consistent with statewide
compliance programs in section 7 of this act.
Streamflow implementation performance program actions that are
consistent with natural hydrologic conditions and minimize disruption
of those conditions shall be preferred over those that do not.
(2) A streamflow implementation performance program may optionally
contain elements for: Acquiring water rights, pro rata water use
reduction agreements, and storage projects.
(3) Streamflow implementation performance programs must describe
the obligations and agreements necessary to achieve and protect
instream flows. Streamflow implementation performance programs may
include measures such as the following: Interlocal agreements,
contracts, voluntary programs, local ordinances, and state rules. At
a minimum, the streamflow implementation performance program must
consist of a state rule detailing the state's responsibilities,
authorities, and actions needed to achieve the instream flow.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) By 2006, the department, in consultation
with the departments of fish and wildlife and health, must implement
the following programs on a statewide basis to support the successful
implementation of streamflow implementation performance programs:
(a) Publicly accessible information including access to a web site
providing data on streamflows and water use;
(b) Water rights acquisition;
(c) Water conservation funding;
(d) Changes in water conveyance to benefit instream flows;
(e) Drought response;
(f) A water code compliance program that regulates illegal and
wasteful water use. This program shall include consultation with the
department of health with respect to the conservation requirements for
municipal water providers; and
(g) A mediation program and other means to facilitate voluntary
shared use agreements and other cooperative mechanisms to achieve
instream flows.
(2) If streamflow implementation performance programs do not
achieve instream flows established by rule or if, during the two or
four-year reviews of the programs, the department finds that the
timelines and benchmarks in a program are not met, the department and
the department of fish and wildlife must take actions that will satisfy
the timelines and benchmarks to achieve and protect such flows through
the use of any and all tools available under law. These tools include,
but are not limited to the following legal authorities:
(a) Chapters 43.27A, 90.03, 90.14, 90.22, 90.44, and 90.54 RCW;
(b) Chapter 90.48 RCW; and
(c) Chapters 43.21C, 36.70A, and 90.58 RCW.
(3) Any person may file an action in Thurston county superior court
or the superior court for the county in which the affected watershed
exists to compel any agency action required by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Each streamflow implementation
performance program must be reviewed for approval by the department.
The department with the concurrence of the department of fish and
wildlife, and following consultation with the departments of health,
and community, trade, and economic development, must approve,
conditionally approve, or disapprove such a program based on its
compliance with the department's rules adopted under section 6 of this
act. Each approval, conditional approval, or disapproval is subject to
appeal to the pollution control hearings board under chapter 43.21B
RCW. Streamflow implementation performance programs that are appealed
to the pollution control hearings board on technical merits or methods
must be reviewed by the instream flow committee of the independent
science panel created under RCW 77.85.040. The purpose of the instream
flow committee review must be to determine if the proposed program is
technically sound and whether the proposed actions are likely to
achieve the instream flows set by rule. If the committee finds that
the program will not likely achieve the instream flows, the committee
must identify the deficiencies with the proposed program and recommend
measures to remedy those deficiencies. The pollution control hearings
board's review is de novo and the committee's findings and
recommendations must be considered by the board during the appeal. The
department and the department of fish and wildlife must formally
respond in writing to the committee's findings and recommendations. If
the performance program is not consistent with the rules adopted under
section 6 of this act, the plan cannot be approved. If such a
performance program is disapproved by the department or is disapproved
or found upon appeal not to be in compliance with the rules adopted
under section 6 of this act, the department must develop a streamflow
implementation performance program for the watershed within one year of
the date of the disapproval or finding. The processing of new water
rights applications must be held in abeyance in a watershed until a
streamflow implementation performance program has been approved by the
state for the watershed.
(2) The department, in consultation with the departments of fish
and wildlife, health, and community, trade, and economic development,
must review each approved or conditionally approved streamflow
implementation performance program every two years to assess progress
in complying with the requirements of the program and the timelines
established in the program and must classify watersheds and their
subbasins as making or failing to make reasonable progress in achieving
the instream flows adopted for the streams in the watersheds or
subbasins.
(3) In watersheds currently meeting required instream flows, the
streamflow implementation performance program must describe those
actions that will be taken to ensure that the required instream flow
will continue to be met. In watersheds not currently meeting required
instream flows, streamflow implementation performance programs must
achieve instream flows as soon as practicable, but no later than six
years from state approval, unless this deadline is extended under
subsection (4) of this section. Reasonable progress must be defined
according to the following benchmarks:
(a) At year two of implementation, scheduled actions have been
taken, pending actions are on schedule for implementation, and initial
improvement to instream flows has occurred;
(b) At year four of implementation, significant progress in
achieving and protecting instream flows has occurred, and it is
determined that current and planned actions are likely to achieve the
instream flows established by rule within the established timeline. If
it is determined that current and planned actions are not likely to
achieve the instream flows, supplemental actions must be identified to
achieve the instream flows; and
(c) At year six of the program, instream flows have been achieved.
(4) Extensions to the six-year performance benchmark provided by
subsection (3) of this section may be granted by the department, but
are not favored and may be granted only under extraordinary
circumstances. Extensions may not be granted where watershed or stream
conditions are poor, which includes but is not limited to situations
where water quality standards as established under chapter 90.48 RCW
are not being met, aquatic species are listed under the federal
endangered species act, or aquatic species are listed on the state
salmon and stock inventory as critical or depressed. Further, it must
be demonstrated at the time of initial approval by the state, and at
the required two and four-year reviews, that there is a high likelihood
that the proposed actions being relied on to achieve instream flows
will be fully funded and effective.
(5) Six years after the approval or conditional approval of a
streamflow implementation performance program or on the extended date
granted under subsection (4) of this section, the department, in
consultation with the departments of fish and wildlife, health, and
community, trade, and economic development, must declare whether the
instream flows of the streams governed by the program satisfy the
instream flow rules adopted for them. The department's declaration is
subject to appeal to the pollution control hearings board under chapter
43.21B RCW.
(6) Once streamflows are achieved, and by 2017, review and updates
to streamflow implementation performance programs must occur in concert
with land use plan updates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Director" means the director of ecology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 and 3 through 9 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(2) "Water right holder" means a person or entity:
(a) With a right to divert or withdraw water under: (i) A water
right permit or certificate issued under chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW;
(ii) the authority of a water right represented by a statement of claim
filed in the water rights claims registry established under RCW
90.14.111; or (iii) the authority of a water right established after
the effective date of this section that is exempted from permit
requirements by RCW 90.44.050; or
(b) Who receives water from a federal reclamation project for
distribution to water users or consumers.
(3) For the purposes of levying a fee under this chapter, a "water
right holder" does not mean a person with a right to withdraw water
from an exempt well established by the effective date of this section,
that is, under a right that is exempt from permit requirements under
RCW 90.44.050 and established by the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) An annual fee is imposed on the
diversion or withdrawal of water by a water right holder and on the
receipt of water from a federal reclamation project for distribution to
water users or consumers. The purpose of the fee is provide funding to
the department of ecology to provide for the long-term health of
watersheds through the administration and enforcement of the programs
for establishing and achieving instream flows provided by sections 1
through 8 of this act.
(2) For diversions or withdrawals by a water right holder, the fee
is in the amount of . . . . . cents for each cubic foot of water
diverted or withdrawn by the water right holder in a calendar year and
is the financial responsibility of the water right holder; and for
persons or entities receiving water from a federal reclamation project
for distribution to water users or consumers, the fee is in the amount
of . . . . . cents for each cubic foot of water received in a calendar
year for such distribution from the project and is the financial
responsibility of the person or entity receiving the water for
distribution.
(3) The department must collect the fees imposed by this section
and deposit them in the streamflow implementation performance account,
created in section 13 of this act, less the costs incurred by the
department in collecting the fees. The provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW
that are not inconsistent with this section apply to the fees imposed
by this section in the same manner prescribed for taxes and the due
dates, reporting periods, and return requirements of chapter 82.04 RCW
apply except that the fee is to be collected annually.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The streamflow implementation performance
account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from section 12
of this act must be deposited in the account. The account is subject
to appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only to
provide funding to the department of ecology for administering the
instream flow and streamflow implementation performance programs
provided by chapter 90.-- RCW (sections 1 and 3 through 9 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 11 through 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.06.220 and 2003 c 53 s 222 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governor after proclaiming a state of emergency and prior
to terminating such, may, in the area described by the proclamation
issue an order prohibiting:
(a) Any person being on the public streets, or in the public parks,
or at any other public place during the hours declared by the governor
to be a period of curfew;
(b) Any number of persons, as designated by the governor, from
assembling or gathering on the public streets, parks, or other open
areas of this state, either public or private;
(c) The manufacture, transfer, use, possession or transportation of
a molotov cocktail or any other device, instrument or object designed
to explode or produce uncontained combustion;
(d) The transporting, possessing or using of gasoline, kerosene, or
combustible, flammable, or explosive liquids or materials in a glass or
uncapped container of any kind except in connection with the normal
operation of motor vehicles, normal home use or legitimate commercial
use;
(e) The possession of firearms or any other deadly weapon by a
person (other than a law enforcement officer) in a place other than
that person's place of residence or business;
(f) The sale, purchase or dispensing of alcoholic beverages;
(g) The sale, purchase or dispensing of other commodities or goods,
as he or she reasonably believes should be prohibited to help preserve
and maintain life, health, property or the public peace;
(h) The use of certain streets, highways or public ways by the
public; and
(i) Such other activities as he or she reasonably believes should
be prohibited to help preserve and maintain life, health, property or
the public peace.
(2) If the state of emergency is proclaimed in response to an
imminent danger to the public health or the environment caused by
insufficient water supplies, the governor must order the director of
ecology to issue orders regulating water users as is necessary to
alleviate the danger.
(3) In imposing the restrictions provided for by RCW 43.06.010, and
43.06.200 through 43.06.270, the governor may impose them for such
times, upon such conditions, with such exceptions and in such areas of
this state he or she from time to time deems necessary.
(((3))) (4) Any person willfully violating any provision of an
order issued by the governor under this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 43.27A
RCW to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to set forth the powers of the
department to regulate the withdrawal or diversion of public waters and
water or water rights related thereto, including regulation based on
dates of priority or other pertinent factors. Regulatory actions taken
under this section shall be based on examination and determination by
the department or the court, as applicable, of the various water rights
involved according to the department's records and other records and
pertinent facts. The powers set forth in this section may be exercised
whether or not a general adjudication relating to the water rights
involved has been conducted.
(1) In a regulatory situation: (a) Where a water right or all
water rights proposed for regulation by the department, as well as any
right or rights of a senior priority that the proposed regulation is
designed to protect, is or are embodied in a certificate or
certificates issued under RCW 90.03.240, 90.03.330, 90.38.040,
90.42.040, or 90.44.060 or a permit or permits issued under RCW
90.03.290 or 90.44.060; (b) where a flow or level has been established
by rule under chapter 90.22, 90.54, or 90.-- RCW (sections 1 and 3
through 9 of this act); or (c) where it appears to the department that
public waters are being withdrawn without any right or other
appropriate authority whatsoever, the department in its discretion is
authorized to regulate the right or rights under either RCW 43.27A.190
or subsection (2) of this section.
(2) In a regulatory situation where one or more of the water rights
proposed for regulation by the department, as well as any right or
rights of a senior priority that the proposed regulation is designed to
protect, is not or are not embodied in a permit or certificate as
described in subsection (1) of this section, the department, in its
sole and exclusive power to regulate, is authorized to bring an
appropriate action at law or in equity, including seeking injunctive
relief, as it may deem necessary. Where actions are brought in a state
court, the actions must be initiated in the superior court of the
county where the point or points of diversion of the water right or
rights proposed for regulation are located. If the points of diversion
are located in more than one county, the department may bring the
action in a county where a point of diversion is located.
Notwithstanding the general adjudication procedures in RCW 90.03.110
through 90.03.245 and 90.44.220, the superior court shall make findings
and a determination of the validity and priority of the water rights
held by the parties to resolve the regulatory situation. The superior
court shall issue any necessary orders to implement its findings and
determination, including injunctive relief, that it determines is
necessary to regulate among the water rights.
(3) Nothing in this section authorizes the department or the
superior court to accomplish a general adjudication of water rights
proceeding or the substantial equivalent of a general adjudication of
water rights. The exclusive procedure for accomplishing a general
adjudication of water rights is under RCW 90.03.110 through 90.03.245
or 90.44.220.
(4) Nothing in this section amends, revises, or repeals RCW
90.14.130 or 90.14.200.
(5) This section does not in any way modify regulatory powers
previously placed with the department except as provided in subsections
(1) and (2) of this section.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2003 c 393 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, and the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW, or
local health departments:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and
90.56.330.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Decisions of the department of ecology to approve,
conditionally approve, or disapprove a streamflow implementation
performance program made under section 8(1) of this act and
declarations of the department made under section 8(5) of this act.
(i) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Proceedings conducted by the department, or the department's
designee, under RCW 90.03.160 through 90.03.210 or 90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 18 RCW 90.82.080 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 4 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) If the initiating governments choose, by majority vote, to
include an instream flow component, it shall be accomplished in the
following manner:
(i) If minimum instream flows have already been adopted by rule for
a stream within the management area, unless the members of the local
governments and tribes on the planning unit by a recorded unanimous
vote request the department to modify those flows, the minimum instream
flows shall not be modified under this chapter. If the members of
local governments and tribes request the planning unit to modify
instream flows and unanimous approval of the decision to modify such
flow is not achieved, then the instream flows shall not be modified
under this section;
(ii) If minimum stream flows have not been adopted by rule for a
stream within the management area, setting the minimum instream flows
shall be a collaborative effort between the department and members of
the planning unit. The department must attempt to achieve consensus
and approval among the members of the planning unit regarding the
minimum flows to be adopted by the department. Approval is achieved if
all government members and tribes that have been invited and accepted
on the planning unit present for a recorded vote unanimously vote to
support the proposed minimum instream flows, and all nongovernmental
members of the planning unit present for the recorded vote, by a
majority, vote to support the proposed minimum instream flows.
(b) The department shall undertake rule making to adopt flows under
(a) of this subsection. The department may adopt the rules either by
the regular rules adoption process provided in chapter 34.05 RCW, the
expedited rules adoption process as set forth in RCW 34.05.353, or
through a rules adoption process that uses public hearings and notice
provided by the county legislative authority to the greatest extent
possible. Such rules do not constitute significant legislative rules
as defined in RCW 34.05.328, and do not require the preparation of
small business economic impact statements.
(c) If approval is not achieved within four years of the date the
planning unit first receives funds from the department for conducting
watershed assessments under RCW 90.82.040, the department ((may)) must
promptly initiate rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW to establish
flows for those streams and shall have two additional years to
establish the instream flows for those streams for which approval is
not achieved.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding RCW 90.03.345, minimum instream flows set
under this section for rivers or streams that do not have existing
minimum instream flow levels set by rule of the department shall have
a priority date of two years after funding is first received from the
department under RCW 90.82.040, unless determined otherwise by a
unanimous vote of the members of the planning unit but in no instance
may it be later than the effective date of the rule adopting such flow.
(b) Any increase to an existing minimum instream flow set by rule
of the department shall have a priority date of two years after funding
is first received for planning in the WRIA or multi-WRIA area from the
department under RCW 90.82.040 and the priority date of the portion of
the minimum instream flow previously established by rule shall retain
its priority date as established under RCW 90.03.345.
(c) Any existing minimum instream flow set by rule of the
department that is reduced shall retain its original date of priority
as established by RCW 90.03.345 for the revised amount of the minimum
instream flow level.
(3) Before setting minimum instream flows under this section, the
department shall engage in government-to-government consultation with
affected tribes in the management area regarding the setting of such
flows.
(4) Nothing in this chapter either: (a) Affects the department's
authority to establish flow requirements or other conditions under RCW
90.48.260 or the federal clean water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.)
for the licensing or relicensing of a hydroelectric power project under
the federal power act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 791 et seq.); or (b) affects or
impairs existing instream flow requirements and other conditions in a
current license for a hydroelectric power project licensed under the
federal power act.
(5) If the planning unit is unable to obtain unanimity under
subsection (1) of this section, the department ((may)) must adopt rules
setting such flows.
(6) The department shall report annually to the appropriate
legislative standing committees on the progress of instream flows being
set under this chapter, as well as progress toward setting instream
flows in those watersheds not being planned under this chapter. The
report shall be made by December 1, 2003, and by December 1st of each
subsequent year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Section 15 of this act takes effect July 1,
2004.

--- END ---