BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.36.080 and 2001 c 274 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may pay no more than thirty thousand dollars per
fiscal year from the general fund for claims under RCW 77.36.040 and
for assessment costs and compromise of claims unless the legislature
declares an emergency. Such money shall be used to pay animal damage
claims only if the claim meets the conditions of RCW 77.36.040 and the
damage occurred in a place where the opportunity to hunt was restricted
or prohibited by a county, municipality, or other public entity during
the season prior to the occurrence of the damage.
(2) The legislature may declare an emergency, defined for the
purposes of this section as any happening arising from weather, other
natural conditions, or fire that causes unusually great damage by deer
or elk to commercially raised agricultural or horticultural crops, or
rangeland forage on privately owned land used for grazing or browsing
of domestic livestock for at least a portion of the year. In an
emergency, the department may pay as much as may be subsequently
appropriated, in addition to the funds authorized under subsection (1)
of this section, for claims under RCW 77.36.040 and for assessment and
compromise of claims. Such money shall be used to pay animal damage
claims only if the claim meets the conditions of RCW 77.36.040 and the
department has expended all funds authorized under RCW 77.36.070 or
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Of the total funds available each fiscal year under subsection
(1) of this section and RCW 77.36.070, no more than one-third of this
total may be used to pay animal damage claims for rangeland forage on
privately owned land.
(4) Of the total funds available each fiscal year under subsection
(1) of this section and RCW 77.36.070 that are estimated by May 1st of
each year to remain unspent at the end of the fiscal year, fifty
percent shall be utilized as matching grants to enhance habitat for
deer and elk on public lands prior to the expiration of the fiscal
year.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.36.040 and 1996 c 54 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Pursuant to this section, the director or the director's
designee may distribute money appropriated to pay claims for damages to
crops caused by wild deer or elk in an amount of up to ten thousand
dollars per claim. Damages payable under this section are limited to
the value of such commercially raised horticultural or agricultural
crops, whether growing or harvested, and shall be paid only to the
owner of the crop at the time of damage, without assignment. Damages
shall not include damage to other real or personal property including
other vegetation or animals, damages caused by animals other than wild
deer or elk, lost profits, consequential damages, or any other damages
whatsoever. These damages shall comprise the exclusive remedy for
claims against the state for damages caused by wildlife.
(2) The director may adopt rules for the form of affidavits or
proof to be provided in claims under this section. The director may
adopt rules to specify the time and method of assessing damage. The
burden of proving damages shall be on the claimant. Payment of claims
shall remain subject to the other conditions and limits of this
chapter.
(3) If funds are limited, payments of claims shall be prioritized
in the order that the claims are received. No claim may be processed
if:
(a) The claimant did not notify the department within ten days of
discovery of the damage. If the claimant intends to take steps that
prevent determination of damages, such as harvest of damaged crops,
then the claimant shall notify the department as soon as reasonably
possible after discovery so that the department has an opportunity to
document the damage and take steps to prevent additional damage; or
(b) The claimant did not present a complete, written claim within
sixty days after the damage, or the last day of damaging if the damage
was of a continuing nature.
(4)(a) For damage to a crop other than rangeland, the ((director or
the director's designee)) department may examine and assess the damage
upon notice.
(b) For damage to rangeland, the department must work with a local
rangeland management expert assigned by Washington State University to
examine and appraise the damage upon notice to the landowner. The
rangeland management expert shall recommend an assessment of the damage
to the department. However, that recommendation is not binding on the
department.
(c) The department and claimant may agree to an assessment of
damages by a neutral person or persons knowledgeable in horticultural
or agricultural practices. The department and claimant shall share
equally in the costs of such third party examination and assessment of
damage.
(5) There shall be no payment for damages if:
(a) The crops are on lands leased from any public agency;
(b) The landowner or claimant failed to use or maintain applicable
damage prevention materials or methods furnished by the department, or
failed to comply with a wildlife damage prevention agreement under RCW
77.12.260;
(c) The director has expended all funds appropriated for payment of
such claims for the current fiscal year; or
(d) The damages are covered by insurance. The claimant shall
notify the department at the time of claim of insurance coverage in the
manner required by the director. Insurance coverage shall cover all
damages prior to any payment under this chapter.
(6) When there is a determination of claim by the director or the
director's designee pursuant to this section, the claimant has sixty
days to accept the claim or it is deemed rejected.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.30.150 and 1998 c 245 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
The regents of Washington State University, in addition to other
duties prescribed by law, shall:
(1) Have full control of the university and its property of various
kinds, except as otherwise provided by law.
(2) Employ the president of the university, his or her assistants,
members of the faculty, and employees of the university, who, except as
otherwise provided by law, shall hold their positions during the
pleasure of said board of regents.
(3) Establish entrance requirements for students seeking admission
to the university which meet or exceed the standards specified under
RCW 28B.80.350(2). Completion of examinations satisfactory to the
university may be a prerequisite for entrance by any applicant, at the
university's discretion. Evidence of completion of public high schools
and other educational institutions whose courses of study meet the
approval of the university may be acceptable for entrance.
(4) Establish such colleges, schools, or departments necessary to
carry out the purpose of the university and not otherwise proscribed by
law.
(5) Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating
board pursuant to RCW 28B.80.340, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus
facilities.
(6) With the assistance of the faculty of the university, prescribe
the courses of instruction in the various colleges, schools, and
departments of the institution and publish the necessary catalogues
thereof.
(7) Collect such information as the board deems desirable as to the
schemes of technical instruction adopted in other parts of the United
States and foreign countries.
(8) Provide for holding agricultural institutes including farm
marketing forums.
(9) Provide that instruction given in the university, as far as
practicable, be conveyed by means of laboratory work and provide in
connection with the university one or more physical, chemical, and
biological laboratories, and suitably furnish and equip the same.
(10) Provide training in military tactics for those students
electing to participate therein.
(11) Establish a department of elementary science and in connection
therewith provide instruction in elementary mathematics, including
elementary trigonometry, elementary mechanics, elementary and
mechanical drawing, and land surveying.
(12) Establish a department of agriculture and in connection
therewith provide instruction in physics with special application of
its principles to agriculture, chemistry with special application of
its principles to agriculture, morphology and physiology of plants with
special reference to common grown crops and fungus enemies, morphology
and physiology of the lower forms of animal life, with special
reference to insect pests, morphology and physiology of the higher
forms of animal life and in particular of the horse, cow, sheep, and
swine, agriculture with special reference to the breeding and feeding
of livestock and the best mode of cultivation of farm produce, and
mining and metallurgy, appointing demonstrators in each of these
subjects to superintend the equipment of a laboratory and to give
practical instruction therein.
(13) Establish agricultural experiment stations in connection with
the department of agriculture, including at least one in the western
portion of the state, and appoint the officers and prescribe
regulations for their management.
(14) Grant to students such certificates or degrees, as recommended
for such students by the faculty.
(15) Confer honorary degrees upon persons other than graduates of
the university in recognition of their learning or devotion to
literature, art, or science when recommended thereto by the faculty:
PROVIDED, That no degree shall ever be conferred in consideration of
the payment of money or the giving of property of whatsoever kind.
(16) Adopt plans and specifications for university buildings and
facilities or improvements thereto and employ skilled architects and
engineers to prepare such plans and specifications and supervise the
construction of buildings or facilities which the board is authorized
to erect, and fix the compensation for such services. The board shall
enter into contracts with one or more contractors for such suitable
buildings, facilities, or improvements as the available funds will
warrant, upon the most advantageous terms offered at a public
competitive letting, pursuant to public notice under rules established
by the board. The board shall require of all persons with whom they
contract for construction and improvements a good and sufficient bond
for the faithful performance of the work and full protection against
all liens.
(17) Except as otherwise provided by law, direct the disposition of
all money appropriated to or belonging to the state university.
(18) Receive and expend the money appropriated under the act of
congress approved May 8, 1914, entitled "An Act to provide for
cooperative agricultural extension work between the agricultural
colleges in the several States receiving the benefits of the Act of
Congress approved July 2, 1862, and Acts supplemental thereto and the
United States Department of Agriculture" and organize and conduct
agricultural extension work in connection with the state university in
accordance with the terms and conditions expressed in the acts of
congress.
(19) Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such
contracts as the regents deem essential to university purposes.
(20) Acquire by lease, gift, or otherwise, lands necessary to
further the work of the university or for experimental or
demonstrational purposes.
(21) Establish and maintain at least one agricultural experiment
station in an irrigation district to conduct investigational work upon
the principles and practices of irrigational agriculture including the
utilization of water and its relation to soil types, crops, climatic
conditions, ditch and drain construction, fertility investigations,
plant disease, insect pests, marketing, farm management, utilization of
fruit byproducts, and general development of agriculture under
irrigation conditions.
(22) Supervise and control the agricultural experiment station at
Puyallup.
(23) Establish and maintain at Wenatchee an agricultural experiment
substation for the purpose of conducting investigational work upon the
principles and practices of orchard culture, spraying, fertilization,
pollenization, new fruit varieties, fruit diseases and pests,
byproducts, marketing, management, and general horticultural problems.
(24) Accept such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests,
whether real or personal property, in trust or otherwise, for the use
or benefit of the university, its colleges, schools, or departments;
and sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the proceeds,
rents, profits, and income thereof except as limited by the terms of
said gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises; and adopt
proper rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the
proceeds of all fees, and the proceeds, rents, profits, and income of
all gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises.
(25) Construct when the board so determines a new foundry and a
mining, physical, technological building, and fabrication shop at the
university, or add to the present foundry and other buildings, in order
that both instruction and research be expanded to include permanent
molding and die casting with a section for new fabricating techniques,
especially for light metals, including magnesium and aluminum; purchase
equipment for the shops and laboratories in mechanical, electrical, and
civil engineering; establish a pilot plant for the extraction of
alumina from native clays and other possible light metal research;
purchase equipment for a research laboratory for technological research
generally; and purchase equipment for research in electronics,
instrumentation, energy sources, plastics, food technology, mechanics
of materials, hydraulics, and similar fields.
(26) Designate either the cooperative extension department, or any
other university department when appropriate, as the lead department
within the university to implement the provisions of RCW
77.36.040(4)(b). The results of the final decision, any changes to
that decision through time, and contact information for the appropriate
department or staff should be communicated to the department of fish
and wildlife.
(27) Make and transmit to the governor and members of the
legislature upon request such reports as will be helpful in providing
for the institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 2001 c 274 s 5 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect June 30, 2004.

--- END ---