BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the waters of the
state are among the most valuable and fragile of the public's natural
resources and that there is great concern throughout the state relating
to their utilization, protection, restoration, and preservation. In
addition, it finds that ever increasing pressures of additional
consumptive uses are being placed on the rivers, streams, and ground
waters, necessitating increased coordination in the management of the
waters of the state for the benefit of people, farms, and fish.
The legislature finds that state programs, watershed plans, and
similar water resource programs being developed across the state will
include strategies to secure adequate water to meet the needs of people
and the streamflow requirements for fish. It is therefore the intent
of the legislature to direct state agencies to ensure that watershed
programs are developed and implemented that achieve and protect
instream flows.
To accomplish this objective, the legislature intends to:
(1) Commit the state to achieving and protecting instream flows
statewide;
(2) Identify streamflows that are needed to ensure a healthy
watershed and establish these as instream flows;
(3) Require the development of instream flow programs that identify
and schedule the actions needed to achieve and protect instream flows;
(4) Build on the implementation of watershed plans and similar
programs where applicable, and make state agencies accountable to work
jointly with governments and water users to achieve and protect
instream flows; and
(5) Ensure adequate funding for state water management programs,
including for the public share of instream flow programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The independent science panel created under RCW 77.85.040
must provide guidance to the director of the department of ecology on
the following:
(i) Rules to be proposed by the department of ecology establishing
detailed policies for setting instream flows under the criteria
established by section 4(2) of this act;
(ii) Rules to be proposed by the department of ecology establishing
detailed requirements for instream flow programs under the criteria
established by section 5 of this act; and
(iii) Rules establishing instream flows for streams that are
adopted after the effective date of this section and before the
effective date of rules adopted under section 4(1)(b) of this act,
regarding the consistency of the instream flows established by those
rules with the detailed policies of the rules adopted under section
4(1)(b) of this act.
(b) If a rule establishing an instream flow established for a
mainstem river or key tributary in accordance with section 4(1)(a) of
this act is appealed to superior court, the independent science panel
must review the rule and provide an analysis of whether the rule is
consistent with the standards adopted by rule for instream flows under
section 4(1)(b) of this act. The panel must submit its analysis to the
department for placement in its rule-making file as authorized by RCW
34.05.370.
(c) If an instream flow program is appealed to the pollution
control hearings board under section 6 of this act, the independent
science panel must review the program and provide an analysis of
whether the program is consistent with the standards for such programs
established by rules adopted under section 5(2) of this act. The panel
must submit its analysis to the pollution control hearings board under
section 6(1)(b) of this act.
(d) The independent science panel must provide the guidance
required by (a)(i) of this subsection to the department before
developing any other guidance under this section.
(2) The independent science panel must also provide guidance to be
used by the department of ecology in evaluating interim progress in
implementing the instream flow programs approved under section 6 of
this act and in reviewing a program for possible revision at the end of
six years under section 6(4) of this act.
(3) The independent science panel must expand its membership to
provide the expertise to provide the guidance and reviews required
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The panel must, by
majority vote, recommend a list of up to six of the most qualified
scientists as candidates to provide that expertise. Candidates must
possess expertise in hydrology, fluvial geomorphology, fisheries
biology, aquatic ecology, or a similar scientific discipline that
confers expertise on instream flow. Among the candidates must be
scientists who have expertise in instream flow assessment
methodologies. The panel must submit any such list to the governor,
the speaker of the house of representatives, and the senate majority
leader. The speaker of the house of representatives and the senate
majority leader may each remove one name from the list. The governor
must consult with tribal representatives and must appoint two
scientists from the remaining names on the list. The provisions of RCW
77.85.040 regarding members, including their terms, apply to the
members appointed under this section except that these added members
may act only with regard to the guidance required by this section. If
two members are added to the independent science panel under this
section, the membership of the panel includes the members appointed
under this section only with regard to guidance to be provided under
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Instream flow program" means a program developed or to be
developed under sections 5 and 6 of this act.
(3) "Mainstem river" and "key tributary" mean a mainstem river and
a key tributary identified by rule under section 4 of this act.
(4) "Watershed" means a water resource inventory area established
in chapter 173-500 WAC as it exists of the effective date of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1)(a) If a planning unit has received, by
the effective date of this section, funding assistance from the
department under RCW 90.82.040 for the establishment of instream flows
for a mainstem river or key tributary under the procedures provided in
RCW 90.82.080, the flows must be established by the deadlines provided
in RCW 90.82.080. Instream flows must be adopted by the department by
rule for all other mainstem rivers and their key tributaries in the
state by 2010.
(b) By December 2006, the department must adopt by rule the
standards that must be used in establishing instream flow rules that
satisfy the criteria established by subsection (2) of this section.
The department must submit any rules it intends to propose under this
subsection to the independent science panel for guidance under section
2 of this act. The department must discuss with the panel its guidance
and, if the panel and the department disagree as to the rules that
should be proposed, the department must submit the disagreement to
mediation. The rules implementing this subsection that are formally
proposed by the department for adoption under chapter 34.05 RCW must be
consistent with the outcome of the mediation.
(2) Instream flows established by rule after the effective date of
this section must establish flow requirements for normal, low, and high
water years that achieve hydrologic integrity, considering both the
biology and hydrology of the watershed. For the purposes of this
subsection, "hydrologic integrity" means a streamflow that protects
biologic, hydrologic, and ecological functions. In identifying the
flows to be established, the department must use generally accepted,
peer-reviewed methodologies. Such instream flows must incorporate the
current requirements regarding instream flows of any habitat
conservation plan approved under the federal endangered species act (16
U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) or of a federal license for a hydroelectric
power project issued under the federal power act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 791 et
seq.) within the watershed if the plan was approved or the license was
issued before the effective date of the rules adopted under subsection
(1)(b) of this section. Such instream flows must incorporate the
current requirements regarding instream flows of any habitat
conservation plan subsequently approved or revised under the federal
endangered species act or of a federal license for a hydroelectric
power project subsequently issued or reissued under the federal power
act within the watershed to the extent those requirements are not
inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.
(3) By July 2005 the department must adopt by rule a list of the
mainstem rivers and their key tributaries for which instream flows must
be adopted under this section. The key tributaries for the mainstem
rivers include those important to the protection of fish and other
instream environmental values. The department of fish and wildlife
must develop, in consultation with affected Indian tribes, planning
units under chapter 90.82 RCW, and local groups conducting planning for
the department under RCW 90.54.040(1), a list of the key tributaries to
the mainstem rivers and must provide the list to the department for its
rule making. Following the adoption of the list and until an instream
flow program is approved under section 6 of this act for the watershed
containing a mainstem river or key tributary on the list, no water
right permits may be issued by the department for new withdrawals of
water from the mainstem river or key tributary except such permits as
are required for the public health or safety or for proposals that
benefit streamflows or have no net effect on streamflows.
(4) This section may not be construed as automatically requiring
the adoption of new instream flows for any stream for which minimum
instream flows are in effect under chapter 90.22 RCW or for which base
flows are in effect under chapter 90.54 RCW prior to the effective date
of this section. However, once rules have been adopted establishing
standards for instream flows under subsection (1) of this section, the
department must review by 2010 each of the existing minimum instream
flow or base flow rules to determine whether the streamflow
requirements of those rules satisfy the standards adopted under
subsection (1) of this section and must revise the rules as necessary
to bring them into conformity with the standards.
(5) Once the instream flow requirements established by rule for a
watershed have been achieved for a period of five years, the department
must review those requirements to determine whether the hydrologic
integrity sought in establishing the requirements has also been
achieved. If it has not, the rules must be revised. After the initial
review under this subsection of the instream flows established under
this chapter, the department must review all such flows for possible
revision under a schedule that will provide such a review for all
watersheds every ten years.
(6) As used in this chapter and chapters 90.22 and 90.54 RCW, the
terms "minimum instream flows," "base flows," and "instream flows" are
synonymous except that such flows adopted by the department after the
effective date of this section must be referred to as instream flows.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An instream flow program must be
prepared, approved, and implemented for each watershed in the state.
(2) The department must adopt rules establishing minimum
requirements for instream flow programs. The rules must require each
instream flow program to specify:
(a) The actions to be taken to achieve the instream flow
requirements established for mainstem rivers and their key tributaries
in the watershed and the estimated amount of water to be provided to
streamflows from each such action;
(b) Timelines for taking the actions and for achieving the flows;
(c) An entity or entities responsible for taking each action;
(d) Benchmarks to be used to measure the progress in achieving the
instream flows;
(e) Actions that will be taken in the near term, upon the approval
of the program, and actions that will be taken to make ongoing
improvements to secure progress over time. When instream flows are not
achieved, priority must be given to actions that place the most water
in the stream in the near term;
(f) How the benchmarks provided by section 10(1) of this act will
be met;
(g) Monitoring that will be conducted to measure progress;
(h) Actions to be taken any time a drought order is issued under
RCW 43.83B.405 for the watershed;
(i) Funding required to implement the program and the sources of
that funding;
(j) Contingency actions that are to be taken if progress in
achieving the instream flows established by rule is not made as
specified in the timelines and benchmarks; and
(k) How the program will be reviewed and altered as a part of
adaptive management as necessary.
(3) Each instream flow program must incorporate the current
requirements regarding instream flows of any habitat conservation plan
approved under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531
et seq.) or of a federal license for a hydroelectric power project
issued under the federal power act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 791 et seq.) within
the watershed if the plan was approved or the license was issued before
the effective date of the rules adopted under section 4(1)(b) of this
act. Such a program must incorporate the current requirements
regarding instream flows of any habitat conservation plan subsequently
approved or revised under the federal endangered species act or of a
federal license for a hydroelectric power project subsequently issued
or reissued under the federal power act within the watershed to the
extent those requirements are not inconsistent with the provisions of
this chapter.
(4) Each instream flow program must also contain: A summary of
current information and an analysis of the effect of land use on
streamflows, an identification of gaps in the information, and an
assessment program to fill those gaps; a summary of existing and
planned water use conservation and efficiency programs and projects;
and an assessment program for determining the water conservation
potential within the watershed.
(5) The department must identify how such progress in achieving the
instream flows for a stream is to be reported to the department.
Beginning in 2008, the department must report to the governor and
legislature by December 31st of each even-numbered year on the progress
made in achieving and maintaining instream flows in the watersheds of
the state and whether the timelines and benchmarks identified in the
instream flow programs are being met. For any watersheds in which such
timelines and benchmarks are not being met, the report must identify
the actions that will be taken to meet those timelines and benchmarks.
Reports through 2012 must identify the watersheds for which such
programs have been developed and adopted and those for which they have
not.
(6) The departments of ecology and fish and wildlife must jointly
develop a programmatic environmental impact statement under chapter
43.21C RCW for the rules required under this section. The statement
must include an environmental review of the various types of actions
that might be proposed in an instream flow program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1)(a) An instream flow program that
satisfies the requirements of section 5 of this act and this section
must be approved for a watershed within one year of the date instream
flows are established by rule for all of the mainstem rivers and their
key tributaries in the watershed under this chapter. If a minimum
instream flow or base flow has been adopted by rule under chapter 90.54
or 90.22 RCW prior to the effective date of this section for a mainstem
river or its key tributaries, such a program for the watershed
containing the stream must be developed within one year of the date
rules for establishing instream flows are adopted under section 4(1) of
this act unless the flow adopted by rule is to be revised under section
4(3) of this act. If the instream flows are to be revised, an instream
flow program that satisfies the requirements of section 5 of this act
and this section must be approved within one year of the effective date
they are revised.
(b) Each instream flow program developed under section 5 of this
act and this section must be submitted to the department of ecology and
to the department of fish and wildlife. The departments must review,
in consultation with the departments of health and community, trade,
and economic development, the programs for compliance with the
requirements established by rule for the programs by the department of
ecology. Activities and actions that are consistent with natural
hydraulic conditions and that minimize the disruption of those
conditions must be preferred over those that do not. The key elements
of the review must be the answers to the following questions: Is the
deadline for achieving streamflows that satisfy the instream flow rule
requirements reasonable; and will conducting the activities specified
in the program result in achieving those flows by the deadline? When
approving or conditionally approving a program, the departments must
identify the activities and actions specific to the watershed governed
by the program that the departments will take to assist in the
implementation of the program. By an action taken jointly, the
department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife must
approve, conditionally approve, or disapprove such a program based on
its compliance with the department of ecology's rules. The failure of
the departments to take such an action jointly within ninety days of
the date a program is submitted to the department of fish and wildlife
under this subsection constitutes a disapproval of the program. Each
approval, conditional approval, or disapproval is subject to appeal to
the pollution control hearings board under chapter 43.21B RCW. In
addition to the appeal requirements of chapter 43.21B RCW, a copy of
the notice of such an appeal must be submitted to the independent
science panel created under RCW 77.85.040. The panel must review the
appealed program as provided in section 2(1) of this act and submit its
analysis to the pollution control hearings board.
(c) As part of their review of each instream program submitted to
the departments of ecology and fish and wildlife, the departments must,
following public notice, jointly conduct a public hearing on the
program.
(d) For purposes of compliance with chapter 43.21C RCW, the
departments of ecology and fish and wildlife are designated as colead
agencies for conducting environmental review of proposed instream flow
programs.
(2)(a) A planning unit that has conducted planning in a watershed
under chapter 90.82 RCW may choose to develop an instream flow program
for the watershed jointly with the department under this chapter. To
jointly develop the program, the planning unit must notify the
department within three months of the date instream flows are
established by rule for a mainstem river or its key tributaries in the
watershed of its intention to do so. If an instream flow program is
not to be developed jointly by the department and such a planning unit
for a watershed, such a program must be developed for the watershed
under this chapter as a segment of a comprehensive state water
resources program under RCW 90.54.040(1) and this chapter.
(b) An instream flow program developed under RCW 90.54.040(1) must
be developed by the department jointly with or through the advice of a
local group of citizens that represents at least the wide range of
interests referred to for conducting planning under chapter 90.82 RCW.
The department may select such a local group to develop an instream
flow program for a watershed jointly with the department from among the
groups that have petitioned it to do so within three months of the date
instream flows are established by rule for a mainstem river and its key
tributaries in the watershed. If no qualifying local group so
petitions for a watershed, the department must develop the instream
flow program and must appoint such a local group to advise the
department in its development.
(3) If a planning unit notified the department of its intention to
jointly develop an instream flow program for a watershed or if a local
group of citizens was, as the result of a petition, designated by the
department to jointly develop a program for a watershed, but a program
that satisfies the requirements of section 5 of this act is not
developed and submitted to the department and the department of fish
and wildlife within one year of the date instream flows are adopted by
rule for a mainstem river and its key tributaries within the watershed,
the department must develop an instream flow program for the watershed
with the advice of a local group of citizens within the following year.
(4) Each instream flow program must be reviewed and modified as
needed every six years after it is initially approved. However,
beginning in 2017, reviews and updates of programs must be done in
concert with land use plan updates in a watershed.
(5) A local group of citizens developing or providing advice for
the development of an instream flow program under this chapter must
consider any recommendations for priority actions provided by the
department of fish and wildlife under section 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If an instream flow program has been
approved or conditionally approved for a watershed under section 6 of
this act, the department of transportation may expend funds for
environmental mitigation as provided in section 17 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) To achieve instream flows or otherwise
to implement the provisions of an instream flow program, the department
may:
(a) Provide departmental resources for and adopt rules facilitating
voluntary agreements for sharing the use of water that have been
developed through or as part of watershed plans developed and approved
under chapter 90.82 RCW, regional water initiatives conducted under RCW
90.54.040(1), habitat conservation plans approved under the federal
endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), trust water
agreements under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW, or watershed agreements
under RCW 90.03.590;
(b) Expend funds to purchase or lease water rights or to secure low
water easements or other interests in water rights;
(c) Provide financial assistance to water right holders for
projects or activities that conserve the use of water under a water
right as long as the portion of the net water savings, as defined in
RCW 90.38.010, derived from the portion of the funding provided by the
department for the project or activity is placed in the trust water
program of chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW and dedicated to instream flows
for the life of the project or activity;
(d) Provide funding for water conveyance infrastructure projects
that benefit instream flows, including but not limited to those
projects that substitute one source of water for another or provide for
the conjunctive use of water rights;
(e) Provide funding for multipurpose water storage projects.
(2) The department may redirect or prioritize the use of any
capital or operating moneys appropriated to the department for
administrative purposes or for the department's water resources
program, not including water quality programs, to use for establishing
instream flows or developing or approving instream flow programs.
(3) The department may prioritize its compliance activity regarding
water rights and the unauthorized use of water to emphasize compliance
in areas governed by a drought emergency order issued under RCW
43.83B.405 or in a watershed for which instream flows are required
under section 4 of this act but have not yet been established by rule.
(4) By December 1, 2004, the department must recommend to the
legislature and the governor tax incentives for water conservation
projects or activities. The recommendation must include the
implementing legislation in bill form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) In determining where to concentrate the
use of departmental resources for reviewing and approving applications
for permits for new appropriations of water, the department must give
priority to such applications in watersheds for which an instream flow
program has been approved under section 6 of this act and in which the
timelines and milestones identified in the program are being met.
(2) The variations in the flow level requirements in an instream
flow rule for a stream that reflect seasonal and climatic variations
must be used by the department in determining whether to approve
applications for new water use permits or for transfers, changes, or
amendments of existing water rights in the watersheds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The department, in consultation with
the department of fish and wildlife, must review each approved or
conditionally approved instream flow program every two years to assess
whether there is reasonable progress in complying with the requirements
of the program and the timelines established in the program. In
watersheds currently meeting the instream flows established by rule for
the watershed, the program must describe those actions that will be
taken to ensure that the required instream flow will continue to be
met. In watersheds not currently meeting the instream flows
established by rule for the watershed, the instream flows must be
achieved as soon as practicable, but no later than eight years after
the approval of the instream flow program for the watershed, unless
this deadline is extended under subsection (2) of this section.
Reasonable progress in achieving instream flows is demonstrated by the
following benchmarks:
(a) At year two of implementation, scheduled actions have been
taken, pending actions are on schedule for implementation, and initial
improvement to instream flows has occurred;
(b) At years four and six of implementation, significant progress
in achieving and protecting instream flows has occurred, and it is
determined that current and planned actions are likely to achieve the
instream flows established by rule within the established timeline. If
it is determined that current and planned actions are not likely to
achieve the instream flows, supplemental actions must be identified to
achieve the instream flows; and
(c) At year eight of the program, instream flows have been
achieved, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Extensions to the eight-year deadline provided by subsection
(1)(c) of this section may be granted by the department, but are not
favored and may be granted only under extraordinary circumstances.
Extensions may not be granted where watershed or stream conditions are
poor, which includes but is not limited to situations where water
quality standards as established under chapter 90.48 RCW are not being
met, aquatic species are listed under the federal endangered species
act, or aquatic species are listed on the state salmon and stock
inventory as critical or depressed. Further, it must be demonstrated
at the time of initial approval by the state, and at the required two,
four, and six-year reviews, that there is a high likelihood that the
proposed actions being relied on to achieve instream flows will be
fully funded and effective.
(3) If the instream flow program for a watershed does not achieve
the instream flows established by rule for the watershed by the eight-year deadline provided by subsection (1)(c) of this section or the
extended deadline provided by subsection (2) of this section, or if,
during the two, four, or six-year review of the program, the department
finds that the timelines and benchmarks in the program are not met, the
department and the department of fish and wildlife must take such
supplementary actions as are needed to satisfy the timelines and
benchmarks to achieve and protect such flows through the use of any and
all tools available under law, including but not limited to the
following legal authorities:
(a) Chapters 43.27A, 90.03, 90.14, 90.22, 90.44, and 90.54 RCW;
(b) Chapter 90.48 RCW; and
(c) Chapters 43.21C, 36.70A, and 90.58 RCW.
(4) Any person may file an action in Thurston county superior court
or the superior court for the county in which the affected watershed
exists against the director of the department or the director of the
department of fish and wildlife, or both such directors, for the
director's department's alleged failure to perform any of the
following:
(a) Meet the deadlines provided by this chapter or chapter 90.82
RCW for establishing instream flows by rule;
(b) Meet the deadline provided by this chapter for approving or
developing an instream flow program for a watershed;
(c) Implement the responsibilities of the department specified in
an approved instream flow program; and
(d) Implement the provisions of this section or section 11 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) By 2006, the department, in
consultation with the departments of fish and wildlife and health, must
implement the following programs on a statewide basis to support the
successful implementation of instream flow programs:
(a) Publicly accessible information including access to a web site
providing data on streamflows and water use;
(b) Water rights acquisition, water conservation funding, and
changes in water conveyance to benefit instream flows, including those
authorized by section 8(1) of this act;
(c) Drought response;
(d) A water code compliance program; and
(e) A mediation program and other means to facilitate voluntary
shared use agreements and other cooperative mechanisms to achieve
instream flows.
(2) If the department finds as part of a two-year review under
section 10(1) of this act that interim timelines and benchmarks are not
being met in a watershed, the department must, as its initial response,
prepare and distribute technical assistance and educational information
to the general public in the watershed to assist the public in
complying with the requirements of their water rights and applicable
water laws and to the general public and the units of local government
in the watershed to assist them in implementing adaptive management
strategies for meeting future timelines and benchmarks.

Sec. 12 RCW 90.03.247 and 2003 c 39 s 48 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever an application for a permit to make beneficial use of
public waters is approved relating to a stream or other water body for
which minimum flows or levels have been adopted and are in effect at
the time of approval, the permit shall be conditioned to protect the
levels or flows. No agency may establish minimum flows and levels or
similar water flow or level restrictions for any stream or lake of the
state other than the department of ecology whose authority to establish
is exclusive, as provided in chapter 90.03 RCW and RCW 90.22.010 and
90.54.040. The provisions of other statutes, including but not limited
to RCW 77.55.100 and chapter 43.21C RCW, may not be interpreted in a
manner that is inconsistent with this section. In establishing such
minimum flows, levels, or similar restrictions, the department shall,
during all stages of development by the department of ecology of
minimum flow proposals, consult with, and carefully consider the
recommendations of, the department of fish and wildlife, the department
of community, trade, and economic development, and the department of
agriculture, and, regarding such flows and instream flow programs
proposed for approval under section 6 of this act, representatives of
the affected Indian tribes. Nothing herein shall preclude the
department of fish and wildlife, the department of community, trade,
and economic development, or the department of agriculture from
presenting its views on minimum flow needs at any public hearing or to
any person or agency, and the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, and the
department of agriculture are each empowered to participate in
proceedings of the federal energy regulatory commission and other
agencies to present its views on minimum flow needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must recommend to a planning unit or local group of
citizens preparing an instream flow program for a watershed under
section 6 of this act and to the department of ecology the priority
watersheds, tributaries, and stream reaches that require earlier
attention in an instream flow program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 3 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

Sec. 15 RCW 90.82.080 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 4 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) If the initiating governments choose, by majority vote, to
include an instream flow component, it shall be accomplished in the
following manner:
(i) If minimum instream flows have already been adopted by rule for
a stream within the management area, unless the members of the local
governments and tribes on the planning unit by a recorded unanimous
vote request the department to modify those flows, the minimum instream
flows shall not be modified under this chapter. If the members of
local governments and tribes request the planning unit to modify
instream flows and unanimous approval of the decision to modify such
flow is not achieved, then the instream flows shall not be modified
under this section;
(ii) If minimum streamflows have not been adopted by rule for a
stream within the management area, setting the minimum instream flows
shall be a collaborative effort between the department and members of
the planning unit. The department must attempt to achieve consensus
and approval among the members of the planning unit regarding the
minimum flows to be adopted by the department. Approval is achieved if
all government members and tribes that have been invited and accepted
on the planning unit present for a recorded vote unanimously vote to
support the proposed minimum instream flows, and all nongovernmental
members of the planning unit present for the recorded vote, by a
majority, vote to support the proposed minimum instream flows.
(b) The department shall undertake rule making to adopt flows under
(a) of this subsection. The department may adopt the rules either by
the regular rules adoption process provided in chapter 34.05 RCW, the
expedited rules adoption process as set forth in RCW 34.05.353, or
through a rules adoption process that uses public hearings and notice
provided by the county legislative authority to the greatest extent
possible. Such rules do not constitute significant legislative rules
as defined in RCW 34.05.328, and do not require the preparation of
small business economic impact statements.
(c) If approval is not achieved within four years of the date the
planning unit first receives funds from the department for conducting
watershed assessments under RCW 90.82.040, the department ((may)) must
promptly initiate rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW to establish
flows for those streams and shall have two additional years to
establish the instream flows for those streams for which approval is
not achieved.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding RCW 90.03.345, minimum instream flows set
under this section for rivers or streams that do not have existing
minimum instream flow levels set by rule of the department shall have
a priority date of two years after funding is first received from the
department under RCW 90.82.040, unless determined otherwise by a
unanimous vote of the members of the planning unit but in no instance
may it be later than the effective date of the rule adopting such flow.
(b) Any increase to an existing minimum instream flow set by rule
of the department shall have a priority date of two years after funding
is first received for planning in the WRIA or multi-WRIA area from the
department under RCW 90.82.040 and the priority date of the portion of
the minimum instream flow previously established by rule shall retain
its priority date as established under RCW 90.03.345.
(c) Any existing minimum instream flow set by rule of the
department that is reduced shall retain its original date of priority
as established by RCW 90.03.345 for the revised amount of the minimum
instream flow level.
(3) Before setting minimum instream flows under this section, the
department shall engage in government-to-government consultation with
affected tribes in the management area regarding the setting of such
flows.
(4) Nothing in this chapter either: (a) Affects the department's
authority to establish flow requirements or other conditions under RCW
90.48.260 or the federal clean water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.)
for the licensing or relicensing of a hydroelectric power project under
the federal power act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 791 et seq.); or (b) affects or
impairs existing instream flow requirements and other conditions in a
current license for a hydroelectric power project licensed under the
federal power act.
(5) If the planning unit is unable to obtain unanimity under
subsection (1) of this section, the department ((may)) must adopt rules
setting such flows.
(6) The department shall report annually to the appropriate
legislative standing committees on the progress of instream flows being
set under this chapter, as well as progress toward setting instream
flows in those watersheds not being planned under this chapter. The
report shall be made by December 1, 2003, and by December 1st of each
subsequent year.

Sec. 16 RCW 47.12.330 and 1998 c 181 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of environmental mitigation of transportation
projects, the department may acquire or develop, or both acquire and
develop, environmental mitigation sites and water management programs
in advance of the construction of programmed projects. The term
"advanced environmental mitigation" means mitigation of adverse impacts
upon the environment from transportation projects before their design
and construction. Advanced environmental mitigation consists of the
acquisition of property; the acquisition of property, water, or air
rights; the development of property for the purposes of improved
environmental management; engineering costs necessary for such purchase
and development; and the use of advanced environmental mitigation sites
and water management programs to fulfill project environmental permit
requirements. Advanced environmental mitigation must be conducted in
a manner that is consistent with the definition of mitigation found in
the council of environmental quality regulations (40 C.F.R. Sec.
1508.20) and the governor's executive order on wetlands (EO 90-04).
Advanced environmental mitigation is for projects approved by the
transportation commission as part of the state's six-year plan or
included in the state highway system plan. Advanced environmental
mitigation must give consideration to activities related to fish
passage((,)) and fish habitat including but not limited to instream
flows for streams in the watershed in which the project is in whole or
in part located, wetlands, and flood management.
Advanced environmental mitigation may also be conducted in
partnership with federal, state, or local government agencies, tribal
governments, interest groups, or private parties. Partnership
arrangements may include joint acquisition and development of
mitigation sites, purchasing and selling mitigation bank credits among
participants, and transfer of mitigation site title from one party to
another. Water rights secured for instream flows must be placed in the
trust water rights program of chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW and dedicated
to instream flows. Specific conditions of partnership arrangements
will be developed in written agreements for each other form of
mitigation for each applicable environmental mitigation site.
As used in this section, a "water management program" includes
water rights, water infrastructure, and other water programs that
mitigate the project's effects and helps to implement an instream flow
program approved under section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 47.12 RCW
to read as follows:
If an instream flow program has been approved or conditionally
approved under section 6 of this act for a watershed and the department
is to provide mitigation or advanced mitigation for a project that is
located in the watershed, the department shall provide that mitigation
in a manner that implements or assists in implementing the instream
flow program. If the department is to provide mitigation or advanced
mitigation for a project that is located in more than one watershed,
the department shall, to the maximum extent possible, concentrate its
mitigation efforts for the project as a whole by providing mitigation
that implements or assists in implementing the instream flow program or
programs that have been approved or conditionally approved under
section 6 of this act for any of the watersheds in which the project is
located.
As used in this section, "watershed" means a water resource
inventory area established in chapter 173-500 WAC as it exists of the
effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 43.27A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In order to prevent or remedy the impairment of a water right
embodied in an instream flow rule or held by the state as a trust water
right, the department is authorized to bring an appropriate action at
law or in equity, including seeking injunctive relief, in a state
superior court, as it may deem necessary. Such an action must be
initiated in the superior court of the county where the point or points
of diversion or withdrawal of the water right or rights are located.
If the points of diversion or withdrawal are located in more than one
county, the department may bring the action in a county where a point
of diversion or withdrawal is located. Notwithstanding the general
adjudication procedures in RCW 90.03.110 through 90.03.245 and
90.44.220, the superior court shall make findings and a determination
of the validity and priority of the water rights held by the parties as
needed to address any impairment of water rights. The superior court
shall issue any necessary orders to implement its findings and
determination, including injunctive relief, that it determines is
necessary to regulate among the water rights.
(2) Nothing in this section authorizes the department or the
superior court to accomplish a general adjudication of water rights
proceeding or the substantial equivalent of a general adjudication of
water rights. The exclusive procedure for accomplishing a general
adjudication of water rights is under RCW 90.03.110 through 90.03.245
or 90.44.220.
(3) This section does not in any way modify regulatory powers
previously placed with the department before the effective date of this
section.

Sec. 19 RCW 90.42.080 and 2002 c 329 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The state may acquire all or portions of existing water
rights, by purchase, gift, or other appropriate means other than by
condemnation, from any person or entity or combination of persons or
entities. Once acquired, such rights are trust water rights. A water
right acquired by the state that is expressly conditioned to limit its
use to instream purposes shall be administered as a trust water right
in compliance with that condition.
(b) If the holder of a right to water from a body of water chooses
to donate all or a portion of the person's water right to the trust
water system to assist in providing instream flows on a temporary or
permanent basis, the department shall accept the donation on such terms
as the person may prescribe as long as the donation satisfies the
requirements of subsection (4) of this section and the other applicable
requirements of this chapter and the terms prescribed are relevant and
material to protecting any interest in the water right retained by the
donor. Once accepted, such rights are trust water rights within the
conditions prescribed by the donor.
(2) The department may enter into leases, contracts, or such other
arrangements with other persons or entities as appropriate, to ensure
that trust water rights acquired in accordance with this chapter may be
exercised to the fullest possible extent.
(3) Trust water rights may be acquired by the state on a temporary
or permanent basis.
(4) A water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section
shall not exceed the extent to which the water right was exercised
during the five years before the donation nor may the total of any
portion of the water right remaining with the donor plus the donated
portion of the water right exceed the extent to which the water right
was exercised during the five years before the donation. A water right
holder who believes his or her water right has been impaired by a trust
water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section may request
that the department review the impairment claim. If the department
determines that exercising the trust water right resulting from the
donation or exercising a portion of that trust water right donated
under subsection (1)(b) of this section is impairing existing water
rights in violation of RCW 90.42.070, the trust water right shall be
altered by the department to eliminate the impairment. Any decision of
the department to alter or not to alter a trust water right donated
under subsection (1)(b) of this section is appealable to the pollution
control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230. A donated water right's
status as a trust water right under this subsection is not evidence of
the validity or quantity of the water right.
(5) The provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.03.390 do not apply to
donations for instream flows described in subsection (1)(b) of this
section, but do apply to other transfers of water rights under this
section.
(6) ((No funds may be expended for the purchase of water rights by
the state pursuant to this section unless specifically appropriated for
this purpose by the legislature.
(7))) Any water right conveyed to the trust water right system as
a gift that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream
purposes shall be managed by the department for public purposes to
ensure that it qualifies as a gift that is deductible for federal
income taxation purposes for the person or entity conveying the water
right.
(((8))) (7) If the department acquires a trust water right by
lease, the amount of the trust water right shall not exceed the extent
to which the water right was exercised during the five years before the
acquisition was made nor may the total of any portion of the water
right remaining with the original water right holder plus the portion
of the water right leased by the department exceed the extent to which
the water right was exercised during the five years before the
acquisition. A water right holder who believes his or her water right
has been impaired by a trust water right leased under this subsection
may request that the department review the impairment claim. If the
department determines that exercising the trust water right resulting
from the leasing or exercising of a portion of that trust water right
leased under this subsection is impairing existing water rights in
violation of RCW 90.42.070, the trust water right shall be altered by
the department to eliminate the impairment. Any decision of the
department to alter or not to alter a trust water right leased under
this subsection is appealable to the pollution control hearings board
under RCW 43.21B.230. The department's leasing of a trust water right
under this subsection is not evidence of the validity or quantity of
the water right.
(((9))) (8) For a water right donated to or acquired by the trust
water rights program on a temporary basis, the full quantity of water
diverted or withdrawn to exercise the right before the donation or
acquisition shall be placed in the trust water rights program and shall
revert to the donor or person from whom it was acquired when the trust
period ends.

Sec. 20 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2003 c 393 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, and the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW, or
local health departments:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and
90.56.330.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Actions taken by the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife to approve, conditionally approve, or disapprove an instream
flow program under section 6 of this act. In reviewing such an action
regarding such a program, the board must consider any analysis
submitted by the independent science panel under section 6(1)(b) of
this act regarding the program.
(i) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Proceedings conducted by the department, or the department's
designee, under RCW 90.03.160 through 90.03.210 or 90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 21 RCW 34.05.370 and 1998 c 280 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each agency shall maintain an official rule-making file for
each rule that it (a) proposes by publication in the state register, or
(b) adopts. The file and materials incorporated by reference shall be
available for public inspection.
(2) The agency rule-making file shall contain all of the following:
(a) A list of citations to all notices in the state register with
respect to the rule or the proceeding upon which the rule is based;
(b) Copies of any portions of the agency's public rule-making
docket containing entries relating to the rule or the proceeding on
which the rule is based;
(c) All written petitions, requests, submissions, and comments
received by the agency and all other written material regarded by the
agency as important to adoption of the rule or the proceeding on which
the rule is based;
(d) Any official transcript of oral presentations made in the
proceeding on which the rule is based or, if not transcribed, any tape
recording or stenographic record of them, and any memorandum prepared
by a presiding official summarizing the contents of those
presentations;
(e) All petitions for exceptions to, amendment of, or repeal or
suspension of, the rule;
(f) Citations to data, factual information, studies, or reports on
which the agency relies in the adoption of the rule, indicating where
such data, factual information, studies, or reports are available for
review by the public, but this subsection (2)(f) does not require the
agency to include in the rule-making file any data, factual
information, studies, or reports gathered pursuant to chapter 19.85 RCW
or RCW 34.05.328 that can be identified to a particular business;
(g) The concise explanatory statement required by RCW 34.05.325(6);
((and))
(h) Any analysis provided by the independent science panel
regarding the rule under section 2(1)(b) of this act; and
(i) Any other material placed in the file by the agency.
(3) Internal agency documents are exempt from inclusion in the
rule-making file under subsection (2) of this section to the extent
they constitute preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, and intra-agency memoranda in which opinions are expressed or policies formulated
or recommended, except that a specific document is not exempt from
inclusion when it is publicly cited by an agency in connection with its
decision.
(4) Upon judicial review, the file required by this section
constitutes the official agency rule-making file with respect to that
rule. Unless otherwise required by another provision of law, the
official agency rule-making file need not be the exclusive basis for
agency action on that rule.

Sec. 22 RCW 39.34.190 and 2003 c 327 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a city or county and the governing
body of any special purpose district enumerated in subsection (2) of
this section may ((authorize up to ten percent of its)) expend water-related revenues to ((be expended in the implementation of)) implement
watershed management plan projects or activities that are in addition
to the county's, city's, or district's existing water-related services
or activities. ((Such limitation on expenditures shall not apply to
additional revenues for watershed plan implementation that are
authorized by voter approval under section 5 of this act or to water-related revenues of a public utility district organized according to
Title 54 RCW.)) Water-related revenues include rates, charges, and
fees for the provision of services relating to water supply, treatment,
distribution, and management generally, and those general revenues of
the local government that are expended for water management purposes.
A local government may not expend for this purpose any revenues that
were authorized by voter approval for other specified purposes or that
are specifically dedicated to the repayment of municipal bonds or other
debt instruments.
(2) The following special purpose districts may exercise the
authority provided by this section:
(a) Water districts, sewer districts, and water-sewer districts
organized under Title 57 RCW;
(b) Public utility districts organized under Title 54 RCW;
(c) Irrigation, reclamation, conservation, and similar districts
organized under Titles 87 and 89 RCW;
(d) Port districts organized under Title 53 RCW;
(e) Diking, drainage, and similar districts organized under Title
85 RCW;
(f) Flood control and similar districts organized under Title 86
RCW;
(g) Lake management districts organized under chapter 36.61 RCW;
(h) Aquifer protection areas organized under chapter 36.36 RCW; and
(i) Shellfish protection districts organized under chapter 90.72
RCW.
(3) The authority for expenditure of local government revenues
provided by this section shall be applicable broadly to the
implementation of watershed management plans addressing water supply,
water transmission, water quality treatment or protection, or any other
water-related purposes. Such plans include but are not limited to
plans developed under the following authorities:
(a) Watershed plans developed under chapter 90.82 RCW;
(b) Salmon recovery plans developed under chapter 77.85 RCW;
(c) Watershed management elements of comprehensive land use plans
developed under the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW;
(d) Watershed management elements of shoreline master programs
developed under the shoreline management act, chapter 90.58 RCW;
(e) Nonpoint pollution action plans developed under the Puget Sound
water quality management planning authorities of chapter 90.71 RCW and
chapter 400-12 WAC;
(f) Other comprehensive management plans addressing watershed
health at a WRIA level or sub-WRIA basin drainage level;
(g) Coordinated water system plans under chapter 70.116 RCW and
similar regional plans for water supply; and
(h) Any combination of the foregoing plans in an integrated
watershed management plan.
(4) The authority provided by this section to expend revenues for
watershed management plan implementation shall be construed broadly to
include, but not be limited to:
(a) The coordination and oversight of plan implementation,
including funding a watershed management partnership for this purpose;
(b) Technical support, monitoring, and data collection and
analysis;
(c) The design, development, construction, and operation of
projects included in the plan; and
(d) Conducting activities and programs included as elements in the
plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A task force composed of representatives of
the department of ecology, the department of community, trade, and
economic development, and the conservation commission must conduct a
study of the feasibility and practical effects of storing storm water
on farm lands and of designating areas into which flood waters may be
diverted or allowed access for the purposes of both: Enhancing the
recharge of aquifers for the release of waters to streams at times that
would assist in securing needed streamflows; and as a means of reducing
potential flood damage from a storm or flood event in this state. If
the task force finds that such activities if taken in this state would
likely reduce flood damage, the task force must also identify actions
that the state should take to encourage and permit the activities,
including incentives the state should provide to promote such
activities. The task force must report its findings, recommendations,
and proposed legislation to implement its recommendations to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December
31, 2005, at which time the task force expires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 (1) The department of ecology must convene
and provide staff support for a water resources administration and
funding task force. The task force must review the administrative
organization and activities of the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife regarding their water resources functions and the statutory
requirements and authorities for those functions, including those
directing the department of ecology's enforcement activities and
authorizing the redirection of the use of department of ecology funding
and resources. Based on its review, the task force must identify
administrative policies and an organizational structure that it
believes would provide an efficient and effective water resources
program under current law. Once the task force has identified that
structure and those policies, the task force shall develop proposals
for and recommend several options for funding the state's water
resource programs, including both operating programs and capital costs
for water program implementation. The task force must report its
findings and its recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by September 15, 2004.
(2) The task force must consist of:
(a) One representative from each of the following interests:
Agriculture, industry, environmental, fisheries, water utilities, and
power utilities;
(b) One representative of cities and one representative of
counties;
(c) Two representatives of Indian tribes, one from eastern
Washington and one from western Washington; and
(d) Three representatives of the executive branch of state
government.
(3) The department of ecology must invite a representative of the
United States bureau of reclamation to participate as a member of the
task force.

--- END ---