BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that domestic
violence is a growing and more visible public safety problem in
Washington state than ever before, and that domestic violence-related
incidents have a significant bearing on overall law enforcement and
court caseloads. The legislature further recognizes the growing costs
associated with domestic violence prevention and advocacy programs
established by local governments and by community-based organizations.
It is the legislature's intent to establish a penalty in law that
will hold convicted domestic violence offenders accountable while
requiring them to pay penalties to offset the costs of domestic
violence advocacy and prevention programs. It is the legislature's
intent that the penalties imposed against convicted domestic violence
offenders under section 2 of this act be used for established domestic
violence prevention and prosecution programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 10.99 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All superior courts, and courts organized under Title 3 or 35
RCW, may impose a penalty assessment not to exceed one hundred dollars
on any person convicted of a crime involving domestic violence. The
assessment shall be in addition to, and shall not supersede, any other
penalty, restitution, fines, or costs provided by law.
(2) Revenue from the assessment shall be used solely for the
purposes of establishing and funding domestic violence advocacy and
domestic violence prevention and prosecution programs in the city or
county of the court imposing the assessment. Revenue from the
assessment shall not be used for indigent criminal defense. If the
city or county does not have domestic violence advocacy or domestic
violence prevention and prosecution programs, cities and counties may
use the revenue collected from the assessment to contract with
recognized community-based domestic violence program providers.
(3) The assessment imposed under this section shall not be subject
to any state or local remittance requirements under chapter 3.46, 3.50,
3.62, 7.68, 10.82, or 35.20 RCW.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "convicted" includes a plea
of guilty, a finding of guilt regardless of whether the imposition of
the sentence is deferred or any part of the penalty is suspended, or
the levying of a fine. For the purposes of this section, "domestic
violence" has the same meaning as that term is defined under RCW
10.99.020 and includes violations of equivalent local ordinances.
(5) When determining whether to impose a penalty assessment under
this section, judges are encouraged to solicit input from the victim or
representatives for the victim in assessing the ability of the
convicted offender to pay the penalty, including information regarding
current financial obligations, family circumstances, and ongoing
restitution.

Sec. 3 RCW 3.50.100 and 1995 c 291 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Costs in civil and criminal actions may be imposed as provided
in district court. All fees, costs, fines, forfeitures and other money
imposed by any municipal court for the violation of any municipal or
town ordinances shall be collected by the court clerk and, together
with any other noninterest revenues received by the clerk, shall be
deposited with the city or town treasurer as a part of the general fund
of the city or town, or deposited in such other fund of the city or
town, or deposited in such other funds as may be designated by the laws
of the state of Washington.
(2) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, the city treasurer
shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest money
received under this section, other than for parking infractions, and
certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this
subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil
actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against
convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund,
and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 4 RCW 3.62.020 and 1995 c 301 s 31 and 1995 c 291 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
costs, fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected in
whole or in part by district courts, except costs, fines, forfeitures
and penalties assessed and collected, in whole or in part, because of
the violation of city ordinances, shall be remitted by the clerk of the
district court to the county treasurer at least monthly, together with
a financial statement as required by the state auditor, noting the
information necessary for crediting of such funds as required by law.
(2) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, the county
treasurer shall remit thirty-two percent of the noninterest money
received under subsection (1) of this section except certain costs to
the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means
those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW
4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted
defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or
36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are specifically
designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the specific
reimbursement of costs incurred by the state or county in the
prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Money
remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be
deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received by the county
treasurer under subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in
the county current expense fund.
(4) All money collected for county parking infractions shall be
remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly, with the
information required under subsection (1) of this section, to the
county treasurer for deposit in the county current expense fund.
(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the county current
expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county current expense
fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 5 RCW 3.62.090 and 2003 c 380 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be assessed and collected in addition to any fines,
forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than for parking infractions,
by all courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW a public safety and
education assessment equal to seventy percent of such fines,
forfeitures, or penalties, which shall be remitted as provided in
chapters 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, and 35.20 RCW. The assessment required by
this section shall not be suspended or waived by the court.
(2) There shall be assessed and collected in addition to any fines,
forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than for parking infractions
and for fines levied under RCW 46.61.5055, and in addition to the
public safety and education assessment required under subsection (1) of
this section, by all courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, an
additional public safety and education assessment equal to fifty
percent of the public safety and education assessment required under
subsection (1) of this section, which shall be remitted to the state
treasurer and deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The additional
assessment required by this subsection shall not be suspended or waived
by the court.
(3) This section does not apply to the fee imposed under RCW
46.63.110(7) ((or)), the penalty imposed under RCW 46.63.110(8), or the
penalty assessment imposed under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 10.82.070 and 1995 c 292 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All sums of money derived from costs, fines, penalties, and
forfeitures imposed or collected, in whole or in part, by a superior
court for violation of orders of injunction, mandamus and other like
writs, for contempt of court, or for breach of the penal laws shall be
paid in cash by the person collecting the same, within twenty days
after the collection, to the county treasurer of the county in which
the same have accrued.
(2) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, the county
treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the money received
under this section except for certain costs to the state treasurer for
deposit as provided under RCW 43.08.250 and shall deposit the remainder
as provided by law. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means
those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW
4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted
defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or
36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are specifically
designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the specific
reimbursement of costs incurred by the state or county in the
prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Costs
or assessments awarded to dedicated accounts, state or local, are not
subject to this state allocation or to RCW 7.68.035.
(3) All fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties collected or
assessed by a district court because of the violation of a state law
shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is
later amended. All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected
or assessed by a superior court in cases on appeal from a lower court
shall be remitted to the municipal or district court from which the
cases were appealed.

Sec. 7 RCW 3.46.120 and 1995 c 291 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All money received by the clerk of a municipal department
including penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees and costs shall be
paid by the clerk to the city treasurer.
(2) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, the city treasurer
shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest money
received under this section, other than for parking infractions, and
certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this
subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil
actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against
convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund,
and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 8 RCW 3.62.040 and 1995 c 291 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
costs, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected, in
whole or in part, by district courts because of violations of city
ordinances shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court at
least monthly directly to the treasurer of the city wherein the
violation occurred.
(2) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, the city treasurer
shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest money
received under this section, other than for parking infractions and
certain costs, to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this
subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil
actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against
convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) All money collected for city parking infractions shall be
remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly to the
city treasurer for deposit in the city's general fund.
(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund,
and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 9 RCW 35.20.220 and 1995 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The chief clerk, under the supervision and direction of the
court administrator of the municipal court, shall have the custody and
care of the books, papers and records of said court; he shall be
present by himself or deputy during the session of said court, and
shall have the power to swear all witnesses and jurors, and administer
oaths and affidavits, and take acknowledgments. He shall keep the
records of said court, and shall issue all process under his hand and
the seal of said court, and shall do and perform all things and have
the same powers pertaining to his office as the clerks of the superior
courts have in their office. He shall receive all fines, penalties and
fees of every kind, and keep a full, accurate and detailed account of
the same; and shall on each day pay into the city treasury all money
received for said city during the day previous, with a detailed account
of the same, and taking the treasurer's receipt therefor.
(2) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, the city treasurer
shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest money
received under this section, other than for parking infractions and
certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this
subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil
actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against
convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund,
and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

--- END ---