BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, although family
leave laws have assisted individuals to balance the demands of the
workplace with their family responsibilities, more needs to be done to
achieve the goals of work force stability and economic security. In
particular, the legislature finds that many individuals do not have
access to family leave laws, and those who do may not be in a financial
position to take family leave that is unpaid, and that employer-paid
benefits, including family leave and disability benefits, meet only a
relatively small part of this need. The legislature declares it to be
in the public interest to establish a program that: (1) Provides
additional options for individuals to use in balancing work and family
responsibilities; (2) is in addition to those programs offered by
employers; (3) provides limited income support for a reasonable period
while an individual is away from work on family leave; and (4) reduces
the impact on state income support programs by increasing an
individual's ability to provide caregiving services for family members
while maintaining an employment relationship.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Application year" means the twelve-month period beginning on
the first day of the calendar week in which an individual files an
application for family leave insurance benefits and, thereafter, the
twelve-month period beginning with the first day of the calendar week
in which the individual next files an application for family leave
insurance benefits after the expiration of the individual's last
preceding application year.
(2) "Calendar quarter" has the meaning provided in RCW 50.04.050.
(3) "Child" means a person who is:
(a) A biological, adopted, or foster child, a stepchild, a legal
ward, or a child of a person standing in loco parentis; and
(b)(i) Under eighteen years of age; or
(ii) Eighteen years of age or older and incapable of self-care
because of a mental or physical disability.
(4) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries.
(6) "Domestic partner" means an unmarried person eighteen years of
age or older of the same sex as an unmarried individual who is eighteen
years of age or older and: (a) To whom the individual is unable to be
lawfully married; (b) with whom the individual entered into a close
personal relationship in lieu of lawful marriage when both parties were
mentally competent and has maintained a close personal relationship
solely with that person for a minimum of six continuous months; (c)
with whom the individual shares a regular and permanent residence; (d)
with whom the individual has agreed to be jointly responsible for basic
living expenses incurred during the domestic partnership; and (e) to
whom the individual is not related by blood as would bar marriage.
(7) "Employer" means: (a) The same as the definition in RCW
50.04.080; and (b) the state and its political subdivisions.
(8) "Employment" has the meaning provided in RCW 50.04.100.
(9) "Family leave" means leave from employment:
(a) To care for a newborn child or adopted or foster child of the
individual or the individual's spouse or domestic partner when leave is
completed within twelve months after the birth or the placement for
adoption or foster care, as applicable;
(b) To care for the individual's family member who has a serious
health condition; or
(c) Because of the individual's serious health condition that makes
the individual unable to perform the functions of the individual's
position.
(10) "Family leave insurance benefits" means the benefits payable
under sections 6 and 7 of this act.
(11) "Family member" means a child, spouse or domestic partner, or
the parent of the individual or individual's spouse or domestic
partner.
(12) "Health care provider" means a person licensed as a physician
under chapter 18.71 RCW or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.57 RCW.
(13) "Parent" means a biological or adoptive parent, a stepparent,
or an individual who stood in loco parentis to an individual or an
individual's spouse or domestic partner when the individual or
individual's spouse or domestic partner was a child.
(14) "Premium" or "premiums" means taxes, which are the money
payments required by this chapter to be made to the department for the
family leave insurance account under section 22 of this act.
(15) "Qualifying year" means the first four of the last five
completed calendar quarters or the last four completed calendar
quarters immediately preceding the first day of the individual's
application year.
(16) "Regularly working" means the average number of hours per work
week that an individual worked in the two quarters of the individual's
qualifying year in which total wages were highest.
(17) "Serious health condition" means an illness, injury,
impairment, or physical or mental condition that involves a period of
incapacity or treatment connected with inpatient care, such as an
overnight stay, in a hospital, hospice, or residential medical care
facility, and a period of incapacity or subsequent treatment or
recovery in connection with such inpatient care; or that involves
continuing treatment by or under the supervision of a health care
provider or a provider of health care services and which includes a
period of incapacity, such as an inability to work, attend school, or
perform other regular daily activities.
(18) "Unpaid family leave" means family leave for which the
individual receives no cash remuneration from the employer from whom
leave is taken.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall establish and
administer a family leave insurance program and pay family leave
insurance benefits as specified in this chapter.
(2) The department shall establish procedures and forms for filing
claims for benefits under this chapter. The department shall notify
the employer within two business days of a claim being filed under
section 4 of this act.
(3) The department may require that a claim for benefits under this
chapter be supported by a certification issued by the health care
provider providing health care to the individual or individual's family
member, as applicable.
(4) Information contained in the files and records pertaining to an
individual under this chapter are confidential and not open to public
inspection, other than to public employees in the performance of their
official duties. However, the individual or an authorized
representative of an individual may review the records or receive
specific information from the records on the presentation of the signed
authorization of the individual. An employer or the employer's duly
authorized representative may review the records of an individual
employed by the employer in connection with a pending claim. At the
department's discretion, other persons may review records when such
persons are rendering assistance to the department at any stage of the
proceedings on any matter pertaining to the administration of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Beginning on July 3, 2005, family leave
insurance benefits are payable to an individual during a period in
which the individual is on unpaid family leave if the individual:
(1) Files a claim for benefits as required by rules adopted by the
director;
(2) Has been employed for at least six hundred eighty hours in
employment during the individual's qualifying year;
(3) Establishes an application year. An application year may not
be established if the qualifying year includes hours worked before
establishment of a previous application year;
(4) Consents to the disclosure of information or records deemed
private and confidential under chapter 50.13 RCW. Initial disclosure
of this information and these records by the employment security
department to the department is solely for purposes related to the
administration of this chapter. Further disclosure of this information
or these records is subject to sections 3(4) and 13(2)(b) of this act;
(5) Discloses whether or not he or she owes child support
obligations as defined in RCW 50.40.050; and
(6) Documents that he or she has provided the employer from whom
family leave is to be taken with written notice of the individual's
intention to take family leave as follows:
(a) If the necessity for family leave defined in section 2(9)(a) of
this act was foreseeable based on an expected birth or placement,
notice was given at least thirty days before the family leave was to
begin, stating the anticipated starting date and ending date of the
family leave. However, if the date of birth or placement required
family leave to begin in less than thirty days, as much notice as
practicable was given; and
(b) If the necessity for family leave defined in section 2(9) (b)
or (c) of this act was foreseeable based on planned medical treatment:
(i) Notice was given at least thirty days before the family leave
was to begin, stating the anticipated starting date and ending date of
the family leave. However, if the date of the treatment required
family leave to begin in less than thirty days, as much notice as
practicable was given; and
(ii) The individual made reasonable efforts to schedule the
treatment so as not to disrupt unduly the operations of the employer,
subject to the approval of the health care provider of the individual
or family member, as applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 An individual is disqualified from family
leave insurance benefits beginning with the first day of the calendar
week, and continuing for the next fifty-two consecutive weeks, in which
the individual:
(1) Willfully made a false statement or misrepresentation regarding
a material fact, or willfully failed to report a material fact, to
obtain benefits under this chapter; or
(2) With respect to family leave defined in section 2(9)(c) of this
act is suffering from:
(a) A willful and intentional self-inflicted serious health
condition; or
(b) A serious health condition resulting from the individual's
perpetration of a gross misdemeanor or felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The maximum number of weeks during which
family leave insurance benefits are payable in an application year is
five weeks. However, benefits are not payable during a waiting period
consisting of the first five work days of family leave taken in an
application year with respect to a particular type of family leave,
whether the first five work days of family leave are employer paid or
unpaid.
(2)(a) The first payment of benefits must be made to an individual
within two weeks after the claim is filed or the family leave began,
whichever is later, and subsequent payments must be made semimonthly
thereafter.
(b) If an individual dies before he or she receives a payment of
benefits, the payment shall be made to the surviving spouse or the
child or children if there is no surviving spouse. If there is no
surviving spouse and no child or children, the payment shall be made by
the department and distributed consistent with the terms of the
decedent's will or, if the decedent dies intestate, consistent with the
terms of RCW 11.04.015.
(3) Benefits are not payable and waiting period credits are not
earned under this chapter for any weeks in which compensation is paid
or payable to the individual under Title 50 RCW or similar law of
another state or the United States, or under RCW 51.32.060 or 51.32.090
or another state or federal workers' compensation law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The amount of family leave insurance
benefits shall be determined as follows:
(1) For weeks of family leave beginning before January 1, 2006, the
weekly benefit shall be two hundred fifty dollars per week for an
individual who at the time of beginning family leave was regularly
working forty hours or more per week. By December 31, 2006, and by
each subsequent December 31st, the department shall calculate to the
nearest dollar an adjusted maximum weekly benefit to account for
inflation using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and
clerical workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve completed
calendar months before each December 31st as calculated by the United
States department of labor. The adjusted maximum weekly benefit takes
effect for weeks of family leave beginning after the relevant December
31st.
(2) If an individual who at the time of beginning family leave was
regularly working forty hours or more per week is on family leave for
less than forty hours but at least eight hours in a week, the
individual's weekly benefit shall be .025 times the maximum weekly
benefit times the number of hours of family leave taken in the week.
Benefits are not payable for less than eight hours of family leave
taken in a week.
(3) For an individual who at the time of beginning family leave was
regularly working less than forty hours per week, the department shall
calculate a prorated schedule for a weekly benefit amount and a minimum
number of hours of family leave that must be taken in a week for
benefits to be payable, with the prorated schedule based on the amounts
and the calculations specified under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.
(4) If an individual discloses that he or she owes child support
obligations under section 4 of this act and the department determines
that the individual is eligible for benefits, the department shall
notify the applicable state or local child support enforcement agency
and deduct and withhold an amount from benefits in a manner consistent
with RCW 50.40.050.
(5) If an individual elects to have federal income tax deducted and
withheld from benefits, the department shall deduct and withhold the
amount specified in the federal internal revenue code in a manner
consistent with section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The department must advise an individual
filing a new claim for family leave insurance benefits, at the time of
filing such claim, that:
(a) Benefits are subject to federal income tax;
(b) Requirements exist pertaining to estimated tax payments;
(c) The individual may elect to have federal income tax deducted
and withheld from the individual's payment of benefits at the amount
specified in the federal internal revenue code; and
(d) The individual is permitted to change a previously elected
withholding status.
(2) Amounts deducted and withheld from benefits must remain in the
family leave insurance account until transferred to the federal taxing
authority as a payment of income tax.
(3) The director shall follow all procedures specified by the
federal internal revenue service pertaining to the deducting and
withholding of income tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If family leave insurance benefits are paid
erroneously or as a result of fraud, or if a claim for family leave
benefits is rejected after benefits are paid, RCW 51.32.240 shall
apply, except that appeals are governed by section 14 of this act, and
the department shall seek repayment of benefits from the recipient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 During a period in which an individual
receives family leave insurance benefits under this chapter, the
individual is entitled to unpaid family leave and, at the established
ending date of leave, to be reinstated in his or her position with the
employer from whom leave was taken subject to the following:
(1)(a) An employer may require that family leave for which an
individual is receiving or received family leave insurance benefits
under this chapter be taken concurrently with leave under the federal
family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107
Stat. 6), chapter 49.78 RCW, or other applicable federal, state, or
local law, except that:
(i) Family leave taken for sickness or temporary disability because
of pregnancy or childbirth is in addition to leave under the federal
family and medical leave act of 1993, chapter 49.78 RCW, or other
applicable federal, state, or local law.
(ii) Family leave during which the individual is receiving or
received family leave insurance benefits under this chapter is in
addition to leave from employment during which benefits are paid or are
payable under RCW 51.32.060 or 51.32.090 or another state or federal
workers' compensation law and that is designated as leave under the
federal family and medical leave act of 1993, chapter 49.78 RCW, or
other applicable federal, state, or local law.
(b) If an employer requires that family leave for which an
individual is receiving or received benefits under this chapter be
taken concurrently with leave under the federal family and medical
leave act of 1993, chapter 49.78 RCW, or other applicable federal,
state, or local law, the employer must give all individuals in its
employ written notice of the requirement.
(2)(a) If the individual is entitled, on return from family leave
under this chapter, to reinstatement under the federal family and
medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6),
chapter 49.78 RCW, or other applicable federal, state, or local law,
other than this chapter, reinstatement is required as provided under
the applicable law most favorable to the individual.
(b)(i) If the individual is not entitled to reinstatement on return
from family leave under (a) of this subsection, the individual is
entitled, upon return from leave under this chapter, to be reinstated:
(A) In the same position held by the individual when the leave
commenced;
(B) In a position with equivalent benefits and pay at a workplace
within twenty miles of the individual's workplace when leave commenced;
or
(C) If the employer's circumstances have so changed that the
individual cannot be reinstated in the same position, or a position of
equivalent pay and benefits, the individual shall be reinstated in any
other position which is vacant and for which the individual is
qualified.
(ii) The entitlement under this subsection (2)(b) is subject to
bona fide changes in compensation or work duties, and does not apply
if:
(A) The individual's position is eliminated by a bona fide
restructuring or reduction-in-force;
(B) The individual's workplace is permanently or temporarily shut
down for at least thirty days;
(C) The individual's workplace is moved to a location at least
sixty miles from the location of the workplace when leave commenced;
(D) An individual on family leave takes another job; or
(E) The individual fails to return on the established ending date
of leave.
(3) An individual who has been on unpaid family leave while
receiving family leave insurance benefits under this chapter shall not
lose any employment benefit, including seniority or pension rights,
accrued before the date that family leave commenced. However, this
chapter does not entitle an individual to accrue employment benefits
during a period of family leave or to a right, benefit, or position of
employment other than a right, benefit, or position to which the
individual would have been entitled had the individual not taken family
leave.
(4) This section shall be enforced as provided in RCW 49.78.005(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) This chapter does not limit an
individual's right to leave from employment under other laws or
employer policy, as applicable, except as provided in this chapter.
(2) If an employer provides paid family leave through disability
insurance or any other means, the individual may elect whether first to
use the paid family leave or to receive family leave insurance benefits
under this chapter. An individual may not be required to use the
individual's paid family leave to which the individual is otherwise
entitled before receiving benefits under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) An employer of individuals not covered
by this chapter or a self-employed person, including a sole proprietor,
partner, or joint venturer, may elect coverage under this chapter for
all individuals in its employ for an initial period of not less than
three years or a subsequent period of not less than one year
immediately following another period of coverage. The employer or
self-employed person must file a notice of election in writing with the
director, as required by the department. The election becomes
effective on the date of filing the notice.
(2) An employer or self-employed person who has elected coverage
may withdraw from coverage within thirty days after the end of the
three-year period of coverage, or at such other times as the director
may prescribe by rule, by filing written notice with the director, such
withdrawal to take effect not sooner than thirty days after filing the
notice.
(3) The department may cancel elective coverage if the employer or
self-employed person fails to make required payments or reports. The
department may collect due and unpaid premiums and may levy an
additional premium for the remainder of the period of coverage. The
cancellation shall be effective no later than thirty days from the date
of the notice in writing advising the employer or self-employed person
of the cancellation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) In the form and at the times specified
by the director, an employer shall make reports, furnish information,
and remit premiums as required by section 20 of this act to the
department. If the employer is a temporary help company that provides
employees on a temporary basis to its customers, the temporary help
company is considered the employer for purposes of this section.
However, if the temporary help company fails to remit the required
premiums, the customer to whom the employees were provided is liable
for paying the premiums.
(2)(a) An employer must keep at his or her place of business a
record of employment from which the information needed by the
department for purposes of this chapter may be obtained. This record
shall at all times be open to the inspection of the director or
department employees designated by the director.
(b) Information obtained from employer records under this chapter
is confidential and not open to public inspection, other than to public
employees in the performance of their official duties. However, an
interested party shall be supplied with information from employer
records to the extent necessary for the proper presentation of the case
in question. An employer may authorize inspection of its records by
written consent.
(3) An employer is subject to the requirements relating to the
assessment and collection of industrial insurance premiums under Title
51 RCW, including but not limited to penalties, interest, and
department lien rights and collection remedies if the employer:
(a) Fails under this chapter to make the required reports, or fails
to remit the full amount of the premiums when due; or
(b) Willfully makes a false statement or misrepresentation
regarding a material fact, or willfully fails to report a material
fact, to avoid making the required reports or remitting the full amount
of the premiums when due under this chapter.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, appeals are
governed by section 14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) A person aggrieved by a decision of the
department under this chapter must file a notice of appeal with the
director, by mail or personally, within thirty days after the date on
which a copy of the department's decision was communicated to the
person. Upon receipt of the notice of appeal, the director shall
request the assignment of an administrative law judge in accordance
with chapter 34.05 RCW to conduct a hearing and issue a proposed
decision and order. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The administrative law judge's proposed decision and order
shall be final and not subject to further appeal unless, within thirty
days after the decision is communicated to the interested parties, a
party petitions for review by the director. If the director's review
is timely requested, the director may order additional evidence by the
administrative law judge. On the basis of the evidence before the
administrative law judge and such additional evidence as the director
may order to be taken, the director shall render a decision affirming,
modifying, or setting aside the administrative law judge's decision.
The director's decision becomes final and not subject to further appeal
unless, within thirty days after the decision is communicated to the
interested parties, a party files a petition for judicial review as
provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. The director is a party to any judicial
action involving the director's decision and shall be represented in
the action by the attorney general.
(3) If an appeal involves the right of an individual to family
leave insurance benefits under this chapter, the parties shall be
afforded an opportunity for hearing within seven days of the appeal
being filed with the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If, upon administrative or judicial review,
the decision of the department is reversed or modified, the
administrative law judge or the court in its discretion may award
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the prevailing party.
Attorneys' fees and costs owed by the department, if any, are payable
from the family leave insurance account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 An employer, temporary help company,
employment agency, employee organization, or other person may not
discharge, expel, or otherwise discriminate against a person because he
or she has filed or communicated to the employer an intent to file a
claim, a complaint, or an appeal, or has testified or is about to
testify or has assisted in any proceeding, under this chapter. This
section shall be enforced as provided in RCW 51.48.025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) This chapter is not intended to
discourage employers from adopting or retaining policies that provide
additional benefits to individuals to address family leave needs.
(2) This chapter is not to be construed to diminish an employer's
obligation to comply with a collective bargaining agreement or an
employment benefit program or plan that provides greater benefits to
individuals than the family leave insurance benefits provided under
this chapter.
(3) An agreement by an individual to waive his or her rights under
this chapter is void as against public policy.
(4) The benefits provided to individuals under this chapter may not
be diminished by a collective bargaining agreement or an employment
benefit program or plan entered into or renewed after the effective
date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) Family leave insurance benefits are
payable under this chapter only to the extent provided in sections 6
and 7 of this act and only to the extent that money is available in the
family leave insurance account for this purpose. Neither the state nor
the department is liable for any amount in excess of these limits.
(2) This chapter does not create a continuing entitlement or
contractual right. The legislature reserves the right to amend or
repeal all or part of this chapter at any time, and a benefit or other
right granted under this chapter exists subject to the legislature's
power to amend or repeal this chapter. There is no vested private
right of any kind against such amendment or repeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The director may adopt rules as necessary
to implement this chapter. In adopting rules, the director shall
maintain consistency with the rules adopted to implement the federal
family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107
Stat. 6), to the extent such rules are not in conflict with this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1)(a) Except as provided in this section,
beginning on January 1, 2005, each employer shall retain from the
earnings of each individual a premium of one cent per hour worked, up
to a maximum of forty hours per week. The employer shall match the
amount retained by an equal amount, and the money retained shall be
paid to the department in the manner and at such intervals as the
department directs for deposit in the family leave insurance account.
In the payment of premiums, a fractional part of a cent shall be
disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which case
it shall be increased to one cent.
(b) The director shall adjust the amount of the premium from time
to time to ensure that the amount is the lowest rate necessary to pay
family leave insurance benefits and administrative costs, and maintain
actuarial solvency in accordance with recognized insurance principles,
of the family leave insurance program on a current basis.
(2) The state apprenticeship council shall pay the entire amount
required to be remitted for the family leave insurance account to the
department for registered apprentices or trainees during their
participation in supplemental and related instruction classes.
(3) None of the amount assessed for the family leave insurance
account may be retained from the earnings of individuals covered under
RCW 51.16.210.
(4) The department may adopt rules to permit an individual with
multiple employers and their employers to petition for refunds or
credits of amounts paid to the department for hours in excess of forty
hours per week worked by the individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 (1) When an employer quits business, or
sells out, exchanges, or otherwise disposes of the employer's business
or stock of goods, any premium payable under this chapter is
immediately due and payable, and the employer must, within ten days
thereafter, make a return and pay the premium due. Any person who
becomes a successor to the business is liable for the full amount of
the premium and must withhold from the purchase price a sum sufficient
to pay any premium due from the employer until the employer produces a
receipt from the department showing payment in full of any premium due
or a certificate that no premium is due and, if the premium is not paid
by the employer within ten days from the date of the sale, exchange, or
disposal, the successor is liable for the payment of the full amount of
the premium. The successor's payment thereof is a payment upon the
purchase price, and if the payment is greater than the purchase price,
the amount of the difference is a debt due the successor from the
employer.
(2) A successor is not liable for any premium due from the person
from whom the successor has acquired a business or stock of goods if
the successor gives written notice to the department of the acquisition
and no assessment is issued by the department within one hundred eighty
days of receipt of the notice against the former operator of the
business and a copy thereof mailed to the successor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The family leave insurance account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the
premium imposed under section 20 of this act or the penalties imposed
under section 13 of this act must be deposited in the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of the
family leave insurance program. Only the director or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for benefit payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The director shall lend . . . . . dollars
from the supplemental pension account to the family leave insurance
account. These loaned funds may be expended solely for the purposes of
administering the family leave insurance program under this chapter.
The director shall repay the supplemental pension fund, plus its
proportionate share of earnings from investment of moneys in the
supplemental pension fund during the loan period, from the family leave
insurance account by . . . . . . . ..

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Sections 1 through 24 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

--- END ---