BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that sex offenses
against children are among the most heinous of crimes and that the
legislature has a paramount duty to protect children from victimization
by sex offenders. Sentencing policy in Washington state should ensure
that punishment of sex offenders is pursued to the extent that such
punishment does not jeopardize the safety of children or hinder the
successful prosecution of sex offenses against children. The special
sex offender sentencing alternative was enacted in 1984 to protect
victims of sexual assault. A 1991 evaluation of the effectiveness of
the sentencing alternative concluded that it accurately selected sex
offenders who, with supervision and treatment, reoffend at lower rates
and that the use of the sentencing alternative does not increase risk
to the community. Today, strong support for the special sex offender
sentencing alternative continues among advocates for children who are
victims of sexual assault and prosecutors who prosecute sex offenses
against children.
(2) The legislature further finds that several weaknesses in the
structure and administration of the special sex offender sentencing
alternative have been identified and should be addressed. In addition,
a comprehensive analysis and evaluation of the special sex offender
sentencing alternative is needed to ensure that efforts to reform the
sentencing alternative do not result in jeopardizing the safety of
children or hindering the successful prosecution of sex offenses
against children.
(3) The legislature intends to protect children from victimization
by sex offenders by taking immediate action to increase punishment for
the most serious sex offenses against children, making immediate
changes in the special sex offender sentencing alternative to address
known weaknesses in the program, and thoroughly evaluating the
effectiveness of the special sex offender sentencing alternative to
determine whether additional changes are needed to further increase the
protection of children from victimization by sex offenders.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2003 c 335 s 5, 2003 c 283 s 33, 2003 c
267 s 3, 2003 c 250 s 14, 2003 c 119 s 8, 2003 c 53 s 56, and 2003 c 52
s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

Rape of a Child 1 when offender is at
least eighteen years of age when
charged (RCW 9A.44.073)

Rape of a Child 2 when offender is at
least eighteen years of age when
charged (RCW 9A.44.076)

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 when offender is
under eighteen years of age when
charged, but subject to adult
felony prosecution because the
juvenile court lacks jurisdiction
under RCW 13.04.030, or has
declined jurisdiction under RCW
13.40.110 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 when offender is
under eighteen years of age when
charged, but subject to adult
felony prosecution because the
juvenile court lacks jurisdiction
under RCW 13.04.030, or has
declined jurisdiction under RCW
13.40.110 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(3))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.670 and 2002 c 175 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies exclusively to:
(a) Offenders who are at least eighteen years old when they are
charged with crimes committed prior to the effective date of this act;
and
(b) Offenders who are less than eighteen years old when they are
charged, but are subject to adult felony prosecution because the
juvenile court lacks jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030, or has declined
jurisdiction under RCW 13.40.110, prior to, on, or after the effective
date of this act.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply to this section only.
(a) "Sex offender treatment provider" or "treatment provider" means
a certified sex offender treatment provider as defined in RCW
18.155.020.
(b) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as
a result of the crime charged. "Victim" also means a parent or
guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or guardian
is the perpetrator of the offense.
(((2))) (3) An offender is eligible for the special sex offender
sentencing alternative if:
(a) The offender has been convicted of a sex offense other than a
violation of RCW 9A.44.050 or a sex offense that is also a serious
violent offense;
(b) The offender has no prior convictions for a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or any other felony sex offenses in this or
any other state; and
(c) The offender's standard sentence range for the offense includes
the possibility of confinement for less than eleven years.
(((3))) (4) If the court finds the offender is eligible for this
alternative, the court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or
the offender, may order an examination to determine whether the
offender is amenable to treatment.
(a) The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the
following:
(i) The offender's version of the facts and the official version of
the facts;
(ii) The offender's offense history;
(iii) An assessment of problems in addition to alleged deviant
behaviors;
(iv) The offender's social and employment situation; and
(v) Other evaluation measures used.
The report shall set forth the sources of the examiner's information.
(b) The examiner shall assess and report regarding the offender's
amenability to treatment and relative risk to the community. A
proposed treatment plan shall be provided and shall include, at a
minimum:
(i) Frequency and type of contact between offender and therapist;
(ii) Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and
description of planned treatment modalities;
(iii) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living
conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members
and others;
(iv) Anticipated length of treatment; and
(v) Recommended crime-related prohibitions.
(c) The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the
state shall order, a second examination regarding the offender's
amenability to treatment. The examiner shall be selected by the party
making the motion. The offender shall pay the cost of any second
examination ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent
in which case the state shall pay the cost.
(((4))) (5) After receipt of the reports, the court shall consider
whether the offender and the community will benefit from use of this
alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender
should receive a treatment disposition under this section. If the
court determines that this alternative is appropriate, the court shall
then impose a sentence or, pursuant to RCW 9.94A.712, a minimum term of
sentence, within the standard sentence range. If the sentence imposed
is less than eleven years of confinement, the court may suspend the
execution of the sentence and impose the following conditions of
suspension:
(a) The court shall place the offender on community custody for the
length of the suspended sentence, the length of the maximum term
imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.712, or three years, whichever is
greater, and require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed
by the department under RCW 9.94A.720.
(b) The court shall order treatment for any period up to three
years in duration. The court, in its discretion, shall order
outpatient sex offender treatment or inpatient sex offender treatment,
if available. A community mental health center may not be used for
such treatment unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex
offender treatment. The offender shall not change sex offender
treatment providers or treatment conditions without first notifying the
prosecutor, the community corrections officer, and the court. If any
party or the court objects to a proposed change, the offender shall not
change providers or conditions without court approval after a hearing.
(((5))) (6) As conditions of the suspended sentence, the court may
impose one or more of the following:
(a) Up to six months of confinement, not to exceed the sentence
range of confinement for that offense;
(b) Crime-related prohibitions;
(c) Require the offender to devote time to a specific employment or
occupation;
(d) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the
court or the community corrections officer prior to any change in the
offender's address or employment;
(e) Report as directed to the court and a community corrections
officer;
(f) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided
in RCW 9.94A.030;
(g) Perform community restitution work; or
(h) Reimburse the victim for the cost of any counseling required as
a result of the offender's crime.
(((6))) (7) At the time of sentencing, the court shall set a
treatment termination hearing for three months prior to the anticipated
date for completion of treatment.
(((7))) (8) The sex offender treatment provider shall submit
quarterly reports on the offender's progress in treatment to the court
and the parties. The report shall reference the treatment plan and
include at a minimum the following: Dates of attendance, offender's
compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the offender's
relative progress in treatment, and any other material specified by the
court at sentencing.
(((8))) (9) Prior to the treatment termination hearing, the
treatment provider and community corrections officer shall submit
written reports to the court and parties regarding the offender's
compliance with treatment and monitoring requirements, and
recommendations regarding termination from treatment, including
proposed community custody conditions. Either party may request, and
the court may order, another evaluation regarding the advisability of
termination from treatment. The offender shall pay the cost of any
additional evaluation ordered unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost. At the treatment
termination hearing the court may: (a) Modify conditions of community
custody, and either (b) terminate treatment, or (c) extend treatment
for up to the remaining period of community custody.
(((9))) (10) If a violation of conditions occurs during community
custody, the department shall either impose sanctions as provided for
in RCW 9.94A.737(2)(a) or refer the violation to the court and
recommend revocation of the suspended sentence as provided for in
subsections (((6))) (7) and (((8))) (9) of this section.
(((10))) (11) The court may revoke the suspended sentence at any
time during the period of community custody and order execution of the
sentence if: (a) The offender violates the conditions of the suspended
sentence, or (b) the court finds that the offender is failing to make
satisfactory progress in treatment. All confinement time served during
the period of community custody shall be credited to the offender if
the suspended sentence is revoked.
(((11))) (12) The offender's sex offender treatment provider may
not be the same person who examined the offender under subsection (4)
of this section or any person who employs, is employed by, or shares
profits with the person who examined the offender under subsection (4)
of this section, unless the court has entered written findings that
such treatment is in the best interests of the victim and that
successful treatment of the offender would otherwise be impractical.
Examinations and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall
only be conducted by sex offender treatment providers certified by the
department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW unless the court
finds that:
(a) The offender has already moved to another state or plans to
move to another state for reasons other than circumventing the
certification requirements; or
(b)(i) No certified providers are available for treatment within a
reasonable geographical distance of the offender's home; and
(ii) The evaluation and treatment plan comply with this section and
the rules adopted by the department of health.
(((12))) (13) If the offender is less than eighteen years of age
when the charge is filed, the state shall pay for the cost of initial
evaluation and treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies exclusively to offenders who are at least
eighteen years old when they are charged with crimes committed on or
after the effective date of this act.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply to this section only.
(a) "Sex offender treatment provider" or "treatment provider" means
a certified sex offender treatment provider as defined in RCW
18.155.020.
(b) "Substantial bodily harm" means bodily injury that involves a
temporary but substantial disfigurement, or that causes a temporary but
substantial loss or impairment of the function of any body part or
organ, or that causes a fracture of any body part or organ.
(c) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as
a result of the crime charged. "Victim" also means a parent or
guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or guardian
is the perpetrator of the offense.
(3) An offender is eligible for the special sex offender sentencing
alternative if:
(a) The offender has been convicted of a sex offense other than a
violation of RCW 9A.44.050 or a sex offense that is also a serious
violent offense;
(b) The offender has no prior convictions for a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or any other felony sex offenses in this or
any other state;
(c) The offender has no prior adult convictions for a violent
offense that was committed within five years of the date the current
offense was committed;
(d) The offense did not result in substantial bodily harm to the
victim;
(e) The offender had an established relationship with, or
connection to, the victim such that the sole connection with the victim
was not the commission of the crime; and
(f) The offender's standard sentence range for the offense includes
the possibility of confinement for less than eleven years.
(4) If the court finds the offender is eligible for this
alternative, the court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or
the offender, may order an examination to determine whether the
offender is amenable to treatment.
(a) The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the
following:
(i) The offender's version of the facts and the official version of
the facts;
(ii) The offender's offense history;
(iii) An assessment of problems in addition to alleged deviant
behaviors;
(iv) The offender's social and employment situation; and
(v) Other evaluation measures used.
The report shall set forth the sources of the examiner's
information.
(b) The examiner shall assess and report regarding the offender's
amenability to treatment and relative risk to the community. A
proposed treatment plan shall be provided and shall include, at a
minimum:
(i) Frequency and type of contact between offender and therapist;
(ii) Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and
description of planned treatment modalities;
(iii) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living
conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members
and others;
(iv) Anticipated length of treatment; and
(v) Recommended crime-related prohibitions, which must include an
identification of specific activities or behaviors that are precursors
to the offender's offense cycle, including, but not limited to,
activities or behaviors such as viewing or listening to pornography or
use of alcohol or controlled substances.
(c) The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the
state shall order, a second examination regarding the offender's
amenability to treatment. The examiner shall be selected by the party
making the motion. The offender shall pay the cost of any second
examination ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent
in which case the state shall pay the cost.
(5) After receipt of the reports, if the offender's conviction is
for a violation of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, or 9A.44.083, the
prosecutor shall recommend to the court whether the offender should or
should not receive a sentencing alternative under this section. When
making his or her recommendation, the prosecutor shall consider whether
the victim's testimony is essential for successful prosecution, whether
the victim is willing to provide credible testimony at trial and
sentencing, and whether there are additional chargeable cases against
the offender based upon the existence of multiple victims. The court
may not impose a sentencing alternative under this section if the
prosecutor has recommended that the offender should not receive such a
sentencing alternative.
(6) After receipt of the reports, unless the imposition of a
sentencing alternative under this section is prohibited under
subsection (5) of this section, the court shall consider whether the
offender and the community will benefit from use of this alternative,
consider whether the alternative is too lenient in light of the extent
and circumstances of the offense, consider whether the offender has
victims in addition to the victim of the offense, consider whether the
offender is amenable to treatment, consider the risk the offender would
present to the community, to the victim, or to persons of similar age
and circumstances as the victim, and consider the victim's opinion
whether the offender should receive a treatment disposition under this
section. The court shall give great weight to the victim's opinion
whether the offender should receive a treatment disposition under this
section. If the sentence imposed is contrary to the victim's opinion,
the court shall enter written findings stating its reasons for imposing
the treatment disposition. The fact that the offender admits to his or
her offense does not, by itself, constitute amenability to treatment.
If the court determines that this alternative is appropriate, the court
shall then impose a sentence or, pursuant to RCW 9.94A.712, a minimum
term of sentence, within the standard sentence range. If the sentence
imposed is less than eleven years of confinement, the court may suspend
the execution of the sentence and impose the following conditions of
suspension:
(a) The court shall order the offender to serve a term of
confinement of twelve months or the maximum term within the standard
range, whichever is less. The court may order the offender to serve a
term of confinement greater than twelve months or the maximum term
within the standard range based on the presence of an aggravating
circumstance listed in RCW 9.94A.535(2). In no case shall the term of
confinement exceed the statutory maximum sentence for the offense. The
court may order the offender to serve all or part of his or her term of
confinement in partial confinement. An offender sentenced to a term of
confinement under this subsection is not eligible for earned release
under RCW 9.92.151 or 9.94A.728.
(b) The court shall place the offender on community custody for the
length of the suspended sentence, the length of the maximum term
imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.712, or three years, whichever is
greater, and require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed
by the department under RCW 9.94A.720.
(c) The court shall order treatment for any period up to five years
in duration. A community mental health center may not be used for such
treatment unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex
offender treatment. The offender shall not change sex offender
treatment providers or treatment conditions without first notifying the
prosecutor, the community corrections officer, and the court. If any
party or the court objects to a proposed change, the offender shall not
change providers or conditions without court approval after a hearing.
(d) As conditions of the suspended sentence, the court shall impose
specific prohibitions relating to the precursor activities or behaviors
identified in the proposed treatment plan under subsection (4)(b)(v) of
this section.
(7) As conditions of the suspended sentence, the court may impose
one or more of the following:
(a) Crime-related prohibitions;
(b) Require the offender to devote time to a specific employment or
occupation;
(c) Require the offender to remain within prescribed geographical
boundaries and notify the court or the community corrections officer
prior to any change in the offender's address or employment;
(d) Require the offender to report as directed to the court and a
community corrections officer;
(e) Require the offender to pay all court-ordered legal financial
obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030;
(f) Require the offender to perform community restitution work; or
(g) Require the offender to reimburse the victim for the cost of
any counseling required as a result of the offender's crime.
(8) At the time of sentencing, the court shall set a treatment
termination hearing for three months prior to the anticipated date for
completion of treatment.
(9)(a) The sex offender treatment provider shall submit quarterly
reports on the offender's progress in treatment to the court and the
parties. The report shall reference the treatment plan and include at
a minimum the following: Dates of attendance, offender's compliance
with requirements, treatment activities, the offender's relative
progress in treatment, and any other material specified by the court at
sentencing.
(b) The court shall conduct a hearing on the offender's progress in
treatment at least once a year. At least fourteen days prior to the
hearing, notice of the hearing shall be given to the victim. The
victim shall be given the opportunity to make statements to the court
regarding the offender's supervision and treatment. At the hearing,
the court may modify conditions of community custody or revoke the
suspended sentence.
(10) At least fourteen days prior to the treatment termination
hearing, notice of the hearing shall be given to the victim. The
victim shall be given the opportunity to make statements to the court
regarding the offender's supervision and treatment. Prior to the
treatment termination hearing, the treatment provider and community
corrections officer shall submit written reports to the court and
parties regarding the offender's compliance with treatment and
monitoring requirements, and recommendations regarding termination from
treatment, including proposed community custody conditions. The court
shall order an evaluation regarding the advisability of termination
from treatment by a sex offender treatment provider who may not be the
same person who treated the offender under subsection (6) of this
section or any person who employs, is employed by, or shares profits
with the person who treated the offender under subsection (6) of this
section. The offender shall pay the cost of the evaluation. At the
treatment termination hearing the court may: (a) Modify conditions of
community custody, and either (b) terminate treatment, or (c) extend
treatment in two-year increments for up to the remaining period of
community custody.
(11)(a) If a violation of conditions other than a second violation
of the prohibitions relating to precursor behaviors or activities
imposed under subsection (6)(d) of this section occurs during community
custody, the department shall either impose sanctions as provided for
in RCW 9.94A.737(2)(a) or refer the violation to the court and
recommend revocation of the suspended sentence as provided for in
subsections (8) and (10) of this section.
(b) If a second violation of the prohibitions relating to precursor
behaviors or activities imposed under subsection (6)(d) of this section
occurs during community custody, the department shall refer the
violation to the court and recommend revocation of the suspended
sentence as provided in subsection (12) of this section.
(12) The court may revoke the suspended sentence at any time during
the period of community custody and order execution of the sentence if:
(a) The offender violates the conditions of the suspended sentence, or
(b) the court finds that the offender is failing to make satisfactory
progress in treatment. All confinement time served during the period
of community custody shall be credited to the offender if the suspended
sentence is revoked.
(13) The offender's sex offender treatment provider may not be the
same person who examined the offender under subsection (4) of this
section or any person who employs, is employed by, or shares profits
with the person who examined the offender under subsection (4) of this
section, unless the court has entered written findings that such
treatment is in the best interests of the victim and that successful
treatment of the offender would otherwise be impractical. Examinations
and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be
conducted by sex offender treatment providers certified by the
department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW unless the court
finds that:
(a) The offender has already moved to another state or plans to
move to another state for reasons other than circumventing the
certification requirements; or
(b)(i) No certified providers are available for treatment within a
reasonable geographical distance of the offender's home; and
(ii) The evaluation and treatment plan comply with this section and
the rules adopted by the department of health.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.92.151 and 1990 c 3 s 201 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
sentence of a prisoner confined in a county jail facility for a felony,
gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor conviction may be reduced by earned
release credits in accordance with procedures that shall be developed
and promulgated by the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The
earned early release time shall be for good behavior and good
performance as determined by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction. Any program established pursuant to this section shall
allow an offender to earn early release credits for presentence
incarceration. The correctional agency shall not credit the offender
with earned early release credits in advance of the offender actually
earning the credits. In the case of an offender convicted of a serious
violent offense or a sex offense that is a class A felony committed on
or after July 1, 1990, the aggregate earned early release time may not
exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In no other case may the
aggregate earned early release time exceed one-third of the total
sentence.
(2) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under section
4(6)(a) of this act is not eligible for earned release credits under
this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2003 c 379 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, the term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned release
time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by
the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency
shall not credit the offender with earned release credits in advance of
the offender actually earning the credits. Any program established
pursuant to this section shall allow an offender to earn early release
credits for presentence incarceration. If an offender is transferred
from a county jail to the department, the administrator of a county
jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time spent
in custody at the facility and the amount of earned release time. An
offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23,
1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good time credits
or earned release time for that portion of his or her sentence that
results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In the
case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex
offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 2003,
the aggregate earned release time may not exceed ten percent of the
sentence.
(b)(i) In the case of an offender who qualifies under (b)(ii) of
this subsection, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed fifty
percent of the sentence.
(ii) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time under this subsection (1)(b) if he or
she:
(A) Is classified in one of the two lowest risk categories under
(b)(iii) of this subsection;
(B) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
and
(C) Has no prior conviction for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor).
(iii) For purposes of determining an offender's eligibility under
this subsection (1)(b), the department shall perform a risk assessment
of every offender committed to a correctional facility operated by the
department who has no current or prior conviction for a sex offense, a
violent offense, a crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411,
a felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020, a
violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary), a violation of, or
an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.401 by
manufacture or delivery or possession with intent to deliver
methamphetamine, or a violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled
substance to a minor). The department must classify each assessed
offender in one of four risk categories between highest and lowest
risk.
(iv) The department shall recalculate the earned release time and
reschedule the expected release dates for each qualified offender under
this subsection (1)(b).
(v) This subsection (1)(b) applies retroactively to eligible
offenders serving terms of total confinement in a state correctional
facility as of July 1, 2003.
(vi) This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to offenders convicted
after July 1, 2010.
(c) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence;
(2)(a) A person convicted of a sex offense or an offense
categorized as a serious violent offense, assault in the second degree,
vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, assault of a child in the second
degree, any crime against persons where it is determined in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed before July 1, 2000, may become
eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the department, for
transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned release time
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(b) A person convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, any
crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or a felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or after July 1, 2000, may
become eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the
department, for transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned
release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(c) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community placement or community
custody terms eligible for release to community custody status in lieu
of earned release shall provide an approved residence and living
arrangement prior to release to the community;
(d) The department may deny transfer to community custody status in
lieu of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
if the department determines an offender's release plan, including
proposed residence location and living arrangements, may violate the
conditions of the sentence or conditions of supervision, place the
offender at risk to violate the conditions of the sentence, place the
offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk to victim safety or
community safety. The department's authority under this section is
independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence or statutory
provision regarding conditions for community custody or community
placement;
(e) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under section
4(6)(a) of this act is not eligible for earned release credits under
this section;
(3) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(4)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious enough to
require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is physically incapacitated due to age or the medical condition;
and
(iii) Granting the extraordinary medical placement will result in
a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the
monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time;
(5) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(6) No more than the final six months of the sentence may be served
in partial confinement designed to aid the offender in finding work and
reestablishing himself or herself in the community;
(7) The governor may pardon any offender;
(8) The department may release an offender from confinement any
time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section; and
(9) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an offender
sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a
mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not be released
from total confinement before the completion of the listed mandatory
minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless allowed
under RCW 9.94A.540, however persistent offenders are not eligible for
extraordinary medical placement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall conduct a comprehensive analysis and evaluation of
the impact and effectiveness of current sex offender sentencing
policies. The institute shall analyze and evaluate the effectiveness
of sex offender policies and programs, including the special sex
offender sentencing alternative, the department of corrections'
treatment program for offenders in prison, and the validity of the risk
assessment conducted by the end of sentence review committee prior to
release from prison. Using detailed information from offender files
and court records, and research conducted in Washington state and other
states and nations, the analysis shall examine whether changes to
sentencing policies and sex offender programming can increase public
safety.
(2) The analysis of the special sex offender sentencing alternative
shall specifically evaluate the impact of the sentencing alternative on
protection of children from sexual victimization, reporting of sex
offenses against children, prosecution of sex offenses against
children, appropriate punishment of perpetrators of sex offenses
against children, and child sex offense recidivism rates. At a
minimum, the institute shall review the following issues to determine
whether modifications in the sentencing alternative will increase its
effectiveness with respect to protecting children from sexual
victimization, successfully prosecuting sex offenses against children,
and appropriately punishing perpetrators of sex offenses against
children:
(a) Eligibility for the sentencing alternative, including whether
the commission of certain types of offenses should render an offender
ineligible, whether the disclosure of multiple victims in the course of
evaluating an offender should render an offender ineligible, and
whether the sentencing alternative should be limited to offenses within
families;
(b) Minimum terms of incarceration, including imprisonment at a
state facility;
(c) Appropriate conditions or restrictions that should be placed on
offenders who receive a sentence alternative; and
(d) Standards for revocation of a sentencing alternative suspended
sentence.
(3) The institute shall report its results and recommendations to
the appropriate standing committees of the legislature no later than
December 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The sum of one million two hundred forty
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, from the general
fund--state to the department of corrections solely for the purposes
of:
(1) Providing specialized training to community corrections
officers regarding the supervision of sex offenders in the community;
and
(2) Reducing the caseloads of community corrections officers who
supervise sex offenders in the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The sum of three hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, from the general fund--state to
the department of community, trade, and economic development solely for
the purposes of distribution to sexual assault victims programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The sum of two hundred sixty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, from the general fund--state to
the department of community, trade, and economic development solely to
reimburse counties for costs associated with the implementation of this
act and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2004, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---