BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.46 RCW
to read as follows:
Any money received from the sale of real property originally
acquired for toll facility purposes shall be deposited into the
separate and proper trust fund with the state treasurer established for
the toll facility. For the purposes of this section, the term "real
property" includes any improvements to the land.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.12.063 and 2002 c 255 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the
department's policy giving priority consideration to abutting property
owners in agricultural areas when disposing of property through its
surplus property program under this section.
(2) Whenever the department determines that any real property owned
by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the department
is no longer required for transportation purposes and that it is in the
public interest to do so, the department may sell the property or
exchange it in full or part consideration for land or improvements or
for construction of improvements at fair market value to any of the
following governmental entities or persons:
(a) Any other state agency;
(b) The city or county in which the property is situated;
(c) Any other municipal corporation;
(d) Regional transit authorities created under chapter 81.112 RCW;
(e) The former owner of the property from whom the state acquired
title;
(f) In the case of residentially improved property, a tenant of the
department who has resided thereon for not less than six months and who
is not delinquent in paying rent to the state;
(g) Any abutting private owner but only after each other abutting
private owner (if any), as shown in the records of the county assessor,
is notified in writing of the proposed sale. If more than one abutting
private owner requests in writing the right to purchase the property
within fifteen days after receiving notice of the proposed sale, the
property shall be sold at public auction in the manner provided in RCW
47.12.283;
(h) To any person through the solicitation of written bids through
public advertising in the manner prescribed by RCW 47.28.050;
(i) To any other owner of real property required for transportation
purposes;
(j) In the case of property suitable for residential use, any
nonprofit organization dedicated to providing affordable housing to
very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined
in RCW 43.63A.510 and is eligible to receive assistance through the
Washington housing trust fund created in chapter 43.185 RCW; or
(k) A federally recognized Indian tribe within whose reservation
boundary the property is located.
(3) Sales to purchasers may at the department's option be for cash,
by real estate contract, or exchange of land or improvements.
Transactions involving the construction of improvements must be
conducted pursuant to chapter 47.28 RCW or Title 39 RCW, as applicable,
and must comply with all other applicable laws and rules.
(4) Conveyances made pursuant to this section shall be by deed
executed by the secretary of transportation and shall be duly
acknowledged.
(5) Except as provided in section 1 of this act, all moneys
received pursuant to the provisions of this section less any real
estate broker commissions paid pursuant to RCW 47.12.320 shall be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.12.283 and 1979 ex.s. c 189 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever the department of transportation determines that any
real property owned by the state of Washington and under the
jurisdiction of the department is no longer required for highway
purposes and that it is in the public interest to do so, the department
may, in its discretion, sell the property under RCW 47.12.063 or under
subsections (2) through (6) of this section.
(2) Whenever the department determines to sell real property under
its jurisdiction at public auction, the department shall first give
notice thereof by publication on the same day of the week for two
consecutive weeks, with the first publication at least two weeks prior
to the date of the auction, in a legal newspaper of general circulation
in the area where the property to be sold is located. The notice shall
be placed in both the legal notices section and the real estate
classified section of the newspaper. The notice shall contain a
description of the property, the time and place of the auction, and the
terms of the sale. The sale may be for cash or by real estate
contract.
(3) The department shall sell the property at the public auction,
in accordance with the terms set forth in the notice, to the highest
and best bidder providing the bid is equal to or higher than the
appraised fair market value of the property.
(4) If no bids are received at the auction or if all bids are
rejected, the department may, in its discretion, enter into
negotiations for the sale of the property or may list the property with
a licensed real estate broker. No property shall be sold by
negotiations or through a broker for less than the property's appraised
fair market value. Any offer to purchase real property pursuant to
this subsection shall be in writing and may be rejected at any time
prior to written acceptance by the department.
(5) Before the department shall approve any offer for the purchase
of real property having an appraised value of more than ten thousand
dollars, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the department
shall first publish a notice of the proposed sale in a local newspaper
of general circulation in the area where the property is located. The
notice shall include a description of the property, the selling price,
the terms of the sale, including the price and interest rate if sold by
real estate contract, and the name and address of the department
employee or the real estate broker handling the transaction. The
notice shall further state that any person may, within ten days after
the publication of the notice, deliver to the designated state employee
or real estate broker a written offer to purchase the property for not
less than ten percent more than the negotiated sale price, subject to
the same terms and conditions. A subsequent offer shall not be
considered unless it is accompanied by a deposit of twenty percent of
the offer in the form of cash, money order, cashiers check, or
certified check payable to the Washington state treasurer, to be
forfeited to the state (for deposit in the motor vehicle fund) if the
offeror fails to complete the sale if the offeror's offer is accepted.
If a subsequent offer is received, the first offeror shall be informed
by registered or certified mail sent to the address stated in his
offer. The first offeror shall then have ten days, from the date of
mailing the notice of the increased offer, in which to file with the
designated state employee or real estate broker a higher offer than
that of the subsequent offeror. After the expiration of the ten day
period, the department shall approve in writing the highest and best
offer which the department then has on file.
(6) Except as provided in section 1 of this act, all moneys
received pursuant to this section, less any real estate broker's
commissions paid pursuant to RCW 47.12.320, shall be deposited in the
motor vehicle fund.

--- END ---