BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and make
available to school districts a model curriculum for incorporating
Pacific Northwest Indian tribal histories into existing Washington
state history and social studies courses. To the extent feasible, the
curriculum should be designed so as to be easily integrated with other
disciplines. The superintendent also shall develop a model tribal
outreach program, including but not limited to communications, oral
history projects, and cultural exchanges. The model curriculum and
model outreach program shall be completed by December 31, 2004.
(2) School districts are encouraged to adopt the model curriculum
and to adapt the curriculum to acknowledge and recognize local tribal
history. School districts also are encouraged to supplement the
curriculum with information regarding one or more local tribes, and to
facilitate opportunities for cultural exchanges with local Indian
tribes.
(3) School district boards of directors must report annually to the
office of Indian education within the office of the superintendent of
public instruction regarding the district's communications and
activities with local Indian tribes.

--- END ---