BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state water law
must take into account rights to water based in both state and federal
law. The legislature also finds that it is in the interest of the
people of the state, the nation, and Indian tribes located within the
state to achieve greater certainty and security regarding the
respective water rights based on state and federal law. The
legislature therefore intends for the state to participate in a
federally authorized pilot negotiation and settlement process with
tribal governments and the United States regarding their respective
water rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature intends for the state of
Washington to proceed under the provisions of this chapter to
participate in a federally sanctioned and facilitated pilot process to
determine and quantify water rights claimed by Indian tribes and the
United States.
(2) The state shall establish a negotiating team within the office
of the governor to participate in this pilot program.
(3) The federal pilot negotiation process includes a scoping
process, development of alternatives, timelines, decision-making
process, funding alternatives, and mediation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general
fund for the fiscal year ending July 1, 2005, to the governor's office
to defray the costs of forming and operating the negotiating team
established in section 2(2) of this act and to pay an equitable share
of the costs of facilitation by the United States Institute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---