BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.04.332 and 2003 c 353 s 7 and 2003 c 141 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
"Motor-driven cycle" means every quadricycle or motorcycle,
including every motor scooter, with a motor that produces not to exceed
five brake horsepower (developed by a prime mover, as measured by a
brake applied to the driving shaft). A motor-driven cycle does not
include a moped, a power wheelchair, a motorized foot scooter, or an
electric personal assistive mobility device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Quadricycle" means a four-wheeled motor vehicle, designed for on-road or off-road use, having a seat or saddle upon which the operator
sits and a motor capable of producing not more than fifty brake
horsepower.
The Washington state patrol may approve of and define as a
"quadricycle" a motor vehicle that fails to meet these specific
criteria, but that is essentially similar in performance and
application to motor vehicles that do meet these specific criteria.
The term does not include golf carts.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.010 and 2003 c 353 s 8 and 2003 c 53 s 238 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to operate any vehicle over and
along a public highway of this state without first having obtained and
having in full force and effect a current and proper vehicle license
and display vehicle license number plates therefor as by this chapter
provided.
(2) Failure to make initial registration before operation on the
highways of this state is a misdemeanor, and any person convicted
thereof must be punished by a fine of no less than three hundred thirty
dollars, no part of which may be suspended or deferred.
(3) Failure to renew an expired registration before operation on
the highways of this state is a traffic infraction.
(4) The licensing of a vehicle in another state by a resident of
this state, as defined in RCW 46.16.028, evading the payment of any tax
or license fee imposed in connection with registration, is a gross
misdemeanor punishable as follows:
(a) For a first offense, up to one year in the county jail and a
fine equal to twice the amount of delinquent taxes and fees, no part of
which may be suspended or deferred;
(b) For a second or subsequent offense, up to one year in the
county jail and a fine equal to four times the amount of delinquent
taxes and fees, no part of which may be suspended or deferred;
(c) For fines levied under (b) of this subsection, an amount equal
to the avoided taxes and fees owed will be deposited in the vehicle
licensing fraud account created in the state treasury;
(d) The avoided taxes and fees shall be deposited and distributed
in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly paid in a
timely fashion.
(5) These provisions shall not apply to the following vehicles:
(a) Motorized foot scooters;
(b) Electric-assisted bicycles;
(c) Quadricycles used as farm vehicles if operated within a radius
of fifteen miles of the farm where principally used or garaged;
(d) Farm vehicles if operated within a radius of fifteen miles of
the farm where principally used or garaged, farm tractors and farm
implements including trailers designed as cook or bunk houses used
exclusively for animal herding temporarily operating or drawn upon the
public highways, and trailers used exclusively to transport farm
implements from one farm to another during the daylight hours or at
night when such equipment has lights that comply with the law;
(((d))) (e) Spray or fertilizer applicator rigs designed and used
exclusively for spraying or fertilization in the conduct of
agricultural operations and not primarily for the purpose of
transportation, and nurse rigs or equipment auxiliary to the use of and
designed or modified for the fueling, repairing, or loading of spray
and fertilizer applicator rigs and not used, designed, or modified
primarily for the purpose of transportation;
(((e))) (f) Fork lifts operated during daylight hours on public
highways adjacent to and within five hundred feet of the warehouses
which they serve: PROVIDED FURTHER, That these provisions shall not
apply to vehicles used by the state parks and recreation commission
exclusively for park maintenance and operations upon public highways
within state parks;
(((f))) (g) "Special highway construction equipment" defined as
follows: Any vehicle which is designed and used primarily for grading
of highways, paving of highways, earth moving, and other construction
work on highways and which is not designed or used primarily for the
transportation of persons or property on a public highway and which is
only incidentally operated or moved over the highway. It includes, but
is not limited to, road construction and maintenance machinery so
designed and used such as portable air compressors, air drills, asphalt
spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders, track laying tractors,
ditchers, leveling graders, finishing machines, motor graders, paving
mixers, road rollers, scarifiers, earth moving scrapers and carryalls,
lighting plants, welders, pumps, power shovels and draglines, self-propelled and tractor-drawn earth moving equipment and machinery,
including dump trucks and tractor-dump trailer combinations which
either (i) are in excess of the legal width, or (ii) which, because of
their length, height, or unladen weight, may not be moved on a public
highway without the permit specified in RCW 46.44.090 and which are not
operated laden except within the boundaries of the project limits as
defined by the contract, and other similar types of construction
equipment, or (iii) which are driven or moved upon a public highway
only for the purpose of crossing such highway from one property to
another, provided such movement does not exceed five hundred feet and
the vehicle is equipped with wheels or pads which will not damage the
roadway surface.
Exclusions:
"Special highway construction equipment" does not include any of
the following:
Dump trucks originally designed to comply with the legal size and
weight provisions of this code notwithstanding any subsequent
modification which would require a permit, as specified in RCW
46.44.090, to operate such vehicles on a public highway, including
trailers, truck-mounted transit mixers, cranes and shovels, or other
vehicles designed for the transportation of persons or property to
which machinery has been attached.
(6) The following vehicles, whether operated solo or in
combination, are exempt from license registration and displaying
license plates as required by this chapter:
(a) A converter gear used to convert a semitrailer into a trailer
or a two-axle truck or tractor into a three or more axle truck or
tractor or used in any other manner to increase the number of axles of
a vehicle. Converter gear includes an auxiliary axle, booster axle,
dolly, and jeep axle.
(b) A tow dolly that is used for towing a motor vehicle behind
another motor vehicle. The front or rear wheels of the towed vehicle
are secured to and rest on the tow dolly that is attached to the towing
vehicle by a tow bar.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.0621 and 2003 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) License tab fees are required to be $30 per year for motor
vehicles, regardless of year, value, make, or model.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license tab fees" are
defined as the general fees paid annually for licensing motor vehicles,
including cars, sport utility vehicles, motorcycles, quadricycles, and
motor homes.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.500 and 2003 c 353 s 9, 2003 c 141 s 7, and 2003
c 41 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) No person may drive either a two-wheeled or a three-wheeled
motorcycle, a quadricycle, or a motor-driven cycle unless such person
has a valid driver's license specially endorsed by the director to
enable the holder to drive such vehicles.
(2) However, a person sixteen years of age or older, holding a
valid driver's license of any class issued by the state of the person's
residence, may operate a moped without taking any special examination
for the operation of a moped.
(3) No driver's license is required for operation of an electric-assisted bicycle if the operator is at least sixteen years of age.
Persons under sixteen years of age may not operate an electric-assisted
bicycle.
(4) No driver's license is required to operate an electric personal
assistive mobility device or a power wheelchair.
(5) No driver's license is required to operate a motorized foot
scooter. Motorized foot scooters may not be operated at any time from
a half hour after sunset to a half hour before sunrise without
reflectors of a type approved by the state patrol.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.37.070 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((After January 1, 1964,)) Every motor vehicle, trailer,
semitrailer, and pole trailer shall be equipped with two or more stop
lamps meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.200, except that passenger
cars manufactured or assembled prior to January 1, 1964, shall be
equipped with at least one such stop lamp. On a combination of
vehicles, only the stop lamps on the rearmost vehicle need actually be
seen from the distance specified in RCW 46.37.200(1).
(2) ((After January 1, 1960,)) Every motor vehicle, trailer,
semitrailer and pole trailer shall be equipped with electric turn
signal lamps meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.200(2), except that
passenger cars, trailers, semitrailers, pole trailers, and trucks less
than eighty inches in width, manufactured or assembled prior to January
1, 1953, need not be equipped with electric turn signal lamps.
(3) Every quadricycle used during the hours of darkness must be
equipped with electric turn signal lamps meeting the requirements of
RCW 46.37.200 or when the distance from the center of the top of the
steering post to the left outside limit of the body exceeds twenty-four
inches. When a quadricycle is operated during daylight hours hand
signals as described in RCW 46.61.315 may be used.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.37.522 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 45 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every motorcycle, quadricycle, and motor-driven cycle shall have
its head lamps and tail lamps lighted whenever such vehicle is in
motion upon a highway.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.37.523 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 46 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Every motorcycle, quadricycle, and ((every)) motor-driven cycle
shall be equipped with at least one lamp which shall comply with the
requirements and limitations of this section.
(2) Every head lamp upon every motorcycle, quadricycle, and motor-driven cycle shall be located at a height of not more than fifty-four
inches nor less than twenty-four inches to be measured as set forth in
RCW 46.37.030(2).
(3) Every quadricycle and motorcycle other than a motor-driven
cycle shall be equipped with multiple-beam road-lighting equipment.
(4) Such equipment shall:
(a) Reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least three
hundred feet ahead when the uppermost distribution of light is
selected;
(b) Reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least one
hundred fifty feet ahead when the lowermost distribution of light is
selected, and on a straight, level road under any condition of loading
none of the high intensity portion of the beam shall be directed to
strike the eyes of an approaching driver.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.37.525 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 48 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Every motorcycle, quadricycle, and motor-driven cycle shall
have at least one tail lamp which shall be located at a height of not
more than seventy-two nor less than fifteen inches.
(2) Either a tail lamp or a separate lamp shall be so constructed
and placed as to illuminate with a white light the rear registration
plate and render it clearly legible from a distance of fifty feet to
the rear. Any tail lamp or tail lamps, together with any separate lamp
or lamps for illuminating the rear registration plate, shall be so
wired as to be lighted whenever the head lamps or auxiliary driving
lamps are lighted.
(3) Every motorcycle, quadricycle, and motor-driven cycle shall
carry on the rear, either as part of the tail lamp or separately, at
least one red reflector meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.060.
(4) Every motorcycle, quadricycle, and motor-driven cycle shall be
equipped with at least one stop lamp meeting the requirements of RCW
46.37.070.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.37.528 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 50 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every motorcycle, quadricycle, and motor-driven cycle, at all times
and under all conditions of loading, upon application of the service
brake, shall be capable of:
(1) Developing a braking force that is not less than forty-three
and one-half percent of its gross weight;
(2) Decelerating to a stop from not more than twenty miles per hour
at not less than fourteen feet per second per second; and
(3) Stopping from a speed of twenty miles per hour in not more than
thirty feet, such distance to be measured from the point at which
movement of the service brake pedal or control begins.
Tests for deceleration and stopping distance shall be made on a
substantially level (not to exceed plus or minus one percent grade),
dry, smooth, hard surface that is free from loose material.

Sec. 11 RCW 46.37.530 and 2003 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful:
(a) For any person to operate a motorcycle, quadricycle, or motor-driven cycle not equipped with mirrors on the left and right sides of
the ((motorcycle)) vehicle, which shall be so located as to give the
driver a complete view of the highway for a distance of at least two
hundred feet to the rear of the ((motorcycle or motor-driven cycle))
vehicle: PROVIDED, That mirrors shall not be required on any
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle over twenty-five years old originally
manufactured without mirrors and which has been restored to its
original condition and which is being ridden to or from or otherwise in
conjunction with an antique or classic motorcycle contest, show, or
other such assemblage: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no mirror is required on
any motorcycle manufactured prior to January 1, 1931;
(b) For any person to operate a motorcycle, quadricycle, or motor-driven cycle ((which)) that does not have a windshield unless wearing
glasses, goggles, or a face shield of a type conforming to rules
adopted by the state patrol;
(c) For any person to operate or ride upon a motorcycle,
quadricycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped on a state highway, county
road, or city street unless wearing upon his or her head a motorcycle
helmet except when the vehicle is an antique motor-driven cycle or
automobile that is licensed as a motorcycle or when the vehicle is
equipped with seat belts and roll bars approved by the state patrol.
The motorcycle helmet neck or chin strap must be fastened securely
while the ((motorcycle or motor-driven cycle)) vehicle is in motion.
Persons operating electric-assisted bicycles shall comply with all laws
and regulations related to the use of bicycle helmets;
(d) For any person to transport a child under the age of five on a
motorcycle, quadricycle, or motor-driven cycle;
(e) For any person to sell or offer for sale a motorcycle helmet
that does not meet the requirements established by this section.
(2) The state patrol may adopt and amend rules, pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act, concerning standards for glasses,
goggles, and face shields.
(3) For purposes of this section, "motorcycle helmet" means a
protective covering for the head consisting of a hard outer shell,
padding adjacent to and inside the outer shell, and a neck or chin
strap type retention system, with a sticker indicating that the
motorcycle helmet meets standards established by the United States
Department of Transportation.

Sec. 12 RCW 46.37.537 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 52 are each amended
to read as follows:
No person shall modify the exhaust system of a motorcycle or
quadricycle in a manner which will amplify or increase the noise
emitted by the engine of such vehicle above that emitted by the muffler
originally installed on the vehicle, and it shall be unlawful for any
person to operate a motorcycle or quadricycle not equipped as required
by this section, or which has been amplified as prohibited by this
section.

Sec. 13 RCW 46.37.539 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 53 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every motorcycle, quadricycle, and ((every)) motor-driven cycle
shall also comply with the requirements and limitations of:
RCW 46.37.380 on horns and warning devices;
RCW 46.37.390 on mufflers and prevention of noise;
RCW 46.37.400 on mirrors; and
RCW 46.37.420 on tires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Absent prohibition by local authorities authorized under this
section and except as prohibited elsewhere in this section, a person
may operate a quadricycle upon a highway having a speed limit of
thirty-five miles per hour or less if:
(a) The person does not operate a quadricycle upon state highways
that are listed in chapter 47.17 RCW except where posted speed limits
are not in excess of thirty-five miles per hour;
(b) The person does not operate a quadricycle upon a highway
without first having obtained and having in full force and effect a
current and proper vehicle license and display vehicle license number
plates in compliance with chapter 46.16 RCW;
(c) The person does not operate a quadricycle upon a highway
without first obtaining a valid driver's license issued to Washington
residents in compliance with chapter 46.20 RCW;
(d) The person does not operate a quadricycle subject to
registration under chapter 46.16 RCW on a highway unless the person is
insured under a motor vehicle liability policy in compliance with
chapter 46.30 RCW; and
(e) The person operating a quadricycle does not cross a roadway
with a speed limit in excess of thirty-five miles per hour, unless the
crossing begins and ends on a roadway with a speed limit of thirty-five
miles per hour or less and occurs at an intersection of approximately
ninety degrees, except that the operator of a quadricycle must not
cross an uncontrolled intersection of streets and highways that are
part of the state highway system subject to Title 47 RCW unless that
intersection has been authorized by local authorities provided
elsewhere in this section.
(2) A person who violates this section commits a traffic
infraction.
(3) This section does not prevent local authorities, with respect
to streets and highways under their jurisdiction and within the
reasonable exercise of their police power, from regulating the
operation of quadricycles on streets and highways under their
jurisdiction by resolution or ordinance of the governing body, if the
regulation is consistent with this title, except that:
(a) Local authorities may not authorize the operation of
quadricycles on streets and highways that are part of the state highway
system subject to Title 47 RCW unless that section of state highway has
a posted speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less;
(b) Local authorities may not prohibit the operation of
quadricycles upon highways having a speed limit of twenty-five miles
per hour or less; and
(c) Local authorities are prohibited from establishing any
requirements for the registration and licensing of quadricycles.

Sec. 15 RCW 46.61.608 and 1975 c 62 s 46 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All motorcycles and quadricycles are entitled to full use of a
lane and no motor vehicle shall be driven in such a manner as to
deprive any motorcycle or quadricycle of the full use of a lane. This
subsection shall not apply to motorcycles operated two abreast in a
single lane.
(2) The operator of a motorcycle or quadricycle shall not overtake
and pass in the same lane occupied by the vehicle being overtaken.
(3) No person shall operate a motorcycle or quadricycle between
lanes of traffic or between adjacent lines or rows of vehicles.
(4) Motorcycles shall not be operated more than two abreast in a
single lane.
(5) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not apply to
police officers in the performance of their official duties.

Sec. 16 RCW 46.61.610 and 1975 c 62 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person operating a motorcycle or quadricycle shall ride only upon
the permanent and regular seat attached thereto, and such operator
shall not carry any other person nor shall any other person ride on a
motorcycle or quadricycle unless ((such motorcycle)) the vehicle is
designed to carry more than one person, in which event a passenger may
ride upon the permanent and regular seat if designed for two persons,
or upon another seat firmly attached to the ((motorcycle)) vehicle at
the rear or side of the operator((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). The
motorcycle or quadricycle must contain foot pegs, foot rests, or floor
boards of a type approved by the ((equipment commission)) state patrol,
for each person ((such motorcycle)) the vehicle is designed to carry.

Sec. 17 RCW 46.61.612 and 1967 c 232 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person shall ride a motorcycle or quadricycle in a position
where both feet are placed on the same side of the ((motorcycle))
vehicle.

Sec. 18 RCW 46.61.613 and 1967 c 232 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of RCW 46.37.530 and 46.61.610 through 46.61.612 may
be temporarily suspended by the chief of the Washington state patrol,
or ((his)) a designee, with respect to the operation of motorcycles or
quadricycles within their respective jurisdictions in connection with
a parade or public demonstration.

Sec. 19 RCW 46.81A.001 and 1988 c 227 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the purpose of this chapter to provide the motorcycle and
quadricycle riders of the state with an affordable motorcycle and
quadricycle skills education program in order to promote motorcycle and
quadricycle safety awareness.
All sales of factory-new quadricycles must include an all-terrain
vehicle safety course that meets the requirements of or is provided by
the ATV Safety Institute or any other industry-recognized safety
course.

Sec. 20 RCW 46.81A.010 and 2003 c 353 s 11 and 2003 c 41 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Motorcycle and quadricycle skills education program" means a
motorcycle or quadricycle rider skills training program to be
administered by the department.
(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(3) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(4) "Motorcycle or quadricycle" means a motor vehicle designed to
travel on not more than ((three)) four wheels in contact with the
ground, on which the driver rides astride the motor unit or power train
and is designed to be steered with a handle bar, but excluding farm
tractors, electric personal assistive mobility devices, mopeds,
motorized foot scooters, motorized bicycles, unlicensed four-wheel all-terrain vehicles, and off-road motorcycles.
(5) "ATV Safety Institute" means the not-for-profit division of the
Specialty Vehicle Institute of America (SVIA), that implements an
expanded national program of all-terrain vehicle (ATV) safety education
and awareness, to promote the safe and responsible use of ATVs, and to
reduce crashes and injuries that may result from improper operation by
the rider.
(6) "ATV safety course" means a hands-on, ATV rider course
conducted by licensed ATV Safety Institute instructors that provides
students an opportunity to increase their safety knowledge and to
practice basic riding skills in a controlled environment under the
direct supervision of a licensed instructor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 This act takes effect July 1, 2004, except
that if 2003 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 776) is ruled unconstitutional
by a court of final jurisdiction, section 4 of this act is null and
void.

--- END ---