BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state has a
compelling interest in ensuring the adequate, reliable, and valid
identification of persons who commit criminal acts, that maintaining
the public health, safety, and welfare requires a standard and readily
recognizable means of identifying persons who commit criminal acts,
that there is no right of privacy that allows persons to hide or
disguise their identities with the intent of avoiding identification,
discovery, or apprehension as the perpetrators of criminal acts, and
that imposing additional sanctions on persons who hide or disguise
their identity for the purpose of avoiding identification, discovery,
or apprehension as the perpetrators of criminal acts will greatly aid
in dealing with the problem of persons who engage in criminal behavior.
The legislature intends by this act to enhance the likelihood that
persons who engage in unlawful conduct may be more easily identified by
ensuring that a true and accurate likeness of the person's face can be
observed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9A.76 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who is a participant in or party to a crime who goes in
disguise by wearing a mask or other natural or man-made device, object,
or thing that would prevent recognition of the true and accurate
likeness of the person's face by hiding, concealing, camouflaging, or
otherwise preventing an unobstructed view of the person's eyes, nose,
cheekbones, and mouth in order to avoid identification, discovery, or
apprehension while in the course of or in furtherance of any crime or
in immediate flight therefrom is guilty of criminal disguise. Partial
obstruction of the view of the mouth caused by the normal growth of
natural facial hair is not considered as going in disguise under this
section.
A person who is guilty of criminal disguise is subject on the first
offense to imprisonment for not less than thirty days, or by a fine of
not less than three thousand dollars, or by both such imprisonment and
fine. On each subsequent conviction, the person is subject to twice
the amount of imprisonment, or fine, or both such imprisonment and fine
as on the previous conviction.

--- END ---