BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
minimize the exposure of citizens to the harmful effects of excessive
noise and to control the level of noise in a manner that promotes
commerce; the use, value, and enjoyment of property; sleep and repose;
and the quality of the environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A person shall not cause or allow to be
emitted on a public road, park, or other such real property or
structure, project, development, or improvement attached to real
property sound from a motor vehicle audio sound system, such as a
radio, tape player, or compact disc player, at a volume so as to be
audible greater than fifty feet from the source without the prior
written approval of the appropriate agency having jurisdiction over the
road, park, or other such real property.
A person who is guilty of violating this section is subject on the
first offense to a fine of not less than three hundred dollars. On
each subsequent violation, the person is subject to twice the amount of
fine as on the last infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 One-third of the proceeds from any fine
imposed under section 2 of this act shall go to the law enforcement
agency issuing the infraction notice, one-third to the prosecuting
authority of the jurisdiction in which the infraction occurred, and
one-third to the court of jurisdiction over the matter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The provisions of sections 2 and 3 of this
act are cumulative and nonexclusive, and shall not affect any other
claim, cause of action or remedy; nor, unless specifically provided,
shall this section be deemed to repeal, amend, or modify any law,
ordinance, or regulation relating to noise, but shall be deemed
additional to existing legislation and common law on noise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 70.107 RCW.

--- END ---