BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.120 and 2003 c 377 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a traffic infraction for any person to operate any
nonhighway vehicle:
(a) In such a manner as to endanger the property of another;
(b) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without a lighted headlight and taillight between the hours of
dusk and dawn, or when otherwise required for the safety of others
regardless of ownership;
(c) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without an adequate braking device or when otherwise required
for the safety of others regardless of ownership;
(d) Without a spark arrester approved by the department of natural
resources;
(e) Without an adequate, and operating, muffling device which
effectively limits vehicle noise to no more than eighty-six decibels on
the "A" scale at fifty feet as measured by the Society of Automotive
Engineers (SAE) test procedure J 331a, except that a maximum noise
level of one hundred and five decibels on the "A" scale at a distance
of twenty inches from the exhaust outlet shall be an acceptable
substitute in lieu of the Society of Automotive Engineers test
procedure J 331a when measured:
(i) At a forty-five degree angle at a distance of twenty inches
from the exhaust outlet;
(ii) With the vehicle stationary and the engine running at a steady
speed equal to one-half of the manufacturer's maximum allowable ("red
line") engine speed or where the manufacturer's maximum allowable
engine speed is not known the test speed in revolutions per minute
calculated as sixty percent of the speed at which maximum horsepower is
developed; and
(iii) With the microphone placed ten inches from the side of the
vehicle, one-half way between the lowest part of the vehicle body and
the ground plane, and in the same lateral plane as the rearmost exhaust
outlet where the outlet of the exhaust pipe is under the vehicle;
(f) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle upon the shoulder or inside bank or slope of any nonhighway
road or highway, or upon the median of any divided highway;
(g) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle in any area or in such a manner so as to unreasonably expose
the underlying soil, or to create an erosion condition, or to injure,
damage, or destroy trees, growing crops, or other vegetation;
(h) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle or on any nonhighway road or trail, when these are restricted
to pedestrian or animal travel; ((and))
(i) On lands zoned as residential within two hundred fifty feet of
another property owner's residence, or within two hundred fifty feet of
another property owner's barn, stable, penned area, or similar
structure or confined area occupied by any livestock, as defined by RCW
16.36.005, in a repetitive manner or on a track for purposes of
recreation or practicing for races, jumps, tests, or similar purposes.
A person who is guilty of violating this subsection is subject on the
first offense to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars. On each
subsequent violation, the person is subject to twice the amount of fine
as on the last infraction; and
(j) On any public lands in violation of rules and regulations of
the agency administering such lands.
(2) It is a misdemeanor for any person to operate any nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.09.190 and 1979 ex.s. c 136 s 42 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW ((46.09.120(2))) 46.09.120 (1)(j) and
(2) and 46.09.130 as now or hereafter amended, violation of the
provisions of this chapter is a traffic infraction for which a penalty
of not less than twenty-five dollars may be imposed.
(2) In addition to the penalties provided in subsection (1) of this
section, the owner and/or the operator of any nonhighway vehicle shall
be liable for any damage to property including damage to trees, shrubs,
or growing crops injured as the result of travel by the nonhighway
vehicle. The owner of such property may recover from the person
responsible three times the amount of damage.

--- END ---