BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.24.310 and 2003 c 111 s 622 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who desires to be a write-in candidate and have such
votes counted at a primary or election may file a declaration of
candidacy with the officer designated in RCW 29A.24.070 not later than
the day before the primary or election. Declarations of candidacy for
write-in candidates must be accompanied by a filing fee in the same
manner as required of other candidates filing for the office as
provided in RCW 29A.24.090.
Votes cast for write-in candidates who have filed such declarations
of candidacy and write-in votes for persons appointed by political
parties pursuant to RCW 29A.28.020 need only specify the name of the
candidate in the appropriate location on the ballot in order to be
counted. Write-in votes cast for any other candidate, in order to be
counted, must designate the office sought and position number or
political party, if the manner in which the write-in is done does not
make the office or position clear. ((In order for write-in votes to be
valid in jurisdictions employing optical-scan mark sense ballot systems
the voter must complete the proper mark next to the write-in line for
that office.))
No person may file as a write-in candidate where:
(1) At a general election, the person attempting to file either
filed as a write-in candidate for the same office at the preceding
primary or the person's name appeared on the ballot for the same office
at the preceding primary;
(2) The person attempting to file as a write-in candidate has
already filed a valid write-in declaration for that primary or
election, unless one or the other of the two filings is for the office
of precinct committeeperson;
(3) The name of the person attempting to file already appears on
the ballot as a candidate for another office, unless one of the two
offices for which he or she is a candidate is precinct committeeperson.
The declaration of candidacy shall be similar to that required by
RCW 29A.24.030. No write-in candidate filing under this section may be
included in any voter's pamphlet produced under chapter 29A.32 RCW
unless that candidate qualifies to have his or her name printed on the
general election ballot. The legislative authority of any jurisdiction
producing a local voter's pamphlet under chapter 29A.32 RCW may
provide, by ordinance, for the inclusion of write-in candidates in such
pamphlets.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.62.180 and 1999 c 157 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For any office at any election or primary, any voter may write
in on the ballot the name of any person for an office who has filed as
a write-in candidate for the office in the manner provided by RCW
29.04.180 and such vote shall be counted the same as if the name had
been printed on the ballot and marked by the voter. No write-in vote
made for any person who has not filed a declaration of candidacy
pursuant to RCW 29.04.180 is valid if that person filed for the same
office, either as a regular candidate or a write-in candidate, at the
preceding primary. Any abbreviation used to designate office,
position, or political party shall be accepted if the canvassing board
can determine, to their satisfaction, the voter's intent.
(2) The number of write-in votes cast for each office must be
recorded and reported with the canvass for the election.
(3) Write-in votes cast for an individual candidate for an office
need not be tallied if the total number of write-in votes ((cast)) and
under votes recorded by the vote tabulation system for the office is
not greater than the number of votes cast for the candidate apparently
nominated or elected, and the write-in votes could not have altered the
outcome of the primary or election. In the case of write-in votes for
statewide office or for any office whose jurisdiction encompasses more
than one county, write-in votes for an individual candidate must be
tallied whenever the county auditor is notified by either the office of
the secretary of state or another auditor in a multicounty jurisdiction
that it appears that the write-in votes could alter the outcome of the
primary or election.
(4) In the case of statewide offices or jurisdictions that
encompass more than one county, if the total number of write-in votes
((cast)) and under votes recorded by the vote tabulation system for an
office within a county is greater than the number of votes cast for a
candidate apparently nominated or elected in a primary or election, the
auditor shall tally all write-in votes for individual candidates for
that office and notify the office of the secretary of state and the
auditors of the other counties within the jurisdiction, that the write-in votes for individual candidates should be tallied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2004.

--- END ---