BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the widespread
availability of social security numbers contributes to identity theft,
which has been well-documented as one of the nation's fastest growing
crimes. Requiring applicants to disclose social security numbers on
employment applications unreasonably and unnecessarily increases the
risk of exposing applicants to fraudulent users of social security
numbers. For these reasons, the legislature declares that applicants
need not provide social security numbers to potential employers in the
absence of offers of employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer may not compel or coerce a person into providing a
social security number on an employment application or through any
other means until the employer gives the person an offer of employment.
Any request for a social security number before an offer of employment
must be in writing, and must state that disclosure of a social security
number before an offer of employment is voluntary.
(2) An employer may not discriminate against a person because he or
she does not provide a social security number before an offer of
employment.
(3)(a) A person who believes an employer has violated subsection
(1) or (2) of this section may file a complaint alleging the violation
with the director of the department of labor and industries. The
applicant may allege a violation only by filing such a complaint within
ninety days of the alleged violation.
(b) Upon receipt of the complaint, the director must cause an
investigation to be made as the director deems appropriate and must
determine whether subsection (1) or (2) of this section has been
violated. Notice of the director's determination must be sent to the
person who filed the complaint and the employer within ninety days of
receipt of the complaint.
(c) If the director determines that an employer violated subsection
(1) or (2) of this section, the employer is subject to a civil penalty
of at least one hundred dollars and not more than two hundred fifty
dollars for each violation.

--- END ---