BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that providing for public health and
safety, minimizing opportunities for terrorism and other crimes, and
ensuring the security of the state's residents are among the most
essential services of state government. The legislature intends to
ensure the safe operation of unattended service stations, and thereby,
reduce the risk of terrorism and crime, and better protect the health
and safety of state residents.
(2) The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the state
fire protection policy board and the director of fire protection, shall
adopt permanent rules to ensure the safe operation of unattended
gasoline service stations.
(3) These rules shall require, at a minimum, that:
(a) Unattended service stations not offer gasoline or other motor
fuel for sale to the public;
(b) An unattended service station must comply with all applicable
provisions of the NFPA 30, flammable and combustible liquids code,
published by the national fire protection association; NFPA 30A,
automotive and marine service station code, published by the national
fire protection association; and the international fire code, adopted
pursuant to RCW 19.27.031;
(c) All accounts with unattended service stations must be with
business entities licensed in Washington or another state;
(d) All accounts with unattended service stations must be for a
minimum volume of three hundred gallons per month for a minimum fleet
of four vehicles, not including employee vehicles;
(e) Fuel dispensing areas must have photocell lighting for
personnel safety and safe equipment operation;
(f) Telephones with 911 access must be accessible from pump
dispensers; and
(g) Fuel dispensing areas must be clearly posted with emergency
telephone numbers, the service station operator's telephone numbers,
and the address of the service station to report malfunctioning
equipment.
(4) These rules must take effect by January 1, 2005.

--- END ---