BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.04.050 and 1987 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following named officers and persons, active or retired, are
hereby authorized to solemnize marriages, to wit: Justices of the
supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of the superior
courts, superior court commissioners, judges of courts of limited
jurisdiction as defined in RCW 3.02.010, elected officials in the
executive or legislative branch of state, county, or municipal
government, and any regularly licensed or ordained minister or any
priest of any church or religious denomination((, and judges of courts
of limited jurisdiction as defined in RCW 3.02.010)).

Sec. 2 RCW 26.04.070 and Code 1881 s 2383 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the solemnization of marriage no particular form is required,
except that the parties thereto shall assent or declare in the presence
of the minister, priest, elected official, or judicial officer
solemnizing the same, and in the presence of at least two attending
witnesses, that they take each other to be husband and wife.

--- END ---