BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.010 and 1990 c 33 s 376 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In all districts the board of directors ((shall)) must elect a
superintendent who ((shall have such)) has the qualifications ((as))
the local school board alone ((shall)) determines. The superintendent
((shall have supervision over)) supervises the ((several)) departments
of the district's schools ((thereof)) and ((carry)) carries out
((such)) other powers and duties ((as)) prescribed by law.
((Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28A.400.300(1), the board may
contract with such superintendent for a term not to exceed three years
when deemed in the best interest of the district. The right to renew
a contract of employment with any school superintendent shall rest
solely with the discretion of the school board employing such school
superintendent. Regarding such renewal of contracts of school
superintendents the provisions of RCW 28A.405.210, 28A.405.240, and
28A.645.010 shall be inapplicable.)) The superintendent must be
appointed for an indefinite term and may be removed by a majority vote
of the local school board.
(2) At least thirty days before the effective date of removal, the
school board must furnish to the superintendent a formal statement in
the form of a resolution passed by a majority vote of the board stating
the board's intention to remove him or her and the reasons for removal.
After passing the resolution, the board may, by majority vote, suspend
the superintendent from duty, but his or her pay continues until the
removal is effective.
(3) The superintendent may reply in writing within thirty days from
the date of service upon him or her of a copy of the resolution stating
the board's intention to remove him or her. If no reply is timely
filed, the board's action is final on the thirty-first day from service
of the resolution and the superintendent's services terminate in
accordance with the resolution. If a reply is timely filed with its
president, the board must fix a time for a public hearing on the
question of the superintendent's removal, and a final resolution
removing the superintendent may not be adopted until after the public
hearing. The board's action in removing the superintendent is final.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.300 and 1997 c 13 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every board of directors, unless otherwise specially provided by
law, shall:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 28A.400.010, employ for not more than
one year, and for sufficient cause discharge all certificated and
classified employees;
(2) Adopt written policies granting leaves to persons under
contracts of employment with the school district(s) in positions
requiring either certification or classified qualifications, including
but not limited to leaves for attendance at official or private
institutes and conferences and sabbatical leaves for employees in
positions requiring certification qualification, and leaves for
illness, injury, bereavement and, emergencies for both certificated and
classified employees, and with ((such)) the compensation ((as)) the
board of directors prescribes: PROVIDED, That the board of directors
((shall)) must adopt written policies granting ((to such)) these
persons annual leave with compensation for illness, injury, and
emergencies as follows:
(a) For ((such)) persons under contract with the school district
for a full year, at least ten days;
(b) For ((such)) persons under contract with the school district as
part time employees, at least that portion of ten days as the total
number of days contracted for bears to one hundred eighty days;
(c) For certificated and classified employees, annual leave with
compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies ((shall)) must be
granted and accrue at a rate not to exceed twelve days per year;
provisions of any contract in force on June 12, 1980, which conflict
with requirements of this subsection ((shall)) continue in effect until
contract expiration; after expiration, any new contract executed
between the parties ((shall)) must be consistent with this subsection;
(d) Compensation for leave for illness or injury actually taken
((shall)) must be the same as the compensation ((such)) the person
would have received had ((such)) that person not taken the leave
provided in this proviso;
(e) Leave provided in this proviso not taken ((shall)) accumulates
from year to year up to a maximum of one hundred eighty days for the
purposes of RCW 28A.400.210 and 28A.400.220, and for leave purposes up
to a maximum of the number of contract days agreed to in a given
contract, but not greater than one year. ((Such)) This accumulated
time may be taken at any time during the school year or up to twelve
days per year may be used for the purpose of payments for unused sick
leave.
(f) Sick leave heretofore accumulated under section 1, chapter 195,
Laws of 1959 (former RCW 28.58.430) and sick leave accumulated under
administrative practice of school districts prior to the effective date
of section 1, chapter 195, Laws of 1959 (former RCW 28.58.430) is
hereby declared valid, and shall be added to leave for illness or
injury accumulated under this proviso;
(g) Any leave for injury or illness accumulated up to a maximum of
forty-five days ((shall be)) is creditable as service rendered for the
purpose of determining the time at which an employee is eligible to
retire, if ((such)) the leave is taken it may not be compensated under
the provisions of RCW 28A.400.210 and 28A.310.490;
(h) Accumulated leave under this proviso ((shall)) must be
transferred to and from one district to another, the office of
superintendent of public instruction, and offices of educational
service district superintendents and boards, to and from ((such))
districts and ((such)) offices;
(i) Leave accumulated by a person in a district ((prior to)) before
leaving ((said)) the district may, under rules and regulations of the
board, be granted to ((such)) the person when the person returns to the
employment of the district.
When any certificated or classified employee leaves one school
district within the state and ((commences)) begins employment with
another school district within the state, the employee ((shall))
retains the same seniority, leave benefits, and other benefits that the
employee had in his or her previous position: PROVIDED, That
classified employees who transfer between districts after July 28,
1985, ((shall)) do not retain any seniority rights other than longevity
when leaving one school district and beginning employment with another.
If the school district to which the person transfers has a different
system for computing seniority, leave benefits, and other benefits,
then the employee shall be granted the same seniority, leave benefits,
and other benefits as a person in that district who has similar
occupational status and total years of service.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.400.315 and 1990 c 8 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Employment contracts entered into between an employer and ((a
superintendent, or)) an administrator as defined in RCW
28A.405.230((,)) under RCW ((28A.400.010,)) 28A.400.300((,)) or
28A.405.210:
(1) ((Shall)) End no later than June 30th of the calendar year that
the contract expires except that, a contract entered into after June
30th of a given year may expire during that same calendar year; and
(2) ((Shall)) May not be revised or entered into retroactively.

--- END ---