BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) It is the legislature's intent to encourage high schools and
high school students to maximize available learning opportunities that
reduce the overall time and taxpayer support for a student to complete
a postsecondary degree. It is further the legislature's intent to
encourage institutions of higher education to expand programs for
students to earn postsecondary credit while in high school.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Dual credit student" means a student who: (i) Graduates from
a public high school with a high school diploma; and (ii) at the time
of graduation, has accumulated postsecondary course credits through
participation in running start, advanced placement, tech-prep, skills
centers, college in the high school, international baccalaureate, or
any other program that provides high school students with the
opportunity to earn college credits.
(b) "Institutions of higher education" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016(4).
(3) Subject to legislative appropriation, each dual credit student
who has accumulated two academic years of postsecondary course credits
shall generate an incentive payment equal to the statewide annual
average allocation for a full-time equivalent high school student under
RCW 28A.150.260, excluding small high school enhancements. For dual
credit students who have accumulated fewer than two academic years of
course credits, the incentive payment shall equal a pro rata share of
the full allocation.
(4)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall allocate the
incentive payment as follows:
(i) One-half of the incentive payment goes to the school district
from which the dual credit student earned a high school diploma; and
(ii) One-half of the incentive payment goes to the institution or
institutions of higher education from which the dual credit student
earned postsecondary course credits. If a student earns postsecondary
course credit from more than one institution of higher education, the
superintendent shall allocate to each a pro rata share of the higher
education portion of the incentive payment based on the number of
credits earned. If a student earns postsecondary course credits from
an entity other than an institution of higher education as defined in
this section, the superintendent shall allocate that entity's portion
of the incentive payment to the school district.
(b) The superintendent shall allocate the incentive payment in the
school year following the dual credit student's graduation from high
school based on the prior school year's statewide annual average
allocation amount.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW to implement this section, in consultation with the
state board for community and technical colleges and the higher
education coordinating board.

--- END ---