BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.070 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 535 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created a correctional industries board of directors
which shall have the composition provided in RCW 72.09.080.
(2) Consistent with general department of corrections policies and
procedures pertaining to the general administration of correctional
facilities, the board shall establish and implement policy for
correctional industries programs designed to:
(a) Offer inmates meaningful employment, work experience, and
training in vocations that are specifically designed to reduce
recidivism and thereby enhance public safety by providing opportunities
for legitimate means of livelihood upon their release from custody;
(b) Provide industries which will reduce the tax burden of
corrections and save taxpayers money through production of goods and
services for sale and use;
(c) Operate correctional work programs in an effective and
efficient manner which are as similar as possible to those provided by
the private sector;
(d) Encourage the development of and provide for selection of,
contracting for, and supervision of work programs with participating
private enterprise firms;
(e) Develop and design correctional industries work programs that
do not unfairly compete with Washington businesses;
(f) Invest available funds in correctional industries enterprises
and meaningful work programs that minimize the impact on in-state jobs
and businesses.
(3) The board of directors shall at least annually review the work
performance of the director of correctional industries division with
the secretary.
(4) The director of correctional industries division shall review
and evaluate the productivity, funding, and appropriateness of all
correctional work programs and report on their effectiveness to the
board and to the secretary.
(5) The board of directors shall have the authority to identify and
establish trade advisory or apprenticeship committees to advise them on
correctional industries work programs. The secretary shall appoint the
members of the committees.
Where a labor management trade advisory and apprenticeship
committee has already been established by the department pursuant to
RCW 72.62.050 the existing committee shall also advise the board of
directors.
(6) The board shall develop a strategic yearly marketing plan that
shall be consistent with and work towards achieving the goals
established in the six-year phased expansion of class I and class II
correctional industries established in RCW 72.09.111. This marketing
plan shall be presented to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by January 17 of each calendar year until the goals set
forth in RCW 72.09.111 are achieved.

Sec. 2 RCW 72.09.100 and 2002 c 175 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the
power to provide for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove
statutory and other restrictions which have limited work programs in
the past. It is also the intent of the legislature to ensure that the
correctional industries board of directors, in developing and designing
correctional industries work programs, does not encourage the
development of, or provide for selection of or contracting for, the
significant expansion of new or existing class I or class II
correctional industries work programs that unfairly compete with
Washington businesses. The legislature intends that the requirements
relating to fair competition in the correctional industries work
programs be liberally construed to protect Washington businesses from
unfair competition.
For purposes of establishing such a comprehensive program, the
legislature recommends that the department consider adopting any or
all, or any variation of, the following classes of work programs:
(1) CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES.
(a) The employer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit organization
pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the department.
The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both the
public and private sector.
(b) The customer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed by the department to provide Washington state manufacturers
or businesses with products or services currently produced or provided
by out-of-state or foreign suppliers.
(c) The correctional industries board of directors shall review
these proposed industries, including any potential new class I
industries work program or the expansion of an existing class I
industries work program, before the department contracts to provide
such products or services. The review shall include ((an)) the
analysis ((of the potential impact of the proposed products and
services on the Washington state business community and labor market))
required under section 4 of this act to determine if the proposed
correctional industries work program will compete with any Washington
business. An agreement for a new class I correctional industries work
program, or an agreement for a significant expansion of an existing
class I correctional industries work program, that unfairly competes
with any Washington business is prohibited.
(d) The department of corrections shall supply appropriate security
and custody services without charge to the participating firms.
(e) Inmates who work in free venture industries shall do so at
their own choice. They shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry
is located, as determined by the director of correctional industries.
If the director cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then
the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.
(f) An inmate who is employed in the class I program of
correctional industries shall not be eligible for unemployment
compensation benefits pursuant to any of the provisions of Title 50 RCW
until released on parole or discharged.
(2) CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be state-owned and operated
enterprises designed to reduce the costs for goods and services for
tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations.
(b) The industries selected for development within this class
shall, as much as possible, match the available pool of inmate work
skills and aptitudes with the work opportunities in the free community.
The industries shall be closely patterned after private sector
industries but with the objective of reducing public support costs
rather than making a profit. The products and services of this
industry, including purchased products and services necessary for a
complete product line, may be sold to public agencies, to nonprofit
organizations, and to private contractors when the goods purchased will
be ultimately used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization.
Clothing manufactured by an industry in this class may be donated to
nonprofit organizations that provide clothing free of charge to low-income persons.
(c)(i) Class II correctional industries products and services,
including any potential new class II correctional industries work
program or the expansion of an existing class II correctional
industries work program, shall be reviewed by the correctional
industries board of directors before offering such products and
services for sale to private contractors. The review shall include the
analysis required under section 4 of this act to determine if the
proposed correctional industries work program will compete with any
Washington business. An agreement for a new class II correctional
industries work program, or an agreement for a significant expansion of
an existing class II correctional industries work program, that
unfairly competes with any Washington business is prohibited.
(ii) The board of directors shall conduct a yearly marketing review
of the products and services offered under this subsection. ((Such
review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business
community.)) To avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to the
state((,)) when there is no public sector market for such goods,
byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural, and animal husbandry
enterprises may be sold to private persons, at private sale. Surplus
byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural and animal husbandry
enterprises that cannot be sold to public agencies or to private
persons may be donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of
surplus products shall be carried out in accordance with rules
prescribed by the secretary.
(d) Security and custody services shall be provided without charge
by the department of corrections.
(e) Inmates working in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall be paid for their work on a gratuity scale
which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in
the locality in which the industry is located and which is approved by
the director of correctional industries.
(f) Subject to approval of the correctional industries board,
provisions of RCW 41.06.380 prohibiting contracting out work performed
by classified employees shall not apply to contracts with Washington
state businesses entered into by the department of corrections through
class II industries.
(3) CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department of
corrections. They shall be designed and managed to accomplish the
following objectives:
(((a))) (i) Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and
experience so that the inmate will be able to qualify for better work
both within correctional industries and the free community. It is not
intended that an inmate's work within this class of industries should
be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.
(((b))) (ii) Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or
work training per week.
(((c))) (iii) Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public
support costs.
(b) Supervising, management, and custody staff shall be employees
of the department.
(c) All able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are
not working in other classes of industries shall work in this class.
(d) Except for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates
in this class shall be paid for their work in accordance with an inmate
gratuity scale. The scale shall be adopted by the secretary of
corrections.
(4) CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department of
corrections. They shall be designed and managed to provide services in
the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The services shall
be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or infirm, or
to nonprofit organizations.
(b) Inmates in this program shall reside in facilities owned by,
contracted for, or licensed by the department of corrections. A unit
of local government shall provide work supervision services without
charge to the state and shall pay the inmate's wage.
(c) The department of corrections shall reimburse participating
units of local government for liability and workers compensation
insurance costs.
(d) Inmates who work in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall receive a gratuity which shall not exceed
the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the
industry is located.
(5) CLASS V: COMMUNITY RESTITUTION PROGRAMS.
(a) Programs in this class shall be subject to supervision by the
department of corrections. The purpose of this class of industries is
to enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off all
or part of a community restitution order as ordered by the sentencing
court.
(b) Employment shall be in a community restitution program operated
by the state, local units of government, or a nonprofit agency.
(c) To the extent that funds are specifically made available for
such purposes, the department of corrections shall reimburse nonprofit
agencies for workers compensation insurance costs.

Sec. 3 RCW 72.09.100 and 2002 c 354 s 238 and 2002 c 175 s 49 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the
power to provide for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove
statutory and other restrictions which have limited work programs in
the past. It is also the intent of the legislature to ensure that the
correctional industries board of directors, in developing and designing
correctional industries work programs, does not encourage the
development of, or provide for selection of or contracting for, the
significant expansion of new or existing class I or class II
correctional industries work programs that unfairly compete with
Washington businesses. The legislature intends that the requirements
relating to fair competition in the correctional industries work
programs be liberally construed to protect Washington businesses from
unfair competition. For purposes of establishing such a comprehensive
program, the legislature recommends that the department consider
adopting any or all, or any variation of, the following classes of work
programs:
(1) CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES.
(a) The employer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit organization
pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the department.
The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both the
public and private sector.
(b) The customer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed by the department to provide Washington state manufacturers
or businesses with products or services currently produced or provided
by out-of-state or foreign suppliers.
(c) The correctional industries board of directors shall review
these proposed industries, including any potential new class I
industries work program or the expansion of an existing class I
industries work program, before the department contracts to provide
such products or services. The review shall include ((an)) the
analysis ((of the potential impact of the proposed products and
services on the Washington state business community and labor market))
required under section 4 of this act to determine if the proposed
correctional industries work program will compete with any Washington
business. An agreement for a new class I correctional industries work
program, or an agreement for a significant expansion of an existing
class I correctional industries work program, that unfairly competes
with any Washington business is prohibited.
(d) The department of corrections shall supply appropriate security
and custody services without charge to the participating firms.
(e) Inmates who work in free venture industries shall do so at
their own choice. They shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry
is located, as determined by the director of correctional industries.
If the director cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then
the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.
(f) An inmate who is employed in the class I program of
correctional industries shall not be eligible for unemployment
compensation benefits pursuant to any of the provisions of Title 50 RCW
until released on parole or discharged.
(2) CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be state-owned and operated
enterprises designed to reduce the costs for goods and services for
tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations.
(b) The industries selected for development within this class
shall, as much as possible, match the available pool of inmate work
skills and aptitudes with the work opportunities in the free community.
The industries shall be closely patterned after private sector
industries but with the objective of reducing public support costs
rather than making a profit. The products and services of this
industry, including purchased products and services necessary for a
complete product line, may be sold to public agencies, to nonprofit
organizations, and to private contractors when the goods purchased will
be ultimately used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization.
Clothing manufactured by an industry in this class may be donated to
nonprofit organizations that provide clothing free of charge to low-income persons.
(c)(i) Class II correctional industries products and services,
including any potential new class II correctional industries work
program or the expansion of an existing class II correctional
industries work program, shall be reviewed by the correctional
industries board of directors before offering such products and
services for sale to private contractors. The review shall include the
analysis required under section 4 of this act to determine if the
proposed correctional industries work program will compete with any
Washington business. An agreement for a new class II correctional
industries work program, or an agreement for a significant expansion of
an existing class II correctional industries work program, that
unfairly competes with any Washington business is prohibited.
(ii) The board of directors shall conduct a yearly marketing review
of the products and services offered under this subsection. ((Such
review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business
community.)) To avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to the
state, when there is no public sector market for such goods, byproducts
and surpluses of timber, agricultural, and animal husbandry enterprises
may be sold to private persons, at private sale. Surplus byproducts
and surpluses of timber, agricultural and animal husbandry enterprises
that cannot be sold to public agencies or to private persons may be
donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of surplus products
shall be carried out in accordance with rules prescribed by the
secretary.
(d) Security and custody services shall be provided without charge
by the department of corrections.
(e) Inmates working in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall be paid for their work on a gratuity scale
which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in
the locality in which the industry is located and which is approved by
the director of correctional industries.
(f) Subject to approval of the correctional industries board,
provisions of RCW 41.06.142 shall not apply to contracts with
Washington state businesses entered into by the department of
corrections through class II industries.
(3) CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department of
corrections. They shall be designed and managed to accomplish the
following objectives:
(((a))) (i) Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and
experience so that the inmate will be able to qualify for better work
both within correctional industries and the free community. It is not
intended that an inmate's work within this class of industries should
be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.
(((b))) (ii) Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or
work training per week.
(((c))) (iii) Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public
support costs.
(b) Supervising, management, and custody staff shall be employees
of the department.
(c) All able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are
not working in other classes of industries shall work in this class.
(d) Except for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates
in this class shall be paid for their work in accordance with an inmate
gratuity scale. The scale shall be adopted by the secretary of
corrections.
(4) CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department of
corrections. They shall be designed and managed to provide services in
the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The services shall
be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or infirm, or
to nonprofit organizations.
(b) Inmates in this program shall reside in facilities owned by,
contracted for, or licensed by the department of corrections. A unit
of local government shall provide work supervision services without
charge to the state and shall pay the inmate's wage.
(c) The department of corrections shall reimburse participating
units of local government for liability and workers compensation
insurance costs.
(d) Inmates who work in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall receive a gratuity which shall not exceed
the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the
industry is located.
(5) CLASS V: COMMUNITY RESTITUTION PROGRAMS.
(a) Programs in this class shall be subject to supervision by the
department of corrections. The purpose of this class of industries is
to enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off all
or part of a community restitution order as ordered by the sentencing
court.
(b) Employment shall be in a community restitution program operated
by the state, local units of government, or a nonprofit agency.
(c) To the extent that funds are specifically made available for
such purposes, the department of corrections shall reimburse nonprofit
agencies for workers compensation insurance costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The correctional industries board of directors must prepare a
threshold analysis for any proposed new class I or class II
correctional industries work program or the significant expansion of an
existing class I or class II correctional industries work program
before the department enters into an agreement to provide such products
or services. The analysis must state whether the proposed new or
expanded program will impact any Washington business and must be based
on information sufficient to evaluate the impact on Washington
business.
(2) If the threshold analysis determines that a proposed new or
expanded class I or class II correctional industries work program will
impact a Washington business, the correctional industries board of
directors must complete a business impact analysis before the
department enters into an agreement to provide such products or
services. The business impact analysis must include:
(a) A detailed statement identifying the scope and types of impacts
caused by the proposed new or expanded correctional industries work
program on Washington businesses; and
(b) A detailed statement of the actual business costs of the
proposed correctional industries work program compared to the costs of
the impacted Washington businesses.
(3) The completed threshold analysis and any completed business
impact analysis with all supporting documents must be shared in a
meaningful and timely manner with affected chambers of commerce, trade
or business associations, local and state labor union organizations,
and government entities before a finding required under subsection (4)
of this section is made on the proposed new or expanded class I or
class II correctional industries work program.
(4) If a business impact analysis is completed, the correctional
industries board of directors must conduct a public hearing to take
public testimony on the business impact analysis. The department must
provide notice to each Washington business assigned the same three-digit standard industrial classification code, or the corresponding
North American industry classification system code, as the organization
seeking the class I or class II correctional industries work program
agreement of the date, time, and place of the hearing. Following the
public hearing, the board shall adopt a finding that the proposed new
or expanded class I or class II correctional industries work program:
(a) Will not compete with any Washington business; (b) will not compete
unfairly with any Washington business; or (c) will compete unfairly
with any Washington business and is therefore prohibited under this
act. Hearings conducted under this subsection are exempt from the
requirements for adjudicative proceedings under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(5) Judicial review of a decision made by the department or board
under this section, including the adequacy of the threshold analysis or
the business impact statement, shall be de novo.

Sec. 5 RCW 72.09.015 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Base level of correctional services" means the minimum level
of field services the department of corrections is required by statute
to provide for the supervision and monitoring of offenders.
(2) "Contraband" means any object or communication the secretary
determines shall not be allowed to be: (a) Brought into; (b) possessed
while on the grounds of; or (c) sent from any institution under the
control of the secretary.
(3) "County" means a county or combination of counties.
(4) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(5) "Earned early release" means earned ((early)) release as
authorized by RCW 9.94A.728.
(6) "Extended family visit" means an authorized visit between an
inmate and a member of his or her immediate family that occurs in a
private visiting unit located at the correctional facility where the
inmate is confined.
(7) "Good conduct" means compliance with department rules and
policies.
(8) "Good performance" means successful completion of a program
required by the department, including an education, work, or other
program.
(9) "Immediate family" means the inmate's children, stepchildren,
grandchildren, great grandchildren, parents, stepparents, grandparents,
great grandparents, siblings, and a person legally married to an
inmate. "Immediate family" does not include an inmate adopted by
another inmate or the immediate family of the adopted or adopting
inmate.
(10) "Indigent inmate," "indigent," and "indigency" mean an inmate
who has less than a ten-dollar balance of disposable income in his or
her institutional account on the day a request is made to utilize funds
and during the thirty days previous to the request.
(11) "Inmate" means a person committed to the custody of the
department, including but not limited to persons residing in a
correctional institution or facility and persons released on furlough,
work release, or community custody, and persons received from another
state, state agency, county, or federal jurisdiction.
(12) "Privilege" means any goods or services, education or work
programs, or earned early release days, the receipt of which are
directly linked to an inmate's (a) good conduct; and (b) good
performance. Privileges do not include any goods or services the
department is required to provide under the state or federal
Constitution or under state or federal law.
(13) "Secretary" means the secretary of corrections or his or her
designee.
(14) "Significant expansion" includes any expansion into a new
product line or service or an increase in production of the same
product or service.
(15) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of a correctional
facility under the jurisdiction of the Washington state department of
corrections, or his or her designee.
(((15))) (16) "Unfair competition" means any net competitive
advantage that a business may acquire as a result of a correctional
industries contract, including but not limited to labor costs,
financing, rent, marketing costs, tax advantages, utility costs, and
other overhead costs.
(17) "Washington business" means a person subject to chapter 82.04
RCW.
(18) "Work programs" means all classes of correctional industries
jobs authorized under RCW 72.09.100.

Sec. 6 RCW 34.05.030 and 1994 c 39 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter shall not apply to:
(a) The state militia, or
(b) The board of clemency and pardons, or
(c) The department of corrections or the indeterminate sentencing
review board with respect to persons who are in their custody or are
subject to the jurisdiction of those agencies.
(2) The provisions of RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 shall not
apply:
(a) To adjudicative proceedings of the board of industrial
insurance appeals except as provided in RCW 7.68.110 and 51.48.131;
(b) Except for actions pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, to the
denial, suspension, or revocation of a driver's license by the
department of licensing;
(c) To the department of labor and industries where another statute
expressly provides for review of adjudicative proceedings of a
department action, order, decision, or award before the board of
industrial insurance appeals;
(d) To actions of the Washington personnel resources board, the
director of personnel, or the personnel appeals board; ((or))
(e) To the extent they are inconsistent with any provisions of
chapter 43.43 RCW; or
(f) To hearings conducted by the correctional industries board
under section 4(4) of this act.
(3) Unless a party makes an election for a formal hearing pursuant
to RCW 82.03.140 or 82.03.190, RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 do not
apply to a review hearing conducted by the board of tax appeals.
(4) The rule-making provisions of this chapter do not apply to
reimbursement unit values, fee schedules, arithmetic conversion
factors, and similar arithmetic factors used to determine payment rates
that apply to goods and services purchased under contract for clients
eligible under chapter 74.09 RCW.
(5) All other agencies, whether or not formerly specifically
excluded from the provisions of all or any part of the Administrative
Procedure Act, shall be subject to the entire act.

Sec. 7 RCW 34.05.030 and 2002 c 354 s 225 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter shall not apply to:
(a) The state militia, or
(b) The board of clemency and pardons, or
(c) The department of corrections or the indeterminate sentencing
review board with respect to persons who are in their custody or are
subject to the jurisdiction of those agencies.
(2) The provisions of RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 shall not
apply:
(a) To adjudicative proceedings of the board of industrial
insurance appeals except as provided in RCW 7.68.110 and 51.48.131;
(b) Except for actions pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, to the
denial, suspension, or revocation of a driver's license by the
department of licensing;
(c) To the department of labor and industries where another statute
expressly provides for review of adjudicative proceedings of a
department action, order, decision, or award before the board of
industrial insurance appeals;
(d) To actions of the Washington personnel resources board or the
director of personnel; ((or))
(e) To the extent they are inconsistent with any provisions of
chapter 43.43 RCW; or
(f) To hearings conducted by the correctional industries board
under section 4(4) of this act.
(3) Unless a party makes an election for a formal hearing pursuant
to RCW 82.03.140 or 82.03.190, RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 do not
apply to a review hearing conducted by the board of tax appeals.
(4) The rule-making provisions of this chapter do not apply to
reimbursement unit values, fee schedules, arithmetic conversion
factors, and similar arithmetic factors used to determine payment rates
that apply to goods and services purchased under contract for clients
eligible under chapter 74.09 RCW.
(5) All other agencies, whether or not formerly specifically
excluded from the provisions of all or any part of the Administrative
Procedure Act, shall be subject to the entire act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Section 3 of this act takes effect July
1, 2005.
(2) Section 7 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Section 2 of this act expires July 1,
2005.
(2) Section 6 of this act expires July 1, 2006.

--- END ---