BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who applies for an original, renewal, or replacement
instruction permit, intermediate driver's license, driver's license, or
identicard, and who is less than twenty-six years of age, and is
required to do so, must be registered in compliance with the
requirements of section 3 of the Military Selective Service Act, 50
U.S.C. app. 451 et seq., as amended.
(2) The department shall forward in an electronic format the
necessary personal information of an applicant identified in subsection
(1) of this section to the selective service system within ten days of
the completion of the application. The applicant's submission of the
application serves as an indication that the applicant either has
already registered with the selective service system or that he is
authorizing the department to forward to the selective service system
the necessary information for the registration. The department shall
notify the applicant at the time of application that his submission of
the application will serve as his consent to registration with the
selective service system, if so required. The department shall also
notify the applicant that if he is under the age of eighteen he will be
registered upon turning age eighteen as required by federal law.
(3) The department may adopt rules necessary for the implementation
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2005.

--- END ---