BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.09.170 and 2002 c 199 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of RCW
26.09.070, the provisions of any decree respecting maintenance or
support may be modified: (a) Only as to installments accruing
subsequent to the petition for modification or motion for adjustment
except motions to compel court-ordered adjustments, which shall be
effective as of the first date specified in the decree for implementing
the adjustment; and, (b) except as otherwise provided in subsections
(5), (6), (9), and (10) of this section, only upon a showing of a
substantial change of circumstances. The provisions as to property
disposition may not be revoked or modified, unless the court finds the
existence of conditions that justify the reopening of a judgment under
the laws of this state.
(2) Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the
decree the obligation to pay future maintenance is terminated upon the
death of either party or the remarriage of the party receiving
maintenance.
(3) Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the
decree, provisions for the support of a child are terminated by
emancipation of the child or by the death of the parent obligated to
support the child.
(4) Unless expressly provided by an order of the superior court or
a court of comparable jurisdiction, the support provisions of the order
are terminated upon the marriage to each other of parties to a
paternity order, or upon remarriage to each other of parties to a
decree of dissolution. The remaining provisions of the order,
including provisions establishing paternity, remain in effect.
(5) An order of child support may be modified one year or more
after it has been entered without showing a substantial change of
circumstances:
(a) If the order in practice works a severe economic hardship on
either party or the child;
(b) If a party requests an adjustment in an order for child support
which was based on guidelines which determined the amount of support
according to the child's age, and the child is no longer in the age
category on which the current support amount was based;
(c) If a child is still in high school, upon a finding that there
is a need to extend support beyond the eighteenth birthday to complete
high school; or
(d) To add an automatic adjustment of support provision consistent
with RCW 26.09.100.
(6) An order or decree entered prior to June 7, 1984, may be
modified without showing a substantial change of circumstances if the
requested modification is to:
(a) Require health insurance coverage for a child named therein; or
(b) Modify an existing order for health insurance coverage.
(7) An obligor's voluntary unemployment or voluntary
underemployment, by itself, is not a substantial change of
circumstances.
(8) The department of social and health services may file an action
to modify an order of child support if public assistance money is being
paid to or for the benefit of the child and the child support order is
twenty-five percent or more below the appropriate child support amount
set forth in the standard calculation as defined in RCW 26.19.011 and
reasons for the deviation are not set forth in the findings of fact or
order. The determination of twenty-five percent or more shall be based
on the current income of the parties and the department shall not be
required to show a substantial change of circumstances if the reasons
for the deviations were not set forth in the findings of fact or order.
(9)(a) All child support decrees may be adjusted once every
((twenty-four)) twelve months based upon changes in the income of the
parents without a showing of substantially changed circumstances.
Either party may initiate the adjustment by filing a motion and child
support worksheets.
(b) A party may petition for modification in cases of substantially
changed circumstances under subsection (1) of this section at any time.
However, if relief is granted under subsection (1) of this section,
((twenty-four)) twelve months must pass before a motion for an
adjustment under (a) of this subsection may be filed.
(c) If, pursuant to (a) of this subsection or subsection (10) of
this section, the court adjusts or modifies a child support obligation
by more than thirty percent and the change would cause significant
hardship, the court may implement the change in two equal increments,
one at the time of the entry of the order and the second six months
from the entry of the order. ((Twenty-four)) Twelve months must pass
following the second change before a motion for an adjustment under (a)
of this subsection may be filed.
(d) A parent who is receiving transfer payments who receives a wage
or salary increase may not bring a modification action pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section alleging that increase constitutes a
substantial change of circumstances.
(e) The department of social and health services may file an action
at any time to modify an order of child support in cases of
substantially changed circumstances if public assistance money is being
paid to or for the benefit of the child. The determination of the
existence of substantially changed circumstances by the department that
lead to the filing of an action to modify the order of child support is
not binding upon the court.
(10) An order of child support may be adjusted ((twenty-four))
twelve months from the date of the entry of the decree or the last
adjustment or modification, whichever is later, based upon changes in
the economic table or standards in chapter 26.19 RCW.

--- END ---