BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
optimize the management of the recreational allocation of Dungeness
crab in Washington state. To accomplish this task, it is necessary to
accurately and efficiently quantify the total catch by recreational
fishers for Dungeness crab using data from catch record cards.
Therefore, an endorsement fee on the catch record card paid at the time
of purchasing a recreational fishing license will be required for
Dungeness crab to specifically identify the recreational crab
harvesting population. The endorsement fee will significantly improve
the precision of the catch estimates by eliminating the current
practice of sampling fishers who do not participate in the recreational
crab fishery.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.32.430 and 2003 c 318 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Catch record card((s)) information is necessary for proper
management of the state's food fish and game fish species and shellfish
resources. Catch record card administration shall be ((administered))
under rules adopted by the commission ((and issued at no charge for
the)). There is no charge for an initial catch record card ((and ten
dollars for)). Each subsequent or duplicate catch record card((. A
duplicate catch record [card])) costs ten dollars.
(2) A license to take and possess Dungeness crab is only valid in
Puget Sound waters east of the Bonilla-Tatoosh line if the fisher has
in possession a valid catch record card officially endorsed for
Dungeness crab. The endorsement shall cost no more than three dollars
including any or all fees authorized under RCW 77.32.050.
(3) Catch record cards issued with affixed temporary short-term
charter stamp licenses are not subject to the ten-dollar charge ((as))
nor to the Dungeness crab endorsement fee provided for in this section.
Charter boat or guide operators issuing temporary short-term charter
stamp licenses shall affix the stamp to each catch record card issued
before fishing commences. Catch record cards issued with a temporary
short-term charter stamp are valid for two consecutive days.
(((3))) (4) The department shall include provisions for recording
marked and unmarked salmon in catch record cards issued after March 31,
2004.
(((4))) (5) The funds received from the sale of catch record cards
and the Dungeness crab endorsement must be deposited into the wildlife
fund. The funds received from the Dungeness crab endorsement may be
used only for the sampling, monitoring, and management of catch
associated with the Dungeness crab recreational fisheries. Moneys
allocated under this section shall supplement and not supplant other
federal, state, and local funds used for Dungeness crab recreational
fisheries management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 After the completion of one season using the
Dungeness crab endorsement fee for Puget Sound recreational Dungeness
crab fisheries, the department of fish and wildlife shall evaluate the
effectiveness of the endorsement fee as a method for improving the
accuracy of catch estimates for the Puget Sound recreational Dungeness
crab fishery. The department's report shall include how the method has
affected their ability to more accurately estimate the preseason
allocation of the Puget Sound recreational Dungeness crab fishery and
monitor in-season catch. The department shall report their findings to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by May 15, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect December 1, 2004, and
applies only to those recreational licenses sold for the 2005-2006
Dungeness crab fishery and to all subsequent recreational Dungeness
crab fisheries.

--- END ---