BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.20.020 and 2003 c 111 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person filing a declaration of candidacy for an office shall,
at the time of filing, be a registered voter and possess the
qualifications specified by law for persons who may be elected to the
office.
(2) ((Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a
temporary elected position such as a charter review board member or
freeholder, no person may file for more than one office.)) A person may
not file for more than one office or more than one position within an
office. However, a person may file for one additional office if the
office is precinct committee officer, a temporary elected office such
as charter review board member or freeholder, or an office for which a
filing fee is not required under RCW 29A.24.090.
(3) The name of a candidate for an office shall not appear on a
ballot for that office unless, except as provided in RCW 3.46.067 and
3.50.057, the candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of
candidacy is filed, properly registered to vote in the geographic area
represented by the office. For the purposes of this section, each
geographic area in which registered voters may cast ballots for an
office is represented by that office. If a person elected to an office
must be nominated from a district or similar division of the geographic
area represented by the office, the name of a candidate for the office
shall not appear on a primary ballot for that office unless the
candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of candidacy is
filed, properly registered to vote in that district or division. The
officer with whom declarations of candidacy must be filed under this
title shall review each such declaration filed regarding compliance
with this subsection.
(4) This section does not apply to the office of a member of the
United States Congress.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.24.310 and 2003 c 111 s 622 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who desires to be a write-in candidate and have such
votes counted at a primary or election may file a declaration of
candidacy with the officer designated in RCW 29A.24.070 not later than
the day before the primary or election. Declarations of candidacy for
write-in candidates must be accompanied by a filing fee in the same
manner as required of other candidates filing for the office as
provided in RCW 29A.24.090.
Votes cast for write-in candidates who have filed such declarations
of candidacy and write-in votes for persons appointed by political
parties pursuant to RCW 29A.28.020 need only specify the name of the
candidate in the appropriate location on the ballot in order to be
counted. Write-in votes cast for any other candidate, in order to be
counted, must designate the office sought and position number or
political party, if the manner in which the write-in is done does not
make the office or position clear. In order for write-in votes to be
valid in jurisdictions employing optical-scan mark sense ballot systems
the voter must complete the proper mark next to the write-in line for
that office.
No person may file as a write-in candidate where:
(1) At a general election, the person attempting to file either
filed as a write-in candidate for the same office at the preceding
primary or the person's name appeared on the ballot for the same office
at the preceding primary;
(2) The person attempting to file as a write-in candidate has
already filed a valid write-in declaration for that primary or
election, unless one ((or the other)) of the two filings is for the
office of precinct committeeperson or any office for which no filing
fee is required;
(3) The name of the person attempting to file already appears on
the ballot as a candidate for another office, unless one of the two
offices for which he or she is a candidate is precinct committeeperson
or any office for which no filing fee is required.
The declaration of candidacy shall be similar to that required by
RCW 29A.24.030. No write-in candidate filing under this section may be
included in any voter's pamphlet produced under chapter 29A.32 RCW
unless that candidate qualifies to have his or her name printed on the
general election ballot. The legislative authority of any jurisdiction
producing a local voter's pamphlet under chapter 29A.32 RCW may
provide, by ordinance, for the inclusion of write-in candidates in such
pamphlets.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.36.200 and 2003 c 111 s 920 are each amended to
read as follows:
The names of the persons certified as nominees by the secretary of
state or the county canvassing board shall be printed on the ballot at
the ensuing election.
No name of any candidate whose nomination at a primary is required
by law shall be placed upon the ballot at a general or special election
unless it appears upon the certificate of either (1) the secretary of
state, or (2) the county canvassing board, or (3) a minor party
convention or the state or county central committee of a major
political party to fill a vacancy on its ticket under RCW 29A.28.020.
((Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a temporary
elected position such as a charter review board member or freeholder,
a candidate's name shall not appear more than once upon a ballot for a
position regularly nominated or elected at the same election.))
A candidate's name shall not appear more than once upon a ballot.
However, a candidate's name may appear for one additional office if the
office is precinct committee officer, a temporary elected office such
as charter review board member or freeholder, or an office for which a
filing fee is not required under RCW 29A.24.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---