BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An agency may not adopt a proposed rule until the legislature
has had the opportunity to hold a public hearing on the proposed rule.
Legislative hearings on agency rules will be held as follows:
(a) For proposed rules published in the state register between
October 1st and December 31st of the same year, a public hearing will
be held during the regular session of the following year.
(b) For proposed rules published in the state register between
January 1st and September 30th, a public hearing will be held during
the legislative interim of that same year. During this period,
hearings will be held within sixty calendar days of publication of the
text of the proposal in the state register.
(2) An agency seeking to adopt a proposed rule shall submit a copy
of the rule, along with the summary and responses required by RCW
34.05.325(6), to the chief clerk of the house of representatives and
the secretary of the senate at the same time that the text of the
proposed rule is sent to the code reviser for publication in the state
register. Upon receipt of a proposed rule, the speaker of the house of
representatives and the president of the senate shall refer the
proposed rule to the appropriate standing committees in the house of
representatives and the senate, respectively.
(3) Standing committees may conduct a public hearing on a referred
proposed rule. If a standing committee decides not to hold a hearing
on a proposed rule, the committee chair must notify the chair and
ranking minority leader of the appropriate standing committee in the
opposite house. The house and senate standing committees may cooperate
to hold joint hearings or to determine which body will hold the
hearing.
(a) If the standing committees in both houses determine that a
hearing will not be held on a proposed rule, the committee chairs shall
notify the appropriate agency of that decision and the agency may
continue with the rule adoption process.
(b) If the legislature has not held a public hearing on a proposed
rule within the timeline established in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of
this section, the agency may proceed with the rule adoption process.
(4) Standing committees shall submit testimony received during the
public hearing on a proposed rule to the agency proposing the rule.
(5) This section does not apply to:
(a) Emergency rules adopted in accordance with RCW 34.05.350; and
(b) Rules adopted by the department of fish and wildlife
establishing hunting and fishing seasons under RCW 77.12.047.
(6) This section applies only to proposed rules the text of which
is first published in the state register after the effective date of
this act.

--- END ---