BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.80.290 and 1983 c 304 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The statewide transfer of credit policy and agreement ((shall))
must be designed to facilitate the transfer of students and the
evaluation of transcripts, to better serve persons seeking information
about courses and programs, to aid in academic planning, and to improve
the review and evaluation of academic programs in the state
institutions of higher education. The statewide transfer of credit
policy and agreement ((shall)) must not require ((nor)) or encourage
the standardization of course content ((and shall not)) or prescribe
course content or the credit value assigned by any institution to the
course. Under the statewide transfer of credit policy and agreement,
public four-year institutions may not treat credits earned at a
community or technical college differently from credits earned at a
baccalaureate institution in terms of the number of credits students
may transfer or the application of credits toward a degree.

--- END ---