BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35A.06.050 and 1994 c 223 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
The proposal for abandonment of a plan of government as authorized
in RCW 35A.06.030 and for adoption of the plan named in the resolution
or petition shall be voted upon at the next general ((municipal))
election ((if one is to be held within one hundred and eighty days or
otherwise at a special election called for that purpose)) in accordance
with RCW ((29.13.020)) 29A.04.330. The ballot title and statement of
the proposition shall be prepared by the city attorney as provided in
RCW 29.27.060 and 35A.29.120.

--- END ---