BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.410 and 1993 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Police dog" means a dog used by a law enforcement agency
specially trained for law enforcement work and under the control of a
dog handler.
(b) "Accelerant detection dog" means a dog used exclusively for
accelerant detection by the state fire marshal or a fire department and
under the control of the state fire marshal or his or her designee or
a fire department handler.
(c) "Dog handler" means a law enforcement officer who has
successfully completed training as prescribed by the Washington state
criminal justice training commission in police dog handling, or in the
case of an accelerant detection dog, the state fire marshal's designee
or an employee of the fire department authorized by the fire chief to
be the dog's handler.
(d) "Horse handler" means a law enforcement officer who has
successfully completed training as prescribed by the Washington state
criminal justice training commission in police horse handling.
(e) "Police horse" means a horse used by a law enforcement agency
specially trained for law enforcement work and under the control of a
horse handler.
(2) Any dog handler who uses a police dog and any horse handler who
uses a police horse in the line of duty in good faith is immune from
civil action for damages arising out of ((such)) the use of the police
dog ((or)), accelerant detection dog, or police horse.

--- END ---