BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.31.057 and 1993 c 280 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of community, trade, and economic development is
directed to develop and promote means to stimulate the expansion of the
market for Washington products and shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) To develop a pamphlet for statewide circulation which will
encourage the purchase of items produced in the state of Washington;
(2) To include in the pamphlet a listing of products of Washington
companies which individuals can examine when making purchases so they
may have the opportunity to select one of those products in support of
this program;
(3) To distribute the pamphlets on the broadest possible basis
through local offices of state agencies, business organizations,
chambers of commerce, or any other means the department deems
appropriate;
(4) To create a "Washington Made" logo pursuant to section 2 of
this act for the voluntary labeling of consumer goods made in
Washington, and to create and carry out an advertising campaign to
promote the logo;
(5) In carrying out these powers and duties the department shall
cooperate and coordinate with other agencies of government and the
private sector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall announce a competition for the design of the "Washington Made"
logo among students receiving an elementary, intermediate, secondary,
or higher education in Washington. The selection committee shall be
composed of the two economic development committees of the legislature
and the governor. The student who designs the winning logo will
receive a scholarship award of five thousand dollars. The student who
designs the logo that receives second place in the competition will
receive a scholarship award of three thousand five hundred dollars.
The student who designs the logo that receives third place in the
competition will receive a scholarship award of one thousand five
hundred dollars. The trademark rights to the winning "Washington Made"
logo shall be vested in the state of Washington.
(2) In subsequent years, if the department determines that it is
cost-effective to issue a different logo, a competition for the logo
design shall be conducted in the same manner as the original
competition.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall work with economic development councils, chambers of commerce,
the economic development commission, industry organizations, and trade
organizations to develop the advertising campaign and secure private
and other public funds to support the advertising campaign.

--- END ---