BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.80.280 and 1998 c 245 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall, in cooperation with the state institutions of
higher education and the state board for community and technical
colleges, establish and maintain a statewide transfer of credit policy
and agreement. The policy and agreement shall, where feasible, include
course and program descriptions consistent with statewide
interinstitutional guidelines. The institutions of higher education
shall provide support and staff resources as necessary to assist in
developing and maintaining this policy and agreement. ((The statewide
transfer of credit policy and agreement shall be effective beginning
with the 1985-86 academic year.))

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.80.290 and 1983 c 304 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The statewide transfer of credit policy and agreement shall be
designed to facilitate the transfer of students and the evaluation of
transcripts, to better serve persons seeking information about courses
and programs, to aid in academic planning, and to improve the review
and evaluation of academic programs in the state institutions of higher
education. ((The statewide transfer of credit policy and agreement
shall not require nor encourage the standardization of course content
and shall not prescribe course content or the credit value assigned by
any institution to the course.))
(2) Beginning with the 2004-05 academic year, the statewide
transfer of credit policy and agreement shall provide for a common
course catalog for all lower division courses offered by institutions
of higher education, where equivalent courses offered at community and
technical colleges and four-year institutions shall be identified using
a statewide common numbering system. The policy and agreement under
this section shall ensure that courses within the common course catalog
will transfer and be accepted equally among institutions of higher
education with regard to the number of credits earned for a course, the
applicability of a course in meeting prerequisites for a major or minor
in a field of study, and the applicability of a course in meeting an
institution's general education requirements.

--- END ---