BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.68.120 and 1949 c 100 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every licensee under this chapter shall comply with the following:
(1) Dead animals shall be placed in containers or vehicles which
are constructed of or lined with impervious material, and which do not
permit the escape of any liquid, and which are completely covered in
such a way that the contents shall not be openly exposed to insects.
(2) All vehicles and containers used for transporting dead animals
shall be properly cleaned and disinfected before leaving the premises
of a rendering plant, substation or place of transfer.
(3) After original loading, dead animals shall not be moved from
the transporting container or vehicle upon a public highway or in any
other place, except at a licensed rendering plant, licensed substation,
or licensed place of transfer.
(4) No containers and vehicles used for transporting dead animals
shall be used for the transporting of live animals except to a licensed
rendering plant.
(5) All vehicles used to haul dead animals that have died of an
infectious or contagious disease, shall proceed directly to the
unloading point and shall not enter other premises until the vehicle
has been properly cleaned and disinfected.
(6) The name of the rendering plant or independent collector shall
be painted in letters at least four inches high on each side of every
truck used for transporting dead animals.
(7) The skinning and dismembering of dead animals shall be done in
the building where they are processed.
(8) Cooking vats or tanks shall be airtight except for proper
escape for steam or vapor.
(9) Steam or vapor from cooking vats or tanks shall be so disposed
of as not to be detrimental to public health or safety.
(10) Dead animals shall be processed within forty-eight hours after
delivery to the rendering plant.
(11) No carcasses, parts thereof, or packing house refuse under
process for marketing shall be permitted to come in contact with any
part of the building or the equipment used in connection with the
unloading, skinning, dismembering and grinding of carcasses or refuse
as originally received at disposal plant.

Sec. 2 RCW 16.68.180 and 1949 c 100 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
The violation of any provision of this chapter ((shall be)) is a
misdemeanor and punishable subject to the penalties in RCW 9A.20.021.

--- END ---