BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.32.020 and 1993 c 403 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The chief of the Washington state patrol may adopt reasonable
rules regarding types of vehicles to be inspected, inspection criteria,
times for the inspection of vehicle equipment, drivers' qualifications,
hours of service, and all other matters with respect to the conduct of
vehicle equipment and driver inspections.
(2)(a) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Utility" means a public service company as defined in RCW
80.04.010, a public utility district, or a rural electric cooperative
that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to more
than one retail electric customer in the state.
(ii) "Utility contractor" means a person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity employed by a utility to provide relief
assistance.
(iii) "Relief assistance" means action taken to respond to a
terrorism threat, to protect the health and safety of individuals, to
protect against substantial loss of property, to protect the public
health and safety, or to lessen or avert the consequences of
catastrophe, severe weather, or other emergency.
(b) Hours of service rules do not apply to a utility, its
employees, its utility contractors, or the employees of its utility
contractors in an emergency. An emergency exists if: (i) An agency of
state or local government requests relief assistance from a utility to
supplement the efforts and capabilities of the agency; or (ii) a
utility identifies an occasion or instance in which relief assistance
is needed. The utility must use due diligence in contacting state or
local officials and coordinating its activity with state or local
officials.
(3) The chief of the Washington state patrol shall prepare and
furnish such stickers, tags, record and report forms, stationery, and
other supplies as shall be deemed necessary. The chief of the
Washington state patrol is empowered to appoint and employ such
assistants as he may consider necessary and to fix hours of employment
and compensation.

--- END ---