BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.120.010 and 1990 c 33 s 554 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The purpose of this chapter is to establish guidelines for the
regulation of health professions not licensed or regulated prior to
July 24, 1983, and those licensed or regulated health professions which
seek to substantially increase their scope of practice: PROVIDED, That
the provisions of this chapter are not intended and shall not be
construed to: (a) Apply to any regulatory entity created prior to July
24, 1983, except as provided in this chapter; (b) affect the powers and
responsibilities of the superintendent of public instruction or state
board of education under RCW 28A.305.130 and 28A.410.010; (c) apply to
or interfere in any way with the practice of religion or to any kind of
treatment by prayer; and (d) apply to any remedial or technical
amendments to any statutes which licensed or regulated activity before
July 24, 1983. The legislature believes that all individuals should be
permitted to enter into a health profession unless there is an
overwhelming need for the state to protect the interests of the public
by restricting entry into the profession. Where such a need is
identified, the regulation adopted by the state should be set at the
least restrictive level consistent with the public interest to be
protected.
(2) It is the intent of this chapter that no regulation shall,
after July 24, 1983, be imposed upon any health profession except for
the exclusive purpose of protecting the public interest. All bills
introduced in the legislature to regulate a health profession for the
first time should be reviewed according to the following criteria. A
health profession should be regulated by the state only when:
(a) Unregulated practice can clearly harm or endanger the health,
safety, or welfare of the public, and the potential for the harm is
easily recognizable and not remote or dependent upon tenuous argument;
(b) The public needs and can reasonably be expected to benefit from
an assurance of initial and continuing professional ability; and
(c) The public cannot be effectively protected by other means in a
more cost-beneficial manner.
(3) After evaluating the criteria in subsection (2) of this section
and considering governmental and societal costs and benefits, if the
legislature finds that it is necessary to regulate a health profession
not previously regulated by law, the least restrictive alternative
method of regulation should be implemented, consistent with the public
interest and this section:
(a) Where existing common law and statutory civil actions and
criminal prohibitions are not sufficient to eradicate existing harm,
the regulation should provide for stricter civil actions and criminal
prosecutions;
(b) Where a service is being performed for individuals involving a
hazard to the public health, safety, or welfare, the regulation should
impose inspection requirements and enable an appropriate state agency
to enforce violations by injunctive relief in court, including, but not
limited to, regulation of the business activity providing the service
rather than the employees of the business;
(c) Where the threat to the public health, safety, or economic
well-being is relatively small as a result of the operation of the
health profession, the regulation should implement a system of
registration;
(d) Where the consumer may have a substantial basis for relying on
the services of a practitioner, the regulation should implement a
system of certification; or
(e) Where apparent that adequate regulation cannot be achieved by
means other than licensing, the regulation should implement a system of
licensing.
(4) With respect to increasing the scope of practice of licensed or
regulated health professions, it is the intent of this chapter to
ensure that practitioners are able to provide health care services to
the extent that they are qualified and that adequate public access to
health services is maintained. The scope of practice for a health
profession should be increased only when:
(a) The training and education received by the profession is
adequate to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public; and
(b) It is determined that the service to be added to the
profession's scope of practice provides a health benefit to the
recipient of the service.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.120.020 and 2001 c 251 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant group" includes any health professional group or
organization, any individual, or any other interested party which
proposes that any health professional group not presently regulated be
regulated or which proposes to substantially increase the scope of
practice of the profession.
(2) "Certificate" and "certification" mean a voluntary process by
which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an individual
who (a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications specified by that
regulatory entity, and (b) may assume or use "certified" in the title
or designation to perform prescribed health professional tasks.
(3) "Grandfather clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute
applicable to practitioners actively engaged in the regulated health
profession prior to the effective date of the regulatory statute which
exempts the practitioners from meeting the prerequisite qualifications
set forth in the regulatory statute to perform prescribed occupational
tasks.
(4) "Health professions" means and includes the following health
and health-related licensed or regulated professions and occupations:
Podiatric medicine and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW; chiropractic
under chapter 18.25 RCW; dental hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW;
dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW; denturism under chapter 18.30 RCW;
dispensing opticians under chapter 18.34 RCW; hearing instruments under
chapter 18.35 RCW; naturopaths under chapter 18.36A RCW; embalming and
funeral directing under chapter 18.39 RCW; midwifery under chapter
18.50 RCW; nursing home administration under chapter 18.52 RCW;
optometry under chapters 18.53 and 18.54 RCW; ocularists under chapter
18.55 RCW; osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW; pharmacy under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW; medicine
under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW; emergency medicine under chapter
18.73 RCW; physical therapy under chapter 18.74 RCW; practical nurses
under chapter 18.79 RCW; psychologists under chapter 18.83 RCW;
registered nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; occupational therapists
licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW; respiratory care practitioners
licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW; veterinarians and veterinary
technicians under chapter 18.92 RCW; health care assistants under
chapter 18.135 RCW; massage practitioners under chapter 18.108 RCW;
acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW; persons registered
under chapter 18.19 RCW; persons licensed as mental health counselors,
marriage and family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225
RCW; dietitians and nutritionists certified by chapter 18.138 RCW;
radiologic technicians under chapter 18.84 RCW; and nursing assistants
registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW.
(5) "Inspection" means the periodic examination of practitioners by
a state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioners'
occupation is being carried out in a fashion consistent with the public
health, safety, and welfare.
(6) "Legislative committees of reference" means the standing
legislative committees designated by the respective rules committees of
the senate and house of representatives to consider proposed
legislation to regulate health professions not previously regulated.
(7) "License," "licensing," and "licensure" mean permission to
engage in a health profession which would otherwise be unlawful in the
state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to those
individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform prescribed
health professional tasks and for the use of a particular title.
(8) "Professional license" means an individual, nontransferable
authorization to carry on a health activity based on qualifications
which include: (a) Graduation from an accredited or approved program,
and (b) acceptable performance on a qualifying examination or series of
examinations.
(9) "Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved
knowledge and skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a
specified health profession.
(10) "Public member" means an individual who is not, and never was,
a member of the health profession being regulated or the spouse of a
member, or an individual who does not have and never has had a material
financial interest in either the rendering of the health professional
service being regulated or an activity directly related to the
profession being regulated.
(11) "Registration" means the formal notification which, prior to
rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state agency
setting forth the name and address of the practitioner; the location,
nature and operation of the health activity to be practiced; and, if
required by the regulatory entity, a description of the service to be
provided.
(12) "Regulatory entity" means any board, commission, agency,
division, or other unit or subunit of state government which regulates
one or more professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or other
endeavors in this state.
(13) "Scope of practice" means the range of activities that may be
performed by individuals who are credentialed to practice a particular
profession.
(14) "State agency" includes every state office, department, board,
commission, regulatory entity, and agency of the state, and, where
provided by law, programs and activities involving less than the full
responsibility of a state agency.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.120.030 and 1991 c 332 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
After July 24, 1983, if appropriate, applicant groups shall explain
each of the following factors to the extent applicable and as requested
by the legislative committees of reference:
(1) A definition of the problem and why regulation or the increase
in the scope of practice is necessary:
(a) The nature of the potential harm to the public if the health
profession is not regulated or the scope of practice is not increased,
and the extent to which there is a threat to public health and safety;
(b) The extent to which consumers need and will benefit from a
method of regulation identifying competent practitioners, indicating
typical employers, if any, of practitioners in the health profession;
((and))
(c) The extent of autonomy a practitioner has, as indicated by:
(i) The extent to which the health profession calls for independent
judgment and the extent of skill or experience required in making the
independent judgment; and
(ii) The extent to which practitioners are supervised; and
(d) The extent to which the existing scope of practice prevents
practitioners from using skills that they are trained and competent to
perform;
(2) The efforts made to address the problem:
(a) Voluntary efforts, if any, by members of the health profession
to:
(i) Establish a code of ethics; or
(ii) Help resolve disputes between health practitioners and
consumers; and
(b) Recourse to and the extent of use of applicable law and whether
it could be strengthened to control the problem;
(3) The alternatives considered:
(a) Regulation of business employers or practitioners rather than
employee practitioners;
(b) Regulation of the program or service rather than the individual
practitioners;
(c) Registration of all practitioners;
(d) Certification of all practitioners;
(e) Other alternatives;
(f) Why the use of the alternatives specified in this subsection
would not be adequate to protect the public interest; and
(g) Why licensing would serve to protect the public interest;
(4) The benefit to the public if regulation or the increase in the
scope of practice is granted:
(a) The extent to which the incidence of specific problems present
in the unregulated health profession can reasonably be expected to be
reduced by regulation;
(b) Whether the public can identify qualified practitioners;
(c) The extent to which the public can be confident that qualified
practitioners are competent:
(i) Whether the proposed regulatory entity would be a board
composed of members of the profession and public members, or a state
agency, or both, and, if appropriate, their respective responsibilities
in administering the system of registration, certification, or
licensure, including the composition of the board and the number of
public members, if any; the powers and duties of the board or state
agency regarding examinations and for cause revocation, suspension, and
nonrenewal of registrations, certificates, or licenses; the
promulgation of rules and canons of ethics; the conduct of inspections;
the receipt of complaints and disciplinary action taken against
practitioners; and how fees would be levied and collected to cover the
expenses of administering and operating the regulatory system;
(ii) If there is a grandfather clause, whether such practitioners
will be required to meet the prerequisite qualifications established by
the regulatory entity at a later date;
(iii) The nature of the standards proposed for registration,
certification, or licensure as compared with the standards of other
jurisdictions;
(iv) Whether the regulatory entity would be authorized to enter
into reciprocity agreements with other jurisdictions;
(v) The nature and duration of any training including, but not
limited to, whether the training includes a substantial amount of
supervised field experience; whether training programs exist in this
state; if there will be an experience requirement; whether the
experience must be acquired under a registered, certificated, or
licensed practitioner; whether there are alternative routes of entry or
methods of meeting the prerequisite qualifications; whether all
applicants will be required to pass an examination; and, if an
examination is required, by whom it will be developed and how the costs
of development will be met; and
(vi) What additional training programs are anticipated to be
necessary to assure training accessible statewide; the anticipated time
required to establish the additional training programs; the types of
institutions capable of providing the training; a description of how
training programs will meet the needs of the expected work force,
including reentry workers, minorities, placebound students, and others;
(d) Assurance of the public that practitioners have maintained
their competence:
(i) Whether the registration, certification, or licensure will
carry an expiration date; and
(ii) Whether renewal will be based only upon payment of a fee, or
whether renewal will involve reexamination, peer review, or other
enforcement;
(e) Whether the regulation or the increase in the scope of practice
will increase access to health care services for the public or meet
recognized public health goals including promoting access to health
care services in rural or underserved areas; and
(f) The extent to which there is a shortage of health care
providers whose services are related to the proposal for new regulation
or increase in the scope of practice of a currently regulated health
profession;
(5) The extent to which regulation or the increase in the scope of
practice might harm the public:
(a) The extent to which regulation will restrict entry into the
health profession:
(i) Whether the proposed standards are more restrictive than
necessary to ((insure)) ensure safe and effective performance; and
(ii) Whether the proposed legislation requires registered,
certificated, or licensed practitioners in other jurisdictions who
migrate to this state to qualify in the same manner as state applicants
for registration, certification, and licensure when the other
jurisdiction has substantially equivalent requirements for
registration, certification, or licensure as those in this state;
((and))
(b) Whether there are similar professions to that of the applicant
group which should be included in, or portions of the applicant group
which should be excluded from, the proposed legislation; and
(c) The harm that the activity that increases the scope of practice
poses to the public if not performed properly and the experience of
similarly trained professionals, in this state or others, to perform
the activity properly;
(6) The maintenance of standards:
(a) Whether effective quality assurance standards exist in the
health profession, such as legal requirements associated with specific
programs that define or enforce standards, or a code of ethics; ((and))
(b) How the proposed legislation will assure quality:
(i) The extent to which a code of ethics, if any, will be adopted;
and
(ii) The grounds for suspension or revocation of registration,
certification, or licensure; and
(c) The extent to which education and training programs include the
activity that increases the scope of practice in the regular
curriculum;
(7) A description of the group proposed for regulation or for the
increase in the scope of practice, including a list of associations,
organizations, and other groups representing the practitioners in this
state, an estimate of the number of practitioners in each group,
((and)) whether the groups represent different levels of practice,
other professions currently performing the activity that is the subject
of an increase in the scope of practice, and other states that
currently regulate the profession or allow the profession to perform
the increase in the scope of practice; and
(8) The expected costs or cost savings of regulation or increased
scope of practice:
(a) The impact that the increase in the scope of practice, or the
registration, certification, or licensure of the profession will have
on the costs of the services to the public, including, to the extent
that information is available, any additional costs or expected savings
that the state may realize in operating programs that provide publicly
funded health care services;
(b) The cost to the state and to the general public of implementing
the proposed legislation; and
(c) The cost to the state and the members of the group proposed for
regulation for the required education, including projected tuition and
expenses and expected increases in training programs, staffing, and
enrollments at state training institutions.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.120.040 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 305 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Applicant groups shall submit a written ((report)) proposal
explaining the factors enumerated in RCW 18.120.030 to the legislative
committees of reference, copies of which shall be sent to the state
board of health and the department of health for review and comment.
((The state board of health and the department of health shall make
recommendations based on the report submitted by applicant groups to
the extent requested by the legislative committees.))
(2) For each application received, the department of health shall
convene a review committee composed of the state health officer or
designee and no more than four other members from across the state with
experience in any of the following areas: Health care delivery models,
health care education, health care policy, health care economics, or
other relevant experience. The review committee shall:
(a) Determine the questions to be asked regarding the merits of the
proposal;
(b) Review the proposal according to the applicable criteria and
factors listed in this chapter; and
(c) Comment and make recommendations to the department of health
regarding the content of proposal.
(3) The department shall assess the proposal according to the
questions established by the review committee and prepare an initial
report of the merits of the proposal considering the review committee's
comments and recommendations.
(4) The department shall distribute the proposal and the initial
report to interested parties and hold a public hearing to solicit
comments on the proposal and initial report. Interested parties may
also submit written comments to the department.
(5) The department shall consider comments received regarding the
proposal and initial report and make any changes supported by
information received before issuing a final report.

--- END ---