BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.34.020 and 2003 c 230 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity
with a duty of care for a vulnerable adult that leaves the vulnerable
person without the means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing,
shelter, or health care.
(2) "Abuse" means the willful action or inaction that inflicts
injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment on a
vulnerable adult. In instances of abuse of a vulnerable adult who is
unable to express or demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental
anguish, the abuse is presumed to cause physical harm, pain, or mental
anguish. Abuse includes sexual abuse, mental abuse, physical abuse,
and exploitation of a vulnerable adult, which have the following
meanings:
(a) "Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual contact,
including but not limited to unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape,
sodomy, sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing, and sexual
harassment. Sexual abuse includes any sexual contact between a staff
person, who is not also a resident or client, of a facility or a staff
person of a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a
vulnerable adult living in that facility or receiving service from a
program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, whether or not it is
consensual.
(b) "Physical abuse" means the willful action of inflicting bodily
injury or physical mistreatment. Physical abuse includes, but is not
limited to, striking with or without an object, slapping, pinching,
choking, kicking, shoving, prodding, or the use of chemical restraints
or physical restraints unless the restraints are consistent with
licensing requirements, and includes restraints that are otherwise
being used inappropriately.
(c) "Mental abuse" means any willful action or inaction of mental
or verbal abuse. Mental abuse includes, but is not limited to,
coercion, harassment, inappropriately isolating a vulnerable adult from
family, friends, or regular activity, and verbal assault that includes
ridiculing, intimidating, yelling, or swearing.
(d) "Exploitation" means an act of forcing, compelling, or exerting
undue influence over a vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to
act in a way that is inconsistent with relevant past behavior, or
causing the vulnerable adult to perform services for the benefit of
another.
(3) "Consent" means express written consent granted after the
vulnerable adult or his or her legal representative has been fully
informed of the nature of the services to be offered and that the
receipt of services is voluntary.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Facility" means a residence licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, boarding homes; chapter 18.51 RCW,
nursing homes; chapter 70.128 RCW, adult family homes; chapter 72.36
RCW, soldiers' homes; or chapter 71A.20 RCW, residential habilitation
centers; or any other facility licensed by the department.
(6) "Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use of
the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult
by any person for any person's profit or advantage.
(7) "Incident" means an allegation of abuse, neglect, abandonment,
or financial exploitation.
(8) "Individual provider" means a person under contract with the
department to provide services in the home under chapter 74.09 or
74.39A RCW.
(((8))) (9) "Mandated reporter" is an employee of the department;
law enforcement officer; social worker; professional school personnel;
individual provider; an employee of a facility, excluding employees in
licensed boarding homes and licensed nursing homes; an operator of a
facility; an employee of a social service, welfare, mental health,
adult day health, adult day care, home health, home care, or hospice
agency; county coroner or medical examiner; Christian Science
practitioner; or health care provider subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.
A "mandated reporter" is an employee of a licensed boarding home or of
a licensed nursing home who:
(a)(i) Observes the incident or hears the resident state that an
incident occurred; or
(ii) Learns of an incident from a permissive reporter who has
direct knowledge of the incident; and
(b) Is designated as the individual who is to receive incident
information.
(((9))) (10) "Neglect" means (a) a pattern of conduct or inaction
by a person or entity with a duty of care that fails to provide the
goods and services that maintain physical or mental health of a
vulnerable adult, or that fails to avoid or prevent physical or mental
harm or pain to a vulnerable adult; or (b) an act or omission that
demonstrates a serious disregard of consequences of such a magnitude as
to constitute a clear and present danger to the vulnerable adult's
health, welfare, or safety.
(((10))) (11) "Permissive reporter" means any person, employee of
a financial institution, attorney, or volunteer in a facility or
program providing services for vulnerable adults.
(((11))) (12) "Protective services" means any services provided by
the department to a vulnerable adult with the consent of the vulnerable
adult, or the legal representative of the vulnerable adult, who has
been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, neglected, or in a state
of self-neglect. These services may include, but are not limited to
case management, social casework, home care, placement, arranging for
medical evaluations, psychological evaluations, day care, or referral
for legal assistance.
(((12))) (13) "Self-neglect" means the failure of a vulnerable
adult, not living in a facility, to provide for himself or herself the
goods and services necessary for the vulnerable adult's physical or
mental health, and the absence of which impairs or threatens the
vulnerable adult's well-being. This definition may include a
vulnerable adult who is receiving services through home health,
hospice, or a home care agency, or an individual provider when the
neglect is not a result of inaction by that agency or individual
provider.
(((13))) (14) "Vulnerable adult" includes a person:
(a) Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or
physical inability to care for himself or herself; or
(b) Found incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW; or
(c) Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW
71A.10.020; or
(d) Admitted to any facility; or
(e) Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care
agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW;
or
(f) Receiving services from an individual provider.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.42.010 and 1997 c 392 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Basic necessities of life" means food, water, shelter,
clothing, and medically necessary health care, including but not
limited to health-related treatment or activities, hygiene, oxygen, and
medication.
(2)(a) "Bodily injury" means physical pain or injury, illness, or
an impairment of physical condition;
(b) "Substantial bodily harm" means bodily injury which involves a
temporary but substantial disfigurement, or which causes a temporary
but substantial loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part
or organ, or which causes a fracture of any bodily part;
(c) "Great bodily harm" means bodily injury which creates a high
probability of death, or which causes serious permanent disfigurement,
or which causes a permanent or protracted loss or impairment of the
function of any bodily part or organ.
(3) "Child" means a person under eighteen years of age.
(4) "Dependent person" means a person who, because of physical or
mental disability, or because of extreme advanced age, is dependent
upon another person to provide the basic necessities of life. A
resident of a nursing home, as defined in RCW 18.51.010, a resident of
an adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, and a frail elder
or vulnerable adult, as defined in RCW 74.34.020(((8))) (14), is
presumed to be a dependent person for purposes of this chapter.
(5) "Employed" means hired by a dependent person, another person
acting on behalf of a dependent person, or by an organization or
governmental entity, to provide to a dependent person any of the basic
necessities of life. A person may be "employed" regardless of whether
the person is paid for the services or, if paid, regardless of who pays
for the person's services.
(6) "Parent" has its ordinary meaning and also includes a guardian
and the authorized agent of a parent or guardian.
(7) "Abandons" means leaving a child or other dependent person
without the means or ability to obtain one or more of the basic
necessities of life.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---