BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.17.040 and 2002 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:
(1) Cemeteries and other burial plots while used for that purpose;
(2) Divisions of land into lots or tracts each of which is one-one
hundred twenty-eighth of a section of land or larger, or five acres or
larger if the land is not capable of description as a fraction of a
section of land, unless the governing authority of the city, town, or
county in which the land is situated shall have adopted a subdivision
ordinance requiring plat approval of such divisions: PROVIDED, That
for purposes of computing the size of any lot under this item which
borders on a street or road, the lot size shall be expanded to include
that area which would be bounded by the center line of the road or
street and the side lot lines of the lot running perpendicular to such
center line;
(3) Divisions made by testamentary provisions, or the laws of
descent;
(4) Divisions of land into lots or tracts classified for industrial
or commercial use when the city, town, or county has approved a binding
site plan for the use of the land in accordance with local regulations;
(5) A division for the purpose of lease when no residential
structure other than mobile homes or travel trailers are permitted to
be placed upon the land when the city, town, or county has approved a
binding site plan for the use of the land in accordance with local
regulations;
(6) A division made for the purpose of alteration by adjusting
boundary lines, between platted or unplatted lots or both, which does
not create any additional lot, tract, parcel, site, or division nor
create any lot, tract, parcel, site, or division which contains
insufficient area and dimension to meet minimum requirements for width
and area for a building site;
(7) Divisions of land into lots or tracts if: (a) Such division is
the result of subjecting a portion of a parcel or tract of land to
either chapter 64.32 or 64.34 RCW subsequent to the recording of a
binding site plan for all such land; (b) the improvements constructed
or to be constructed thereon are required by the provisions of the
binding site plan to be included in one or more condominiums or owned
by an association or other legal entity in which the owners of units
therein or their owners' associations have a membership or other legal
or beneficial interest; (c) a city, town, or county has approved the
binding site plan for all such land; (d) such approved binding site
plan is recorded in the county or counties in which such land is
located; and (e) the binding site plan contains thereon the following
statement: "All development and use of the land described herein shall
be in accordance with this binding site plan, as it may be amended with
the approval of the city, town, or county having jurisdiction over the
development of such land, and in accordance with such other
governmental permits, approvals, regulations, requirements, and
restrictions that may be imposed upon such land and the development and
use thereof. Upon completion, the improvements on the land shall be
included in one or more condominiums or owned by an association or
other legal entity in which the owners of units therein or their
owners' associations have a membership or other legal or beneficial
interest. This binding site plan shall be binding upon all now or
hereafter having any interest in the land described herein." The
binding site plan may, but need not, depict or describe the boundaries
of the lots or tracts resulting from subjecting a portion of the land
to either chapter 64.32 or 64.34 RCW. A site plan shall be deemed to
have been approved if the site plan was approved by a city, town, or
county: (i) In connection with the final approval of a subdivision
plat or planned unit development with respect to all of such land; or
(ii) in connection with the issuance of building permits or final
certificates of occupancy with respect to all of such land; or (iii) if
not approved pursuant to (i) and (ii) of this subsection (7)(e), then
pursuant to such other procedures as such city, town, or county may
have established for the approval of a binding site plan; ((and))
(8) A division for the purpose of leasing land for facilities
providing personal wireless services while used for that purpose.
"Personal wireless services" means any federally licensed personal
wireless service. "Facilities" means unstaffed facilities that are
used for the transmission or reception, or both, of wireless
communication services including, but not necessarily limited to,
antenna arrays, transmission cables, equipment shelters, and support
structures; and
(9) A division of land into lots or tracts of less than five acres
that is (a) recorded in accordance with chapter 58.09 RCW and (b) used
or to be used for the purpose of establishing a site for construction
and operation of consumer-owned or investor-owned electric utility
facilities. For purposes of this subsection, "electric utility
facilities" means unstaffed facilities, including, but not limited to,
electric power substations, that are used for or in connection with or
to facilitate the transmission, distribution, sale, or furnishing of
electricity. This subsection does not exempt a division of land from
the zoning and permitting laws and regulations of cities, towns,
counties, and municipal corporations.

--- END ---