BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.422 and 2001 c 258 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a motor
vehicle dealer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW, or a dealer licensed
by any other state, for the wholesale sale of used motor vehicles at
auctions to licensed dealers.
(2) This chapter does not apply to amounts derived by a new car
dealer from wholesale sales of new motor vehicles ((of the same make))
to other new car dealers ((where the sales enable the dealers to adjust
their inventory levels as long as the amount paid by the purchasing
dealer does not exceed the amount paid by the selling dealer in the
acquisition of the vehicle, however, the selling dealer may add
reasonable expenses for the preparation of the vehicle for sale or
transfer)) making sales of new motor vehicles of the same make. This
exemption does not apply to amounts derived by a manufacturer,
distributor, or factory branch as defined in chapter 46.70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---