BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.30.385 and 2003 c 334 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The park land trust revolving fund is to be utilized by the
department for the ((exclusive)) purpose of acquiring real property,
including all reasonable costs associated with these acquisitions, as
a replacement for the property transferred to the state parks and
recreation commission, as directed by the legislature in order to
maintain the land base of the affected trusts or under RCW 79.22.060
and to receive voluntary contributions for the purpose of operating and
maintaining public use and recreation facilities, including trails,
managed by the department. Proceeds from transfers of real property to
the state parks and recreation commission or other proceeds identified
from transfers of real property as directed by the legislature shall be
deposited in this fund. Disbursement from the park land trust
revolving fund to acquire replacement property and for operating and
maintaining public use and recreation facilities shall be on the
authorization of the department. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control, the park land trust revolving fund is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the
fund.
(2) The department is authorized to solicit and receive voluntary
contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining public use
and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the department.
The department may seek voluntary contributions from individuals and
organizations for this purpose. Voluntary contributions will be
deposited into the park land trust revolving fund and used solely for
the purpose of public use and recreation facilities operations and
maintenance. Voluntary contributions are not considered a fee for use
of these facilities.

--- END ---