BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that state law
requires criminal background checks of applicants for school district
employment. However, the legislature finds that, because they
generally are limited to criminal conviction histories, results of
background checks are more complete when supplemented by an applicant's
history of past sexual misconduct. Therefore, the legislature finds
that additional safeguards are necessary in the hiring of school
district employees to ensure the safety of Washington's school
children. In order to provide the safest educational environment for
children, school districts must provide known information regarding
employees' sexual misconduct when those employees attempt to transfer
to different school districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Applicant" means a person applying for employment in a
certificated or classified position who is currently or was previously
employed by a school district.
(b) "Employer" means a school district employer.
(2) Before hiring a classified applicant, (a) a school district
shall request the applicant to sign a statement:
(i) Authorizing the applicant's current employer, or, if the
applicant is not currently employed by a school district, the
applicant's immediately previous employer, to disclose to the hiring
school district sexual misconduct, if any, by the applicant and making
available to the hiring school district copies of all documents in the
applicant's personnel record maintained by that employer relating to
that sexual misconduct; and
(ii) Releasing the applicant's current employer or, if the
applicant is not currently employed by a school district, the
applicant's immediately previous employer, and employees acting on
behalf of that employer, from any liability for providing information
described in (a)(i) of this subsection, as provided in subsection (3)
of this section; and
(b) A school district shall request in writing, electronic or
otherwise, at least the applicant's current employer or, if the
applicant is not currently employed by a school district, the
applicant's immediately previous employer, to provide the information
described in (a)(i) of this subsection, if any. The request shall
include a copy of the statement signed by the applicant under this
subsection.
(3) Not later than twenty business days after receiving a request
under subsection (2)(b) of this section, a school district shall
provide the information requested and make available to the requesting
school district copies of all documents in the applicant's personnel
record relating to sexual misconduct. The school district, or an
employee acting on behalf of the school district, who in good faith
discloses information under this section is immune from civil liability
for the disclosure.
(4) A hiring district shall electronically request from the office
of the superintendent of public instruction verification of
certification status for applicants for certificated employment. When
the results of the electronic request regarding an applicant indicate
a complaint or investigation, including an open investigation or a
closed investigation that resulted in action being taken, the hiring
district shall request from the office of the superintendent of public
instruction information relating to the complaint and investigation of
sexual misconduct as described in subsection (10) of this section, if
any.
(5) A school district shall not hire an applicant who does not sign
the statement described in subsection (2) of this section.
(6) School districts may employ applicants on a conditional basis
pending the district's review of information obtained under this
section.
(7) Information received under this section shall be used by a
school district only for the purpose of evaluating an applicant's
qualifications for employment in the position for which he or she has
applied. Except as otherwise provided by law, a board member or
employee of a school district shall not disclose the information to any
person, other than the applicant, who is not directly involved in the
process of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for employment.
A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(8) Beginning September 1, 2004, the board or an official of a
school district shall not enter into a collective bargaining agreement,
individual employment contract, resignation agreement, severance
agreement, or any other contract or agreement that has the effect of
suppressing information about sexual misconduct of a present or former
employee or of expunging information about that sexual misconduct from
personnel records. Any provision of a contract or agreement that is
contrary to this subsection is void and unenforceable and may not be
withheld from disclosure by the entry of any administrative or court
order. This subsection does not restrict the expungement from a
personnel file information about alleged sexual misconduct that has not
been substantiated.
(9) This section does not prevent a school district from requesting
or requiring an applicant to provide information other than that
described in this section.
(10) By September 1, 2004, the state board of education shall adopt
rules defining "sexual misconduct" as used in this section for
application to all classified and certificated employees. The
definition of sexual misconduct adopted by the state board of education
must include the requirement that the school district has made a
determination that there is sufficient information to conclude that the
sexual misconduct occurred and that the sexual misconduct resulted in
the employee's leaving his or her position at the school district.

--- END ---