BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.010 and 1997 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The total outside width of any vehicle or load ((thereon)) shall
not exceed eight and one-half feet subject to the following:
((PROVIDED, That))
(1) No rear vision mirror may extend more than five inches beyond
the extreme limits of the body((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That));
(2) Excluded from this calculation of width are safety appliances
such as clearance lights, rub rails, flexible fender extensions, mud
flaps, and splash and spray suppressant devices, and appurtenances such
as door handles, door hinges, and turning signal brackets and such
other safety appliances and appurtenances as the department may
determine are necessary for the safe and efficient operation of motor
vehicles((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That));
(3) No appliances or appurtenances may extend more than three
inches beyond the extreme limits of the body;
(4) Campers, motor homes, and travel trailers may exceed the
maximum width established by this section if the excess width is
attributable to an appurtenance that extends no more than six inches
beyond the body of the vehicle and is affixed to the side of the
vehicle at such a height that it does not impair the ability of the
driver to see to the rear of the vehicle. For purposes of this
subsection, the term "appurtenance" is limited to awnings and support
hardware.

--- END ---