BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 101 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,109,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,233,000))
$28,308,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,387,000))
$56,462,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $25,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation is provided for allocation to Project Citizen, a program
of the national conference of state legislatures to promote student
civic involvement.

Sec. 102 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,001,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,173,000))
$23,248,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,219,000))
$45,294,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $25,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation is provided for allocation to Project Citizen, a program
of the national conference of state legislatures to promote student
civic involvement.

Sec. 103 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,627,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,717,000))
$2,340,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,344,000))
$4,017,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 1869 (tax preferences). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $21,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 3094
(high school skills center). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $152,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Third Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1053 (government accountability). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for a study of state and national trends
for prevalence of developmental disabilities including autism, mental
retardation, cerebral palsy, and other major developmental
disabilities. The study shall include but not be limited to a review
of:
(a) Epidemiological studies on the causes of developmental
disabilities;
(b) On-going population-based surveillance being conducted in other
states;
(c) Genetic and environmental factors that may be contributing to
an increase in developmental disabilities; and
(d) Data sources specific to Washington state.
A report shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2004.
(5) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for a performance review of the policies
and practices of the state wildfire suppression program. The
performance review shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) A review of how current fire suppression practices comply with
the policies and intent of chapter 76.04 RCW.
(b) An examination of what factors are contributing to the recent
increase in the cost of fire suppression. This examination shall
include a review of changes in the use of high cost equipment and
services; changes in the level of reimbursement for contractors and
employees; changes in the use of permanent agency employees for fire
suppression compared to the use of temporary employees, inmate labor,
and contractors; and changes in other significant costs. This
examination shall include an analysis of how the respective
responsibilities of various state agencies, local fire districts, and
federal agencies are used to determine how costs are allocated to the
different responsible agencies.
(c) An examination of how the department of natural resources
determines the proportion of fire suppression costs charged to private
parties and the land owners' contingency account.
A final report of this performance audit shall be provided to the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by June 30,
2005.
(6) $50,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 for state administration under Title II is provided solely
for a study of state and school district expenditures for Title II.

Sec. 104 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,656,000))
$1,631,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,799,000))
$1,774,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,455,000))
$3,405,000

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $25,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, in
consultation with the economic and revenue forecast council, to
establish and maintain a set of economic indicators that could be used
for adjusting the statewide salary schedule by a regional cost-of-living index. The economic indicators to be included in this index
include but are not limited to the median cost of housing.
(1) In developing the regional cost-of-living index, the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee shall
collect data on the economic activity comprising the cost-of-living
indexes for geographic areas of the state coterminous with the
boundaries of the nine educational service districts established under
RCW 28A.310.010.
(2) Not later than July 1, 2004, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee shall submit the regional cost-of-living index to an advisory committee for its review. The advisory
committee shall be appointed by the governor and shall consist of one
member representing the office of financial management, one member
representing the employment security department, one member
representing the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
and three representatives of the private sector having demonstrated
expertise in regional economics. The advisory committee shall not
receive compensation for performance of its duties but may be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(3) Not later than October 1, 2004, the advisory committee created
under this section shall submit to the director of the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee written comment on the
proposed regional cost-of-living index. The written comment may
include recommendations for revision to the index or its components.))

Sec. 105 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,754,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,753,000))
$8,153,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,507,000))
$14,907,000

Sec. 106 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,462,000))
$5,481,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,665,000))
$5,714,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,127,000))
$11,195,000

Sec. 107 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,045,000))
$2,049,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,095,000))
$4,099,000

Sec. 108 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,510,000))
$12,520,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,747,000))
$12,886,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,257,000))
$25,406,000

Sec. 109 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,295,000))
$17,374,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,340,000))
$18,036,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,389,000))
$43,623,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,903,000))
$31,803,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,927,000))
$110,836,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The judicial information systems account appropriation shall be
used for the operations and maintenance of technology systems that
improve services provided by the supreme court, the court of appeals,
the office of public defense, and the administrator for the courts.
(2) $750,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $750,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for court-appointed special
advocates in dependency matters. The administrator for the courts,
after consulting with the association of juvenile court administrators
and the association of court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad
litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer court-appointed
special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution of
funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally
accessible to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian
ad litem programs. The administrator for the courts shall not retain
more than six percent of total funding to cover administrative or any
other agency costs.
(3) (($12,572,000)) $16,472,000 of the judicial information systems
account -- state appropriation is provided solely for improvements and
enhancements to the judicial information system. ((This funding shall
only be expended after the office of the administrator for the courts
certifies to the office of financial management that there will be at
least a $1,000,000 ending fund balance in the judicial information
systems account at the end of the 2003-05 biennium.))
(4) $3,000,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for school district petitions to
juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and
28A.225.035. The office of the administrator for the courts shall
develop an interagency agreement with the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this
subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be
based on the number of petitions filed.
(5) $13,224,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to county juvenile
court administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children
in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The office of the
administrator for the courts shall not retain any portion of these
funds to cover administrative costs. The office of the administrator
for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula
shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition
processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average
per-petition processing costs.
(6) The distributions made under subsection (6) of this section and
distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made
pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate
reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of
service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.
(7) Each fiscal year during the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
((department)) administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after
the end of the fiscal year. The department shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a fiscal year
ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for
the purpose of distributing funds.
(8) $813,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $762,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for billing and related costs for
the office of the administrator for the courts pursuant to Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5990 (supervision of offenders).
(9) $1,800,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to the county clerks
for the collection of legal financial obligations pursuant to Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5990 (supervision of offenders). The
funding shall be distributed by the office of the administrator for the
courts to the county clerks in accordance with the funding formula
determined by the Washington association of county officials pursuant
to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5990 (supervision of
offenders).

Sec. 110 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $884,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,395,000))
$12,783,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,945,000))
$14,333,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $51,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for the office of public defense's
costs in implementing chapter 303, Laws of 1999 (court funding).
(2) Amounts provided from the public safety and education account
appropriation in this section include funding for investigative
services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.

Sec. 111 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,773,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,776,000))
$4,111,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,140,000
Water Quality Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,854,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,543,000))
$12,878,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,854,000 of the water quality account appropriation and
$1,140,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided
solely for the Puget Sound water quality action team to implement the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action items PSAT-01 through PSAT-05.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the development of kindergarten
readiness guidelines, in collaboration with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 112 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,336,000))
$18,298,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,092,000))
$17,672,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,967,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,150,000))
$8,414,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $699,000
Election Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,140,000
Election Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,121,000))
$33,121,000
Local Government Archives Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,067,000))
$9,010,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,432,000))
$97,321,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,296,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) $1,826,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,686,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the verification of initiative
and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and
candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $118,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29.27.072.
(4)(a) $1,944,004 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004 and $1,986,772 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2003-05 biennium. The funding level
for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in
this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The
office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once
all criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection have been satisfactorily
documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a four-year contract with the nonprofit organization to
provide public affairs coverage through June 30, 2006.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(5) (($6,038,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004 is provided solely to reimburse the counties for the
state's share of the cost of conducting the presidential primary.))
$252,000 of the archives and records management account--state
appropriation and $1,504,000 of the local government archives account--state appropriation are provided solely for additional facility capital
costs, digital archives technology architecture costs, and additional
digital archives staff and operational costs associated with the new
eastern regional archives and digital archives facility.
(6) The entire election account--state appropriation in this
section is provided solely as state match funding for federal moneys
provided under the Help America Vote act (P.L. 107-252). Of the state
match funding provided, the secretary of state may expend only the
amount required to match the federal funding received, and any amount
that is not necessary to match the federal funding shall lapse. After
receipt of the federal moneys, the office of the secretary of state
shall notify the appropriations committee of the house of
representatives and the ways and means committee of the senate of the
amount of federal funding received and the associated required state
match.
(7) $580,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to conduct voter outreach and education
and to train local elections officials pursuant to new state primary
election laws. If no new state primary election laws are enacted by
June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 113 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,149,000))
$13,463,000

Sec. 114 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 123 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($83,000))
$112,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($157,000))
$192,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($240,000))
$304,000

Sec. 115 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,057,000))
$4,373,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,109,000))
$4,221,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,845,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,814,000))
$2,001,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,180,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($165,275,000))
$166,761,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($179,550,000))
$181,651,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.
(3) $137,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
2396 (instream flows). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $70,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3026 (correctional industries). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(5) $88,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 2839
(health care provider/actions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 116 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($638,000))
$669,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($639,000))
$671,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,277,000))
$1,340,000

Sec. 117 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,459,000))
$61,983,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,801,000))
$67,286,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($213,287,000))
$236,264,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,574,000))
$15,075,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,095,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,913,000))
$2,113,000
Building Code Council Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,061,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,776,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,293,000))
$8,293,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,013,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $256,000
Community Economic Development Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,909,000))
$1,581,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,740,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $622,000
Lead Paint Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Developmental Disabilities Endowment Trust Fund--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000
Homeless Families Services Fund--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($392,805,000))
$432,434,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center. For work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities, the
center shall not pay any increased indirect rate nor increases in other
indirect charges above the absolute amount paid during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium.
(2) $61,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $62,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item OCD-01.
(3) $10,180,797 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for the drug control and system improvement formula
grant program, to be distributed in state fiscal year 2004 as follows:
(a) $3,551,972 to local units of government to continue
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;
(b) $611,177 to the department to continue the drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;
(c) $1,343,603 to the Washington state patrol for coordination,
investigative, and supervisory support to the multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces and for methamphetamine education and response;
(d) $197,154 to the department for grants to support tribal law
enforcement needs;
(e) $976,897 to the department of social and health services,
division of alcohol and substance abuse, for drug courts in eastern and
western Washington;
(f) $298,246 to the department for training and technical
assistance of public defenders representing clients with special needs;
(g) $687,155 to the department to continue domestic violence legal
advocacy;
(h) $890,150 to the department of social and health services,
juvenile rehabilitation administration, to continue youth violence
prevention and intervention projects;
(i) $60,000 to the department for community-based advocacy services
to victims of violent crime, other than sexual assault and domestic
violence;
(j) $89,705 to the department to continue the governor's council on
substance abuse;
(k) $97,591 to the department to continue evaluation of Byrne
formula grant programs;
(l) $572,919 to the office of financial management for criminal
history records improvement; and
(m) $804,228 to the department for required grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on Byrne formula grant programs.
These amounts represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure
authority for each program. No program may expend Byrne grant funds in
excess of the amounts provided in this subsection. If moneys in excess
of those appropriated in this subsection become available, whether from
prior or current fiscal year Byrne grant distributions, the department
shall hold these moneys in reserve and may not expend them without
specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried forward and
applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for programs
and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget
request for the succeeding year, the department shall estimate and
request authority to spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result
of this subsection.
(4) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for implementing the industries of
the future strategy.
(5) $200,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $200,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
manufacturing services.
(6) $205,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $205,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for grants to Washington Columbia
River Gorge counties to implement their responsibilities under the
national scenic area management plan. Of this amount, $390,000 is
provided for Skamania county and $20,000 is provided for Clark county.
(7) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for a contract with international
trade alliance of Spokane.
(8) $5,085,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $5,085,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, $4,250,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation, and $6,145,000 of the Washington housing trust account
are provided solely for providing housing and shelter for homeless
people, including but not limited to grants to operate, repair, and
staff shelters; grants to operate transitional housing; partial
payments for rental assistance; consolidated emergency assistance;
overnight youth shelters; and emergency shelter assistance.
(9) (($697,000)) $369,000 of the community economic development
account appropriation ((is)) and $120,000 of the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund appropriation are provided solely for
support of the developmental disabilities endowment governing board and
costs of the endowment program. The governing board may use
appropriations to implement a sliding-scale fee waiver for families
earning below 150 percent of the state median family income.
(10) $800,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation and $6,000
of the lead paint account--state appropriation are provided solely to
implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5586 (lead-based paint).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the business retention and
expansion program to fund contracts with locally based development
organizations for local business and job retention activities.
(12) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the tourism office to market
Washington state as a travel destination to northwest states,
California, and British Columbia. By December 1, 2004, the department
shall report to the relevant legislative policy and fiscal committees
on the effectiveness of these expenditures.
(13) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for business development
activities to conduct statewide and/or regional business recruitment
and client lead generation services.
(14) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and (($60,000)) $180,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the
community services block grant program for pass-through to community
action agencies.
(15) $26,862,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004 and $26,862,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for providing
early childhood education assistance.
(16) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
provided for Washington state dues for the Pacific northwest economic
region.
(17) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the foreign offices (overseas
representatives) to expand local capacity for China, expand operations
in Shanghai, Beijing and Hong Kong, and in Mexico to assist Washington
exporters in expanding their sales opportunities.
(18) $600,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for sexual assault prevention and
treatment programs.
(19) $65,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $65,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for a contract with a food
distribution program for communities in the southwestern portion of the
state and for workers impacted by timber and salmon fishing closures
and reductions. The department may not charge administrative overhead
or expenses to the funds provided in this subsection.
(20) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall contract with a lender or contract collection agent to
act as a collection agent of the state. The lender or contract
collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and
deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected
shall be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest earned in the
account may be retained by the lender or contract collection agent, and
shall be considered a fee for processing payments on behalf of the
state. Repayments of loans granted under this chapter shall be made to
the lender or contract collection agent as long as the loan is
outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the chapter.
(21) Within amounts provided in this section, sufficient funding is
provided to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 1090 (trafficking of
persons).
(22) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to develop a state plan to address how the
state can improve coordination between state and local partners to
substantially reduce the incidence of homelessness.
(23) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $425,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the purpose of supporting the
base realignment and closure process. The department shall develop and
implement criteria and procedures, including the types of activities
that may be funded by the grants and requirements for local matching
funds, for the issuance of grants to one organization within each of
the following counties: Island, Kitsap, Pierce, Snohomish, and Spokane.
The department shall use a portion of the funding provided to support
the related activities of state agencies as identified by the office of
the governor.
(24) $421,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $193,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to coordinate the state's efforts
in siting the 7E7 final assembly plant.
(25) $10,208,818 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the drug control and system improvement formula
grant program, to be distributed in state fiscal year 2005 as follows:
(a) $3,533,522 to local units of government to continue
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;
(b) $608,002 to the department to continue the drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;
(c) $1,336,624 to the Washington state patrol for coordination,
investigative, and supervisory support to the multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces and for methamphetamine education and response;
(d) $196,130 to the department for grants to support tribal law
enforcement needs;
(e) $971,823 to the department of social and health services,
division of alcohol and substance abuse, for drug courts in eastern and
western Washington;
(f) $296,697 to the department for training and technical
assistance of public defenders representing clients with special needs;
(g) $683,586 to the department to continue domestic violence legal
advocacy;
(h) $885,526 to the department of social and health services,
juvenile rehabilitation administration, to continue youth violence
prevention and intervention projects;
(i) $59,688 to the department for community-based advocacy services
to victims of violent crime, other than sexual assault and domestic
violence;
(j) $89,239 to the department to continue the governor's council on
substance abuse;
(k) $97,084 to the department to continue evaluation of Byrne
formula grant programs;
(l) $650,846 to the office of financial management for criminal
history records improvement; and
(m) $800,051 to the department for required grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on Byrne formula grant programs.
These amounts represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure
authority for each program. No program may expend Byrne grant funds in
excess of the amounts provided in this subsection. If moneys in excess
of those appropriated in this subsection become available, whether from
prior or current fiscal year Byrne grant distributions, the department
shall hold those moneys in reserve and may not expend them without
specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried forward and
applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for programs
and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget
request for the succeeding year, the department shall estimate and
request authority to spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result
of this subsection.
(26) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for increased civil legal services for the
indigent.
(27) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
3084 (national guard). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(28) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the department to:
(a) Conduct a survey of small and medium-sized manufacturers
focused on the region of the state with the heaviest concentration of
these types of manufacturers to:
(i) Identify common technical assistance and employee training
needs; and
(ii) Identify acceptable means of delivering technical assistance
and training to small and medium-sized manufacturers; and
(b) Develop a plan for delivering technical assistance and employee
training services consistent with the findings of the survey.
The recipient of the contract funds may subcontract for the
performance of the required work. The contract dollars may serve as
matching funds for federal economic development grants.
(29) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for deposit in the small business
incubator account to implement the small business incubator provisions
of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2784 (small business incubator
program). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(30) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for a study under (a) through (i) of this
subsection. Expenditure of this amount is contingent upon a $60,000
match from a county with a population exceeding one million. The
department shall conduct a study to:
(a) Detail the progress in each of the buildable land counties to
date in achieving annexation or incorporation of its urban growth area
since adoption of the county's county-wide planning policies to the
present time by documenting:
(i) The number of acres annexed;
(ii) The number of acres incorporated;
(iii) The number of residents annexed, incorporated, and remaining
in urban unincorporated areas; and
(iv) The characteristic of urban land remaining unincorporated in
terms of assessed value, infrastructure deficits, service needs, land
use, commercial development, and residential development;
(b) Determine the characteristics of remaining urban unincorporated
areas and current statutes, and estimate when all urban unincorporated
areas in each county will be annexed or incorporated, based on the rate
of progress to date;
(c) Survey the counties to identify those obstacles which, in their
experience, slow or prohibit annexation;
(d) Survey the cities in each of the subject counties to identify
obstacles, which in their experience, slow or prohibit annexation;
(e) Survey residents of urban unincorporated areas in each of the
subject counties to identify their attitudes towards annexation or
incorporation;
(f) Propose possible changes to city and county taxing authority
which will serve to aid the transfer of annexation of remaining urban
growth areas in a timely manner;
(g) Identify and discuss the need for funding of capital
improvement projects needed to provide urban levels of service;
(h) Assess the role and statutory authority of the boundary review
board and how altering their role and authority might facilitate
annexation; and
(i) Propose possible changes to growth management or annexation
processes which will facilitate annexation.
The department shall report to the local government committees of
the legislature no later than December 1, 2004.
If a county does not wish to participate in this study, the county
administrative officer shall submit those intentions, in writing, to
the department no later than July 1, 2004.
(31) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the department to conduct a
study, with input from an advisory committee, on the feasibility and
benefits of establishing a one-stop satellite office colocating the
employment security department and the department of social and health
services on community college campuses. Essential elements of the
study include a strategic evaluation of services to be colocated, the
appropriate location on campuses, and how to better integrate
employment security department and department of social and health
services programs with basic skills, workforce, and academic programs
of community and technical colleges to provide more opportunities for
skill improvements and employability. The advisory committee shall
include representation of the state board for community and technical
colleges, the employment security department, and the department of
social and health services. The department shall provide its findings
and recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 20, 2004.
(32) $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for deposit in the homeless families
services fund to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2818
(homeless families services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(33) The entire homeless families services fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement the administrative
functions of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2818 (homeless families
services). It is the intent of the legislature that beginning with the
2005-07 biennium, the department choose a qualified contractor to
administer the homeless families services fund program. If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(34) $3,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $7,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to initiate a discussion of a
proposal for a regional energy transmission corridor siting process
compatible with rules established under the federal energy regulatory
commission. The energy facility site evaluation council shall initiate
contact with the states of Oregon, Idaho, and Montana. Discussions
shall be held in conjunction with meetings of the Pacific Northwest
economic region. In developing this proposal, the council shall also
consult with regional organizations involved in energy issues,
appropriate federal and state agencies, and interested parties involved
in the development of a regional transmission organization. The
council must report on the progress made toward developing a draft
proposal by December 1, 2004, to the appropriate committees of the
legislature.

Sec. 118 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,662,000))
$12,655,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,383,000))
$13,666,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,500,000))
$23,924,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $242,000
State Auditing Services Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,812,000))
$50,512,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $127,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $122,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5694 (integrated permit system). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2003, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(2) By November 15, 2003, the office of financial management shall
report to the house of representatives committees on appropriations,
capital budget, and transportation and to the senate committees on ways
and means and highways and transportation on the ten general priorities
of government upon which the 2005-07 biennial budgets will be
structured. Each priority must include a proposed set of cross agency
activities with definitions and outcome measures. For historical
comparisons, the 2001-03 expenditures and 2003-05 appropriations must
be restated in this format and organized by priority, activity, fund
source, and agency.
(3) $38,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2955 (K-12 finance task force). If this bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2004, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 3080 (state budgeting). If this bill is not enacted by June
30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $98,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Third Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1053 (government accountability). If this bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(6) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the development of a set of
sustainability indicators for the state.
(7)(a) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for a task force on noneconomic damages.
On or before October 31, 2005, the task force shall prepare a study and
develop, for consideration by the legislature, a proposed plan for
implementation of an advisory schedule of noneconomic damages in
actions for injuries resulting from health care under chapter 7.70 RCW.
Implementation of any proposed plan is contingent upon statutory
authorization by the legislature.
(b) The task force shall develop a proposed plan for use of an
advisory schedule of noneconomic damages, as defined in RCW 4.56.250,
that will increase the predictability and proportionality of
settlements and awards for noneconomic damages in actions for injuries
resulting from health care. The task force shall consider:
(i) The information that can most appropriately be used to provide
guidance to the trier of fact regarding noneconomic damage awards,
giving consideration to past noneconomic damage awards for similar
injuries, considering severity and duration of the injuries, and other
factors deemed appropriate by the task force; past noneconomic damage
awards for similar claims for damages; and such other information the
task force finds appropriate;
(ii) The most appropriate format in which to present the
information to the trier of fact; and
(iii) When and under what circumstances an advisory schedule should
be utilized in alternative dispute resolution settings and presented to
the trier of fact at trial.
(c) A proposed implementation plan shall include, at a minimum:
(i) The information developed under subsection (b) of this section;
(ii) Identification of statutory, regulatory, or court rule changes
necessary to implement the advisory schedule, as well as forms or other
documents necessary to implement the schedule; and
(iii) Identification of the time required to implement an advisory
schedule authorized by the legislature.
(d) The task force is composed of fourteen members, as follows:
(i) One member from each of the two largest caucuses in the senate, to
be appointed by the president of the senate, and one member from each
of the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives, to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; (ii) one
health care ethicist; (iii) one economist; (iv) one actuary; (v) two
attorneys with expertise or significant experience in medical
malpractice actions, one representing the plaintiff's bar and one
representing the insurance defense bar; (vi) two superior court judges;
(vii) one representative of a hospital; (viii) one physician; (ix) one
representative of a medical malpractice insurer; and (x) two consumers.
The governor shall appoint the nonlegislative members of the task force
and select a chair.
(e) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members of the
task force shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(f) The office of financial management shall provide support to the
task force with the assistance of staff from the administrative office
of the courts, the house of representatives office of program research,
and senate committee services.
(8) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the office to study land use and local
government finance and make recommendations on the impact that current
trends in city and county revenue sources and expenditures may have on
land use decisions made by counties and cities and meeting goals of the
growth management act. Among the areas to be studied: Local
government revenue sources and expenditures over the past decade; the
relationship between local government finances and land use decisions
including commercial, residential, and industrial development;
cooperation or competition of adjoining jurisdictions over land use and
annexation; the relationship new development has to existing commercial
and residential areas and its affect on a community's infrastructure
and quality of life. The study shall include recommendations for state
and local government fiscal partnerships that encourage cooperation
among jurisdictions to meet the goals of the growth management act, and
how the state and local government fiscal structure can better meet the
responsibilities of providing services to citizens and meeting the
goals of the growth management act.
(9) By December 1, 2004, the office of financial management shall
report to the house of representatives committees on commerce and
labor, state government, and trade and economic development and the
senate committees on commerce and trade, economic development,
government operations and elections, or their successor committees, on
its review of the following:
(a) Personal services and purchased services contracts, and any
subcontracts awarded under such contracts, performed at locations
outside the United States;
(b) The applicability of international trade agreements to state
procurement policies; the compliance of signatories to such agreements
with international and state child labor, environmental protection,
human rights, and labor standards; and the effects of such agreements
on domestic preferences adopted by signatories to such agreements;
(c) The economic benefit of awarding personal services and
purchased services contracts to Washington companies. The economic
benefit shall be measured as follows:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands;
(d) The cost to the state of retraining workers who are separated
from employment because their positions were outsourced to locations
outside the United States, and issues relative to their eligibility for
training benefits under RCW 50.22.150;
(e) The extent to which state contracts performed at locations
outside the U.S. involve solicitation or disclosure of personal
information; and
(f) The relationship between state labor market conditions,
including unemployment rate, and outsourcing decisions.

Sec. 119 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,619,000))
$26,983,000

Sec. 120 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,247,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,612,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,859,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department is authorized to enter into a financing contract
for up to (($32,095,000)) $38,911,000, plus necessary financing
expenses and required reserves, pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. The
contract shall be to purchase, develop, and implement a new statewide
payroll system and shall be for a term of not more than twelve years.
The legislature recognizes the critical nature of the human resource
management system and its relationship to successful implementation of
civil service reform, collective bargaining, and the ability to permit
contracting out of services to the private sector. Projects of this
size and complexity have many risks associated with their successful
and timely completion, therefore, to help ensure project success, the
department of personnel and the office of financial management shall
jointly report to the legislature by January 15, 2004, on progress
toward implementing the human resource management system. The report
shall include a description of mitigation strategies employed to
address the risks related to: Business requirements not fully defined
at the project outset; short time frame for system implementation; and
delays experienced by other states. The report shall assess the
probability of meeting the system implementation schedule and recommend
contingency strategies as needed. The report shall establish the
timelines, the critical path, and the dependencies for realizing each
of the benefits articulated in the system feasibility study.
(2) The department shall coordinate with the governor's office of
Indian affairs on providing one-day government to government training
sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees.
The training sessions must cover tribal historical perspectives, legal
issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the
training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the
participants of each session.

Sec. 121 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS -- OPERATIONS
Dependent Care Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $384,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,485,000))
$45,216,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,869,000))
$45,600,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $31,000 of the retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1519, chapter 155, Laws
of 2003 (unreduced duty death survivor benefits).
(2) $1,678,000 of the retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2197,
chapter 92, Laws of 2003 (law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
plan 2 board implementation).
(3) $2,083,000 of the retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely for the support of the information
systems project known as the electronic document image management
system.
(4) $124,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate
Bill No. 5094, chapter 157, Laws of 2003 (substitute employees'
retirement credit).
(5) $77,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate
Bill No. 5100, chapter 32, Laws of 2003 (fallen hero survivor
benefits).
(6) $21,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 1206, chapter 156, Laws of 2003 (plan 3 contributions).
(7) $30,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 1207, chapter 402, Laws of 2003 (employee death benefits).
(8) $324,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute
House Bill No. 1829, chapter 412, Laws of 2003 (retire-rehire reform).
(9) $125,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute
House Bill No. 1202, chapter 293, Laws of 2003 (emergency medical
technicians' retirement).
(10) $188,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 2418 (minimum disability benefits).
(11) $7,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 2419 (unreduced line-duty death benefits).
(12) $5,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 2534 (state patrol line-duty death benefits).
(13) $128,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 2538 ($1000 minimum benefit).
(14) $403,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 2537 (public safety employees' retirement system).

Sec. 122 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,644,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($81,916,000))
$82,241,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,191,000))
$5,327,000
Waste Education/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,000
Oil Spill Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($169,933,000))
$170,394,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2436 (retired
persons property tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
2500 (streamlined sales & use tax). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $149,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
2531 (regional transportation investment districts). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(4) $136,000 of the timber tax distribution account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2693 (taxation of timber). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 123 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,990,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office's revolving fund charges to state agencies may not
exceed (($1,282,000)) $1,534,000.
(2) During the 2003-05 biennium, the office may receive gifts,
grants, or endowments from public or private sources that are made from
time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the
purposes of the office and spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income
from the public or private sources according to their terms, unless the
receipt of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.
(3) During ((fiscal year 2004)) the 2003-05 biennium, the office
may raise fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor.

Sec. 124 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 141 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($193,000))
$235,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($275,000))
$233,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,215,000))
$3,865,000
General Administration Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,086,000))
$38,419,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,769,000))
$42,752,000

Sec. 125 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $631,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,307,000))
$33,209,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,938,000))
$33,840,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $200,000 of the insurance commissioner's
regulatory account--state appropriation is provided solely to assess
conditions in liability insurance markets in Washington. The
commissioner will develop and provide information to Washington
businesses, insurance agents, and brokers to assist such businesses in
obtaining liability insurance coverage. The commissioner will also
assist such businesses in determining which Washington agents and
brokers have access to authorized and surplus lines insurers writing
such liability coverages. The commissioner shall provide this
information in a manner that does not discriminate or favor any agent,
broker, or insurer writing business directly. Nothing in this section
shall impair the authority of the commissioner to activate a market
assistance plan under RCW 48.22.050.

Sec. 126 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 146 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION
Horse Racing Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,609,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: During fiscal year 2005, the commission
may raise license fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor as
provided in RCW 43.135.055.

Sec. 127 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 147 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,454,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,455,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,717,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($133,842,000))
$135,793,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($142,468,000))
$144,419,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,000,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is
provided solely for the costs associated with ((the completion of)) the
merchandising business system, with priority placed on the point of
sale component of the system. Actual expenditures are limited to the
balance of funds remaining from the $4,803,000 appropriation provided
for the merchandise business system in the 2001-03 budget.
(2) $1,309,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is
provided solely for the costs associated with ((purchasing merchandise
business system software and hardware-related items, and hiring system-related staff)) the merchandising business system solution, with
priority placed on the point of sale component of the system. These
costs include hiring system-related staff and procuring system-related
hardware and software.
(3) As required under RCW 66.16.010, the liquor control board shall
add an equivalent surcharge of $0.42 per liter on all retail sales of
spirits, excluding licensee, military and tribal sales, effective no
later than September 1, 2003. The intent of this surcharge is to raise
$14,000,000 in additional revenue for the 2003-05 biennium. To the
extent that a lesser surcharge is sufficient to raise $14,000,000, the
board may reduce the amount of the surcharge. The board shall remove
the surcharge once it generates $14,000,000, but no later than June 30,
2005.
(4) $875,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
2131 (Sunday sales). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 128 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Public Service Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,872,000))
$26,654,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,768,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,041,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,681,000))
$30,463,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The commission shall report back to the appropriate policy
committees of the legislature by July 1st of 2003 and 2004 a list of
authorized out-of-state travel for the preceding calendar year.
(((3))) (2) $135,000 of the public services revolving account
appropriation and $15,000 of the pipeline safety account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the
commission's financial systems project. If final approval for the
project is not granted by the office of financial management, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((4))) (3) $200,000 of the public services revolving account
appropriation is provided solely for an interagency transfer to the
joint legislative audit and review committee for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1013 (UTC performance audit). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, ((2003)) 2004, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 129 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,486,000))
$8,578,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,223,000))
$8,466,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,094,000))
$143,243,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $371,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,955,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($190,000))
$3,472,000
Disaster Response Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,915,000
Worker and Community Right to Know Fund -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $290,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,128,000))
$17,869,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,725,000))
$62,103,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($185,462,000))
$287,262,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $190,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation
is provided solely to develop and implement a disaster grant management
system. The military department shall also submit a report quarterly
to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing information on the disaster response account,
including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b)
the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c)
the projected fund balance at the end of the 2003-05 biennium based on
current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) (($10,128,000)) $14,869,000 of the Nisqually earthquake
account--state appropriation and (($48,725,000)) $62,103,000 of the
Nisqually earthquake account--federal appropriation are provided solely
for response and recovery costs associated with the February 28, 2001,
earthquake. The military department shall submit a report quarterly to
the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing earthquake recovery costs, including: (a)
Estimates of total costs; (b) incremental changes from the previous
estimate; (c) actual expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining
costs to be paid; and (e) estimates of future payments by biennium.
This information shall be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and
by amount paid on behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The
military department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office
of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2003-05 biennium based on current revenue and
expenditure patterns.
(3) $3,000,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--state
appropriation is provided solely to cover other response and recovery
costs associated with the Nisqually earthquake that are not eligible
for federal emergency management agency reimbursement. Prior to
expending funds provided in this subsection, the military department
shall obtain prior approval of the director of financial management.
Prior to approving any single project of over $1,000,000, the office of
financial management shall notify the fiscal committees of the
legislature. The military department is to submit a quarterly report
detailing the costs authorized under this subsection to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees.
(4) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and (($43,555,000)) $105,952,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for homeland security, to be
distributed as follows:
(a) $9,469,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to units
of local government for homeland security purposes. Any communications
equipment purchased shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and (($200,000)) $2,713,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation to the department to conduct the terrorism consequence
management program;
(c) $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to the
department to conduct a critical infrastructure assessment;
(d) (($500,000)) $674,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation to the office of financial management for the citizen
corps and the community emergency response teams;
(e) $1,384,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to the
department to provide homeland security exercise and training
opportunities to state and local governments, and to develop, monitor,
coordinate, and manage statewide homeland security programs, including
required grant administration, monitoring, and reporting;
(f) (($29,917,000)) $89,677,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation for other anticipated homeland security needs. This
amount shall not be allotted until a spending plan is approved by the
governor's domestic security advisory group and the office of financial
management;
(g) The remaining general fund--federal appropriation may be
expended according to federal requirements;
(h) Federal moneys shall be carried forward and applied to the pool
of moneys available for appropriation for programs and projects in the
succeeding fiscal year. Funding is contingent upon receipt of federal
awards. As part of its budget request in each year, the department
shall estimate and request authority to spend any federal funds
remaining available as a result of this subsection;
(i) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for Washington state; incremental changes from
the previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security
expenditures by the state and local governments with this federal
funding; and matching or accompanying state or local expenditures.

Sec. 130 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,362,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,436,000))
$2,396,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,542,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,340,000))
$7,300,000

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $40,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 is provided solely for the
implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5012 (charter
schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 201 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES. (1)
Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health
services shall initially be allotted as required by this act.
Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of
moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in
this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that
purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2004, unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2004 among programs
after approval by the director of financial management. However, the
department shall not transfer state moneys that are provided solely for
a specified purpose except as expressly provided in subsection (3)(b)
of this section.
(b) To the extent that transfers under subsection (3)(a) of this
section are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of
fiscal year 2004 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the
medical assistance, long-term care, foster care, adoption support, and
child support programs, the department may transfer state moneys that
are provided solely for a specified purpose after approval by the
director of financial management.
(c) The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this subsection.
(4) ((The department)) After consultation and coordination with
local elected officials and community groups to assure there will be no
degradation in existing services as a result of implementing the
Washington medicaid integration project, the department shall report
its progress to the appropriate committees of the legislature during
the 2004 September committee assembly days and is authorized to develop
an integrated health care program designed to slow the progression of
illness and disability and better manage Medicaid expenditures for the
aged and disabled population. Under this Washington medicaid
integration partnership (WMIP) the department may combine and transfer
such Medicaid funds appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 209
of this act as may be necessary to finance a unified health care plan
for the WMIP program enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not
exceed a daily enrollment of 6,000 persons during the 2003-05 biennium.
The amount of funding assigned to the pilot projects from each program
may not exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act for
individuals covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the
health condition of persons enrolled in the pilot, times the number of
clients enrolled in the pilot. In implementing the WMIP pilot
projects, the department may: (a) Withhold from calculations of
"available resources" as set forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the
capitated rate for individuals enrolled in the pilots; and (b) employ
capitation financing and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration
with health care service contractors licensed by the office of the
insurance commissioner and qualified to participate in both the
medicaid and medicare programs. The department shall conduct an
evaluation of the WMIP, measuring changes in participant health
outcomes, changes in patterns of service utilization, participant
satisfaction, participant access to services, and the state fiscal
impact.

Sec. 202 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($231,566,000))
$219,391,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($232,468,000))
$230,572,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($416,043,000))
$424,102,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Public Safety and Education Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,920,000))
$21,476,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,640,000))
$1,488,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($910,037,000))
$897,429,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,271,000 of the fiscal year 2004 general fund--state
appropriation, $2,271,000 of the fiscal year 2005 general fund--state
appropriation, and $1,584,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the category of services titled
"intensive family preservation services."
(2) $701,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2004
appropriation and $701,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2005
appropriation are provided to contract for the operation of one
pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $375,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2004
appropriation, $375,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2005
appropriation, and $322,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(4) The providers for the 31 HOPE beds shall be paid a $1,000 base
payment per bed per month, and reimbursed for the remainder of the bed
cost only when the beds are occupied.
(5) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for a foster parent retention
program. This program is directed at foster parents caring for
children who act out sexually.
(6) Within funding provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures. The
department shall adjust adoption support benefits to account for the
availability of the new federal adoption support tax credit for special
needs children.
(7) $50,000 of the fiscal year 2004 general fund--state
appropriation and $50,000 of the fiscal year 2005 general fund--state
appropriation are provided solely for a street youth program in
Spokane.
(8) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to increase shelter and other services for
victims of domestic violence provided as a part of the department's
victim assistance program.
(9) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $2,921,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $1,763,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement CAMIS user interface
improvements and family team decision meetings, as a part of the
department's program improvement plan implementation.
(10) The department shall convene regional and local department
staff and community-based agency staff to develop recommended policies
and protocols concerning collaborative decision making, including,
contracting, referrals, and resource allocation. The department shall
submit these recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2004.

Sec. 203 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,095,000))
$72,435,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,697,000))
$70,712,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,062,000))
$6,260,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,139,000))
$7,300,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,338,000))
$37,699,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($206,429,000))
$195,504,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $695,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation is provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $6,065,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts
provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county
impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $1,204,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $1,204,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $5,262,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation are provided solely to implement
community juvenile accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws
of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection
may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants,
administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the
grants.
(4) $2,544,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely to implement alcohol and
substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on
a competitive basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision
of services approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for
evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and
shall assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) (($100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for a contract for expanded
services of the teamchild project.
(6))) $16,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $16,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
167, Laws of 1999 (firearms on school property). The amounts provided
in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 167, Laws of 1999, and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(((8))) (6) $16,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely for the evaluation of the
juvenile offender co-occurring disorder pilot program ((implemented
pursuant to subsection (7) of this section)).
(((9) $900,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $900,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the continued implementation
of the juvenile violence prevention grant program established in
section 204, chapter 309, Laws of 1999.
(11))) (7) For the purposes of a pilot project recommended by the
family policy council, the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall
provide a block grant, rather than categorical funding, for
consolidated juvenile services, community juvenile accountability act
grants, the chemically dependent disposition alternative, and the
special sex offender disposition alternative to the Pierce county
juvenile court. To evaluate the effect of decategorizing funding for
youth services, the juvenile court shall do the following:
(a) Develop intermediate client outcomes according to the risk
assessment tool (RAT) currently used by juvenile courts and in
coordination with the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the
family policy council;
(b) Track the number of youth participating in each type of
service, intermediate outcomes, and the incidence of recidivism within
twenty-four months of completion of services;
(c) Track similar data as in (b) of this subsection with an
appropriate control group, selected in coordination with the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the family policy council;
(d) Document the process for managing block grant funds on a
quarterly basis, and provide this report to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the family policy council; and
(e) Provide an initial process evaluation to the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the family policy council by January
30, 2004, and an intermediate evaluation by December 31, 2004. The
court shall develop this evaluation in consultation with the juvenile
rehabilitation administration, the family policy council, and the
Washington state institute for public policy.
(((13) $308,000)) (8) $158,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and (($875,000)) $580,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided
solely to reimburse counties for local juvenile disposition
alternatives implemented pursuant to Senate Bill No. 5903 (juvenile
offender sentencing). The juvenile rehabilitation administration, in
consultation with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an
equitable distribution formula for the funding provided in this
subsection. The juvenile rehabilitation administration may adjust this
funding level in the event that utilization rates of the disposition
alternatives are lower than the level anticipated by the total
appropriations to the juvenile rehabilitation administration in this
section. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((14))) (9) $1,416,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and $1,417,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for additional
research-based services to the juvenile parole population, including
quality control efforts to ensure appropriate implementation of
research-based services. The juvenile rehabilitation administration
shall consult with the Washington state institute for public policy in
deciding which interventions to provide to the parole population and
appropriate levels of quality control. Of the total general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2004, up to $55,000 may be used for
additional suicide precaution training for staff.

Sec. 204 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($209,818,000))
$200,251,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($211,317,000))
$213,519,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($384,801,000))
$404,043,000
General Fund -- Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,970,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($807,906,000))
$819,783,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Regional support networks shall use portions of the general
fund -- state appropriation for implementation of working agreements with
the vocational rehabilitation program that will maximize the use of
federal funding for vocational programs.
(b) From the general fund -- state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund -- state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(c) $4,222,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $4,222,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $8,444,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons whose treatment
needs constitute substantial barriers to community placement and who no
longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital
level of care, no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment, and have been discharged from a state psychiatric hospital.
Primary responsibility and accountability for provision of appropriate
community support for persons placed with these funds shall reside with
the mental health program and the regional support networks, with
partnership and active support from the alcohol and substance abuse
division and from the aging and disability services administration.
The department shall continue performance-based incentive contracts to
provide appropriate community support services for individuals leaving
the state hospitals under this subsection. The department shall first
seek to contract with regional support networks before offering a
contract to any other party. The funds appropriated in this subsection
shall not be considered "available resources" as defined in RCW
71.24.025 and are not subject to the standard allocation formula
applied in accordance with RCW 71.24.035(13)(a).
(d) At least $902,000 of the federal block grant funding
appropriated in this subsection shall be used for the continued
operation of the mentally ill offender pilot program.
(((f))) (e) Within funds appropriated in this subsection, the
department shall contract with the Clark county regional support
network for development and operation of a project demonstrating
collaborative methods for providing intensive mental health services in
the school setting for severely emotionally disturbed children who are
medicaid eligible. Project services are to be delivered by teachers
and teaching assistants who qualify as, or who are under the
supervision of, mental health professionals meeting the requirements of
chapter 275-57 WAC. The department shall increase medicaid payments to
the regional support network by the amount necessary to cover the
necessary and allowable costs of the demonstration, not to exceed the
upper payment limit specified for the regional support network in the
department's medicaid waiver agreement with the federal government
after meeting all other medicaid spending requirements assumed in this
subsection. The regional support network shall provide the department
with (i) periodic reports on project service levels, methods, and
outcomes; and (ii) an intergovernmental transfer equal to the state
share of the increased medicaid payment provided for operation of this
project.
(((g))) (f) The department shall assure that each regional support
network increases spending on direct client services in fiscal years
2004 and 2005 by at least the same percentage as the total state,
federal, and local funds allocated to the regional support network in
those years exceed the amounts allocated to it in fiscal year 2003.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($94,196,000))
$93,933,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($92,964,000))
$93,435,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($134,755,000))
$135,076,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,342,000))
$29,118,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($348,257,000))
$351,562,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state mental hospitals may use funds appropriated in this
subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) The mental health program at Western state hospital shall
continue to use labor provided by the Tacoma prerelease program of the
department of corrections.
(c) During the 2003-05 biennium, the department may not reduce the
number of inpatient psychiatric hospital beds in the state hospitals
below existing levels of 547 at Western State Hospital and 191 at
Eastern State Hospital, until such time as there are available
community resources, especially inpatient facilities, at an average
cost equal to or less than the respective hospital's daily rate and the
reduction receives legislative approval. In addition, residential beds
in the program for adaptive living skills at Western state hospital may
be closed only if the department provides sufficient resources for
these patients' mental health care to the communities in which they are
placed.

(3) CIVIL COMMITMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,695,000))
$29,194,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,081,000))
$34,551,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,776,000))
$63,745,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) (($1,381,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004 and $2,090,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for operational
costs associated with a less restrictive step-down placement facility
on McNeil Island.
(b))) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for public safety mitigation
funding for jurisdictions affected by the placement of ((less
restrictive alternative facilities for persons conditionally released
from the special commitment center facility being constructed)) the
secure community transition facility on McNeil Island. Of this amount,
$45,000 per year shall be provided to the city of Lakewood on September
1, 2003, and September 1, 2004, for police protection ((reimbursement))
services provided by the city at Western State Hospital and adjacent
areas((; up to $45,000 per year shall be provided on September 1, 2003,
and September 1, 2004, for training police personnel under chapter 12,
Laws of 2001, 2nd sp. sess. (3ESSB 6151); up to $125,000 per year shall
be provided to Pierce county on September 1, 2003, and September 1,
2004, for reimbursement of additional costs; and the remaining amounts
are for other documented costs by jurisdictions directly impacted by
the placement of the secure community transition facility on McNeil
Island. Pursuant to chapter 12, Laws of 2001, 2nd sp. sess. (3ESSB
6151), the department shall continue to work with local jurisdictions
towards reaching agreement for mitigation costs.
(c) $924,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,429,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for operational costs associated
with a less restrictive step-down placement facility located outside of
Pierce county. In selecting a site, the department is encouraged to
purchase or lease a site in an industrial area close to employment
opportunities and treatment services, in an effort to reduce operating
expenditures related to transportation and staff time)). Of the
remaining $255,000 per year, the department shall reimburse the
affected jurisdictions for their documented costs that have been
negotiated in an interagency agreement between the department and each
jurisdiction, as follows:
(i) Up to $125,000 per year shall be provided to Pierce county for
its additional public safety costs as defined in RCW 71.09.344(2).
(ii) Up to $45,000 per year shall be provided to affected
jurisdictions other than Pierce county for the costs of training their
law enforcement and administrative personnel as defined in RCW
71.09.344(2)(a).
(iii) The remaining amounts are for affected jurisdictions other
than Pierce county for reimbursement of their documented public safety
costs as defined in RCW 71.09.344(2) (b), (c), and (d).
(b) $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2004 and $354,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 are provided solely for mitigation costs for the city of
Seattle associated with the development and occupancy of the secure
community transition facility in Seattle, as described in the
settlement agreement dated February 3, 2004, between the department and
the city of Seattle. If City of Seattle v. DSHS, King County Superior
Court Cause No. 03-2-37882-SEA is not dismissed with prejudice by July
1, 2004, this appropriation shall lapse. If the proceeding requested
by the city under RCW 71.09.342(5) is not withdrawn or dismissed with
prejudice by July 1, 2004, this appropriation shall lapse.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,082,000

(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,863,000))
$3,144,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,751,000))
$3,122,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,011,000))
$5,807,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,625,000))
$12,073,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $113,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $164,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are
provided solely for the institute for public policy to evaluate the
impacts of chapter 214, Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders), chapter
297, Laws of 1998 (commitment of mentally ill persons), and chapter
334, Laws of 2001 (mental health performance audit).
(b) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $50,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are
provided solely for a study of the prevalence of mental illness among
the state's regional support networks. The study shall examine how
reasonable estimates of the prevalence of mental illness relate to the
incidence of persons enrolled in medical assistance programs in each
regional support network area. In conducting this study, the
department shall consult with the joint legislative audit and review
committee, regional support networks, community mental health
providers, and mental health consumer representatives. The department
shall submit a final report on its findings to the fiscal, health care,
and human services committees of the legislature by November 1, 2003.
(c) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely for a study of community residential
psychiatric capacity to determine specific community mental health
needs, optimum treatment locations, and evaluate facility options,
including operations and staffing costs. The department shall make
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 1, 2004.

Sec. 205 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($262,458,000))
$250,712,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($268,826,000))
$271,707,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($439,489,000))
$450,614,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,038,000))
$885,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($971,811,000))
$973,918,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Any new funding for family support and high school transition
along with a portion of existing funding for these programs shall be
provided as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental
payments for persons with developmental disabilities in families with
taxable incomes at or below 150 percent of median family income.
Individuals receiving family support or high school transition payments
shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510
due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.
(b) The health services account appropriation and (($1,038,000))
$885,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely
for health care benefits for home care workers with family incomes
below 200 percent of the federal poverty level who are employed through
state contracts for twenty hours per week or more.
(i) Premium payments for individual provider home care workers
shall be made only to the subsidized basic health plan.
(ii) Home care agencies may obtain coverage either through the
basic health plan or through an alternative plan with substantially
equivalent benefits. It is the intent of the legislature to fund the
purchase of health care benefits for agency home care providers in a
more fiscally prudent manner. The legislature encourages agency
providers to purchase more cost-effective health care benefits,
including increasing participation in the basic health plan or
purchasing substantially equivalent benefits with substantially
equivalent costs.
(c) (($510,000)) $587,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004, (($784,000)) $2,181,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and (($1,225,000)) $2,708,000
of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
community residential and support services. Funding in this subsection
shall be prioritized for (i) residents of residential habilitation
centers who are able to be adequately cared for in community settings
and who choose to live in those community settings; ((and)) (ii)
clients without residential services who are at immediate risk of
institutionalization or in crisis; (iii) children who are aging out of
other state services; and (iv) current home and community-based waiver
program clients who have been assessed as having an immediate need for
increased services. The department shall ensure that the average cost
per day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not
exceed $300. In order to maximize the number of clients served and
ensure the cost-effectiveness of the waiver programs, the department
will strive to limit new client placement expenditures to 90 percent of
the budgeted daily rate. If this can be accomplished, additional
clients may be served with excess funds provided the total projected
carry-forward expenditures do not exceed the amounts estimated. The
department shall electronically report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the
number of residents moving into community settings and the actual
expenditures for all community services to support those residents.
(d) (($511,000)) $617,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004, (($616,000)) $1,542,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and (($1,073,000)) $2,057,000
of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
expanded community services for persons with developmental disabilities
who also have community protection issues ((or are diverted or
discharged from state psychiatric hospitals)). Funding in this
subsection shall be prioritized for (i) clients being diverted or
discharged from the state psychiatric hospitals; (ii) clients
participating in the dangerous mentally ill offender program; (iii)
clients participating in the community protection program; and (iv)
mental health crisis diversion outplacements. The department shall
ensure that the average cost per day for all program services other
than start-up costs shall not exceed $300. In order to maximize the
number of clients served and ensure the cost-effectiveness of the
waiver programs, the department will strive to limit new client
placement expenditures to 90 percent of the budgeted daily rate. If
this can be accomplished, additional clients may be served with excess
funds provided the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not
exceed the amounts estimated. The department shall electronically
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days
following each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served with
these additional community services, where they were residing, what
kinds of services they were receiving prior to placement, and the
actual expenditures for all community services to support these
clients.
(e) The department shall provide a status report on the transition,
implementation, and operation of the four home and community-based
waivers which will replace the community alternatives program waiver.
The department shall electronically report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature, within 45 days following each fiscal
year quarter, the following information for each home and community-based waiver: Total projected state and federal fiscal year
expenditures, year-to-date actual expenditures compared to projected
expenditures, year-to-date unduplicated clients compared to projected
clients, actual average per capita costs compared to projected per
capita costs, number of transfers between waivers, amount of emergency
funds spent to date compared to projected emergency costs, and the
year-to-date number of new clients added to a waiver program.
(f) The department may transfer funding provided in this subsection
to meet the purposes of subsection (2) of this section to the extent
that fewer residents of residential habilitation centers choose to move
to community placements than was assumed in this appropriation.
(((f))) (g) $3,290,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004, $4,773,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2005, and $7,504,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of providing a wage
increase effective October 1, 2003, for individual home care workers
providing state-funded services. The amounts in this subsection also
include the funds needed for the employer share of unemployment and
social security taxes on the amount of the increase.
(((g))) (h) $355,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004, (($517,000)) $780,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and (($848,000)) $1,092,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to increase
payments to agency home care providers from $13.44 per hour to $14.27
per hour effective October 1, 2003, and to $14.83 per hour effective
October 1, 2004. The amounts in this subsection shall be used to
increase ((wages)) compensation for direct care workers by 75 cents per
hour on October 1, 2003, and by an additional 50 cents per hour on
October 1, 2004. The amounts in this subsection also include the funds
needed for the employer share of unemployment and social security taxes
on the amount of the increase.
(i) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for employment and day services. Priority
consideration for this new funding shall be young adults with
developmental disabilities living with their family who need employment
opportunities and assistance after high school graduation. Federal
funds may be used to enhance this funding only to the extent that a
client is already on a home and community-based waiver. This funding
shall not be used to add new clients to a home and community-based
waiver.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,862,000))
$67,708,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,926,000))
$70,794,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($144,682,000))
$148,998,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,228,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($298,698,000))
$298,728,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department may transfer funding
provided in this subsection to meet the purposes of subsection (1) of
this section to the extent that more residents of residential
habilitation centers choose to move to community placements than was
assumed in this appropriation.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,245,000))
$2,474,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,245,000))
$3,208,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,965,000))
$4,209,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,782,000))
$891,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,237,000))
$10,782,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $245,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004, $996,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and $1,258,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of
developing and implementing a consistent needs assessment instrument
for use on all clients with developmental disabilities. In developing
the instrument, the department shall develop a process for collecting
data on family income for minor children with developmental
disabilities who are clients of the department and shall ensure that
this information is captured as part of the client assessment process.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,993,000))
$13,604,000

Sec. 206 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($557,645,000))
$524,349,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($570,669,000))
$591,248,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,162,511,000))
$1,200,279,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,644,000))
$18,697,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,888,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,314,357,000))
$2,339,461,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire health services account appropriation, $1,476,000 of
the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2004,
(($1,476,000)) $484,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and (($7,284,000)) $6,293,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits for
home care workers who are employed through state contracts for at least
twenty hours per week.
(a) Premium payments for individual provider home care workers
shall be made only to the subsidized basic health plan, and only for
persons with incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level.
(b) Home care agencies may obtain coverage either through the basic
health plan or through an alternative plan with substantially
equivalent benefits. It is the intent of the legislature to fund the
purchase of health care benefits for agency home care providers in a
more fiscally prudent manner. The legislature encourages agency
providers to purchase more cost-effective health care benefits,
including increasing participation in the basic health plan or
purchasing substantially equivalent benefits with substantially
equivalent costs.
(2) $1,768,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,768,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
chore services program.
(3) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall be no more than (($144.54))
$142.04 for fiscal year 2004, and no more than (($147.43)) $144.93 for
fiscal year 2005. For all facilities, the direct care, therapy care,
support services, and operations component rates established in
accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW shall be adjusted for economic trends
and conditions by 3.0 percent effective July 1, 2003.
(4) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue certificates of capital authorization that result in up to $32
million of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in
fiscal year 2004; up to $32 million of increased asset value completed
and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2005; and up to $32 million of
increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year
2006.
(5) Adult day health services shall not be considered a duplication
of services for persons receiving care in long-term care settings
licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW.
(6) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement ((a)) two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not
qualify for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal
approval and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) ((The)) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in
community residential facilities, and the second shall include coverage
of home-based services. Enrollment in the waiver covering community
residential services shall not exceed 600 persons ((by the end of)) in
fiscal year 2004, nor 600 persons ((by the end of)) in fiscal year
2005. Enrollment in the waiver covering home-based services shall not
exceed 200 persons in fiscal year 2004, nor 200 persons in fiscal year
2005.
(b) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(c) The department shall track and electronically report to health
care and fiscal committees of the legislature by November 15, 2004, on
the types of long-term care support a sample of waiver participants
were receiving prior to their enrollment in the waivers, how those
services were being paid for, and an assessment of their adequacy.
(7) $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $236,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to assess at least annually each
elderly resident residing in residential habilitation centers and
state-operated living alternatives to determine if the resident can be
more appropriately served in a less restrictive setting.
(a) The department shall consider the proximity to the resident of
the family, friends, and advocates concerned with the resident's
well-being in determining whether the resident should be moved from a
residential habilitation center to a different facility or program.
(b) In assessing an elderly resident under this section and to
ensure appropriate placement, the department shall identify the special
needs of the resident, the types of services that will best meet those
needs, and the type of facility that will best provide those services.
(c) The appropriate interdisciplinary team shall conduct the
evaluation.
(d) If appropriate, the department shall coordinate with the local
mental health authority.
(e) The department may explore whether an enhanced rate is needed
to serve this population.
(8) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department may
((assess nursing facility residents with Alzheimer's disease or related
dementias to determine whether such residents can be more appropriately
served in licensed boarding home facilities that specialize in caring
for such conditions. The department may, based upon the assessments
and within existing funds, pay dementia pilot project rates on behalf
of)) expand the number of boarding home beds participating in the
dementia pilot project by up to 200. These additional beds shall
provide persons with Alzheimer's disease or related dementias who
((move from nursing facilities to specialized boarding homes)) might
otherwise require nursing home care accommodation in licensed boarding
home facilities that specialize in caring for such conditions.
(9) The department shall establish waiting lists to the extent
necessary to assure that annual expenditures on the community options
program entry systems (COPES) program do not exceed appropriated
levels. In establishing and managing any such waiting list, the
department shall assure priority access to persons with the greatest
unmet needs, as determined by department assessment processes.
(10) $7,102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $10,065,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $17,029,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of providing a wage
increase effective October 1, 2003, for individual home care workers
providing state-funded services. The amounts in this subsection also
include the funds needed for the employer share of unemployment and
social security taxes on the amount of the increase.
(11) $107,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $23,848,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $23,239,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of implementing the
collective bargaining agreement between the home care quality authority
and the exclusive bargaining representative of individual providers.
The amounts in this subsection are provided solely to appropriate
funding for this purpose in the event that appropriations for this
purpose are not enacted in separate legislation. If appropriations for
this purpose in amounts equal to or greater than the amounts
appropriated in this subsection are enacted in separate legislation
prior to April 4, 2004, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse. Amounts provided in this subsection may be transferred from the
aging and adult services program to other programs within the
department or to the home care quality authority to implement the
collective bargaining agreement.
(12) $2,219,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, (($3,192,000)) $4,837,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and (($5,263,000)) $6,898,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to increase
payments to agency home care providers from $13.44 per hour to $14.27
per hour effective October 1, 2003, and to $14.83 per hour effective
October 1, 2004. The amounts in this subsection shall be used to
increase ((wages)) compensation for direct care workers by 75 cents per
hour on October 1, 2003, and by an additional 50 cents per hour on
October 1, 2004. The amounts in this subsection also include the funds
needed for the employer share of unemployment and social security taxes
on the amount of the increase.
(13) $53,000 of the general fund--local appropriation and $53,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to
improve the timeliness of processing boarding home licensing
applications.
(14) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for area agencies on aging, or entities
with which area agencies on aging contract, to provide support services
for kinship caregivers throughout the state.
(a) Support services shall include but not be limited to assistance
in gaining access to those services, counseling, organization of
support groups, and respite care.
(b) In providing support services under the kinship caregivers
support program, area agencies on aging shall give priority to kinship
caregivers who are at the greatest risk of being unable to maintain the
caregiving role.
(c) In carrying out the kinship caregivers support program, each
area agency on aging shall coordinate the activities of the agency, or
entities with which the agency contracts, with the activities of other
public and private agencies or organizations providing similar services
for kinship caregivers.

Sec. 207 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($408,184,000))
$445,968,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($407,363,000))
$438,823,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,209,758,000))
$1,207,983,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,880,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,059,185,000))
$2,126,654,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $273,652,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004, $273,695,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2005, and $1,000,222,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst
program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the
department shall:
(a) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Valid outcome measures of job retention and wage
progression shall be developed and reported quarterly to appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the legislature for families who leave
assistance, measured after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months. The
department shall also report the percentage of families who have
returned to temporary assistance for needy families after 12 months, 24
months, and 36 months;
(b) Submit a report by October 1, 2003, to the fiscal committees of
the legislature containing a spending plan for the WorkFirst program.
The plan shall identify how spending levels in the 2003-2005 biennium
will be adjusted to stay within available federal grant levels and the
appropriated state-fund levels; and
(c) Include an urban adjustment factor for child care providers in
urban areas of region 1.
(2) (($45,639,000)) $57,547,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and (($39,335,000)) $59,953,000 of
the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided
solely for cash assistance and other services to recipients in the
general assistance -- unemployable program. Within these amounts, the
department may expend funds for services that assist recipients to
reduce their dependence on public assistance, provided that
expenditures for these services and cash assistance do not exceed the
funds provided.
(3) (($1,436,000)) $936,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and (($1,436,000)) $936,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for
the department to assist in naturalization efforts for legal aliens
whose eligibility for federal supplemental security income has expired.
The department shall use funding previously spent on general assistance
employment supports for these naturalization services.
(4) $3,940,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $3,940,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the food assistance program
for legal immigrants. The level of benefits shall be equivalent to the
benefits provided by the federal food stamp program.
(5) $9,142,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for increased reimbursement of county legal-clerk
services for child support enforcement. The department shall ensure
this increase in cost does not reduce federal incentive payments.
(6) In reviewing the budget for the division of child support, the
legislature has conducted a review of the Washington state child
support schedule, chapter 26.19 RCW, and supporting documentation as
required by federal law. The legislature concludes that the
application of the support schedule continues to result in the correct
amount of child support to be awarded. No further changes will be made
to the support schedule or the economic table at this time.
(7) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement, within funds appropriated in
this subsection, a child care career and wage ladder program. The
child care career and wage ladder shall provide increased wages for
child care workers based on their work experience, level of
responsibility, and education. To the extent practicable within
available funds, the program shall be modeled after the child care
career and wage ladder program in place from 2000 to 2003. Licensed
child care centers may only be eligible if they meet the following
criteria: (a) At least ten percent of child care slots are dedicated
to children whose care is subsidized by the state or any political
subdivision thereof or any local government; (b) agree to adopt the
child care career and wage ladder; and (c) meet further program
standards as established by rule. Because available funds may not be
sufficient to allow all qualifying child care centers to participate,
the department shall develop a system for prioritizing child care
centers interested in adopting the child care career and wage ladder.
(8) $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for a subsidy rate increase for child care
providers in urban areas of region 1.
(9) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the department to maintain specialized
employment services through the WorkFirst/LEP pathway program for
refugees and other limited-English-proficient (LEP) families and
individuals that receive temporary assistance for needy families, state
family assistance, or refugee cash assistance benefits. These
employment services include but are not limited to English as a second
language (ESL), job placement assistance, and work support services.
(10) The department shall request a waiver of the interview
requirement for all basic food applications completed by basic food
outreach contractors. If the department is not granted a federal
waiver by January 1, 2005, the food bank outreach pilot program is
created as set forth in this subsection: The department shall select
six food banks at which to conduct the food bank outreach pilot
program. Three of the food banks shall be located in eastern
Washington, and three shall be located in western Washington. A
departmental intake worker shall be available at least one time per
week at each of the participating food banks in order to assist food
bank clients with applications for the basic food program. The
department shall implement the food bank outreach pilot program no
later than January 1, 2005.

Sec. 208 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE
ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,320,000))
$40,429,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,320,000))
$42,151,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($90,632,000))
$94,105,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $630,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,160,000))
$2,060,000
Problem Gambling Treatment Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,950,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,342,000))
$48,242,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($232,354,000))
$237,067,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $966,197 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $966,197 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the parent child assistance
program. The department shall contract with the University of
Washington and community-based providers in Spokane and Yakima for the
provision of this program. For all contractors, indirect charges for
administering the program shall not exceed ten percent of the total
contract amount.
(2) $500,000 of the problem gambling treatment account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2776 (problem gambling). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 209 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,184,774,000))
$1,117,886,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,265,423,000))
$1,274,692,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,764,258,000))
$3,915,458,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($262,736,000))
$268,296,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,700,000))
$14,004,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($756,012,000))
$715,399,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,256,903,000))
$7,305,735,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) The department shall continue to extend medicaid eligibility to
children through age 18 residing in households with incomes below 200
percent of the federal poverty level.
(3) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the department is authorized to disregard recoveries by
Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined
in RCW 48.104.030.
(4) (($999,000)) $493,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2004, (($1,519,000)) $748,000 of the
health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and
(($2,142,000)) $1,241,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
are provided solely for implementation of a "ticket to work" medicaid
buy-in program for working persons with disabilities, operated in
accordance with the following conditions:
(a) To be eligible, a working person with a disability must have
total income which is less than 450 percent of poverty;
(b) Participants shall participate in the cost of the program by
paying (i) a monthly enrollment fee equal to fifty percent of any
unearned income in excess of the medicaid medically needy standard; and
(ii) a monthly premium equal to 5 percent of all unearned income, plus
5 percent of all earned income after disregarding the first sixty-five
dollars of monthly earnings, and half the remainder;
(c) The department shall establish more restrictive eligibility
standards than specified in this subsection to the extent necessary to
operate the program within appropriated funds; and
(d) The department may require point-of-service copayments as
appropriate, except that copayments shall not be so high as to
discourage appropriate service utilization, particularly of
prescription drugs needed for the treatment of psychiatric conditions.
(5) Sufficient funds are appropriated in this section for the
department to continue podiatry services for medicaid-eligible adults.
(6) Sufficient funds are appropriated in this section for the
department to provide an adult dental benefit equivalent to
approximately 75 percent of the dental benefit provided during the
2001-03 biennium. The department shall establish the scope of services
to be provided within the available funds in consultation with dental
providers and consumer representatives.
(7) The legislature reaffirms that it is in the state's interest
for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable
component of the state's health care system.
(8) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, (($52,057,000)) $35,952,000
of the fiscal year 2004 health services account appropriation,
(($35,016,000)) $20,577,000 of the fiscal year 2005 health services
account appropriation, and (($87,074,000)) $61,038,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by rural public hospital districts.
The payments shall be conditioned upon (a) a contractual commitment by
the association of public hospital districts and participating rural
public hospital districts to make an intergovernmental transfer to the
state treasurer, for deposit into the health services account, equal to
at least ((94.5)) 91.8 percent of the supplemental payments; (b) a
contractual commitment by the association of public hospital districts
to return at least ((5.5)) 8.2 percent of the supplemental payments to
the participating rural hospital districts; and (c) a contractual
commitment by the participating districts to not allow expenditures
covered by the supplemental payments to be used for medicaid nursing
home rate setting. A hospital which does not participate in the
supplemental payment intergovernmental transfer budgeted for fiscal
year 2003 shall not be eligible to participate in the supplemental
payments budgeted in this subsection for fiscal years 2004 and 2005.
The participating districts shall retain no more than a total of
$9,600,000 for the 2003-05 biennium.
(9) (($14,616,000)) $12,318,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2004, (($12,394,000)) $10,738,000 of the
health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and
(($27,010,000)) $23,056,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
are provided solely for additional disproportionate share and medicare
upper payment limit payments to public hospital districts and to the
state's teaching hospitals. The payments shall be conditioned upon a
contractual commitment by the participating public hospitals to make an
intergovernmental transfer to the health services account equal to at
least 91 percent of the additional payments. The state's teaching
hospitals shall retain at least 28 percent of the amounts retained by
hospitals under these programs, or the maximum allowable under the
teaching hospitals' limits as established under federal rule, whichever
is less.
(10) $3,100,000 of the health services account appropriation,
(($8,416,000)) $4,208,000 of the general fund--local appropriation, and
(($11,516,000)) $7,308,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for grants to rural hospitals. The department
shall distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively
larger share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(11) $10,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, $26,080,000 of the health services account
appropriation, and $26,080,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for grants to nonrural hospitals.
The department shall distribute the funds under a formula that provides
a relatively larger share of the available funding to hospitals that
(a) serve a disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent
patients and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the
extent allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(((13) $156,000)) (12) $302,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004, $1,671,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and (($1,403,000))
$17,757,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for ((a study to assess alternatives for replacing the existing
medicaid management information system. The department shall report to
the information services board and to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2003, on the anticipated costs and benefits
of the major alternative approaches)) development and implementation of
a replacement system for the existing medicaid management information
system.
(((14))) (13) The department shall implement a combination of cost
containment and utilization strategies sufficient to reduce general
fund--state costs for durable medical equipment and supplies in fiscal
year 2005 by approximately 5 percent below the level projected for
fiscal year 2005 in the February 2003 forecast. In designing
strategies, the primary strategy considered shall be selective or
direct contracting with durable medical equipment and supplies vendors
or manufacturers.
(((15))) (14) The department shall, within available resources,
design and implement a medical care services care management pilot
project for clients receiving general assistance benefits. The pilot
project shall be operated in at least two of the counties with the
highest concentration of general assistance clients, and may use a full
or partial capitation model. In designing the project, the department
shall consult with the mental health division and its managed care
contractors that include community and migrant health centers in their
provider network. The pilot project shall be designed to maximize care
coordination, high-risk medical management, and chronic care management
to achieve better health outcomes. The pilot project shall begin
enrollment on July 1, 2004.
(((16))) (15) Within available resources and to the extent
possible, the department shall evaluate and pilot a nurse consultant
services program to assist fee-for-service clients in accessing medical
information, with the goal of reducing administrative burdens on
physicians and unnecessary emergency room utilization.
(((17))) (16) The department shall include in any pending medicaid
reform section 1115 waiver application, or in any existing section 1115
waiver, a request for authorization to provide optional medicaid
services that have been eliminated in this act to American Indian and
Alaska Native persons as defined in relevant federal law who are
eligible for medicaid only to the extent that such services are
provided through the American Indian health system and are financed
with one hundred percent federal medicaid matching funds.
(((18))) (17) The department shall establish managed care rates
within available funds, giving specific consideration to each plan's
programmatic and financial performance, and ability to assure access in
under-served areas.
(((19))) (18) The department of social and health services, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the department
of health should jointly identify opportunities for early intervention
and prevention activities that can help prevent disease and reduce oral
health issues among children. Disease prevention among infants at the
age of one year and among children entering the K-12 education system
provides cost-effective ways to avoid higher health care spending later
in life.
(((20))) (19) The department shall secure a federal waiver,
effective no later than September 1, 2003, which will enable it to
charge co-premiums for medical and dental coverage of children whose
family incomes exceed the federal poverty level.
(((21))) (20) For purposes of RCW 74.09.800(2), (($9,549,000))
$8,017,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2004, (($10,779,000)) $8,454,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and (($37,753,000)) $30,588,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to provide
prenatal care services to low-income women who are not eligible to
receive such services under the medical assistance program, Title XIX
of the federal social security act. If the department is unable to
secure federal matching funds under Title XXI of the social security
act, the department shall take all actions necessary to manage the
program within these appropriated levels.
(21) $20,279,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2004, $16,430,000 of the health services account for fiscal
year 2005, and $36,709,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for additional disproportionate share hospital
payments to public hospital districts. The payments shall be
conditioned upon a contractual commitment by the participating public
hospital districts to make an intergovernmental transfer to the health
services account equal to at least 91 percent of the additional
disproportionate share payment. The participating districts shall
retain no more than $6,600,000 of the additional disproportionate share
payment.

Sec. 210 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,180,000))
$10,172,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,202,000))
$10,191,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,803,000))
$85,804,000
General Fund--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $440,000
Telecommunication Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $891,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($106,625,000))
$107,498,000

Sec. 211 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,926,000))
$37,620,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,968,000))
$28,824,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,752,000))
$52,021,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,444,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,152,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $395,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($108,456,000))
$126,266,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $467,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $769,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $1,236,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for transition costs associated with the downsizing
effort at Fircrest school. The department shall organize the
downsizing effort so as to minimize disruption to clients, employees,
and the developmental disabilities program. The employees responsible
for the downsizing effort shall report to the assistant secretary of
the aging and disability services administration. Within the funds
provided in this subsection, the department shall:
(a) Determine appropriate ways to maximize federal reimbursement
during the downsizing process;
(b) Meet and confer with representatives of affected employees on
how to assist employees who need help to relocate to other state jobs
or to transition to private sector positions;
(c) Review opportunities for state employees to continue caring for
clients by assisting them in developing privately operated community
residential alternatives. In conducting the review, the department
will examine efforts in this area pursued by other states as part of
institutional downsizing efforts;
(d) Keep appropriate committees of the legislature apprised,
through regular reports and periodic e-mail updates, of the development
of and revisions to the work plan regarding this downsizing effort; and
(e) Provide a preliminary transition plan to the fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature by January 1, 2004. The transition plan
shall include recommendations on ways to continue to provide some of
the licensed professional services offered at Fircrest school to
clients being served in community settings.
(2) $10,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely for one-time expenditures needed to meet
the federally required level for state supplemental payments (SSP).
The department shall transfer appropriate portions of this amount to
other programs within the agency to accomplish this purpose. The
department shall not initiate new services with this funding that will
cause total future SSP expenditures to exceed the required annual
maintenance-of-effort level.
(3) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for a contract for expanded
services of the teamchild project.
(4) $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the continued implementation
of the juvenile violence prevention grant program established in
section 204, chapter 309, Laws of 1999.
(5) The entire domestic violence prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2481 (marriage license fees). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(6) If, by June 1, 2004, the department has not completed the
computer system updates required to implement RCW 41.56.113, the
department is subject to penalties as described in this subsection.
For each day after May 31, 2004, that the department fails to make the
deductions required by RCW 41.56.113(2)(a) as per the agreement entered
into by the department pursuant to RCW 41.56.113(3)(a), $2,500 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 and $2,500 of
the general fund--federal appropriation provided in this section shall
lapse.

Sec. 212 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,011,000))
$43,454,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,011,000))
$43,493,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,994,000))
$43,321,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($126,016,000))
$130,268,000

Sec. 213 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
State Health Care Authority Administrative
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,665,000))
$18,942,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($415,459,000))
$416,085,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,050,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,307,000))
$3,875,000
Medical Aid Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($128,000))
$213,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($436,559,000))
$444,165,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely to increase funding for health care services provided through
local community clinics.
(2) $6,000,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
is provided solely to increase the number of persons not eligible for
medicaid receiving dental care from nonprofit community clinics, and
for interpreter services to support dental and medical services for
persons for whom interpreters are not available from any other source.
(((2))) (3) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is
provided solely to support the operation of an innovative clinic model
for the delivery of health services to uninsured or publicly insured
persons that is located in an urban underserved area and operated as a
department or subsidiary of a hospital located in that underserved
area; has been in operation for fewer than six months as of the
effective date of this act; utilizes an innovative service delivery
model that relies upon midlevel practitioners, volunteers, and students
enrolled in health education programs and offers group visits for
common conditions; and has a sliding fee schedule that assumes that
every patient of the clinic will make some contribution towards the
cost of his or her care.
(4) In order to maximize the number of enrollees who can be
supported within appropriated amounts, the health care authority is
directed to make modifications that will reduce the actuarial value of
the basic health plan benefit by approximately 18 percent effective
January 1, 2004. Modifications may include changes in enrollee premium
obligations, enrollee cost-sharing, benefits, and incentives to access
preventative services. To the extent that additional actions are
needed in order to operate within appropriated funds, new enrollments
to the program shall be limited in a manner consistent with the
authority's September 6, 2001, administrative policy on basic health
plan enrollment management.
(((3))) (5) Within funds appropriated in this section and sections
205 and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents and home
care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(((4))) (6) The health care authority shall require organizations
and individuals which are paid to deliver basic health plan services
and which choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health
plan to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be
due from the sponsored enrollees.
(((5))) (7) The administrator shall take at least the following
actions to assure that persons participating in the basic health plan
are eligible for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require
submission of income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all
applicants; (b) check employment security payroll records at least once
every twelve months on all enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose
income as indicated by payroll records exceeds that upon which their
subsidy is based to document their current income as a condition of
continued eligibility; (d) require enrollees for whom employment
security payroll records cannot be obtained to document their current
income at least once every six months; (e) not reduce gross family
income for self-employed persons by noncash-flow expenses such as, but
not limited to, depreciation, amortization, and home office deductions,
as defined by the United States internal revenue service; and (f)
pursue repayment and civil penalties from persons who have received
excessive subsidies, as provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(((6))) (8) To decrease administrative burdens for providers and
plans participating in state purchased health care programs, the
administrator, the assistant secretary for the medical assistance
administration of the department of social and health services, and the
director of the department of labor and industries, in collaboration
with health carriers, health care providers, and the office of the
insurance commissioner shall, within available resources:
(a) Improve the timeliness of claims processing and the
distribution of medical assistance program fee schedules, and more
clearly define the scope of coverage under managed care contracts;
(b) Improve the capacity for electronic billing and claims
submission and provide electronic access to eligibility, benefits, and
exclusion information;
(c) Develop clear audit and data requirements for contracting
managed health care plans and improve consistency between claims
processing and published fee schedules;
(d) Conform billing codes with providers and between agencies with
national and regional standards wherever possible; and
(e) Take steps to implement cost-effective measures pursuant to
this section by December 2004, and on or before December 1, 2003,
provide a progress report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature on the feasibility of implementation and any fiscal
constraints or regulatory or statutory barriers.
(9) $145,000 of the health services account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2469 (Canadian prescription
drug purchasing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $150,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
is provided for fiscal year 2005 solely to conduct a study and prepare
recommendations to the legislature related to health care financing,
cost containment, and quality improvement in the state's health care
system. The report and recommendations must be submitted to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1,
2005.
(a) The study shall be conducted jointly by the administrator, the
department of health, and the state board of health. An advisory
committee shall be established that includes representatives of at
least the following individuals or entities: Business; labor
organizations; consumers, including people with disabilities;
communities of color; health care providers and facilities; health
insurance carriers; academic or health care research institutions;
health care ethicists; the department of social and health services;
and the department of labor and industries. The committee shall be
actively consulted with in conducting the study and preparing
recommendations.
(b) The following issues shall be examined and addressed in the
study and recommendations:
(i) Assessing Washington state's health care needs and available
resources. In assessing health care needs, improving health status and
health outcomes for residents of Washington state should be the primary
focus;
(ii) The impacts of the employer-based health insurance system upon
the availability and affordability of health insurance coverage in
Washington state. The impacts to be considered include but are not
limited to:
(A) Trends in employer sponsored health insurance coverage among
large and small employers, including an assessment of the impact of the
failure of some large employers to provide health insurance coverage to
their workers on the competitive environment between employers that do
provide coverage and those that do not;
(B) The appropriate role of medical assistance programs, the state
childrens health insurance program, and the basic health plan as a
source of health care coverage for low-wage workers whose employers do
not offer health insurance coverage, and the fiscal impact of that
coverage upon the state;
(iii) Containing the cost of health care coverage;
(iv) Improving the quality and effectiveness of the health care
system through increased focus upon evidence-based medicine, proven
preventive health services, management of chronic disease,
implementation of proven patient safety strategies, and other
appropriate mechanisms;
(v) Decreasing health disparities between racial and ethnic groups;
(vi) Increasing the transparency of health care costs and the
relative efficiency with which care is delivered; and
(vii) Consolidation of existing state programs to achieve
efficiencies where possible.
(c) To provide more information related to the role of state funded
health insurance programs in covering low-wage workers, the
administrator, in consultation with the department of social and health
services, shall provide a report to the legislature by February 1,
2005, on employers whose employees are receiving benefits through the
basic health plan or medical assistance for themselves or their
dependents. The report must include information on the size of the
employers, the number of employees who are receiving benefits through
the basic health plan or medical assistance; the number of enrollees
who are spouses or dependents of their employees; whether the employers
offer health benefits to their employees; and the cost to the state of
providing basic health plan or medical assistance for their employees
and enrolled dependents.

Sec. 214 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Death Investigations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,078,000))
$18,128,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,686,000))
$18,736,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $124,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely to allow the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs to increase the technical and training
support provided to the local criminal justice agencies on the new
incident-based reporting system and the national incident-based
reporting system.
(2) $136,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely to allow the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys to enhance the training provided to criminal
justice personnel.
(3) $65,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for regionalized training programs for
school district and local law enforcement officials on school safety
issues.
(4) $250,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs for staffing and support of a web site to
provide information about sex offenders.
(5) $50,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2556 (criminal background checks). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 215 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,863,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,860,000))
$6,437,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,391,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,462,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($693,000))
$717,000
Electrical License Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,966,000))
$29,589,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,544,000))
$2,557,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,411,000))
$2,477,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($187,843,000))
$188,181,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,396,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($186,724,000))
$186,408,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,960,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,451,000))
$1,490,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,807,000))
$2,878,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($472,399,000))
$473,834,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((2))) (1) $90,000 of the electrical license account--state
appropriation and $206,000 of the plumbing certificate account--state
appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5713 (electrical contractors). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2003, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((3) $378,000)) (2) $578,000 of the accident account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the purpose of contracting with
medical laboratories, health care providers, and other appropriate
entities to provide cholinesterase medical monitoring of farm workers
who handle cholinesterase-inhibiting pesticides, and to collect and
analyze data related to such monitoring.
(3) $453,000 of the accident account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the purpose of reimbursing agricultural employers
for the costs of training, recordkeeping, and travel related to
cholinesterase medical monitoring of farm workers who handle
cholinesterase-inhibiting pesticides.

Sec. 216 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,527,000))
$1,531,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,528,000))
$1,536,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,066,000))
$3,078,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,579,000))
$2,588,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,579,000))
$2,596,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $309,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,668,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,135,000))
$7,161,000

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,473,000))
$7,380,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,890,000))
$6,020,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,207,000))
$27,365,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,822,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,392,000))
$68,587,000

Sec. 217 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($412,000))
$360,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($259,000))
$471,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($671,000))
$831,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((1) $150,000)) $98,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 ((is)) and $212,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the design
and development of the home care provider registry mandated by
Initiative Measure No. 775.
(((2) Pursuant to RCW 74.39A.300(1), the legislature rejects the
collective bargaining agreement entered into by the home care quality
authority and the exclusive bargaining representative of individual
providers under chapter 74.39A RCW (Initiative Measure No. 775).))

Sec. 218 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,143,000))
$57,853,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,224,000))
$60,375,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,289,000))
$37,389,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($348,897,000))
$392,762,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,601,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,490,000
Health Professions Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,097,000))
$40,571,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,558,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,728,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,498,000))
$15,654,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($633,000))
$1,053,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,359,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $258,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,761,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,718,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,806,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,510,000
Patient Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($729,616,000))
$779,918,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department or any successor agency is authorized to raise
existing fees charged for health care assistants, commercial shellfish
paralytic shellfish poisoning, commercial shellfish licenses, ((and))
newborn screening programs, psychiatrically impaired children and youth
residential treatment and in-home services, in excess of the fiscal
growth factor established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary,
to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation
levels in this section.
(2) $1,337,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year 2004
appropriation and $1,338,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year
2005 appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound water work plan and agency action items, DOH-01, DOH-02,
DOH-03, and DOH-04.
(3) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive,
and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not
anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require
expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated
unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services
authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(4) (($21,650,000)) $24,350,000 of the health services account -- state appropriation is provided solely for the state's program of
universal access to essential childhood vaccines. The department shall
utilize all available federal funding before expenditure of these
funds.
(5) $2,984,000 of the general fund--local appropriation is provided
solely for development and implementation of an internet-based system
for preparing and retrieving death certificates as provided in
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5545 (chapter 241, Laws of 2003, web-based
vital records).
(6) The department of social and health services, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, and the department of health
should jointly identify opportunities for early intervention and
prevention activities that can help prevent disease and reduce oral
health issues among children. Disease prevention among infants at the
age of one year and among children entering the K-12 education system
provides cost-effective ways to avoid higher health care spending later
in life.
(7) $92,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $19,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $987,000 of the general fund--local appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1338
(municipal water rights). If Substitute House Bill No. 1338 is not
enacted by June 30, 2003, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to enhance and protect basin flows to
implement Substitute House Bill No. 2396 (instream flows). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(9) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the department to implement a
multiyear pilot project in Yakima and Franklin counties for persons
with household income at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty
level who are ineligible for family planning services through the
medicaid program. Individuals who will be served under the pilot
include women who have never been pregnant, are not currently pregnant,
or are beyond the family planning extension period allowed for first
steps program eligibility. It is anticipated that the pilot project
will serve approximately 2,000 women annually. The department will
provide a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2005.
(10) $188,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to increase the regulation of sales of
precursor drugs that are often used to illegally manufacture
methamphetamine to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2844
(ephedrine). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $83,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to expand the scope of practice for naturopaths to
implement Substitute House Bill No. 1862 (naturopaths). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(12) $100,000 of the patient safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely to support efforts to reduce medical errors and enhance
patient safety to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
2786 (patient safety practices). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $203,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a task force on improvement of
health professions discipline to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2834 (health profession discipline). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(14) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to develop and implement best practices in
preventative health care for children. The department and the kids get
care program of public health - Seattle and King county will work in
collaboration with local health care agencies to disseminate strategic
interventions that are focused on evidence-based best practices for
improving health outcomes in children and saving health care costs. A
report shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by June 30, 2005, on the program effectiveness and cost
savings. This funding shall be matched by an equal amount of local
funding.

Sec. 219 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act
shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified herein.
However, after May 1, 2004, after approval by the director of financial
management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the
department may transfer general fund -- state appropriations for fiscal
year 2004 between programs. The director of financial management shall
notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing prior to approving any deviations from
appropriation levels.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,317,000))
$36,534,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,473,000))
$38,942,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,657,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,473,000))
$79,159,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (($3,250,000))
(a) $700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 ((is)) and $2,550,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the
continuation of phase two of the department's offender-based tracking
system replacement project. ((This)) The amounts ((is)) are
conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of section
902 of this act.
(b) $107,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2661 (information on fugitives). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection (b) shall
lapse.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($441,122,000))
$458,402,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($449,520,000))
$477,061,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,746,000))
$4,090,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,008,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($902,396,000))
$942,561,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as recovery
of costs.
(b) The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership
program at the Washington corrections center for women at a level at
least equal to that provided in the 1995-97 biennium.
(c) The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel
reductions with the least possible impact on correctional custody
staff, community custody staff, and correctional industries. For the
purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff means employees
responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.
(d) During the 2003-05 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(e) For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the
department of corrections is authorized to enter into financial
contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the purposes
indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
This authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option
to purchase or lease-purchase approximately 50 work release beds in
facilities throughout the state for $3,500,000.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,952,000))
$87,626,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,200,000))
$88,631,000
Public Safety and Education
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,492,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($163,644,000))
$191,749,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel
reductions with the least possible impact on correctional custody
staff, community custody staff, and correctional industries. For the
purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff means employees
responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the department of corrections
to contract with the institute for public policy for responsibilities
assigned in chapter 196, Laws of 1999 (offender accountability act) and
sections 7 through 12 of chapter 197, Laws of 1999 (drug offender
sentencing).
(c) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely for a pilot project to test the
availability, reliability, and effectiveness of an electronic
monitoring system based on passive data logging global positioning
system technology for monitoring sex offenders.
(i) The department of corrections shall work with the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs and the department of social
and health services to establish the pilot project.
(ii) The pilot project shall be of sufficient size to test the
reliability of the technology in a variety of geographical
circumstances including both urban and rural locations.
(iii) The pilot project shall test the system using sex or
kidnapping offenders under the jurisdiction of the department of
corrections and persons civilly committed under chapter 71.09 RCW under
a variety of supervision circumstances. Offenders included in the
pilot project shall be offenders who have been classified as level
three offenders by the end of sentence review committee and over whom
the department of corrections has authority to establish conditions of
supervision or persons who have been ordered to be electronically
monitored by the court in a proceeding under chapter 71.09 RCW and who
have been classified as level three offenders by the end of sentence
review committee.
(iv) The pilot project shall specifically examine the feasibility
of electronic monitoring for level three sex offenders or kidnapping
offenders who register as homeless or transient.
(v) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the
governor on the results of the pilot project by January 31, 2004. The
report must include, but is not limited to:
(A) The availability of the technology, including a description of
the system used and a discussion of the various types of global
positioning system-based monitoring available and appropriate for a sex
offender population;
(B) Any geographic or weather-related limitations posed by the
technology;
(C) The reliability, including the false alarm rate of the
technology;
(D) Any training requirements for department of corrections staff
or supervised persons;
(E) Any distinctions in effectiveness or feasibility for different
supervision populations;
(F) Costs, including equipment costs, monitoring fees, and any
changes to department of corrections staffing levels;
(G) The ability of the subjects of the pilot to pay for daily
and/or equipment costs;
(H) The rate of loss or damage to equipment used by the subjects of
the pilot project; and
(I) Limitations in the pilot project to determining the answers to
the items in this subsection (3)(c)(v).
The association shall make a recommendation in the report about the
frequency and timing of monitoring reports, and the need for further
study of the issue to determine efficacy and reliability.
(d) $67,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2661 (information on fugitives). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection (d) shall
lapse.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $626,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($626,000))
$663,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,252,000))
$1,289,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $110,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $110,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for transfer to the jail
industries board. The board shall use the amounts provided only for
administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and technical assistance
associated with advising cities and counties in developing, promoting,
and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient offender work
programs.
(b) $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3026 (correctional industries). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection
(b) shall lapse.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,099,000))
$26,259,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,134,000))
$26,288,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,233,000))
$52,547,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $70,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 is provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 3026
(correctional industries). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 220 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $267,586,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,103,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($184,878,000))
$191,331,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,721,000))
$12,721,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,184,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($520,472,000))
$524,925,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $100,000 of the administrative contingency
account appropriation is provided solely to ((establish an advisory
partnership on the Washington manufacturing sector as outlined in
Substitute House Bill No. 2164 (manufacturing advisory partnership) and
recommended in the report entitled manufacturing in Washington state,
1990-2002: trends and implications for the industry and state)) the
employment security department for manufacturing economic research and
surveys with findings reported to relevant legislative committees,
business, and labor.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 301 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,464,000))
$35,762,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,263,000))
$36,312,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,143,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,696,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,760,000
Flood Control Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,019,000))
$2,159,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($552,000))
$725,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,714,000
State Drought Preparedness Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,708,000))
$1,858,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $593,000
Site Closure Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $629,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,252,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $356,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,348,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($59,268,000))
$59,704,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $353,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,878,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,205,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,710,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $784,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,185,000))
$4,535,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,654,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,745,000))
$7,945,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,693,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,503,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($380,000))
$387,000
Vehicle Tire Recycling Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,735,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,867,000))
$1,901,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($301,337,000))
$309,639,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,757,696 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $2,757,696 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, $394,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation,
$2,581,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation, $217,830
of the water quality account--state appropriation, $322,976 of the
state drought preparedness account--state appropriation, $3,748,220 of
the water quality permit account--state appropriation, and $704,942 of
the oil spill prevention account are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items
DOE-01, DOE-02, DOE-04, DOE-05, DOE-06, DOE-07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.
(2) $4,059,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely for methamphetamine lab clean-up activities.
(3) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action
item UW-02 through a contract with the University of Washington's sea
grant program to develop an educational program targeted to small
spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports,
and marinas.
(4) (($1,000,000)) $600,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and (($1,000,000)) $1,400,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided
solely for shoreline grants to local governments to implement
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6012 (shoreline management), chapter 262,
Laws of 2003.
(5) Fees approved by the department of ecology in the 2003-05
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(6) $200,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract with Washington State
University cooperative extension program to provide statewide
coordination and support for coordinated resource management.
(7) $100,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1002 (mercury), chapter 260, Laws of 2003. If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(8) The department of ecology is authorized to take one of the
following actions related to the grant awarded in the 2001-03 biennium
to Lincoln county for the Negro Creek flood control project, flood
control assistance account program grant G0200049: (a) Carry forward
to the 2003-05 biennium any unspent portion of the grant, or (b) extend
the time of performance for the grant contract to the end of the 2003-2005 biennium.
(9) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the department
shall convene and provide staff support for a water resources
administration and funding task force. The task force shall develop
proposals for and recommend several options for funding the state's
water resource programs, including both operating programs and capital
costs for water program implementation. The task force must report its
findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 15, 2004.
(10) $436,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to: (a) Implement the mercury
chemical action plan; (b) fund rulemaking to select future chemicals
for action plans; and (c) provide ongoing funding for the development
and implementation of future chemical action plans. Any pesticide with
a valid registration on or after the effective date of this act issued
by the environmental protection agency under the federal insecticide,
fungicide and rodenticide act, 7 U.S.C. 136 et seq, or any fertilizer
regulated under the Washington fertilizer act, chapter 15.54 RCW, shall
not be included in a persistent bioaccumulative toxin rulemaking
process, list, or chemical action plan undertaken by the department of
ecology.
(11) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to support the initial phase of the
federal United States Geological Survey study of the Spokane
Valley-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.
(12) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to pursue resolution of federal and tribal
rights to water in Washington state consistent with comprehensive state
water resources planning under chapter 90.54 RCW. Of this amount,
$200,000 is provided solely for mediation efforts with the Lummi Nation
and $200,000 is provided solely for state participation in a federal
pilot process to determine and quantify the water rights of the Tulalip
Tribes.
(13) $100,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 3112
(marine fuel facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $100,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 3020 (oil spill
management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $1,735,000 of the vehicle tire recycling account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
3054 (restoring the vehicle tire fee). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2488 (electronic products). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2004, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $2,012,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for (a) establishing instream flows by
rule for main stem rivers and their key tributaries in the state
through application of standards adopted pursuant to chapters 90.22 and
90.54 RCW; securing independent scientific review of the state's
instream flow program; investing in the streamflow gauges and related
information systems to assist in implementation of watershed plans, and
studying the recharge management of flood waters; (b) working with
counties that have existing geographic information systems to map
existing water rights and document current ownership, compiling
existing watershed planning unit assessments to document current use of
water in comparison to existing paper water rights, evaluating
alternative administrative systems for determining existing water
rights; and (c) assign one water master to a basin that has been
adjudicated.
(18) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely for a one-time payment to settle all
claims in a suit against the state in the Envirotest v. Department of
Ecology, Thurston Co. Sup. Ct. Case No. 02-2-00255-0.
(19) $350,000 of the hazardous waste assistance account
appropriation is provided solely for rulemaking to require closure
plans, liability coverage, and financial assurances for hazardous waste
management facilities.
(20) $16,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $254,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are contingent on the enactment of House Bill No. 3202
(water rights fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 302 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,986,000))
$30,015,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,976,000))
$30,034,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,666,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,079,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $285,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,790,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $332,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,769,000))
$34,431,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,993,000))
$104,042,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2003-05 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $8,000 of the winter recreation program account -- state
appropriation are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the
Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $191,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
and agency action item P+RC-02.
(4) At each state park at which a parking fee is collected, the
state parks and recreation commission shall provide notice that the
revenue collected from the parking fee shall be used to fund
expenditures to maintain and improve the state park system.
(5) $72,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely for one-time and ongoing computer
system improvements and technical support.

Sec. 303 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,246,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,256,000))
$1,481,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,983,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,608,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $691,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $254,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,260,000))
$24,610,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $16,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the forest and fish agreement
rules. These funds will be passed through to the department of natural
resources and the department of fish and wildlife.
(2) $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the operation and maintenance
of the natural resources data portal.
(3) $812,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $813,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $1,625,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided to the salmon recovery funding board for distribution to
lead entities. The board may establish policies to require
coordination of funding requests from lead entities and regional
recovery boards to ensure that recovery efforts are synchronized. At
the discretion of the board, funding shall be concentrated in
watersheds within the highest priority salmon recovery regions as
defined by the statewide strategy to recover salmon. The board shall
also coordinate funding decisions with the northwest power planning
council to ensure maximum efficiency and investment return.
(4) $234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement priority
recommendations developed by the monitoring oversight committee as
directed by RCW 77.85.210. Within these funds, activity shall be
directed to improve monitoring oversight within watersheds, enhance
data coordination and access among recovery partners, and produce a
state watershed health report card.
(5) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 and $125,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
are provided solely for implementation of a statewide biodiversity
conservation strategy.
(6) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2275 (habitat conservation program). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 304 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($923,000))
$934,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($960,000))
$998,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,883,000))
$1,932,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $30,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to
implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5776 (review of permit
decisions), chapter 393, Laws of 2003.

Sec. 305 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,234,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,245,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,162,000))
$2,412,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,641,000))
$6,891,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $247,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $247,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item CC-01.
(2) $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $121,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1418 (drainage infrastructure), chapter 391,
Laws of 2003.
(3) $250,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation is
provided solely for grants to conservation districts. Grants shall
provide for education, outreach, and technical assistance programs to
assist owners and operators of concentrated animal feeding operations
with compliance issues related to federal concentrated animal feeding
operations requirements and the department of agriculture's livestock
nutrient management program.

Sec. 306 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,453,000))
$41,600,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,179,000))
$40,494,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,632,000))
$40,316,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,300,000))
$29,420,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $501,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,620,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $562,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,392,000))
$3,467,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,568,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,138,000))
$58,922,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,216,000))
$29,532,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,158,000))
$10,038,000
((Game)) Special Wildlife Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,949,000))
$2,068,000
((Game)) Special Wildlife Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,598,000))
$8,720,000
((Game)) Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($350,000))
$450,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $981,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($137,000))
$411,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($276,249,000))
$278,185,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,355,714 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $1,355,713 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $402,000 of the wildlife account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget
Sound work plan and agency action items DFW-01 through DFW-06.
(2) $225,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $225,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $550,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery reform
recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(3) (($850,000)) $1,016,000 of the wildlife account--state
appropriation is provided solely for stewardship and maintenance needs
on agency-owned lands and water access sites.
(4) $900,000 of the wildlife fund--state appropriation is provided
solely for wetland restoration activities for migratory waterfowl by
providing landowner incentives to create or maintain waterfowl habitat
and management activities.
(5) $2,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation is provided for cooperative volunteer projects.
(6) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(7) The department shall develop and implement an activity-based
costing system. The system shall be operational no later than January
1, 2004.
(8) $400,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement the department's information systems
strategic plan to include continued implementation of a personal
computer leasing plan, an upgrade of computer back-up systems, systems
architecture assessment, and network security analysis.
(9) Within funds provided, the department shall make available
enforcement and biological staff to respond and take appropriate action
to ensure public safety in response to public complaints regarding bear
and cougar.
(10) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for staffing and operation of the
Tennant Lake interpretive center.
(11) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $77,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1095 (small forest landowners), chapter 311, Laws of
2003.
(12) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1338 (municipal water rights). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(13) $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for economic adjustment assistance
to fishermen pursuant to the 1999 Pacific salmon treaty agreement.
(14) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(15) $75,000 of the recreational fisheries enhancement account and
$75,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement additional selective recreational fisheries to
include one additional fishery each in eastern and western Washington.
The department shall determine the eastern Washington fishery, and the
western Washington fishery shall be for Lake Washington sockeye.
(16) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2920 (special economic recreational fisheries). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(17) $16,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2621
(razor clam license). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $417,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2431 (Dungeness
crab card). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $112,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to buy back purse seine fishing licenses.
(20) $180,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to test deer and elk for chronic wasting disease and to
document the extent of swan lead poisoning. Of this amount, $65,000 is
provided solely to document the extent of swan lead poisoning and to
begin environmental cleanup.
(21) $122,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to reimburse the department of natural resources for
fire suppression costs incurred on department of fish and wildlife
lands.

Sec. 307 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,307,000))
$54,329,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,233,000))
$35,196,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,809,000))
$5,116,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,482,000
Forest Development Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,060,000))
$52,210,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,028,000))
$4,029,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,760,000))
$2,761,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,884,000))
$6,925,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,391,000))
$70,618,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,293,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,479,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,311,000
Natural Resource Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,868,000))
$1,872,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,130,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($223,844,000))
$250,560,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $1,006,950 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget
Sound work plan and agency action items DNR-01, DNR-02, and DNR-04.
(2) $908,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $910,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(3) (($1,158,000)) $24,674,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004, $8,358,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and $7,200,000 of the
disaster response account--state appropriation are provided solely for
emergency fire suppression. One-time funding is provided for incurred
and anticipated emergency fire suppression costs during fiscal year
2004, in excess of the department's existing fire suppression
appropriations. Funding provided in this subsection shall not be
allocated to cover any portion of agency indirect and administrative
expenses.
(4) $582,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for spartina control.
(5) Fees approved by the board of natural resources in the 2003-05
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(6) The department shall prepare a report of actual and planned
expenditures by task and activity from all fund sources for all aspects
of the forest and fish program for the 2001-03 and 2003-05 biennia.
The report shall be submitted to the director of financial management
and the legislative fiscal committees by August 31, 2003.
(7) Authority to expend funding for acquisition of technology
equipment and software associated with development of a new revenue
management system is conditioned on compliance with section 902 of this
act.
(8) $1,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to meet its
obligations with the U.S. environmental protection agency for the
clean-up of Commencement Bay.
(9) For the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, the department has revised the
methodology by which administrative costs of the department are
allocated among the state general fund and the various dedicated funds
and accounts from which the department receives appropriations. The
legislature recognizes that the revised methodology represents a fair
and equitable allocation of costs under state law and accounting rules.
The legislature further finds that retroactive application of the
revised methodology is neither practical nor desirable.
(10) The department of natural resources shall provide a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature, the office of financial
management, and the board of natural resources concerning the costs and
effectiveness of the contract harvesting program as authorized by
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5074 (contract harvesting), chapter
313, Laws of 2003. The report shall be submitted by December 31, 2006,
and shall include the following information:
(a) Number of sales conducted through contract harvesting;
(b) For each sale conducted, the (i) number of board feet sold;
(ii) stumpage and pond prices; (iii) difference in revenues received
compared to revenues that would have accrued through noncontract
harvest sales, and the distribution of revenues to the contract
harvesting revolving account, and to applicable management and trust
accounts; and (iv) total cost to conduct the contract harvest, by fund
and object of expenditure; and
(c) Other costs and benefits attributable to contract harvesting.
(11) $208,000 of the general fund--state appropriation of fiscal
year 2004 and $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1095 (small forest landowners), chapter 311, Laws of
2003.
(12) The department of natural resources shall not close Sahara
Creek facility, campground, or trailhead. The appropriations in this
section are deemed sufficient to provide service for these recreational
opportunities.
(13) $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to compensate the forest board
trust for a portion of the lease to the Crescent television improvement
district consistent with RCW 79.12.055.
(14) $2,700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely to the department of natural resources to
acquire approximately 232 acres of land and timber in Klickitat county
from the SDS lumber company. Expenditure of the moneys provided in
this subsection shall not be made until the SDS lumber company accepts
the land and timber acquisition as full and complete settlement of the
current litigation brought by the SDS lumber company against the state
and the litigation is dismissed, with prejudice. The land and timber
acquired with the funding in this subsection shall be managed for the
benefit of the common schools. By June 30, 2004, if the department has
not recovered through trust asset management the state's capital
investment from the land acquisition provided in this subsection, the
department shall seek reimbursement from the federal government.
(15) $265,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation is provided solely for developing a pilot project to
study the feasibility of geoduck aquaculture on both intertidal and
subtidal lands in the state of Washington.
(16) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely for habitat restoration work in the Loomis
natural resource area.
(17) $440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for legal defense costs in Pacific
Sound Resources v. Burlington Northern Santa Fe Railroad et al.
(18) $450,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to maintain department-managed trails,
campsites, and other areas or lands that are open for public use. The
department shall ensure that these sites will remain open and operating
at their current level of service.
(19) $48,000 of the forest development account--state appropriation
and $113,000 of the resources management cost account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 2506 (allowing property owners to acquire access to
landlocked parcels across public lands). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2004, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $87,000 of the forest development account--state
appropriation, $87,000 of the resources management cost account--state
appropriation, and $4,000 of the agricultural college trust management
account--state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2753 (state-owned forest land). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(21) $40,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for the department to (a) calculate the rent for
DNR-leased marinas based on a percentage of a marina's income and (b)
recommend an appropriate formula to the 2005 legislature.

Sec. 308 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,444,000))
$7,636,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,244,000))
$11,491,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,068,000
General fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,110,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,942,000))
$2,027,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $692,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,580,000))
$2,780,000
Water Quality Permit Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,245,000))
$35,969,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound work plan and agency action item WSDA-01.
(2) Fees and assessments approved by the department in the 2003-05
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(3) $165,000 of the water quality permit account--state
appropriation and $692,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5889 (animal feeding operations), chapter 325, Laws of
2003.
(4) $53,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1754 (chickens), chapter 397, Laws of 2003.
(5) $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for animal identification, food
safety, and commercial feed inspection programs.
(6) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely for response costs to the discovery of
bovine spongiform encephalopathy in a Washington dairy cow.
(7) $630,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the "from the heart of Washington"
campaign, southeast Asia/China trade representatives, and for the small
farm and direct marketing program.
(8) $85,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for spartina eradication efforts in Willapa Bay and
Grays Harbor.
(9) $330,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to contract with Washington State
University for research and development activities related to asparagus
harvesting and automation technology.
(10) $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the purchase of agricultural products
packing equipment. The department shall negotiate an appropriate
agreement with the agricultural industry for the use of the equipment.

Sec. 309 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($984,000))
$808,000

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 401 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,986,000))
$5,085,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,988,000))
$4,978,000
Architects' License Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($696,000))
$706,000
Cemetery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($235,000))
$249,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,025,000))
$2,938,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,111,000))
$7,048,000
Master License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,110,000))
$8,922,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,987,000))
$2,837,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($277,000))
$275,000
Real Estate Appraisers Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($927,000))
$1,041,000
Geologist's Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,000))
$21,000
Funeral Directors and Embalmers Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($521,000))
$532,000
Washington Real Estate Research Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($308,000))
$302,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,207,000))
$34,994,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is the policy of the state
of Washington that the cost of each professional, occupational, or
business licensing program be fully borne by the members of that
profession, occupation, or business. For each licensing program
covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall set fees at levels
sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering the licensing
program, including any costs associated with policy enhancements funded
in the 2003-05 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the
2003-05 fiscal biennium, the department may increase fees in excess of
the fiscal growth factor if the increases are necessary to fully fund
the costs of the licensing programs.
(2) $95,000 of the real estate appraiser commission account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1897 (real estate appraisers). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $2,000 of the master license account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 3082 (landlord
and tenant disputes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
2313 (bail bond agents). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 402 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,005,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,855,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,240,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $378,000
Death Investigations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,489,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,852,000))
$21,969,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $612,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,649,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,087,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,374,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $436,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $286,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,405,000))
$5,393,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,793,000))
$87,898,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $750,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5176 (fire fighting training). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $200,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTE's in the office of state
fire marshal to exclusively review K-12 construction documents for fire
and life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the
intent of this appropriation to provide these services only to those
districts that are located in counties without qualified review
capabilities.
(3) $376,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for additional DNA testing kits.
(4) $276,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 2532 (modifying commercial driver's license provisions).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
Sec. 501 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) STATE AGENCY OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,772,000))
$11,615,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,761,000))
$11,960,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,921,000))
$26,968,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,454,000))
$50,543,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $10,771,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $10,768,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Within the
amounts provided in this subsection, the superintendent shall recognize
the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have
demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning
requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award. The
students selected for the award must demonstrate understanding through
completion of at least one of the classroom-based civics assessment
models developed by the superintendent of public instruction, and
through leadership in the civic life of their communities. The
superintendent shall select two students from eastern Washington and
two students from western Washington to receive the award, and shall
notify the governor and legislature of the names of the recipients.
(b) $428,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $428,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities.
(c) $416,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and (($416,000)) $537,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator
standards board. Within the amounts provided, the Washington
professional educator standards board (WPESB) shall submit a report
regarding specific implementation strategies to strengthen reading and
mathematics initiatives by improving teacher knowledge and skill
development including: (i) Teacher preparation program approval
standard changes; (ii) teacher certification requirement changes and
the development of new expertise credentials; (iii) state-established
standards to guide the approval of professional development providers
and offerings related to reading and mathematics; and (iv) other
related recommendations. The WPESB shall base the recommendations on
determinations of the status of teacher preparation and professional
development opportunities and work with appropriate parties. The WPESB
shall submit the report to the governor, superintendent of public
instruction, state board of education, and the education and fiscal
committees of the legislature by November 1, 2004.
(d) (($157,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $149,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5012 (charter schools). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2003, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(e))) The department of social and health services, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, and the department of health
should work together to identify opportunities for early intervention
and prevention activities that can help prevent disease and reduce oral
health issues among children. Disease prevention among infants at the
age of one year and among children entering the K-12 education system
provide cost-effective ways to avoid higher health spending later in
life.
(e) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the development of kindergarten
readiness guidelines, in collaboration with the governor's office.
(f) $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
2456 (school employee applicants). If Substitute House Bill No. 2456
is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount in this subsection shall
lapse.
(g) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2406 (tribal history curriculum). If Substitute House Bill
No. 2406 is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount in this subsection
shall lapse.
(h) $48,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
2455 (financial literacy). If Substitute House Bill No. 2455 is not
enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.
(i) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
2596 (children with disabilities). If Substitute House Bill No. 2596
is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount in this subsection shall
lapse.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,966,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,345,000))
$10,179,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,405,000))
$61,656,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,716,000))
$80,801,000

The appropriations in this subsection are provided solely for the
statewide programs specified in this subsection and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) A maximum of $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $2,541,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for
a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as
determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be
dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to
students, health education, and training for school staff.
(ii) A maximum of $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $96,000 of the general fund --
state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for the school
safety center in the office of the superintendent of public instruction
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(A) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(B) The superintendent of public instruction shall participate in
a school safety center advisory committee that includes representatives
of educators, classified staff, principals, superintendents,
administrators, the American society for industrial security, the state
criminal justice training commission, and others deemed appropriate and
approved by the school safety center advisory committee. Members of
the committee shall be chosen by the groups they represent. In
addition, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall appoint representatives of law enforcement to participate on the
school safety center advisory committee. The advisory committee shall
select a chair.
(C) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(iii) A maximum of $100,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $100,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for
a school safety training program provided by the criminal justice
training commission subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(A) The criminal justice training commission with assistance of the
school safety center advisory committee established in section
2(b)(iii) of this section shall develop manuals and curricula for a
training program for all school safety personnel.
(B) The Washington state criminal justice training commission, in
collaboration with the advisory committee, shall provide the school
safety training for all school administrators and school safety
personnel, including school safety personnel hired after the effective
date of this section.
(((v))) (iv) (($13,663,000)) $12,917,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided for safe and drug free schools and
communities grants for drug and violence prevention activities and
strategies.
(((vi))) (v) A maximum of $146,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $146,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for
a nonviolence and leadership training program provided by the institute
for community leadership. The program shall provide the following:
(A) Statewide nonviolence leadership coaches training program for
certification of educational employees and community members in
nonviolence leadership workshops;
(B) Statewide leadership nonviolence student exchanges, training,
and speaking opportunities for student workshop participants; and
(C) A request for proposal process, with up to 80 percent funding,
for nonviolence leadership workshops serving at least 12 school
districts with direct programming in 36 elementary, middle, and high
schools throughout Washington state.
(vi) A maximum of $194,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2005 and $400,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation transferred from the department of health are provided
for a program that provides grants to school districts for media
campaigns promoting sexual abstinence and addressing the importance of
delaying sexual activity, pregnancy, and childbearing until individuals
are ready to nurture and support their children. Grants to the school
districts shall be for projects that are substantially designed and
produced by students. The grants shall require a local private sector
match equal to one-half of the state grant, which may include in-kind
contribution of technical or other assistance from consultants or firms
involved in public relations, advertising, broadcasting, and graphics
or video production or other related fields.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
A maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for K-20
telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to
prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization
of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the
network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced
technical support for the network.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $306,000 of the fiscal year 2004 appropriation and $689,000 of
the fiscal year 2005 appropriation are provided solely for the special
services pilot projects provided by Second Substitute House Bill No.
2012 (special services pilot program). The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall allocate these funds to the
district or districts participating in the pilot program according to
the provisions of section 2 subsection (4) of Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2012, chapter 33, Laws of 2003.
(ii) A maximum of $761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of (($757,000)) $1,097,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for
alternative certification routes. Funds may be used by the
professional educator standards board to continue existing alternative-route grant programs and to create new alternative-route programs in
regions of the state with service shortages.
(iii) A maximum of $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for operation of
the Cispus environmental learning center.
(iv) A maximum of $1,224,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $1,224,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for
in-service training and educational programs conducted by the Pacific
Science Center.
(v) A maximum of $1,079,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $1,079,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for
the Washington state leadership assistance for science education reform
(LASER) regional partnership coordinated at the Pacific Science Center.
(vi) A maximum of $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $97,000 of the general fund --
state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided to support
vocational student leadership organizations.
(vii) A maximum of $146,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $146,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for
the Washington civil liberties education program.
(viii) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and (($500,000)) $750,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the
Washington state achievers scholarship program. The funds shall be
used to support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and
match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers
scholars.
(ix) (($1,433,000)) $1,650,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for the advanced placement fee program to
increase opportunities for low-income students and under-represented
populations to participate in advanced placement courses and to
increase the capacity of schools to provide advanced placement courses
to students.
(x) (($9,510,000)) $9,953,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for comprehensive school reform demonstration
projects to provide grants to low-income schools for improving student
achievement through adoption and implementation of research-based
curricula and instructional programs.
(xi) (($12,977,000)) $12,941,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for 21st century learning center grants,
providing after-school and inter-session activities for students.
(xii) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for expanding the World War II oral
history project to include the role of women during World War II. The
project shall be conducted in accordance with RCW 28A.300.370.

Sec. 502 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,969,407,000))
$3,976,507,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,977,209,000))
$3,988,248,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,946,616,000))
$7,964,755,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2003-04 and
2004-05 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (d) through (f) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (c) through
(f) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) 49 certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding;
(v) For class size reduction and expanded learning opportunities
under the better schools program, an additional 0.8 certificated
instructional staff units for the 2003-04 school year for grades K-4
per thousand full-time equivalent students. Funds allocated for these
additional certificated units shall not be considered as basic
education funding. The allocation may be used for reducing class sizes
in grades K-4 or to provide additional classroom contact hours for
kindergarten, before-and-after-school programs, weekend school
programs, summer school programs, and intercession opportunities to
assist elementary school students in meeting the essential academic
learning requirements and student assessment performance standards.
For purposes of this subsection, additional classroom contact hours
provided by teachers beyond the normal school day under a supplemental
contract shall be converted to a certificated full-time equivalent by
dividing the classroom contact hours by 900.
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) in
excess of the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the
district documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater
than 54.0 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time
equivalent students in the 2003-04 school year and 53.2 certificated
instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in the
2004-05 school year. For any school district documenting a lower
certificated instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based
on the district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff
ratio achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 54.0 funding ratio in the 2003-04 school year, and up
to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding ratio in the 2004-05 school year, to employ
additional classified instructional assistants assigned to basic
education classrooms in grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a
district's staff ratio under this section, funds used by the district
to employ additional classified instructional assistants shall be
converted to a certificated staff equivalent and added to the
district's actual certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional
classified instructional assistants, for the purposes of this
subsection, shall be determined using the 1989-90 school year as the
base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 54.0 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in the 2003-04 school year and 53.2
certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students in the 2004-05 school year may use allocations generated under
this subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) in excess of that required to
maintain the minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to
employ additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) shall only be expended to
reduce class size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated
instructional funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of
classified instructional assistants;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent
vocational students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic
education and vocational enhancement allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(h) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2003-04 and 2004-05
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each three certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
sixty average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
9.68 percent in the 2003-04 school year and ((9.68)) 9.69 percent in
the 2004-05 school year for certificated salary allocations provided
under subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 12.25 percent in
the 2003-04 school year and 12.25 percent in the 2004-05 school year
for classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (h) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$8,785 per certificated staff unit in the 2003-04 school year and a
maximum of (($8,952)) $8,855 per certificated staff unit in the 2004-05
school year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $21,573 per certificated
staff unit in the 2003-04 school year and a maximum of (($21,983))
$21,746 per certificated staff unit in the 2004-05 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $16,739 per certificated
staff unit in the 2003-04 school year and a maximum of (($17,057))
$16,873 per certificated staff unit in the 2004-05 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $531.09 for the 2003-04 and
2004-05 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of (($6,392,000))
$6,385,000 outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2004
and 2005 as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $495,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2004
and a maximum of (($504,000)) $499,000 may be expended in fiscal year
2005;
(b) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,035,000 may be expended for the 2004 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,035,000 for the 2005 fiscal year;
(c) A maximum of (($353,000)) $351,000 may be expended for school
district emergencies; and
(d) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs.
(10) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 3.4 percent from the 2002-03 school year to the
2003-04 school year and 2.5 percent from the 2003-04 school year to the
2004-05 school year.
(11) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(((12) $159,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,181,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5012 (charter schools). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2003, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.))

Sec. 503 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,511,000))
$28,604,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($116,670,000))
$141,659,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($559,000))
$674,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($145,740,000))
$170,937,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($8,913,000)) $8,944,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and (($20,238,000)) $20,343,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided
solely to provide a salary adjustment for state formula certificated
instructional staff units in their first seven years of service.
Consistent with the statewide certificated instructional staff salary
allocation schedule in section 503 of this act, sufficient funding is
provided to increase the salary of certificated instructional staff
units in the 2003-04 school year and the 2004-05 school year by the
following percentages: Three percent for certificated instructional
staff in their first and second years of service; two and one-half
percent for certificated instructional staff in their third year of
service; one and one-half percent for certificated instructional staff
in their fourth year of service; one percent for certificated
instructional staff in their fifth year of service; and one-half of a
percent for certificated instructional staff in their sixth and seventh
years of service. These increases will take effect September 1, 2003
and September 1, 2004.
(a) In order to receive funding provided in this subsection, school
districts shall certify to the office of superintendent of public
instruction that they will provide the percentage increases in the
amounts specified in this subsection. In cases where a school district
providing the increases in the amounts specified in this subsection
would cause that school district to be out of compliance with RCW
28A.400.200, they may provide salary increases in different amounts but
only to the extent necessary to come into compliance with RCW
28A.400.200. Funds provided in this subsection shall be used
exclusively for providing the percentage increases specified in this
subsection to the certificated staff units in their first seven years
of service and shall not be used to supplant any other state or local
funding for compensation for these staff.
(b) The appropriations include associated incremental fringe
benefit allocations at rates of 9.04 percent for school year 2003-04
and ((9.04)) 9.05 percent for school year 2004-05 for certificated
staff. Increases for general apportionment (basic education) are based
on the salary allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and
503 of this act. Increases for special education result from increases
in each district's basic education allocation per student. Increases
for educational service districts and institutional education programs
are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act.
(2) The appropriations in this section provide salary adjustments
and incremental fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments
as follows:

School Year

2003-04 2004-05

Highly Capable (per formula student) $0.93 $1.89

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $2.45 $4.97

Learning Assistance (per entitlement unit) $0.69 $1.40

(3) (($116,483,000)) $140,976,000 is provided for adjustments to
insurance benefit allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance
benefit allocations is $457.07 per month for the 2003-04 and 2004-05
school years. The appropriations in this section provide for a rate
increase to $481.31 per month for the 2003-04 school year and
(($570.74)) $600.85 per month for the 2004-05 school year at the
following rates:

School Year

2003-04 2004-05

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.22 (($1.03)) $1.31

Highly Capable (per formula student) $1.52 (($7.00)) $8.85

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $3.92 (($18.40)) $23.28

Learning Assistance (per entitlement unit) $3.08 (($14.46)) $18.29

(4) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

Sec. 504 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($201,638,000))
$215,454,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($210,279,000))
$219,899,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($411,917,000))
$435,353,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $768,000 of this fiscal year 2004 appropriation
and a maximum of (($782,000)) $774,000 of the fiscal year 2005
appropriation may be expended for regional transportation coordinators
and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure
that data submitted by school districts for state transportation
funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual
transportation activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2004 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2005 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $39.21 per weighted mile in the 2003-04 school
year and (($39.43)) $39.30 per weighted mile in the 2004-05 school year
exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of
this act. Allocations for transportation of students transported more
than one radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based
on the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by
the per mile reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.
(((5) Beginning with busses purchased on or after July 1, 2003, the
office of superintendent of public instruction shall provide
reimbursement funding to a school district only after the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was
purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or
a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote
based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195. The competitive specifications shall meet
federal motor vehicle safety standards, minimum state specifications as
established by rule by the superintendent, and supported options as
determined by the superintendent in consultation with the regional
transportation coordinators of the educational service districts.))

Sec. 505 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($272,069,000))
$252,128,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($278,269,000))
$258,328,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for state matching money for federal
child nutrition programs.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $100,000 of the 2005 fiscal year appropriation are
provided for summer food programs for children in low-income areas.

Sec. 506 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($433,984,000))
$435,061,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($427,214,000))
$427,763,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($409,637,000))
$425,489,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,270,835,000))
$1,288,313,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall use the
excess cost methodology developed and implemented for the 2001-02
school year using the S-275 personnel reporting system and all related
accounting requirements to ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The S-275 and accounting changes in effect since the 2001-02
school year shall supercede any prior excess cost methodologies and
shall be required of all school districts.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
and federal funds to school districts based on two categories: The
optional birth through age two program for special education eligible
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers, and the mandatory special
education program for special education eligible students ages three to
twenty-one. A "special education eligible student" means a student
receiving specially designed instruction in accordance with a properly
formulated individualized education program.
(5)(a) For the 2003-04 and 2004-05 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers ages birth through two,
multiplied by the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
two enrollment, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
Each district's general fund -- state funded special education
enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent or 12.7 percent. Increases in enrollment percent from 12.7
percent to 13.0 percent shall be funded from the general fund -- federal
appropriation.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, $25,746,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is provided for safety net awards for districts
with demonstrated needs for state special education funding beyond the
amounts provided in subsection (5) of this section. If safety net
awards exceed the amount appropriated in this subsection (8), the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the
state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal and local sources.
Differences in program costs attributable to district philosophy,
service delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate
basis for safety net awards.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(d) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund -- state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(12) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for projects to provide special education students with
appropriate job and independent living skills, including work
experience where possible, to facilitate their successful transition
out of the public school system. The funds provided by this subsection
shall be from federal discretionary grants.
(13) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(14) A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation may be expended by the superintendent for projects
related to use of inclusion strategies by school districts for
provision of special education services. The superintendent shall
prepare an information database on laws, best practices, examples of
programs, and recommended resources. The information may be
disseminated in a variety of ways, including workshops and other staff
development activities.
(15) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of general fund -- state funds allocated under this
program; however, carry over funds shall be expended in the special
education program.

Sec. 507 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE
DISTRICTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,538,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,537,000))
$3,538,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,075,000))
$7,076,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.310.340, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

Sec. 508 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT
ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($162,236,000))
$163,049,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($167,073,000))
$161,945,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($329,309,000))
$324,994,000

Sec. 509 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,596,000))
$18,207,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,092,000))
$18,176,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,688,000))
$36,383,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) (($279,000)) $190,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and (($286,000)) $142,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to
maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related
support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not
sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated
instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following
types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the
department of social and health services for developmentally disabled
juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections,
and programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation
administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 510 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY
CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,597,000))
$6,620,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,614,000))
$6,632,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,211,000))
$13,252,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of $334.89 per funded
student for the 2003-04 school year and (($334.89)) $334.91 per funded
student for the 2004-05 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit
adjustments pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded
students shall be a maximum of two percent of each district's full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $170,000 of the fiscal year 2004 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2005 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.
(4) $90,000 of the fiscal year 2004 appropriation and $90,000 of
the fiscal year 2005 appropriation are provided for the Washington
destination imagination network and future problem-solving programs.

Sec. 511 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR MISCELLANEOUS
PURPOSES UNDER THE ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT AND
THE NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,198,000))
$42,817,000

Sec. 512 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,107,000))
$38,292,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,501,000))
$38,220,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($128,402,000))
$164,037,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($204,010,000))
$240,549,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $310,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $310,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the academic achievement and
accountability commission.
(2) (($16,050,000)) $15,486,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004, (($12,511,000)) $13,414,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and
(($15,455,000)) $12,310,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
are provided solely for development and implementation of the
Washington assessments of student learning((. Of the general fund--state amounts provided:
(a) $222,000 in fiscal year 2004 and $244,000 in fiscal year 2005
are for providing high school students who are not successful in one or
more content areas of the Washington assessment of student learning the
opportunity to retake the test and $75,000 of the fiscal year 2004
appropriation is provided for developing alternative assessments as
provided in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2195 (state academic
standards). If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2195 is not enacted
by June 30, 2003, the amounts in this subsection (a) shall lapse.
(b) $300,000 in fiscal year 2004 is for independent research on the
alignment and technical review of the reading, writing, and science
content areas of the Washington assessment of student learning, as
provided by Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2195 (state academic
standards). If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2195 is not enacted
by June 30, 2003, the amount in this subsection (b) shall lapse))
(WASL), including development and implementation of retake assessments
for high school students who are not successful in one or more content
areas of the WASL, development of alternative assessments or appeals
procedures to implement the certificate of academic achievement, and
independent research on the alignment and technical review of reading,
writing, and science.
(3) $548,000 of the fiscal year 2004 general fund -- state
appropriation and $548,000 of the fiscal year 2005 general fund -- state
appropriation are provided solely for training of paraprofessional
classroom assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom
assistants as provided in RCW 28A.415.310.
(4) $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for mentor teacher assistance,
including state support activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and
28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in
this subsection may be used each fiscal year to operate a mentor
academy to help districts provide effective training for peer mentors.
Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be allocated to school
districts based on the number of first year beginning teachers.
(a) A teacher assistance program is a program that provides to a
first year beginning teacher peer mentor services that include but are
not limited to:
(i) An orientation process and individualized assistance to help
beginning teachers who have been hired prior to the start of the school
year prepare for the start of a school year;
(ii) The assignment of a peer mentor whose responsibilities to the
beginning teacher include but are not limited to constructive feedback,
the modeling of instructional strategies, and frequent meetings and
other forms of contact;
(iii) The provision by peer mentors of strategies, training, and
guidance in critical areas such as classroom management, student
discipline, curriculum management, instructional skill, assessment,
communication skills, and professional conduct. A district may provide
these components through a variety of means including one-on-one
contact and workshops offered by peer mentors to groups, including
cohort groups, of beginning teachers;
(iv) The provision of release time, substitutes, mentor training in
observation techniques, and other measures for both peer mentors and
beginning teachers, to allow each an adequate amount of time to observe
the other and to provide the classroom experience that each needs to
work together effectively;
(v) Assistance in the incorporation of the essential academic
learning requirements into instructional plans and in the development
of complex teaching strategies, including strategies to raise the
achievement of students with diverse learning styles and backgrounds;
and
(vi) Guidance and assistance in the development and implementation
of a professional growth plan. The plan shall include a professional
self-evaluation component and one or more informal performance
assessments. A peer mentor may not be involved in any evaluation under
RCW 28A.405.100 of a beginning teacher whom the peer mentor has
assisted through this program.
(b) In addition to the services provided in (a) of this subsection,
an eligible peer mentor program shall include but is not limited to the
following components:
(i) Strong collaboration among the peer mentor, the beginning
teacher's principal, and the beginning teacher;
(ii) Stipends for peer mentors and, at the option of a district,
for beginning teachers. The stipends shall not be deemed compensation
for the purposes of salary lid compliance under RCW 28A.400.200 and are
not subject to the continuing contract provisions of Title 28A RCW; and
(iii) To the extent that resources are available for this purpose
and that assistance to beginning teachers is not adversely impacted,
the program may serve second year and more experienced teachers who
request the assistance of peer mentors.
(5) $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate a process to
facilitate the evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses to
school districts which includes the following: Creation of a general
listing of the types of available online curriculum courses; a survey
conducted by each regional educational technology support center of
school districts in its region regarding the types of online curriculum
courses desired by school districts; a process to evaluate and
recommend to school districts the best online courses in terms of
curriculum, student performance, and cost; and assistance to school
districts in procuring and providing the courses to students.
(6) $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
provide a continuum of care for children and families to help children
become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall
contain local plans designed collaboratively with community service
providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which
the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible.
Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.
(7) $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the meals for kids program
under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155. In fiscal year 2005, funds
provided in this subsection shall also be used to implement House Bill
No. 2769 (reducing hunger) by providing school districts with grants
for equipment and start-up costs for new meal programs resulting from
the enactment of the bill.
(8) An additional $11,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2005 is provided solely for grants to school districts
to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2769 (reducing
hunger). If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2769 is not
enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(9) $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(((9))) (10) A maximum of $250,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $250,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for
summer accountability institutes offered by the superintendent of
public instruction and the academic achievement and accountability
commission. The institutes shall provide school district staff with
training in the analysis of student assessment data, information
regarding successful district and school teaching models, research on
curriculum and instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve
instruction in reading, mathematics, language arts, and guidance and
counseling. $35,000 of the fiscal year 2005 appropriation in this
subsection is provided solely for summer institutes training related to
implementing the civics essential academic learning requirements and
the classroom-based civics assessments developed by the superintendent
of public instruction.
(((10))) (11) $3,713,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and $3,713,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the
Washington reading corps subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(a) Grants shall be allocated to schools and school districts to
implement proven, research-based mentoring and tutoring programs in
reading that may include research-based reading skills development
software for low-performing students in grades K-6. If the grant is
made to a school district, the principals of schools enrolling targeted
students shall be consulted concerning design and implementation of the
program.
(b) The programs may be implemented before, after, or during the
regular school day, or on Saturdays, summer, intercessions, or other
vacation periods.
(c) Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps
programs.
(d) A program is eligible for a grant if it meets the following
conditions:
(i) The program employs methods of teaching and student learning
based on reliable reading/literacy research and effective practices;
(ii) The program design is comprehensive and includes instruction,
on-going student assessment, professional development,
parental/community involvement, and program management aligned with the
school's reading curriculum;
(iii) It provides quality professional development and training for
teachers, staff, and volunteer mentors and tutors;
(iv) It has measurable goals for student reading aligned with the
essential academic learning requirements;
(v) It contains an evaluation component to determine the
effectiveness of the program; and
(vi) The program may include a software-based solution to increase
the student/tutor ratio to a minimum of 5:1. The selected software
program shall be scientifically researched-based.
(e) Funding priority shall be given to low-performing schools.
(f) Beginning and end-of-program testing data shall be available to
determine the effectiveness of funded programs and practices. Common
evaluative criteria across programs, such as grade-level improvements
shall be available for each reading corps program. The superintendent
of public instruction shall provide program evaluations to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature. Administrative and
evaluation costs may be assessed from the annual appropriation for the
program.
(g) Grants provided under this section may be used by schools and
school districts for expenditures from September 2003 through August
31, 2005.
(((11) $1,564,000)) (12) $1,313,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and (($2,497,000)) $2,473,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided
solely for salary bonuses for teachers who attain certification by the
national board for professional teaching standards, subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) Teachers who hold a valid certificate from the national board
during the 2003-04 or 2004-05 school years shall receive an annual
bonus not to exceed $3,500 in each of these school years in which they
hold a national board certificate.
(b) The annual bonus shall be paid in a lump sum amount and shall
not be included in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW
41.32.010(10).
(((12))) (13) $313,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004 and $313,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for a principal support
program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
contract with an independent organization to administer the program.
The program shall include: (a) Development of an individualized
professional growth plan for a new principal or principal candidate;
and (b) participation of a mentor principal who works over a period of
between one and three years with the new principal or principal
candidate to help him or her build the skills identified as critical to
the success of the professional growth plan.
(((13))) (14) $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004 and $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2005 are provided for the development and posting of
web- based instructional tools, assessment data, and other information
that assists schools and teachers implementing higher academic
standards.
(((14))) (15) $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to the office of
the superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Each educational audit
shall include recommendations for best practices and ways to address
identified needs and shall be presented to the community in a public
meeting to seek input on ways to implement the audit and its
recommendations.
(((15))) (16) $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the
mathematics helping corps subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(a) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall not be
permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) The school improvement specialists shall provide the following:
(i) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(ii) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(iii) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(iv) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(v) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(vi) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(vii) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(((16) $87,901,000)) (17) $314,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 is provided solely for the reading
initiative and $515,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 is provided solely for the math initiative. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall evaluate
textbooks and other instructional materials for reading and math to
determine the extent to which they are aligned with the state
standards. A scorecard of the analysis shall be made available to
school districts. The superintendent shall also develop and
disseminate information on essential components of comprehensive,
school-based reading and math programs and shall work with mentor
teachers from around the state to develop guidelines for eligibility,
training, and professional development for mentor math teachers.
(18) $125,772,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(((17) $25,046,000)) (19) $25,955,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for the reading first program under Title I
of the no child left behind act.

Sec. 513 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,791,000))
$50,678,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,062,000))
$54,050,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,309,000))
$44,544,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($148,162,000))
$149,272,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $725.11 per
eligible bilingual student in the 2003-04 school year and (($725.11))
$725.17 in the 2004-05 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit
adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to $700,000 in school year
2003-04 and up to $700,000 in school year 2004-05, and adjust the per
eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this section accordingly, for
the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1)
and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are
provided solely to develop a system for the tracking of current and
former transitional bilingual program students.
(5) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I Part C and English
language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III
of the elementary and secondary education act.

Sec. 514 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,385,000))
$64,366,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,051,000))
$62,929,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($307,178,000))
$301,322,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($436,614,000))
$428,617,000

(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $432.15 per funded unit for the 2003-04 school year and (($433.03)) $432.53 per funded unit for the 2004-05
school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided under
section 504 of this act.
(c) For purposes of this section, "test results" refers to the
district results from the norm-referenced test administered in the
specified grade level. The norm-referenced test results used for the
third and sixth grade calculations shall be consistent with the third
and sixth grade tests required under RCW 28A.230.190 and 28A.230.193.
(d) A school district's general fund -- state funded units shall be
the sum of the following:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-6,
multiplied by the 5-year average 4th grade lowest quartile test results
as adjusted for funding purposes in the school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.82. As the 3rd grade test becomes available, it
shall be phased into the 5-year average on a 1-year lag;
(ii) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 7-9,
multiplied by the 5-year average 8th grade lowest quartile test results
as adjusted for funding purposes in the school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.82. As the 6th grade test becomes available, it
shall be phased into the 5-year average for these grades on a 1-year
lag;
(iii) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 10-11 multiplied by the 5-year average 11th grade lowest quartile test
results, multiplied by 0.82. As the 9th grade test becomes available,
it shall be phased into the 5-year average for these grades on a 1-year
lag;
(iv) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free and
reduced price lunch exceeded the state average, subtract the state
average percentage of students eligible for free and reduced price
lunch from the district's percentage and multiply the result by the
district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the
current school year multiplied by 22.3 percent; and
(v) In addition to amounts allocated under (d) of this subsection,
for school districts in which the effective Title I Part A (basic
program) increase is insufficient to cover the formula change in the
multiplier from .92 to .82, a state allocation shall be provided that,
when combined with the effective increase in federal Title I Part A
(basic program) funds from the 2001-02 school year, is sufficient to
cover this amount. The effective Title I Part A (basic program)
increase is the current school year federal Title I Part A (basic
program) allocation minus the 2001-02 school year federal Title I Part
A (basic program) allocation, after the 2001-02 Title I Part A
allocation has been inflated by three percent.
(2) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(3) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund--state funds allocated under this
program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning
assistance program.

Sec. 515 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT
PROGRAM
Student Achievement Fund -- State
Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($203,123,000))
$206,825,000
Student Achievement Fund -- State
Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($195,080,000))
$195,535,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($398,203,000))
$402,360,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of (($211.67)) $211.72 per FTE student
for the 2003-04 school year and $254.00 per FTE student for the 2004-05 school year. For the purposes of this section and in accordance
with RCW 84.52.068, FTE student refers to the annual average full-time
equivalent enrollment of the school district in grades kindergarten
through twelve for the prior school year.
(2) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection (2).
(3) For the 2003-04 school year, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall distribute ten percent of the school year
allocation to districts each month for the months of September through
June. For the 2004-05 school year, the superintendent of public
instruction shall distribute the school year allocation according to
the monthly apportionment schedule defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION--FOR TRAFFIC SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAMS
Public Safety and Education Account--
Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $831,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount in this section is provided
solely to implement Third Substitute House Bill No. 1796 (driver's
education funding). If Third Substitute House Bill No. 1796 is not
enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount in this section shall lapse.

Sec. 517 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 517 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS. State
general fund and state student achievement fund appropriations provided
to the superintendent of public instruction for state entitlement
programs in the public schools in this part V of this act may be
expended as needed by the superintendent for adjustments to
apportionment for prior fiscal periods. Recoveries of state general
fund moneys from school districts and educational service districts for
a prior fiscal period shall be made as reductions in apportionment
payments for the current fiscal period and shall be shown as prior year
adjustments on apportionment reports for the current period. Such
recoveries shall not be treated as revenues to the state, but as a
reduction in the amount expended against the appropriation for the
current fiscal period.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
Sec. 601 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 602 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
(1) The appropriations in sections 603 through 610 of this act
provide state general fund support for full-time equivalent student
enrollments at each institution of higher education. Listed below are
the annual full-time equivalent student enrollments by institutions
assumed in this act.

2003-04
Annual
Average 2004-05
Annual
Average

University of Washington

Main campus ((32,427)) 32,458 ((32,427)) 32,986

Bothell branch 1,235 1,235

Tacoma branch ((1,484)) 1,494 ((1,484)) 1,494

Washington State University

Main campus ((17,348)) 17,479 ((17,364)) 17,793

Spokane branch ((593)) 616 ((593)) 616

Tri-Cities branch ((616)) 633 ((616)) 633

Vancouver branch ((1,153)) 1,162 ((1,153)) 1,162

Central Washington University ((7,666)) 7,809 ((7,666)) 7,976

Eastern Washington University ((8,017)) 8,150 ((8,017)) 8,272

The Evergreen State College ((3,837)) 3,871 ((3,837)) 3,929

Western Washington University ((11,126)) 11,242 ((11,126)) 11,411

State Board for Community and Technical Colleges ((126,070)) 127,189 ((126,070)) 129,097

Higher Education Coordinating Board ((246)) 0 ((500)) 860

(2)(a) In addition to the annual full-time equivalent student
enrollments enumerated in this section, funding is provided in (i)
section 603 of this act for additional community or technical college
full-time equivalent student enrollments in high-demand fields of study
and (ii) section 722 of this act (special appropriations to the
governor) for additional full-time equivalent transfer student
enrollments with junior-class standing.
(b) For the state universities, the number of full-time equivalent
student enrollments enumerated in this section for the branch campuses
are the minimum required enrollment levels for those campuses. At the
start of an academic year, the governing board of a state university
may transfer full-time equivalent student enrollments from the main
campus to one or more branch campus. Intent notice shall be provided
to the office of financial management and reassignment of funded
enrollment is contingent upon satisfying data needs of the forecast
division who is responsible to track and monitor state-supported
college enrollment.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that baccalaureate higher
education institutions manage actual full-time equivalent student
enrollments to be within a band of two percent of budgeted enrollments,
over a period of three years.

Sec. 602 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($507,960,000))
$509,268,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($517,854,000))
$533,309,000
Administrative Contingency Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,200,000))
$5,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,029,014,000))
$1,047,777,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The technical colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess
of the fiscal growth factor to conform with the percentage increase in
community college operating fees.
(2) $1,250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to increase salaries and related
benefits for part-time faculty. The board shall report by January 30,
2004, to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal and
higher education committees on (a) the distribution of state funds; and
(b) wage adjustments for part-time faculty.
(3) $1,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for faculty salary increments and
associated benefits and may be used in combination with salary and
benefit savings from faculty turnover to provide salary increments and
associated benefits.
(4) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for a program to fund the start-up of new
community and technical college programs in rural counties as defined
under RCW 43.160.020(12) and in communities impacted by business
closures and job reductions. Successful proposals must respond to
local economic development strategies and must include a plan to
continue programs developed with this funding.
(5) $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for allocation to Clark Community
College and Lower Columbia Community College to prepare a total of 168
full-time equivalent students for transfer to the engineering and
science institute at the Vancouver branch campus of Washington State
University. The appropriations in this section are intended to
supplement, not supplant, general enrollment allocations by the board
to districts named in this subsection.
(6) $640,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $640,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for allocation to twelve college
districts identified in (a) through (l) of this subsection to prepare
students for transfer to the state technology institute at the Tacoma
branch campus of the University of Washington. The appropriations in
this section are intended to supplement, not supplant, general
enrollment allocations by the board to the districts under (a) through
(l) of this subsection:
(a) Bates Technical College;
(b) Bellevue Community College;
(c) Centralia Community College;
(d) Clover Park Community College;
(e) Grays Harbor Community College;
(f) Green River Community College;
(g) Highline Community College;
(h) Tacoma Community College;
(i) Olympic Community College;
(j) Pierce District;
(k) Seattle District; and
(l) South Puget Sound Community College.
(7) $28,761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 ((and $28,761,000)), $26,761,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and $2,000,000 of the
administrative contingency account--state appropriation are provided
solely as special funds for training and related support services,
including financial aid, as specified in chapter 226, Laws of 1993
(employment and training for unemployed workers). Funding is provided
to support up to ((6,200)) 7,219 full-time equivalent students in each
fiscal year.
(8) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for tuition support for students
enrolled in work-based learning programs.
(9) $2,950,000 of the administrative contingency account--state
appropriation is provided solely for administration and customized
training contracts through the job skills program, which shall be made
available broadly and not to the exclusion of private nonprofit
baccalaureate degree granting institutions or vocational arts career
schools operating in Washington state who partner with a firm,
hospital, group, or industry association concerned with commerce,
trade, manufacturing, or the provision of services to train current or
prospective employees. The state board shall make an annual report by
January 1 of each fiscal year to the governor and appropriate policy
and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding the implementation
of this section listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of
funds by educational sector and region of the state, as well as
successful partnerships being supported by these state funds.
(10) $250,000 of the administrative contingency account--state
appropriation is provided solely and on a one-time basis to start up a
college district consortium organized under the name "alliance for
corporate education." Financial operations shall be self-sustaining by
no later than June 30, 2005, after which time any amount remaining
unexpended from this amount shall lapse.
(11) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are solely for higher education student child care
matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(12) $212,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $212,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for allocation to Olympic college. The
college shall contract with accredited baccalaureate institution(s) to
bring a program of upper-division courses to Bremerton. The state
board for community and technical colleges shall report to the office
of financial management and the fiscal and higher education committees
of the legislature on the implementation of this subsection by December
1st of each fiscal year.
(13) $6,304,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and (($6,305,000)) $12,704,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to expand
enrollment in high-demand fields.
(a) High-demand fields means (i) health services, (ii) applied
science and engineering, (iii) viticulture and enology, ((and)) (iv)
expansion of worker retraining programs, (v) information technology,
(vi) manufacturing, and (vii) energy technology. The state board
shall allocate resources among the ((four)) seven areas specified in
this subsection and shall manage a competitive process for awarding
resources for health services, viticulture, enology, ((and)) applied
science and engineering, information technology, manufacturing, and
energy technology programs.
(b) The state board shall provide information on the number of
additional headcount and full-time equivalent students enrolled in
high-demand fields ((by November 1 of each fiscal year)) at the
conclusion of each academic year, as soon as final enrollment data
becomes available, to the office of financial management and the fiscal
and higher education committees of the legislature.
(14) $111,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $86,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to support the development of a
comprehensive viticulture (grape growing) and enology (wine making)
higher education program in Washington state. From these sums, the
state board shall allocate:
(a) $75,000 a year to Walla Walla community college for its
associate science and associate arts degree programs for the purpose of
vineyard and wine-making equipment purchases, student labor,
instructional supplies, field work, and travel expenses;
(b) $25,000 on a one-time basis to Wenatchee community college for
the purpose of adapting its orchard employee educational program; and
(c) $22,000 on a one-time basis to Yakima Valley community college
for the purpose of vineyard and wine-making equipment and supply
purchases.
The college districts named in this subsection are encouraged to
seek a portion of the high-demand student enrollment funding made
available on a competitive basis through the state board to address
their respective need for additional instructors and professional
staff.
(15) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the transition math project to address
the need to reduce remedial math courses taken at institutions of
higher education.
(a) The project will bring together representatives from the K-12
system, the two-year college system, and the public four-year
institutions of higher education to: (i) Align standards and
expectations for mathematics so that high school graduates will be well
prepared to enter college-level math courses; (ii) increase student
success in completing math requirements in high school and college
through careful attention to improved instruction and assessment; and
(iii) communicate math expectations to students through clear and
consistent messages and focused educational advising. The state board
for community and technical colleges will serve as fiscal agent for the
project.
(b) By December 1, 2004, the state board, in coordination with the
K-12 system and the public four-year institutions of higher education,
shall provide a progress report on the transition math project to the
office of financial management and the fiscal and higher education
committees of the legislature. A final report will be submitted by
December 1, 2005 and shall identify specific strategies implemented to
reduce remedial math courses taken at higher education institutions, as
well as a long-term plan to achieve measurable and specific
improvements each academic year for substantial progress towards the
achievement of this goal.

Sec. 603 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($311,628,000))
$310,866,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($319,584,000))
$326,630,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Death Investigations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $261,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,937,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,960,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($643,670,000))
$649,954,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,875,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,875,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to create a state resource for
technology education in the form of an institute located at the
University of Washington, Tacoma. The university will continue to
provide undergraduate and graduate degree programs meeting regional
technology needs including, but not limited to, computing and software
systems. As a condition of these appropriations:
(a) The university will work with the state board for community and
technical colleges, or individual colleges where necessary, to
establish articulation agreements in addition to the existing associate
of arts and associate of science transfer degrees. Such agreements
shall improve the transferability of students and in particular,
students with substantial applied information technology credits.
(b) The university will establish performance measures for
recruiting, retaining and graduating students, including nontraditional
students, and report back to the governor and legislature by September
2004 as to its progress and future steps.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for research faculty clusters in
the advanced technology initiative program.
(3) The entire death investigations account appropriation is
provided for the forensic pathologist fellowship program.
(4) $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item UW-01.
(5) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the Olympic natural resources
center.
(6) $1,526,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $3,096,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for competitively offered
recruitment and retention salary adjustments for instructional and
research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic administrators,
academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as
classified by the office of financial management, and all other
nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015.
Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this
section to further provide recruitment and retention salary
adjustments.
(7) $1,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for state match to attract or
retain federal research grants in high demand and technologically
advanced fields.
(8) $300,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for shellfish biotoxin monitoring as specified in
Chapter 263, Laws of 2003 (SSB 6073, shellfish license fee).
(9) $2,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the University of Washington's school
of medicine for the recruitment of biosciences research faculty to
establish a proteomics center.
(10) $1,897,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for the training and support of primary
care physicians and primary care providers through the network of
family practice residency programs. All of the funding provided in
this section shall be distributed directly to the family practice
residency programs to assist with cost increases experienced by the
programs, including the cost of medical malpractice premiums.
(11) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for research on labor and economic issues
in Washington. All of the funding provided in this subsection shall be
allocated to the Harry Bridges Center to support research and shall not
be used for overhead expenses.
(12) The University of Washington shall present a preliminary
report to the fiscal committees of the legislature detailing the use of
state research funds by November 1, 2004, and shall present a final
report by November 1, 2005. For each research project supported by the
state general fund in the 2003-05 biennium, including projects funded
in the university's base budget, the report shall include: (a) A brief
description of the research project; (b) the amount of state and
institutional funds contributed to the project; (c) the level of
federal or other sources of match received for the state's investment;
and (d) any other information deemed pertinent by the institution.
(13) By December 15, 2004, the University of Washington Bothell
shall submit to the higher education and fiscal committees of the
legislature a plan to phase in lower-division courses at the campus.
At a minimum, the following issues should be addressed in the plan:
(a) An enrollment plan that provides adequate capacity for
community college transfer students;
(b) Appropriate levels of state general fund support and tuition
and fees for the campus, commensurate with a role and mission similar
to a comprehensive university;
(c) Identification of any start-up costs to implement the phase-in
of lower division courses; and
(d) Other issues deemed pertinent by the institution.

Sec. 604 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($185,265,000))
$184,966,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($189,954,000))
$192,450,000
Washington State University Building Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($375,369,000))
$377,566,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $507,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,014,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to expand the entering class of
veterinary medicine students by 16 full-time equivalent residents each
academic year during the 2003-05 biennium.
(2) $657,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $180,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and the entire Washington state university building account
appropriation are provided solely to support the development of a
comprehensive viticulture (grape growing) and enology (wine making)
higher education program in Washington state. In consideration of
these appropriations, the legislature intends to provide ongoing
support of not less than $180,000 a year for extension field personnel
and services. The balance of the amount provided from the fiscal year
2004 appropriation is provided on a one-year basis to enable the
university to appoint jointly shared faculty between the Pullman main
campus and its branch campus in the TriCities. The legislature expects
the university to meet ongoing faculty, staff, and related expenses to
support the delivery of baccalaureate degree programs in viticulture
and enology by making a successful bid for a portion of high-demand
enrollment funding that will be distributed on a competitive basis by
the state higher education coordinating board for student instruction
pursuant to section 610(3) of this act.
(3) $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for allocation in full to the
branch campus in Vancouver to create and operate a state institute for
engineering and science in partnership with Clark and Lower Columbia
community colleges and regional industry leaders in southwest
Washington. As a condition of this appropriation, the university shall
develop and provide to the satisfaction of the office of financial
management a business plan for the new institute. The university,
together with its two-year college and industry partners, shall provide
the governor, legislature, and state higher education coordinating
board with an annual summary of its progress to produce more graduates
trained in applied science technologies and engineering. Annual
reports to inform and advise policymakers of the partners' success,
emerging issues, and resource needs if any shall occur by no later than
November 15 during the 2003-05 biennium.
(4) $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for research faculty clusters in
the advanced technology initiative program.
(5) $165,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $166,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item WSU-01.
(6) $949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,927,000 of general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for competitively offered
recruitment and retention salary adjustments for instructional and
research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic administrators,
academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as
classified by the office of financial management, and all other
nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015.
Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this
section to further provide recruitment and retention salary
adjustments.
(7) $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for state match to attract or retain
federal research grants in high demand and technologically advanced
fields.
(8) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for research to develop alternative
control mechanisms for burrowing shrimp.
(9) $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely to the college of veterinary medicine to
support the development of a live animal test for bovine spongiform
encephalopathy.
(10) Washington State University shall present a preliminary report
to the fiscal committees of the legislature detailing the use of state
research funds by November 1, 2004, and shall present a final report by
November 1, 2005. For each research project supported by the state
general fund in the 2003-05 biennium, including projects funded in the
university's base budget, the report shall include: (a) A brief
description of the research project; (b) the amount of state and
institutional funds contributed to the project; (c) the level of
federal or other sources of match received for the state's investment;
and (d) any other information deemed pertinent by the institution.

Sec. 605 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,861,000))
$40,796,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,183,000))
$42,798,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($83,044,000))
$83,594,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $248,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $503,000 of general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for
competitively offered recruitment and retention salary adjustments for
instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic
administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research
assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW
28B.16.015. Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those
required by this section to further provide recruitment and retention
salary adjustments.

Sec. 606 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,765,000))
$39,694,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,391,000))
$42,449,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($81,156,000))
$82,143,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided to expand university enrollment by 196
full-time equivalent students.
(2) $206,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $418,000 of general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 are provided solely for competitively offered recruitment and
retention salary adjustments for instructional and research faculty,
exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic
librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as classified
by the office of financial management, and all other nonclassified
staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Tuition
revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this section
to further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments.

Sec. 607 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,881,000))
$22,834,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,618,000))
$23,886,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,499,000))
$46,720,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $124,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $252,000 of general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 are provided solely for competitively offered recruitment and
retention salary adjustments for instructional and research faculty,
exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic
librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as classified
by the office of financial management, and all other nonclassified
staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Tuition
revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this section
to further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments.
(2) The Washington state institute for public policy shall research
the following issues and provide reports to the legislature as
directed. The institute board shall prioritize and schedule all
studies based on staff capacity.
(a) $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy to review research assessing the effectiveness of
prevention and early intervention programs concerning children and
youth, including but not limited to, programs designed to reduce the
at-risk behaviors for children and youth identified in RCW
70.190.010(4).
Using this research, the institute shall identify specific
research-proven programs that produce a positive return on the dollar
compared to the costs of the program. The institute shall also develop
criteria designed to ensure quality implementation and program fidelity
of research-proven programs in the state. The criteria shall include
measures for ongoing monitoring and continual improvement of treatment
delivery, and shall be feasible for inclusion in a contract for
services. The institute shall develop recommendations for potential
state legislation that encourages local government investment in
research-proven prevention and early intervention programs by
reimbursing local governments for a portion of the savings that accrue
to the state as the result of local investments in such programs. The
institute shall present a preliminary report of its findings to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2003, and
shall present a final report by ((March)) July 1, 2004.
(b) $26,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy to develop adherence and outcome standards for measuring
the effectiveness of treatment programs referred to in Chapter 378,
Laws of 2003 (ESSB 5903). The standards shall be developed and
presented to the governor and legislature by no later than January 1,
2004.
(c) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy to study the relationship between prison overcrowding and
construction, and the current state criminal sentencing structure.
(i) The institute shall determine whether any changes could be made
to the current state sentencing structure to address prison
overcrowding and the need for new prison construction, giving great
weight to the primary purposes of the criminal justice system. These
purposes include: Protecting community safety; making frugal use of
state and local government resources by concentrating resources on
violent offenders and sex offenders who pose the greatest risk to our
communities; achieving proportionality in sentencing; and reducing the
risk of reoffending by offenders in the community.
(ii) In developing its research plan, the institute may consult
with the sentencing guidelines commission, the caseload forecast
council, and interested stakeholders.
(iii) The institute for public policy shall present a preliminary
report of its findings to the governor and to the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature by December 15, 2003, and shall present
a final report regarding its findings and recommendations by March 15,
2004.
(d) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to examine the results of the changes in earned
release under Chapter 379, Laws of 2003 (ESSB 5990). The study shall
determine whether the changes in earned release affect the rate of
recidivism or the type of offenses committed by persons whose release
dates were affected by the changes under the bill. The institute shall
report its findings to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature by no later than December 1, 2008.
(((e) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the institute for public
policy to conduct the evaluation outlined in Substitute Senate Bill No.
5012 (charter schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2003,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 608 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,645,000))
$53,539,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($55,537,000))
$56,353,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($109,182,000))
$109,892,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $980,400 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $980,400 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the operations of the North
Snohomish, Island, Skagit (NSIS) higher education consortium.
(2) $248,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $503,000 of general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 are provided solely for competitively offered recruitment and
retention salary adjustments for instructional and research faculty,
exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic
librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as classified
by the office of financial management, and all other nonclassified
staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Tuition
revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this section
to further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments.

Sec. 609 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,952,000))
$4,943,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,716,000))
$14,365,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($642,000))
$649,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,310,000))
$19,957,000

The appropriations in this section are provided to carry out the
policy coordination, planning, studies and administrative functions of
the board and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the appropriations provided in this section, funds are
provided to continue the teacher training pilot program pursuant to
chapter 28B.80 RCW until standing authority for this program expires as
scheduled on January 1, 2005.
(2) $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to continue a demonstration
project to improve rural access to post-secondary education by bringing
distance learning technologies into Jefferson county.
(3) (($2,755,000)) $2,740,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and (($5,520,000)) $11,934,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided
solely to contract for ((246)) 247 full-time equivalent students in
high demand fields in fiscal year 2004 and an additional ((254)) 860
full-time equivalent students in high demand fields in fiscal year
2005. High-demand fields are programs where enrollment access is
limited and employers are experiencing difficulty finding qualified
graduates to fill job openings. Of the amounts provided, up to $70,000
may be used for management of the competitive process for awarding
high-demand student FTEs during the 2003-05 biennium.
(a) The board will manage a competitive process for awarding high-demand student FTEs. Public baccalaureate institutions are eligible to
apply for funding and may submit proposals that include cooperative
partnerships with private independent institutions.
(b) Among coequals, the board shall make it a priority to fund
proposals that prepare students for careers in (i) nursing and other
health services; (ii) applied science and engineering; (iii) teaching
and speech pathology; (iv) computing and information technology; and
(v) viticulture and enology, but not to the exclusion of compelling
proposals that document specific regional student and employer demand
in fields not listed in this subsection. Proposals and grant awards
will separately identify one-time, nonrecurring costs and ongoing
costs.
(c) The board will establish a proposal review committee that will
include, but not be limited to, representatives from the board, the
office of financial management, and economic development and labor
market analysts. The board will develop the request for proposals,
including the criteria for awarding grants, in consultation with the
proposal review committee.
(d) Baccalaureate institutions that receive grants shall provide
the board and the forecast division of the office of financial
management with data specified by the board or the office of financial
management that shows the impact of this subsection, particularly the
degree of improved access to high-demand programs for students and
successful job placements for graduates. The board will report on the
implementation of this subsection by November 1 of each fiscal year to
the office of financial management and the fiscal and higher education
committees of the legislature.
(4) $205,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal
year 2005 is provided solely for a comprehensive and ongoing assessment
system as outlined in Substitute House Bill No. 3103 (higher
education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 610 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($145,217,000))
$145,228,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($154,412,000))
$161,774,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,530,000))
$7,537,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($307,159,000))
$316,539,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $259,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $273,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the western interstate
commission for higher education.
(2) $1,100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 ((and)), $1,100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2005, and $2,000,000 of the health services account--state appropriation are provided solely for the health professional
conditional scholarship and loan program under chapter 28B.115 RCW.
This amount shall be deposited to the health professional loan
repayment and scholarship trust fund to carry out the purposes of the
program.
(3) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for higher education student child
care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(4) $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the benefit of students who
participate in college assistance migrant programs (CAMP) operating in
Washington state. To ensure timely state aid, the board may establish
a date after which no additional grants would be available for the
2003-04 and 2004-05 academic years. The board shall disperse grants in
equal amounts to eligible post-secondary institutions so that state
money in all cases supplements federal CAMP awards.
(5) $111,628,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004 and (($120,420,000)) $123,387,000 of the general
fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for
the state need grant program. It is the intent of the legislature to
serve all state need grant eligible students in the 2004-05 academic
year. The higher education coordinating board shall maintain the
maximum state need grant award amounts for the 2004-05 academic year at
2003-04 levels. After April 1 of each fiscal year, up to one percent
of the annual appropriation for the state need grant program may be
transferred to the state work study program.
(6) $17,048,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $17,048,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the state work study program.
After April 1 of each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual
appropriation for the state work study program may be transferred to
the state need grant program. In addition to the administrative
allowance in subsection (12) of this section, four percent of the
general fund -- state amount in this subsection may be expended for state
work study program administration.
(7) $2,867,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,867,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for educational opportunity grants
pursuant to Chapter 233, Laws of 2003 (ESB 5676). The board may
deposit sufficient funds from its appropriation into the state
education trust fund as established in RCW 28B.10.821 to provide a one-year renewal of the grant for each new recipient of the educational
opportunity grant award.
(8) $1,919,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,155,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement the Washington
scholars program. Any Washington scholars program moneys not awarded
by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the board to the
Washington award for vocational excellence.
(9) $794,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $845,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement Washington award for
vocational excellence program. Any Washington award for vocational
program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred
by the board to the Washington scholars program.
(10) $246,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $246,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for community scholarship matching
grants of $2,000 each. To be eligible for the matching grant, a
nonprofit community organization organized under section 501(c)(3) of
the internal revenue code must demonstrate that it has raised $2,000 in
new moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
act. An organization may receive more than one $2,000 matching grant
and preference shall be given to organizations affiliated with the
citizens' scholarship foundation.
(11) Subject to state need grant service requirements pursuant to
chapter 28B.119 RCW, $6,050,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and (($6,050,000)) $10,393,000 of
the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided
solely for the Washington promise scholarship program. For fiscal year
2005, the income eligibility for the graduating high school class of
2004 shall not exceed one hundred twenty percent of the state median
family income adjusted for family size. The income eligibility for the
graduating high school class of 2003 shall be retained at one hundred
thirty-five percent of the state median family income adjusted for
family size.
(12) (($2,667,000)) $2,678,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and (($2,768,000)) $2,820,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided
solely for financial aid administration, in addition to the four
percent cost allowance provision for state work study under subsection
(6) of this section. These funds are provided to administer all the
financial aid and grant programs assigned to the board by the
legislature and administered by the agency. To the extent the
executive director finds the agency will not require the full sum
provided in this subsection, a portion may be transferred to supplement
financial grants-in-aid to eligible clients after notifying the board
and the office of financial management of the intended transfer.
(13) $539,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $540,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the displaced homemakers
program.

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 701 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($570,186,000))
$655,886,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($626,814,000))
$528,766,000
Debt-Limit General Fund Bond Retirement Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,000,000))
$17,300,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,014,000))
$8,922,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,587,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($322,000))
$465,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,087,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,216,923,000))
$1,216,013,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
deposit into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account. The
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 shall be deposited in the debt-limit
general fund bond retirement account by June 30, 2004.

Sec. 702 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE
REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,394,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,805,000
Capitol Historic District Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($299,000))
$323,000
Higher Education Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,000
State Vehicle Parking Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,375,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($180,213,000))
$180,237,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 703 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,000
Higher Education Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,032,000))
$2,083,000
State Vehicle Parking Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
Capitol Historic District Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,000))
$60,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,231,000))
$3,472,000

Sec. 704 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 709 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE GOVERNOR -- COMPENSATION -- INSURANCE BENEFITS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,243,000))
$8,821,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,879,000))
$44,968,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,232,000))
$44,119,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,354,000))
$97,908,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) ((The appropriation from dedicated funds and accounts shall be
made in the amounts specified and from the dedicated funds and accounts
specified in LEAP document 2003-38, a computerized tabulation developed
by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
June 2, 2003, which is hereby incorporated by reference. The office of
financial management shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this
section in the amounts specified and to the state agencies specified in
LEAP document 2003-38, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.
(2)))(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $504.89 per eligible employee
for fiscal year 2004, and (($592.30)) $600.85 for fiscal year 2005.
(b) Within the rates in (a) of this subsection, $4.13 per eligible
employee shall be included in the employer funding rate for fiscal year
2004, and $2.11 per eligible employee shall be included in the employer
funding rate for fiscal year 2005, solely to increase life insurance
coverage in accordance with a court approved settlement in Burbage et
al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county superior court cause no.
94-2-02560-8).
(c) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or
make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.
(d) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(((3))) (2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of
the public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for
health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public
employees and school district employees who are eligible for parts A
and B of medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2004,
through December 31, 2004, the subsidy shall be $102.35. Starting
January 1, 2005, the subsidy shall be $116.19 per month.
(((4))) (3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational
service districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit
into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account established
in RCW 41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $42.76 per month beginning
September 1, 2003, and $49.14 beginning September 1, 2004;
(b) For each part-time employee who, at the time of the remittance,
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $42.76 each month beginning September 1, 2003, and
$49.14 beginning September 1, 2004, prorated by the proportion of
employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the
part-time employee receives.
The remittance requirements specified in this subsection shall not
apply to employees of a technical college, school district, or
educational service district who purchase insurance benefits through
contracts with the health care authority.
(((5))) (4) The appropriations in this section include amounts
sufficient to fund health benefits for ferry workers at the premium
levels specified in subsection (2) of this section, consistent with the
2003-2005 transportation appropriations act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 25 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Special Account Retirement Contribution Increase Revolving
Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely to increase agency and institution appropriations to
reflect a 0.01 percent increase in employer pension contributions to
the public employees' retirement system and the teachers' retirement
system required to implement House Bill No. 2538 ($1000 minimum
benefit).

Sec. 706 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 712 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY
REVOLVING ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,468,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,468,000))
$9,264,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,936,000))
$19,732,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is for
appropriation to the education technology revolving account for the
purpose of covering operational and transport costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in providing telecommunication services
to network participants.

Sec. 707 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 715 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
INCREASED FEDERAL ASSISTANCE. (1) If the department of social and
health services or the department of veterans affairs receives federal
funding to enhance the federal medical assistance percentage for the
2001-2003 ((or 2003-2005 fiscal biennia)) biennium as a result of the
jobs and growth tax relief reconciliation act of 2003 (P.L. 108-27),
the moneys shall be expended as an unanticipated receipt under RCW
43.79.270 and 43.79.280, subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(a) The moneys shall be expended in the manner required by the
federal act;
(b) The federal moneys shall be expended in a manner that will
maximize the conservation of state moneys, which shall be placed in
reserve status and remain unexpended; and
(c) The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees of proposed allotment
modifications prior to expenditure of the federal moneys.
(2) If the state receives federal funding for the 2001-2003 ((or
2003-2005 fiscal biennia)) biennium as a result of the jobs and growth
tax relief reconciliation act of 2003 (P.L. 108-27) in addition to the
funding described in subsection (1) of this section, the moneys may be
expended as an unanticipated receipt under RCW 43.79.270 and 43.79.280,
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The moneys shall be expended in the manner required by the
federal act;
(b) The federal moneys shall be expended for necessary state
services and in a manner that will maximize the conservation of state
moneys, which shall be placed in reserve status and remain unexpended;
and
(c) The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees of proposed allotment
modifications prior to expenditure of the federal moneys.

Sec. 708 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 718 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR TORT LIABILITY.
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($10,638,000)
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($4,317,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($14,955,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office of financial management shall
((reduce allotments for all agencies by $10,638,000 from 2003-05
biennial general fund appropriations in this act)) update agency
appropriation schedules to reflect the reduction in contributions to
the liability account((. The general fund allotment reduction shall be
placed in unallotted status and remain unexpended)) as identified by
agency and account in LEAP Document 2004-05 dated February 21, 2004,
which is hereby incorporated by reference.

Sec. 709 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 723 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS. The following sums, or so much thereof as may
be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise
indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations
for sundry claims. These appropriations are to be disbursed on
vouchers approved by the director of ((general administration)) the
office of financial management, except as otherwise provided, as
follows:
(1) Reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of
self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110:
(a) Kelly C. Schwartz, claim number SCJ 03-10 . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,250
(b) Clinton Johnston, claim number SCJ 04-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,225
(c) Johnny Riley, claim number SCJ 04-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500
(d) Gregory Nichols, claim number SCJ 04-06 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,995
(e) William Poll, claim number SCJ 04-07 . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,106
(f) John Obert, claim number SCJ 04-09 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,957
(2) Payment from the state wildlife account for damage to crops by
wildlife, pursuant to RCW 77.36.050:
(a) Circle S Landscape Supplies, claim number
SCG 03-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,380
(b) Marilyn Lund Farms, claim number SCG 03-08 . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,175
(c) Paul Gibbons, claim number SCG 03-09 . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,414
(d) Bud Hamilton, claim number SCG 03-10 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,591
(e) Richard Anderson, claim number SCG 03-11 . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,933
(f) Neil Ice, claim number SCG 03-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,474
(g) Carl Anderson, claim number SCG 03-13 . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,943
(h) Lafe Wilson, claim number SCG 04-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $626
(i) Richard Anderson, claim number SCG 04-04 . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,998

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 25 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--WASHINGTON INTEGRATED JUSTICE
INFORMATION BOARD
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely to support the program office of the Washington
integrated justice information board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 25 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--HELP AMERICA VOTE ACT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,140,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for deposit in the state election account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 25 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--MADER LAWSUIT SETTLEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims in Mader et al.
v. Health Care Authority and State of Washington (cause number
98-2-30850-8SEA). The expenditure of this appropriation is contingent
on the release of all claims in the case, and total settlement costs
shall not exceed the appropriation in this section.
If settlement is not executed by June 30, 2004, the appropriation
in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 25 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE
COSTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,911,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of financial management shall
distribute the appropriation to the following counties in the amounts
designated for extraordinary criminal justice costs:

King . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,743,000
Pacific . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 25 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT--COUNTY ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
deposit in the county assistance account, and the department shall
distribute the funding to counties in accordance with the provisions of
Substitute House Bill No. 3175 (financial assistance/county).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 25 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR--JOINT TASK FORCE ON MENTAL HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations are provided solely for a joint legislative
and executive task force on mental health services delivery and
financing. The joint task force shall consist of eight members, as
follows: The secretary of the department of social and health services
or his or her designee; the president of the Washington state
association of counties or his or her designee; a representative from
the governor's office; two members of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate, one of whom shall be a member of the majority
caucus and one of whom shall be a member of the minority caucus; two
members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives, one of whom shall be a member of the majority
caucus and one of whom shall be a member of the minority caucus; and
the chair of the joint legislative audit and review committee. Staff
support for the joint task force is provided by the office of financial
management, the house of representatives office of program research,
and senate committee services.
(2) The joint task force may create advisory committees to assist
the joint task force in its work.
(3) Joint task force members may be reimbursed for travel expenses
as authorized under RCW 43.03.050-060 and chapter 44.04 RCW, as
appropriate. Advisory committee members, if appointed, shall not
receive compensation or reimbursement for travel or expenses.
(4) The joint task force shall assess and make recommendations
related to:
(a) Progress made by the department of social and health services
and the regional support networks (i) towards implementation of a
performance-based measurement system that focuses on outcomes for
consumers served by the mental health system, and (ii) to reduce
duplicative and burdensome administrative and oversight requirements;
(b) The funding requirements for mental health services for
nonmedicaid consumers for the priority populations under chapter 71.24
RCW;
(c) The extent to which the current funding distribution
methodology achieves equity in funding and access to services for
mental health services consumers;
(d) The administrative structure of the community mental health
system as it relates to effectively meeting the goals established in
statute;
(e) The most effective and efficient mental health funding and
payment models (including capitated managed care), in light of
requirements of the federal balanced budget act of 1997 related to
state medicaid managed care contracting; and
(f) The types, numbers, and locations of inpatient psychiatric
hospital and community residential beds in both the private and public
sector.
(5) The joint task force shall report its initial findings and
recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature by January 1, 2005, and its final findings and
recommendations by June 30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 25 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The funding is provided to implement
proposed legislation revising criminal penalties for sex offenders. If
the legislation is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in
this section shall lapse.

Sec. 717 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 710 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The appropriations in this section are subject
to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for
the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall
be made on a monthly basis beginning July 1, 2003, consistent with
chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial
retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with
chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,256,000))
$20,256,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,914,000))
$21,414,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($55,170,000))
$54,670,000

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 801 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,711,500))
$5,344,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,273,684))
$40,012,876
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,441,197))
$3,671,015
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and
education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,074,300))
$4,147,426
General Fund Appropriation for other tax
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,750
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly
funded autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,123,723
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation
for harbor improvement revenue
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $187,068
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,192,170
County Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,131,000))
$53,130,820
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,069,000))
$21,069,120
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for
liquor excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,624,831
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for
liquor profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,511,693))
$57,369,693
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($268,374,916))
$270,907,492

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 802 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 805 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS. For transfers in this section
to the state general fund, pursuant to RCW 43.135.035(5), the state
expenditure limit shall be increased by the amount of the transfer.
The increase shall occur in the fiscal year in which the transfer
occurs.

State Convention and Trade Center Account:
For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
County Sale/Use Tax Equalization Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2004 . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,000
Financial Services Regulation Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund at the beginning
of fiscal year 2005 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,632,000))
$7,285,000
Municipal Sale/Use Tax Equalization Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2004 . . . . . . . . . . . . $374,000
Asbestos Account: For transfer to the state
general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Electrical License Account: For transfer
to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer
to the state toxics control account . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,059,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account: For transfer
to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Health Services Account: For transfer
to the water quality account . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,182,000
State Treasurer's Service Account: For
transfer to the general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,000,000))
$13,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For
transfer to the drinking water
assistance account . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,387,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer
to the health services account, in an
amount not to exceed the actual balance
of the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($185,000,000))
$180,540,000
Health Service Account: For transfer
to the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,789,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to
the disaster response account . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,200,000
Industrial Insurance Premium Refund Account:
For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $577,000
Public Service Revolving Account: For transfer
to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
State Forest Nursery Revolving Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $250,000 for fiscal
year 2004 and $250,000 for fiscal year 2005 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Flood Control Assistance Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $1,350,000 for
fiscal year 2004 and $1,350,000 for fiscal
year 2005 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000
Water Quality Account: For transfer to the water
pollution control account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,500,000))
$14,034,513
General Fund: For transfer to the water quality
account, $3,870,000 for fiscal year 2004 and
$4,557,000 for fiscal year 2005 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,427,000
Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory Account:
For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$2,500,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
tobacco prevention and control account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,216,000))
$23,795,000
From the Emergency Reserve Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund, not to exceed
the actual balance of the emergency reserve fund.
This transfer is intended to liquidate the
emergency reserve fund . . . . . . . . . . . . (($59,350,000))
$58,100,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:
For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$3,500,000
Woodstove Education and Enforcement Account:
For transfer to the air pollution control account . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Multimodal Transportation Account: For transfer
to the air pollution control account for
fiscal year 2004. The amount transferred
shall be deposited into the segregated
subaccount of the air pollution control
account created in Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6072, chapter 264, Laws of
2003. The state treasurer shall perform the
transfer from the multimodal transportation
account to the air pollution control subaccount
on a quarterly basis . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,170,726
Multimodal Transportation Account: For transfer
to the vessel response account for fiscal
year 2004 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,213,704
Resource Management Cost Account: For transfer
to the contract harvesting revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Forest Development Account: For transfer to the
contract harvesting revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Site Closure Account: For transfer to the
state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,800,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
general fund--state for fiscal year 2005 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,250,000))
$27,753,000
K-20 Technology Account: For transfer to the state
general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,281
Motor Vehicle Fund: For transfer
to the Public Safety and Education Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $831,000
Gambling Revolving Fund, Nontribal Sources:
For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
State Building Construction Account: For transfer
to the conservation assistance revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Education Technology Revolving Fund: For transfer
to the data processing revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . $296,000
Digital Government Revolving Account: For transfer
to the data processing revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,000
Gambling Revolving Fund: For transfer to the problem
gambling treatment account. If Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2776 is not enacted by June 30,
2004, this transfer is null and void . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Wildlife Account: For transfer to the special
wildlife account, $250,000 in fiscal year
2004 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2005 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Sec. 803 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 806 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS -- TRANSFERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation: For
transfer to the department of retirement
systems expense account: For the
administrative expenses of the judicial
retirement system . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,901))
$12,000

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 25 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FUND BALANCE TRANSFER. At the end of fiscal year 2004, the office
of financial management shall transfer to the general fund-state fund
balance the unspent federal fiscal relief grant moneys received as a
result of P.L. 108-27 (federal jobs and growth tax relief
reconciliation act of 2003). Pursuant to RCW 43.135.035(5), the state
expenditure limit shall be increased by the amount of the transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 25 (uncodified) to read as follows:
AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR MOTOR VEHICLES. The use of hybrid motor
vehicles reduces air contaminants, greenhouse gas emissions and
reliance on imported sources of petroleum. To foster the use of hybrid
motor vehicles, beginning July 1, 2004, before the purchase or lease of
a motor vehicle, state agencies should first consider the feasibility
of hybrid motor vehicles. State agencies should strive to purchase or
lease a hybrid motor vehicle when the use of such vehicle is consistent
with and can accomplish the agency's mission and when the purchase is
financially reasonable. The financial assessment should include
savings accruing from reduced fuel purchases over the life of the
vehicle. Agencies shall report on their purchases of hybrid vehicles
in their biennial sustainability plans as required under executive
order 02-03.

Sec. 903 RCW 9.46.100 and 2002 c 371 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created the gambling revolving fund which shall
consist of all moneys receivable for licensing, penalties, forfeitures,
and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the commission.
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys
received by the commission or any employee thereof, except for change
funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by rule or regulation of the
commission, shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the
state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited
to the gambling revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving fund
shall be on authorization of the commission or a duly authorized
representative thereof. In order to maintain an effective expenditure
and revenue control the gambling revolving fund shall be subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall be required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from such fund. All
expenses relative to commission business, including but not limited to
salaries and expenses of the director and other commission employees
shall be paid from the gambling revolving fund.
During the ((2001-))2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the gambling revolving fund to the problem gambling
treatment account. Also during the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the gambling revolving fund to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess nontribal fund balance
of the fund ((and reductions made by the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings)).

Sec. 904 RCW 28A.160.195 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 10 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the regional transportation coordinators of the educational service
districts, shall establish a minimum number of school bus categories
considering the capacity and type of vehicles required by school
districts in Washington. The superintendent, in consultation with the
regional transportation coordinators of the educational service
districts, shall establish competitive specifications for each category
of school bus. The categories shall be developed to produce minimum
long-range operating costs, including costs of equipment and all costs
in operating the vehicles. The categories, for purposes of comparative
studies, will be at a minimum the same as those in the beginning of the
1994-95 school year. The competitive specifications shall meet federal
motor vehicle safety standards, minimum state specifications as
established by rule by the superintendent, and supported options as
determined by the superintendent in consultation with the regional
transportation coordinators of the educational service districts. In
fiscal year 2005, the superintendent may solicit and accept price
quotes for a rear-engine category school bus that shall be reimbursed
at the price of the corresponding front engine category.
(2) After establishing school bus categories and competitive
specifications, the superintendent of public instruction shall solicit
competitive price quotes from school bus dealers to be in effect for
one year and shall (a) except in fiscal year 2005, establish a list of
the lowest competitive price quotes obtained under this subsection, and
(b) in fiscal year 2005, establish a list of all accepted price quotes
in each category obtained under this subsection.
(3) The superintendent shall base the level of reimbursement to
school districts and educational service districts for school buses on
the lowest quote in each category.
(4) Notwithstanding RCW 28A.335.190, school districts and
educational service districts may purchase at the quoted price directly
from the dealer who is providing the lowest competitive price quote on
the list established under subsection (2) of this section and in fiscal
year 2005 from any dealer on the list established under subsection
(2)(b) of this section. School districts and educational service
districts may make their own selections for school buses, but shall be
reimbursed at the rates determined under ((this section)) subsection
(3) of this section and RCW 28A.160.200. District-selected options
shall not be reimbursed by the state. For the 2003-05 fiscal biennium,
school districts and educational service districts shall be reimbursed
for buses purchased only through a lowest-price competitive bid process
conducted pursuant to RCW 28A.335.190 or through the state bid process
established by this section.
(5) This section does not prohibit school districts or educational
service districts from conducting their own competitive bid process.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW to implement this section.

Sec. 905 RCW 28A.650.035 and 1993 c 336 s 708 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction may receive such
gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit
of the purposes of educational technology and expend the same or any
income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or
endowments.
(2) The education technology account is hereby established in the
custody of the state treasurer. The superintendent of public
instruction shall deposit in the account all moneys received from
gifts, grants, or endowments for education technology. Moneys in the
account may be spent only for education technology. Disbursements from
the account shall be on authorization of the superintendent of public
instruction or the superintendent's designee. The account is subject
to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for disbursements.
(3) During the 2003-2005 biennium, the legislature may transfer
moneys from the education technology account to the data processing
revolving fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
account.

Sec. 906 RCW 28B.102.040 and 1987 c 437 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall establish a planning
committee to develop criteria for the screening and selection of
recipients of the conditional scholarships. These criteria shall
emphasize factors demonstrating excellence including but not limited to
superior scholastic achievement, leadership ability, community
contributions, and an ability to act as a role model for targeted
ethnic minority students. These criteria also may include, for
approximately half of the recipients, requirements that those
recipients meet the definition of "needy student" under RCW 28B.10.802.
Subject to enactment of chapter . . ., Laws of 2004 (SHB 2708), for
fiscal year 2005, additional priority shall be given to such
individuals who are also bilingual. It is the intent of the
legislature to develop a pool of dual-language teachers in order to
meet the challenge of educating students who are dominant in languages
other than English.

Sec. 907 RCW 28B.119.010 and 2003 c 233 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall design the Washington
promise scholarship program based on the following parameters:
(1) Scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating from
public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW,
students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter
28A.200 RCW, and persons twenty-one years of age or younger receiving
a GED certificate, who meet both an academic and a financial
eligibility criteria.
(a) Academic eligibility criteria shall be defined as follows:
(i) Beginning with the graduating class of 2002, students
graduating from public and approved private high schools under chapter
28A.195 RCW must be in the top fifteen percent of their graduating
class, as identified by each respective high school at the completion
of the first term of the student's senior year; or
(ii) Students graduating from public high schools, approved private
high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW, and persons
twenty-one years of age or younger receiving a GED certificate, must
equal or exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment test I score of
twelve hundred on their first attempt or must equal or exceed a
composite American college test score of twenty-seven on their first
attempt.
(b) To meet the financial eligibility criteria, a student's family
income shall not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent of the state
median family income adjusted for family size, as determined by the
higher education coordinating board for each graduating class.
Students not meeting the eligibility requirements for the first year of
scholarship benefits may reapply for the second year of benefits, but
must still meet the income standard set by the board for the student's
graduating class. Beginning with the graduating class of 2004, a
student's family income shall not exceed one hundred twenty percent of
the state median family income adjusted for family size, as determined
by the higher education coordinating board.
(2) Promise scholarships are not intended to supplant any grant,
scholarship, or tax program related to postsecondary education. If the
board finds that promise scholarships supplant or reduce any grant,
scholarship, or tax program for categories of students, then the board
shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of
scholarship to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.
(3) Within available funds, each qualifying student shall receive
two consecutive annual awards, the value of each not to exceed the
full-time annual resident tuition rates charged by Washington's
community colleges. The higher education coordinating board shall
award scholarships to as many students as possible from among those
qualifying under this section.
(4) By October 15th of each year, the board shall determine the
award amount of the scholarships, after taking into consideration the
availability of funds.
(5) The scholarships may only be used for undergraduate coursework
at accredited institutions of higher education in the state of
Washington.
(6) The scholarships may be used for undergraduate coursework at
Oregon institutions of higher education that are part of the border
county higher education opportunity project in RCW 28B.80.806 when
those institutions offer programs not available at accredited
institutions of higher education in Washington state.
(7) The scholarships may be used for college-related expenses,
including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books, and
materials.
(8) The scholarships may not be awarded to any student who is
pursuing a degree in theology.
(9) The higher education coordinating board may establish
satisfactory progress standards for the continued receipt of the
promise scholarship.
(10) The higher education coordinating board shall establish the
time frame within which the student must use the scholarship.

Sec. 908 RCW 43.83.020 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 46 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized herein shall
be deposited in the state building construction account which is hereby
established in the state treasury and shall be used exclusively for the
purposes of carrying out the provisions of the capital appropriation
acts, and for payment of the expense incurred in the printing,
issuance, and sale of such bonds.
(2) During the 2003-2005 biennium, the legislature may transfer
moneys from the state building construction account to the conservation
assistance revolving account such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the account.

Sec. 909 RCW 43.88.030 and 2002 c 371 s 911 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director of financial management shall provide all agencies
with a complete set of instructions for submitting biennial budget
requests to the director at least three months before agency budget
documents are due into the office of financial management. The
director shall provide agencies and committees that are required under
RCW 44.40.070 to develop comprehensive six-year program and financial
plans with a complete set of instructions for submitting these program
and financial plans at the same time that instructions for submitting
other budget requests are provided. The budget document or documents
shall consist of the governor's budget message which shall be
explanatory of the budget and shall contain an outline of the proposed
financial policies of the state for the ensuing fiscal period, as well
as an outline of the proposed six-year financial policies where
applicable, and shall describe in connection therewith the important
features of the budget. The message shall set forth the reasons for
salient changes from the previous fiscal period in expenditure and
revenue items and shall explain any major changes in financial policy.
Attached to the budget message shall be such supporting schedules,
exhibits and other explanatory material in respect to both current
operations and capital improvements as the governor shall deem to be
useful to the legislature. The budget document or documents shall set
forth a proposal for expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period, or six-year period where applicable, based upon the estimated revenues and
caseloads as approved by the economic and revenue forecast council and
caseload forecast council or upon the estimated revenues and caseloads
of the office of financial management for those funds, accounts,
sources, and programs for which the forecast councils do not prepare an
official forecast, including those revenues anticipated to support the
six-year programs and financial plans under RCW 44.40.070. In
estimating revenues to support financial plans under RCW 44.40.070, the
office of financial management shall rely on information and advice
from the transportation revenue forecast council. Revenues shall be
estimated for such fiscal period from the source and at the rates
existing by law at the time of submission of the budget document,
including the supplemental budgets submitted in the even-numbered years
of a biennium. However, the estimated revenues and caseloads for use
in the governor's budget document may be adjusted to reflect budgetary
revenue transfers and revenue and caseload estimates dependent upon
budgetary assumptions of enrollments, workloads, and caseloads. All
adjustments to the approved estimated revenues and caseloads must be
set forth in the budget document. The governor may additionally
submit, as an appendix to each supplemental, biennial, or six-year
agency budget or to the budget document or documents, a proposal for
expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period from revenue sources derived
from proposed changes in existing statutes.
Supplemental and biennial documents shall reflect a six-year
expenditure plan consistent with estimated revenues from existing
sources and at existing rates for those agencies required to submit
six-year program and financial plans under RCW 44.40.070. Any
additional revenue resulting from proposed changes to existing statutes
shall be separately identified within the document as well as related
expenditures for the six-year period.
The budget document or documents shall also contain:
(a) Revenues classified by fund and source for the immediately past
fiscal period, those received or anticipated for the current fiscal
period, those anticipated for the ensuing biennium, and those
anticipated for the ensuing six-year period to support the six-year
programs and financial plans required under RCW 44.40.070;
(b) The undesignated fund balance or deficit, by fund;
(c) Such additional information dealing with expenditures,
revenues, workload, performance, and personnel as the legislature may
direct by law or concurrent resolution;
(d) Such additional information dealing with revenues and
expenditures as the governor shall deem pertinent and useful to the
legislature;
(e) Tabulations showing expenditures classified by fund, function,
activity, and agency. However, documents submitted for the ((2003-05))
2005-07 biennial budget request need not show expenditures by activity;
(f) A delineation of each agency's activities, including those
activities funded from nonbudgeted, nonappropriated sources, including
funds maintained outside the state treasury;
(g) Identification of all proposed direct expenditures to implement
the Puget Sound water quality plan under chapter 90.71 RCW, shown by
agency and in total; and
(h) Tabulations showing each postretirement adjustment by
retirement system established after fiscal year 1991, to include, but
not be limited to, estimated total payments made to the end of the
previous biennial period, estimated payments for the present biennium,
and estimated payments for the ensuing biennium.
(2) The budget document or documents shall include detailed
estimates of all anticipated revenues applicable to proposed operating
or capital expenditures and shall also include all proposed operating
or capital expenditures. The total of beginning undesignated fund
balance and estimated revenues less working capital and other reserves
shall equal or exceed the total of proposed applicable expenditures.
The budget document or documents shall further include:
(a) Interest, amortization and redemption charges on the state
debt;
(b) Payments of all reliefs, judgments, and claims;
(c) Other statutory expenditures;
(d) Expenditures incident to the operation for each agency;
(e) Revenues derived from agency operations;
(f) Expenditures and revenues shall be given in comparative form
showing those incurred or received for the immediately past fiscal
period and those anticipated for the current biennium and next ensuing
biennium, as well as those required to support the six-year programs
and financial plans required under RCW 44.40.070;
(g) A showing and explanation of amounts of general fund and other
funds obligations for debt service and any transfers of moneys that
otherwise would have been available for appropriation;
(h) Common school expenditures on a fiscal-year basis;
(i) A showing, by agency, of the value and purpose of financing
contracts for the lease/purchase or acquisition of personal or real
property for the current and ensuing fiscal periods; and
(j) A showing and explanation of anticipated amounts of general
fund and other funds required to amortize the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability of the retirement system specified under chapter
41.45 RCW, and the contributions to meet such amortization, stated in
total dollars and as a level percentage of total compensation.
(3) A separate capital budget document or schedule shall be
submitted that will contain the following:
(a) A statement setting forth a long-range facilities plan for the
state that identifies and includes the highest priority needs within
affordable spending levels;
(b) A capital program consisting of proposed capital projects for
the next biennium and the two biennia succeeding the next biennium
consistent with the long-range facilities plan. Insomuch as is
practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the capital program shall
reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels proposed in
previously submitted capital budget documents in order to provide a
reliable long-range planning tool for the legislature and state
agencies;
(c) A capital plan consisting of proposed capital spending for at
least four biennia succeeding the next biennium;
(d) A strategic plan for reducing backlogs of maintenance and
repair projects. The plan shall include a prioritized list of specific
facility deficiencies and capital projects to address the deficiencies
for each agency, cost estimates for each project, a schedule for
completing projects over a reasonable period of time, and
identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future
backlogs;
(e) A statement of the reason or purpose for a project;
(f) Verification that a project is consistent with the provisions
set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW;
(g) A statement about the proposed site, size, and estimated life
of the project, if applicable;
(h) Estimated total project cost;
(i) For major projects valued over five million dollars, estimated
costs for the following project components: Acquisition, consultant
services, construction, equipment, project management, and other costs
included as part of the project. Project component costs shall be
displayed in a standard format defined by the office of financial
management to allow comparisons between projects;
(j) Estimated total project cost for each phase of the project as
defined by the office of financial management;
(k) Estimated ensuing biennium costs;
(l) Estimated costs beyond the ensuing biennium;
(m) Estimated construction start and completion dates;
(n) Source and type of funds proposed;
(o) Estimated ongoing operating budget costs or savings resulting
from the project, including staffing and maintenance costs;
(p) For any capital appropriation requested for a state agency for
the acquisition of land or the capital improvement of land in which the
primary purpose of the acquisition or improvement is recreation or
wildlife habitat conservation, the capital budget document, or an
omnibus list of recreation and habitat acquisitions provided with the
governor's budget document, shall identify the projected costs of
operation and maintenance for at least the two biennia succeeding the
next biennium. Omnibus lists of habitat and recreation land
acquisitions shall include individual project cost estimates for
operation and maintenance as well as a total for all state projects
included in the list. The document shall identify the source of funds
from which the operation and maintenance costs are proposed to be
funded;
(q) Such other information bearing upon capital projects as the
governor deems to be useful;
(r) Standard terms, including a standard and uniform definition of
normal maintenance, for all capital projects;
(s) Such other information as the legislature may direct by law or
concurrent resolution.
For purposes of this subsection (3), the term "capital project"
shall be defined subsequent to the analysis, findings, and
recommendations of a joint committee comprised of representatives from
the house capital appropriations committee, senate ways and means
committee, legislative transportation committee, legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee, and office of financial
management.
(4) No change affecting the comparability of agency or program
information relating to expenditures, revenues, workload, performance
and personnel shall be made in the format of any budget document or
report presented to the legislature under this section or RCW
43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget document or report
which was presented to the previous regular session of the legislature
during an odd-numbered year without prior legislative concurrence.
Prior legislative concurrence shall consist of (a) a favorable majority
vote on the proposal by the standing committees on ways and means of
both houses if the legislature is in session or (b) a favorable
majority vote on the proposal by members of the legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee if the legislature is not in
session.

Sec. 910 RCW 43.105.830 and 1999 c 285 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The K-20 technology account is hereby created in the state
treasury. The department of information services shall deposit into
the account moneys received from legislative appropriations, gifts,
grants, and endowments for the buildout and installation of the K-20
telecommunication system. The account shall be subject to
appropriation and may be expended solely for the K-20 telecommunication
system. Disbursements from the account shall be on authorization of
the director of the department of information services with approval of
the board.
(2) During the 2003-2005 biennium, the legislature may transfer
moneys from the K-20 technology account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 911 RCW 69.50.520 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 930 are each
amended to read as follows:
The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(((i)(1))) (9)(a), 82.08.150(5),
82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989
shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for funding services and programs under chapter 271, Laws
of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess., including state
incarceration costs. Funds from the account may also be appropriated
to reimburse local governments for costs associated with implementing
criminal justice legislation including chapter 338, Laws of 1997.
During the 2003-2005 biennium, funds from the account may also be used
for costs associated with providing grants to local governments in
accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, funding drug offender
treatment services in accordance with RCW 70.96A.350, maintenance and
operating costs of the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs jail reporting system, maintenance and operating costs of the
juvenile rehabilitation administration's client activity tracking
system, civil indigent legal representation, multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces, and grants to community networks under chapter
70.190 RCW by the family policy council.

Sec. 912 RCW 74.46.431 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations shall be facility-specific and shall have seven components:
Direct care, therapy care, support services, operations, property,
financing allowance, and variable return. The department shall
establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing
facility in this state.
(2) All component rate allocations for essential community
providers as defined in this chapter shall be based upon a minimum
facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds, regardless
of how many beds are set up or in use. For all facilities other than
essential community providers, effective July 1, 2001, component rate
allocations in direct care, therapy care, support services, variable
return, operations, property, and financing allowance shall continue to
be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of
licensed beds. For all facilities other than essential community
providers, effective July 1, 2002, the component rate allocations in
operations, property, and financing allowance shall be based upon a
minimum facility occupancy of ninety percent of licensed beds,
regardless of how many beds are set up or in use.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, direct care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
((2004)) 2005, direct care component rate allocations.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1996 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(c) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1999 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
((2004)) (2005), therapy care component rate allocations.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October
1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July
1, 2001, through June 30, ((2004)) 2005, support services component
rate allocations.
(b) Support services component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, operations component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
((2004)) 2005, operations component rate allocations.
(b) Operations component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(8) For July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, a facility's
property and return on investment component rates shall be the
facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on investment component
rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999,
a facility's property and return on investment component rates shall be
rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.
(9) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(10) Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum
wage of the greater of the state minimum wage or the federal minimum
wage.
(11) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: The need to prorate inflation for
partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing
facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded
new bed capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of
ownership of the nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or
converting beds back into service, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(12) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(13) Effective July 1, 2001, medicaid rates shall continue to be
revised downward in all components, in accordance with department
rules, for facilities converting banked beds to active service under
chapter 70.38 RCW, by using the facility's increased licensed bed
capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting. However,
for facilities other than essential community providers which bank beds
under chapter 70.38 RCW, after May 25, 2001, medicaid rates shall be
revised upward, in accordance with department rules, in direct care,
therapy care, support services, and variable return components only, by
using the facility's decreased licensed bed capacity to recalculate
minimum occupancy for rate setting, but no upward revision shall be
made to operations, property, or financing allowance component rates.
(14) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of
need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have
a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and
(b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to
be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate
allocation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR MOTOR VEHICLES . . . . . . . . . . . . 196
AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR TORT LIABILITY. . . . . . . . . . . . . 184
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 81
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 112
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
COUNTY ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 187
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 89
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 95
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 104
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 85
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 115
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 108
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 189
OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 195
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 67
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 76
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 73
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 83
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 169
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 94
ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 187
FUND BALANCE TRANSFER . . . . . . . . . . . . 196
GOVERNOR
COMPENSATION -- INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 181
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 84
HORSE RACING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
INCREASED FEDERAL ASSISTANCE. . . . . . . . . . . . . 183
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 101
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 157
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 183
EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 183
HELP AMERICA VOTE ACT . . . . . . . . . . . . 186
MADER LAWSUIT SETTLEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 186
SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING . . . . . . . . . . . . 189
WASHINGTON INTEGRATED JUSTICE INFORMATION BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 186
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
JOINT TASK FORCE ON MENTAL HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 187
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 159
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 76
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 100
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 117
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 179, 180
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 191
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 192
SUNDRY CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 185
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 119
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 144
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 141
ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY SCHOOL-- IMPROVEMENT--NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 144
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 125
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 143
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 135
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 133
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 137
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 137
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 155
TRAFFIC SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 157
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 164
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 114
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 167
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
--- END ---