BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.21.045 and 1995 c 265 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An insurer offering any health benefit plan to a small
employer ((shall)) may offer and actively market to the small employer
a health benefit plan ((providing benefits identical to the schedule of
covered health services that are required to be delivered to an
individual enrolled in the basic health plan)) featuring a limited
schedule of covered health care services. Nothing in this subsection
shall preclude an insurer from offering, or a small employer from
purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more ((or less))
comprehensive benefits than ((the basic health plan, provided such
plans are in accordance with this chapter)) those included in the
product offered under this subsection. An insurer offering a health
benefit plan ((that does not include benefits in the basic health
plan)) under this subsection shall clearly disclose ((these
differences)) all covered benefits to the small employer in a brochure
((approved by)) filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW ((48.21.130,)) 48.21.140, ((48.21.141,))
48.21.142, 48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197,
48.21.200, 48.21.220, ((48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235,)) 48.21.240,
48.21.244, 48.21.250, 48.21.300, 48.21.310, or 48.21.320 ((if: (i) The
health benefit plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of this
subsection that provides benefits identical to the basic health plan,
to the extent these requirements differ from the basic health plan; or
(ii) the health benefit plan is offered to)) for employers with not
more than ((twenty-five)) fifty employees.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from
offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit plans with
benefits in excess of the ((basic health plan services)) health benefit
plan offered under subsection (1) of this section. All forms,
policies, and contracts shall be submitted for approval to the
commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under this section
shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs ((not to exceed twenty percent)).
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all small groups purchasing coverage
including the development of allowable factors under (a) and (h) of
this subsection. The development of these factors or benefit
relativities must be based on the carrier's company-wide credible study
or a large study developed by an actuarial consultant or other method
accepted by the commissioner.
(4) ((The health benefit plans authorized by this section that are
lower than the required offering shall not supplant or supersede any
existing policy for the benefit of employees in this state.)) Nothing
in this section shall restrict the right of employees to collectively
bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of those provided
herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
an insurer in determining whether to provide coverage to a small
employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) An insurer shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) An insurer may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(6) An insurer must offer coverage to all eligible employees of a
small employer and their dependents. An insurer may not offer coverage
to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer group or
to only part of the group. An insurer may not modify a health plan
with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or dependent,
through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or exclude
coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or
services otherwise covered by the plan.
(7) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," (("basic health plan,")) "adjusted community rate," and
"wellness activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.43.005 and 2001 c 196 s 5 and 2001 c 147 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless otherwise specifically provided, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adjusted community rate" means the rating method used to
establish the premium for health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially
demonstrated differences in utilization or cost attributable to
geographic region, age, family size, and use of wellness activities.
(2) "Basic health plan" means the plan described under chapter
70.47 RCW, as revised from time to time.
(3) "Basic health plan model plan" means a health plan as required
in RCW 70.47.060(2)(d).
(4) "Basic health plan services" means that schedule of covered
health services, including the description of how those benefits are to
be administered, that are required to be delivered to an enrollee under
the basic health plan, as revised from time to time.
(5) "Catastrophic health plan" means:
(a) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering a
single enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand five hundred dollars and an
annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other
than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least three thousand
dollars; and
(b) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering more
than one enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, three thousand dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other than for
premiums) for covered benefits of at least five thousand five hundred
dollars; or
(c) Any health benefit plan that provides benefits for hospital
inpatient and outpatient services, professional and prescription drugs
provided in conjunction with such hospital inpatient and outpatient
services, and excludes or substantially limits outpatient physician
services and those services usually provided in an office setting.
(6) "Certification" means a determination by a review organization
that an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or
procedure has been reviewed and, based on the information provided,
meets the clinical requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness,
level of care, or effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable
health benefit plan.
(7) "Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted during
a patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.
(8) "Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a
health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder,
beneficiary of a group plan, or individual covered by any other health
plan.
(9) "Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse
and unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the
enrollee's health benefit plan.
(10) "Eligible employee" means an employee who works on a full-time
basis with a normal work week of thirty or more hours. The term
includes a self-employed individual, including a sole proprietor, a
partner of a partnership, and may include an independent contractor, if
the self-employed individual, sole proprietor, partner, or independent
contractor is included as an employee under a health benefit plan of a
small employer, but does not work less than thirty hours per week and
derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her income from a trade
or business through which he or she has attempted to earn taxable
income and for which he or she has filed the appropriate internal
revenue service form. Persons covered under a health benefit plan
pursuant to the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1986
shall not be considered eligible employees for purposes of minimum
participation requirements of chapter 265, Laws of 1995.
(11) "Emergency medical condition" means the emergent and acute
onset of a symptom or symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead
a prudent layperson acting reasonably to believe that a health
condition exists that requires immediate medical attention, if failure
to provide medical attention would result in serious impairment to
bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a bodily organ or part, or
would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.
(12) "Emergency services" means otherwise covered health care
services medically necessary to evaluate and treat an emergency medical
condition, provided in a hospital emergency department.
(13) "Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means amounts paid to
health carriers directly providing services, health care providers, or
health care facilities by enrollees and may include copayments,
coinsurance, or deductibles.
(14) "Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or on
behalf of a covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services included in the
covered person's health benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues
other than denial of payment for medical services or nonprovision of
medical services, including dissatisfaction with medical care, waiting
time for medical services, provider or staff attitude or demeanor, or
dissatisfaction with service provided by the health carrier.
(15) "Health care facility" or "facility" means hospices licensed
under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW,
rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric
hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers licensed under
chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical
facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and alcohol treatment
facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A RCW, and home health agencies
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and includes such facilities if
owned and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the
state and such other facilities as required by federal law and
implementing regulations.
(16) "Health care provider" or "provider" means:
(a) A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to
practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing
health care services in this state consistent with state law; or
(b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this
subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her employment.
(17) "Health care service" means that service offered or provided
by health care facilities and health care providers relating to the
prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.
(18) "Health carrier" or "carrier" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service
contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.
(19) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means any policy,
contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide, arrange,
reimburse, or pay for health care services except the following:
(a) Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 RCW;
(b) Medicare supplemental health insurance governed by chapter
48.66 RCW;
(c) Limited health care services offered by limited health care
service contractors in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;
(d) Disability income;
(e) Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability insurance
policy such as automobile personal injury protection coverage and
homeowner guest medical;
(f) Workers' compensation coverage;
(g) Accident only coverage;
(h) Specified disease and hospital confinement indemnity when
marketed solely as a supplement to a health plan;
(i) Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;
(j) Dental only and vision only coverage; and
(k) Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to have a short-term
limited purpose or duration, or to be a student-only plan that is
guaranteed renewable while the covered person is enrolled as a regular
full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an accredited higher
education institution, after a written request for such classification
by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.
(20) "Material modification" means a change in the actuarial value
of the health plan as modified of more than five percent but less than
fifteen percent.
(21) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition, illness,
or injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of
coverage.
(22) "Premium" means all sums charged, received, or deposited by a
health carrier as consideration for a health plan or the continuance of
a health plan. Any assessment or any "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a health
carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing.
(23) "Review organization" means a disability insurer regulated
under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service contractor as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health maintenance organization as defined
in RCW 48.46.020, and entities affiliated with, under contract with, or
acting on behalf of a health carrier to perform a utilization review.
(24) "Small employer" or "small group" means any person, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision, sole
proprietor, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged in
business that, on at least fifty percent of its working days during the
preceding calendar quarter, employed at least two but no more than
fifty eligible employees, with a normal work week of thirty or more
hours, the majority of whom were employed within this state, and is not
formed primarily for purposes of buying health insurance and in which
a bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining the
number of eligible employees, companies that are affiliated companies,
or that are eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of
taxation by this state, shall be considered an employer. Subsequent to
the issuance of a health plan to a small employer and for the purpose
of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer shall be
determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically provided, a
small employer shall continue to be considered a small employer until
the plan anniversary following the date the small employer no longer
meets the requirements of this definition. ((The term "small employer"
includes a self-employed individual or sole proprietor. The term
"small employer" also includes a self-employed individual or sole
proprietor who derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her
income from a trade or business through which the individual or sole
proprietor has attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she
has filed the appropriate internal revenue service form 1040, schedule
C or F, for the previous taxable year.)) A self-employed individual or
sole proprietor who is covered as a group of one on the day prior to
the effective date of this section shall also be considered a "small
employer" to the extent that individual or group of one is entitled to
have his or her coverage renewed as provided in RCW 48.43.035(6).
(25) "Utilization review" means the prospective, concurrent, or
retrospective assessment of the necessity and appropriateness of the
allocation of health care resources and services of a provider or
facility, given or proposed to be given to an enrollee or group of
enrollees.
(26) "Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an activity
consistent with department of health guidelines, such as, smoking
cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse,
appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle
safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education for the
purpose of improving enrollee health status and reducing health service
costs.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.43.018 and 2001 c 196 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in (a) through (((c))) (d) of this
subsection, a health carrier may require any person applying for an
individual health benefit plan to complete the standard health
questionnaire designated under chapter 48.41 RCW.
(a) If a person is seeking an individual health benefit plan due to
his or her change of residence from one geographic area in Washington
state to another geographic area in Washington state where his or her
current health plan is not offered, completion of the standard health
questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage if application for
coverage is made within ninety days of relocation.
(b) If a person is seeking an individual health benefit plan:
(i) Because a health care provider with whom he or she has an
established care relationship and from whom he or she has received
treatment within the past twelve months is no longer part of the
carrier's provider network under his or her existing Washington
individual health benefit plan; and
(ii) His or her health care provider is part of another carrier's
provider network; and
(iii) Application for a health benefit plan under that carrier's
provider network individual coverage is made within ninety days of his
or her provider leaving the previous carrier's provider network; then
completion of the standard health questionnaire shall not be a
condition of coverage.
(c) If a person is seeking an individual health benefit plan due to
his or her having exhausted continuation coverage provided under 29
U.S.C. Sec. 1161 et seq., or is part of a small employer group of less
than twenty employees, and meets the federal standards of eligibility
for continuation coverage, completion of the standard health
questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage if application for
coverage is made within ninety days of exhaustion of continuation
coverage. A health carrier shall accept an application without a
standard health questionnaire from a person currently covered by such
continuation coverage if application is made within ninety days prior
to the date the continuation coverage would be exhausted and the
effective date of the individual coverage applied for is the date the
continuation coverage would be exhausted, or within ninety days
thereafter.
(d) If a person is seeking an individual health benefit plan due to
his or her receiving notice that his or her coverage under a conversion
contract is discontinued, completion of the standard health
questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage if application for
coverage is made within ninety days of discontinuation of eligibility
under the conversion contract. A health carrier shall accept an
application without a standard health questionnaire from a person
currently covered by such conversion contract if application is made
within ninety days prior to the date eligibility under the conversion
contract would be discontinued and the effective date of the individual
coverage applied for is the date eligibility under the conversion
contract would be discontinued, or within ninety days thereafter.
(2) If, based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire, the person qualifies for coverage under the Washington
state health insurance pool, the following shall apply:
(a) The carrier may decide not to accept the person's application
for enrollment in its individual health benefit plan; and
(b) Within fifteen business days of receipt of a completed
application, the carrier shall provide written notice of the decision
not to accept the person's application for enrollment to both the
person and the administrator of the Washington state health insurance
pool. The notice to the person shall state that the person is eligible
for health insurance provided by the Washington state health insurance
pool, and shall include information about the Washington state health
insurance pool and an application for such coverage. If the carrier
does not provide or postmark such notice within fifteen business days,
the application is deemed approved.
(3) If the person applying for an individual health benefit plan:
(a) Does not qualify for coverage under the Washington state health
insurance pool based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire; (b) does qualify for coverage under the Washington state
health insurance pool based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire and the carrier elects to accept the person for
enrollment; or (c) is not required to complete the standard health
questionnaire designated under this chapter under subsection (1)(a) or
(b) of this section, the carrier shall accept the person for enrollment
if he or she resides within the carrier's service area and provide or
assure the provision of all covered services regardless of age, sex,
family structure, ethnicity, race, health condition, geographic
location, employment status, socioeconomic status, other condition or
situation, or the provisions of RCW 49.60.174(2). The commissioner may
grant a temporary exemption from this subsection if, upon application
by a health carrier, the commissioner finds that the clinical,
financial, or administrative capacity to serve existing enrollees will
be impaired if a health carrier is required to continue enrollment of
additional eligible individuals.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.43.035 and 2000 c 79 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
For group health benefit plans, the following shall apply:
(1) All health carriers shall accept for enrollment any state
resident within the group to whom the plan is offered and within the
carrier's service area and provide or assure the provision of all
covered services regardless of age, sex, family structure, ethnicity,
race, health condition, geographic location, employment status,
socioeconomic status, other condition or situation, or the provisions
of RCW 49.60.174(2). The insurance commissioner may grant a temporary
exemption from this subsection, if, upon application by a health
carrier the commissioner finds that the clinical, financial, or
administrative capacity to serve existing enrollees will be impaired if
a health carrier is required to continue enrollment of additional
eligible individuals.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, all
health plans shall contain or incorporate by endorsement a guarantee of
the continuity of coverage of the plan. For the purposes of this
section, a plan is "renewed" when it is continued beyond the earliest
date upon which, at the carrier's sole option, the plan could have been
terminated for other than nonpayment of premium. The carrier may
consider the group's anniversary date as the renewal date for purposes
of complying with the provisions of this section.
(3) The guarantee of continuity of coverage required in health
plans shall not prevent a carrier from canceling or nonrenewing a
health plan for:
(a) Nonpayment of premium;
(b) Violation of published policies of the carrier approved by the
insurance commissioner;
(c) Covered persons entitled to become eligible for medicare
benefits by reason of age who fail to apply for a medicare supplement
plan or medicare cost, risk, or other plan offered by the carrier
pursuant to federal laws and regulations;
(d) Covered persons who fail to pay any deductible or copayment
amount owed to the carrier and not the provider of health care
services;
(e) Covered persons committing fraudulent acts as to the carrier;
(f) Covered persons who materially breach the health plan; or
(g) Change or implementation of federal or state laws that no
longer permit the continued offering of such coverage.
(4) The provisions of this section do not apply in the following
cases:
(a) A carrier has zero enrollment on a product; ((or))
(b) A carrier replaces a product and the replacement product is
provided to all covered persons within that class or line of business,
includes all of the services covered under the replaced product, and
does not significantly limit access to the kind of services covered
under the replaced product. The health plan may also allow
unrestricted conversion to a fully comparable product; ((or))
(c) No sooner than January 1, 2005, a carrier discontinues offering
a particular type of health benefit plan offered for groups of up to
two hundred if: (i) The carrier provides notice to each group of the
discontinuation at least ninety days prior to the date of the
discontinuation; (ii) the carrier offers to each group provided
coverage of this type the option to enroll, with regard to small
employer groups, in any other small employer group plan, or with regard
to groups of up to two hundred, in any other applicable group plan,
currently being offered by the carrier in the applicable group market;
and (iii) in exercising the option to discontinue coverage of this type
and in offering the option of coverage under (c)(ii) of this
subsection, the carrier acts uniformly without regard to any health
status-related factor of enrolled individuals or individuals who may
become eligible for this coverage;
(d) A carrier discontinues offering all health coverage in the
small group market or for groups of up to two hundred, or both markets,
in the state and discontinues coverage under all existing group health
benefit plans in the applicable market involved if: (i) The carrier
provides notice to the commissioner of its intent to discontinue
offering all such coverage in the state and its intent to discontinue
coverage under all such existing health benefit plans at least one
hundred eighty days prior to the date of the discontinuation of
coverage under all such existing health benefit plans; and (ii) the
carrier provides notice to each covered group of the intent to
discontinue the existing health benefit plan at least one hundred
eighty days prior to the date of discontinuation. In the case of
discontinuation under this subsection, the carrier may not issue any
group health coverage in this state in the applicable group market
involved for a five-year period beginning on the date of the
discontinuation of the last health benefit plan not so renewed. This
subsection (4) does not require a carrier to provide notice to the
commissioner of its intent to discontinue offering a health benefit
plan to new applicants when the carrier does not discontinue coverage
of existing enrollees under that health benefit plan; or
(e) A carrier is withdrawing from a service area or from a segment
of its service area because the carrier has demonstrated to the
insurance commissioner that the carrier's clinical, financial, or
administrative capacity to serve enrollees would be exceeded.
(5) The provisions of this section do not apply to health plans
deemed by the insurance commissioner to be unique or limited or have a
short-term purpose, after a written request for such classification by
the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
guarantee of continuity of coverage applies to a group of one only if:
(a) The carrier continues to offer any other small employer group plan
in which the group of one was eligible to enroll on the day prior to
the effective date of this section; and (b) the person continues to
qualify as a group of one under the criteria in place on the day prior
to the effective date of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.43.038 and 2000 c 79 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
individual health plans shall contain or incorporate by endorsement a
guarantee of the continuity of coverage of the plan. For the purposes
of this section, a plan is "renewed" when it is continued beyond the
earliest date upon which, at the carrier's sole option, the plan could
have been terminated for other than nonpayment of premium.
(2) The guarantee of continuity of coverage required in individual
health plans shall not prevent a carrier from canceling or nonrenewing
a health plan for:
(a) Nonpayment of premium;
(b) Violation of published policies of the carrier approved by the
commissioner;
(c) Covered persons entitled to become eligible for medicare
benefits by reason of age who fail to apply for a medicare supplement
plan or medicare cost, risk, or other plan offered by the carrier
pursuant to federal laws and regulations;
(d) Covered persons who fail to pay any deductible or copayment
amount owed to the carrier and not the provider of health care
services;
(e) Covered persons committing fraudulent acts as to the carrier;
(f) Covered persons who materially breach the health plan; or
(g) Change or implementation of federal or state laws that no
longer permit the continued offering of such coverage.
(3) This section does not apply in the following cases:
(a) A carrier has zero enrollment on a product;
(b) A carrier is withdrawing from a service area or from a segment
of its service area because the carrier has demonstrated to the
commissioner that the carrier's clinical, financial, or administrative
capacity to serve enrollees would be exceeded;
(c) No sooner than the first day of the month following the
expiration of a one hundred eighty-day period beginning on March 23,
2000, a carrier discontinues offering a particular type of health
benefit plan offered in the individual market, including conversion
contracts, if: (i) The carrier provides notice to each covered
individual provided coverage of this type of such discontinuation at
least ninety days prior to the date of the discontinuation; (ii) the
carrier offers to each individual provided coverage of this type the
option, without being subject to the standard health questionnaire, to
enroll in any other individual health benefit plan currently being
offered by the carrier; and (iii) in exercising the option to
discontinue coverage of this type and in offering the option of
coverage under (c)(ii) of this subsection, the carrier acts uniformly
without regard to any health status-related factor of enrolled
individuals or individuals who may become eligible for such coverage;
or
(d) A carrier discontinues offering all individual health coverage
in the state and discontinues coverage under all existing individual
health benefit plans if: (i) The carrier provides notice to the
commissioner of its intent to discontinue offering all individual
health coverage in the state and its intent to discontinue coverage
under all existing health benefit plans at least one hundred eighty
days prior to the date of the discontinuation of coverage under all
existing health benefit plans; and (ii) the carrier provides notice to
each covered individual of the intent to discontinue his or her
existing health benefit plan at least one hundred eighty days prior to
the date of such discontinuation. In the case of discontinuation under
this subsection, the carrier may not issue any individual health
coverage in this state for a five-year period beginning on the date of
the discontinuation of the last health plan not so renewed. Nothing in
this subsection (3) shall be construed to require a carrier to provide
notice to the commissioner of its intent to discontinue offering a
health benefit plan to new applicants where the carrier does not
discontinue coverage of existing enrollees under that health benefit
plan.
(4) The provisions of this section do not apply to health plans
deemed by the commissioner to be unique or limited or have a short-term
purpose, after a written request for such classification by the carrier
and subsequent written approval by the commissioner.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.44.022 and 2000 c 79 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be
subject to the following provisions:
(a) The health care service contractor shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age;
(iv) Tenure discounts; and
(v) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health care service contractor shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection.
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs ((not to exceed twenty percent)).
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the family composition;
(ii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the
individual; or
(iii) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(h) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan
of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage, and
shall not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of
health benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.44.023.
(3) As used in this section ((and RCW 48.44.023)), "health benefit
plan," "small employer," "adjusted community rates," and "wellness
activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.44.023 and 1995 c 265 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health care services contractor offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer ((shall)) may offer and actively
market to the small employer a health benefit plan ((providing benefits
identical to the schedule of covered health services that are required
to be delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health plan))
featuring a limited schedule of covered health care services. Nothing
in this subsection shall preclude a contractor from offering, or a
small employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may
have more ((or less)) comprehensive benefits than ((the basic health
plan, provided such plans are in accordance with this chapter)) those
included in the product offered under this subsection. A contractor
offering a health benefit plan ((that does not include benefits in the
basic health plan)) under this subsection shall clearly disclose
((these differences)) all covered benefits to the small employer in a
brochure ((approved by)) filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245,
((48.44.290, 48.44.300,)) 48.44.310, 48.44.320, ((48.44.325, 48.44.330,
48.44.335,)) 48.44.340, 48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440,
48.44.450, and 48.44.460 ((if: (i) The health benefit plan is the
mandatory offering under (a) of this subsection that provides benefits
identical to the basic health plan, to the extent these requirements
differ from the basic health plan; or (ii) the health benefit plan is
offered to)) for employers with not more than ((twenty-five)) fifty
employees.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care service
contractor from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the ((basic health plan services))
health benefit plan offered under subsection (1) of this section. All
forms, policies, and contracts shall be submitted for approval to the
commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under this section
shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs ((not to exceed twenty percent)).
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all groups purchasing coverage including
the development of allowable factors under (a) and (h) of this
subsection. The development of these factors or benefit relativities
must be based on the carrier's company-wide credible study or a large
study developed by an actuarial consultant or other method accepted by
the commissioner.
(4) ((The health benefit plans authorized by this section that are
lower than the required offering shall not supplant or supersede any
existing policy for the benefit of employees in this state.)) Nothing
in this section shall restrict the right of employees to collectively
bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of those provided
herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
a contractor in determining whether to provide coverage to a small
employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A contractor shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A contractor may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(6) A contractor must offer coverage to all eligible employees of
a small employer and their dependents. A contractor may not offer
coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer
group or to only part of the group. A contractor may not modify a
health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee
or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.
(7) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," and "wellness activities" mean the same as defined in RCW
48.43.005.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.46.064 and 2000 c 79 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be
subject to the following provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age;
(iv) Tenure discounts; and
(v) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection.
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs not to exceed twenty percent.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the family composition;
(ii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the
individual; or
(iii) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(h) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan
of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage, and
shall not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of
health benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.46.066.
(3) As used in this section ((and RCW 48.46.066)), "health benefit
plan," "adjusted community rate," "small employer," and "wellness
activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 9 RCW 48.46.066 and 1995 c 265 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health maintenance organization offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer ((shall)) may offer and actively
market to the small employer a health benefit plan ((providing benefits
identical to the schedule of covered health services that are required
to be delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health plan))
featuring a limited schedule of covered health care services. Nothing
in this subsection shall preclude a health maintenance organization
from offering, or a small employer from purchasing, other health
benefit plans that may have more ((or less)) comprehensive benefits
than ((the basic health plan, provided such plans are in accordance
with this chapter)) those included in the product offered under this
subsection. A health maintenance organization offering a health
benefit plan ((that does not include benefits in the basic health
plan)) under this subsection shall clearly disclose ((these
differences)) all the covered benefits to the small employer in a
brochure ((approved by)) filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW ((48.46.275, 48.46.280, 48.46.285,))
48.46.290, 48.46.350, 48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480,
48.46.510, 48.46.520, and 48.46.530 ((if: (i) The health benefit plan
is the mandatory offering under (a) of this subsection that provides
benefits identical to the basic health plan, to the extent these
requirements differ from the basic health plan; or (ii) the health
benefit plan is offered to)) for employers with not more than ((twenty-five)) fifty employees.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health maintenance
organization from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the ((basic health plan services))
health benefit plan offered under subsection (1) of this section. All
forms, policies, and contracts shall be submitted for approval to the
commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under this section
shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs ((not to exceed twenty percent)).
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all groups purchasing coverage including
the development of allowable factors under (a) and (h) of this
subsection. The development of these factors or benefit relativities
must be based on the carrier's company-wide credible study or a large
study developed by an actuarial consultant or other method accepted by
the commissioner.
(4) ((The health benefit plans authorized by this section that are
lower than the required offering shall not supplant or supersede any
existing policy for the benefit of employees in this state.)) Nothing
in this section shall restrict the right of employees to collectively
bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of those provided
herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
a health maintenance organization in determining whether to provide
coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small
employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A health maintenance organization shall not require a minimum
participation level greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A health maintenance organization may not increase any
requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small
employer at any time after the small employer has been accepted for
coverage.
(6) A health maintenance organization must offer coverage to all
eligible employees of a small employer and their dependents. A health
maintenance organization may not offer coverage to only certain
individuals or dependents in a small employer group or to only part of
the group. A health maintenance organization may not modify a health
plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or
dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.
(7) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," and "wellness activities" mean the same as defined in RCW
48.43.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 48.21.260 (Conversion policy to be offered -- Exceptions,
conditions) and 1984 c 190 s 3;
(2) RCW 48.21.270 (Conversion policy -- Restrictions and
requirements) and 1984 c 190 s 4;
(3) RCW 48.44.370 (Conversion contract to be offered -- Exceptions,
conditions) and 1984 c 190 s 6;
(4) RCW 48.44.380 (Conversion contract -- Restrictions and
requirements) and 1984 c 190 s 7;
(5) RCW 48.46.450 (Conversion agreement to be offered -- Exceptions,
conditions) and 1984 c 190 s 9; and
(6) RCW 48.46.460 (Conversion agreement -- Restrictions and
requirements) and 1984 c 190 s 10.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 9 of this act apply to
all small group health benefit plans issued or renewed on or after the
effective date of this section.

--- END ---