BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.300 and 2003 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person, including but not limited to a volunteer provider
of emergency or medical services, who without compensation or the
expectation of compensation renders emergency care at the scene of an
emergency or who participates in transporting, not for compensation,
therefrom an injured person or persons for emergency medical treatment
shall not be liable for civil damages resulting from any act or
omission in the rendering of such emergency care or in transporting
such persons, other than acts or omissions constituting gross
negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. Any person rendering
emergency care during the course of regular employment and receiving
compensation or expecting to receive compensation for rendering such
care is excluded from the protection of this subsection.
(2) Any ((physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW))
licensed health care provider as listed in RCW 18.130.040 in the state
of Washington who, without compensation or the expectation of
compensation, provides health care services at a community ((clinic
that is a public or private tax exempt corporation)) health care
setting is not liable for civil damages resulting from any act or
omission in the rendering of such care, other than acts or omissions
constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
(3) For purposes of subsection (2) of this section, "community
health care setting" means an entity that provides health care services
and:
(a) Is operated by a public entity or private tax exempt
corporation;
(b) Is a for-profit corporation that maintains and holds itself out
to the public as having established hours on a regular basis for
providing free health care services to members of the public to the
extent that care is actually provided without compensation during those
established hours; or
(c) Is a for-profit corporation that is participating, through a
written agreement, in a community-based program to provide access to
health care services for uninsured persons, to the extent that care is
being provided without compensation to individuals who have been
referred for care through that community-based program.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.460 and 1993 c 492 s 276 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may establish a program to purchase and maintain
liability malpractice insurance for retired primary care providers who
provide primary health care services ((at community clinics)) to low-income patients. The following conditions apply to the program:
(a) Primary health care services shall be provided at ((community))
clinics serving low-income patients that are public or private tax-exempt corporations or other established practice settings as defined
by the department;
(b) Primary health care services provided at the clinics shall be
offered to low-income patients based on their ability to pay;
(c) Retired primary care providers providing health care services
shall not receive compensation for their services; and
(d) The department shall contract only with a liability insurer
authorized to offer liability malpractice insurance in the state.
(2) This section and RCW 43.70.470 shall not be interpreted to
require a liability insurer to provide coverage to a primary care
provider should the insurer determine that coverage should not be
offered to a ((physician [primary care provider])) primary care
provider because of past claims experience or for other appropriate
reasons.
(3) The state and its employees who operate the program shall be
immune from any civil or criminal action involving claims against
clinics or ((physicians [primary care providers])) primary care
providers that provided health care services under this section and RCW
43.70.470. This protection of immunity shall not extend to any clinic
or primary care provider participating in the program.
(4) The department may monitor the claims experience of retired
((physicians [primary care providers])) primary care providers covered
by liability insurers contracting with the department.
(5) The department may provide liability insurance under chapter
113, Laws of 1992 only to the extent funds are provided for this
purpose by the legislature. If there are insufficient funds to support
all applications for liability insurance coverage, priority shall be
given to those retired primary care providers working at clinics
operated by public or private tax-exempt corporations rather than
clinics operated by for-profit corporations.

--- END ---