BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.220 and 1993 c 371 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Satisfaction of the basic education program requirements
identified in RCW 28A.150.210 shall be considered to be implemented by
the following program:
(a) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in kindergarten at least a total instructional offering of four hundred
fifty hours. The program shall include instruction in the essential
academic learning requirements under RCW ((28A.630.885)) 28A.655.060
and such other subjects and such activities as the school district
shall determine to be appropriate for the education of the school
district's students enrolled in such program;
(b) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in grades one through twelve, at least a district-wide annual average
total instructional hour offering of one thousand hours. The state
board of education may define alternatives to classroom instructional
time for students in grades nine through twelve enrolled in alternative
learning experiences. The state board of education shall establish
rules to determine annual average instructional hours for districts
including fewer than twelve grades. The program shall include the
essential academic learning requirements under RCW ((28A.630.885))
28A.655.060 and such other subjects and such activities as the school
district shall determine to be appropriate for the education of the
school district's students enrolled in such group;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages.
(2) Nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to require individual students to attend school for any
particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.
(3) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty
school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten: PROVIDED, That effective May 1, 1979, a
school district may schedule the last five school days of the one
hundred and eighty day school year for noninstructional purposes in the
case of students who are graduating from high school, including, but
not limited to, the observance of graduation and early release from
school upon the request of a student, and all such students may be
claimed as a full time equivalent student to the extent they could
otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and
28A.150.260.
(4) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.
(5) The board of directors of a school district in which school did
not begin until after September 30, 2004, may excuse graduating seniors
from the last twenty days of the one hundred eighty day school year.
These students:
(a) May be claimed for the entire one hundred eighty days as full-time equivalent students to the extent that they could otherwise have
been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260;
(b) May be provided an additional five days for noninstructional
purposes as permitted under RCW 28A.150.220(3). Despite the provisions
of RCW 28A.150.220(3), the five days for noninstructional purposes may
be school days that occur immediately before the school day in which
the students are excused; and
(c) May be provided with fewer instructional hours than required by
RCW 28A.150.220(1)(b).
This subsection (5) expires August 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---