BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.0941 and 1995 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following fees, in addition to the regular license and
tonnage fees, shall be paid for all movements under special permit made
upon state highways. All funds collected, except the amount retained
by authorized agents of the department as provided in RCW 46.44.096,
shall be forwarded to the state treasury and shall be deposited in the
motor vehicle fund:

(a) All overlegal loads, except overweight, single
trip . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10.00
(b) Continuous operation of overlegal loads
having either overwidth or overheight
features only, for a period not to exceed
thirty days . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00
(c) Continuous operations of overlegal loads
having overlength features only, for a
period not to exceed thirty days . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10.00
(d) Continuous operation of a combination of
vehicles having one trailing unit that
exceeds fifty-three feet and is not
more than fifty-six feet in length, for
a period of one year . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100.00
(e) Continuous operation of a combination of
vehicles having two trailing units
which together exceed sixty-one feet and
are not more than sixty-eight feet in
length, for a period of one year . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100.00
(f) Continuous operation of a three-axle fixed
load vehicle having less than 65,000
pounds gross weight, for a period not
to exceed thirty days . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 70.00
(g) Continuous operation of a four-axle fixed load
vehicle meeting the requirements of
RCW 46.44.091(1) and weighing less than
86,000 pounds gross weight, not to exceed
thirty days . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 90.00
(h) Continuous movement of a mobile home or manufactured
home having nonreducible features not to
exceed eighty-five feet in total length and
fourteen feet in width, for a period of
one year . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150.00
(i) Continuous operation of a two or three-axle
collection truck, actually engaged in the
collection of solid waste or recyclables,
or both, under chapter 81.77 or 35.21 RCW
or by contract under RCW 36.58.090, for
one year with an additional six thousand
pounds more than the weight authorized in
RCW 46.16.070 on the rear axle of a two-axle
truck or eight thousand pounds for the tandem
axles of a three-axle truck. RCW 46.44.041
and 46.44.091 notwithstanding, the tire limits
specified in RCW 46.44.042 apply, but none of
the excess weight is valid or may be permitted
on any part of the federal interstate highway
system . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 42.00
per thousand pounds
(j) Continuous operation of two or three-axle
eductor trucks used for such purposes as
sewer and catch basin cleaning for one year
with an additional six thousand pounds more
than the weight authorized in RCW 46.16.070
on the rear axle of a two-axle truck or
eight thousand pounds for the tandem axles
of a three-axle truck. RCW 46.44.041 and 46.44.091
notwithstanding, the tire limits specified
in RCW 46.44.042 apply, but none of the excess
weight is valid or may be permitted on any part
of the federal interstate highway
system . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 42.00
per thousand pounds

(2) The department may issue any of the above-listed permits that
involve height, length, or width for an expanded period of consecutive
months, not to exceed one year.
(3) Subsection (1)(j) of this section applies only to existing
vehicles that were in operation before July 1, 2004. After that date,
any new vehicle fitting this category that is added to an
organization's existing inventory of such vehicles and causes the total
number of vehicles owned by one organization to increase, will not be
eligible for the special permit.
(4) Organizations operating vehicles of the category provided for
in subsection (1)(j) of this section must submit to the department a
vehicle inventory list indicating how many vehicles they own and the
specifics on each vehicle. This list must be submitted to the
department by July 1, 2004. Annually thereafter, each organization
must submit a new vehicle inventory list specifying if any vehicles
have been replaced or added to its existing inventory. If such
vehicles are added causing the total number of vehicles owned by the
organization to increase beyond the original inventory number submitted
by July 1, 2004, those additional vehicles are not eligible for the
special permit.
(5) Continuous operation of farm implements under a permit issued
as authorized by RCW 46.44.140 by:

(((1))) (a) Farmers in the course of farming activities,
for any three-month period . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10.00
(((2))) (b) Farmers in the course of farming activities,
for a period not to exceed one year . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25.00
(((3))) (c) Persons engaged in the business of the
sale, repair, or maintenance of such
farm implements, for any three-month period . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25.00
(((4))) (d) Persons engaged in the business of the
sale, repair, or maintenance of such
farm implements, for a period not to
exceed one year . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100.00

(6) Overweight Fee Schedule

Excess weight over legal capacity,
as provided in RCW 46.44.041.
Cost per mile.

0- 9,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ .07

10,000-14,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ .14

15,000-19,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ .21

20,000-24,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ .28

25,000-29,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ .35

30,000-34,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ .49

35,000-39,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ .63

40,000-44,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ .79

45,000-49,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ .93

50,000-54,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1.14

55,000-59,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1.35

60,000-64,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1.56

65,000-69,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1.77

70,000-74,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2.12

75,000-79,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2.47

80,000-84,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2.82

85,000-89,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3.17

90,000-94,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3.52

95,000-99,999 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3.87

100,000 pounds . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4.25

(7) The fee for weights in excess of 100,000 pounds is $4.25 plus
fifty cents for each 5,000 pound increment or portion thereof exceeding
100,000 pounds.

PROVIDED: (a) The minimum fee for any overweight permit shall be
$14.00, (b) the fee for issuance of a duplicate permit shall be $14.00,
(c) when computing overweight fees prescribed in this section or in RCW
46.44.095 that result in an amount less than even dollars the fee shall
be carried to the next full dollar if fifty cents or over and shall be
reduced to the next full dollar if forty-nine cents or under.
(8) The fees levied in this section and RCW 46.44.095 do not apply
to vehicles owned and operated by the state of Washington, a county
within the state, a city or town or metropolitan municipal corporation
within the state, or the federal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---