BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.520 and 1998 c 211 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the death of any person ensues within three years as a
proximate result of injury proximately caused by the driving of any
vehicle by any person, the driver is guilty of vehicular homicide if
the driver was operating a motor vehicle:
(a) While under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug,
as defined by RCW 46.61.502; or
(b) In a reckless manner; or
(c) With disregard for the safety of others; or
(d) While his or her license was suspended for any violation of RCW
46.61.502.
(2) Vehicular homicide is a class A felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW, except that, for a conviction under subsection (1)(a) or (d)
of this section, an additional two years shall be added to the sentence
for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.

--- END ---