BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.14.050 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 29 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Each agency administering a state purchased health care program
as defined in RCW 41.05.011(2) shall, in cooperation with other
agencies, take any necessary actions to control costs without reducing
the quality of care when reimbursing for or purchasing drugs. To
accomplish this purpose, participating agencies may establish an
evidence-based prescription drug program.
(2) In developing the evidence-based prescription drug program
authorized by this section, agencies:
(a) Shall prohibit reimbursement for drugs that are determined to
be ineffective by the United States food and drug administration;
(b) Shall adopt rules in order to ensure that less expensive
generic drugs will be substituted for brand name drugs in those
instances where the quality of care is not diminished;
(c) Where possible, may authorize reimbursement for drugs only in
economical quantities;
(d) May limit the prices paid for drugs by such means as negotiated
discounts from pharmaceutical manufacturers, central purchasing, volume
contracting, purchasing drugs from approved pharmacies or wholesalers
in Canada, or setting maximum prices to be paid;
(e) Shall consider the approval of drugs with lower abuse potential
in substitution for drugs with significant abuse potential;
(f) May take other necessary measures to control costs of drugs
without reducing the quality of care; and
(g) Shall adopt rules governing practitioner endorsement and use of
any list developed as part of the program authorized by this section.
(3) Agencies shall provide for reasonable exceptions, consistent
with RCW 69.41.190, to any list developed as part of the program
authorized by this section.
(4) Agencies shall establish an independent pharmacy and
therapeutics committee to evaluate the effectiveness of prescription
drugs in the development of the program authorized by this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.500 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 29 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) In negotiating price discounts with prescription drug
manufacturers for state purchased health care programs, the health care
authority shall also negotiate such discounts for any Washington
resident:
(a) Whose family income does not exceed three hundred percent of
the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined
annually by the federal department of health and human services;
(b) Whose existing prescription drug need is not covered by
insurance; and
(c) Who is: (i) At least fifty years old; or (ii) between the ages
of nineteen and forty-nine and is otherwise eligible for benefits under
Title II of the social security act, federal old age, survivors, and
disability insurance benefits.
(2)(a) An attestation, which shall be submitted to the
administrator, from an individual that the individual's family income
does not exceed three hundred percent of the federal poverty level is
sufficient to satisfy the eligibility requirement of subsection (1)(a)
of this section.
(b) Any person willfully making a false statement in order to
qualify for discounts under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Notice of such shall be included on the program enrollment form.
(3) The administrator shall charge participants in this program an
annual enrollment fee sufficient to offset the cost of program
administration.
(4) Any rebate or discount provided by a pharmaceutical
manufacturer and made available to individuals under this section shall
not be at the expense of retail pharmacies. This does not prohibit
participating state agencies from using discounted pharmacy
reimbursements for services or ingredients provided by the pharmacies.
(5) In addition to price discounts negotiated with pharmaceutical
manufacturers for state purchased health care programs and eligible
individuals, the health care authority is authorized to purchase, or
facilitate the purchase of, drugs approved by the food and drug
administration from Canadian pharmacies and wholesalers. The health
care authority shall develop an Internet web site and use the pharmacy
connection program established under RCW 41.05.520 to provide
information to Washington residents regarding opportunities to purchase
prescription drugs from Canada and the best means to ensure that any
prescription drugs they purchase have been safely manufactured,
distributed, and stored. The attorney general shall review the web
site and the information provided through the pharmacy connection
program and certify that they do not violate any applicable state or
federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Agencies administering a state-purchased
health care program shall not implement the provisions of this act
relating to the bulk purchasing of prescription drugs from Canada until
federal statutory or regulatory action is taken to authorize such
purchasing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---