BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES--OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW
COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

(1) $1,200,000 of the motor vehicle fund--state appropriation is
provided for performance and functional audits of transportation
agencies and departments as provided for in Substitute Senate Bill No.
5748.
(2) Within the amount provided in this section, the committee shall
consider a targeted performance audit of the Washington state patrol.
For this performance audit, the committee shall put its highest
priority on the following topics:
(a) An assessment of the types and categories of services,
including a contrast of public highway policing and general policing
services provided by the patrol, and the organizational structures used
to deliver these services;
(b) An evaluation of the patrol's fiscal policies and procedures,
including a differentiation between transportation and general fund
expenditures; and
(c) An evaluation of the linkages among expenditures,
organizational structures, service delivery, accountability, and
outcomes. The committee shall provide a final report, including
findings and recommendations, by September 30, 2004.

Sec. 102 2003 c 360 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($352,000))
$362,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to 2003 c 360
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--INITIATIVE MEASURE NO. 776
COSTS
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with refunds resulting from Pierce County et al. v. State of
Washington et al. (Supreme Court Case No. 73607-3), upholding the
Initiative Measure No. 776 reduction of gross vehicle weight fees.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--OPERATING
Sec. 201 2003 c 360 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,017,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,744,000))
$15,742,000
School Zone Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,059,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,820,000))
$20,818,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The commission may oversee up to four pilot projects
implementing the use of traffic safety cameras to detect failure to
stop at railroad crossings, stoplights, and school zones.
(a) In order to ensure adequate time in the 2003-05 biennium to
evaluate the effectiveness of the pilot program, any projects
authorized by the commission must be authorized by December 31, 2003.
(b) If a county or city has established an authorized automated
traffic safety camera program under this section, the compensation paid
to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based only
upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in
support of the system, and may not be based upon a portion of the fine
or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment.
(c) The traffic safety commission shall use the following
guidelines to administer the program:
(i) Traffic safety cameras may take pictures of the vehicle and
vehicle license plate only, and only while an infraction is occurring;
(ii) The law enforcement agency of the city or county government
shall plainly mark the locations where the automated traffic
enforcement system is used by placing signs on street locations that
clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone where
traffic laws are enforced by an automated traffic enforcement system;
(iii) Cities and counties using traffic safety cameras must provide
periodic notice by mail to its citizens indicating the zones in which
the traffic safety cameras will be used;
(iv) Notices of infractions must be mailed to the registered owner
of a vehicle within fourteen days of the infraction occurring;
(v) The owner of the vehicle is not responsible for the violation
if the owner of the vehicle, within fourteen days of receiving
notification of the violation, mails to the issuing law enforcement
agency, a declaration under penalty of perjury, stating that the
vehicle involved was, at the time, stolen or in the care, custody, or
control of some person other than the registered owner, or any other
extenuating circumstances;
(vi) Infractions detected through the use of traffic safety cameras
are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW
46.52.101 and 46.52.120;
(vii) If a notice of infraction is sent to the registered owner and
the registered owner is a rental car business, the infraction will be
dismissed against the business if it mails to the issuing agency,
within fourteen days of receiving the notice, a declaration under
penalty of perjury of the name and known mailing address of the
individual driving or renting the vehicle when the infraction occurred.
If the business is unable to determine who was driving or renting the
vehicle at the time the infraction occurred, the business must sign a
declaration under penalty of perjury to this effect. The declaration
must be mailed to the issuing agency within fourteen days of receiving
the notice of traffic infraction. Timely mailing of this declaration
to the issuing agency relieves a rental car business of any liability
under this section for the notice of infraction. A declaration form
suitable for this purpose must be included with each automated traffic
infraction notice issued, along with instructions for its completion
and use;
(viii) For purposes of the 2003-05 biennium pilot projects,
infractions generated by the use of traffic safety cameras are exempt
from the provisions of RCW 3.46.120, 3.50.100, and 35.20.220, and must
be processed in the same manner as parking violations; and
(ix) By June 30, 2005, the traffic safety commission shall provide
a report to the legislature regarding the use, public acceptance,
outcomes, and other relevant issues regarding traffic safety cameras
demonstrated by the pilot projects.
(2) $210,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for continuing the five existing DUI/traffic safety
task forces that receive federal project funding that expires during
the 2003-05 biennium. However, the appropriation in this subsection
may only be expended for a task force when the federal funding for that
task force has expired.
(3)(a) $1,555,000 of the school zone safety account--state
appropriation is provided solely as matching funds for the following
school safety enhancement projects, as proposed by local agencies,
schools, and tribal governments in response to the department of
transportation's highways and local programs request for information
for potential projects to be financed under Referendum No. 51:

Agency Project Title

Cheney School Crosswalk Improvement Project

Skokomish Indian Tribe Skokomish School Safety Sidewalk Program

Brier 37th Pl SW & 233rd Pl SW Sidewalk

Sunnyside Lincoln Ave Sidewalks

Lynnwood Olympic View Dr - 76th Ave SW to 169th St SW

Steilacoom Cherrydale Elementary School Safety Enhancement

Yakima W Valley School Zone Flashers

Camas SD SR 500 at 15th St Interchange

Seattle Meadowbrook Playfield - NE 105th St

Vancouver Franklin ES Sidewalk Improvements

(b) If one or more of the projects under this subsection cannot be
completed or no longer seeks state matching funds, the following
projects may be substituted in order of priority:

Agency Project Title

Davenport Davenport Sixth St School Sidewalk

Edmonds 96th Ave W Pedestrian Improvements

Mountlake Terrace 223rd St SW - 44th Ave W to Cedar Way Elementary

Yakima Englewood/Powerhouse Intersection Safety Project

(c) The highways and local programs division within the department
of transportation shall provide assistance to the commission in
administering this program.
(d) The legislature intends to tie funding to specific projects
only for the 2003-05 biennium.

Sec. 202 2003 c 360 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $769,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,927,000))
$1,934,000
County Arterial Preservation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $719,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,415,000))
$3,422,000

Sec. 203 2003 c 360 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,611,000))
$1,613,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,620,000))
$1,622,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,231,000))
$3,235,000

Sec. 204 2003 c 360 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($272,000))
$278,000

Sec. 205 2003 c 360 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,374,000))
$724,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) No funding is provided for the staffing, administration and
operations of the house of representatives transportation committee.
Existing staff of the transportation committee shall be transferred to
the house of representatives in the office of program research. All
tangible and intangible property that has been acquired by, or
allocated for use by the house of representatives transportation
committee and its staff, including but not limited to office space and
equipment, information systems technology, and employer-related assets,
rights, privileges, and liabilities shall be transferred to the house
of representatives. Any property acquired by, or allocated for use by
the senate transportation committee and its staff shall be transferred
to the senate.
(2) (($1,600,000)) $400,000 of the motor vehicle state
appropriation in this section is provided for the purposes of (a) and
(b) of this subsection:
(a)(i) If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5748 becomes law by June 30,
2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall be for performance
and functional audits of transportation agencies and departments as
provided in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5748; and
(ii) If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5748 does not become law by June
30, 2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall be for
performance and functional audits of transportation agencies and
departments paid for and ordered by the executive committee of the
legislative transportation committee, pursuant to a recommendation of
the transportation performance audit board hereby created. The
transportation performance audit board shall consist of the majority
and minority leaders of the transportation committees of the
legislature, five citizen members with transportation-related expertise
who shall be nominated by professional associations chosen by the
board's legislative members and appointed by the governor, the
legislative auditor as an ex officio member, and one at-large member
appointed by the governor. The citizen members may not currently, or
within one year of their appointment, be employed by the Washington
state department of transportation, and shall include:
(A) One member with expertise in construction project planning,
including permitting and assuring regulatory compliance;
(B) One member with expertise in construction means and methods and
construction management, crafting and implementing environmental
mitigation plans, and administration;
(C) One member with expertise in construction engineering services,
including construction management, materials testing, materials
documentation, contractor payments, inspection, surveying, and project
oversight;
(D) One member with expertise in project management, including
design estimating, contract packaging, and procurement; and
(E) One member with expertise in transportation planning and
congestion management.
(b) Within the amount provided in this subsection, the legislative
transportation committee shall consider contracting with the joint
legislative audit and review committee to conduct a targeted
performance audit of the Washington state patrol. For this performance
audit, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall put its
highest priority on the following topics: (i) An assessment of the
types and categories of services, including a contrast of public
highway policing and general policing services provided by the patrol,
and the organizational structures used to deliver these services; (ii)
an evaluation of the patrol's fiscal policies and procedures, including
a differentiation between transportation and general fund expenditures;
and (iii) an evaluation of the linkages among expenditures,
organizational structures, service delivery, accountability, and
outcomes. If a contract is entered into under this subsection (b), the
joint legislative audit and review committee shall provide a progress
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31,
2003, and a final report, including findings and recommendations, by
September 30, 2004.
(3) Any appropriations remaining from the $400,000 from the motor
vehicle account--state appropriation on July 1, 2004, for the
transportation performance audit board shall be transferred to the
joint legislative audit and review committee as an appropriation to be
used by the transportation performance audit board.
(4) The legislative transportation committee shall develop a
mission and organizational plan during the 2003 legislative interim
that:
(a) Reconciles any newly-mandated responsibilities (such as
performance auditing and benchmarking) with current statutory
responsibilities;
(b) Develops a process for adopting interim work plans, including
identifying subcommittees of the legislative transportation committee,
special studies or activities to be undertaken (which may include a
study of administrative costs funded with commute trip reduction funds
and how administrative cost savings can be achieved), deliverables
and/or expected outcomes, and resources required to accomplish the work
plan;
(c) Develops a long-range staffing plan to fit any new statutory
requirements and a redefined mission and organizational plan; and
(d) Ensures that all basic legislative transportation committee
functions and the adopted interim work plan are appropriately funded.

Sec. 206 2003 c 360 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($807,000))
$813,000

Sec. 207 2003 c 360 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($616,000))
$625,000

Sec. 208 2003 c 360 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($171,269,000))
$172,521,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,167,000))
$6,957,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($177,611,000))
$179,653,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed
employment providing traffic control services to the department of
transportation or other state agencies are authorized to use state
patrol vehicles for the purposes of that employment, subject to
guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The
Washington state patrol shall be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle
at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage,
subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state
patrol. The patrol shall report to the house of representatives and
senate transportation committees by December 31, 2004, on the use of
agency vehicles by officers engaging in the off-duty employment
specified in this subsection. The report shall include an analysis
that compares cost reimbursement and cost-impacts, including increased
vehicle mileage, maintenance costs, and indirect impacts, associated
with the private use of patrol vehicles.
(2) $2,075,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation in this section is provided solely for the addition of
thirteen troopers to those permanently assigned to vessel and terminal
security. The Washington state patrol shall continue to provide the
enhanced services levels established after September 11, 2001.
(3) In addition to the user fees, the patrol shall transfer into
the state patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving account created
under section 1501 of this act, no more than the amount of appropriated
state patrol highway account and general fund funding necessary to
cover the costs for the patrol's use of the aircraft. The state patrol
highway account and general fund--state funds shall be transferred
proportionately in accordance with a cost allocation that
differentiates between highway traffic enforcement services and general
policing purposes.
(4) The patrol shall not account for or record locally provided DUI
cost reimbursement payments as expenditure credits to the state patrol
highway account. The patrol shall report the amount of expected
locally provided DUI cost reimbursements to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 31 of
each year.
(5) $750,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation and $198,000 of the state patrol highway account--federal
appropriation are provided for the purchase of 65 in car video cameras
and the replacement of 60 aged datamaster breath test instruments. The
funds shall only be expended after the DUI cost recoveries have been
deposited into the state patrol highway account.

Sec. 209 2003 c 360 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,993,000))
$69,469,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,290,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,283,000))
$70,759,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Under the direction of the legislative auditor, the patrol
shall update the pursuit vehicle life-cycle cost model developed in the
1998 Washington state patrol performance audit (JLARC Report 99-4).
The patrol shall utilize the updated model as a basis for determining
maintenance and other cost impacts resulting from the increase to
pursuit vehicle mileage above 110 thousand miles in the 2003-05
biennium. The patrol shall submit a report, that includes identified
cost impacts, to the transportation committees of the senate and house
of representatives by December 31, 2003.
(2) The Washington state patrol shall assign two full-time
detectives to work solely to investigate incidents of identity fraud,
drivers' license fraud, and identity theft. The detectives shall work
cooperatively with the department of licensing's driver's special
investigation unit.

Sec. 210 2003 c 360 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,000))
$3,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,000))
$96,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,000))
$84,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,286,000))
$7,953,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,623,000))
$4,407,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($107,000))
$85,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,185,000))
$12,628,000

Sec. 211 2003 c 360 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- INFORMATION SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($133,000))
$137,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,000))
$54,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,489,000))
$11,272,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,569,000))
$6,253,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($670,000))
$1,040,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,927,000))
$18,764,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall submit a report to
the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the progress
made in transitioning off of the Unisys system by December 1, 2003, and
each December 1 thereafter.

Sec. 212 2003 c 360 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- VEHICLE SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $585,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,372,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,509,000))
$57,638,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,211,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,337,000))
$63,466,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $144,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5435 or Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1592.
(2) If Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6063 is not enacted by June 30,
2003, $1,100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
shall lapse.
(3) $81,000 of the DOL services account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1036.
(4) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$117,000 for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2167. If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2167 is not enacted by
June 30, 2004, the $117,000 in funding shall lapse.
(5) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes $25,000
for the implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2471. If Engrossed
House Bill No. 2471 is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the $25,000 in
funding shall lapse.
(6) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes $33,000
for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2910. If
Substitute House Bill No. 2910 is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the
$33,000 in funding shall lapse.

Sec. 213 2003 c 360 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,576,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,809,000))
$86,285,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $318,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($87,703,000))
$89,179,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $178,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for two temporary collision processing FTEs to
eliminate the backlog of collision reports. The department shall
report, informally, to the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees quarterly, beginning October 1, 2003, on the
progress made in eliminating the backlog.
(2) The highway safety account--state appropriation includes
$354,000 for the implementation of House Bill No. 2532. If House Bill
No. 2532 is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the $354,000 in funding shall
lapse.
(3) The highway safety account--state appropriation includes
$148,000 for the implementation of House Bill No. 1681. If House Bill
No. 1681 is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the $148,000 in funding shall
lapse.

Sec. 214 2003 c 360 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM
C
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,661,000))
$56,474,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,163,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,583,000))
$6,383,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,770,000))
$68,383,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($715,000)) $238,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely to ((retain an external consultant))
hire a project staff person to provide an assessment of the
department's ((review of current)) major information technology systems
and ((planning for system and application modernization. The
legislative transportation committee shall approve the statement of
work before the consultant is hired. The consultant shall also work
with the department)) to prepare ((an)) a system and application
modernization strategy and ((preliminary)) project plan.
The department ((and the consultant)) shall work with the office of
financial management and the department of information services to
ensure that (a) the department's current and future system development
is consistent with the overall direction of other key state systems;
and (b) when possible, common statewide information systems are used or
developed to encourage coordination and integration of information used
by the department and other state agencies and to avoid duplication.
The department shall provide a report on its proposed application
modernization plan to the transportation committees of the legislature
by June 30, ((2004)) 2006.
(2)(a) (($2,963,000)) $2,959,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and $2,963,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of a new
revenue collection system, including the integration of the regional
fare coordination system (smart card), at the Washington state ferries.
By December 1st of each year, an annual update must be provided to the
legislative transportation committee concerning the status of
implementing and completing this project.
(b) (($400,000)) $200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operation
account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
the smart card program. (($200,000 of)) This amount must be held in
allotment reserve until a smart card report is delivered to the
legislative transportation committee indicating that an agreement on
which technology will be used throughout the state of Washington for
the smart card program has been reached among smart card participants.
(3) The department shall contract with the department of
information services to conduct a survey that identifies possible
opportunities and benefits associated with siting and use of technology
and wireless facilities located on state right of way authorized by RCW
47.60.140. The department shall submit a report regarding the survey
to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2004.

Sec. 215 2003 c 360 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS
AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,048,000))
$30,981,000

Sec. 216 2003 c 360 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,107,000))
$5,607,000
Aeronautics Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($650,000))
$2,150,000
Aircraft Search and Rescue Safety and Education
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($282,000))
$260,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,039,000))
$8,017,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,381,000 of the aeronautics account--state appropriation is provided solely for additional preservation
grants to airports. (($122,000 of the aircraft search and rescue
safety and education account--state appropriation is provided for
additional search and rescue and safety and education activities. If
Senate Bill No. 6056 is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amounts
provided shall lapse.))

Sec. 217 2003 c 360 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,010,000))
$49,056,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,410,000))
$49,456,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $14,310,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the staffing, activities, and overhead of the
department's environmental affairs office. This funding is provided in
lieu of funding provided in sections 305 and 306 of this act.
(2) $3,100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the staffing and activities of the transportation
permit efficiency and accountability committee.
(3) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department solely for the
purposes of providing contract services to the association of
Washington cities and Washington state association of counties to
implement section 2(3)(c), (5), and (6), chapter 8 (ESB 5279), Laws of
2003 for activities of the transportation permit efficiency and
accountability committee.

Sec. 218 2003 c 360 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,011,000))
$1,411,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for a traffic and economic study
of the Mount Saint Helens tourist and recreational area. The study
shall analyze existing and potential traffic patterns in the area and
develop funding strategies sufficient to fund construction of a
connection between state route number 504 and forest service road
number 99. The study shall also include an analysis of potential
partnership funding plans involving the use of tolls in order to
determine the potential to pay for ongoing maintenance and operations
requirements of visitor centers, roads, and other amenities provided to
tourists. The purpose and results of this study shall be made
available to citizens, businesses, and community organizations in the
affected area. The study shall be completed and submitted to the
transportation committees of the house of representatives and senate by
December 31, 2004.

Sec. 219 2003 c 360 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($283,350,000))
$283,991,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,426,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,253,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($289,029,000))
$289,670,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations must be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account--private/local
appropriation.
(4) Funding is provided for maintenance on the state system to
allow for a continuation of the level of service targets included in
the 2001-03 biennium. In delivering the program, the department should
concentrate on the following areas:
(a) Meeting or exceeding the target for structural bridge repair on
a statewide basis;
(b) Eliminating the number of activities delivered in the "f" level
of service at the region level;
(c) Reducing the number of activities delivered in the "d" level of
service by increasing the resources directed to those activities on a
statewide and region basis; and
(d) Evaluating, analyzing, and potentially redistributing resources
within and among regions to provide greater consistency in delivering
the program statewide and in achieving overall level of service
targets.

Sec. 220 2003 c 360 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,869,000))
$39,442,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,994,000))
$39,567,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of $8,800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation may be expended for the incident response program,
including the service patrols. The department and the Washington state
patrol shall continue to consult and coordinate with private sector
partners, such as towing companies, media, auto, insurance and trucking
associations, and the legislative transportation committees to ensure
that limited state resources are used most effectively. No funds shall
be used to purchase tow trucks.
(2) $4,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give
priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or
provide congestion relief. The department shall prioritize low-cost
enhancement projects on a statewide rather than regional basis.
(3) At a frequency determined by the department, the interstate-5
variable message signs shall display a message advising slower traffic
to keep right.
(4) $518,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1702. If Substitute House Bill No. 1702 is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 221 2003 c 360 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,852,000))
$25,779,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $636,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,093,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,554,000))
$28,481,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $627,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5248. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5248 is not enacted by June 30,
2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The agency
may transfer between programs funds provided in this subsection.
(2) The department shall transfer at no cost to the Washington
state patrol the title to the Walla Walla colocation facility.

Sec. 222 2003 c 360 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA,
AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,064,000))
$23,014,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,814,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,021,000))
$1,521,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,899,000))
$41,349,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($3,800,000)) $2,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a study of regional congestion
relief solutions for Puget Sound, Spokane, and Vancouver. The study
must include proposals to alleviate congestion consistent with
population and land use expectations under the growth management act,
and must include measurement of all modes of transportation.
(2) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for additional assistance to support regional
transportation planning organizations and long-range transportation
planning efforts.
(3) (($3,000,000)) $2,100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the costs of the regional
transportation investment district (RTID) election and department of
transportation project oversight. These funds are provided as a loan
to the RTID and shall be repaid to the state motor vehicle account
within one year following the certification of the election results
related to the RTID.
(4) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the costs of department of transportation oversight
and support in selecting transportation projects and funding for those
transportation projects under chapter 36.120 RCW in counties newly
authorized to establish a regional transportation investment district
under House Bill No. 2531.
(5) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for contracting with the department of
natural resources to develop data systems for state submerged lands
that can be shared with other governmental agencies and that can
support the state vision for ecoregional planning. The data to be
shared shall include, but not limited to, tabular and geospatial data
describing public land ownership, distributions of native plants,
marine and aquatic species and their habitats, physical attributes,
aquatic ecosystems, and specially designated conservation or
environmentally sensitive areas.
(6) $650,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department to support the
processing and analysis of the backlog of city and county collision
reports.
(((5))) (7) The department shall contribute to the report required
in section 208(1) of this act in the form of an analysis of the cost
impacts incurred by the department as the result of the policy
implemented in section 208(1) of this act. The analysis shall contrast
overtime costs charged by the patrol prior to July 1, 2003, with
contract costs for similar services after July 1, 2003.
(((6))) (8) $60,000 of the distribution under RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) is provided solely to the department for the Washington
strategic freight transportation analysis.

Sec. 223 2003 c 360 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,082,000))
$54,738,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($50,799,000)) $43,799,000 of the motor vehicle fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for the liabilities attributable to
the department of transportation. The office of financial management
must provide a detailed accounting of the revenues and expenditures of
the self-insurance fund to the transportation committees of the
legislature on December 31st and June 30th of each year.
(2) Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(a) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
DIVISION OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES . . . . . . . . . . . . (($989,000))
$848,000
(b) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . (($823,000))
$819,000
(c) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED
MAIL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,850,000
(d) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,252,000))
$2,786,000
(e) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS
AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,799,000))
$43,799,000
(f) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,846,000
(g) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . (($523,000))
$538,000
(h) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF MINORITY
AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . $252,000

Sec. 224 2003 c 360 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,457,000))
$47,197,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,186,000))
$49,926,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for nonprofit
providers of transportation for persons with special transportation
needs. $14,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for transit
agencies to transport persons with special transportation needs.
((Moneys shall be to provide additional service only and may not be
used to supplant current funding.)) Grants shall only be used by
nonprofit providers and transit agencies for capital and operating
costs ((directly associated with adding additional service)). Grants
for nonprofit providers shall be based on need, including the
availability of other providers of service in the area, efforts to
coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost effectiveness
of trips provided. Grants for transit agencies shall be prorated based
on the amount expended for demand response service and route deviated
service in calendar year 2001 as reported in the "Summary of Public
Transportation - 2001" published by the department of transportation.
No transit agency may receive more than thirty percent of these
distributions. The first $200,000 provided to King county shall be
used to provide electric buses, instead of diesel buses, for service on
Capital Hill in Seattle, Washington through June 30, 2005.
(2) $1,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to implement section 9 of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2228. For the 2003-05 biennium,
the grant program is not subject to the $750,000 annual limitation but
may not expend more than $1,500,000 for the biennium.
(3) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2001 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(4) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for public
transit agencies. The grant program will cover capital costs only; no
operating costs are eligible for funding under this grant program.
Only grants that add vanpools are eligible, no supplanting of transit
funds currently funding vanpools is allowed. Additional criteria for
selecting grants will include leveraging funds other than state funds.
(5) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided to the city of Seattle for the Seattle
streetcar project on South Lake Union.
(6) $240,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for additional commute trip reduction
(CTR) program funding distributions. This amount shall be divided
equally among Benton, Clark, Kitsap, Thurston, Whatcom, and Yakima
counties for CTR programs and planning.

Sec. 225 2003 c 360 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($309,580,000))
$311,744,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,120,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($314,700,000))
$316,864,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of
(($34,701,000)) $35,348,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 2003-2005
biennium. If the actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted
amount, the excess amount may not be expended. If the actual cost
exceeds this amount, the department shall request a supplemental
appropriation.
(2) The Washington state ferries (WSF) is directed to work with the
office of the state treasurer to use available financing tools to
mitigate the fluctuating price of fuel. The WSF shall enter into
contracts to sell put options and purchase call options, creating a
"costless collar" that will both set a floor and a cap on fuel prices
for at least fifty percent of the ferry system's fuel needs for the
2005 fiscal year. The state treasurer and the state investment board
shall provide the necessary direction and oversight to ensure the WSF
develops and implements a financially sound strategy.
(3) The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry
employees. The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees
during the 2003-2005 biennium may not exceed (($207,757,000))
$208,130,000 plus a dollar amount, as prescribed by the office of
financial management, that is equal to any insurance benefit increase
granted general government employees in excess of $495.30 a month
annualized per eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of
eligible marine employees for fiscal year 2004 and $567.67 a month
annualized per eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of
eligible marine employees for fiscal year 2005, a dollar amount as
prescribed by the office of financial management for costs associated
with pension amortization charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by
the office of financial management for salary increases during the
2003-2005 biennium. For the purposes of this section, the expenditures
for compensation paid to ferry employees shall be limited to salaries
and wages and employee benefits as defined in the office of financial
management's policies, regulations, and procedures named under objects
of expenditure "A" and "B" (7.2.6.2).
The prescribed salary increase or decrease dollar amount that shall
be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used
to increase or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 2003, and
thereafter, as established in the 2003-2005 general fund operating
budget.
(((3))) (4) $4,234,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation and $800,000 of the Puget Sound ferry
operations account--state appropriation are provided solely for
operating costs associated with the Vashon to Seattle passenger-only
ferry. The Washington state ferries will develop a plan to increase
passenger-only farebox recovery to at least forty percent by July 1,
2003, with an additional goal of eighty percent, through increased
fares, lower operation costs, and other cost-saving measures as
appropriate. In order to implement the plan, ferry system management
is authorized to negotiate changes in work hours (requirements for
split shift work), but only with respect to operating passenger-only
ferry service, to be included in a collective bargaining agreement in
effect during the 2003-05 biennium that differs from provisions
regarding work hours in the prior collective bargaining agreement. The
department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2003.
(((4))) (5) $866,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation and $200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry
operations account--state appropriation are provided solely for
operating costs associated with the Bremerton to Seattle passenger-only
ferry service for thirteen weeks.
(((5))) (6) The department shall study the potential for private or
public partners, including but not limited to King county, to provide
passenger-only ferry service from Vashon to Seattle. The department
shall report to the legislative transportation committees by December
31, 2003.
(((6))) (7) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide
service to Sidney, British Columbia.
(((7))) (8) When augmenting the existing ferry fleet, the
department of transportation ferry capital program shall explore cost-effective options to include the leasing of ferries from private-sector
organizations.
(((8))) (9) The Washington state ferries shall work with the
department of general administration, office of state procurement to
improve the existing fuel procurement process and solicit, identify,
and evaluate, purchasing alternatives to reduce the overall cost of
fuel and mitigate the impact of market fluctuations and pressure on
both short- and long-term fuel costs. Consideration shall include, but
not be limited to, long-term fuel contracts, partnering with other
public entities, and possibilities for fuel storage in evaluating
strategies and options. The department shall report back to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2003, on
the options, strategies, and recommendations for managing fuel
purchases and costs.
(((9))) (10) The department must provide a separate accounting of
passenger-only ferry service costs and auto ferry service costs, and
must provide periodic reporting to the legislature on the financial
status of both passenger-only and auto ferry service in Washington
state.
(((10))) (11) The Washington state ferries must work with the
department's information technology division to implement a new revenue
collection system, including the integration of the regional fare
coordination system (smart card). Each December, annual updates are to
be provided to the transportation committees of the legislature
concerning the status of implementing and completing this project, with
updates concluding the first December after full project
implementation.
(((11))) (12) The Washington state ferries shall evaluate the
benefits and costs of selling the depreciation rights to ferries
purchased by the state in the future through sale and lease-back
agreements, as permitted under RCW 47.60.010. The department is
authorized to issue a request for proposal to solicit proposals from
potential buyers. The department must report to the transportation
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2004, on the options,
strategies, and recommendations for sale/lease-back agreements on
existing ferry boats as well as future ferry boat purchases.
(13) The Washington state ferries will develop a standard cost
allocation methodology and accounting process to adequately identify,
capture, and report revenues and expenses associated with their
increasing number of profit center business activities. The intent of
the legislature is to ensure that costs incurred for any of the ferry
system's break-even or profit-center activities are properly associated
with the revenues generated by that activity. A standard methodology
for identifying and allocating indirect costs is to be developed. In
addition, recommendations for identifying and allocating capital costs
are to be established, where applicable. The Washington state ferries
will submit a report to the house of representatives transportation
committee and to the senate highways and transportation committee by
December 1, 2004, outlining the cost allocation methodologies and
accounting processes to be used to capture information and report
business unit revenue and expenses.
(14) The department shall analyze the total cost of purchasing
traditional fossil-based fuels for ferry operations versus the cost of
replacing traditional fuels with bio-fuels. In calculating the total
cost of both types of fuel the department must include, but is not
limited to, the costs associated with environmental protection
requirements associated with truck-based on-ship loading, assuming the
use of 100 per cent bio-fuel, regulated by the federal government as
vegetable oil.
(15) $238,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3112. If Second Substitute House Bill No.
3112 is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 226 2003 c 360 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,075,000))
$34,118,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($30,831,000)) $29,961,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service
contract and Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and
maintaining the state-supported passenger rail service.
(2) No Amtrak Cascade runs may be eliminated.
(3) The department is directed to explore scheduling changes that
will reduce the delay in Seattle when traveling from Portland to
Vancouver B.C.
(4) The department is directed to explore opportunities with
British Columbia (B.C.) concerning the possibility of leasing an
existing Talgo trainset to B.C. during the day for a commuter run when
the Talgo is not in use during the Bellingham layover.

Sec. 227 2003 c 360 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,057,000))
$7,067,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,569,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,626,000))
$9,636,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $75,000 of the total appropriation is provided in
accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) to fund the state's
share of the 2004 Washington marine cargo forecast study. Public port
districts, acting through their association, must provide funding to
cover the remaining cost of the forecast.
(2) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) solely to
fund a study of the threats posed by flooding to the state and other
infrastructure near the Interstate 5 crossing of the Skagit River.
This funding is contingent on the receipt of federal matching funds.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--CAPITAL
Sec. 301 2003 c 360 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,296,000))
$15,940,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement the activities and projects included in
the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - Current Law report
as transmitted to LEAP on ((April 27, 2003)) March 11, 2004.
(2) The department shall develop a standard design for all
maintenance facilities to be funded under this section. Prior to
developing design standards, the department must solicit input from all
personnel classifications typically employed at maintenance facilities.
By September 1, 2003, the department shall submit a report to the
legislative transportation committees describing the stakeholder
involvement process undertaken and the adopted design standards for
maintenance facilities.

Sec. 302 2003 c 360 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($565,300,000))
$558,789,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($950,000))
$7,239,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,434,000))
$3,211,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($157,374,000))
$159,225,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($192,940,000))
$191,338,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,258,000))
$26,691,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,279,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($613,300,000))
$603,992,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,596,835,000))
$1,600,764,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($157,374,000)) $159,225,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation, (($192,940,000)) $191,338,000 of the motor vehicle
account--federal appropriation, (($13,258,000)) $26,691,000 of the
motor vehicle account--local appropriation, and $50,279,000 of the
special category C account--state appropriation are provided solely to
implement the activities and projects included in the Legislative 2003
Transportation Project List - Current Law report as transmitted to LEAP
on ((April 27, 2003)) March 11, 2004.
(2) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
(($78,000,000)) $93,615,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation. The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
(($18,038,000)) $17,380,000 in unexpended proceeds from bond sales
authorized in RCW 47.10.843 for mobility and economic initiative
improvement projects.
(3) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation
includes $567,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843. The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state
appropriation includes (($46,300,000)) $36,992,000 in unexpended
proceeds from the January 2003 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.843
for the Tacoma Narrows bridge project.
(4) The special category C account--state appropriation includes
$44,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.812. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available in the special category C account in lieu of
bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(5) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as
indicated in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law
report transmitted to LEAP on ((April 27, 2003)) March 11, 2004.
(6) The ((motor vehicle account)) transportation 2003 account
(nickel account)--state appropriation includes (($280,000,000))
$269,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by Senate
Bill No. 6062. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(7) $11,000,000 of the ((motor vehicle account)) transportation
2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation is provided solely
for the environmental impact statement on the SR 520 Evergreen floating
bridge.
(8) $250,000 of the transportation 2003 account (Nickel Account)--state appropriation and an equal amount from the city of Seattle are
provided solely for an analysis of the impacts that an expansion of the
SR 520 Evergreen floating bridge will have on the streets of North
Capitol Hill, Roanoke Park, and Montlake. An advisory committee with
two members each from Portage Bay/Roanoke Park Community Council,
Montlake Community Council, and the North Capitol Hill community
organization along with the secretary of transportation is established.
The seven-member committee shall hire and oversee the contract with a
transportation consulting organization to: (a) Perform an analysis of
such impacts; and (b) design a traffic and circulation plan that
mitigates the adverse consequences of such impacts. If the city of
Seattle does not agree to provide $250,000 by January 1, 2004, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9)(a) (($500,000)) $170,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a study to provide the legislature
with information regarding the feasibility of pursuing a Washington
commerce corridor. The department shall retain outside experts to
conduct the study. The study must include the following conditions:
(i) The Washington commerce corridor must be a north-south corridor
starting in the vicinity of Lewis county and extending northerly to the
vicinity of the Canadian border. The corridor must be situated east of
state route number 405 and west of the Cascades. The corridor may
include any of the following features:
(A) Ability to carry long-haul freight;
(B) Ability to provide for passenger auto travel;
(C) Freight rail;
(D) Passenger rail;
(E) Public utilities; and
(F) Other ancillary facilities as may be desired to maximize use of
the corridor;
(ii) The Washington commerce corridor must be developed, financed,
designed, constructed, and operated by private sector consortiums; and
(iii) The Washington commerce corridor must be subject to a joint
permitting process involving federal, state, and local agencies with
jurisdiction.
(b) The legislative transportation committee shall form a working
group to work with the department and the outside consultant on the
study.
(10) (($8,000,000)) $3,500,000 of the ((motor vehicle))
transportation 2003 (nickel) account--state appropriation is provided
for the SR 522, University of Washington-Bothell campus access project.
((This amount will cover approximately one-half of the construction
costs.))
(11) The transportation permit efficiency and accountability
committee (TPEAC) shall select from the project list under this
subsection ten projects that have not yet secured state permits. TPEAC
shall select projects from both urban and rural areas representing a
wide variety of locations within the state. These projects shall be
designated "Department of Transportation Permit Drafting Pilot
Projects" and shall become a part of the work plan of TPEAC required
under section 2(1)(b), chapter 8 (ESB 5279), Laws of 2003.
(12) Of the amounts appropriated in this section and section 306 of
this act, no more than $124,000 is provided for increased project costs
due to the enactment of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5457.
(((14))) (13) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal
funds may be transferred from program Z to program I ((to replace those
federal)) and replaced with state funds in a dollar-for-dollar match.
However, funds may not be transferred between federal programs. Fund
transfers authorized under this subsection shall not affect project
prioritization status. Appropriations shall initially be allotted as
appropriated in this act. The department shall not transfer funds as
authorized under this subsection without approval of the transportation
commission and the director of financial management. The department
shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund transfers to the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 1, 2004.
(14) The department shall report on the costs associated
synchronizing all stop lights within one-half mile of each other on
state highway 20 between Anacortes and Burlington at the I-5
interchange, so that a vehicle, starting from a stop at a red light and
traveling at the posted speed limit, can pass through the other lights
without having to stop for an additional red light.
(15) Funding provided by this act for the Alaskan Way Viaduct
project shall not be spent for preliminary engineering, design, right
of way acquisition, or construction on the project if it could have the
effect of reducing roadway capacity on that facility.
(16) In conducting its environmental impact statement
responsibilities on the Alaskan Way Viaduct project, the department of
transportation must provide briefings and consult with the legislators
in the affected project area on the design alternatives for that
facility.

Sec. 303 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$20,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($178,909,000))
$186,395,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($457,467,000))
$458,653,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,666,000))
$12,665,000
Multimodal Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,690,000
Multimodal Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,247,000))
Puyallup Tribal Settlement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($656,979,000))
$670,423,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($178,909,000)) $186,395,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation, (($457,467,000)) $458,653,000 of the motor vehicle
account--federal appropriation, (($12,666,000)) $12,665,000 of the
motor vehicle account--local appropriation, $1,690,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation, and
(($4,247,000 of the multimodal transportation account--federal))
$11,000,000 of the Puyallup tribal settlement account--state
appropriation are provided solely to implement the activities and
projects included in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List -Current Law report transmitted to LEAP on ((April 27, 2003)) March 11,
2004.
(2) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$2,850,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW
47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for emergency purposes. The motor vehicle
account--state appropriation includes $338,000 in unexpended proceeds
from the January 2003 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.761 and
47.10.762 for emergency purposes.
(3) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$77,700,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(4) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as
indicated in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law
report transmitted to LEAP on ((April 27, 2003)) March 11, 2004.
(5) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(6) Of the amounts appropriated in this section and section 305 of
this act, no more than $124,000 is provided for increased project costs
due to the enactment of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5457.
(7) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to program P ((to replace those federal))
and replaced with state funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However,
funds may not be transferred between federal programs. Fund transfers
authorized under this subsection shall not affect project
prioritization status. Appropriations shall initially be allotted as
appropriated in this act. The department shall not transfer funds as
authorized under this subsection without approval of the transportation
commission and the director of financial management. The department
shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund transfers to the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 1, 2004.
(8) The department is authorized to negotiate with the city of
Tacoma for the purpose of transferring ownership of the Murray
Morgan/11th street bridge to the city. The department is allowed to
use the Puyallup tribal settlement account appropriation as well as any
funds appropriated in the current biennium and planned in future
biennia for the demolition and mitigation for the demolition of the
bridge to rehabilitate or replace the bridge if agreed to by the city.
In no event will the departments participation exceed $26,500,000 and
no funds may be expended unless the city has signed an agreement to
accept ownership of the bridge.
(9) The department shall explore short and long term opportunities
for development of the land beneath the Alaskan Way Viaduct to generate
additional revenue for transportation purposes. The department shall
report back to the transportation committees of the house of
representatives and senate by December 1, 2005.

Sec. 304 2003 c 360 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($129,066,000))
$108,260,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,400,000))
$69,881,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account --
Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $249,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,381,000))
$16,473,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,749,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($182,596,000))
$200,612,000

The appropriations in this section are provided for improving the
Washington state ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel improvements, and terminal
construction and improvements. The appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes $11,772,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
Senate Bill No. 6062. The transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation
in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) (($129,066,000)) $108,260,000 of the Puget Sound capital
construction account--state appropriation ((and $34,400,000)),
$69,881,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--federal
appropriation, $249,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction
account--local appropriation, and $4,701,000 of the multimodal
transportation account--state appropriation are provided solely for
capital projects as listed in the Legislative 2003 Transportation
Project List - Current Law as transmitted to the LEAP on ((April 27,
2003)) March 11, 2004.
(3) (($17,521,000)) $5,749,000 of the transportation 2003 account
(nickel account)--state appropriation ((is)) and $11,772,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation are provided
solely for capital projects as listed in the Legislative 2003
Transportation Project List - New Law as transmitted to the LEAP on
((April 27, 2003)) March 11, 2004.
(4) The Puget Sound capital construction account -- state
appropriation includes (($45,000,000)) $29,385,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and terminal
acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long lead time materials
acquisition for the Washington state ferries. The transportation
commission may authorize the use of current revenues available to the
motor vehicle account in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the
state appropriation.
(5) Any revenues made available to the motor vehicle account from
the Puget Sound capital construction account are provided as a loan and
are to be repaid with interest to that account by the close of the
2005-07 biennium. The annual interest rate on the loan shall be five
percent.
(6) The Washington state ferries shall consult with the United
States Coast Guard regarding operational and design standards required
to meet Safety of Life at Sea requirements, in an effort to determine
the most efficient and cost-effective vessel design that meets these
requirements.
(7) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the current financing plan that assumes four auto boats will be
financed through revenues generated through mechanisms provided in
current law and additional revenues. The department shall evaluate
whether sufficient financing will be made available through operating
savings, additional financing mechanisms, or a combination of the two
approaches to finance a fifth auto boat. A report of the findings
shall be provided to the transportation committees of the legislature
by December 15, 2004.
(8) The department of transportation shall not sell any passenger-only ferries in the ferry system fleet before the legislature has had
an opportunity to review and act on the results of the cost/benefit
analysis required under this subsection. The department is authorized,
however, to lease to other public or private ferry operators the
passenger-only vessels not scheduled for use or for backup in the 2003-2005 biennium on a short-term (two years or less) basis.
The department shall develop alternatives for the use of passenger-only vessels that are not scheduled for use or for backup. Options
should include, but are not limited to:
(a) Retaining the vessels for future use on state ferry routes;
(b) Leasing the vessels to public or private operators; and
(c) Selling the vessels and using the proceeds to purchase smaller
vessels that better match current and anticipated passenger loads.
The department must provide a cost/benefit analysis of the
alternatives identified and provide recommendations to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2004.
(9) The department shall provide to the transportation committees
of the legislature an estimate of the total cost associated with
provisioning each ferry vessel with life vests and life boats or rafts
to accommodate for the maximum number of passengers on each ferry
vessel.

Sec. 305 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,530,000))
$35,330,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,499,000))
$10,088,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,787,000
Washington Fruit Express Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,299,000))
$56,475,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes $30,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
Senate Bill No. 6062. The transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation
in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) (($4,530,000)) $5,330,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation, (($9,499,000)) $10,088,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--federal appropriation, $9,787,000 of
the multimodal transportation account--local appropriation, $500,000 of
the Washington fruit express account--state appropriation, and $770,000
of the essential rail assistance account--state appropriation are
provided solely for capital projects as listed in the Legislative 2003
Transportation Project List - Current Law as transmitted to the LEAP on
((April 27, 2003)) March 11, 2004.
(3) $1,230,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $770,000 of the essential rail assistance account--state appropriation is to be placed in reserve status by the office of
financial management to be held until the department identifies the
location for a new transload facility at either Wenatchee or Quincy.
The funds are to be released upon determination of a location and
approval by the office of financial management.
(4) $30,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for capital projects as listed in the
Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law as transmitted
to the LEAP on ((April 27, 2003)) March 11, 2004.
(5) If federal block grant funding for freight or passenger rail is
received, the department shall consult with the legislative
transportation committee prior to spending the funds on additional
projects.
(6) If the department issues a call for projects, applications must
be received by the department by November 1, 2003, and November 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 509 (uncodified) is
repealed.

Sec. 307 2003 c 360 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,425,000))
$33,226,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,726,000))
$30,226,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,960,000))
$66,261,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as
indicated in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law
Local Projects report transmitted to LEAP on ((April 27, 2003)) March
11, 2004.
(2) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to programs I and P and state funds shall be
transferred from programs I and P to program Z to replace those federal
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department may not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission. The
department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2004.
(3) $7,576,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to fund the first
phase of a multiphase cooperative project with the state of Oregon to
dredge the Columbia River. If dredge material is disposed of in the
ocean, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
subsection unless agreement on ocean disposal sites has been reached
that protects the state's commercial crab fishery. The amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse unless the state of Oregon appropriates
a dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of the project.
(4) (($1,156,000)) $647,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for additional
small city pavement preservation program grants, to be administered by
the department's highways and local programs division. The department
shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at
least semiannually to determine whether the projects are making
satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded small city
pavement preservation program grant funds, but does not report activity
on the project within one year of grant award, should be reviewed by
the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated.
The department must promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and identify where unused grant funds remain because actual
project costs were lower than estimated in the grant award. The
department shall expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified
projects when funds become available either because grant awards have
been rescinded for lack of sufficient project activity or because
completed projects returned excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(5) (($4,010,000)) $3,156,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for additional
traffic and pedestrian safety improvements near schools. The highways
and local programs division within the department of transportation
shall administer this program. The department shall review all
projects receiving grant awards under this program at least
semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory
progress. Any project that has been awarded traffic and pedestrian
safety improvement grant funds, but does not report activity on the
project within one year of grant award should be reviewed by the
department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The
department must promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and identify where unused grant funds remain because actual
project costs were lower than estimated in the grant award. The
department shall expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified
projects when funds become available either because grant awards have
been rescinded for lack of sufficient project activity or because
completed projects returned excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(6) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
(($20,452,000)) $15,317,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843.
(7) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes $6,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
Senate Bill No. 6062. The transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation
in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(8) $15,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a rail barge facility to
accommodate very large or oversized cargo to complement the port of
Everett's existing deep water marine terminals. This appropriation is
contingent upon an office of financial management finding that:
(a) This project is a necessary expansion for the port to meet the
needs of a tenant employing thousands of Washington residents to expand
the tenant's operations and to provide very substantial economic
benefits to the region; and
(b) The tenant has committed to performing the manufacturing or
other programs that this project will serve in the Puget Sound region.
The department shall report to the house of representatives and
senate transportation committees, the house of representatives capital
committee, and the senate ways and means committee at least ten days
prior to the transmittal of any funds authorized under this section.
(9) $11,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement the activities and projects included in
the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - Current Law report
transmitted to LEAP on March 11, 2004.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 401 2003 c 360 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT
TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($258,971,000))
$250,000,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,131,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,340,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,721,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,876,000))
$5,254,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($331,000))
$338,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $358,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,100,000))
$2,117,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($350,068,000))
$342,499,000

Sec. 402 2003 c 360 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL
AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,293,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000))
$21,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $119,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,228,000))
$2,244,000

Sec. 403 2003 c 360 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account -- State Reappropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $567,000,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$567,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound capital construction
account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,000,000))
$29,385,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
(($45,000,000)) $29,385,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for
vessel and terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long
lead-time materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.

Sec. 404 2003 c 360 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to
cities and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($441,359,000))
$439,328,354
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For license permit and fee distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,652,000))
$13,119,000

Sec. 405 2003 c 360 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
(1) State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($465,152,000))
$770,347,000
(3) Highway Safety Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the motor
vehicle account -- state . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,000,000))
$17,000,000

The state treasurer shall perform the transfers from the state
patrol highway account and the highway safety account to the motor
vehicle account on a quarterly basis up to the amounts provided as
determined by the department of transportation.

Sec. 406 2003 c 360 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Ferry Operations
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,757,000
(2) RV Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,954,000
(3) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,287,000))
$61,287,000
(4) Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to Puget Sound
Capital Construction Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
(5) Transportation Equipment Fund--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(6) Advanced Right-of-Way Revolving Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of transportation shall only transfer funds in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section up to the level provided, on an
as-needed basis.
(b) The department of transportation shall transfer funds in
subsection (4) of this section up to the amount identified, provided
that a minimum balance of $5,000,000 is retained in the Puget Sound
ferry operations account.
(c) The amount identified in subsection (4) of this section may not
include any revenues collected as passenger fares.

Sec. 407 2003 c 360 s 407 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--TRANSFERS
State Patrol Highway Account: For transfer to the
department of retirement systems expense account:
For the administrative expenses of the ((judicial))
Washington state patrol retirement system . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,304

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to 2003 c 360
(uncodified) to read as follows:
AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR MOTOR VEHICLES. The use of hybrid motor
vehicles reduces air contaminants, greenhouse gas emissions and
reliance on imported sources of petroleum. To foster the use of hybrid
motor vehicles, beginning July 1, 2004, before the purchase or lease of
a motor vehicle, state agencies should first consider the feasibility
of hybrid motor vehicles. State agencies should strive to purchase or
lease a hybrid motor vehicle when the use of such a vehicle is
consistent with and can accomplish the agency's mission and when the
purchase is financially reasonable. The financial assessment should
include savings accruing from reduced fuel purchases over the life of
the vehicle. Agencies shall report on their purchases of hybrid
vehicles in their biennial sustainability plans as required under
executive order 02-03.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 A new section is added to 2003 c 360
(uncodified) to read as follows:
Washington state ferries are more than a symbol of the state's
natural beauty and economic vitality. They also are a critical
component of our state's transportation system, serving as an extension
of our land-based highways and transit systems, connecting Washington's
people, jobs, and communities.
The investments made in the 2003 transportation funding package
provide the foundation for a marine transportation system that
coordinates Washington's cross-Sound marine transportation and our
land-based transportation alternatives to create a fully integrated
marine/land multimodal transportation system. Achieving this will
require the development of a long-range vision and supporting strategy
that will provide the policy guidance to define and maximize efficient
delivery of quality marine transportation service to the traveling
public.
(1) To accomplish this, the Washington state department of
transportation shall develop a vision statement and 10-year strategy
for the future development of Washington's multimodal water-based
transportation system.
(a) This strategy shall recommend the most appropriate means of
moving foot passengers across central Puget Sound, using Washington
state ferries, alternative operators, or a combination of both, in the
immediate future and over the longer term:
(i) Giving priority to those routes where passenger service likely
will be provided at least for the near term on passenger-only vessels,
such as Vashon-Seattle, Kingston-Seattle, Southworth-Seattle, and
Clinton-Seattle. Consideration shall be given to existing public-private partnership opportunities;
(ii) Considering how service patterns will best fit in the near and
long term with development goals and opportunities of Colman Dock as a
major hub for integrating water transportation with other
transportation modes in downtown Seattle;
(iii) Evaluating how operating economies and reasonable fare box
recoveries can be established by scheduling A.M. and P.M. services to
match commuter demand and to fit within existing collective bargaining
agreements as interpreted and applied to facilitate "split shift"
transit-like operations; and
(iv) Providing a vessel plan that most efficiently uses existing
state ferry assets and provides for their likely repair and
rehabilitation needs, while preserving flexibility to structure
services around vessel availability that could rely on purchase or
lease of additional vessels, as may suitably be required.
The strategy shall also consider the availability of partnering in
operations, vessel deployment, or funding arrangements with other
public transportation entities and with the private sector. The study
shall also recommend the most effective use of federal funding
opportunities for the overall support of integrated water
transportation services on the central Puget Sound.
(b) Other components of the strategy shall include but not be
limited to:
(i) A long-term plan for the ferry system's existing terminals,
considering the revenue generation opportunities and potential for
partnering with the private sector where appropriate. This should
include a plan for generating other revenues as identified in the 2003
5-5-5 plan; and
(ii) A more equitable fare structure for the San Juan Islands,
particularly for island residents.
(2) The department shall consult with key public and private sector
stakeholders including business, labor, environmental community
representatives, local governments, and transit agencies as part of the
development of the vision statement and supporting strategy.
The long-range strategy should also recommend a short-range
implementation plan for the 2005-07 biennium. The department shall
provide its recommendations to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 15, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 In addition to other gubernatorial
appointees, the state historic preservation officer shall be appointed
to any steering committee that makes the final selection of projects
funded from the surface transportation program flexible funds or a
similar program anticipated to be authorized in the extension or
reauthorization of the Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century
(TEA-21).

PROVISIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 The following bills, as identified by bill
number, in the form passed by the legislature are necessary to
implement portions of this act: House Bill numbers 1702, 1796, 1960,
2531, 3164, and 3205.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR MOTOR VEHICLES . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
DRIVER SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
VEHICLE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AVIATION -- PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM D . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY--PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
PROGRAM D -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT--PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 1
LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
INITIATIVE MEASURE NO. 776 COSTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 43, 44
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
--- END ---