BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.690 and 1983 c 247 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who uses a toll bridge, toll tunnel, toll road, or
toll ferry, and the approaches thereto, operated by the state of
Washington, the department of transportation, ((or any)) a political
subdivision or municipal corporation empowered to operate toll
facilities, or an entity operating a toll facility under a contract
with the department of transportation, a political subdivision, or
municipal corporation, at the entrance to which appropriate signs have
been erected to notify both pedestrian and vehicular traffic that it is
entering a toll facility or its approaches and is subject to the
payment of tolls at the designated station for collecting tolls,
commits a traffic infraction if:
(((1) Such)) (a) The person does not pay, refuses to pay, evades,
or attempts to evade the payment of such tolls, or uses or attempts to
use any spurious ((or)), counterfeit, or stolen ticket((s)),
coupon((s)), ((or)) token((s)), or electronic device for payment of any
such tolls, or
(((2) Such)) (b) The person turns, or attempts to turn, the vehicle
around in the bridge, tunnel, loading terminal, approach, or toll plaza
where signs have been erected forbidding such turns, or
(((3) Such)) (c) The person refuses to move a vehicle through the
toll ((gates)) facility after having come within the area where signs
have been erected notifying traffic that it is entering the area where
toll is collectible or where vehicles may not turn around and where
vehicles are required to pass through the toll ((gates)) facility for
the purpose of collecting tolls.
(2) A law enforcement officer may issue a notice of traffic
infraction or a notice may be mailed to the registered owner of the
vehicle or person renting the vehicle for violation of this section.
(3) In accordance with RCW 46.16.216, upon request by the
department of transportation, the department shall suspend the renewal
of the vehicle registration of a person who does not respond to the
notice of infraction issued for toll violations under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.030 and 2002 c 279 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A law enforcement officer has the authority to issue a notice
of traffic infraction:
(a) When the infraction is committed in the officer's presence;
(b) When the officer is acting upon the request of a law
enforcement officer in whose presence the traffic infraction was
committed; ((or))
(c) If an officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle
accident has reasonable cause to believe that the driver of a motor
vehicle involved in the accident has committed a traffic infraction; or
(d) When the notice of infraction is mailed to the registered owner
or the person renting a vehicle as authorized under subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) When a photo monitoring system is used in compliance with
section 4 of this act, a law enforcement officer, whether present or
not during the commission of the infraction, or other law enforcement
agency with jurisdiction may issue a notice of infraction by mail to
the registered owner of the vehicle, or to the person renting the
vehicle. The law enforcement officer shall include with the notice of
infraction a certificate or facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of
photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded images
produced by a photo monitoring system, stating the facts supporting the
notice of infraction. This certificate or facsimile is prima facie
evidence of the facts contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding
charging a violation of this section or of toll collection rules. The
photographs, digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other
recorded images evidencing the violation must be available for
inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate
the liability for the violation.
(3) Unless issued in person by an officer, the notice of infraction
must be mailed to the registered owner within sixty days of the toll
violation.
(4) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for a
violation unless within fifteen days after issuance of the violation,
if the notice is issued in person, or within eighteen days of the date
of mailing if the notice is mailed, the owner furnishes the officials
or agents of the municipality that issued the notice of infraction
with:
(a) A statement made under oath, stating that the vehicle involved
was, at the time, stolen or in the care, custody, or control of some
person other than the registered owner; or
(b) Testimony in open court under oath that the person was not the
operator of the vehicle at the time of the alleged violation.
(((2))) (5) A court may issue a notice of traffic infraction upon
receipt of a written statement of the officer that there is reasonable
cause to believe that an infraction was committed.
(((3))) (6) If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked,
standing, or stopped in violation of this title or an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution, the officer finding the vehicle shall take its registration
number and may take any other information displayed on the vehicle
which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to the
vehicle a notice of traffic infraction.
(((4))) (7) In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle
under RCW 46.55.120, upon receiving a complaint by a registered tow
truck operator that has incurred costs in removing, storing, and
disposing of an abandoned vehicle, an officer of the law enforcement
agency responsible for directing the removal of the vehicle shall send
a notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known address of
the person responsible under RCW 46.55.105. The notice must be
entitled "Littering -- Abandoned Vehicle" and give notice of the monetary
penalty. The officer shall append to the notice of infraction, on a
form prescribed by the department of licensing, a notice indicating the
amount of costs incurred as a result of removing, storing, and
disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at
auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction
will not be considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty
payable under this chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied
that the person has made restitution in the amount of the deficiency
remaining after disposal of the vehicle.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.63.140 and 1980 c 128 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In any traffic infraction case involving a violation of this
title or equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance,
regulation, or resolution relating to the stopping, standing, or
parking of a vehicle, proof that the particular vehicle described in
the notice of traffic infraction was stopping, standing, or parking in
violation of any such provision of this title or an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution, together with proof that the person named in the notice of
traffic infraction was at the time of the violation the registered
owner of the vehicle, ((shall)) constitutes in evidence a prima facie
presumption that the registered owner of the vehicle was the person who
parked or placed the vehicle at the point where, and for the time
during which, the violation occurred.
(2) The foregoing stated presumption ((shall apply)) applies only
when the procedure prescribed in RCW 46.63.030(((3))) (6) has been
followed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW
to read as follows:
A notice of infraction issued under RCW 46.61.690 for evasion of
toll collection systems is subject to the requirements of this section.
Toll collection systems include manual cash collection, electronic toll
collection, and photo monitoring systems.
(1) "Electronic toll collection system" means a system of
collecting tolls or charges that is capable of charging the account of
the toll patron the appropriate toll or charge by electronic
transmission from the motor vehicle to the toll collection system,
which information is used to charge the appropriate toll or charge to
the patron's account. The department of transportation shall adopt
rules that allow automatic vehicle identification transponders used for
electronic toll collection to be compatible with other electronic
payment devices or transponders from the Washington state ferry system,
other public transportation systems, or other toll collection systems
to the extent that technology permits.
(2) "Photo monitoring system" means a vehicle sensor installed to
work in conjunction with an electronic toll collection system in a toll
facility that automatically produces one or more photographs, one or
more microphotographs, a videotape, or other recorded images of each
vehicle at the time the vehicle is used or operated within a toll
facility.
(3) The use of the photo monitoring system for issuance of notices
of infraction for toll violations is subject to the following
requirements:
(a) Photo monitoring systems may take photographs, digital
photographs, microphotographs, videotapes, or other recorded image of
the vehicle and vehicle license plate only.
(b) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner
of the vehicle, or to the renter of a vehicle within sixty days of the
toll violation, unless the notice has been issued in person by a law
enforcement officer.
(c) A person receiving a notice of infraction based on evidence
detected by a photo monitoring system may respond to the notice by mail
within eighteen days of the date the notice of infraction was mailed.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs,
digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded
images prepared under this section are for the exclusive use of the
tolling agency in the discharge of its duties under this section and
are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending
action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding relates to a toll
collection violation under this section. The tolling agency shall not
sell, distribute, or make available in any way, the names and addresses
of electronic toll collection system account holders.
(4) Infractions detected through the use of photo monitoring
systems will be recorded as stopping, standing, or parking violations
under RCW 46.61.560, but are not part of the registered owner's driving
record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120.
(5) If a notice of infraction is mailed to the registered owner
under RCW 46.63.030(2) and the registered owner is a rental car
business, the infraction will be dismissed against the business if it
mails to the issuing agency, a statement under oath stating the name
and known mailing address of the individual driving or renting the
vehicle when the infraction occurred. If the business is unable to
determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the
infraction occurred, the business must sign a statement under oath
making this statement. The statement must be mailed to the issuing law
enforcement agency within eighteen days of the mailing date of the
notice of infraction. Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing
law enforcement agency relieves a rental car business of any liability
under this chapter for the notice of infraction. A form suitable for
this purpose must be included with each notice of infraction issued to
a rental car business, along with instructions for its completion and
use. In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car
business may pay the applicable toll and fee.
(6) The legislature respectfully requests the Washington state
supreme court to amend the infraction rules for courts of limited
jurisdiction to conform to this act. Furthermore, the legislature
respectfully asks the court to create a notice of infraction that is
consistent with this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.216 and 1990 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 401 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) To renew a vehicle license, an applicant shall satisfy all
listed standing, stopping, ((and)) parking, and toll evasion violations
for the vehicle incurred while the vehicle was registered in the
applicant's name and forwarded to the department pursuant to RCW
46.20.270(3). For the purposes of this section, "listed" standing,
stopping, ((and)) parking, and toll evasion violations include only
those violations for which notice has been received from state or local
agencies by the department one hundred twenty days or more before the
date the vehicle license expires and that are placed on the records of
the department. Notice of such violations received by the department
later than one hundred twenty days before that date that are not
satisfied shall be considered by the department in connection with any
applications for license renewal in any subsequent license year. The
renewal application may be processed by the department or its agents
only if the applicant:
(a) Presents a preprinted renewal application showing no listed
standing, stopping, ((and)) parking, and toll evasion violations, or in
the absence of such presentation, the agent verifies the information
that would be contained on the preprinted renewal application; or
(b) If listed standing, stopping, ((and)) parking, and toll evasion
violations exist, presents proof of payment and pays a fifteen dollar
surcharge.
(2) The surcharge shall be allocated as follows:
(a) Ten dollars shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund to be
used exclusively for the administrative costs of the department of
licensing; and
(b) Five dollars shall be retained by the agent handling the
renewal application to be used by the agent for the administration of
this section.
(3) If there is a change in the registered owner of the vehicle,
the department shall forward the information regarding the change to
the state or local charging jurisdiction and release any hold on the
renewal of the vehicle license resulting from parking or toll evasion
violations incurred while the certificate of license registration was
in a previous registered owner's name.
(4) The department shall send to all registered owners of vehicles
who have been reported to have outstanding listed parking or toll
evasion violations, at the time of renewal, a statement setting out the
dates and jurisdictions in which the violations occurred as well as the
amounts of unpaid fines and penalties relating to them and the
surcharge to be collected.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.20.270 and 1990 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 402 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever any person is convicted of any offense for which this
title makes mandatory the suspension or revocation of the driver's
license of such person by the department, the privilege of the person
to operate a vehicle is suspended until the department takes the action
required by this chapter, and the court in which such conviction is had
shall forthwith secure the immediate forfeiture of the driver's license
of such convicted person and immediately forward such driver's license
to the department, and on failure of such convicted person to deliver
such driver's license the judge shall cause such person to be confined
for the period of such suspension or revocation or until such driver's
license is delivered to such judge: PROVIDED, That if the convicted
person testifies that he or she does not and at the time of the offense
did not have a current and valid vehicle driver's license, the judge
shall cause such person to be charged with the operation of a motor
vehicle without a current and valid driver's license and on conviction
punished as by law provided, and the department may not issue a
driver's license to such persons during the period of suspension or
revocation: PROVIDED, ALSO, That if the driver's license of such
convicted person has been lost or destroyed and such convicted person
makes an affidavit to that effect, sworn to before the judge, the
convicted person may not be so confined, but the department may not
issue or reissue a driver's license for such convicted person during
the period of such suspension or revocation: PROVIDED, That perfection
of notice of appeal shall stay the execution of sentence including the
suspension and/or revocation of the driver's license.
(2) Every court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under
this chapter, or any other act of this state or municipal ordinance
adopted by a local authority regulating the operation of motor vehicles
on highways, or any federal authority having jurisdiction over offenses
substantially the same as those set forth in Title 46 RCW which occur
on federal installations within this state, shall forward to the
department within ten days of a forfeiture of bail or collateral
deposited to secure the defendant's appearance in court, a payment of
a fine or penalty, a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt, or a finding
that any person has committed a traffic infraction an abstract of the
court record in the form prescribed by rule of the supreme court,
showing the conviction of any person or the finding that any person has
committed a traffic infraction in said court for a violation of any
said laws other than regulations governing standing, stopping, parking,
and pedestrian offenses.
(3) Every state agency or municipality having jurisdiction over
offenses committed under this chapter, or under any other act of this
state or municipal ordinance adopted by a state or local authority
regulating the operation of motor vehicles on highways, may forward to
the department within ten days of failure to respond, failure to pay a
penalty, failure to appear at a hearing to contest the determination
that a violation of any statute, ordinance, or regulation relating to
standing, stopping, ((or)) parking, or toll evasion has been committed,
or failure to appear at a hearing to explain mitigating circumstances,
an abstract of the citation record in the form prescribed by rule of
the department, showing the finding by such municipality that two or
more violations of laws governing standing, stopping, and parking have
been committed and indicating the nature of the defendant's failure to
act. Such violations may not have occurred while the vehicle is stolen
from the registered owner or is leased or rented under a bona fide
commercial vehicle lease or rental agreement between a lessor engaged
in the business of leasing vehicles and a lessee who is not the
vehicle's registered owner. The department may enter into agreements
of reciprocity with the duly authorized representatives of the states
for reporting to each other violations of laws governing standing,
stopping, and parking.
(4) For the purposes of Title 46 RCW the term "conviction" means a
final conviction in a state or municipal court or by any federal
authority having jurisdiction over offenses substantially the same as
those set forth in Title 46 RCW which occur on federal installations in
this state, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to
secure a defendant's appearance in court, the payment of a fine, a plea
of guilty, or a finding of guilt on a traffic law violation charge,
regardless of whether the imposition of sentence or sanctions are
deferred or the penalty is suspended, but not including entry into a
deferred prosecution agreement under chapter 10.05 RCW.
(5) For the purposes of Title 46 RCW the term "finding that a
traffic infraction has been committed" means a failure to respond to a
notice of infraction or a determination made by a court pursuant to
this chapter. Payment of a monetary penalty made pursuant to RCW
46.63.070(2) is deemed equivalent to such a finding.

--- END ---