BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Washington's utilities have been historical leaders in
developing cost-effective renewable hydropower energy and investing in
cost-effective energy efficiency, and the state economy has greatly
benefited from the strong foundation of low-cost hydropower generation
as well as forward-looking investments in energy efficiency, that have
stimulated economic development, reduced operating costs for
businesses, made industries more competitive, made homes more
comfortable and efficient, reduced the energy burden of low-income
households, and protected the environment;
(2) The western energy crisis of 2000-2001 demonstrated the
vulnerability of an energy system reliant on transmission of
electricity from distant load centers, increasingly strained water
resources, and natural gas impacted by volatile market prices;
(3) Washington electric ratepayers benefit from resource planning
and acquisition that hedges against future fuel price risk by assisting
utilities in developing a diverse portfolio of resources to meet
customer needs;
(4) Fuel diversity, economic, and environmental benefits from
renewable energy and efficiency resources accrue to the public at
large, and therefore all consumers and utilities should support
consistent development of these resources to meet the state's electric
demand and stabilize electricity prices through tax incentives for
renewable resource and energy efficiency investments.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.02567 and 2001 c 213 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales of machinery and equipment used directly in generating
electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, or landfill gas as the
principal source of power, or ((to sales of or charges made for labor
and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment)) another eligible renewable resource, except a dedicated
resource, but only if the purchaser:
(a) Develops with ((such)) the machinery, and equipment((, and
labor)) a facility capable of generating not less than two hundred
watts of electricity and;
(b) Provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department, and the department with a
duplicate of the certificate or a summary of exempt sales as the
department may require; and
(c) If the purchaser is an electric utility, has entered into an
agreement with the department of revenue under section 5 or 6 of this
act. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02567:
(a) "Landfill gas" means biomass fuel of the type qualified for
federal tax credits under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 collected from a landfill.
"Landfill" means a landfill as defined under RCW 70.95.030;
(b) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities that are integral and necessary to the
generation of electricity using wind, sun, or landfill gas as the
principal source of power((;
(c) "Machinery and equipment")) or other renewable resources; but
does not include: (i) Hand-powered tools; (ii) property with a useful
life of less than one year; (iii) repair parts required to restore
machinery and equipment to normal working order; (iv) replacement parts
that do not increase productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the
useful life of machinery and equipment; (v) buildings; or (vi) building
fixtures that are not integral and necessary to the generation of
electricity that are permanently affixed to and become a physical part
of a building;
(((d))) (c) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in
generating electricity ((with)) by a fuel cell((s)) or by wind energy,
solar energy, ((or)) landfill gas power, or another eligible renewable
resource if it provides any part of the process that captures the
energy of the wind, sun, ((or)) landfill gas or from another renewable
resource, converts that energy to electricity, and stores, transforms,
or transmits that electricity for entry into or operation in parallel
with electric transmission and distribution systems;
(((e))) (d) "Fuel cell" means an electrochemical reaction that
generates electricity by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the
presence of a catalyst and does not use hydrogen that is reformed on-site from a fossil fuel.
(e) "Electric utility" has the meaning in section 4 of this act.
(f) "Eligible renewable resource" has the meaning in section 4 of
this act.
(g) "Renewable resource" has the meaning in section 4 of this act.
(h) "Dedicated resource" has the meaning in section 4 of this act.
(3) The department of revenue, after consultation with the
utilities and transportation commission in the case of electrical
companies and the department of community, trade, and economic
development in the case of consumer-owned utilities, determines the
eligibility of individual projects and measures for deductions under
this section and compliance with sections 5 and 6 of this act.
(4) This section expires June 30, ((2009)) 2023.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.02567 and 2003 c 5 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply with
respect to machinery and equipment used directly in generating not less
than two hundred watts of electricity using wind, sun, or landfill gas
as the principal source of power, or ((to the use of labor and services
rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment)) from
a fuel cell or eligible renewable resource other than a dedicated
resource, if the user provides the department with:
(a) An exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department within sixty days of the first use of the machinery and
equipment in this state; or
(b) An annual summary listing the machinery and equipment by
January 31st of the year following the calendar year in which the
machinery and equipment is first used in this state; and
(c) If the user is an electric utility, has entered into a
renewable energy acquisition agreement with the department of revenue
under section 5 or 6 of this act.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this section.
(3) The department of revenue, after consultation with the
utilities and transportation commission in the case of electrical
companies and the department of community, trade, and economic
development in the case of consumer-owned utilities, determines the
eligibility of individual projects and measures for deductions under
this section and compliance with sections 5 and 6 of this act.
(4) This section expires June 30, ((2009)) 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agreement effective date" means the calendar year in which an
electric utility begins to acquire electrical energy or capacity under
a renewable energy acquisition agreement with the department of
revenue.
(2) "Base year" means the calendar year in which an electric
utility entered into an energy efficiency acquisition agreement with
the department of revenue.
(3) "Cogeneration" means the sequential generation, in either
order, of electrical energy and useful thermal energy, such as heat or
steam, from the same primary energy source or fuel in which the useful
thermal energy is used in a manufacturing process, space heating, or
cooling.
(4) "Cogeneration facility" means any machinery, equipment,
structure, process, or property, or any part thereof, installed or
acquired for the purpose of cogeneration.
(5) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(6) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption as a result of increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, transmission, or distribution without reducing the level of
energy service.
(7) "Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipality, public
utility district, irrigation district, cooperative association, port
district, or water-sewer district engaged in the business of
distributing electricity to one or more retail electric customers in
the state.
(8) "Conventional resource" means hydroelectric generation, natural
gas generation, or coal generation, as defined in RCW 19.29A.010.
(9) "Cooperative association" means a cooperative association or
mutual corporation or association organized under chapter 23.86 or
24.06 RCW.
(10) "Cost-effective" has the meaning in RCW 80.52.030.
(11) "Dedicated resource" means a qualified conventional resource
used by an electric utility to shape and firm electrical output from an
eligible renewable resource so that resource will mimic the capacity
factor and operational characteristics of a combined cycle combustion
turbine. A dedicated resource includes a stated quantity of electric
generation capacity or energy tied directly to a specific generation
facility or set of facilities either through ownership or contractual
purchase, or a contractual right to a stated quantity of electric
generation capacity or energy from a specific generation facility or
set of facilities. A dedicated resource is an eligible renewable
resource under this chapter only for the amount of electrical capacity
used to shape and firm the electrical output of an eligible renewable
resource that is not a qualified conventional resource.
(12) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(13) "Electric utility" means any electrical company or consumer-owned utility.
(14) "Electrical company" means a company that meets the definition
in RCW 80.04.010 and is owned by investors.
(15) "Eligible net-metered generation" means an electricity
generation system that meets the criteria of a net metering system as
defined in RCW 80.60.010 and uses as its fuel a renewable resource.
(16) "Eligible renewable resources" means a renewable resource that
supplies electricity to electric utilities in Washington from the
following:
(a) A nonhydropower renewable resource that began operation after
April 1, 1999, and any subsequent additions to those facilities;
(b) Additional power produced, above original design
specifications, by hydropower facilities that were operating on April
1, 1999, are located in the Pacific Northwest, and that were improved
or upgraded after April 1, 1999, to increase capacity or efficiency;
(c) Hydropower facilities that operate with a head of twenty meters
or less and that began operation after April 1, 1999;
(d) Additions to hydropower generating capacity operating on April
1, 1999, in irrigation pipes and canals located in the Pacific
Northwest, that result from upgrades or improvements made after April
1, 1999, and do not result in any new water diversions;
(e) Dedicated resources;
(f) Eligible net-metered generation; or
(g) High-efficiency cogeneration.
(17) "Full requirements consumer-owned utility" means a consumer-owned utility that has contracted with the Bonneville Power
Administration for resources sufficient to meet its firm power load.
(18) "Governing body" means the board of directors, council,
commission, or board that is legally responsible for the management of
a consumer-owned utility.
(19) "High efficiency cogeneration" means a cogeneration facility
that achieves at least a doubling of previous energy resource
utilization by the facility owner or operator, or that has a combined
fuel conversion efficiency of at least eighty percent.
(20) "Incremental retail load growth" means an electric utility's
forecasted retail load growth to serve retail electric customers in
Washington for any twenty-five year period beginning after April 1,
1999.
(21) "Irrigation district" means a district formed under chapter
87.03 RCW.
(22) "Low income" means a household meeting the income eligibility
guidelines determined by the department.
(23) "Low-income energy efficiency services" include energy-related
repairs, weatherization, installation of energy-efficient appliances
and fixtures for low-income residences, and investment in new
construction of low-income households that exceed the state energy
code, as well as energy education, for the purpose of enhancing energy
efficiency.
(24) "Municipality" means a city or town that is authorized to own
or operate an electric utility under chapter 35.92 RCW.
(25) "New eligible renewable resource" means a nonhydropower
renewable resource that began operation after July 1, 2004, and any
subsequent additions to those facilities.
(26) "Pacific Northwest" has the meaning in section 3 of the
Pacific Northwest electric power planning and conservation act, P.L.
96-501 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 389a; 94 Stat. 2698).
(27) "Port district" means a port district within which an
industrial development district has been established as authorized by
Title 53 RCW.
(28) "Public utility district" means a district formed under
chapter 54.04 RCW.
(29) "Qualified conventional resource" means (a) qualified
hydropower; or (b) natural gas generation, as defined in RCW
19.29A.010, that has mitigated its emissions of carbon dioxide pursuant
to the laws of this or any other state in the Pacific Northwest.
(30) "Qualified hydropower" means (a) a hydropower generating
facility that has been issued a license by the federal energy
regulatory commission pursuant to the federal power act (16 U.S.C. Sec.
791 et seq.) after enactment of the electric consumers protection act
of 1986, P.L. 99-495, which afforded equal consideration to power and
nonpower values in the determination of the federal energy regulatory
commission of whether or not to issue a license for a hydropower
project; and (b) firming and shaping products purchased from a federal
power marketing agency and supported by hydropower facilities owned and
operated by agencies of the federal government.
(31) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable certificate of
proof of one megawatt-hour of electricity generated from a tradable
renewable resource if the credit is obtained after July 1, 2001.
(32) "Renewable resources" means electricity generation facilities
fueled by: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) hydrogen; (d) solar energy; (e)
geothermal energy; (f) landfill gas; (g) biomass energy based on animal
waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues, or
dedicated energy crops that do not include wood pieces treated with
chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or
copper-chrome-arsenic; (h) wave or tidal action; or (i) gas from sewage
treatment facilities.
(33) "Retail electric customer" means a person or entity in
Washington that purchases electricity for ultimate consumption and not
for resale.
(34) "Retail load" means the number of kilowatt-hours of
electricity delivered by an electric utility to its Washington retail
customers.
(35) "Small utility" means a small utility as defined in RCW
19.29A.010.
(36) "Tradable renewable resource" means: (a) An eligible
renewable resource other than a dedicated resource; and (b) any
nonhydropower renewable resource located within the jurisdiction of the
western energy coordinating council, or its successor entity, that
commenced operation or made additions to the facilities after April 1,
1999.
(37) "Water-sewer district" means a district formed under Title 57
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) To claim a tax deduction or exemption
under RCW 82.08.02567, 82.12.02567, or section 7 (1) or (2) of this act
an electric utility must enter into a renewable energy acquisition
agreement with the department of revenue and comply with the
requirements of this section.
(2)(a) Before entering into an agreement with the department of
revenue, an electric utility must prepare a prospective incremental
load growth forecast for a twenty year period. An electrical company
must prepare and update its forecast pursuant to rules adopted by the
commission. A consumer-owned utility must prepare and update its
forecast pursuant to rules adopted by the department. The department
shall develop guidelines for, and provide assistance to, full
requirements consumer-owned utilities in the development of the
incremental load forecasts required under this subsection. The purpose
of the guidelines and assistance is to reduce the administrative burden
of preparing the forecasts. These guidelines may provide for load
forecasting by small utilities that relies on historical load growth.
(b) An electric utility must conduct a resource cost analysis
before it acquires any new eligible renewable resource under a
renewable energy acquisition agreement with the department of revenue.
When an electric utility initiates a process to acquire electric
generation capacity or energy, the electric utility must quantify the
cost of new conventional resources and the cost of new eligible
renewable resources to determine the availability of cost-effective new
renewable resources. To quantify the costs of these resources, an
electric utility may either identify the cost of developing the
resources itself, or issue a request for proposals to identify the
market cost of new conventional resources and new eligible renewable
resources. Full requirements consumer-owned utilities may use the
published rates of the Bonneville Power Administration for firm
supplies as a substitute for the cost analysis required for new
conventional resources.
(c) The cost analysis must identify for a period of at least twenty
years: (i) All costs associated with owning and operating new
conventional resources and new eligible renewable resources, and
purchasing the resources through contract; (ii) all costs associated
with integrating a new eligible renewable resource within the utility's
system including, but not limited to, shaping and firming the resource,
if necessary; (iii) the cost or value of transmission capacity or
rights needed to convey electrical energy from a new conventional
resource or new eligible renewable resource to the contractual or
operational point of delivery onto the utility's distribution system;
and (iv) the estimated value of tax incentives available under RCW
82.08.02567, 82.12.02567, or section 7 (1) or (2) of this act.
(d) If the cost analysis shows that the cost of the lowest cost new
eligible renewable resource, without considering the estimated value of
tax incentives under RCW 82.08.02567, 82.12.02567, or section 7 (1) or
(2) of this act, is less than or equal to the cost of the lowest cost
new conventional resource, then the tax incentives under RCW
82.08.02567, 82.12.02567, or section 7 (1) or (2) of this act are not
available to the electric utility for the acquisition of the new
eligible renewable resource. Even though a new eligible renewable
resource may not qualify for the tax incentives under RCW 82.08.02567,
82.12.02567, or section 7 (1) or (2) of this act, the new eligible
renewable resource, if acquired by the electric utility, will still
count toward the renewable energy standard in this section.
(e) The commission, in the case of an investor-owned utility, and
the department, in the case of a consumer-owned utility, shall adopt
comparable rules to govern the cost analysis, including, but not
limited to, criteria under which the results of the analysis will be
verified by the commission and the department.
(4) An electric utility that enters into a renewable energy
acquisition agreement with the department of revenue under this section
is subject to the following renewable energy standard:
(a) Within five years of the agreement's effective date, the
utility must acquire on an annual average an amount of electric
generation capacity or energy from eligible renewable resources, or
renewable energy credits equivalent to fifteen percent of its
incremental retail load growth, if the utility has forecasted any
incremental growth load.
(b) Within ten years of the agreement's effective date, the utility
must acquire on an annual average an amount of electric generation
capacity or energy from eligible renewable resources, or renewable
energy credits equivalent to twenty-five percent of its incremental
retail load growth, if the utility has forecasted any incremental
growth load.
(c) Within fifteen years of the agreement's effective date, the
utility must acquire on an annual average an amount of electric
generation capacity or energy from eligible renewable resources, or
renewable energy credits equivalent to thirty-five percent of its
incremental retail load growth, if the utility has forecasted any
incremental growth load.
(5) An eligible renewable resource acquired by an electric utility
between April 1, 1999, and the agreement's effective date counts toward
the renewable energy standard.
(6) Nothing in this section limits an electric utility from
exceeding the renewable energy standard under this section. Nothing in
this section requires an electric utility to have any forecasted
incremental load growth to enter into a renewable energy acquisition
agreement under this section.
(7) No electrical company may purchase eligible renewable resources
through contract from an affiliated interest of the electrical company
as defined in RCW 80.16.010 unless it has issued a request for
proposals from other suppliers based upon the same terms and conditions
that would apply to a contract with an affiliated interest and the
commission determines the proposal from its affiliated interest is the
lowest cost option.
(8) The commission, in the case of an electrical company, and the
department, in the case of a consumer-owned utility, determines the
date by which an electric utility is deemed to begin to acquire
electric generation capacity for the purpose of subsection (3) of this
section.
(9) If at any time after an agreement's effective date, the utility
determines that an insufficient amount of cost-effective renewable
resources is available for it to comply with the renewable energy
standard in this section, the utility may petition the commission, in
the case of an electrical company, or the department, in the case of a
consumer-owned utility, for a lesser renewable energy standard which
may be applied retroactively. The lesser standard adopted under this
subsection must take into account results of any and all cost analyses
conducted by an electric utility under this section. The department of
revenue must amend its agreement with the affected electric utility to
reflect any change made to the utility's renewable energy standard.
(10) The commission has sole authority to approve criteria, program
implementation guidelines and schedules, and goals for electrical
companies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) To claim a tax deduction under section
7(3) of this act, an electric utility must enter into an energy
efficiency acquisition agreement with the department of revenue and
comply with the energy efficiency standard of this section.
(2) Before entering into an energy efficiency acquisition agreement
with the department of revenue, an electric utility must calculate the
amount it expended on energy efficiency programs in 2003 and quantify,
as may be practicable, the amount of energy savings achieved by those
expenditures as a percentage of the utility's retail electric load in
2003.
(3) The following baseline energy efficiency standard is
established:
(a) Within five years of entering into an agreement with the
department of revenue, the electric utility must on average annually
acquire cost-effective electricity savings directly attributable to
conservation programs serving its Washington retail electric customers
sufficient to meet an amount equal to seventy-five one-hundredths of
one percent of the utility's base year retail load. After five years
from the utility's base year, the electricity savings acquired from the
conservation programs implemented during the preceding five-year period
must equal at least three and seventy-five one-hundredths of one
percent of the utility's base year retail load.
(b) Within ten years of the utility's base year, the utility must
on average annually acquire cost-effective electricity savings directly
attributable to conservation programs serving its Washington retail
electric customers sufficient to meet an amount equal to eighty-five
one-hundredths of one percent of the utility's retail load in the five
years after the base year. After ten years of the base year, the
electricity savings acquired from the conservation programs implemented
during the preceding three-year period will meet at least two and
fifty-five one-hundredths of one percent of the utility's retail load
in the year five years after the base year.
(c) The utility must continue to comply with the standard
established in (b) of this subsection for each subsequent three-year
period.
(d) The amount of conservation the utility needs to acquire to meet
the standard will be based on that utility's base year retail load.
(4) Before entering into an energy efficiency acquisition
agreement, an electric utility may petition the commission, in the case
of an electrical company, or the department, in the case of a consumer-owned utility, for the establishment of a lesser energy efficiency
standard to that provided under subsection (3) of this section. The
commission and department will establish a lesser energy efficiency
standard based upon a showing that a lower standard is more appropriate
for the unique load characteristics of the electric utility. An
alternative energy efficiency standard established under this
subsection for an electric utility shall be incorporated into the
utility's energy efficiency acquisition agreement with the department
of revenue.
(5) Nothing in this section limits an electric utility from
exceeding the energy efficiency standard under this section.
(6) The utility must meet at least five percent of its annual
energy efficiency standard requirement under this section with
low-income energy efficiency services, unless it can demonstrate to the
commission in the case of an electrical company or the department in
the case of a consumer-owned utility that sufficient cost-effective
opportunities do not exist within its service territory for conserving
energy in low-income households.
(7) The utility must pursue energy conservation opportunities in
each customer class to achieve energy savings that are not
independently captured by consumer acquisition and that are
economically feasible for consumers, taking into account incentives
provided by the utility. All energy savings resulting from
appropriately targeted energy efficiency programs shall be applied
towards satisfying the energy efficiency standard. The portfolio of
energy conservation programs used to meet the efficiency standard must
be cost-effective. A conservation program implemented by an electrical
company is cost-effective if it passes the total resource cost test as
defined by the commission.
(8) The utility must use practices generally accepted in the
Pacific Northwest to measure accrued energy savings from conservation,
including monitoring and verification of those savings.
(9) In meeting the energy efficiency standard, the utility may
count conservation even if it also receives credit or funding for that
conservation from the Bonneville Power Administration.
(10) An electric utility contributing to the northwest energy
efficiency alliance on its own or through its Bonneville Power
Administration rates may count its share of annual accrued energy
savings as determined by the northwest energy efficiency alliance
towards the energy efficiency standard under this section. The credit
taken under this subsection may not exceed twenty percent of the
utility's annual energy efficiency standard requirement.
(11)(a) For electrical companies, the commission must develop
criteria for cost-effective conservation that qualifies toward the
energy efficiency standard and program implementation guidelines,
including verifying and monitoring savings. The commission must
consider all existing and appropriate criteria and guidelines where
applicable, and may rely on work of regional power planning committees
in determining criteria and guidelines.
(b) For consumer-owned utilities, the department must develop
criteria for cost-effective conservation that qualifies toward the
energy efficiency standard and program implementation guidelines,
including verifying and monitoring savings. The department must
consider all existing and appropriate criteria and guidelines where
applicable, and may rely on work of regional power planning committees
in determining criteria and guidelines.
(12) If an electric utility can demonstrate to the commission in
the case of an electrical company or the department in the case of a
consumer-owned utility that it is unable to meet the energy efficiency
standard created under this section due to a lack of sufficient
opportunities for acquiring cost-effective conservation, the commission
or department will adopt a lesser standard for the utility. The lesser
standard may be retroactive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax under this chapter, a light and power
business may deduct from gross income an amount equal to:
(a) The cost of production of electrical energy produced or
generated from an eligible renewable resource other than a dedicated
resource, built and owned by a light and power business on or after
July 1, 2004, and used for consumption within the state;
(b) The amount paid by a light and power business to purchase
energy or capacity from an eligible renewable resource other than a
dedicated resource, by contract entered into after July 1, 2004, and
used for consumption within the state; and
(c) The amount paid by a light and power business to purchase
renewable energy credits after July 1, 2001.
(2) In computing the tax under this chapter, a light and power
business may deduct from gross income an amount equal to the cost or
value of transmission capacity or rights acquired by the business after
July 1, 2004, and needed to convey electrical energy from an eligible
renewable resource to the contractual or operational point of delivery
into the distribution system of the light and power business.
(3) In computing the tax under this chapter, a light and power
business may deduct from gross income an amount equal to amounts
expended, less an amount equal to the amount expended by the light and
power business in the base year of the agreement, to improve consumers'
efficiency of energy end use or to otherwise reduce the use of
electrical energy or gas by the consumer.
(4) Deductions under subsection (1) of this section are allowed for
a period not more than thirty years after the project is placed in
operation.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) When a light and power business purchases renewable energy by
contract, "the cost of production at the plant" means the purchase
price for electrical energy or capacity under the contract;
(b) "Renewable energy credit" has the meaning in section 4 of this
act;
(c) "Eligible renewable resource" has the meaning in section 4 of
this act; and
(d) "Dedicated resource" has the meaning in section 4 of this act.
(6) The department of revenue, after consultation with the
utilities and transportation commission in the case of electrical
companies and the department of community, trade, and economic
development in the case of consumer-owned utilities, determines the
eligibility of individual projects and measures for deductions under
this section. No light and power business may take a deduction under
this section unless it has entered into a renewable energy acquisition
agreement or energy efficiency acquisition agreement with the
department of revenue.
(7) No new deduction may be taken under this section after June 30,
2023.
(8) This section expires July 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1)(a) An electric utility may receive
additional credit toward meeting the renewable energy standard under
section 5 of this act and may claim an additional tax exemption under
section 9 of this act if it acquires eligible renewable resources other
than dedicated resources, physically located in Washington state if:
(i) Construction began after December 31, 2003; and
(ii) The electric utility purchased or contracted for the eligible
renewable resource by December 31, 2007.
(b) An electric utility that acquires energy from an eligible
renewable resource that meets the criteria of this section may count
that resource above its base value in meeting the renewable energy
standard as follows:
(i) Energy purchased or contracted by December 31, 2004, can be
counted at one and one-tenth times its base value;
(ii) Energy purchased or contracted by December 31, 2005, can be
counted at one and nine-hundredths times its base value;
(iii) Energy purchased or contracted by December 31, 2006, can be
counted at one and eight-hundredths times its base value; or
(iv) Energy purchased or contracted by December 31, 2007, can be
counted at one and seven-hundredths times its base value.
(2)(a) An electric utility may receive additional credit toward
meeting the renewable energy standard if it acquires eligible renewable
resources other than dedicated resources, physically located in
Washington state or renewable energy credits from an eligible renewable
resource physically located in Washington state if:
(i) Construction began after December 31, 2003; and
(ii) The renewable energy developer used apprenticeship programs
during construction of the eligible renewable resources.
(b) The apprenticeship programs must be approved by the
apprenticeship council under its authority in chapter 49.04 RCW, and
minimum levels of apprenticeship programs must be:
(i) Ten percent of total labor hours for projects beginning
construction after December 31, 2007;
(ii) Twelve and one-half percent of total labor hours for projects
beginning construction after December 31, 2014; and
(iii) Fifteen percent of total labor hours for projects beginning
construction after December 31, 2021.
(c) The apprenticeship council will determine compliance with (b)
of this subsection.
(d) An electric utility that acquires energy or renewable energy
credits from an eligible renewable resource other than a dedicated
resource that meets the criteria under this subsection may count that
resource at one and two-tenths times its base value in meeting the
renewable energy standard.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to labor or
services rendered in respect to installing machinery and equipment used
directly in generating electricity from a fuel cell or eligible
renewable resource other than a dedicated resource, but only if the
purchaser has entered into a renewable energy acquisition agreement
with the department of revenue as provided in section 5 of this act,
develops with the labor a facility capable of generating at least two
hundred kilowatts of electricity and provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department
by rule, and the purchaser provides the department with a duplicate of
the certificate or a summary of exempt sales as the department may
require. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Eligible renewable resource" has the meaning in section 4 of
this act.
(b) "Electric utility" has the meaning in section 4 of this act.
(c) "Fuel cell" has the meaning in RCW 82.08.02567.
(d) "Machinery and equipment" has the meaning in RCW 82.08.02567.
(e) "Renewable resource" has the meaning in section 4 of this act.
(f) "Dedicated resource" has the meaning in section 4 of this act.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 An electric utility may receive credit
towards meeting the energy efficiency or renewable energy standards
under this chapter when it also receives credit or funding for those
same resources under an energy efficiency or renewable energy standard
established by federal legislation. However, an electric utility may
not receive credit towards meeting the energy efficiency or renewable
energy standards when it also receives credit or funding for those same
resources under an energy efficiency or renewable energy standard
established by legislation in another state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The department may adopt rules
applicable to consumer-owned utilities for the purposes of: (a)
Verifying load resource balance; (b) verifying a lack of sufficient
opportunities for cost-effective renewable resources; (c) verifying a
lack of sufficient opportunities for cost-effective conservation; (d)
establishing a lesser renewable energy standard; (e) establishing a
lesser energy efficiency standard; (f) determining the
cost-effectiveness of eligible renewable resources; and (g) verifying
compliance with the renewable energy and energy efficiency standards.
(2) The commission may adopt rules applicable to electrical
companies for the purposes of: (a) Verifying load resource balance;
(b) verifying a lack of sufficient opportunities for cost-effective
renewable resources; (c) verifying a lack of sufficient opportunities
for cost-effective conservation; (d) establishing a lesser renewable
energy standard; (e) establishing a lesser energy efficiency standard;
(f) determining the cost-effectiveness of eligible renewable resources;
and (g) verifying compliance with the renewable energy and energy
efficiency standards.
(3) Any rules adopted pursuant to this section must be adopted
before an electric utility may enter into an agreement with the
department of revenue under sections 5 and 6 of this act.
(4) The department must convene a group of stakeholders, including
the commission, to advise it on the establishment of a new or selection
of an existing system of renewable energy credits that may be used to
comply with the renewable energy standard under section 5 of this act.
The department will consider all existing and appropriate systems and
organizations that facilitate renewable energy credit trading
westernwide or nationally.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) On or before June 1, 2008, and annually
thereafter, an electric utility that has entered into an agreement
under section 5 or 6 of this act must demonstrate progress in meeting
the energy efficiency and renewable energy standards in this chapter
for the annual period ending the previous December 31st. The
department and commission may share this information with each other.
Each report must include at least the following: (a) The amount of
electricity generated or acquired from eligible renewable resources;
(b) the amount of renewable energy credits acquired, sold, or traded;
(c) the annual retail load for an electric utility or the annual
electricity consumption data; and (d) the amount of conservation
annually acquired. Each electrical company will report to the
commission and each consumer-owned utility will report to the
department.
(2) Reports submitted to the commission and department shall also
be provided to the department of revenue, which may conduct an
independent audit of the records submitted by electric utilities.
(3) On or before December 1, 2010, and biennially thereafter, the
department and commission shall submit a report to the legislature on
the accomplishments of the energy efficiency and renewable energy
standards voluntarily entered into by electric utilities under this
act.
(4) On or before December 1, 2010, and biennially thereafter, the
department of revenue shall submit a report to the legislature on the
amount or value of tax deductions and exemptions claimed pursuant to
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 3 through 6, 8, and 10 through 12
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

--- END ---