BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.470 and 1991 c 199 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish((,)) by rule ((under chapter
34.05 RCW,)): (a) A statewide opacity level of twenty percent for
((residential)) solid fuel burning devices ((for the purpose of
enforcement on a complaint basis)); and (b) a statewide opacity of ten
percent for purposes of public education.
(2) For the purpose of enforcement on a complaint basis in a wood
smoke concentration area, it is unlawful for emissions, other than
uncombined water vapor, from a solid fuel burning device to visibly
enter that portion of a neighboring property that immediately surrounds
a dwelling.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter which may
allow an authority to adopt a more stringent opacity level, no
authority shall adopt or enforce an opacity level for solid fuel
burning devices other than established in this section.
(((3))) (4) Actions of the department and local air pollution
control authorities under this section shall preempt actions of other
state agencies and local governments for the purposes of controlling
air pollution from solid fuel burning devices, except where authorized
by chapter 199, Laws of 1991.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.94.473 and 1998 c 342 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any person in a residence or commercial establishment which
has an adequate source of heat without burning wood shall:
(((a))) (i) Not burn wood in any solid fuel burning device whenever
the department has determined under RCW 70.94.715 that any air
pollution episode exists in that area;
(((b))) (ii) Not burn wood in any solid fuel burning device except
those which are either Oregon department of environmental quality phase
II or United States environmental protection agency certified or
certified by the department under RCW 70.94.457(1) or a pellet stove
either certified or issued an exemption by the United States
environmental protection agency in accordance with Title 40, Part 60 of
the code of federal regulations, in the geographical area and for the
period of time that a first stage of impaired air quality has been
determined, by the department or any authority, for that area. A first
stage of impaired air quality is reached when:
(A) Fine particulates ((ten microns and smaller in diameter)) are
at an ambient level of ((sixty)) thirty-five micrograms per cubic meter
measured on a twenty-four hour average ((or when carbon monoxide is at
an ambient level of eight parts of contaminant per million parts of air
by volume measured on an eight-hour average)); and
(B) Forecasted meteorological conditions are not expected to allow
levels of fine particulates to decline below thirty-five micrograms per
cubic meter for a period of forty-eight hours or more from the time
that the fine particulates are measured at the trigger level; and
(((c))) (iii) Not burn wood in any solid fuel burning device in a
geographical area and for the period of time that a second stage of
impaired air quality has been determined by the department or any
authority, for that area. A second stage of impaired air quality is
reached when ((particulates ten microns and smaller in diameter are at
an ambient level of one hundred five micrograms per cubic meter
measured on a twenty-four hour average)):
(A) A first stage of impaired air quality has been in force and not
been sufficient to reduce the increasing fine particle pollution trend;
and
(B) Fine particulates are at an ambient level of sixty micrograms
per cubic meter measured on a twenty-four hour average; and
(C) Forecasted meteorological conditions are not expected to allow
levels of fine particulates to decline below sixty micrograms per cubic
meter for a period of forty-eight hours or more from the time that the
fine particulates are measured at the trigger level.
(b) Visible emissions, other than uncombined water vapor, from a
chimney, flue, or similar exhaust outlet three hours or more after the
declaration of the episode or period of impaired air quality under this
section or under RCW 70.94.715 constitutes prima facie evidence of
unlawful operation of a solid fuel burning device prohibited under
(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection.
(2) Actions of the department and local air pollution control
authorities under this section shall preempt actions of other state
agencies and local governments for the purposes of controlling air
pollution from solid fuel burning devices, except where authorized by
chapter 199, Laws of 1991.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.94.030 and 1993 c 252 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context,
the following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter
shall have the following meanings:)) The definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Air contaminant" means dust, fumes, mist, smoke, other
particulate matter, vapor, gas, odorous substance, or any combination
thereof.
(2) "Air pollution" is presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or
more air contaminants in sufficient quantities and of such
characteristics and duration as is, or is likely to be, injurious to
human health, plant or animal life, or property, or which unreasonably
interfere with enjoyment of life and property. For the purpose of this
chapter, air pollution shall not include air contaminants emitted in
compliance with chapter 17.21 RCW.
(3) "Air quality standard" means an established concentration,
exposure time, and frequency of occurrence of an air contaminant or
multiple contaminants in the ambient air which shall not be exceeded.
(4) "Ambient air" means the surrounding outside air.
(5) "Authority" means any air pollution control agency whose
jurisdictional boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of one or
more counties.
(6) "Best available control technology" (BACT) means an emission
limitation based on the maximum degree of reduction for each air
pollutant subject to regulation under this chapter emitted from or that
results from any new or modified stationary source, that the permitting
authority, on a case-by-case basis, taking into account energy,
environmental, and economic impacts and other costs, determines is
achievable for such a source or modification through application of
production processes and available methods, systems, and techniques,
including fuel cleaning, clean fuels, or treatment or innovative fuel
combustion techniques for control of each such a pollutant. In no
event shall application of "best available control technology" result
in emissions of any pollutants that will exceed the emissions allowed
by any applicable standard under 40 C.F.R. Part 60 and Part 61, as they
exist on July 25, 1993, or their later enactments as adopted by
reference by the director by rule. Emissions from any source utilizing
clean fuels, or any other means, to comply with this subsection shall
not be allowed to increase above levels that would have been required
under the definition of BACT as it existed prior to enactment of the
(([federal])) federal clean air act amendments of 1990.
(7) "Best available retrofit technology" (BART) means an emission
limitation based on the degree of reduction achievable through the
application of the best system of continuous emission reduction for
each pollutant that is emitted by an existing stationary facility. The
emission limitation must be established, on a case-by-case basis,
taking into consideration the technology available, the costs of
compliance, the energy and nonair quality environmental impacts of
compliance, any pollution control equipment in use or in existence at
the source, the remaining useful life of the source, and the degree of
improvement in visibility that might reasonably be anticipated to
result from the use of the technology.
(8) "Board" means the board of directors of an authority.
(9) "Control officer" means the air pollution control officer of
any authority.
(10) "Department" or "ecology" means the department of ecology.
(11) "Emission" means a release of air contaminants into the
ambient air.
(12) "Emission standard" and "emission limitation" mean a
requirement established under the federal clean air act or this chapter
that limits the quantity, rate, or concentration of emissions of air
contaminants on a continuous basis, including any requirement relating
to the operation or maintenance of a source to assure continuous
emission reduction, and any design, equipment, work practice, or
operational standard adopted under the federal clean air act or this
chapter.
(13) "Fine particulate" means particulates with a diameter of two
and one-half microns and smaller.
(14) "Lowest achievable emission rate" (LAER) means for any source
that rate of emissions that reflects:
(a) The most stringent emission limitation that is contained in the
implementation plan of any state for such class or category of source,
unless the owner or operator of the proposed source demonstrates that
such limitations are not achievable; or
(b) The most stringent emission limitation that is achieved in
practice by such class or category of source, whichever is more
stringent.
In no event shall the application of this term permit a proposed
new or modified source to emit any pollutant in excess of the amount
allowable under applicable new source performance standards.
(((14))) (15) "Modification" means any physical change in, or
change in the method of operation of, a stationary source that
increases the amount of any air contaminant emitted by such source or
that results in the emission of any air contaminant not previously
emitted. The term modification shall be construed consistent with the
definition of modification in Section 7411, Title 42, United States
Code, and with rules implementing that section.
(((15))) (16) "Multicounty authority" means an authority which
consists of two or more counties.
(((16))) (17) "New source" means (a) the construction or
modification of a stationary source that increases the amount of any
air contaminant emitted by such source or that results in the emission
of any air contaminant not previously emitted, and (b) any other
project that constitutes a new source under the federal clean air act.
(((17))) (18) "Permit program source" means a source required to
apply for or to maintain an operating permit under RCW 70.94.161.
(((18))) (19) "Person" means an individual, firm, public or private
corporation, association, partnership, political subdivision of the
state, municipality, or governmental agency.
(((19))) (20) "Reasonably available control technology" (RACT)
means the lowest emission limit that a particular source or source
category is capable of meeting by the application of control technology
that is reasonably available considering technological and economic
feasibility. RACT is determined on a case-by-case basis for an
individual source or source category taking into account the impact of
the source upon air quality, the availability of additional controls,
the emission reduction to be achieved by additional controls, the
impact of additional controls on air quality, and the capital and
operating costs of the additional controls. RACT requirements for a
source or source category shall be adopted only after notice and
opportunity for comment are afforded.
(((20))) (21) "Silvicultural burning" means burning of wood fiber
on forest land consistent with the provisions of RCW 70.94.660.
(((21))) (22) "Source" means all of the emissions units including
quantifiable fugitive emissions, that are located on one or more
contiguous or adjacent properties, and are under the control of the
same person, or persons under common control, whose activities are
ancillary to the production of a single product or functionally related
group of products.
(((22))) (23) "Stationary source" means any building, structure,
facility, or installation that emits or may emit any air contaminant.
(24) "Trigger level" means the ambient level of fine particulates,
measured in micrograms per cubic meter, that must be detected prior to
initiating a first or second state of impaired air quality under RCW
70.94.473.
(25) "Wood smoke concentration area" means areas identified by a
multicounty authority as having historically problematic wood smoke
concentrations. A wood smoke concentration area may only be identified
by a multicounty authority that has within its jurisdiction a county of
greater than five hundred thousand residents.

--- END ---