BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.32.010 and 1971 ex.s. c 265 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to provide a mechanism for the
payment of covered claims ((under certain insurance policies)) to avoid
excessive delay in payment and to avoid financial loss to claimants or
policyholders under certain policies of insurance covered by the scope
of this chapter because of the insolvency of an insurer, to assist in
the detection and prevention of insurer insolvencies, and to provide an
association to assess the cost of such protection among insurers.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.32.020 and 1987 c 185 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter shall apply to all kinds of direct insurance, except
life, title, surety, disability, credit, mortgage guaranty, workers'
compensation, and ocean marine ((insurance)). For the purposes of this
section, "workers' compensation" means industrial insurance as defined
in Title 51 RCW, but does not include longshore and harbor workers'
compensation act insurance as defined in 33 U.S.C. Sec. 901 et seq.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.32.030 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 109 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Account" means one of the ((two)) three accounts created in
RCW 48.32.040 as now or hereafter amended.
(2) "Association" means the Washington Insurance Guaranty
Association created in RCW 48.32.040.
(3) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of this state.
(4)(a) "Covered claim" means, except under (b) of this subsection,
an unpaid claim, including one for unearned premiums, which arises out
of and is within the coverage of an insurance policy to which this
chapter applies issued by an insurer, if such insurer becomes an
insolvent insurer after the first day of April, 1971 and (((a))) (i)
the claimant or insured is a resident of this state at the time of the
insured event; or (((b))) (ii) the property from which the claim arises
is permanently located in this state. "Covered claim" shall not
include any amount due any reinsurer, insurer, insurance pool, or
underwriting association, as subrogation recoveries or otherwise:
PROVIDED, That a claim for any such amount asserted against a person
insured under a policy issued by an insurer which has become an
insolvent insurer, which, if it were not a claim by or for the benefit
of a reinsurer, insurer, insurance pool, or underwriting association,
would be a "covered claim" may be filed directly with the receiver of
the insolvent insurer, but in no event may any such claim be asserted
in any legal action against the insured of such insolvent insurer. In
addition, "covered claim" shall not include any claim filed with the
association subsequent to the final date set by the court for the
filing of claims against the liquidator or receiver of an insolvent
insurer.
(b) For longshore and harbor workers' insurance, a "covered claim"
means an unpaid claim, excluding one for unearned premiums, for
benefits due an injured worker under the provisions of the longshore
and harbor workers' compensation act as defined in 33 U.S.C. Sec. 901
et seq. which is within the scope of coverage provided under an
insurance policy to which this chapter applies issued by an insurer,
for any insurer insolvency occurring after the first day of January
2004 and (i) the worksite from which the injury occurred was within
this state or on the navigable waters within or immediately offshore of
this state, or (ii) the worksite from which the injury occurred is
outside this state but for which the insured was provided insurance
coverage under a policy of longshore and harbor workers' compensation
act insurance issued for a business located within this state.
"Covered claim" does not include any amount due any insurer, reinsurer,
insurance pool, or underwriting association, as subrogation recoveries
or otherwise.
(5) "Insolvent insurer" means an insurer (a) authorized to transact
insurance in this state either at the time the policy was issued or
when the insured event occurred and (b) determined to be insolvent and
ordered liquidated by a court of competent jurisdiction, and which
adjudication was subsequent to the first day of April((,)) 1971, or in
the case of an insurer authorized to transact longshore and harbor
workers' compensation act insurance, any insolvency occurring after
January 1, 2004.
(6) "Member insurer" means any person who (a) writes any kind of
insurance to which this chapter applies under RCW 48.32.020, including
the exchange of reciprocal or interinsurance contracts, and (b) holds
a certificate of authority to transact insurance in this state.
(7) "Net direct written premiums" means direct gross premiums
written in this state on insurance policies to which this chapter
applies, less return premiums thereon and dividends paid or credited to
policyholders on such direct business. "Net direct written premiums"
does not include premiums on contracts between insurers or reinsurers.
(8) "Person" means any individual, corporation, partnership,
association, or voluntary organization.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.32.040 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 109 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created a nonprofit unincorporated legal entity to
be known as the Washington Insurance Guaranty Association. All
insurers defined as member insurers in RCW 48.32.030(6) as now or
hereafter amended shall be and remain members of the association as a
condition of their authority to transact insurance in this state. The
association shall perform its functions under a plan of operation
established and approved under RCW 48.32.070 and shall exercise its
powers through a board of directors established under RCW 48.32.050 as
now or hereafter amended. For purposes of administration and
assessment, the association shall be divided into ((two)) three
separate accounts: (1) The automobile insurance account; (2) the
account for longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance;
and (((2))) (3) the account for all other insurance to which this
chapter applies.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.32.050 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 109 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of the association shall consist of not
less than five nor more than nine persons serving terms as established
in the plan of operation. The members of the board shall be selected
by member insurers subject to the approval of the commissioner.
Vacancies on the board shall be filled for the remaining period of the
term by a majority vote of the remaining board members, subject to the
approval of the commissioner.
(2) In approving selections to the board, the commissioner shall
consider among other things whether all member insurers are fairly
represented. In the event of the insolvency of an insurer of longshore
and harbor workers' compensation act insurance, at least one member of
the board must represent the interests of this class of insurer.
(3) Members of the board may be reimbursed from the assets of the
association for expenses incurred by them as members of the board of
directors.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.32.060 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 109 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The association shall:
(a) For other than covered claims involving the longshore and
harbor workers' compensation act, be obligated to the extent of the
covered claims existing prior to the order of liquidation and arising
within thirty days after the order of liquidation, or before the policy
expiration date if less than thirty days after the order of
liquidation, or before the insured replaces the policy or on request
effects cancellation, if he or she does so within thirty days of the
order of liquidation((, but such)). Except for covered claims
involving the longshore and harbor workers' compensation act, the
obligation shall include only that amount of each covered claim which
is in excess of one hundred dollars and is less than three hundred
thousand dollars. In no event shall the association be obligated to a
policyholder or claimant in an amount in excess of the face amount of
the policy from which the claim arises. For covered claims involving
the longshore and harbor workers' compensation act, the obligation
shall be for the statutory obligations established under the longshore
and harbor workers' compensation act.
(b) Be deemed the insurer to the extent of its obligation on the
covered claims and to such extent shall have all rights, duties, and
obligations of the insolvent insurer as if the insurer had not become
insolvent. This right includes access to any and all reinsurance that
would have inured to the benefit of the insurer had no insolvency
occurred.
(c) Allocate claims paid and expenses incurred among the ((two))
three accounts enumerated in RCW 48.32.040 ((as now or hereafter
amended separately)), and assess member insurers separately for each
account amounts necessary to pay the obligations of the association
under subsection (1)(a) ((above)) of this section subsequent to an
insolvency, the expenses of handling covered claims subsequent to an
insolvency, the cost of examinations under RCW 48.32.110, and other
expenses authorized by this chapter. Except as provided for in this
subsection for insurers of longshore and harbor workers' compensation
act insurance, the assessments of each member insurer shall be in the
proportion that the net direct written premiums of the member insurer
for the calendar year preceding the assessment on the kinds of
insurance in the account bears to the net direct written premiums of
all member insurers for the calendar year preceding the assessment on
the kinds of insurance in the account. Each member insurer shall be
notified of the assessment not later than thirty days before it is due.
No member insurer may be assessed in any year on any account an amount
greater than two percent of that member insurer's net direct written
premiums for the calendar year preceding the assessment on the kinds of
insurance in the account. If the maximum assessment, together with the
other assets of the association in any account, does not provide in any
one year in any account an amount sufficient to make all necessary
payments from that account, the funds available may be prorated and the
unpaid portion shall be paid as soon thereafter as funds become
available. The association shall pay claims in any order which it may
deem reasonable, including the payment of claims in the order such
claims are received from claimants or in groups or categories of
claims, or otherwise. The association may exempt or defer, in whole or
in part, the assessment of any member insurer, if the assessment would
cause the member insurer's financial statement to reflect amounts of
capital or surplus less than the minimum amounts required for a
certificate of authority by any jurisdiction in which the member
insurer is authorized to transact insurance. Each member insurer
serving as a servicing facility may set off against any assessment,
authorized payments made on covered claims and expenses incurred in the
payment of such claims by such member insurer if they are chargeable to
the account for which the assessment is made.
(d) For insurers of longshore and harbor workers' compensation act
insurance, the provisions of (c) of this subsection pertaining to the
assessment of insurers applies except as modified by the following:
(i) Beginning on July 1, 2004, each insurer writing coverage for
longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance in this state,
whether on a primary or excess coverage basis, shall be assessed not
more than two percent of the direct written premium on each policy of
insurance until a fund of five hundred thousand dollars has been
established in the account established by the board of directors for
this class of insurance. This assessment is authorized in excess of
any approved rate filing for that class of insurance, and may at the
option of the insurer be passed on directly to the insured.
(ii) In the event there are insufficient funds in the separate
longshore and harbor workers' compensation act account to cover paid
claim obligations of an insolvent insurer, the association is
authorized to borrow from the longshore and harbor workers'
compensation assigned risk plan, the industrial insurance fund of the
state of Washington, or other sources as approved by the commissioner
amounts sufficient to meet the claim payment obligations of the
association. These borrowed funds shall be repaid at prevailing
interest rates from the assessments of the insurers of this class of
insurance. Insurer assessments shall continue until all claim and loan
obligations of the association have been met, and shall continue until
a minimum fund deemed appropriate by the board of directors has been
reestablished.
(e) Investigate claims brought against the association and adjust,
compromise, settle, and pay covered claims to the extent of the
association's obligation and deny all other claims.
(((e))) (f) Notify such persons as the commissioner directs under
RCW 48.32.080(2)(a).
(((f))) (g) Handle claims through its employees or through one or
more insurers or other persons designated as servicing facilities.
Designation of a servicing facility is subject to the approval of the
commissioner, but such designation may be declined by a member insurer.
(((g))) (h) Reimburse each servicing facility for obligations of
the association paid by the facility and for expenses incurred by the
facility while handling claims on behalf of the association and shall
pay the other expenses of the association authorized by this chapter.
(2) The association may:
(a) Appear in, defend, and appeal any action on a claim brought
against the association.
(b) Employ or retain such persons as are necessary to handle claims
and perform other duties of the association.
(c) Borrow funds necessary to effect the purposes of this chapter
in accord with the plan of operation.
(d) Sue or be sued.
(e) Negotiate and become a party to such contracts as are necessary
to carry out the purpose of this chapter.
(f) Perform such other acts as are necessary or proper to
effectuate the purpose of this chapter.
(g) Refund to the member insurers in proportion to the contribution
of each member insurer to that account that amount by which the assets
of the account exceed the liabilities, if, at the end of any calendar
year, the board of directors finds that the assets of the association
in any account exceed the liabilities of that account as estimated by
the board of directors for the coming year.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.32.145 and 1997 c 300 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) With the exception of insurers of longshore and harbor workers'
compensation act insurance, every member insurer that prior to April 1,
1993, or after July 27, 1997, shall have paid one or more assessments
levied pursuant to RCW 48.32.060(1)(c) shall be entitled to take a
credit against any premium tax falling due under RCW 48.14.020. The
amount of the credit shall be one-fifth of the aggregate amount of such
aggregate assessments paid during such calendar year for each of the
five consecutive calendar years beginning with the calendar year
following the calendar year in which such assessments are paid.
Whenever the allowable credit is or becomes less than one thousand
dollars, the entire amount of the credit may be offset against the
premium tax at the next time the premium tax is paid.
(2) For member insurers of longshore and harbor workers'
compensation act insurance, to the extent that any assessment provided
for under RCW 48.32.060(1)(d)(i) is passed on to the policyholder, a
credit for premium tax assessments is not permitted. If any insurer
does not elect to pass this assessment on to the policyholder, then
subsection (1) of this section applies to that insurer.

--- END ---