BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.18.010 and 2002 c 294 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
County auditors or recording officers shall collect the following
fees for their official services:
(1) For recording instruments, for the first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, five dollars; for each additional page
eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar. The fee for
recording multiple transactions contained in one instrument will be
calculated for each transaction requiring separate indexing as required
under RCW 65.04.050 as follows: The fee for each title or transaction
is the same fee as the first page of any additional recorded document;
the fee for additional pages is the same fee as for any additional
pages for any recorded document; the fee for the additional pages may
be collected only once and may not be collected for each title or
transaction;
(2) For preparing and certifying copies, for the first page eight
and one-half by fourteen inches or less, three dollars; for each
additional page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one
dollar;
(3) For preparing noncertified copies, for each page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar;
(4) For administering an oath or taking an affidavit, with or
without seal, two dollars;
(5) For issuing a marriage license, eight dollars, (this fee
includes taking necessary affidavits, filing returns, indexing, and
transmittal of a record of the marriage to the state registrar of vital
statistics), plus ten dollars to be transmitted monthly to the state
treasury for deposit in the domestic violence prevention account, plus
an additional five-dollar fee for use and support of the prevention of
child abuse and neglect activities to be transmitted monthly to the
state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund plus an
additional ten-dollar fee to be transmitted monthly to the state
treasurer and deposited in the state general fund. The legislature
intends to appropriate an amount at least equal to the revenue
generated by this fee for the purposes of the displaced homemaker act,
chapter 28B.04 RCW;
(6) For searching records per hour, eight dollars;
(7) For recording plats, fifty cents for each lot except cemetery
plats for which the charge shall be twenty-five cents per lot; also one
dollar for each acknowledgment, dedication, and description: PROVIDED,
That there shall be a minimum fee of twenty-five dollars per plat;
(8) For recording of miscellaneous records not listed above, for
the first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, five
dollars; for each additional page eight and one-half by fourteen inches
or less, one dollar;
(9) For modernization and improvement of the recording and indexing
system, a surcharge as provided in RCW 36.22.170((.));
(10) For recording an emergency nonstandard document as provided in
RCW 65.04.047, fifty dollars, in addition to all other applicable
recording fees((.));
(11) For recording instruments, a surcharge as provided in RCW
36.22.178.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.04.160 and 1997 c 58 s 909 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for a marriage license must be made and filed with
the appropriate county auditor upon blanks to be provided by the county
auditor for that purpose, which application shall be under the oath of
each of the applicants, and each application shall state the name,
address at the time of execution of application, age, social security
number, birthplace, whether single, widowed or divorced, and whether
under control of a guardian, residence during the past six months:
PROVIDED, That each county may require such other and further
information on said application as it shall deem necessary.
(2)(a) The county legislative authority may impose an additional
fee up to fifteen dollars on a marriage license for the purpose of
funding family services such as family support centers.
(b) The county legislative authority may impose an additional fee
of three dollars on a marriage license to fund domestic violence
prevention services and programs within the county or, if the county
does not have such services and programs, to contract with community-based domestic violence program providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.123 RCW
to read as follows:
The domestic violence prevention account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from the marriage license fee imposed for
deposit in the domestic violence prevention act under RCW 36.18.010(5)
must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for funding nonshelter community-based services for victims of
domestic violence.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.123.030 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 235 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department of social and health services, in consultation with
the state department of health, and individuals or groups having
experience and knowledge of the problems of victims of domestic
violence, shall:
(1) Establish minimum standards for shelters applying for grants
from the department under this chapter. Classifications may be made
dependent upon size, geographic location, and population needs;
(2) Receive grant applications for the development and
establishment of shelters for victims of domestic violence;
(3) Distribute funds, within forty-five days after approval, to
those shelters meeting departmental standards;
(4) Evaluate biennially each shelter receiving departmental funds
for compliance with the established minimum standards; ((and))
(5) Review the minimum standards each biennium to ensure
applicability to community and client needs; and
(6) Administer funds available from the domestic violence
prevention account under section 3 of this act and establish minimum
standards for nonshelter community-based services receiving funds
administered by the department.

--- END ---