BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Within seven days of its adoption, each board of school
directors shall provide to the superintendent of public instruction an
electronic copy of any collective bargaining agreement approved by the
district and the district's certificated employees.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall collect and
store these agreements in an electronic data base and shall make the
agreements available on its web site.

--- END ---