BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that advances in
technology have created a significant number of obsolete electronic
products. The legislature also finds the challenge of providing
electronic product management and recycling opportunities for
Washington residents can be effectively addressed through partnerships
with electronic product manufacturers, retailers, consumers, local
governments, waste haulers, recyclers, nonprofit organizations, and
other stakeholders. Therefore, the legislature finds that the
department of ecology shall work with electronic product stakeholders
to evaluate existing projects, encourage new pilot projects as needed,
and develop recommendations for implementing and financing the
collection, recycling, and reuse of electronic products throughout the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 1 through 3 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Covered electronic product" means all computer monitors,
personal computers, and televisions. Covered electronic product does
not include medical devices and products, including materials intended
for use as ingredients in such products, as such terms are defined in
the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.)
or the virus-serum-toxin act of 1913 (21 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.), and
regulations issued under those acts.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Electronic waste" means a covered electronic product that has
been discarded by its owner, or that has entered the solid waste
stream.
(4) "Historic waste" means discarded covered electronic products
that were produced before June 30, 2006.
(5) "Manufacturer" means any person who, as of the effective date
of this act: (a) Manufactures and sells covered electronic equipment
under its own brand; (b) manufactures and sells covered electronic
equipment without affixing a brand; or (c) resells covered electronic
products produced by other suppliers under its own brand and label.
The term "manufacturer" applies regardless of the selling technique
used, including distance communication.
(6) "Orphan waste" means electronic waste that was manufactured by,
or bears the brand of, a manufacturer that is no longer in business.
(7) "Recycling" means the use of previously manufactured materials
including metals, glass, and plastics, as feedstock in the
manufacturing of new products. "Recycling" does not include energy
recovery or energy generation by means of combusting electronic waste
with or without other waste.
(8) "Reuse" means any operation by which electronic waste or
components of electronic waste are used for the same purposes for which
they were originally created, including the continued use of the
equipment or components of the equipment that are returned to
collection points, recyclers, or manufacturers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department, in consultation with the
solid waste advisory committee created under RCW 70.95.040, shall
conduct research and develop recommendations for implementing and
financing an electronic product collection, recycling, and reuse
program. The department and the solid waste advisory committee shall
consult with stakeholders including persons who represent covered
electronic product manufacturers, covered electronic product retailers,
waste haulers, electronics recyclers, charities, cities, counties,
environmental organizations, public interest organizations, and other
interested parties that have a role or interest in the collection,
reuse, and recycling of electronic waste.
(2) The department shall identify and evaluate existing projects
and encourage new pilot projects for electronic product collection,
recycling, and reuse that allow for new information to be obtained. In
evaluating new and existing projects, factors to be considered include:
(a) Urban versus rural recycling challenges and issues;
(b) The involvement of electronic product manufacturers;
(c) Different methods of financing the collection, reuse, and
recycling programs for electronic products;
(d) The impact of the approach on local governments, nonprofit
organizations, waste haulers, and other stakeholders;
(e) How to address historic and orphan waste; and
(f) The effect of landfill bans on collection and recovery of
electronic products.
(3) The department shall also:
(a) Examine existing programs and infrastructure for reuse and
recycling of electronic waste;
(b) Compile information on electronic product manufacturers'
electronic product collection, recycling, and reuse programs;
(c) Review existing data on the costs to collect, transport, and
recycle electronic waste;
(d) Develop possible performance measures to assess the
effectiveness of collection, reuse, and recycling of covered electronic
products;
(e) Develop a description of what could be accomplished voluntarily
and what would require regulation or legislation if needed to implement
the recommended statewide collection, recycling, and reuse program for
covered electronic products;
(f) Research the potential impacts of recycling or reusing
electronic waste on jobs, recycling infrastructure, and economic
development;
(g) Evaluate the suitability of lined and unlined facilities for
the disposal of covered electronic products;
(h) Explore state financial incentives for developing business
opportunities and jobs in the area of electronic product recycling and
reuse infrastructure;
(i) Develop and assess ways to establish and finance a statewide
collection, reuse, and recycling program for covered electronic
products; and
(j) Work with the federal environmental protection agency, other
federal agencies, and interested stakeholders to:
(i) Determine the amount of electronic waste exported from
Washington that is subject to reporting under 40 C.F.R. part 262;
(ii) Determine the amount of electronic waste exported from
Washington that is not subject to reporting under 40 C.F.R. part 262,
including electronic waste from households, small quantity generators,
regulated generators, and other sources; and
(iii) Identify methods to determine if exports of electronic waste
from Washington are in compliance with national laws in destination
countries.
(4) The department shall report its findings and recommendations
for implementing and financing a state electronic product collection,
recycling, and reuse program to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 15, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire June
30, 2005.

--- END ---