BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.44.240 and 1997 c 332 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any public hospital district may contract or join with any other
public hospital district, ((any)) publicly owned hospital, ((any))
nonprofit hospital, ((any corporation, any other)) legal entity, or
individual to acquire, own, operate, manage, or provide any hospital or
other health care facilities or hospital services or other health care
services to be used by individuals, districts, hospitals, or others,
including ((the)) providing ((of)) health maintenance services. If a
public hospital district chooses to contract or join with another party
or parties pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, it may do so
through ((the establishment of)) establishing a nonprofit corporation,
partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity of its
choosing in which the public hospital district and the other party or
parties participate. The governing body of such legal entity shall
include representatives of the public hospital district, ((including))
which representatives may include members of the public hospital
district's board of commissioners. A public hospital district
contracting or joining with another party pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter may appropriate funds and may sell, lease, or otherwise
provide property, personnel, and services to the legal entity
established to carry out the contract or joint activity.

--- END ---