BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (a) If a check as defined in RCW 62A.3-104
is dishonored by nonacceptance or nonpayment and the check is assigned
to a collection agency as defined in RCW 19.16.100, the collection
agency may collect a reasonable handling fee of up to forty-five
dollars for each instrument. If the collection agency or its agent
sends a notice of dishonor as provided by section 2 of this act to the
drawer at the drawer's last known address and the check amount plus the
reasonable handling fee are not paid within thirty-three days after the
sending of the notice of dishonor, then, unless the instrument
otherwise provides, the drawer of the instrument is liable for payment
of interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum from the date of
dishonor, and a cost of collection of forty dollars or the face amount
of the check, whichever is less, payable to the collection agency. In
addition, in the event of court action on the check, the court, after
notice and the expiration of the thirty-three days, shall award
reasonable attorneys' fees, and three times the face amount of the
check or three hundred dollars, whichever is less, as part of the
damages payable to the collection agency. This section does not apply
to an instrument that is dishonored by reason of a justifiable stop
payment order.
(b) Subsequent to the commencement of an action on the check under
subsection (a) of this section but prior to the hearing, the defendant
may tender to the plaintiff as satisfaction of the claim, an amount of
money equal to the face amount of the check, a reasonable handling fee
of up to forty-five dollars, accrued interest, collection costs equal
to the lesser of the face amount of the check or forty dollars, and the
incurred court costs, service costs, and statutory attorneys' fees.
(c) Nothing in this section precludes the right to commence action
in a court under chapter 12.40 RCW for small claims. Nothing in this
section prevents a collection agency or its agent from charging the
drawer lesser amounts than the amounts provided for in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (a) If a check is assigned to a collection
agency as defined in RCW 19.16.100 and the collection agency or its
agent sends a notice of dishonor, the notice of dishonor shall be sent
by mail to the drawer at the drawer's last known address. The drawer
will be presumed to have received the notice of dishonor not more than
three days from the date it is mailed. The notice shall be
substantially in the following form:

NOTICE OF DISHONOR OF CHECK

A check drawn by you and made payable by you to . . . . . . in the
amount of . . . . . . has not been accepted for payment by . . . . . .,
which is the drawee bank designated on your check. This check is dated
. . . . . ., and it is numbered, No. . . . . . .
You are CAUTIONED that unless you pay the amount of this check and
a handling fee of . . . . . . within thirty-three days after the date
this letter is postmarked, you may have to pay the following additional
amounts:
(1) Costs of collecting the amount of the check in the lesser of
the check amount or forty dollars, plus, in the event of legal action,
court costs and attorneys' fees which will be set by the court;
(2) Interest on the amount of the check which shall accrue at the
rate of twelve percent per annum from the date of dishonor; and
(3) Three hundred dollars or three times the face amount of the
check, whichever is less, by award of the court.
You are also CAUTIONED that law enforcement agencies may be
provided with a copy of this notice of dishonor and the check drawn by
you for the possibility of proceeding with criminal charges if you do
not pay the amount of this check within thirty-three days after the
date this letter is postmarked.
You are advised to make your payment of $. . . . . . to . . . . .
. at the following address: . . . . . ..
(b) The cautionary statement regarding law enforcement need not be
included in a notice of dishonor sent by a collection agency. However,
if included and whether or not the collection agency regularly refers
dishonored checks to law enforcement, the above cautionary statement
shall not be construed as a threat to take any action not intended to
be taken or that cannot legally be taken; nor shall it be construed to
be harassing, oppressive, or abusive conduct; nor shall it be construed
to be a false, deceptive, or misleading representation; nor shall it be
construed to be unfair or unconscionable; nor shall it otherwise be
construed to violate any law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (a) If a notice of dishonor is sent by a
collection agency or its agent under section 2 of this act, the person
sending notice shall execute an affidavit certifying service of the
notice by mail. The affidavit of service by mail must be attached to
a copy of the notice of dishonor and must be substantially in the
following form:

AFFIDAVIT OF SERVICE BY MAIL

I, . . . . . ., hereby certify that on the . . . . . . day of . .
. . . ., 20. . ., a copy of the foregoing Notice was served on . . . .
. . by mailing via the United States Postal Service, postage prepaid,
at . . . . . ., Washington.
Dated: . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)

(b) The person enforcing the check shall retain the affidavit with
the check or may file the affidavit and check with the clerk of the
court in which an action on the check is commenced as permitted by
court rule or practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 No interest, collection costs, and
attorneys' fees, except handling fees, are recoverable on any
dishonored check under the provisions of section 1 of this act where a
collection agency or its agent, employee, or assign has demanded:
(1) Interest or collection costs in excess of that provided by
section 1 of this act;
(2) Interest or collection costs prior to the expiration of
thirty-three days after the mailing of notice of dishonor, as provided
by section 1 of this act; or
(3) Attorneys' fees other than statutory attorneys' fees without
having the fees set by the court, or any attorneys' fees prior to
thirty-three days after the mailing of the notice of dishonor, as
provided by section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 62A.3 RCW.

--- END ---