BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The firearms industry may not be sued by a
public or private entity or individual for damages, abatement, or
injunctive relief resulting or arising from the lawful design,
manufacture, marketing, sale, or use of firearms, firearm-related
components, or ammunition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Sections 1 through 5 of this act do not
prohibit a public or private entity or individual from bringing an
action against the firearms industry for breach of contract or warranty
in connection with firearms, firearm-related components, or ammunition
when purchased by a public or private entity or individual.
(2) Sections 1 through 5 of this act do not prohibit civil actions
by individuals for injuries resulting from a firearm, firearm-related
component, or ammunition malfunction due to defects in design or
manufacture of the firearm, firearm-related component, or ammunition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) For purposes of sections 1 through 5 of
this act, the potential of a firearm, firearm-related component, or
ammunition to cause serious injury, death, or damages to persons or
property as a result of the normal function of the firearm, firearm-related component, or ammunition does not constitute a defect in design
or manufacture or other defective condition.
(2) A firearm, firearm-related component, or ammunition shall not
be deemed defective on the basis of the potential of the firearm,
firearm-related component, or ammunition to cause serious injury,
death, or damage to persons or property regardless of whether or not
the firearm is discharged lawfully or unlawfully.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The authority to regulate the manufacture,
sale, purchase, possession, ownership, carrying, transport, transfer,
licensing, registration, operation, or use of gun shows, firearms,
firearm components, firearm ammunition, firearm dealers, dealers in
firearm components, or sellers of firearm ammunition is reserved
exclusively to the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 For purposes of sections 1 through 5 of this
act, "firearms industry" means those persons, corporations, or
organizations engaged in the business of manufacture, marketing,
storage, distribution, transport, display, advertising, sale, training,
or service of firearms, firearm-related components, or ammunition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 9.41 RCW.

--- END ---