BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.58.082 and 1997 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person may prepare or issue any birth certificate that purports
to be an original, certified copy, or copy of a birth certificate
except as authorized in this chapter.
The department shall adopt rules providing for the release of paper
or electronic copies of birth certificate records ((that)). The rules
shall include adequate means for determining the proper identity of the
person making the request for the release of the record, including a
statement of the person's relationship to the person on the record and
the presentation of either any photo identification issued to the
person by any federal, state, or local government or two forms of
nonphotographic identification issued to the person both of which must
include the person's signature, adequate assurances the proper record
is identified, adequate standards for maintaining the security and
confidentiality of the records, ((assure the proper record is
identified, and prevent)) and adequate safeguards for preventing
fraudulent use of the record((s)). All certified copies of birth
certificates in the state must be on paper and in a format provided and
approved by the department and must include security features to deter
the alteration, counterfeiting, duplication, or simulation without
ready detection.
Federal, state, and local governmental agencies may, upon request
and with submission of the appropriate fee, be furnished copies of
birth certificates if the birth certificate will be used for the
agencies' official duties. The department may enter into agreements
with offices of vital statistics outside the state for the transmission
of copies of birth certificates to those offices when the birth
certificates relate to residents of those jurisdictions and receipt of
copies of birth certificates from those offices. The agreement must
specify the statistical and administrative purposes for which the birth
certificates may be used and must provide instructions for the proper
retention and disposition of the copies. Copies of birth certificates
that are received by the department from other offices of vital
statistics outside the state must be handled as provided under the
agreements.
The department may disclose information that may identify any
person named in any birth certificate record for research purposes as
provided under chapter 42.48 RCW.

--- END ---