BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that open and
transparent government-to-government communication with the federally
recognized Indian tribes located within the borders of Washington
should be encouraged. The legislature further finds that there are
multiple state agencies that manage, regulate, and administer the
state's natural resources. Therefore, those agencies that are
responsible for the state's natural resources should foster government-to-government communications with Indian tribes when natural resources
are significantly affected by the actions of an agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Timely notification of any significant natural resource-related
action undertaken by any state entity listed in subsection (2) of this
section must be provided to the legislative authority of any federally
recognized Indian tribe when the agency determines that the action
affects, or could affect, a particular Indian tribe or tribes.
(2) This section applies only to the following state entities:
(a) The board of natural resources and the department of natural
resources;
(b) The forest practices board;
(c) The department of fish and wildlife and the fish and wildlife
commission;
(d) The department of agriculture;
(e) The department of ecology;
(f) The state conservation commission;
(g) The department of transportation; and
(h) The state board of health and the department of health.
(3) As used in this section, the term "natural resource-related
action" includes any agency rule, policy statement, order,
administrative decision, or execution of statutory functions that is
determined by the agency to significantly affect, or relate to, the
state's water, mineral, forest, fisheries, or wildlife resources.
(4) An agency may satisfy the requirements of this section by
providing electronic notification, or another method of notification
found by the agency to be most cost-effective, to the legislative
authority of a federally recognized Indian tribe that the agency
determines would be affected by a natural resource-related action.
(5) Nothing in this section affects or replaces any other
notification requirement contained in state law.
(6) No action may be invalidated based on the failure of an agency
to provide notification to an Indian tribe under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
Any rule, policy statement, order, administrative decision, or
execution of statutory functions performed by the department or board
must comply with the tribal notification requirements of section 2 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.300 RCW
to read as follows:
Any rule, policy statement, order, administrative decision, or
execution of statutory functions performed by the department or
commission must comply with the tribal notification requirements of
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.23 RCW
to read as follows:
Any rule, policy statement, order, administrative decision, or
execution of statutory functions performed by the department must
comply with the tribal notification requirements of section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
Any rule, policy statement, order, administrative decision, or
execution of statutory functions performed by the department must
comply with the tribal notification requirements of section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Any rule, policy statement, order, administrative decision, or
execution of statutory functions performed by the department must
comply with the tribal notification requirements of section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Any rule, policy statement, order, administrative decision, or
execution of statutory functions performed by the state board must
comply with the tribal notification requirements of section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
Any rule, policy statement, order, administrative decision, or
execution of statutory functions performed by the department must
comply with the tribal notification requirements of section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Any rule, policy statement, order, administrative decision, or
execution of statutory functions performed by the board must comply
with the tribal notification requirements of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 89.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Any rule, policy statement, order, administrative decision, or
execution of statutory functions performed by the commission must
comply with the tribal notification requirements of section 2 of this
act.

--- END ---