BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I. DEFINITIONS
Sec. 101 RCW 82.32.020 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 13 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) The meaning attributed in chapters 82.01 through 82.27 RCW to
the words and phrases "tax year," "taxable year," "person," "company,"
"gross proceeds of sales," "gross income of the business," "business,"
"engaging in business," "successor," "gross operating revenue," "gross
income," "taxpayer," "retail sale," and "value of products" shall apply
equally to the provisions of this chapter.
(2) Unless the context requires otherwise, "agreement" means the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
(3) "Certified automated system" means software certified under the
agreement to calculate the tax imposed by each jurisdiction on a
transaction, determine the amount of tax to remit to the appropriate
state, and maintain a record of the transaction.
(4) "Certified service provider" means an agent certified under the
agreement to perform all of the seller's sales and use tax functions,
other than the seller's obligation to remit tax on its own purchases.
(5)(a) "Member state" means a state that:
(i) Has petitioned for membership in the agreement and submitted a
certificate of compliance; and
(ii) Prior to the effective date of the agreement, has been found
to be in substantial compliance with the requirements of the agreement
by an affirmative vote of three-fourths of the other petitioning
states; or
(iii) After the effective date of the agreement, has been found to
be in compliance with the agreement by a three-fourths vote of the
entire governing board of the agreement.
(b) Membership under (a)(ii) of this subsection is effective on the
first day of a calendar quarter at least sixty days after at least ten
states comprising at least twenty percent of the total population, as
determined by the 2000 federal census, of all states imposing a state
sales tax have petitioned for membership and have been found in
compliance with the agreement.
(c) Membership under (a)(iii) of this subsection is effective on
the state's proposed date of entry.
(6) "Model 1 seller" means a seller that has selected a certified
service provider as its agent to perform all the seller's sales and use
tax functions, other than the seller's obligation to remit tax on its
own purchases.
(7) "Model 2 seller" means a seller that has selected a certified
automated system to perform part of its sales and use tax functions,
but retains responsibility for remitting the tax.
(8) "Model 3 seller" means a seller that has sales in at least five
member states, has total annual sales revenue of at least five hundred
million dollars, has a proprietary system that calculates the amount of
tax due each jurisdiction, and has entered into a performance agreement
with the member states that establishes a tax performance standard for
the seller. As used in this subsection, a seller includes an
affiliated group of sellers using the same proprietary system.
(9) "Source" means the location in which the sale or use, of
tangible personal property or a service, subject to tax under chapter
82.08, 82.12, 82.14, or 82.14B RCW, is deemed to occur.

PART II. REGISTRATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A seller, by written agreement, may appoint a person to
represent the seller as its agent. The seller's agent has authority to
register the seller with the state. An agent may also be a certified
service provider, with authority to perform all the seller's sales and
use tax functions, except that the seller remains responsible for
remitting the tax on its own purchases.
(2) The seller or its agent must provide the state with a copy of
the written agreement upon request.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.32.030 and 1996 c 111 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
if any person engages in any business or performs any act upon which a
tax is imposed by the preceding chapters, he or she shall, under such
rules as the department of revenue shall prescribe, apply for and
obtain from the department a registration certificate. Such
registration certificate shall be personal and nontransferable and
shall be valid as long as the taxpayer continues in business and pays
the tax accrued to the state. In case business is transacted at two or
more separate places by one taxpayer, a separate registration
certificate for each place at which business is transacted with the
public shall be required. Each certificate shall be numbered and shall
show the name, residence, and place and character of business of the
taxpayer and such other information as the department of revenue deems
necessary and shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the place of
business for which it is issued. Where a place of business of the
taxpayer is changed, the taxpayer must return to the department the
existing certificate, and a new certificate will be issued for the new
place of business. No person required to be registered under this
section shall engage in any business taxable hereunder without first
being so registered. The department, by rule, may provide for the
issuance of certificates of registration to temporary places of
business.
(2) Unless the person is a dealer as defined in RCW 9.41.010,
registration under this section is not required if the following
conditions are met:
(a) A person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross
income of the business, from all business activities taxable under
chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than twelve thousand dollars per year;
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twelve thousand dollars
per year;
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to
collect; and
(d) The person is not otherwise required to obtain a license
subject to the master application procedure provided in chapter 19.02
RCW.
(3) Persons who agree to collect and remit sales and use tax to the
department under the agreement and are not required to register under
subsection (1) of this section may:
(a) Register through an on-line system authorized under the
agreement, if the person agrees to provide additional information to
the department to complete the registration process; or
(b) Register under subsection (1) of this section.

PART III. MONETARY ALLOWANCES AND VENDOR DISCOUNTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt by rule monetary allowances for
certified service providers, model 2 sellers, model 3 sellers, and
other sellers that are not model 1 or model 2 sellers. The department
may be guided by the provisions for monetary allowances adopted by the
governing board of the agreement to determine the amount of the
allowances and the conditions under which they are allowed. The
monetary allowance must be reasonable and provide adequate incentive
for certified service providers and sellers to collect and remit under
the agreement.
(2) For certified service providers, the monetary allowance may
include a base rate that applies to taxable transactions processed by
the certified service provider. Additionally, for a period not to
exceed twenty-four months following a seller's registration under RCW
82.32.030(3), the monetary allowance may include a percentage of tax
revenue generated by the seller.
(3) For model 2 sellers, the monetary allowance may include a base
rate or percentage of revenue generated by a seller registering under
RCW 82.32.030(3), but shall not exceed a period of twenty-four months.
(4) For model 3 sellers and all other sellers that are not model 1
sellers or model 2 sellers, the monetary allowance may include a
percentage of tax revenue generated by a seller registering under RCW
82.32.030(3), but shall not exceed a period of twenty-four months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department may adopt by rule vendor compensation for
sellers collecting and remitting sales and use taxes. The vendor
compensation may include a base rate or a percentage of tax revenue
collected by the seller, and may vary by type of seller. The
department may be guided by the findings of the cost of collection
study performed under the agreement, by cost of collection studies
performed by the department, and by vendor compensation provided by
other states, to determine reasonable vendor compensation for sellers
for the costs to collect and remit sales and use taxes.
(2) A seller shall not be entitled to vendor compensation while the
seller or its certified service provider, as defined in RCW 82.32.020,
receives a monetary allowance under section 301 of this act.

PART IV. AMNESTY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) No assessment for taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW, or related penalties or interest, may be made by the department
against a seller who:
(a) Within twelve months of the effective date of this state
becoming a member state of the agreement, registers to collect and
remit to the department the applicable taxes imposed under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW on sales made to buyers in this state in accordance
with the terms of the agreement, if the seller was not so registered in
this state in the twelve-month period preceding the effective date of
this state becoming a member state of the agreement; and
(b) Continues to be registered and continues to collect and remit
to the department the applicable taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW for a period of at least thirty-six months, absent the
seller's fraud or intentional misrepresentation of a material fact.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section preclude an
assessment for taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW for
sales made to buyers during the period the seller was not registered in
this state.
(3) The provisions of this section do not apply to any seller with
respect to:
(a) Any matter or matters for which the seller, before registering
to collect and remit the applicable taxes imposed under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW, received notice from the department of the commencement
of an audit and which audit is not yet finally resolved including any
related administrative and judicial processes;
(b) Taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW and collected
or remitted to the department by the seller; or
(c) That seller's liability for taxes imposed under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW in that seller's capacity as a buyer.
(4) The periods of limitation for making an assessment or
correction of an assessment prescribed in RCW 82.32.050(3) and
82.32.100(3) do not run during the thirty-six month period in
subsection (1)(b) of this section.

PART V. SOURCING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (5), (6), (7), and (8) of
this section, for purposes of collecting or paying sales or use taxes
to the appropriate jurisdictions, all sales at retail shall be sourced
in accordance with this subsection and subsections (2) through (4) of
this section.
(a) When tangible personal property or a service defined as a
retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 is received by the purchaser at a
business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to that business
location.
(b) When the tangible personal property or a service defined as a
retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 is not received by the purchaser at a
business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to the location
where receipt by the purchaser or the purchaser's donee, designated as
such by the purchaser, occurs, including the location indicated by
instructions for delivery to the purchaser or donee, known to the
seller.
(c) When (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply, the sale is
sourced to the location indicated by an address for the purchaser that
is available from the business records of the seller that are
maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business when use of
this address does not constitute bad faith.
(d) When (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection do not apply, the
sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the
address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is
available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith.
(e) When (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection do not apply,
including the circumstance where the seller is without sufficient
information to apply those provisions, then the location shall be
determined by the address from which tangible personal property was
shipped, from which the digital good or the computer software delivered
electronically was first available for transmission by the seller, or
from which the service defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 was
provided, disregarding for these purposes any location that merely
provided the digital transfer of the product sold.
(2) The lease or rental of tangible personal property, other than
property identified in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, shall be
sourced as follows:
(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic
payments, the first periodic payment is sourced the same as a retail
sale in accordance with subsection (1) of this section. Periodic
payments made subsequent to the first payment are sourced to the
primary property location for each period covered by the payment. The
primary property location shall be as indicated by an address for the
property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor from
its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when use of
this address does not constitute bad faith. The property location
shall not be altered by intermittent use at different locations, such
as use of business property that accompanies employees on business
trips and service calls.
(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic
payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(c) This subsection does not affect the imposition or computation
of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump sum or
accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.
(3) The lease or rental of motor vehicles, trailers, semitrailers,
or aircraft that do not qualify as transportation equipment shall be
sourced as follows:
(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic
payments, each periodic payment is sourced to the primary property
location. The primary property location shall be as indicated by an
address for the property provided by the lessee that is available to
the lessor from its records maintained in the ordinary course of
business, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith. This
location shall not be altered by intermittent use at different
locations.
(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic
payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(c) This subsection does not affect the imposition or computation
of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump sum or
accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.
(4) The retail sale, including lease or rental, of transportation
equipment shall be sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section.
(5) A purchaser that is a business and is not a holder of a direct
pay permit that knows at the time of purchase of a digital good,
computer software delivered electronically, or a service that the
digital good, computer software delivered electronically, or service
will be concurrently available for use in more than one jurisdiction
shall deliver to the seller in conjunction with its purchase a multiple
points of use exemption form disclosing this fact.
(a) Upon receipt of the multiple point of use exemption form, the
seller is relieved of all obligation to collect, pay, or remit the
applicable tax and the purchaser is obligated to collect, pay, or remit
the applicable tax.
(b) A purchaser delivering the multiple point of use exemption
form, or a direct pay permit in lieu of a multiple point of use
exemption form, may use any reasonable, but consistent and uniform,
method of apportionment that is supported by the purchaser's business
records as they exist at the time of the consummation of the sale.
(c) The multiple point of use exemption form shall remain in effect
for all future sales by the seller to the purchaser until it is revoked
in writing.
(6)(a) A purchaser of direct mail that is not a holder of a direct
pay permit shall provide to the seller in conjunction with the purchase
either a direct mail form or information that shows the jurisdictions
to which the direct mail is delivered to recipients.
(i) Upon receipt of the direct mail form, the seller is relieved of
all obligations to collect, pay, or remit the applicable tax and the
purchaser is obligated to pay or remit the applicable tax on a direct
pay basis. A direct mail form shall remain in effect for all future
sales of direct mail by the seller to the purchaser until it is revoked
in writing.
(ii) Upon receipt of information from the purchaser showing the
jurisdictions to which the direct mail is delivered to recipients, the
seller shall collect the tax according to the delivery information
provided by the purchaser. In the absence of bad faith, the seller is
relieved of any further obligation to collect tax on any transaction
where the seller has collected tax pursuant to the delivery information
provided by the purchaser.
(b) If the purchaser of direct mail does not have a direct pay
permit and does not provide the seller with either a direct mail form
or delivery information as required by (a) of this subsection, the
seller shall collect the tax according to subsection (1)(e) of this
section. This subsection does not limit a purchaser's obligation for
sales or use tax to any state to which the direct mail is delivered.
(c) If a purchaser of direct mail provides the seller with
documentation of direct pay authority, the purchaser is not required to
provide a direct mail form or delivery information to the seller.
(7) The following are sourced to the location at or from which
delivery is made to the consumer:
(a) A retail sale consisting of watercraft;
(b) A retail sale consisting of a modular home, manufactured home,
or mobile home;
(c) A retail sale, excluding the lease and rental, consisting of a
motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or aircraft, that do not qualify
as transportation equipment; and
(d) Until January 1, 2006, a retail sale of tangible personal
property made by a person engaged in the business of selling flowers.
The rules for the sourcing retail sales and use taxes of flowers
delivered with telegraphic instructions in WAC 458-20-158, as effective
on July 1, 1970, shall remain in effect until January 1, 2006.
(8) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520.
(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Delivered electronically" means delivered to the purchaser by
means other than tangible storage media.
(b) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed
by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or
to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed
directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal
property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct
mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed
material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed
material delivered to a single address.
(c) "Receive" and "receipt" means taking possession of tangible
personal property, making first use of services, or taking possession
or making first use of digital goods, whichever comes first. "Receive"
and "receipt" do not include possession by a shipping company on behalf
of the purchaser.
(d) "Transportation equipment" means any of the following:
(i) Locomotives and railcars that are used for the carriage of
persons or property in interstate commerce;
(ii) Trucks and truck-tractors with a gross vehicle weight rating
of 10,001 pounds or greater, trailers, semitrailers, or passenger buses
that are:
(A) Registered through the international registration plan; and
(B) Operated under authority of a carrier authorized and
certificated by the United States department of transportation or
another federal authority to engage in the carriage of persons or
property in interstate commerce;
(iii) Aircraft that are operated by air carriers authorized and
certificated by the United States department of transportation or
another federal or foreign authority to engage in the carriage of
persons or property in interstate or foreign commerce;
(iv) Containers designed for use on and component parts attached or
secured on the items described in (d)(i) through (iii) of this
subsection.
(10) In those instances where there is no obligation on the part of
a seller to collect or remit use tax, the use of tangible personal
property or of a service, subject to use tax, is sourced to the place
of first use. The definition of use in RCW 82.12.010 applies to this
subsection.

Sec. 502 RCW 82.14.020 and 2003 c 168 s 503 and 2003 c 168 s 502
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) ((A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property shall be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet
at or from which delivery is made to the consumer;
(2) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place at which such services were primarily performed,
except that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in
RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;
(3) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property shall be deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the place of primary use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (b) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;
(4) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
shall be deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and
services involved were primarily performed;
(5)(a) A retail sale consisting of the providing to a consumer of
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of
tangible personal property under subsection (1) of this section or a
rental of tangible personal property under subsection (3) of this
section or a sale of mobile telecommunications services, shall be
deemed to have occurred at the situs of the telephone or other
instrument through which the telephone service is rendered;
(b) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520;
(6) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202;
(7))) "City" means a city or town;
(((8))) (2) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters
82.04, 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, insofar as
applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under authority of this chapter;
(((9))) (3) "Taxable event" shall mean any retail sale, or any use,
upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant to RCW
82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;
(((10))) (4) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the
treasurer or legal depository of a county or city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
Sales and use taxes imposed under this chapter shall be sourced in
accordance with section 501 of this act.

PART VI. SOURCING MITIGATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Washington state's participation as a member state in the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement benefits the state, all its
local taxing jurisdictions, and its retailing industry by increasing
state and local revenues, improving the state's business climate, and
simplifying the state's tax structure.
(2) Participation in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement
requires the adoption of the agreement's sourcing provisions, which
changes the location in which a retail sale of tangible personal
property occurs from the point of origin to the point of delivery.
(3) The streamlined sales and use tax agreement's sourcing
provisions will cause sales and use tax revenues to shift among local
taxing jurisdictions, and it is in the best interest of the state and
all its subdivisions to mitigate the adverse effects of adopting the
agreement's sourcing provisions by providing state revenues to those
taxing jurisdictions that lose revenues.
(4) Revenue shifts among local taxing jurisdictions cannot be
precisely determined without significantly increasing the
administrative burden on the retail industry, which is contrary to the
intent of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement. Therefore, the
legislature recognizes that local taxing jurisdictions will be
adequately, but not completely, mitigated for revenue losses that
result from this act.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The streamlined sales and use tax agreement mitigation account
is created in the state treasury, and shall be used for mitigating
financial impacts related to the enactment of section 501 of this act.
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, into this account
shall be placed:
(a) An amount of state sales and use taxes, as provided in section
606 of this act, representing a portion of the amount that is expected
to be received by the department from sellers who, under the agreement,
register to collect and remit to the department state sales and use
taxes and who are otherwise not required to register under RCW
82.32.030(1);
(b) A portion of the amounts deducted under the authority of RCW
82.14.050 by the department under contract with counties and cities and
with transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045 for the
administration and collection of sales and use taxes authorized by this
chapter and imposed by such local taxing authorities. The portion is
equal to the product of (i) the total amounts deducted and (ii) the
factor specified in section 606(1)(b) of this act; and
(c) All amounts authorized under section 604 of this act to be
deducted by the department.
(2)(a) Funds in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement
mitigation account shall be distributed by the state treasurer to
cities, counties, and transportation authorities, as directed by the
department and in accordance with sections 603 and 605 of this act.
(b) Any funds that remain in the account as of June 30 of each year
shall be distributed ratably to the state general fund and to the local
jurisdictions for which the department made a deduction under section
604 of this act, based on the proportion of funds received to the
account from each jurisdiction under this section.
(3) By December 1, 2010, the department shall submit a report to
the governor and the legislature on the fiscal and economic effects of
the sourcing changes under section 501 of this act. The department
shall consider any changes to the tax base pursuant to the
implementation of legislation to require remote sellers to collect and
remit sales taxes pursuant to federal authorization under section
1101(1) (a) or (b) of this act, and the need for continuing state
mitigation assistance.
(4) For purposes of this section and sections 603 through 606 of
this act, the following definitions apply:
(a) "State sales and use taxes" means the taxes imposed under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
(b) "Agreement" means the same as in RCW 82.58.010.
(c) "Transportation authority" means an authority that imposes a
tax under RCW 82.14.045.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) At such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.14.060,
the state treasurer, as directed by the department, shall make
distributions to eligible counties, cities, and transportation
authorities from the streamlined sales and use tax agreement mitigation
account. Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, the
distributions shall be made as provided in (a) through (d) of this
subsection.
(a) In the period July 2005 through June 2006, an amount equal to:
(i) Eighty-five percent of estimated sales tax loss for each
county, city, and transportation authority whose estimated sales tax
loss is four percent or more of total calendar year 2002 unrestricted
current expense revenue as determined by the department;
(ii) Seventy percent of estimated sales tax loss for each county,
city, and transportation authority whose estimated sales tax loss is at
least one-half of one percent, but less than four percent of total
calendar year 2002 unrestricted current expense revenue as determined
by the department; and
(iii) Fifty percent of estimated sales tax loss for each county,
city, and transportation authority whose estimated sales tax loss is
less than one-half of one percent of total calendar year 2002
unrestricted current expense revenue, but greater than one hundred
thousand dollars as determined by the department.
(b) In the period July 2006 through June 2007, an amount equal to:
(i) Sixty-five percent of estimated sales tax loss for each county,
city, and transportation authority whose estimated sales tax loss is
four percent or more of total calendar year 2002 unrestricted current
expense revenue as determined by the department;
(ii) Fifty percent of estimated sales tax loss for each county,
city, and transportation authority whose estimated sales tax loss is at
least one-half of one percent, but less than four percent of total
calendar year 2002 unrestricted current expense revenue as determined
by the department; and
(iii) Twenty-five percent of estimated sales tax loss for each
county, city, and transportation authority whose estimated sales tax
loss is less than one-half of one percent of total calendar year 2002
unrestricted current expense revenue, but greater than one hundred
thousand dollars as determined by the department.
(c) In the period July 2007 through June 2008, an amount equal to:
(i) Forty-five percent of estimated sales tax loss for each county,
city, and transportation authority whose estimated sales tax loss is
four percent or more of total calendar year 2002 unrestricted current
expense revenue as determined by the department; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of estimated sales tax loss for each
county, city, and transportation authority whose estimated sales tax
loss is at least one-half of one percent, but less than four percent of
total calendar year 2002 unrestricted current expense revenue as
determined by the department.
(d) In the period July 2008 through June 2009, an amount equal to
twenty-five percent of estimated sales tax loss for each county, city,
and transportation authority whose estimated sales tax loss is four
percent or more of total calendar year 2002 unrestricted current
expense revenue as determined by the department.
(e)(i) In each fiscal year through fiscal year 2012, an amount
equal to no less than sixty percent of the estimated long-term sales
tax loss, and in each fiscal year from fiscal year 2013 through fiscal
year 2015, an amount equal to no less than thirty percent of the
estimated long-term sales tax loss, for each county, city, and
transportation authority whose estimated long-term sales tax loss is:
(A) At least two-hundred and fifty thousand dollars in magnitude and
equal to one and six-tenths percent or more of total calendar year 2002
unrestricted current expense revenue as determined by the department;
or (B) equal to three percent or more of total calendar year 2002
unrestricted current expense revenue as determined by the department.
The amounts shall be provided as in (e)(ii) through (iv) of this
subsection.
(ii) If the amount to be distributed for the fiscal year in (a),
(b), (c), or (d) of this subsection (1) exceeds an amount equal to
sixty percent of the estimated long-term sales tax loss, no amounts
shall be distributed under this subsection (1)(e) for the fiscal year.
(iii) If the amount to be distributed for the fiscal year in (a),
(b), (c), or (d) of this subsection (1) is equal to or less than an
amount equal to sixty percent of the estimated long-term sales tax
loss, the treasurer shall distribute an additional amount under this
subsection (1)(e) for the fiscal year such that the total amount
distributed is equal to sixty percent of the estimated long-term sales
tax loss.
(iv) In each fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the
distributions in (d) of this subsection (1) are made through fiscal
year 2012, the treasurer shall distribute an amount equal to sixty
percent of the estimated long-term sales tax loss. For each fiscal
year thereafter, the treasurer shall distribute an amount equal to
thirty percent of the estimated long-term sales tax loss.
(2) If the amounts necessary to make the distributions under this
section exceed the amount of funds in the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement mitigation account, then the distributions under this section
shall be reduced ratably on the basis of the amount of estimated sales
tax loss.
(3) Determinations by the department of amounts to be distributed
by the state treasurer under this section are final and not appealable.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Eligible counties, cities, and transportation authorities"
means those counties, cities, and transportation authorities imposing
a tax under this chapter that have each experienced an estimated sales
tax loss:
(i) Of a magnitude that is greater than or equal to one-half of one
percent of total calendar year 2002 unrestricted current expense
revenue; or
(ii) Greater than or equal to one hundred thousand dollars in
magnitude.
(b) "Estimated sales tax loss" means a loss in sales tax revenues
resulting from the implementation of section 501 of this act as
estimated by the department and included in appendix A of the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement sourcing study published by the
department in December 2003.
(c) "Estimated long-term sales tax loss" means a loss in sales tax
revenues, as estimated by the department and as shown in LEAP document
X, due to:
(i) The implementation of section 501 of this act. Loss in
revenues is as estimated by the department and included in appendix A
of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement sourcing study published
by the department in December 2003; and
(ii) The imposition of the state retail sales tax collection and
remittance requirements on remote sellers pursuant to federal
authorization under section 1101(1) (a) or (b) of this act, based on
the department's statewide estimate of sales tax gain following such
changes as reported in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement
sourcing study published in December 2003.
(d) "Unrestricted current expense revenue" means the amount of
unrestricted revenue deposited in calendar year 2002 to the general
fund of a jurisdiction as reported under the state budget and
accounting reporting system requirements to the state auditor's office.
For transportation authorities, "unrestricted current expense revenue"
shall include only the taxes imposed under this chapter.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the deduction provided for in RCW 82.14.050, the
department shall deduct an additional amount from the taxes collected
for counties, cities, and transportation authorities for the purpose of
mitigating any adverse impacts as a result of the implementation of
section 501 of this act.
(2)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) and (iii) of this
subsection, the amount deducted under this section shall be the product
of two percent of the taxes collected and the factor in (b) of this
subsection.
(ii) Deductions shall cease for the remainder of a calendar year
when the cumulative amount deducted equals the product of eighty
percent of the estimated sales tax gain accruing to the county, city,
or transportation authority and the factor in (b) of this subsection.
Deductions that have ceased under this subsection (2) shall resume the
following calendar year.
(iii) If the estimated sales tax gain is zero, no amount may be
deducted.
(b)(i) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, the factor is
equal to eighty-three one-hundredths;
(ii) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, the factor is equal
to sixty one-hundredths;
(iii) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, the factor is equal
to thirty-six one-hundredths;
(iv) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, the factor is equal
to fourteen one-hundredths.
(3) The deduction in subsection (2) of this section shall be placed
into the streamlined sales and use tax agreement mitigation account
established in section 602 of this act.
(4) For purposes of this section, "estimated sales tax gain" means
the estimated increase in sales tax revenues resulting from the
implementation of section 501 of this act included in appendix A of the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement sourcing study published by the
department in December 2003. If no increase is estimated in the study
to occur, "estimated sales tax gain" is zero.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that the estimated sales tax loss
calculated by the department and included in appendix A of the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement sourcing study published by the
department in December 2003 may be less accurate for smaller
jurisdictions. To address the possibility that certain small
jurisdictions face unanticipated adverse financial impacts as a result
of the implementation of the sourcing provisions of this act, the
legislature finds that it is necessary to provide temporary
supplemental mitigation funds.
(2)(a) The department, in consultation with a committee composed of
city, county, and transportation authority officials from eligible
small impacted jurisdictions, shall evaluate the actual impact of the
implementation of section 501 of this act on eligible small impacted
jurisdictions. Committee responsibilities include review and feedback
with respect to the department's analysis of actual impacts.
(b) To evaluate the actual impact, the department shall examine
with respect to eligible small impacted jurisdictions the taxpayer data
in industries for which the implementation of section 501 of this act
results in a significant reallocation of tax revenues between
jurisdictions. The department shall compare data pertaining to
collections after the effective date of section 501 of this act to data
pertaining to collections before the effective date. The department
may account and adjust for economic growth in its analysis as
necessary.
(3)(a) Based on the results of the evaluation in subsection (2) of
this section, the department shall direct the state treasurer to
distribute supplemental mitigation funds from the streamlined sales and
use tax agreement mitigation account to eligible small impacted
jurisdictions. The amount distributed to a jurisdiction is an amount,
when added to funds provided pursuant to section 603 of this act in the
previous fiscal year, equals the amount that would have been provided
had actual sales tax loss data been used in lieu of estimated sales tax
loss data in the calculation under that section.
(b) No more than two million dollars may be provided under this
section to all eligible small impacted jurisdictions in any fiscal
year.
(c) If the amounts necessary to make the distributions under this
section exceed the limitation under this subsection (3), then the
distributions under this section shall be reduced ratably on the basis
of the full amounts calculated for distribution under (a) of this
subsection.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "eligible small impacted
jurisdiction" means:
(a) A county with a population of seventy-two thousand persons or
less;
(b) A city or town with a population of ten thousand persons or
less; or
(c) A transportation authority with a population of fifty thousand
persons or less.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) On July 1 of each year, an amount of sales and use taxes
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW shall be deposited into the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement mitigation account created
under section 602 of this act equal to the product of (i) the amount
that is forecasted as of June 30, 2004, by the office of the forecast
council to be received by the department during the fiscal year
pursuant to the enactment of chapter . . ., Laws of 2004 (this act)
from sellers who, under the agreement, register to collect and remit to
the department state sales and use taxes and who are otherwise not
required to register under RCW 82.32.030(1), and (ii) the factor
specified in (b) of this subsection.
(b)(i) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, the factor is
equal to eighty-three one-hundredths.
(ii) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, the factor is equal
to sixty-three one-hundredths.
(iii) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, the factor is equal
to fifty-four one-hundredths.
(iv) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, the factor is equal
to forty-nine one-hundredths.
(v) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2010, through the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2015, the factor is equal to thirty-nine one-hundredths.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2015.

PART VII. LOCAL SALES AND PROPERTY TAX EQUALIZATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the sales and use tax and property
tax bases of some local jurisdictions in the state are inadequate to
allow the jurisdictions to generate enough tax revenues to pay for core
services over the long term. The legislature intends to assist such
jurisdictions by providing a portion of the state retail sales tax
revenues realized by an expansion of the tax base following federal
government action that authorizes states to require remote sellers to
collect and remit sales taxes.
(2) The local sales and property tax equalization account is
created in the state treasury. A portion of the retail sales tax
receipts received from the imposition of retail sales tax collection
and remittance requirements on remote sellers shall be deposited to the
account, as provided in section 702 of this act. Moneys in the account
may only be spent after appropriation and are to be distributed to
local jurisdictions for the purpose of assisting in the provision of
core governmental services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning in the fiscal year after the fiscal year in which the
legislature requires remote sellers to collect and remit sales taxes
pursuant to federal authorization under section 1101(1) (a) or (b) of
this act, the treasurer shall transfer from the state general fund to
the local sales and property tax equalization account created in
section 701 of this act an amount, representing a portion of new
collections under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW resulting from the
legislative change, equal to eighty million dollars, divided into four
equal deposits occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1.
For each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the
total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW
43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial
management in November of the preceding year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The local sales and property tax equalization task force is
formed for the purpose of providing a recommendation to the governor
and to the legislature for a mechanism to distribute funds in the local
sales and property tax equalization account created in section 701 of
this act.
(2)(a) Membership on the task force shall be as follows: Two
members each from the house of representatives and from the senate,
appointed by the leaders of each of the two largest caucuses in each
house; a designee of the governor who will coordinate the appointment
of the task force chairperson; a representative of the department of
revenue; one person representing the large counties of the state,
appointed by the governor; one person representing the small counties
of the state, appointed by the governor; one person representing the
large cities of the state, appointed by the governor; one person
representing the small cities of the state, appointed by the governor;
and one person representing transportation authorities, appointed by
the governor.
(b) Members of the task force shall serve without compensation, but
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
(3) The staffs of the department, the office of financial
management, and the fiscal committees of the legislature shall support
the task force as needed.
(4) In arriving at a recommendation, the task force shall consider
factors that influence the generation of revenue in local
jurisdictions, including the long-term growth of the sales and property
tax bases; structural changes to the sales tax base as a result of the
implementation of section 501 of this act and enactment of legislation
pursuant to federal action under section 1101(1) (a) and (b) of this
act; changes to property taxation authority in recent years; and other
local economic factors. The task force shall submit its recommendation
to the legislature by December 1, 2005.

PART VIII. CONFIDENTIALITY AND PRIVACY PROTECTIONS FOR
PERSONS USING CERTIFIED SERVICE PROVIDERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A fundamental precept of allowing the use of a certified
service provider is to preserve the privacy of consumers by protecting
their anonymity. With very limited exceptions, a certified service
provider shall perform its tax calculation, remittance, and reporting
functions without retaining the personally identifiable information of
consumers.
(2) The department of revenue shall provide public notification to
consumers, including purchasers claiming exemption from tax, of its
practices relating to the collection, use, and retention of personally
identifiable information.
(3) When personally identifiable information that has been
collected and retained is no longer required to ensure the validity of
exemptions from taxation by reason of the consumer's status or the
intended use of the goods or services purchased, the information shall
no longer be retained by the state of Washington.
(4) When personally identifiable information regarding an
individual is retained by or on behalf of the state of Washington, this
state shall provide reasonable access for the individual to his or her
own information and a right to correct any inaccurately recorded
information.
(5) If anyone other than a member state of the agreement, or other
than a person authorized by Washington law or the agreement, seeks to
discover personally identifiable information, the state of Washington
shall make a reasonable and timely effort to notify the individual of
the request.
(6) The provisions of this section may be enforced by petitioning
the superior court of Thurston county for injunctive relief.

PART IX. TAXABILITY MATRIX
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department of revenue shall complete a taxability matrix
maintained by the member states of the agreement in downloadable
format. The matrix contains terms defined in the agreement. The
department of revenue shall provide notice of changes in the taxability
of products or services listed in the matrix.
(2) Sellers and certified service providers are relieved from
liability to the state and to local jurisdictions for having charged or
collected the incorrect amount of sales or use tax if the error
resulted from reliance on erroneous information provided by the
department of revenue in the taxability matrix.

PART X. DELIVERY CHARGES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
When computing the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020, if a shipment
consists of taxable tangible personal property and nontaxable tangible
personal property, and delivery charges are included in the sales
price, the seller must collect and remit tax on the percentage of
delivery charges allocated to the taxable tangible property, but does
not have to collect and remit tax on the percentage allocated to exempt
tangible personal property. The seller may use either of the following
percentages to determine the taxable portion of the delivery charges:
(1) A percentage based on the total sales price of the taxable
tangible property compared to the total sales price of all tangible
personal property in the shipment; or
(2) A percentage based on the total weight of the taxable tangible
personal property compared to the total weight of all tangible personal
property in the shipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
When computing the tax levied by RCW 82.12.020, if a shipment
consists of taxable tangible personal property and nontaxable tangible
personal property, and delivery charges are included in the purchase
price, the retailer must collect and remit tax on the percentage of
delivery charges allocated to the taxable personal property, but does
not have to collect and remit tax on the percentage allocated to exempt
tangible personal property. The retailer may use either of the
following percentages to determine the taxable portion of the delivery
charges:
(1) A percentage based on the total purchase price of the taxable
personal property compared to the total purchase price of all tangible
personal property in the shipment; or
(2) A percentage based on the total weight of the taxable tangible
personal property compared to the total weight of all tangible personal
property in the shipment.

PART XI. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101 (1) Sections 501 through 503, 601 through
606, and 1102 of this act take effect July 1, 2005. Section 401 of
this act takes effect when Washington becomes a member state of the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement. Section 302 of this act takes
effect when:
(a) The United States congress grants individual states the
authority to impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote
sellers; or
(b) It is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a
judgment not subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use
tax collection duties on remote sellers.
(2) The remainder of this act takes effect July 1, 2004.

Sec. 1102 2003 c 168 s 902 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) If a court of competent jurisdiction enters a final judgment on
the merits that is based on federal or state law, is no longer subject
to appeal, and substantially limits or impairs the essential elements
of P.L. 106-252, 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116 through 126, or chapter 67, Laws of
2002, then chapter 67, Laws of 2002 is null and void in its entirety,
except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) ((If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 502, chapter 168, Laws of 2003 is null and void)) Subsection
(1) of this section does not apply to section 7, chapter 67, Laws of
2002 on or after April 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1103 Part headings used in this act are not
any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1104 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1105 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act referencing this act by bill or chapter number is not provided
by June 30, 2004, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null
and void.

--- END ---