BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may grant to any person such easements and
rights in state-owned lands administered by the department as the
person may acquire in privately owned lands through proceedings in
eminent domain. No grant shall be made under this section until such
time as the full market value of the estate or interest granted
together with damages to all remaining property of the state of
Washington has been ascertained and safely secured to the state.
(2) The department shall grant such easements and rights in state-owned lands administered by the department consistent with subsection
(1) of this section when:
(a) A person's property is landlocked by state lands;
(b) There has been historical usage of the state lands to access
the person's property; and
(c) Easements or other rights in state lands are needed to access
the person's property.
(3) Easements and rights granted according to this section shall be
such as is necessary to provide for historical use and shall be granted
along routes selected by the department to minimize impacts to state
resources. Any road constructed pursuant to this section shall be
constructed in compliance with road construction and maintenance rules
adopted by the forest practices board according to chapter 76.09 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.36.355 and 2003 c 334 s 396 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may grant to any person such easements and
rights in state lands or state forest lands as the ((applicant applying
therefor)) person may acquire in privately owned lands through
proceedings in eminent domain. No grant shall be made under this
section until such time as the full market value of the estate or
interest granted together with damages to all remaining property of the
state of Washington has been ascertained and safely secured to the
state.
(2) The department shall grant such easements and rights in state
lands or state forest lands consistent with the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section when:
(a) A person's property is landlocked by state lands or state
forest lands;
(b) There has been historical usage of the state lands or state
forest lands to access the person's property; and
(c) Easements or other rights in state lands or state forest lands
are needed to access the person's property.

--- END ---