BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.48.200 and 2003 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Debts due the state or a county or city for the overpayment of
wages to ((state)) their respective employees may be recovered by the
employer by deductions from subsequent wage payments as provided in RCW
49.48.210, or by civil action. If the overpayment is recovered by
deduction from the employee's subsequent wages, each deduction shall
not exceed: (a) Five percent of the employee's disposable earnings in
a pay period other than the final pay period; or (b) the amount still
outstanding from the employee's disposable earnings in the final pay
period. The deductions from wages shall continue until the overpayment
is fully recouped.
(2) Nothing in ((chapter 77, Laws of 2003)) this section or RCW
49.48.210 or 49.48.220 prevents: (a) An employee from making payments
in excess of the amount specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section
to an employer; or (b) an employer and employee from agreeing to a
different overpayment amount than that specified in the notice in RCW
49.48.210(1) or to a method other than a deduction from wages for
repayment of the overpayment amount.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.48.210 and 2003 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, when an
employer determines that an employee was overpaid wages, the employer
shall provide written notice to the employee. The notice shall include
the amount of the overpayment, the basis for the claim, a demand for
payment within twenty calendar days of the date on which the employee
received the notice, and the rights of the employee under this section.
(2) The notice may be served upon the employee in the manner
prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action, or be mailed
by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the employee at his or
her last known address.
(3) Within twenty calendar days after receiving the notice from the
employer that an overpayment has occurred, the employee may request, in
writing, that the employer review its finding that an overpayment has
occurred. The employee may choose to have the review conducted through
written submission of information challenging the overpayment or
through a face-to-face meeting with the employer. If the request is
not made within the twenty-day period as provided in this subsection,
the employee may not further challenge the overpayment and has no right
to further agency review, an adjudicative proceeding, or judicial
review.
(4) Upon receipt of an employee's written request for review of the
overpayment, the employer shall review the employee's challenge to the
overpayment. Upon completion of the review, the employer shall notify
the employee in writing of the employer's decision regarding the
employee's challenge. The notification must be sent by certified mail,
return receipt requested, to the employee at his or her last known
address.
(5) If the employee is dissatisfied with the employer's decision
regarding the employee's challenge to the overpayment, the employee may
request an adjudicative proceeding governed by the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW or, in the case of a county or city
employee, an adjudicative proceeding provided pursuant to ordinance or
resolution of the county or city. The employee's application for an
adjudicative proceeding must be in writing, state the basis for
contesting the overpayment notice, and include a copy of the employer's
notice of overpayment. The application must be served on and received
by the employer within twenty-eight calendar days of the employee's
receipt of the employer's decision following review of the employee's
challenge. Notwithstanding RCW 34.05.413(3), agencies may not vary the
requirements of this subsection (5) by rule or otherwise. The employee
must serve the employer by certified mail, return receipt requested.
(6) If the employee does not request an adjudicative proceeding
within the twenty-eight-day period, the amount of the overpayment
provided in the notice shall be deemed final and the employer may
proceed to recoup the overpayment as provided in this section and RCW
49.48.200.
(7) Where an adjudicative proceeding has been requested, the
presiding or reviewing officer shall determine the amount, if any, of
the overpayment received by the employee.
(8) If the employee fails to attend or participate in the
adjudicative proceeding, upon a showing of valid service, the presiding
or reviewing officer may enter an administrative order declaring the
amount claimed in the notice sent to the employee after the employer's
review of the employee's challenge to the overpayment to be assessed
against the employee and subject to collection action by the ((state))
employer as provided in RCW 49.48.200.
(9) Failure to make an application for a review by the employer as
provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section or an adjudicative
proceeding within twenty-eight calendar days of the date of receiving
notice of the employer's decision after review of the overpayment shall
result in the establishment of a final debt against the employee in the
amount asserted by the employer, which debt shall be collected as
provided in RCW 49.48.200.
(10) When an employer determines that an employee covered by a
collective bargaining agreement was overpaid wages, the employer shall
provide written notice to the employee. The notice shall include the
amount of the overpayment, the basis for the claim, and the rights of
the employee under the collective bargaining agreement. Any dispute
relating to the occurrence or amount of the overpayment shall be
resolved using the grievance procedures contained in the collective
bargaining agreement.
(11) As used in ((chapter 77, Laws of 2003)) this section or RCW
49.48.210 and 49.48.220:
(a) "City" means city or town;
(b) "Employer" means the state of Washington or a county or city,
and any of its agencies, institutions, boards, or commissions; and
(((b))) (c) "Overpayment" means a payment of wages for a pay period
that is greater than the amount earned for a pay period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---