BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.20.240 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) To ensure that following the initial application for
benefits, an individual is actively engaged in searching for work, the
employment security department shall implement a job search monitoring
program. Effective January 4, 2004, the department shall contract with
employment security agencies in other states to ensure that individuals
residing in those states and receiving benefits under this title are
actively engaged in searching for work in accordance with the
requirements of this section. The department may use interactive voice
technology and other electronic means to ensure that individuals are
subject to comparable job search monitoring, regardless of whether they
reside in Washington or elsewhere.
(b) Except for those individuals with employer attachment or union
referral, individuals who qualify for unemployment compensation under
RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b)(((iii))) (iv) or (2)(b)(((v))) (iv), as
applicable, and individuals in commissioner-approved training, an
individual who has received five or more weeks of benefits under this
title, regardless of whether the individual resides in Washington or
elsewhere, must provide evidence of seeking work, as directed by the
commissioner or the commissioner's agents, for each week beyond five in
which a claim is filed. With regard to claims with an effective date
before January 4, 2004, the evidence must demonstrate contacts with at
least three employers per week or documented in-person job search
activity at the local reemployment center. With regard to claims with
an effective date on or after January 4, 2004, the evidence must
demonstrate contacts with at least three employers per week or
documented in-person job search activities at the local reemployment
center at least three times per week.
(c) In developing the requirements for the job search monitoring
program, the commissioner or the commissioner's agents shall utilize an
existing advisory committee having equal representation of employers
and workers.
(2) Effective January 4, 2004, an individual who fails to comply
fully with the requirements for actively seeking work under RCW
50.20.010 shall lose all benefits for all weeks during which the
individual was not in compliance, and the individual shall be liable
for repayment of all such benefits under RCW 50.20.190.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.20.100 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Suitable work for an individual is employment in an occupation
in keeping with the individual's prior work experience, education, or
training and if the individual has no prior work experience, special
education, or training for employment available in the general area,
then employment which the individual would have the physical and mental
ability to perform. In determining whether work is suitable for an
individual, the commissioner shall also consider the degree of risk
involved to the individual's health, safety, and morals, the
individual's physical fitness, the individual's length of unemployment
and prospects for securing local work in the individual's customary
occupation, the distance of the available work from the individual's
residence, and such other factors as the commissioner may deem
pertinent, including state and national emergencies.
(2) For individuals with base year work experience in agricultural
labor, any agricultural labor available from any employer shall be
deemed suitable unless it meets conditions in RCW 50.20.110 or the
commissioner finds elements of specific work opportunity unsuitable for
a particular individual.
(3) For part-time workers as defined in RCW 50.20.119, suitable
work includes suitable work under subsection (1) of this section that
is for seventeen or fewer hours per week.
(4) For individuals who have qualified for unemployment
compensation benefits under RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b)(((iii))) (iv) or
(2)(b)(((v))) (iv), as applicable, an evaluation of the suitability of
the work must consider the individual's need to address the physical,
psychological, legal, and other effects of domestic violence or
stalking.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.29.020 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 20 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to benefits charged to the experience
rating accounts of employers for claims that have an effective date
before January 4, 2004.
(2) An experience rating account shall be established and
maintained for each employer, except employers as described in RCW
50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments in
lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers as described
in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments
in lieu of contributions, based on existing records of the employment
security department. Benefits paid to any eligible individuals shall
be charged to the experience rating accounts of each of such
individual's employers during the individual's base year in the same
ratio that the wages paid by each employer to the individual during the
base year bear to the wages paid by all employers to that individual
during that base year, except as otherwise provided in this section.
(3) The legislature finds that certain benefit payments, in whole
or in part, should not be charged to the experience rating accounts of
employers except those employers described in RCW 50.44.010 and
50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of
contributions, taxable local government employers described in RCW
50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments in
lieu of contributions, as follows:
(a) Benefits paid to any individuals later determined to be
ineligible shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer.
(b) Benefits paid to an individual filing under the provisions of
chapter 50.06 RCW shall not be charged to the experience rating account
of any contribution paying employer only if:
(i) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after receiving
crime victims' compensation for a disability resulting from a nonwork-related occurrence; or
(ii) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(2).
(c) Benefits paid which represent the state's share of benefits
payable as extended benefits defined under RCW 50.22.010(6) shall not
be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(d) In the case of individuals who requalify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050 or 50.20.060, benefits based on wage credits earned prior to
the disqualifying separation shall not be charged to the experience
rating account of the contribution paying employer from whom that
separation took place.
(e) Individuals who qualify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050(1)(b)(((iii))) (iv) shall not have their benefits charged to
the experience rating account of any contribution paying employer.
(f) In the case of individuals identified under RCW 50.20.015,
benefits paid with respect to a calendar quarter, which exceed the
total amount of wages earned in the state of Washington in the higher
of two corresponding calendar quarters included within the individual's
determination period, as defined in RCW 50.20.015, shall not be charged
to the experience rating account of any contribution paying employer.
(4)(a) A contribution-paying base year employer, not otherwise
eligible for relief of charges for benefits under this section, may
receive such relief if the benefit charges result from payment to an
individual who:
(i) Last left the employ of such employer voluntarily for reasons
not attributable to the employer;
(ii) Was discharged for misconduct connected with his or her work
not a result of inability to meet the minimum job requirements;
(iii) Is unemployed as a result of closure or severe curtailment of
operation at the employer's plant, building, worksite, or other
facility. This closure must be for reasons directly attributable to a
catastrophic occurrence such as fire, flood, or other natural disaster;
or
(iv) Continues to be employed on a regularly scheduled permanent
part-time basis by a base year employer and who at some time during the
base year was concurrently employed and subsequently separated from at
least one other base year employer. Benefit charge relief ceases when
the employment relationship between the employer requesting relief and
the claimant is terminated. This subsection does not apply to shared
work employers under chapter 50.60 RCW.
(b) The employer requesting relief of charges under this subsection
must request relief in writing within thirty days following mailing to
the last known address of the notification of the valid initial
determination of such claim, stating the date and reason for the
separation or the circumstances of continued employment. The
commissioner, upon investigation of the request, shall determine
whether relief should be granted.

--- END ---