BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.12.220 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 22 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) If an employer fails to file in a timely and complete manner
a report required by RCW 50.12.070, or the rules adopted pursuant
thereto, the employer shall be subject to a penalty to be determined by
the commissioner, but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars or ten
percent of the quarterly contributions for each such offense, whichever
is less.
(b) If an employer knowingly misrepresents to the employment
security department the amount of his or her payroll upon which
contributions under this title are based, the employer shall be liable
to the state for up to ten times the amount of the difference in
contributions paid, if any, and the amount the employer should have
paid and for the reasonable expenses of auditing his or her books and
collecting such sums. Such liability may be enforced in the name of
the department.
(c) If any part of a delinquency for which an assessment is made
under this title is due to an intent to evade the successorship
provisions of RCW 50.29.062, then for the calendar year in which the
commissioner makes the determination under this subsection, the
commissioner shall assign to the employer, and to any business found to
be promoting the evasion of such provisions, the ((tax)) contribution
rate determined for that calendar year under RCW 50.29.025, including
the solvency surcharge, if any, for rate class 20 or rate class 40, as
applicable, ((for five consecutive calendar quarters, beginning with
the calendar quarter in which the intent to evade such provision is
found)) plus two percent.
(2) If contributions are not paid on the date on which they are due
and payable as prescribed by the commissioner, there shall be assessed
a penalty of five percent of the amount of the contributions for the
first month or part thereof of delinquency; there shall be assessed a
total penalty of ten percent of the amount of the contributions for the
second month or part thereof of delinquency; and there shall be
assessed a total penalty of twenty percent of the amount of the
contributions for the third month or part thereof of delinquency. No
penalty so added shall be less than ten dollars. These penalties are
in addition to the interest charges assessed under RCW 50.24.040.
(3) Penalties shall not accrue on contributions from an estate in
the hands of a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee in
bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer
subsequent to the date when such receiver, executor, administrator,
trustee in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating
officer qualifies as such, but contributions accruing with respect to
employment of persons by a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee
in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer shall
become due and shall be subject to penalties in the same manner as
contributions due from other employers.
(4) Where adequate information has been furnished to the department
and the department has failed to act or has advised the employer of no
liability or inability to decide the issue, penalties shall be waived
by the commissioner. Penalties may also be waived for good cause if
the commissioner determines that the failure to timely file reports or
pay contributions was not due to the employer's fault.
(5) Any decision to assess a penalty as provided by this section
shall be made by the chief administrative officer of the tax branch or
his or her designee.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny an employer
the right to appeal the assessment of any penalty. Such appeal shall
be made in the manner provided in RCW 50.32.030.

--- END ---