BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.20A.725 and 2001 c 210 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, through the sole authority of the office or its
successor organization, shall maintain a program whereby an individual
of school age or older who possesses a hearing or speech impairment is
provided with telecommunications equipment, software, and/or peripheral
devices, digital or otherwise, that is determined by the office to be
necessary for such a person to access and use telecommunications
transmission services effectively.
(2) The department, through the sole authority of the office or its
successor organization, shall maintain a program where
telecommunications relay services of a human or electronic nature will
be provided to connect hearing impaired, deaf-blind, or speech impaired
persons with persons who do not have a hearing or speech impairment.
Such telecommunications relay services shall provide the ability for an
individual who has a hearing or speech impairment to engage in voice,
tactile, or visual communication by wire or radio with a hearing
individual in a manner that is functionally equivalent to the ability
of an individual who does not have a hearing or speech impairment to
communicate using voice or visual communication services by wire or
radio subject to subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(3) The telecommunications relay service and equipment distribution
program may operate in such a manner as to provide communications
transmission opportunities that are capable of incorporating new
technologies that have demonstrated benefits consistent with the intent
of this chapter and are in the best interests of the citizens of this
state.
(4) The office shall administer and control the award of money to
all parties incurring costs in implementing and maintaining
telecommunications services, programs, equipment, and technical support
services according to this section. The relay service contract shall
be awarded to an individual company registered as a telecommunications
company by the utilities and transportation commission, to a group of
registered telecommunications companies, or to any other company or
organization determined by the office as qualified to provide relay
services, contingent upon that company or organization being approved
as a registered telecommunications company prior to final contract
approval. The relay system providers and telecommunications equipment
vendors shall be selected on the basis of cost-effectiveness and
utility to the greatest extent possible under the program and technical
specifications established by the office.
(a) To the extent funds are available under the then-current rate
and not otherwise held in reserve or required for other purposes
authorized by this chapter, the office may award contracts for
communications and related services and equipment for hearing impaired
or speech impaired individuals accessing or receiving services provided
by, or contracted for, the department to meet access obligations under
Title 2 of the federal Americans with disabilities act or related
federal regulations.
(b) The office shall perform its duties under this section with the
goal of achieving functional equivalency of access to and use of
telecommunications services similar to the enjoyment of access to and
use of such services experienced by an individual who does not have a
hearing or speech impairment only to the extent that funds are
available under the then-current rate and not otherwise held in reserve
or required for other purposes authorized by this chapter.
(5) The program shall be funded by a telecommunications relay
service (TRS) excise tax applied to each switched access line provided
by the local exchange companies. The office shall determine, in
consultation with the office's program advisory committee, the budget
needed to fund the program on an annual basis, including both
operational costs and a reasonable amount for capital improvements such
as equipment upgrade and replacement. The budget proposed by the
office, together with documentation and supporting materials, shall be
submitted to the office of financial management for review and
approval. The approved budget shall be given by the department in an
annual budget to the ((utilities and transportation commission))
department of revenue no later than March 1st prior to the beginning of
the fiscal year. The ((utilities and transportation commission))
department of revenue shall then determine the amount of
telecommunications relay service excise tax to be placed on each
switched access line and shall inform ((each)) local exchange
((company)) companies and the utilities and transportation commission
of this amount no later than May ((15)) 1st. The ((utilities and
transportation commission)) department of revenue shall determine the
amount of telecommunications relay service excise tax to be collected
in the following fiscal year by dividing the total of the program
budget, as submitted by the office, by the total number of switched
access lines in the prior calendar year, as reported to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.14B RCW, and shall not exercise any further
oversight of the program under this subsection other than administering
the collection of the telecommunications relay service excise tax as
provided in sections 3 through 11 of this act. The telecommunications
relay service excise tax shall not exceed nineteen cents per month per
access line. ((Each local exchange company shall impose the amount of
excise tax determined by the commission as of July 1, and shall remit
the amount collected directly to the department on a monthly basis.))
The telecommunications relay service excise tax shall be separately
identified on each ratepayer's bill with the following statement:
"Funds federal ADA requirement." All proceeds from the
telecommunications relay service excise tax shall be put into a fund to
be administered by the office through the department. "Switched access
line" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.14B.020.
(6) The telecommunications relay service program and equipment
vendors shall provide services and equipment consistent with the
requirements of federal law for the operation of both interstate and
intrastate telecommunications services for the hearing impaired or
speech impaired. The department and the utilities and transportation
commission shall be responsible for ensuring compliance with federal
requirements and shall provide timely notice to the legislature of any
legislation that may be required to accomplish compliance.
(7) The department shall adopt rules establishing eligibility
criteria, ownership obligations, financial contributions, and a program
for distribution to individuals requesting and receiving such
telecommunications devices distributed by the office, and other rules
necessary to administer programs and services consistent with this
chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.36.430 and 2003 c 134 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington telephone assistance program shall be funded by
a telephone assistance excise tax on all switched access lines and by
funds from any federal government or other programs for this purpose.
Switched access lines are defined in RCW 82.14B.020. The telephone
assistance excise tax shall be applied equally to all residential and
business access lines not to exceed fourteen cents per month. The
department shall submit an approved annual budget for the Washington
telephone assistance program to the department of revenue no later than
March 1st prior to the beginning of each fiscal year. The department
of revenue shall then determine the amount of telephone assistance
excise tax to be placed on each switched access line and shall inform
local exchange companies and the utilities and transportation
commission of this amount no later than May 1st. The department of
revenue shall determine the amount of telephone assistance excise tax
by dividing the total of the program budget funded by the telephone
assistance excise tax, as submitted by the department, by the total
number of switched access lines in the prior calendar year. The
telephone assistance excise tax shall be separately identified on each
ratepayer's bill as the "Washington telephone assistance program." All
money collected from the telephone assistance excise tax shall be
transferred to a telephone assistance fund administered by the
department.
(2) Local exchange companies shall bill the fund for their expenses
incurred in offering the telephone assistance program, including
administrative and program expenses. The department shall disburse the
money to the local exchange companies. The department is exempted from
having to conclude a contract with local exchange companies in order to
effect this reimbursement. The department shall recover its
administrative costs from the fund. The department may specify by rule
the range and extent of administrative and program expenses that will
be reimbursed to local exchange companies.
(3) The department shall enter into an agreement with the
department of community, trade, and economic development for an amount
not to exceed eight percent of the prior fiscal year's total revenue
for the administrative and program expenses of providing community
service voice mail services. The community service voice mail service
may include toll-free lines in community action agencies through which
recipients can access their community service voice mailboxes at no
charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Switched access line" has the meaning provided in RCW
82.14B.020.
(2) "Local exchange company" has the meaning provided in RCW
80.04.010.
(3) "Subscriber" means the retail purchaser of telephone service as
telephone service is defined in RCW 82.04.065(3).
(4) "Telephone program excise taxes" means the taxes on switched
access lines imposed by RCW 43.20A.725 and 80.36.430.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department shall collect the telephone
program excise taxes on behalf of the department of social and health
services at no cost to the department of social and health services.
The telephone program excise taxes shall be remitted to the department
by local exchange companies on a tax return provided by the department.
All telephone program excise taxes shall be deposited by the treasurer
into the account described in RCW 43.20A.725 and the account described
in RCW 80.36.430.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Telephone program excise taxes shall be
collected from the subscriber by the local exchange company providing
the switched access line.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Telephone program excise taxes must be
paid by the subscriber to the local exchange company providing the
switched access line, and each local exchange company shall collect
from the subscriber the full amount of the taxes payable. Telephone
program excise taxes to be collected by the local exchange company are
deemed to be held in trust by the local exchange company until paid to
the department. Any local exchange company that appropriates or
converts the tax collected to its own use or to any use other than the
payment of the tax to the extent that the money collected is not
available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) If any local exchange company fails to collect telephone
program excise taxes or, after collecting the tax, fails to pay it to
the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter, whether such
failure is the result of its own act or the result of acts or
conditions beyond its control, the local exchange company is personally
liable to the state for the amount of the tax, unless the local
exchange company has taken from the buyer in good faith a properly
executed resale certificate under section 9 of this act.
(3) The amount of tax, until paid by the subscriber to the local
exchange company or to the department, constitutes a debt from the
subscriber to the local exchange company. Any local exchange company
that fails or refuses to collect telephone program excise taxes as
required with intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to
gain some advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any
subscriber who refuses to pay any telephone excise tax is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(4) If a subscriber has failed to pay to the local exchange company
the telephone program excise taxes and the local exchange company has
not paid the amount of the tax to the department, the department may,
in its discretion, proceed directly against the subscriber for
collection of the tax, in which case a penalty of ten percent may be
added to the amount of the tax for failure of the subscriber to pay the
tax to the local exchange company, regardless of when the tax is
collected by the department. Telephone program excise taxes are due as
provided under section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department shall administer and
shall adopt rules necessary to enforce and administer the collection of
telephone program excise taxes. Chapter 82.32 RCW, with the exception
of RCW 82.32.045, 82.32.145, and 82.32.380, applies to the
administration, collection, and enforcement of telephone program excise
taxes.
(2) Telephone program excise taxes, along with reports and returns
on forms prescribed by the department, are due at the same time the
taxpayer reports other taxes under RCW 82.32.045. If no other taxes
are reported under RCW 82.32.045, the taxpayer shall remit telephone
program excise taxes on an annual basis in accordance with RCW
82.32.045.
(3) The department may relieve any taxpayer or class of taxpayers
from the obligation of remitting monthly and may require the return to
cover other longer reporting periods, but in no event may returns be
filed for a period greater than one year.
(4) Telephone program excise taxes are in addition to any taxes
imposed upon the same persons under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14B
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A local exchange company shall file tax
returns on a cash receipts or accrual basis according to which method
of accounting is regularly employed in keeping the books of the
company. A local exchange company filing returns on a cash receipts
basis is not required to pay telephone program excise taxes on debts
that are deductible as worthless for federal income tax purposes.
(2) A local exchange company is entitled to a credit or refund for
telephone program excise taxes previously paid on debts that are
deductible as worthless for federal income tax purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Unless a local exchange company has
taken from the buyer a resale certificate or equivalent document under
RCW 82.04.470, the burden of proving that a sale of the use of a
switched access line was not a sale to a subscriber is upon the person
who made the sale.
(2) If a local exchange company does not receive a resale
certificate at the time of the sale, have a resale certificate on file
at the time of the sale, or obtain a resale certificate from the buyer
within a reasonable time after the sale, the local exchange company
remains liable for the telephone program excise taxes as provided in
section 6 of this act, unless the local exchange company can
demonstrate facts and circumstances according to rules adopted by the
department that show the sale was properly made without payment of
telephone program excise taxes.
(3) The penalty imposed by RCW 82.32.291 may not be assessed on
telephone program excise taxes that are due but not paid as a result of
the improper use of a resale certificate. This subsection does not
prohibit or restrict the application of other penalties authorized by
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Upon termination, dissolution, or
abandonment of a corporate or limited liability company business, any
officer, member, manager, or other person having control or supervision
of tax funds collected and held in trust under section 6 of this act,
or who is charged with the responsibility for the filing of returns or
the payment of tax funds collected and held in trust under section 6 of
this act, is personally liable for any unpaid taxes and interest and
penalties on those taxes, if the officer or other person willfully
fails to pay or to cause to be paid any taxes due from the corporation
under this section. For the purposes of this section, any taxes that
have been paid, but not collected, are deductible from the taxes
collected but not paid. For purposes of this subsection "willfully
fails to pay or to cause to be paid" means that the failure was the
result of an intentional, conscious, and voluntary course of action.
(2) The officer, member, manager, or other person is liable only
for taxes collected that became due during the period he or she had the
control, supervision, responsibility, or duty to act for the
corporation described in subsection (1) of this section, plus interest
and penalties on those taxes.
(3) Persons liable under subsection (1) of this section are exempt
from liability if nonpayment of the tax funds held in trust is due to
reasons beyond their control as determined by the department by rule.
(4) Any person having been issued a notice of assessment under this
section is entitled to the appeal procedures under RCW 82.32.160
through 82.32.200.
(5) This section applies only if the department has determined that
there is no reasonable means of collecting the tax funds held in trust
directly from the corporation.
(6) This section does not relieve the corporation or limited
liability company of other tax liabilities or otherwise impair other
tax collection remedies afforded by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Unless otherwise stated in this chapter,
the collection authority and procedures prescribed in chapter 82.32 RCW
apply to collections under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 3 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The department of revenue is
responsible for the administration and collection of telephone program
excise taxes as provided in this act only with regard to telephone
program excise taxes that are imposed on switched access lines for any
time period occurring on or after the effective date of this act.
(2) The department of social and health services is responsible for
the administration and collection of telephone program excise taxes as
provided in this act only with regard to telephone program excise taxes
that are imposed on switched access lines for the current year and the
four preceding years which occurred prior to the effective date of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The secretary of the department of social
and health services and the director of the department of revenue may
take the necessary steps to ensure that this act is implemented on its
effective date.

--- END ---