BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In order to safeguard human health, safety,
and property, and to promote public welfare, any person in either a
public or private capacity using the title of interior designer shall
be required to submit evidence that he or she is qualified under the
provisions of section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 As used in this chapter, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Interior design" means client consultation and the preparation
and administration of design documents, including design studies,
drawings, schedules, specifications, and contracts relating to the
nonstructural and nonseismic interior elements of a building or
structure. "Nonstructural and nonseismic interior elements" includes
but is not limited to ceilings and partition systems. "Interior
design" includes but is not limited to preparation of working drawings
and specifications for nonload bearing interior construction, reflected
ceiling plans, detailing, materials, finishes, space planning,
furnishing, fixtures, and equipment, in compliance with universal
accessibility and guidelines and all applicable codes.
(3) "Interior designer" means a person registered under this
chapter who is a registered design professional qualified by education,
experience, and examination to affect the function, safety, and quality
of interior spaces.
(4) "Reflected ceiling plan" means a ceiling design drawing that
includes the locations of lighting fixtures and specifications of
ceiling materials, finishes, or other ceiling elements.
(5) "Registration" means the certificate of registration issued by
the department to an interior designer under this chapter.
(6) "Space planning" means the analysis of spatial and occupancy
requirements, including but not limited to preliminary space, final
space, furnishing, fixture, and equipment plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An applicant may qualify for
registration as an interior designer if the applicant pays any
applicable fee established by the department and shows to the
satisfaction of the department that the applicant:
(a)(i) Has a current certificate number issued by the national
council for interior design qualification; and
(ii) Has six years combined work experience and formal education in
interior design. At a minimum, there must be two years of formal
education in interior design; or
(b) Provides the department, by July 1, 2007, with proof of fifteen
years of work experience as an interior designer and either two years
of formal education in interior design or a current certificate number
issued by the national council for interior design qualification prior
to the effective date of this section.
(2) The department may also grant registration by reciprocity. An
applicant applying to the department for registration by reciprocity
must furnish satisfactory evidence that the applicant meets both of the
following requirements:
(a) Holds a valid registration or license issued by another
registration authority recognized by the department, where the
qualifications for registration or licensure are substantially
equivalent to those required by this chapter on the date of original
registration or licensure with the other registration authority; and
(b) Holds a current certificate number issued by the national
council for interior design qualification.
(3) The department must develop by rule, in consultation with
professional organizations representing interior design, the necessary
forms to use in verifying education and work experience for
registration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department must grant a certificate of
registration to an applicant who meets the requirements of section 3 of
this act beginning July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The renewal date for certificates of
registration shall be set by the director in accordance with RCW
43.24.086. An interior designer who fails to pay the renewal fee
within thirty days of the due date shall pay all delinquent fees plus
a penalty fee equal to one-third of the renewal fee. An interior
designer who fails to pay a renewal fee for a period of five years may
be reinstated under such circumstances as the department determines.
The renewal and penalty fees and the frequency of renewal assessment
must be adopted by the department by rule.
(2) An interior designer in good standing may withdraw from the
practice of interior design by giving written notice to the department,
and may within five years thereafter resume active practice upon
payment of the then-current renewal fee. An interior designer may be
reinstated after a withdrawal of more than five years under such
circumstances as the department determines by rule.
(3) An interior designer registered under this chapter must
complete one continuing education unit, equal to ten hours of
continuing education instruction, every two years. The department, in
consultation with professional organizations representing interior
design, must develop a form to verify continuing education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The director may issue a new certificate of
registration to replace a lost, destroyed, or mutilated certificate.
The director must charge a fee as determined by RCW 43.24.086 for the
issuance of the new certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Beginning July 1, 2007, a person may not use
the title "interior designer" in this state or any other title,
designation, sign, card, or device indicating that the person is an
interior designer unless he or she is registered under the provisions
of this chapter. Every holder of a certificate of registration under
this chapter must display it in a conspicuous place in the holder's
principal office, place of business, or employment. No corporation,
firm, partnership, or association may be granted a certificate of
registration under this chapter. This chapter does not prevent any
individual from offering or providing interior design services provided
they do not use the title "interior designer."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A design document issued by an interior
designer registered under this chapter must be signed, sealed, and
dated by him or her. An interior designer must include the designer's
registration number on all design documents issued by the interior
designer when filed with public authorities. An interior designer must
personally prepare or supervise the preparation of any design document
that is signed and sealed by the interior designer or that lists the
interior designer's registration number.
(2) The department, in consultation with professional organizations
representing interior design, must develop by rule the seal to be used
by interior designers registered by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The uniform regulation of business and
professions act, chapter 18.235 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the
issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) A person who violates a provision of
this chapter or a rule adopted under it is guilty of a misdemeanor and
may also be subject to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed one
thousand dollars for each offense.
(2) Any public officer may initiate an action before the department
to enforce the provisions of this chapter.
(3) The department may apply for relief by injunction without bond
to restrain a person from committing any act that is prohibited by this
chapter. In such proceedings, it is not necessary to allege or prove
either that an adequate remedy at law does not exist or that
substantial irreparable damage would result from the continued
violation thereof. The department is not liable for its actions in any
such proceeding or in any other proceeding instituted by the department
under this chapter. The department in any proper case shall cause
prosecution to be instituted in any county or counties where any
violation of this chapter occurs, and shall aid the prosecution of the
violator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This chapter does not affect or prevent the
practice of architecture under chapter 18.08 RCW or engineering under
chapter 18.43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) Interior design limited to kitchen and
bathroom design is exempt from registration requirements under this
chapter. Notwithstanding the provisions of section seven of this act,
persons practicing interior design limited to kitchen and bathroom
design, may without registering under this chapter use the title
"kitchen and bathroom interior designer."
(2) The department of licensing shall conduct a review of the need
for regulation of kitchen and bathroom interior designers using the
public interest criteria set forth in RCW 18.118.010. In conducting
the review, the department of licensing shall consult with
representatives of kitchen and bathroom interior designers, interior
designers, and consumers of interior design services. The department
of licensing shall submit recommendations to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2004, regarding (a) the need for
regulation of kitchen and bathroom interior design; and (b) if some
form of regulation is recommended, the minimum qualifications to meet
the regulatory standard.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act may be known and cited as the
interior design professionals act of 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 11 and 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---