BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of the legislature is to assist
local governments, state agencies, and citizens in planning under the
growth management act. The legislature does not intend to change the
best available science requirement or the state procedural criteria
adopted to implement that requirement.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, counties and cities shall include the best available science
in developing policies and development regulations to protect the
functions and values of critical areas. In addition, counties and
cities shall give special consideration to conservation or protection
measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous fisheries.
(2) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.
(3) "Best available science" is defined as follows:
(a) "Best available" in this context means science, as defined
below, which applies to the physical and biological setting under
consideration and is practically and economically feasible to be
implemented, as shown by the evidence in the record. A city or county
need not conduct or commission new scientific studies to fill gaps in
the existing scientific information.
(b) "Science" means a process involving sound methods to reach
conclusions to understand the workings of the natural world. The
characteristics of a sound scientific process include, as applicable,
(i) findings that have been critically reviewed by qualified scientific
experts in the field; (ii) methods that are standard in the field or
peer reviewed; (iii) conclusions that are logical and the inferences
drawn from those conclusions reasonable given the data and methods;
(iv) data that has been analyzed using standard or peer reviewed
quantitative or statistical methods; (v) data and findings that are
considered in their proper physical and biological context; and (vi)
assumptions, analytical techniques, and conclusions that are referenced
to relevant, credibly sound scientific literature.
(4) Not all sources of sound scientific information incorporate all
of the generally accepted characteristics of science, as defined in
subsection (3)(b) of this section. However, the more characteristics
that are incorporated into the process, the more sound and reliable the
conclusions are likely to be. The broader the range of valid science,
the broader the range of discretion allowed to a city or county. If
local governments choose within that range, their decision is valid.
(5) Local governments may employ innovative approaches to protect
critical areas when such approaches include best available science, as
defined in subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(6) Local governments may employ experimental approaches to protect
critical areas. However, if a local government bases a management
decision regarding a critical area on information that does not satisfy
all of the characteristics of science, or on conflicting scientific
information, the local government must minimize risk and employ
monitoring and adaptive management to learn whether the approach used
is adequately protecting the functions and values of that critical
area, and adjust the approach as necessary to ensure protection of
critical area functions and values.

--- END ---