BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
A nursing home facility under chapter 18.51 RCW, a boarding home
providing assisted living services under chapter 18.20 RCW, an adult
family home under chapter 70.128 RCW, or a continuing care retirement
community under RCW 70.38.025, and its employees or volunteers, shall
not be liable for civil damages as a result of any act or omission in
providing assistance to a resident of the facility when the facility,
employee, or volunteer, without gross negligence or willful or wanton
misconduct, provides assistance to a resident of the facility who has
fallen and the resident requests assistance in rising or indicates he
or she will accept assistance in rising.

--- END ---