BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Chlor-alkali electrolytic processing business" means a person
who is engaged in a business that uses more than ten average megawatts
of electricity per month in a chlor-alkali electrolytic process to
split the electrochemical bonds of sodium chloride and water to make
chlorine and sodium hydroxide. A "chlor-alkali electrolytic processing
business" does not include direct service industrial customers or their
subsidiaries that contract for the purchase of power from the
Bonneville power administration as of the effective date of this
section.
(b) "Sodium chlorate electrolytic processing business" means a
person who is engaged in a business that uses more than ten average
megawatts of electricity per month in a sodium chlorate electrolytic
process to split the electrochemical bonds of sodium chloride and water
to make sodium chlorate and hydrogen. A "sodium chlorate electrolytic
processing business" does not include direct service industrial
customers or their subsidiaries that contract for the purchase of power
from the Bonneville power administration as of the effective date of
this section.
(2) Effective July 1, 2004, the tax levied under this chapter does
not apply to sales of electricity made by a light and power business to
a chlor-alkali electrolytic processing business or a sodium chlorate
electrolytic processing business for the electrolytic process if the
contract for sale of electricity to the business contains the following
terms:
(a) The electricity to be used in the electrolytic process is
separately metered from the electricity used for general operations of
the business;
(b) The price charged for the electricity used in the electrolytic
process will be reduced by an amount equal to the tax exemption
available to the light and power business under this section; and
(c) Disallowance of all or part of the exemption under this section
is a breach of contract and the damages to be paid by the chlor-alkali
electrolytic processing business or the sodium chlorate electrolytic
processing business are the amount of the tax exemption disallowed.
(3) The exemption provided for in this section does not apply to
amounts received from the remarketing or resale of electricity
originally obtained by contract for the electrolytic process.
(4) In order to claim an exemption under this section, the
chlor-alkali electrolytic processing business or the sodium chlorate
electrolytic processing business must provide the light and power
business with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed
by the department.
(5)(a) This section does not apply to sales of electricity made
after December 31, 2007.
(b) This section expires June 30, 2008.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after
the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent, except as provided in section 1 of this act;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "electrolytic processing
business tax exemption" means the exemption and preferential tax rate
under section 1 of this act.
(2) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources, the
legislature needs information to evaluate whether the stated goals of
legislation were achieved.
(3) The goals of the electrolytic processing business tax exemption
are:
(a) To retain family wage jobs by enabling electrolytic processing
businesses to maintain production of chlor-alkali and sodium chlorate
at a level that will preserve at least seventy-five percent of the jobs
that were on the payroll effective January 1, 2004, as adjusted for
employment reductions publicly announced before November 30, 2003; and
(b) To allow the electrolytic processing industries to continue
production in this state through 2007 so that the industries will be
positioned to preserve and create new jobs when the anticipated
reduction of energy costs occur.
(4)(a) A person who receives the benefit of an electrolytic
processing business tax exemption shall make an annual report to the
department detailing employment, wages, and employer-provided health
and retirement benefits per job at the manufacturing site. The report
is due by March 31st following any year in which a tax exemption is
claimed or used. The report shall not include names of employees. The
report shall detail employment by the total number of full-time,
part-time, and temporary positions. The report shall indicate the
quantity of product produced at the plant during the time period
covered by the report. The first report filed under this subsection
shall include employment, wage, and benefit information for the
twelve-month period immediately before first use of a tax exemption.
Employment reports shall include data for actual levels of employment
and identification of the number of jobs affected by any employment
reductions that have been publicly announced at the time of the report.
Information in a report under this section is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection by the due date of the report, the department shall declare
the amount of taxes exempted for that year to be immediately due and
payable. Public utility taxes payable under this subsection are
subject to interest but not penalties, as provided under this chapter.
This information is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of
RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(5) By December 1, 2006, and by December 1, 2007, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, shall report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of the tax incentive under section 1 of this act.
The report shall measure the effect of the incentive on job retention
for Washington residents, and other factors as the committees select.
The report shall also discuss expected trends or changes to electricity
prices as they affect the industries that benefit from the incentives.

--- END ---