BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county may impose additional regular property tax levies in
an amount equal to fifty cents or less per thousand dollars of the
assessed value of property in the county in accordance with the terms
of this section.
(2) The tax proposition may be submitted at a general or special
election.
(3) The tax may be imposed each year for six consecutive years when
specifically authorized by the registered voters voting on the
proposition, subject to the following:
(a) If the number of registered voters voting on the proposition
does not exceed forty percent of the total number of voters voting in
the taxing district at the last general election, the number of persons
voting "yes" on the proposition shall constitute at least three-fifths
of a number equal to forty percent of the total number of voters voting
in the taxing district at the last general election.
(b) If the number of registered voters voting on the proposition
exceeds forty percent of the total number of voters voting in the
taxing district at the last preceding general election, the number of
persons voting "yes" on the proposition shall be at least three-fifths
of the registered voters voting on the proposition.
(4) Ballot propositions shall conform with RCW 29A.36.210.
(5) Any tax imposed under this section shall be used exclusively
for criminal justice purposes.
(6) The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 do not apply to the tax
authorized in this section.
(7) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the first tax
levy imposed pursuant to this section following the approval of the
levy by the voters pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.36.210 and 2003 c 111 s 921 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
the regular property tax levies authorized in RCW 36.69.145, 67.38.130,
((or)) 84.52.069, or section 1 of this act shall contain in substance
the following:
"Shall the . . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose regular property tax levies of . . . . . . (insert
the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed valuation
for each of . . . . . . (insert the maximum number of years allowable)
consecutive years?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"
Each voter shall indicate either "Yes" or "No" on his or her ballot
in accordance with the procedures established under this title.
(2) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
a permanent regular tax levy under RCW 84.52.069 shall contain the
following:
"Shall the . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose a PERMANENT regular property levy of . . . . .
(insert the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

Sec. 3 RCW 84.52.010 and 2003 c 83 s 310 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and
purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on
any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of
these sections, the assessor shall recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(1) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy shall take precedence over all other levies and
shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under section 1 of
this act, RCW 36.54.130, 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy
by a metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120,
and 84.52.105, the combined rate of regular property tax levies that
are subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then these levies shall be reduced
as follows: (a) The levy imposed by a county under section 1 of this
act must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(b) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated; (((b))) (c) if the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property,
the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that is
protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be reduced until the combined rate
no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; (((c))) (d) if the combined rate of
regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent
limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property, then the levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and
any portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess
of thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or shall be
eliminated; and (((d))) (e) if the combined rate of regular property
tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the thirty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under
RCW 84.52.069 shall be reduced until the combined rate no longer
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or
eliminated.
(2) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(a) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(b) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(c) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, library
districts, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the first fifty
cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for public
hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(d) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced
on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and
(f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated.
((In determining whether the aggregate rate of tax levy on any
property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in that section, the
assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy, as apportioned to the
county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW 84.48.080
without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.))

Sec. 4 RCW 84.52.043 and 2003 c 83 s 311 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as
amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal
property by the taxing districts hereafter named shall be as follows:
(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a)
The levy by the state shall not exceed three dollars and sixty cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted to the state equalized
value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state
department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support of the
common schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not exceed one dollar
and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c) the levy
by any road district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or
town shall not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county is hereby
authorized to increase its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a
rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value for general county purposes if the
total levies for both the county and any road district within the
county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as
a result of the increased county levy.
(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior
taxing districts, other than the state, shall not exceed five dollars
and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term
"junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the
state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and
public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection
shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law
by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution;
(c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW
84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical
services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable
housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f)
the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are
protected under RCW 84.52.120; ((and)) (g) levies imposed by ferry
districts under RCW 36.54.130; and (h) levies for criminal justice
purposes under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---