BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that fair and open competition is a
basic tenet of public works procurement. This competition reduces the
appearance of and opportunity for favoritism and inspires public
confidence that contracts are awarded equitably and economically. The
preservation of the integrity of the competitive bid system dictates
that after bids for a public work, as defined in RCW 39.04.010, have
been opened by the state or municipalities, as defined in RCW
39.04.010, and institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, award must be made to the bidder who submitted the lowest
responsive bid, unless there is a cogent and compelling reason to
reject all bids and cancel the invitation.
(2) Invitations for bids may be canceled after opening the bidding
process, but prior to award where this action is consistent with
subsection (1) of this section and the public owner determines in
writing that cancellation is in the best interest of the government for
specified reasons such as the following:
(a) The invitation for bids included inadequate, ambiguous, or
restrictive specifications.
(b) The public work is no longer required.
(c) The invitation for bids did not provide for consideration of
all needs of the public owner.
(d) All otherwise acceptable bids received are at unreasonable
prices.
(e) The bids were not independently arrived at in open competition,
were collusive, or were submitted in bad faith.
(f) The bids received did not provide competition which was
adequate to ensure reasonable prices.
(3) The requirements of this section apply to procurement of
subcontract bid package work under RCW 39.10.061, except that both the
public owner and the contractor must determine in writing that
rejection of all bids and cancellation of the solicitation of bids is
in the best interest of the government for specified reasons.

--- END ---