BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.30.060 and 2003 c 301 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every invitation to bid on a prime contract that is expected to
cost one million dollars or more for the construction, alteration, or
repair of any public building or public work of the state or a state
agency or municipality as defined under RCW 39.04.010 or an institution
of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016 shall require each
prime contract bidder to submit as part of the bid, or within one hour
after the published bid submittal time, the names of the subcontractors
with whom the bidder, if awarded the contract, will subcontract for
performance of the work of: HVAC (heating, ventilation, and air
conditioning); plumbing as described in chapter 18.106 RCW; and
electrical as described in chapter 19.28 RCW, or to name itself for the
work. Bids shall not be publicly opened or read until the names of the
subcontractors with whom the prime contract bidder, if awarded the
contract, will subcontract for performance of the work have been
submitted. The names of the subcontractors with whom the prime
contract bidder, if awarded the contract, will subcontract for
performance of the work shall be publicly read at the bid opening when
bids are opened. The prime contract bidder shall not list more than
one subcontractor for each category of work identified, unless
subcontractors vary with bid alternates, in which case the prime
contract bidder must indicate which subcontractor will be used for
which alternate. Failure of the prime contract bidder to submit as
part of the bid the names of such subcontractors or to name itself to
perform such work or the naming of two or more subcontractors to
perform the same work shall render the prime contract bidder's bid
nonresponsive and, therefore, void.
(2) Substitution of a listed subcontractor in furtherance of bid
shopping or bid peddling before or after the award of the prime
contract is prohibited and the originally listed subcontractor is
entitled to recover monetary damages from the prime contract bidder who
executed a contract with the public entity and the substituted
subcontractor but not from the public entity inviting the bid. It is
the original subcontractor's burden to prove by a preponderance of the
evidence that bid shopping or bid peddling occurred. Substitution of
a listed subcontractor may be made by the prime contractor for the
following reasons:
(a) Refusal of the listed subcontractor to sign a contract with the
prime contractor;
(b) Bankruptcy or insolvency of the listed subcontractor;
(c) Inability of the listed subcontractor to perform the
requirements of the proposed contract or the project;
(d) Inability of the listed subcontractor to obtain the necessary
license, bonding, insurance, or other statutory requirements to perform
the work detailed in the contract; or
(e) The listed subcontractor is barred from participating in the
project as a result of a court order or summary judgment.
(3) The requirement of this section to name the prime contract
bidder's proposed HVAC, plumbing, and electrical subcontractors applies
only to proposed HVAC, plumbing, and electrical subcontractors who will
contract directly with the prime contract bidder submitting the bid to
the public entity.
(4) This section does not apply to job order contract requests for
proposals under RCW 39.10.130.

--- END ---