BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A joint select committee on the
supervision of offenders in the community is established.
(2) The joint select committee shall consist of the following
members:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) The secretary of the department of corrections, or his or her
designee;
(d) One member appointed by the governor;
(e) One member representing crime victims appointed jointly by the
speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the
senate;
(f) One member representing local law enforcement appointed by the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;
(g) One member who is a community corrections officer appointed by
the Washington federation of state employees; and
(h) One member who is an expert on mental health and co-occurring
disorders appointed by an organization representing such experts.
(3) The joint select committee shall be chaired by a legislative
member chosen by the members of the committee.
(4) The joint select committee shall review and make
recommendations regarding changing the manner in which the department
of corrections supervises offenders in the community who are in the two
highest risk categories. In conducting the review, the joint select
committee shall:
(a) Focus on maximizing public safety within available resources
through an effective program of supervision; and
(b) Consider research on best practices regarding the supervision
of offenders in the community.
(5) The joint select committee shall present a report of its
findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2004.
(6) The joint select committee may, where feasible, consult with
individuals from the public and private sector when carrying out its
duties under this section.
(7) Nonlegislative members of the joint select committee shall
serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses
as provided in RCW 43.03.050. Legislative members of the joint select
committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
44.04.120.
(8) Staff of the house of representatives office of program
research and senate committee services shall provide staff support to
the joint select committee.
(9) This section expires March 1, 2005.

--- END ---