BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.92.030 and 1989 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission on harbor lines is hereby authorized to change,
relocate, or reestablish harbor lines in Guemes Channel and Fidalgo Bay
in front of the city of Anacortes, Skagit county; in Grays Harbor in
front of the cities of Aberdeen, Hoquiam, and Cosmopolis, Grays Harbor
county; Bellingham Bay in front of the city of Bellingham and in
Drayton Harbor in front of the city of Blaine, Whatcom county; in
Elliott Bay, Puget Sound and Lake Union within, and in front of the
city of Seattle, King county, and within one mile of the limits of such
city; Port Angeles harbor in front of the city of Port Angeles, Clallam
county; in Lake Washington in front of the cities of Renton and Lake
Forest Park, King county; Commencement Bay in front of the city of
Tacoma, Pierce county; and within one mile of the limits of such city;
Budd Inlet in front of the city of Olympia, Thurston county; the
Columbia river in front of the city of Kalama, Cowlitz county; Port
Washington Narrows and Sinclair Inlet in front of the city of
Bremerton, Kitsap county; Sinclair Inlet in front of the city of Port
Orchard, Kitsap county; in Liberty Bay in front of the city of Poulsbo,
((King)) Kitsap county; the Columbia river in front of the city of
Vancouver, Clark county; Port Townsend Bay in front of the city of Port
Townsend, Jefferson county; the Swinomish Channel in front of the city
of La Conner, Skagit county; and Port Gardner Bay in front of the city
of Everett, ((Snohomish county,)) except no harbor lines shall be
established in Port Gardener Bay west of the easterly shoreline of
Jetty Island as presently situated or west of a line extending S 37°
09' 38" W from the Snohomish River Light (5), and in front of the city
of Edmonds, Snohomish county; in Oakland Bay in front of the city of
Shelton, Mason county; and within one mile of the limits of such city;
in Gig Harbor in front of the city of Gig Harbor, Pierce county; and
within one mile of the limits of such city, at the entrance to the
Columbia river in front of the city of Ilwaco, Pacific county; in the
Columbia river in front of the city of Pasco, Franklin county; and in
the Columbia river in front of the city of Kennewick, Benton county.

--- END ---