BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be cited as the "self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement regulation act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The purposes of this chapter are to:
(1) Provide for the authorization and registration of self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangements;
(2) Regulate self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements in
order to ensure the financial integrity of the arrangements;
(3) Provide reporting requirements for self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangements; and
(4) Provide for sanctions against self-funded multiple employer
welfare arrangements organized, operated, providing benefits, or
maintained in this state that do not comply with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Bona fide association" means an association of employers that
has been in existence for a period of not less than ten years prior to
sponsoring a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement, during
which time the association has engaged in substantial activities
relating to the common interests of member employers, such as
conducting employee training programs, rendering safety and regulatory
compliance services, conducting accident investigations, monitoring and
testing workplace environmental conditions, conducting wage surveys,
negotiating collective bargaining agreements, developing employee
handbooks, improving employee relations, or engaging in lobbying
activities, and that continues to engage in substantial activities in
addition to sponsoring an arrangement.
(2) "Employer" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
business trust, legal representative, or other business entity which
engages in any business, industry, profession, or activity in this
state and employs one or more other persons or who contracts with one
or more persons, the essence of which is the personal labor of that
person or persons.
(3) "Health care service" means that service offered or provided by
health care facilities and health care providers relating to the
prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.
(4) "Incurred claims" means the value of all amounts paid or
payable under a multiple employer welfare arrangement determined by
contract to be a liability with an incurred claims date during the
valuation period. It includes all payments during the valuation period
plus a reasonable estimate of unpaid claims liabilities.
(5) "Multiple employer welfare arrangement" means a multiple
employer welfare arrangement as defined by 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1002, but
does not include an arrangement, plan, program, or interlocal agreement
of or between any political subdivisions of this state, any federal
agencies, or any contractors or subcontractors with federal agencies at
a federal government facility within this state.
(6) "Qualified actuary" means an individual who:
(a) Is a member in good standing of the American academy of
actuaries; and
(b) Is qualified to sign statements of actuarial opinion for health
annual statements in accordance with the American academy of actuaries
qualification standards for actuaries signing the statements.
(7) "Self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement" or
"arrangement" means a multiple employer welfare arrangement that does
not provide for payment of benefits under the arrangement solely
through a policy or policies of insurance issued by one or more
insurance companies licensed under this title.
(8) "Surplus" means the excess of the assets of a self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangement over the liabilities of the
arrangement. The assets and liabilities should be determined in
accordance with the accounting practices and procedures manuals as
adopted by the national association of insurance commissioners, unless
otherwise provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of
this section, a person may not establish, operate, provide benefits, or
maintain a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement in this
state unless the arrangement first obtains a certificate of authority
from the commissioner.
(2) An arrangement is considered to be established, operated,
providing benefits, or maintained in this state if (a) one or more of
the employer members participating in the arrangement is either
domiciled in or maintains a place of business in this state, or (b) the
activities of the arrangement or employer members fall under the scope
of RCW 48.01.020.
(3) An arrangement established, operated, providing benefits, or
maintained in this state prior to December 31, 2003, has until April 1,
2005, to file a substantially complete application for a certificate of
authority. An arrangement that files a substantially complete
application for a certificate of authority by that date is allowed to
continue to operate without a certificate of authority until the
commissioner approves or denies the arrangement's application for a
certificate of authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The commissioner may not issue a certificate
of authority to a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement
unless the arrangement establishes to the reasonable satisfaction of
the commissioner that the following requirements have been satisfied by
the arrangement:
(1) The employers participating in the arrangement are members of
a bona fide association;
(2) The employers participating in the arrangement exercise control
over the arrangement, as follows:
(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, control exists if the board
of directors of the bona fide association or the employers
participating in the arrangement have the right to elect at least
seventy-five percent of the individuals designated in the arrangement's
organizational documents as having control over the operations of the
arrangement and the individuals designated in the arrangement's
organizational documents in fact exercise control over the operation of
the arrangement; and
(b) The use of a third-party administrator to process claims and to
assist in the administration of the arrangement is not evidence of the
lack of exercise of control over the operation of the arrangement;
(3) In this state, the arrangement provides only health care
services;
(4) In this state, the arrangement provides or arranges benefits
for health care services in compliance with those provisions of this
title that mandate particular benefits or offerings and with provisions
that require access to particular types or categories of health care
providers and facilities;
(5) The arrangement provides health care services to not less than
twenty employers and not less than seventy-five employees;
(6) The arrangement may not solicit participation in the
arrangement from the general public. However, the arrangement may
employ licensed insurance agents who receive a commission, unlicensed
individuals who do not receive a commission, and may contract with a
licensed insurance producer who may be paid a commission or other
remuneration, for the purpose of enrolling and renewing the enrollments
of employers in the arrangement;
(7) The arrangement has been in existence and operated actively for
a continuous period of not less than ten years as of December 31, 2003,
except for an arrangement that has been in existence and operated
actively since December 31, 2000, and is sponsored by an association
that has been in existence more than twenty-five years; and
(8) The arrangement is not organized or maintained solely as a
conduit for the collection of premiums and the forwarding of premiums
to an insurance company.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) In addition to the requirements under
section 5 of this act, self-funded multiple employer welfare
arrangements are subject to the following requirements:
(a) Arrangements must maintain a calendar year for operations and
reporting purposes;
(b) Arrangements must satisfy one of the following requirements:
(i)(A) The arrangement must deposit two hundred thousand dollars
with the commissioner to be used for the payment of claims in the event
that the arrangement becomes insolvent; and
(B) The arrangement must submit to the commissioner a written plan
of operation that, in the reasonable discretion of the commissioner,
ensures the financial integrity of the arrangement; or
(ii) The arrangement demonstrates to the reasonable satisfaction of
the commissioner the ability of the arrangement to remain financially
solvent, for which purpose the commissioner may consider:
(A) The pro forma financial statements of the arrangement;
(B) The types and levels of excess of loss insurance coverage,
including the attachment points of the coverage and whether the points
are reflected as annual or monthly levels;
(C) Whether a deposit is required for each employee covered under
the arrangement equal to at least one month's cost of providing
benefits under the arrangement;
(D) The experience of the individuals who will be involved in the
management of the arrangement, including employees, independent
contractors, and consultants; and
(E) Other factors as reasonably determined by the commissioner to
be relevant to a determination of whether the arrangement is able to
operate in a financially solvent manner.
(2) The commissioner may require that the articles, bylaws,
agreements, trusts, or other documents or instruments describing the
rights and obligations of the employers, employees, and beneficiaries
of the arrangement provide that employers participating in the
arrangement are subject to pro rata assessment for all liabilities of
the arrangement.
(3) Self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements with fewer
than one thousand covered persons are required to have aggregate stop
loss coverage, with an attachment point of one hundred twenty-five
percent of expected claims. If the arrangement is allowed to assess
the participating employers to cover actual or projected claims in
excess of plan assets, then the attachment point shall be increased by
the amount of the allowable assessments. If the required attachment
point exceeds one hundred seventy-five percent of expected claims,
aggregate stop loss coverage shall be waived. Arrangements with one
thousand covered persons or more are not required to have aggregate
stop loss coverage.
(4) The arrangement must demonstrate continued compliance with
respect to the conditions set forth in this section as a condition of
receiving and maintaining a certificate of authority. The commissioner
may waive continued compliance with respect to the conditions in this
section at any time after the commissioner has granted a certificate of
authority to an arrangement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A self-funded multiple employer welfare
arrangement must apply for a certificate of authority on a form
prescribed by the commissioner and must submit the application,
together with the following documents, to the commissioner:
(1) A copy of all articles, bylaws, agreements, trusts, or other
documents or instruments describing the rights and obligations of the
employers, employees, and beneficiaries of the arrangement;
(2) A copy of the summary plan description or summary plan
descriptions of the arrangement, including those filed or required to
be filed with the United States department of labor, together with any
amendments to the description;
(3) Evidence of coverage of or letters of intent to participate
executed by at least twenty employers providing allowable benefits to
at least seventy-five employees;
(4) A copy of the arrangement's most recent year's financial
statements that must include, at a minimum, a balance sheet, an income
statement, a statement of changes in financial position, and an
actuarial opinion signed by a qualified actuary stating that the unpaid
claim liability of the arrangement satisfies the standards under this
title;
(5) Proof that the arrangement maintains or will maintain fidelity
bonds required by the United States department of labor under the
employee retirement income security act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et
seq.;
(6) A copy of any excess of loss insurance coverage policies
maintained or proposed to be maintained by the arrangement;
(7) Biographical reports on forms prescribed by the national
association of insurance commissioners evidencing the general
trustworthiness and competence of each individual who is serving or who
will serve as an officer, director, trustee, employee, or fiduciary of
the arrangement;
(8) Fingerprint cards and current fees payable to the Washington
state patrol to check the criminal history of any person who exercises
control over the financial dealings and operations of the self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangement, including collection of employer
contributions, investment of assets, payment of claims, rate setting,
and claims adjudication; and
(9) A statement executed by a representative of the arrangement
certifying, to the best knowledge and belief of the representative,
that:
(a) The arrangement is in compliance with section 5 of this act;
(b) The arrangement is in compliance with the requirements of the
employee retirement income security act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et
seq., or a statement of any requirements with which the arrangement is
not in compliance and a statement of proposed corrective actions; and
(c) The arrangement is in compliance with sections 8 and 9 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Self-funded multiple employer welfare
arrangements must maintain continuously a surplus equal to at least ten
percent of the next twelve months projected incurred claims or two
million dollars, whichever is greater. The commissioner may proceed
against self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements that fail to
maintain the level of surplus required by this section in any manner
that the commissioner is authorized to proceed against a health care
service contractor that failed to maintain minimum net worth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A self-funded multiple employer welfare
arrangement must establish and maintain contribution rates for
participation under the arrangement that satisfy either of the
following requirements:
(1) Contribution rates must equal or exceed the sum of projected
incurred claims for the year, plus all projected costs of operation of
the arrangement for the year, plus an amount equal to any deficiency in
the surplus of the arrangement for the prior year, minus an amount
equal to the surplus of the arrangement in excess of the minimum
required level of surplus; or
(2) Contribution rates must equal or exceed a funding level
established by a report prepared by a qualified actuary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The commissioner shall grant or deny an
application for a certificate of authority within one hundred eighty
days of the date that a completed application, together with the items
designated in section 7 of this act, is submitted to the commissioner.
(2) The commissioner shall grant the application of an arrangement
that satisfies the applicable requirements of sections 5 through 9 of
this act.
(3) The commissioner shall deny the application of an arrangement
that does not satisfy the applicable requirements of sections 5 through
9 of this act. Denial of an application for a certificate of authority
is subject to appeal under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) A certificate of authority granted to an arrangement is
effective unless revoked by the commissioner under section 12 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) A self-funded multiple employer welfare
arrangement must comply with the reporting requirements of this
section.
(2) Every arrangement holding a certificate of authority from the
commissioner must file its financial statements as required by this
title and by the commissioner in accordance with the accounting
practices and procedures manuals as adopted by the national association
of insurance commissioners, unless otherwise provided by law.
(3) Every arrangement must comply with the provisions of chapters
48.12 and 48.13 RCW.
(4) Every arrangement holding a certificate of authority shall,
annually, before the first day of March, file with the commissioner a
true statement of its financial condition, transactions, and affairs as
of the thirty-first day of December of the preceding year. The
statement forms must be those forms approved by the national
association of insurance commissioners for health insurance. The
statement must be verified by the oaths of at least two officers of the
arrangement. Additional information may be required by this title or
by the request of the commissioner.
(5) Every arrangement must report their annual and other statements
in the same manner required of other insurers by rule of the
commissioner.
(6) The arrangement must file with the commissioner a copy of the
arrangement's internal revenue service form 5500 together with all
attachments to the form, at the time required for filing the form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The commissioner may impose sanctions
against a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement that fails
to comply with this chapter. The maximum fine may not exceed ten
thousand dollars for each violation.
(2) The commissioner may issue a notice of intent to revoke the
certificate of authority of a self-funded multiple employer welfare
arrangement that fails to comply with section 8, 9, or 11 of this act.
If, within sixty days of receiving notice under this subsection, the
arrangement fails to file with the commissioner a plan to bring the
arrangement into compliance with section 8, 9, or 11 of this act, the
commissioner may revoke the arrangement's certificate of authority. A
revocation of a certificate of authority is subject to appeal under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) An arrangement that fails to maintain the level of surplus
required by section 8 of this act is subject to the sanctions
authorized in RCW 48.44.160 through 48.44.166.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A self-funded multiple employer welfare
arrangement organized, operated, providing benefits, or maintained in
this state without a certificate of authority is in violation of this
title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Each policy issued by a self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangement must contain, in ten-point type
on the front page and the declaration page, the following notice:

"NOTICE

This policy is issued by a self-funded multiple employer welfare
arrangement. A self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement may
not be subject to all of the insurance laws and regulations of your
state. State insurance insolvency guaranty funds are not available for
a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A self-funded multiple employer welfare
arrangement is subject to RCW 48.43.300 through 48.43.370, the
rehabilitation provisions under chapter 48.31 RCW, and chapter 48.99
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The commissioner may make an
examination of the operations of any self-funded multiple employer
welfare arrangement as often as he or she deems necessary in order to
carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(2) Every self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement shall
submit its books and records relating to its operation for financial
condition and market conduct examinations and in every way facilitate
them. For the purpose of examinations, the commissioner may issue
subpoenas, administer oaths, and examine the officers and principals of
the multiple employer welfare arrangement.
(3) The commissioner may elect to accept and rely on audit reports
made by an independent certified public accountant for the self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangement in the course of that part of the
commissioner's examination covering the same general subject matter as
the audit. The commissioner may incorporate the audit report in his or
her report of the examination.
(4) Whenever any self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement
applies for initial admission, the commissioner may make, or cause to
be made, an examination of the arrangement's business and affairs.
Whenever such an examination is made, all of the provisions of chapter
48.03 RCW not inconsistent with this chapter shall be applicable. In
lieu of making an examination himself or herself, the commissioner may,
in the case of a foreign self-funded multiple employer welfare
arrangement, accept an examination report of the applicant by the
regulatory official in its state of domicile. In the case of a
domestic self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement, the
commissioner may accept an examination report of the applicant by the
regulatory official of a state that has already licensed the
arrangement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This chapter does not apply to:
(1) Single employer entities;
(2) Taft-Hartley plans;
(3) Self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements that do not
provide coverage for health care services; or
(4) Plans that have received a United States department of labor
advisory opinion saying that they constitute a single employee welfare
benefit plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to be codified between RCW 48.43.300 and 48.43.370 to read as follows:
A self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement, as defined in
section 3 of this act, is subject to the same RBC reporting
requirements as a domestic carrier under RCW 48.43.300 through
48.43.370.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 48.31 RCW
to read as follows:
A self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement, as defined in
section 3 of this act, is an insurer under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 48.99 RCW
to read as follows:
A self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement, as defined in
section 3 of this act, is an insurer under this chapter.

Sec. 21 RCW 48.02.190 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 923 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Organization" means every insurer, as defined in RCW
48.01.050, having a certificate of authority to do business in this
state and every health care service contractor registered to do
business in this state. "Class one" organizations shall consist of all
insurers as defined in RCW 48.01.050. "Class two" organizations shall
consist of all organizations registered under provisions of chapter
48.44 RCW. "Class three" organizations shall consist of self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangements as defined in section 3 of this
act.
(b) "Receipts" means (i) net direct premiums consisting of direct
gross premiums, as defined in RCW 48.18.170, paid for insurance written
or renewed upon risks or property resident, situated, or to be
performed in this state, less return premiums and premiums on policies
not taken, dividends paid or credited to policyholders on direct
business, and premiums received from policies or contracts issued in
connection with qualified plans as defined in RCW 48.14.021, and (ii)
prepayments to health care service contractors as set forth in RCW
48.44.010(3) less experience rating credits, dividends, prepayments
returned to subscribers, and payments for contracts not taken.
(2) The annual cost of operating the office of insurance
commissioner shall be determined by legislative appropriation. A pro
rata share of the cost shall be charged to all organizations. Each
class of organization shall contribute sufficient in fees to the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account to pay the reasonable
costs, including overhead, of regulating that class of organization.
(3) Fees charged shall be calculated separately for each class of
organization. The fee charged each organization shall be that portion
of the cost of operating the insurance commissioner's office, for that
class of organization, for the ensuing fiscal year that is represented
by the organization's portion of the receipts collected or received by
all organizations within that class on business in this state during
the previous calendar year: PROVIDED, That the fee shall not exceed
one-eighth of one percent of receipts: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
minimum fee shall be one thousand dollars.
(4) The commissioner shall annually, on or before June 1, calculate
and bill each organization for the amount of its fee. Fees shall be
due and payable no later than June 15 of each year: PROVIDED, That if
the necessary financial records are not available or if the amount of
the legislative appropriation is not determined in time to carry out
such calculations and bill such fees within the time specified, the
commissioner may use the fee factors for the prior year as the basis
for the fees and, if necessary, the commissioner may impose
supplemental fees to fully and properly charge the organizations. The
penalties for failure to pay fees when due shall be the same as the
penalties for failure to pay taxes pursuant to RCW 48.14.060. The fees
required by this section are in addition to all other taxes and fees
now imposed or that may be subsequently imposed.
(5) All moneys collected shall be deposited in the insurance
commissioner's regulatory account in the state treasury which is hereby
created.
(6) Unexpended funds in the insurance commissioner's regulatory
account at the close of a fiscal year shall be carried forward in the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account to the succeeding fiscal
year and shall be used to reduce future fees. During the 2003-2005
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the insurance
commissioner's regulatory account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the account.

Sec. 22 RCW 48.03.060 and 1995 c 152 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Examinations within this state of any insurer or self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined in section 3 of this
act domiciled or having its home offices in this state, other than a
title insurer, made by the commissioner or the commissioner's examiners
and employees shall, except as to fees, mileage, and expense incurred
as to witnesses, be at the expense of the state.
(2) Every other examination, whatsoever, or any part of the
examination of any person domiciled or having its home offices in this
state requiring travel and services outside this state, shall be made
by the commissioner or by examiners designated by the commissioner and
shall be at the expense of the person examined; but a domestic insurer
shall not be liable for the compensation of examiners employed by the
commissioner for such services outside this state.
(3) When making an examination under this chapter, the commissioner
may retain attorneys, appraisers, independent actuaries, independent
certified public accountants, or other professionals and specialists as
examiners, the cost of which shall be borne by the person who is the
subject of the examination, except as provided in subsection (1) of
this section.
(4) The person examined and liable therefor shall reimburse the
state upon presentation of an itemized statement thereof, for the
actual travel expenses of the commissioner's examiners, their
reasonable living expense allowance, and their per diem compensation,
including salary and the employer's cost of employee benefits, at a
reasonable rate approved by the commissioner, incurred on account of
the examination. Per diem salary and expenses for employees examining
insurers domiciled outside the state of Washington shall be established
by the commissioner on the basis of the National Association of
Insurance Commissioner's recommended salary and expense schedule for
zone examiners, or the salary schedule established by the Washington
personnel resources board and the expense schedule established by the
office of financial management, whichever is higher. A domestic title
insurer shall pay the examination expense and costs to the commissioner
as itemized and billed by the commissioner.
The commissioner or the commissioner's examiners shall not receive
or accept any additional emolument on account of any examination.
(5) Nothing contained in this chapter limits the commissioner's
authority to terminate or suspend any examination in order to pursue
other legal or regulatory action under the insurance laws of this
state. Findings of fact and conclusions made pursuant to any
examination are prima facie evidence in any legal or regulatory action.

Sec. 23 RCW 48.14.0201 and 1998 c 323 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "taxpayer" means a health maintenance
organization((,)) as defined in RCW 48.46.020, ((or)) a health care
service contractor((,)) as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined in section 3 of this
act.
(2) Each taxpayer shall pay a tax on or before the first day of
March of each year to the state treasurer through the insurance
commissioner's office. The tax shall be equal to the total amount of
all premiums and prepayments for health care services received by the
taxpayer during the preceding calendar year multiplied by the rate of
two percent.
(3) Taxpayers shall prepay their tax obligations under this
section. The minimum amount of the prepayments shall be percentages of
the taxpayer's tax obligation for the preceding calendar year
recomputed using the rate in effect for the current year. For the
prepayment of taxes due during the first calendar year, the minimum
amount of the prepayments shall be percentages of the taxpayer's tax
obligation that would have been due had the tax been in effect during
the previous calendar year. The tax prepayments shall be paid to the
state treasurer through the commissioner's office by the due dates and
in the following amounts:
(a) On or before June 15, forty-five percent;
(b) On or before September 15, twenty-five percent;
(c) On or before December 15, twenty-five percent.
(4) For good cause demonstrated in writing, the commissioner may
approve an amount smaller than the preceding calendar year's tax
obligation as recomputed for calculating the health maintenance
organization's, health care service contractor's, or certified health
plan's prepayment obligations for the current tax year.
(5) Moneys collected under this section shall be deposited in the
general fund through March 31, 1996, and in the health services account
under RCW 43.72.900 after March 31, 1996.
(6) The taxes imposed in this section do not apply to:
(a) Amounts received by any taxpayer from the United States or any
instrumentality thereof as prepayments for health care services
provided under Title XVIII (medicare) of the federal social security
act.
(b) Amounts received by any health care service contractor, as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, as prepayments for health care services
included within the definition of practice of dentistry under RCW
18.32.020.
(7) Beginning January 1, 2000, the state does hereby preempt the
field of imposing excise or privilege taxes upon taxpayers and no
county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision shall have the right
to impose any such taxes upon such taxpayers. This subsection shall be
limited to premiums and payments for health benefit plans offered by
health care service contractors under chapter 48.44 RCW ((and)), health
maintenance organizations under chapter 48.46 RCW, and self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangements as defined in section 3 of this
act. The preemption authorized by this subsection shall not impair the
ability of a county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision to
impose excise or privilege taxes upon the health care services directly
delivered by the employees of a health maintenance organization under
chapter 48.46 RCW.
(8) The taxes imposed by this section apply to a self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangement only in the event that they are
not preempted by the employee retirement income security act of 1974,
as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq. The arrangements and the
commissioner shall initially request an advisory opinion from the
United States department of labor and obtain a declaratory ruling from
a federal court on the legality of imposing state premium taxes on
these arrangements before assessing the taxes. If the taxes are not
preempted by federal law, the taxes provided for in this section become
effective on the first day of March following the issuance of a
certificate of authority and shall not be retroactively applied to any
period occurring before the arrangement receives a certificate of
authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 1 through 17 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---