BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.56.720 and 1992 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the ferry operated by Wahkiakum
county between Puget Island and Westport on the Columbia river provides
service which is primarily local in nature with secondary benefits to
the state highway system in providing a bypass for state route 4 and
providing the only crossing of the Columbia river between the Astoria-Megler bridge and the Longview bridge.
(2) The department is hereby authorized to enter into a continuing
agreement with Wahkiakum county pursuant to which the department shall
pay to Wahkiakum county from moneys appropriated for such purpose
monthly amounts not to exceed eighty percent of the operating and
maintenance deficit with a maximum not to exceed the amount
appropriated for that biennium to be used in the operation and
maintenance of the Puget Island ferry, commencing July 1, 1992.
(3) The annual deficit, if any, incurred in the operation and
maintenance of the ferry shall be determined by Wahkiakum county
subject to the approval of the department. If eighty percent of the
deficit for the preceding fiscal year exceeds the total amount paid to
the county for that year, the additional amount shall be paid to the
county by the department upon the receipt of a properly executed
voucher. The total of all payments to the county in any biennium shall
not exceed the amount appropriated for that biennium. The fares
established by the county shall be comparable to those used for similar
runs on the state ferry system.
(4) Whenever((, subsequent to June 9, 1977,)): (a) State route 4
between Cathlamet and Longview is closed to traffic pursuant to chapter
47.48 RCW due to actual or potential slide conditions and there is no
suitable, reasonably short alternate state route provided, or (b) the
Longview-Rainier bridge or the Astoria-Megler bridge is closed due to
emergency conditions, Wahkiakum county is authorized to operate the
Puget Island ferry on a toll-free basis during the entire period of
such closure. The state's share of the ferry operations and
maintenance deficit during such period shall be one hundred percent.
(5) Whenever state route 4 between Cathlamet and Longview is closed
to traffic, as mentioned in subsection (4) hereof, the state of
Washington shall provide temporary rest room facilities at the
Washington ferry landing terminal.

--- END ---