BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.20.020 and 2003 c 231 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Boarding home" means any home or other institution, however
named, which is advertised, announced, or maintained for the express or
implied purpose of providing ((board and)) housing and assuming general
responsibility for the safety and well-being of the residents,
consistent with RCW 18.20.280, and may also provide domiciliary care,
consistent with section 2 of this act, to seven or more residents after
July 1, 2000. However, a boarding home that is licensed to provide
((board and)) housing and assume general responsibility for the safety
and well-being of the residents consistent with RCW 18.20.280, and
which may also provide domiciliary care, consistent with section 2 of
this act, to three to six residents on July 1, 2000, may maintain its
boarding home license as long as it is continually licensed as a
boarding home. "Boarding home" shall not include facilities certified
as group training homes pursuant to RCW 71A.22.040, nor any home,
institution or section thereof which is otherwise licensed and
regulated under the provisions of state law providing specifically for
the licensing and regulation of such home, institution or section
thereof. Nor shall it include any independent senior housing,
independent living units in continuing care retirement communities, or
other similar living situations including those subsidized by the
department of housing and urban development.
(2) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal
successor thereof.
(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(4) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(5) "Designated representative" means a person under RCW 7.70.065,
or a person appointed by the resident to act on the resident's behalf
and at the direction of the resident. The designated representative
may not be an employee of the boarding home.
(6) "Domiciliary care" means: Assistance with activities of daily
living provided by the boarding home either directly or indirectly; or
((assuming general responsibility for the safety and well-being of the
resident)) health support services, if provided directly or indirectly
by the boarding home; or intermittent nursing services, if provided
directly or indirectly by the boarding home. (("Domiciliary care" does
not include general observation or preadmission assessment for the
purposes of transitioning to a licensed care setting.
(6))) (7) "General responsibility for the safety and well-being of
the resident" includes the provision of: Meals, nutritious snacks,
laundry, emergency assistance, activities, housekeeping services, and
observation of residents for changes in overall functioning. However,
observation of residents for changes in overall functioning shall not
be construed to include systems or methods employed by independent
senior housing, independent living units in continuing care retirement
communities, or other similar living situations including those
subsidized by the department of housing and urban development, to
monitor the well-being of nonresident individuals.
(8) "General responsibility for the safety and well-being of the
resident" does not include: (a) Emergency assistance provided on an
intermittent or nonroutine basis to any nonresident individual; ((or))
(b) blood pressure checks for nonresident individuals; (c) nurse
consultation services provided at the request of a nonresident
individual to determine whether referral to an outside health care
provider is recommended; (d) making health care appointments at the
request of nonresident individuals; (e) reminding nonresident
individuals of scheduled outside health care appointments; (f) one-time
or short term treatment, including but not limited to removing sutures
or staples for nonresident individuals or applying eye drops following
eye surgery for nonresident individuals when performed pursuant to an
outside health care provider's instructions and the treatment is
performed at the request of any nonresident individual, and the
activity is within the scope of practice of the available licensed
nurse; (g) periodic observation or preadmission assessment for the
purposes of transitioning to a licensed care setting; or (h) services
customarily provided under landlord tenant agreements governed by the
residential landlord-tenant act, chapter 59.18 RCW. Such services do
not include continual care or supervision for any nonresident
individual.
(((7))) (9) "Nonresident individual" means a person who resides in
independent senior housing, independent living units in continuing care
retirement communities, or in other similar living environments
including those subsidized by the department of housing and urban
development.
(10) "Resident" means an individual who((: Lives in a boarding
home, including those receiving respite care;)) is not related by blood
or marriage to the operator of the boarding home((;)), and by reason of
age or disability, resides in the boarding home and may receive((s))
domiciliary care, respite care, or hospice care provided either
directly or indirectly by the boarding home.
(11) "Resident applicant" means an individual who has completed and
signed an application for admission to a licensed boarding home.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A boarding home licensed under this chapter may select the
level and scope of care or services that it chooses to provide from the
list of domiciliary care services described in subsection (2), (3), or
(4) of this section. In addition to the care and services described in
subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, the boarding home
licensee may provide additional care and services, as long as the
resident does not require medical or nursing care, and as long as such
additional care or services are disclosed in accordance with this
section.
(a) The boarding home licensee shall disclose the level and scope
of care or services that it chooses to provide to the department,
residents or a resident's designated representative, and interested
consumers upon request.
(b) If the boarding home licensee changes the level or scope of
services that it chooses to provide, the licensee shall provide a
minimum of thirty days' notice to the department and to residents
before the effective date of any change in the level or scope of care
or services provided.
(c) The disclosure of any services or care that a boarding home
licensee offers to provide may include exceptions to allow the licensee
to, on a limited basis, meet the needs of residents pending discharge.
Providing care or services to one or more residents on a limited basis,
pending discharge, shall not be construed to mean that the licensee can
or will reasonably accommodate other residents' similar needs
throughout their boarding home stay.
(d) Even though the boarding home licensee may disclose that it can
provide certain care or services to residents or resident applicants,
the licensee reserves the right to deny admission to a resident
applicant or to discharge any resident when the licensee determines
that the needs of the resident applicant or the resident cannot be met
based upon the cumulative need for care or services of all residents or
the medical complexity of the resident or the resident applicant. The
licensee may immediately discharge a resident when the licensee
determines that it can no longer meet the residents' needs or when the
resident requires care or services that are beyond those that the
licensee has disclosed. The department shall, at the request of the
licensee, secure an alternative placement for the resident.
(e) The boarding home licensee shall use the following form, or one
that is substantially similar, to disclose the care or services that
the licensee may choose to provide:

Boarding Home Name: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Address: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . . Web Address, if applicable: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Boarding Home License Number: . . . . . . . . . . . . Number of License Boarding Home Beds: . . . . . . . . . . . .

This boarding home □ does not accept Medicaid as a source of payment

□ may accept Medicaid payments, with the following conditions/limitations:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

This Disclosure Statement is not intended to take the place of
visiting the boarding home, communicating with boarding home staff, or
understanding the boarding home's fee schedule for services outlined
below, and other offered services.
This licensed boarding home has selected the level and scope of
care or services that it chooses to provide from the list of
domiciliary care services outlined below. Should the boarding home
change the level or scope of services that it chooses to provide, the
provider shall provide a minimum of 30 days' notice to the Department
of Social and Health Services and to residents before the effective
date of any change in the level or scope of care or services provided.
The disclosure of any services or care that a boarding home offers
to provide may include exceptions to allow the provider to, on a
limited basis, meet the needs of residents pending discharge.
Providing care or services to one or more residents on a limited basis,
pending discharge, shall not be construed to mean that the provider can
or will reasonably accommodate other residents' similar needs
throughout their boarding home stay.

This boarding home provides assistance with one or more of the
following Activities of Daily Living:

□ Bathing:

□ Minimal assistance - The resident requires oversight or reminding
only. The resident is capable of bathing without assistance or
supervision, but must be reminded occasionally or cannot get into the
tub or shower alone. Help is limited to standby assistance only.
□ Substantial assistance - The resident requires physical
assistance with a significant part of the bathing activity, for
example, to lather, wash and/or rinse the resident's hair or body, or
physical assistance into a tub or shower is needed.
□ Total assistance - The resident is dependent upon caregivers to
provide a complete bath.
□ Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Dressing:

□ Minimal assistance - The resident can dress and undress but may
need clothing laid out and/or needs to be reminded or supervised on
occasion.
□ Substantial assistance - The resident can assist in dressing or
undressing but frequently or most of the time needs some physical
assistance.
□ Total assistance - The resident is dependent upon caregivers to
do all dressing and undressing.
□ Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Eating:

□ Minimal assistance - The resident may need assistance cutting or
preparing food or beverages for consumption.
□ Substantial assistance - The resident can self-feed but needs
standby assistance for occasional gagging, choking, or swallowing
difficulty. The resident may need reminding or assistance with
adaptive feeding equipment.
□ Total assistance - The resident must be fed some or all food by
a caregiver and/or frequently gags or chokes due to difficulty in
swallowing.
□ Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Personal hygiene:

□ Minimal assistance - The resident can manage personal hygiene and
grooming tasks but must be reminded, supervised, or have personal
grooming items set out, at least some of the time. The resident may
require occasional assistance with both personal hygiene and grooming.
□ Substantial assistance - The resident regularly requires
assistance with personal hygiene and grooming.
□ Total assistance - The resident is dependent upon caregivers to
provide all personal hygiene and grooming.
□ Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Transferring:

□ Minimal assistance - The resident occasionally requires verbal
cuing or standby assistance for transfers.
□ Substantial assistance - The resident occasionally requires a
light touch to guide or steady the resident in transferring.
□ Total assistance - The resident requires physical assistance with
some or all transfers.
□ Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Toileting:

□ Minimal assistance - The resident needs reminding to toilet or
to change a protective garment.
□ Substantial assistance - The resident needs occasional assistance
with parts of the toileting tasks.
□ Total assistance - The resident needs physical assistance to use
the toilet on a scheduled toileting or incontinence program which may
include management of a closed drainage system if the resident has a
catheter or sheath.
□ Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Ambulation and Mobility:

□ Minimal assistance - The resident is ambulatory or mobile, with
or without assistive devices, but requires verbal cuing some of the
time.
□ Substantial assistance - The resident is ambulatory or mobile but
needs occasional standby light touch assistance to guide or steady the
resident during ambulation or mobility.
□ Total assistance - The resident is only ambulatory or mobile,
with or without assistive devices, with the physical assistance of a
caregiver.
□ Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ This boarding home provides one or more of the following Health
Support Services:

□ Medication assistance Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Assistance with treatments Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Blood glucose testing Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Low sodium diets Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ General diabetic diets Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Puree diets Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Mechanical soft diets Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Calorie-controlled diabetic diets Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Other diets Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Arrangement of health care appointments with outside health care providers

Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Coordination of health care services with outside health care providers

Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Assistance with obtaining and maintaining glasses, hearing aids, dentures, canes, crutches, walkers, wheelchairs,

and assistive communication devices Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Other Health Support Services: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ This boarding home provides one or more of the following Intermittent Nursing Services:

□ Medication administration Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Administration of health care treatments Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Blood glucose monitoring Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Ostomy care Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Tube feeding Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Insertion of indwelling urinary catheter Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Other Intermittent Nursing Services: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Admission/Discharge/Transfer

Even though the licensee may disclose that it can provide certain care
or services to residents or resident applicants, the licensee may deny
admission to a resident applicant or to discharge a resident when the
licensee determines that the needs of the resident applicant or the
resident cannot be met based upon the cumulative need for care or
services of all residents or the medical complexity of the resident or
the resident applicant. Notwithstanding RCW 70.129.110 (1)(a) and
(4)(a), the licensee may immediately discharge a resident when the
licensee determines that it can no longer meet the residents' needs or
when the resident requires care or services that are beyond those that
the licensee has disclosed. The licensee and the resident otherwise
retain all other rights of transfer and discharge under RCW 70.129.110.
The department of social and health services shall, at the request of
the licensee, secure an alternative placement for the resident.

Optional Services/Amenities:

□ This boarding home

□ Does permit residents' designated representatives to administer or assist with medications or
treatments, with the following limitations and/or conditions: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Does not permit residents' designated representatives to administer or assist with medications or
treatments.

□ This boarding home has the capacity to assist with the use of oxygen, with the following limitations
or conditions: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ This boarding home

□ Does permit smoking, with the following limitations or conditions: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Does not permit smoking

□ This boarding home

□ Does permit pets, with the following limitations or conditions: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Does not permit pets

□ Religious/Spiritual support services Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Barber/Beauty Shop services Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Facility transportation, Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Housekeeping (...... day/week) Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ This boarding home has the ability to assist with management of wandering behavior:

□ Indoor □ Outdoor Clarification/Other Comments: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Other: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Other: . . . . . . . . . . . .

□ Other: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Phone number to call for more information on this boarding home, or to
schedule an appointment to visit the boarding home: . . . . . . . . . . . .

This Disclosure Statement was completed by: Name: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Title: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Company: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Email: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Phone No.: . . . . . . . . . . . . Date: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Signature: . . . . . . . . . . . .

(2) Activities of daily living assistance may include one or more
of the following:

(a) Bathing:

(i) Minimal assistance. The resident requires oversight or
reminding only. The resident is capable of bathing without assistance
or supervision, but must be reminded occasionally or cannot get into
the tub or shower alone. Help is limited to standby assistance only.
(ii) Substantial assistance. The resident requires physical
assistance with a significant part of the bathing activity, for
example, to lather, wash and/or rinse the resident's hair or body, or
physical assistance into a tub or shower is needed.
(iii) Total assistance. The resident is dependent upon caregivers
to provide a complete bath.

(b) Dressing:

(i) Minimal assistance. The resident can dress and undress but may
need clothing laid out and/or needs to be reminded or supervised on
occasion.
(ii) Substantial assistance. The resident can assist in dressing
or undressing but frequently or most of the time needs some physical
assistance.
(iii) Total assistance. The resident is dependent upon caregivers
to do all dressing and undressing.

(c) Eating:

(i) Minimal assistance. The resident may need assistance cutting
or preparing food or beverages for consumption.
(ii) Substantial assistance. The resident can self-feed but needs
standby assistance for occasional gagging, choking, or swallowing
difficulty. The resident may need reminding or assistance with
adaptive feeding equipment.
(iii) Total assistance. The resident must be fed some or all food
by a caregiver and/or frequently gags or chokes due to difficulty in
swallowing.

(d) Personal Hygiene:

(i) Minimal assistance. The resident can manage personal hygiene
and grooming tasks but must occasionally be reminded, supervised, or
have personal grooming items set out. The resident may require
occasional assistance with both personal hygiene and grooming.
(ii) Substantial assistance. The resident regularly requires
assistance with personal hygiene and grooming.
(iii) Total assistance. The resident is dependent upon caregivers
to provide all personal hygiene and grooming.

(e) Transferring:

(i) Minimal assistance. The resident occasionally requires verbal
cuing or standby assistance for transfers.
(ii) Substantial assistance. The resident occasionally requires
light touch to guide or steady the resident in transferring.
(iii) Total assistance. The resident requires physical assistance
with some or all transfers.

(f) Toileting:

(i) Minimal assistance. The resident needs reminding to toilet or
to change a protective garment.
(ii) Substantial assistance. The resident needs occasional
assistance with parts of the toileting tasks.
(iii) Total assistance. The resident needs physical assistance to
use the toilet on a scheduled toileting, or incontinence program which
may include management of a closed drainage system if the resident has
a catheter or sheath.

(g) Ambulation and Mobility:

(i) Minimal assistance. The resident is ambulatory or mobile, with
or without assistive devices, but requires occasional verbal cuing.
(ii) Substantial assistance. The resident is ambulatory or mobile
but needs occasional standby assistance or light touch assistance to
guide or steady during ambulation or mobility.
(iii) Total assistance. The resident is only ambulatory or mobile,
with or without assistive devices, with the physical assistance of a
caregiver.

(3) Health support services may include one or more of the
following:

(a) Medication assistance;
(b) Assistance with treatments;
(c) Blood glucose testing;
(d) Low sodium diets;
(e) General diabetic diets;
(f) Puree diets;
(g) Mechanical soft foods;
(h) Calorie-controlled diabetic diets;
(i) Arrangement of health care appointments with outside health
care providers;
(j) Coordination of health care services with outside health care
providers; and
(k) Assistance with obtaining and maintaining glasses, hearing
aids, dentures, canes, crutches, walkers, wheelchairs, and assistive
communication devices.

(4) Intermittent nursing services may include one or more of the
following:

(a) Medication administration;
(b) Administration of health care treatments;
(c) Blood glucose monitoring;
(d) Ostomy care;
(e) Tube feeding; and
(f) Insertion of indwelling urinary catheters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A boarding home licensee may permit residents' designated
representatives to administer medications or treatments or to provide
medication or treatment assistance to residents. If the licensee
permits this, the licensee may establish conditions under which such
assistance may occur. The licensee shall disclose to the department,
residents, and each resident's designated representative, and to
interested consumers upon request, information describing whether the
licensee permits assistance with or permits the administration of
medications or treatments and, if so, whether there are any limitations
or conditions and the extent thereof.
(2) A resident's designated representative may only administer or
provide assistance with medications or treatments on behalf of the
resident who has granted the designated representative the authority to
so act.
(3) If a licensee permits residents' designated representatives to
administer medications or treatments or to provide medication or
treatment assistance, the licensee shall request that each designated
representative submit to the licensee a written medication or treatment
plan. At a minimum, the written medication or treatment plan shall
identify:
(a) By name, the designated representative who will administer the
medication or treatment or provide assistance therewith;
(b) The primary medication or treatment administration or
assistance that the designated representative will provide consistent
with subsection (1) of this section. This will be referred to as the
primary plan;
(c) An alternate plan that will meet the resident's medication or
treatment needs if the designated representative is unable to fulfill
his or her duties as specified in the primary plan; and
(d) An emergency contact person and telephone number if the
boarding home licensee observes changes in the resident's functioning
or condition that may relate to the medication or treatment plan.
(4) The boarding home licensee may require that the primary or
alternate medication or treatment plan include other information in
addition to that specified in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The medication or treatment plan shall be signed and dated by
the resident, the resident's designated representative, and the
boarding home licensee.
(6) The designated representative shall immediately notify the
boarding home licensee of any change in the primary or alternate
medication or treatment plan.
(7) When a boarding home licensee permits residents' designated
representatives to assist with or administer medications or treatments,
the licensee must observe the resident for changes in overall
functioning consistent with RCW 18.20.280. The licensee's duty of care
under this section, and any negligence that may be attributed thereto,
is limited to the licensee's failure to observe the resident for a
change in overall functioning, and then to the extent that such change
in overall functioning would have been observed by a reasonable person
having the same skill and knowledge as the licensee.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.20.090 and 1985 c 213 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall adopt, amend, and promulgate such rules,
regulations, and standards with respect to all boarding homes and
operators thereof to be licensed hereunder as may be designed to
further the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter in promoting
safe and adequate care of individuals in boarding homes and the
sanitary, hygienic and safe conditions of the boarding home in the
interest of public health, safety, and welfare. However, the
department may not adopt or amend rules, with respect to matters
pertaining to chapter 18.79 RCW, or any other health professional
licensing matters that are under the purview of the department of
health. The department may, by reference, incorporate any such rules
adopted under chapter 18.79 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The boarding home licensee shall conduct an initial assessment
for each resident applicant. The initial assessment shall include the
following minimum information:
(a) Medical history;
(b) Necessary and contraindicated medications;
(c) A licensed medical or health professional's diagnosis, unless
the individual objects for religious reasons;
(d) Significant known behaviors or symptoms that may cause concern
or require special care. The licensee shall complete the initial
assessment before admission unless there is an emergency. In an
emergency admission, the initial assessment must be completed within
five days of the date of admission. For purposes of this section, an
emergency includes, but is not limited to, evenings, weekends, or
Friday afternoons and the resident applicant would otherwise need to
remain in a licensed hospital, nursing facility, adult family home, an
unsafe home environment, or be without adequate and safe housing.
(e) Mental illness diagnosis, except where protected by
confidentiality laws;
(f) Level of personal care needs;
(g) Activities and service preferences; and
(h) Preferences regarding other issues important to the resident
applicant, such as food and daily routine.
(2) The boarding home licensee shall complete an initial resident
service plan upon move-in to identify the resident's immediate needs
and to provide direction to staff and caregivers relating to the
resident's immediate needs.
(3) The boarding home licensee shall complete a negotiated service
agreement involving the resident and the resident's designated
representative, within thirty days of a resident's move-in date. The
resident's designated representative will not be included in the
development of the negotiated service agreement if the resident objects
to his or her involvement. If the resident is a Medicaid client, the
department's case manager shall also be involved. However, if the case
manager is not available, the completion of the negotiated service
agreement shall not be delayed but shall be sent to the case manager
for review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
By December 12, 2005, the department shall report on the payment
system for licensed boarding homes to the chairs of the senate and
house of representatives health care committees. The department shall
include in the report findings regarding the average costs of providing
care and services for the nonmetropolitan statistical areas,
metropolitan statistical areas, and King county to determine whether
the rates of payment within the designated areas are, on average,
reasonably related to the identified average costs. To protect the
confidentiality of the cost data, the department shall work in
collaboration with the three statewide associations representing
boarding home providers, so that the department does not possess
individual provider identifiable cost data. This cost-to-rate
comparison study shall assess any cost impacts that may be attributed
to the implementation of new boarding home rules occurring between
September 1, 2004, and June 30, 2005. If the department adopts new
boarding home rules after June 30, 2005, the report to the chairs of
the senate and house of representatives health care committees will
instead be due by December 12, 2006.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.20.160 and 1985 c 297 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Because boarding homes are engaged in the rental or leasing of real
property to residents, no person operating a boarding home licensed
under this chapter shall admit to or retain in the boarding home any
aged person requiring nursing or medical care of a type provided by
institutions licensed under chapters 18.51, 70.41 or 71.12 RCW, except
that when registered nurses are available, and upon a doctor's order
that a supervised medication service is needed, it may be provided.
Supervised medication services, as defined by the department but not
exceeding that which is permitted under chapters 69.41 and 18.79 RCW,
may include an approved program of self-medication or self-directed
medication. Such medication service shall be provided only to boarders
who otherwise meet all requirements for residency in a boarding home.
No boarding home shall admit or retain a person requiring twenty-four
hours of continuous skilled nursing care or supervision, excluding
persons who are receiving hospice care or persons who have a short-term
illness that is expected to be resolved within fourteen days.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.20.290 and 2003 c 231 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a boarding home contracts with the department to provide
adult residential care services, enhanced adult residential care
services, or assisted living services under chapter 74.39A RCW, the
boarding home must hold a medicaid eligible resident's room or unit
when short-term care is needed in a nursing home or hospital, the
resident is likely to return to the boarding home, and payment is made
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The medicaid resident's bed or unit shall be held for up to
twenty days. The per day bed or unit hold compensation amount shall be
seventy percent of the daily rate paid for the first seven days the bed
or unit is held for the resident who needs short-term nursing home care
or hospitalization. The rate for the eighth through the twentieth day
a bed is held shall be established in rule, but shall be no lower than
ten dollars per day the bed or unit is held.
(3) The boarding home may seek third-party payment to hold a bed or
unit for twenty-one days or longer. The third-party payment shall not
exceed eighty-five percent of the average daily private pay and
Medicaid rate paid to the facility, and as determined by the facility.
If third-party payment is not available, the medicaid resident may
return to the first available and appropriate bed or unit, if the
resident continues to meet the admission criteria under this chapter.
(4) The department shall monitor the use and impact of the policy
established under this section and shall report its findings to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 31, 2005.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2006.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.39A.009 and 1997 c 392 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult family home" means a home licensed under chapter 70.128
RCW.
(2) "Adult residential care" means services provided by a boarding
home that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a contract
with the department under RCW 74.39A.020 to provide personal care
services.
(3) "Assisted living services" means services provided by a
boarding home that has a contract with the department under RCW
74.39A.010 to provide personal care services, intermittent nursing
services, and medication administration services, and the resident is
housed in a private apartment-like unit.
(4) "Boarding home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.20
RCW.
(5) "Cost-effective care" means care provided in a setting of an
individual's choice that is necessary to promote the most appropriate
level of physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being consistent with
client choice, in an environment that is appropriate to the care and
safety needs of the individual, and such care cannot be provided at a
lower cost in any other setting. But this in no way precludes an
individual from choosing a different residential setting to achieve his
or her desired quality of life.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Enhanced adult residential care" means services provided by a
boarding home that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a
contract with the department under RCW 74.39A.010 to provide personal
care services, intermittent nursing services, and medication
administration services.
(8) "Functionally disabled person" is synonymous with chronic
functionally disabled and means a person who because of a recognized
chronic physical or mental condition or disease, including chemical
dependency, is impaired to the extent of being dependent upon others
for direct care, support, supervision, or monitoring to perform
activities of daily living. "Activities of daily living", in this
context, means self-care abilities related to personal care such as
bathing, eating, using the toilet, dressing, and transfer.
Instrumental activities of daily living may also be used to assess a
person's functional abilities as they are related to the mental
capacity to perform activities in the home and the community such as
cooking, shopping, house cleaning, doing laundry, working, and managing
personal finances.
(9) "Home and community services" means adult family homes, in-home
services, and other services administered or provided by contract by
the department directly or through contract with area agencies on aging
or similar services provided by facilities and agencies licensed by the
department.
(10) "Long-term care" is synonymous with chronic care and means
care and supports delivered indefinitely, intermittently, or over a
sustained time to persons of any age disabled by chronic mental or
physical illness, disease, chemical dependency, or a medical condition
that is permanent, not reversible or curable, or is long-lasting and
severely limits their mental or physical capacity for self-care. The
use of this definition is not intended to expand the scope of services,
care, or assistance by any individuals, groups, residential care
settings, or professions unless otherwise expressed by law.
(11) "Nursing home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.51
RCW.
(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(13) "Tribally licensed boarding home" means a boarding home
licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe which home provides
services similar to boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 74.39A.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) To the extent of available funding, the department of social
and health services may contract for adult residential care ((and
enhanced adult residential care)).
(2) The department shall, by rule, develop terms and conditions for
facilities that contract with the department for adult residential care
((and enhanced adult residential care)) to establish:
(a) Facility service standards consistent with the principles in
RCW 74.39A.050 and consistent with chapter 70.129 RCW; and
(b) Training requirements for providers and their staff.
(3) The department shall, by rule, provide that services in adult
residential care ((and enhanced adult residential care)) facilities:
(a) Recognize individual needs, privacy, and autonomy;
(b) Include personal care ((and limited nursing services)) and
other services that promote independence and self-sufficiency and aging
in place;
(c) Are directed first to those persons most likely, in the absence
of adult residential care ((and enhanced adult residential care))
services, to need hospital, nursing facility, or other out-of-home
placement; and
(d) Are provided in compliance with applicable facility and
professional licensing laws and rules.
(4) When a facility contracts with the department for adult
residential care ((and enhanced adult residential care)), only services
and facility standards that are provided to or in behalf of the adult
residential care ((or the enhanced adult residential care)) client
shall be subject to the adult residential care ((or enhanced adult
residential care)) rules.
(5) To the extent of available funding, the department may also
contract under this section with a tribally licensed boarding home for
the provision of services of the same nature as the services provided
by adult residential care facilities. The provisions of subsections
(2)(a) and (b) and (3)(a) through (d) of this section apply to such a
contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
When the department performs assessments of Medicaid eligible
clients to determine whether such persons are eligible for boarding
home placement, the department shall not adjust the assessment method,
including the algorithms used to categorize clients into assessment
categories, for the sole purpose of remaining within the funding amount
appropriated by the legislature for boarding homes.

Sec. 12 RCW 70.129.110 and 1997 c 392 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The facility must permit each resident to remain in the
facility, and not transfer or discharge the resident from the facility
unless:
(a) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, the transfer or
discharge is necessary for the resident's welfare and the resident's
needs cannot be met in the facility;
(b) The safety of individuals in the facility is endangered;
(c) The health of individuals in the facility would otherwise be
endangered;
(d) The resident has failed to make the required payment for his or
her stay; or
(e) The facility ceases to operate.
(2) All long-term care facilities shall fully disclose to potential
residents or their legal representative the service capabilities of the
facility prior to admission to the facility. If the care needs of the
applicant who is medicaid eligible are in excess of the facility's
service capabilities, the department shall identify other care settings
or residential care options consistent with federal law.
(3) Before a long-term care facility transfers or discharges a
resident, the facility must:
(a) First attempt through reasonable accommodations to avoid the
transfer or discharge, unless agreed to by the resident;
(b) Notify the resident and representative and make a reasonable
effort to notify, if known, an interested family member of the transfer
or discharge and the reasons for the move in writing and in a language
and manner they understand;
(c) Record the reasons in the resident's record; and
(d) Include in the notice the items described in subsection (5) of
this section.
(4)(a) Except when specified in this subsection and as provided in
section 2 of this act, the notice of transfer or discharge required
under subsection (3) of this section must be made by the facility at
least thirty days before the resident is transferred or discharged.
(b) Notice may be made as soon as practicable before transfer or
discharge when:
(i) The safety of individuals in the facility would be endangered;
(ii) The health of individuals in the facility would be endangered;
(iii) An immediate transfer or discharge is required by the
resident's urgent medical needs; or
(iv) A resident has not resided in the facility for thirty days.
(5) The written notice specified in subsection (3) of this section
must include the following:
(a) The reason for transfer or discharge;
(b) The effective date of transfer or discharge;
(c) The location to which the resident is transferred or
discharged;
(d) The name, address, and telephone number of the state long-term
care ombudsman;
(e) For residents with developmental disabilities, the mailing
address and telephone number of the agency responsible for the
protection and advocacy of developmentally disabled individuals
established under part C of the developmental disabilities assistance
and bill of rights act; and
(f) For residents who are mentally ill, the mailing address and
telephone number of the agency responsible for the protection and
advocacy of mentally ill individuals established under the protection
and advocacy for mentally ill individuals act.
(6) A facility must provide sufficient preparation and orientation
to residents to ensure safe and orderly transfer or discharge from the
facility.
(7) A resident discharged in violation of this section has the
right to be readmitted immediately upon the first availability of a
gender-appropriate bed in the facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except that sections 2, 3, and 5 of this act take effect
September 1, 2004.

--- END ---