BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Baccalaureate institutions" means the state universities,
regional universities, and state college under RCW 28B.10.016.
(2) "Institution of higher education" means each of the
baccalaureate institutions, community colleges, and technical colleges.
(3) "Precollege class or laboratory" means high school level
classes or instruction intended to prepare postsecondary students for
college level work. The classes or laboratories may offer high school
level instruction in mathematics, grammar, reading, spelling, writing,
and English. For the purposes of this chapter and RCW 28B.10.685,
classes in English as a second language are not considered precollege
classes.
(4) "Recent high school graduate" means a person who graduated from
a public high school in Washington sometime during the three years
immediately before the student enrolled in a state-supported precollege
class or laboratory at an institution of higher education.
(5) "State-supported" means an activity supported in whole or in
part by money from the state general fund or student operating fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Beginning with the fall 2005 academic
term, each institution of higher education shall assess a charge to
each Washington school district that granted a diploma to a recent high
school graduate enrolled in a state-supported precollege class or
laboratory offered at the institution of higher education. The
superintendent of public instruction, the governing board of each of
the baccalaureate institutions, and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall adopt rules to implement this requirement.
The rules shall include parameters for billing and reporting
requirements.
(2) No later than twenty days after receipt of the information
contained in subsection (1) of this section, each school district shall
transmit to the institution of higher education an amount per student
credit hour that equals the amount per credit hour established for
students in the program under RCW 28A.600.310, plus seven percent,
minus tuition and fees. The amount deducted for tuition and fees shall
be determined by the rules adopted under subsection (1) of this
section. The amount may be based on the per credit hour tuition and
fees amount charged for the courses, or the amount charged to resident
undergraduate students for the same number of credits. The amount
deducted for tuition and fees shall be uniform for the community
colleges and for the technical colleges. The amount may vary for the
baccalaureate institutions, or the rules may permit a tuition and fee
deduction for all baccalaureate institutions. Each school district
shall use money from local funds to pay the charges. If a school
district does not have money available from local funds, the district
shall pay the charges from other nonbasic education funding sources.
(3) Beginning with the fall 2005 academic term, institutions of
higher education shall not include in their enrollment reports for
receipt of state funding, recent high school graduates enrolled in
precollege courses or laboratories.
(4) After consultation with the superintendent of public
instruction, each baccalaureate institution, and, for the community
colleges and technical colleges, the state board for community and
technical colleges, shall adopt rules to implement this section by June
30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

--- END ---