BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.120.010 and 2002 c 56 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) The capacity of many of Washington state's transportation
facilities have failed to keep up with the state's growth, particularly
in major urban regions;
(2) The state cannot by itself fund, in a timely way, many of the
major capacity and other improvements required on highways of statewide
significance ((in the state's largest urbanized area)) and facilities
that are an identified risk for failure;
(3) Providing a transportation system that provides efficient
mobility for persons and freight requires a shared partnership and
responsibility between the state, local, and regional governments and
the private sector; and
(4) Timely construction and development of significant
transportation improvement projects can best be achieved through
enhanced funding options for governments at the county and regional
levels, using already existing tax authority to address roadway and
multimodal needs and new authority for regions to address critical
transportation projects ((of statewide significance)).

Sec. 2 RCW 36.120.020 and 2002 c 56 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional transportation
investment district.
(2) "Department" means the Washington state department of
transportation.
(3) "Highway of statewide significance" means an existing or
proposed state route or federal interstate designated as a highway of
statewide significance by the transportation commission, its successor
entity, or the legislature.
(4) "Lead agency" means a public agency that by law can plan,
design, and build a transportation project and has been so designated
by the district.
(5) "Regional transportation investment district" or "district"
means a municipal corporation ((whose boundaries are coextensive with
two or more contiguous counties and)) that has been created by a county
legislative authority or authorities and a vote of the people under
this chapter to implement a regional transportation investment plan.
For counties specified under RCW 36.120.030(1), the boundaries must be
coextensive with two or more contiguous counties, except as provided in
RCW 36.120.030(1), and for counties specified under RCW 36.120.030(2),
the boundaries may be multicounty, county-wide, or less than county-wide; however, a city must be wholly inside or outside the boundaries
of the district.
(6) "Regional transportation investment district planning
committee" or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created
under RCW 36.120.030 to create and propose to county legislative
authorities a regional transportation investment plan to develop,
finance, and construct transportation projects.
(7) "Regional transportation investment plan" or "plan" means a
plan to develop, construct, and finance a transportation project or
projects.
(8)(a) "Transportation project" means((:
(a) A capital improvement or improvements to a highway that has
been designated, in whole or in part, as a highway of statewide
significance, including an extension, that:
(i) Adds a lane or new lanes to an existing state or federal
highway; or
(ii) Repairs or replaces a lane or lanes damaged by an event
declared an emergency by the governor before January 1, 2002.
(b) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
highway of statewide significance, including an extension, and may
include the following associated multimodal capital improvements:
(i) Approaches to highways of statewide significance;
(ii) High-occupancy vehicle lanes;
(iii) Flyover ramps;
(iv) Park and ride lots;
(v) Bus pullouts;
(vi) Vans for vanpools;
(vii) Buses; and
(viii) Signalization, ramp metering, and other transportation
system management improvements.
(c) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
city street, county road, or existing highway or the creation of a new
highway that intersects with a highway of statewide significance, if
all of the following conditions are met:
(i) The project is included in a plan that makes highway
improvement projects that add capacity to a highway or highways of
statewide significance;
(ii) The secretary of transportation determines that the project
would better relieve traffic congestion than investing that same money
in adding capacity to a highway of statewide significance;
(iii) Matching money equal to one-third of the total cost of the
project is provided by local entities, including but not limited to a
metropolitan planning organization, county, city, port, or private
entity in which a county participating in a plan is located. Local
entities may use federal grants to meet this matching requirement;
(iv) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed ten percent of the revenues generated by the
district;
(v) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed one billion dollars; and
(vi) The specific projects are included within the plan and
submitted as part of the plan to a vote of the people.
(d))) a project or program contained in the transportation plan of
the state or of a regional transportation planning organization,
including operations, preservation, and maintenance ((are excluded from
this definition and may not be included in a regional transportation
investment plan)) of the projects or programs.
(b) "High-priority project" means the restoration, reconstruction,
or improvement of a transportation facility of regional significance
that has failed or is an identified risk for failure in terms of its
design life expectancy or other factors.
(9) "Weighted vote" means a vote that reflects the population each
board or planning committee member represents relative to the
population represented by the total membership of the board or planning
committee. Population will be determined using the federal 2000 census
or subsequent federal census data.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.120.030 and 2002 c 56 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
Regional transportation investment district planning committees are
advisory entities that are created, convened, and empowered as follows:
(1) A county with a population over one million five hundred
thousand persons and any adjoining counties with a population over five
hundred thousand persons may create a regional transportation
investment district and shall convene a regional transportation
investment district planning committee. Any portion of a county that
is located on a peninsula and is connected to the other portion of the
county by a bridge improved under the Public-Private Transportation
Initiatives Act, chapter 47.46 RCW, in a county with a national park
and a population of more than five hundred thousand persons and less
than one million five hundred thousand persons may not be part of a
regional transportation investment district. To proceed with
developing a plan, including submission of a plan to county legislative
authorities for placement on a ballot, at least two contiguous counties
must be included in the plan.
(2) For counties other than those counties specified in subsection
(1) of this section, the county legislative authority may create a
regional transportation investment district and shall convene a
regional transportation investment planning committee. Counties may by
resolution of each county's legislative authority create a district to
include more than one county.
(3) The members of the legislative authorities participating in
planning under this chapter shall serve as the district planning
committee. In addition, for counties planning under subsection (2) of
this section, the planning committee must also include mayors or city
council members of cities within the district so that the proportional
membership on the planning committee in terms of members with weighted
votes reflects the relative population of persons living within the
respective jurisdictions. Members of the planning committee receive no
compensation, but may be reimbursed for travel and incidental expenses
as the planning committee deems appropriate.
The secretary of transportation, or the appropriate regional
administrator of the department, as named by the secretary, shall serve
on the committee as a nonvoting member.
(((3))) (4) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee may be entitled to state funding, as appropriated by the
legislature, for start-up funding to pay for salaries, expenses,
overhead, supplies, and similar expenses ordinarily and necessarily
incurred in selecting transportation projects and funding for those
transportation projects under this chapter. Upon creation of a
regional transportation investment district, the district shall within
one year reimburse the state for any sums advanced for these start-up
costs from the state.
(((4))) (5) The planning committee shall conduct its affairs and
formulate a regional transportation investment plan as provided under
RCW 36.120.040, except that ((it)) planning committees for counties
under subsection (1) of this section shall elect an executive board of
seven members to discharge the duties of the planning committee and
formulate a regional transportation investment plan, subject to the
approval of the full committee.
(((5))) (6) At its first meeting, a regional transportation
investment district planning committee may elect officers and provide
for the adoption of rules and other operating procedures.
(((6))) (7) Governance of and decisions by a regional
transportation investment district planning committee must be by a
sixty-percent weighted majority vote of the total membership.
(((7))) (8) The planning committee may dissolve itself at any time
by a two-thirds weighted majority vote of the total membership of the
planning committee.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.120.040 and 2003 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee shall adopt a regional transportation investment plan
providing for the development, construction, and financing of
transportation projects. The planning committee may consider the
following factors in formulating its plan:
(a) Land use planning criteria;
(b) The input of cities located within a participating county; and
(c) The input of regional transportation planning organizations in
which a participating county is located. A regional transportation
planning organization in which a participating county is located shall
review its adopted regional transportation plan and submit, for the
planning committee's consideration, its list of transportation
improvement priorities.
(2) The planning committee may coordinate its activities with the
department, which shall provide services, data, and personnel to assist
in this planning as desired by the planning committee. In addition,
the planning committee may coordinate with affected cities, towns, and
other local governments that engage in transportation planning.
(3) In conducting its environmental impact statement
responsibilities on the Alaskan Way Viaduct project, the department of
transportation must provide briefings and consult with legislators in
the affected project area on the design alternatives for that facility
as a high-priority project.
(4) The planning committee shall:
(a) Conduct public meetings that are needed to assure active public
participation in the development of the plan;
(b) Adopt a plan proposing the:
(i) Creation of a regional transportation investment district; and
(ii) Construction of transportation projects to improve or maintain
mobility within each county((. Operations, maintenance, and
preservation of facilities or systems may not be part of the plan));
(((c))) (d) Recommend sources of revenue authorized by RCW
36.120.050 and a financing plan to fund selected transportation
projects. The overall plan of the district must leverage the
district's financial contributions so that the federal, state, local,
and other revenue sources continue to fund major congestion relief and
((transportation capacity)) mobility improvement projects in each
county and the district. A combination of local, state, and federal
revenues may be necessary to pay for transportation projects, and the
planning committee shall consider all of these revenue sources in
developing a plan.
(((4))) (5) For counties under RCW 36.120.030(1), the plan must use
tax revenues and related debt for projects that generally benefit a
participating county in proportion to the general level of tax revenues
generated within that participating county. This equity principle
applies to all modifications to the plan, appropriation of contingency
funds not identified within the project estimate, and future phases of
the plan. During implementation of the plan, the board shall retain
the flexibility to manage distribution of revenues, debt, and project
schedules so that the district may effectively implement the plan.
Nothing in this section should be interpreted to prevent the district
from pledging district-wide tax revenues for payment of any contract or
debt entered into under RCW 36.120.130.
(((5))) (6) Before adopting the plan, the planning committee, with
assistance from the department, shall work with the lead agency to
develop accurate cost forecasts for transportation projects. This
project costing methodology must be integrated with revenue forecasts
in developing the plan and must at a minimum include estimated project
costs in constant dollars as well as year of expenditure dollars, the
range of project costs reflected by the level of project design,
project contingencies, identification of mitigation costs, the range of
revenue forecasts, and project and plan cash flow and bond analysis.
The plan submitted to the voters must provide cost estimates for each
project, including reasonable contingency costs. Plans submitted to
the voters must provide that the maximum amount possible of the funds
raised will be used to fund projects in the plan, including
environmental improvements and mitigation, and that administrative
costs be minimized. If actual revenue exceeds actual plan costs, the
excess revenues must be used to retire any outstanding debt associated
with the plan.
(((6))) (7) For counties under RCW 36.120.030(1), if a county opts
not to adopt the plan or participate in the regional transportation
investment district, but two or more contiguous counties do choose to
continue to participate, then the planning committee may, within ninety
days, redefine the regional transportation investment plan and the
ballot measure to be submitted to the people to reflect elimination of
the county, and submit the redefined plan to the legislative
authorities of the remaining counties for their decision as to whether
to continue to adopt the redefined plan and participate. This action
must be completed within sixty days after receipt of the redefined
plan.
(((7))) (8) Once adopted, the plan must be forwarded to the
participating county legislative authority or authorities to initiate
the election process under RCW 36.120.070. The planning committee
shall at the same time provide notice to each city and town within the
district, the governor, the chairs of the transportation committees of
the legislature, the secretary of transportation, and each legislator
whose legislative district is partially or wholly within the boundaries
of the district.
(((8))) (9) If the ballot measure is not approved, the planning
committee may redefine the selected transportation projects, financing
plan, and the ballot measure. The county legislative authority or
authorities may approve the new plan and ballot measure, and may then
submit the revised proposition to the voters at the next election or a
special election. If no ballot measure is approved by the voters by
the third vote, the planning committee is dissolved.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.120.050 and 2003 c 350 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee may, as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
recommend the imposition of some or all of the following revenue
sources, which a regional transportation investment district may impose
upon approval of the voters as provided in this chapter:
(a) A regional sales and use tax, as specified in RCW 82.14.430, of
up to ((0.5)) 0.2 percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales
tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax, upon the
occurrence of any taxable event in the regional transportation
investment district. The proceeds of this tax may be spent only as
follows:
(i) 0.1 percent only for high-priority projects;
(ii) 0.1 percent only for public transportation purposes, commute
trip reduction programs, or high-priority projects, or a combination
thereof;
(b) A local option vehicle license fee, as specified under RCW
82.80.100, of up to one hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the
district. As used in this subsection, "vehicle" means motor vehicle as
defined in RCW 46.04.320. Certain classes of vehicles, as defined
under chapter 46.04 RCW, may be exempted from this fee;
(c) A parking tax under RCW 82.80.030;
(d) A local motor vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060 and
chapter 81.104 RCW;
(e) A local option fuel tax under RCW 82.80.120;
(f) A mileage charge under section 16 of this act;
(g) An employer excise tax under RCW 81.100.030; and
(((g))) (h) With the approval of the transportation commission, or
its successor, vehicle tolls on ((new or reconstructed facilities)) a
local or regional arterial or state or federal highway within the
boundaries of the district. The plan must identify the facilities to
be tolled and the purpose of the toll. Unless otherwise specified by
law or contract, the department shall administer the collection of
vehicle tolls on designated facilities, and the state transportation
commission, or its successor, shall be the tolling authority.
(2) Taxes, fees, and tolls may not be imposed without an
affirmative vote of the majority of the voters within the boundaries of
the district voting on a ballot proposition as set forth in RCW
36.120.070. Revenues from these taxes and fees may be used only to
implement the plan as set forth in this chapter. A district may
contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate
entities for administration and collection of any of the taxes or fees
authorized in this section. In authorizing these revenue sources, it
is the intent of the legislature to provide a range of options that can
be tailored to meet the transportation needs identified by local
elected officials, with voter approval. The legislature does not
intend that all local option tax sources will be used by a single
district, nor that each revenue source will necessarily be imposed to
its maximum limit.
(3) Existing statewide motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes,
at the distribution rates in effect on January 1, 2001, are not
intended to be altered by this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.120.060 and 2002 c 56 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The planning committee shall consider the following criteria
for selecting transportation projects to improve corridor performance:
(a) Reduced level of congestion and improved safety;
(b) Improved travel time;
(c) Improved air quality;
(d) Increases in daily and peak period person and vehicle trip
capacity;
(e) Reductions in person and vehicle delay;
(f) Improved personal mobility;
(g) Improved freight mobility; and
(((g))) (h) Cost-effectiveness of the investment.
(2) The planning committee shall develop and weight other criteria
as necessary to ensure that high-priority projects are accomplished.
(3) Funding provided by this act for the Alaskan Way Viaduct
project as a high-priority project shall not be spent for preliminary
engineering, design, right of way acquisition, or construction on the
project if it could have the effect of reducing roadway capacity on
that facility.
(4) These criteria represent only minimum standards that must be
considered in selecting transportation improvement projects. The board
shall also consider rules and standards for benchmarks adopted by the
transportation commission or its successor.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.120.070 and 2002 c 56 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
Two or more contiguous county legislative authorities under RCW
36.120.030(1) and a county or county legislative authorities under RCW
36.120.030(2), upon receipt of the regional transportation investment
plan under RCW 36.120.040, may ((certify the plan to the ballot,
including identification of the tax options)) submit to the voters of
the proposed district a single ballot measure that approves formation
of the district, approves the regional transportation investment plan,
and approves the revenue sources necessary to ((fund)) finance the
plan. ((County legislative authorities)) The planning committee may
draft ((a ballot title,)) the ballot measure on behalf of the county
legislative authorities, and the county legislative authorities may
give notice as required by law for ballot measures, and perform other
duties as required to ((put the plan before)) submit the measure to the
voters of the proposed district for their approval or rejection ((as a
single ballot measure that both approves formation of the district and
approves the plan)). Counties may negotiate interlocal agreements
necessary to implement the plan. The electorate will be the voters
voting within the boundaries of the participating counties. A simple
majority of the total persons voting on the single ballot measure ((to
approve the plan, establish the district, and approve the taxes and
fees)) is required for approval of the measure.

Sec. 8 RCW 36.120.090 and 2002 c 56 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governing board of a district consists of the members of
the legislative authority of each member county, acting ex officio and
independently. The secretary of transportation or the appropriate
regional administrator of the department, as named by the secretary,
shall also serve as a nonvoting member of the board. For districts in
counties under RCW 36.120.030(1), the governing board may elect an
executive board of seven members to discharge the duties of the
governing board subject to the approval of the full governing board.
(2) A sixty-percent majority of the weighted votes of the total
board membership is required to submit to the county or counties a
modified plan under RCW 36.120.140 or any other proposal to be
submitted to the voters. The county or counties may, with majority
vote of each county legislative authority, submit a modified plan or
proposal to the voters.

Sec. 9 RCW 36.120.140 and 2003 c 194 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board may modify the plan to change transportation projects
or revenue sources if:
(a) For districts in counties under RCW 36.120.030(1), two or more
participating counties adopt a resolution to modify the plan((;)) and
(((b))) the counties submit to the voters in the district a ballot
measure that redefines the scope of the plan, its projects, its
schedule, its costs, or the revenue sources;
(b) For districts in counties under RCW 36.120.030(2), the board
adopts a resolution to modify the plan and the county or counties
submit to the voters in the district a ballot measure that redefines
the scope of the plan, its projects, its schedule, its costs, or the
revenue sources.
If the voters of either type of district fail to approve the
redefined plan, the district shall continue to work on and complete the
plan, and the projects in it, that was originally approved by the
voters. If the voters approve the redefined plan, the district shall
work on and complete the projects under the redefined plan.
(2) The board may modify the plan to change transportation projects
within a participating county if:
(a) A majority of the board approves the change;
(b) The modifications are limited to projects within the county;
(c) The county submits to the voters in the county a ballot measure
that redefines:
(i) Projects;
(ii) Scopes of projects; or
(iii) Costs; and
(iv) The financial plan for the county;
(d) The proposed modifications maintain the equity of the plan and
((does [do])) do not increase the total level of plan expenditure for
the county.
If the voters fail to approve the modified plan, the district shall
continue to work on and complete the plan, and the projects in it, that
was originally approved by the voters. If the voters approve the
redefined plan, the district shall work on and complete the projects
under the redefined plan.
(3) If a transportation project cost exceeds its original cost by
more than twenty percent as identified in the plan:
(a) The board shall, in coordination with the county legislative
authorities, submit to the voters in the district or county a ballot
measure that redefines the scope of the transportation project, its
schedule, or its costs. If the voters fail to approve the redefined
transportation project, the district shall terminate work on that
transportation project, except that the district may take reasonable
steps to use, preserve, or connect any improvement already constructed.
The remainder of any funds that would otherwise have been expended on
the terminated transportation project must first be used to retire any
outstanding debt attributable to the plan and then may be used to
implement the remainder of the plan.
(b) Alternatively for districts in counties under RCW
36.120.030(1), upon adoption of a resolution by two or more
participating counties:
(i) The counties shall submit to the voters in the district a
ballot measure that redefines the scope of the plan, its transportation
projects, its schedule, or its costs. If the voters fail to approve
the redefined plan, the district shall terminate work on that plan,
except that the district may take reasonable steps to use, preserve, or
connect any improvement already constructed. The remainder of any
funds must be used to retire any outstanding debt attributable to the
plan; or
(ii) The counties may elect to have the district continue the
transportation project without submitting an additional ballot proposal
to the voters.
(4) To assure accountability to the public for the timely
construction of the transportation improvement project or projects
within cost projections, the district shall issue a report, at least
annually, to the public and copies of the report to newspapers of
record in the district. In the report, the district shall indicate the
status of transportation project costs, transportation project
expenditures, revenues, and construction schedules. The report may
also include progress towards meeting the performance criteria provided
under this chapter.

Sec. 10 RCW 36.120.190 and 2002 c 56 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
For districts in counties under RCW 36.120.030(1), at the option of
the planning committee, and with the explicit approval of the regional
transit authority, the participating counties may choose to impose any
remaining high capacity transportation taxes under chapter 81.104 RCW
that have not otherwise been used by a regional transit authority and
submit to the voters a common ballot measure that creates the district,
approves the regional transportation investment plan, implements the
taxes, and implements any remaining high capacity transportation taxes
within the boundaries of the regional transportation investment
district. Collection and expenditures of any high capacity
transportation taxes implemented under this section must be determined
by agreement between the participating counties or district and the
regional transit authority electing to submit high capacity
transportation taxes to the voters under a common ballot measure as
provided in this section. If the measure fails, all such unused high
capacity transportation taxes revert back to and remain with the
regional transit authority. A project constructed with this funding is
not considered a "transportation project" under RCW 36.120.020.

Sec. 11 RCW 36.120.200 and 2002 c 56 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
The regional transportation investment district account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. The purpose of this account is
to act as an account into which may be deposited state money, if any,
that may be used in conjunction with district money to fund
transportation projects. Additionally, ((the)) districts may deposit
funds into this account for disbursement, as appropriate, on
transportation projects. Nothing in this section requires any state
matching money. All money deposited in the regional transportation
investment district account will be used for design, right of way
acquisition, capital acquisition, and construction, or for the payment
of debt service associated with these activities, for regionally funded
transportation projects developed under this chapter. Only the
district may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. An
appropriation is not required for expenditures from this account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 36.120
RCW to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this chapter, a
regional transportation investment district may impose vehicle tolls on
local and regional arterials with the approval of the transportation
commission, or its successor, and upon approval of a majority of the
voters voting on a regional transportation investment plan ballot
measure within its boundaries as authorized in this chapter. These
tolls may be imposed to generate revenue to fund the regional
transportation investment plan.

Sec. 13 RCW 47.56.076 and 2002 c 56 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
With the approval of the transportation commission, or its
successor, and upon approval of a majority of the voters within its
boundaries voting on the ballot proposition, and only for the purposes
authorized in RCW 36.120.050(1)(((f))) (h), a regional transportation
investment district may impose vehicle tolls on a state ((routes where
improvements financed in whole or in part by a regional transportation
investment district add additional lanes to, or reconstruct lanes on,
a highway of statewide significance)) or federal highway within the
boundaries of the district. The department shall administer the
collection of vehicle tolls on designated facilities unless otherwise
specified in law or by contract, and the state transportation
commission, or its successor, shall ((be the tolling authority)) set
and impose the tolls in amounts sufficient to implement the regional
transportation investment plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this chapter, a
regional transportation investment district may impose vehicle tolls on
either Lake Washington bridge upon approval of a majority of the voters
voting on a regional transportation investment plan ballot measure
within its boundaries as authorized in chapter 36.120 RCW and RCW
47.56.076.

Sec. 15 RCW 82.14.430 and 2002 c 56 s 405 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If approved by the majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, a regional transportation investment
district may impose a sales and use tax of up to ((0.5)) 0.2 percent of
the selling price or value of the article used in the case of a use
tax. The tax authorized by this section is in addition to the tax
authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and must be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing district. Motor
vehicles are exempt from the sales and use tax imposed under this
subsection.
(2) If approved by the majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, a regional transportation investment
district may impose a tax on the use of a motor vehicle within a
regional transportation investment district. The tax applies to those
persons who reside within the regional transportation investment
district. The rate of the tax may not exceed ((0.5)) 0.2 percent of
the value of the motor vehicle. The tax authorized by this subsection
is in addition to the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030 and must be
imposed and collected at the time a taxable event under RCW
82.08.020(1) or 82.12.020 takes place. All revenue received under this
subsection must be deposited in the local sales and use tax account and
distributed to the regional transportation investment district
according to RCW 82.14.050. The following provisions apply to the use
tax in this subsection:
(a) Where persons are taxable under chapter 82.08 RCW, the seller
shall collect the use tax from the buyer using the collection
provisions of RCW 82.08.050.
(b) Where persons are taxable under chapter 82.12 RCW, the use tax
must be collected using the provisions of RCW 82.12.045.
(c) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but
does not include farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW
46.04.180 and 46.04.181, off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in
RCW 46.09.020, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(d) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(e) The value of a motor vehicle must be determined under RCW
82.12.010.
(f) Except as specifically stated in this subsection (2), chapters
82.12 and 82.32 RCW apply to the use tax. The use tax is a local tax
imposed under the authority of chapter 82.14 RCW, and chapter 82.14 RCW
applies fully to the use tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a regional transportation
investment district may impose a charge based upon vehicle miles
traveled. This charge may be, but is not limited to, a charge upon the
vehicle miles traveled within the district by a vehicle, upon vehicle
miles traveled within certain corridors in the district, or upon total
vehicle miles traveled by a vehicle registered to a person whose legal
residence is within the district.
(2) Charges imposed may be collected either periodically in a
manner prescribed by the district or annually by the department of
licensing upon renewal of the vehicle license. The district may
identify categories of miles driven that are subject to or exempt from
the charge, including but not limited to, travel outside the district,
travel in specified corridors, or exempt or maximum mileage charges.
(3) The mileage charge under this section is subject to the
approval of the transportation commission or its statutory successor
and of a majority of the voters within the district boundaries voting
on formation of the district. The mileage charge must be part of the
investment plan of the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---