BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.308 and 1999 c 331 s 2 and 1999 c 274 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is
deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW
46.61.506, to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood for the
purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or presence of any
drug in his or her breath or blood if arrested for any offense where,
at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has reasonable grounds
to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or was in violation of RCW 46.61.503.
(2) The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the
direction of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to
believe the person to have been driving or in actual physical control
of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to have been driving or
in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having alcohol in
a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system and
being under the age of twenty-one. However, in those instances where
the person is incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or
other physical limitation, of providing a breath sample or where the
person is being treated in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office,
emergency medical vehicle, ambulance, or other similar facility in
which a breath testing instrument is not present or where the officer
has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is under the
influence of a drug, a blood test shall be administered by a qualified
person as provided in RCW 46.61.506(4). The officer shall inform the
person of his or her right to refuse the breath or blood test, and of
his or her right to have additional tests administered by any qualified
person of his or her choosing as provided in RCW 46.61.506. The
officer shall warn the driver that:
(a) His or her license, permit, or privilege to drive will be
revoked or denied if he or she refuses to submit to the test;
(b) His or her license, permit, or privilege to drive will be
suspended, revoked, or denied if the test is administered and the test
indicates the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood is
0.08 or more, in the case of a person age twenty-one or over, or in
violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 in the case of a
person under age twenty-one; and
(c) His or her refusal to take the test may be used in a criminal
trial.
(3) Except as provided in this section, the test administered shall
be of the breath only. If an individual is unconscious or is under
arrest for the crime of vehicular homicide as provided in RCW 46.61.520
or vehicular assault as provided in RCW 46.61.522, or if an individual
is under arrest for the crime of driving while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided in RCW 46.61.502, which arrest
results from an accident in which there has been serious bodily injury
to another person, a breath or blood test may be administered without
the consent of the individual so arrested.
(4) Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a
condition rendering him or her incapable of refusal, shall be deemed
not to have withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (1) of this
section and the test or tests may be administered, subject to the
provisions of RCW 46.61.506, and the person shall be deemed to have
received the warnings required under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under
subsection (2) of this section, the person arrested refuses upon the
request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a test or tests of
his or her breath or blood, no test shall be given except as authorized
under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(6) If, after arrest and after the other applicable conditions and
requirements of this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of
the person's blood or breath is administered and the test results
indicate that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood
is 0.08 or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or is in
violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the person is
under the age of twenty-one, or the person refuses to submit to a test,
the arresting officer or other law enforcement officer at whose
direction any test has been given, or the department, where applicable,
if the arrest results in a test of the person's blood, shall:
(a) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of its intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's
license, permit, or privilege to drive as required by subsection (7) of
this section;
(b) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of his or her right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or
she must take to obtain a hearing as provided by subsection (8) of this
section;
(c) Mark the person's Washington state driver's license or permit
to drive, if any, in a manner authorized by the department;
(d) Serve notice in writing that the marked license or permit, if
any, is a temporary license that is valid for sixty days from the date
of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event notice is
given by the department following a blood test, or until the
suspension, revocation, or denial of the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8)
of this section, whichever occurs first. No temporary license is valid
to any greater degree than the license or permit that it replaces; and
(e) Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to
the department within seventy-two hours, except as delayed as the
result of a blood test, a sworn report or report under a declaration
authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that states:
(i) That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or drugs, or both, or was under the age of twenty-one years and
had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
while having an alcohol concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503;
(ii) That after receipt of the warnings required by subsection (2)
of this section the person refused to submit to a test of his or her
blood or breath, or a test was administered and the results indicated
that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.08
or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or was in violation of
RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the person is under the age
of twenty-one; and
(iii) Any other information that the director may require by rule.
(7) The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report
or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under
subsection (6)(e) of this section, shall suspend, revoke, or deny the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive or any nonresident
operating privilege, as provided in RCW 46.20.3101, such suspension,
revocation, or denial to be effective beginning sixty days from the
date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event
notice is given by the department following a blood test, or when
sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8) of this section,
whichever occurs first.
(8) A person receiving notification under subsection (6)(b) of this
section may, within thirty days after the notice has been given,
request in writing a formal hearing before the department. The person
shall pay a fee of one hundred dollars as part of the request. If the
request is mailed, it must be postmarked within thirty days after
receipt of the notification. Upon timely receipt of such a request for
a formal hearing, including receipt of the required one hundred dollar
fee, the department shall afford the person an opportunity for a
hearing. The department may waive the required one hundred dollar fee
if the person is an indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, the hearing is subject to and shall
be scheduled and conducted in accordance with RCW 46.20.329 and
46.20.332. The hearing shall be conducted in the county of the arrest,
except that all or part of the hearing may, at the discretion of the
department, be conducted by telephone or other electronic means. The
hearing shall be held within sixty days following the arrest or
following the date notice has been given in the event notice is given
by the department following a blood test, unless otherwise agreed to by
the department and the person, in which case the action by the
department shall be stayed, and any valid temporary license marked
under subsection (6)(c) of this section extended, if the person is
otherwise eligible for licensing. For the purposes of this section,
the scope of the hearing shall cover the issues of whether a law
enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had
been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug or had been driving or was in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her
system in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 and was under
the age of twenty-one, whether the person was placed under arrest, and
(a) whether the person refused to submit to the test or tests upon
request of the officer after having been informed that such refusal
would result in the revocation of the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive, or (b) if a test or tests were administered,
whether the applicable requirements of this section were satisfied
before the administration of the test or tests, whether the person
submitted to the test or tests, or whether a test was administered
without express consent as permitted under this section, and whether
the test or tests indicated that the alcohol concentration of the
person's breath or blood was 0.08 or more if the person was age twenty-one or over at the time of the arrest, or was in violation of RCW
46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the person was under the age of
twenty-one at the time of the arrest. The sworn report or report under
a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 submitted by a law
enforcement officer is prima facie evidence that the officer had
reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in
actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or the
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her system in
a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 and was under the age of
twenty-one and that the officer complied with the requirements of this
section.
A hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas
for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and
shall administer oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not
issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness at the request of the
person unless the request is accompanied by the fee required by RCW
5.56.010 for a witness in district court. The sworn report or report
under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 of the law enforcement
officer and any other evidence accompanying the report shall be
admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the
certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited
jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary
foundation. The person may be represented by counsel, may question
witnesses, may present evidence, and may testify. The department shall
order that the suspension, revocation, or denial either be rescinded or
sustained.
(9) If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after
such a hearing, the person whose license, privilege, or permit is
suspended, revoked, or denied has the right to file a petition in the
superior court of the county of arrest to review the final order of
revocation by the department in the same manner as an appeal from a
decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal must be
filed within thirty days after the date the final order is served or
the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ
1.1, or other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal
shall be limited to a review of the record of the administrative
hearing. The appellant must pay the costs associated with obtaining
the record of the hearing before the hearing officer. The filing of
the appeal does not stay the effective date of the suspension,
revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection must
include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting
petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the
department's final order of suspension, revocation, or denial as
expeditiously as possible. The review must be limited to a
determination of whether the department has committed any errors of
law. The superior court shall accept those factual determinations
supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were
expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be
inferred from the final order of the department. The superior court
may reverse, affirm, or modify the decision of the department or remand
the case back to the department for further proceedings. The decision
of the superior court must be in writing and filed in the clerk's
office with the other papers in the case. The court shall state the
reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a stay or
other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall
not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is
likely to prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant
will suffer irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension,
revocation, or denial it may impose conditions on such stay.
(10)(a) If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to
drive has been or will be suspended, revoked, or denied under
subsection (7) of this section, other than as a result of a breath or
blood test refusal, and who has not committed an offense for which he
or she was granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW,
petitions a court for a deferred prosecution on criminal charges
arising out of the arrest for which action has been or will be taken
under subsection (7) of this section, the court may direct the
department to stay any actual or proposed suspension, revocation, or
denial for at least forty-five days but not more than ninety days. If
the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose
conditions on such stay. If the person is otherwise eligible for
licensing, the department shall issue a temporary license, or extend
any valid temporary license marked under subsection (6) of this
section, for the period of the stay. If a deferred prosecution
treatment plan is not recommended in the report made under RCW
10.05.050, or if treatment is rejected by the court, or if the person
declines to accept an offered treatment plan, or if the person violates
any condition imposed by the court, then the court shall immediately
direct the department to cancel the stay and any temporary marked
license or extension of a temporary license issued under this
subsection.
(b) A suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section,
other than as a result of a breath or blood test refusal, shall be
stayed if the person is accepted for deferred prosecution as provided
in chapter 10.05 RCW for the incident upon which the suspension,
revocation, or denial is based. If the deferred prosecution is
terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or
denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is completed, the stay
shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial canceled.
(c) The provisions of (b) of this subsection relating to a stay of
a suspension, revocation, or denial and the cancellation of any
suspension, revocation, or denial do not apply to the suspension,
revocation, denial, or disqualification of a person's commercial
driver's license or privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle.
(11) When it has been finally determined under the procedures of
this section that a nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle
in this state has been suspended, revoked, or denied, the department
shall give information in writing of the action taken to the motor
vehicle administrator of the state of the person's residence and of any
state in which he or she has a license.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.25.010 and 1996 c 30 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Alcohol" means any substance containing any form of alcohol,
including but not limited to ethanol, methanol, propanol, and
isopropanol.
(2) "Alcohol concentration" means:
(a) The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of
blood; or
(b) The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of
breath.
(3) "Commercial driver's license" (CDL) means a license issued in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter to an individual that
authorizes the individual to drive a class of commercial motor vehicle.
(4) The "commercial driver's license information system" (CDLIS) is
the information system established pursuant to the CMVSA to serve as a
clearinghouse for locating information related to the licensing and
identification of commercial motor vehicle drivers.
(5) "Commercial driver's instruction permit" means a permit issued
under RCW 46.25.060(((4))) (5).
(6) "Commercial motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle designed or
used to transport passengers or property:
(a) If the vehicle has a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,001 or
more pounds;
(b) If the vehicle is designed to transport sixteen or more
passengers, including the driver;
(c) If the vehicle is transporting hazardous materials ((and is
required to be identified by a placard in accordance with 49 C.F.R.
part 172, subpart F)) as defined in this section; or
(d) If the vehicle is a school bus ((as defined in RCW 46.04.521))
regardless of weight or size.
(7) "Conviction" has the definition set forth in RCW 46.20.270.
(8) "Disqualification" means a prohibition against driving a
commercial motor vehicle.
(9) "Drive" means to drive, operate, or be in physical control of
a motor vehicle in any place open to the general public for purposes of
vehicular traffic. For purposes of RCW 46.25.100, 46.25.110, and
46.25.120, "drive" includes operation or physical control of a motor
vehicle anywhere in the state.
(10) "Drugs" are those substances as defined by RCW 69.04.009.
(11) "Employer" means any person, including the United States, a
state, or a political subdivision of a state, who owns or leases a
commercial motor vehicle, or assigns a person to drive a commercial
motor vehicle.
(12) "Gross vehicle weight rating" (GVWR) means the value specified
by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a single or a
combination or articulated vehicle, or the registered gross weight,
where this value cannot be determined. The GVWR of a combination or
articulated vehicle, commonly referred to as the "gross combined weight
rating" or GCWR, is the GVWR of the power unit plus the GVWR of the
towed unit or units.
(13) "Hazardous materials" ((has the same meaning found in Section
103 of the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act (49 App. U.S.C. 1801
et seq.))) means any material that has been designated as hazardous
under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 5103 and is required to be placarded under subpart
F of 49 C.F.R. part 172 or any quantity of a material listed as a
select agent or toxin in 42 C.F.R. part 73.
(14) "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power used on highways, or
any other vehicle required to be registered under the laws of this
state, but does not include a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
semitrailer operated exclusively on a rail.
(15) "Out-of-service order" means a temporary prohibition against
driving a commercial motor vehicle.
(16) "School bus" means a commercial motor vehicle used to
transport preprimary, primary, or secondary school students from home
to school, from school to home, or to and from school-sponsored events.
School bus does not include a bus used as a common carrier.
(17) "Serious traffic violation" means:
(a) Excessive speeding, defined as fifteen miles per hour or more
in excess of the posted limit;
(b) Reckless driving, as defined under state or local law;
(c) A violation of a state or local law relating to motor vehicle
traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection
with an accident or collision resulting in death to any person; ((and))
(d) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without obtaining a
commercial driver's license;
(e) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without a commercial
driver's license in the driver's possession; however, any individual
who provides proof to the court by the date the individual must appear
in court or pay any fine for such a violation, that the individual held
a valid CDL on the date the citation was issued, is not guilty of a
"serious traffic offense";
(f) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without the proper class of
commercial driver's license endorsement or endorsements for the
specific vehicle group being operated or for the passenger or type of
cargo being transported; and
(g) Any other violation of a state or local law relating to motor
vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, that the
department determines by rule to be serious.
(((17))) (18) "State" means a state of the United States and the
District of Columbia.
(((18))) (19) "Tank vehicle" means a vehicle that is designed to
transport a liquid or gaseous material within a tank that is either
permanently or temporarily attached to the vehicle or the chassis.
Tank vehicles include, but are not limited to cargo tanks and portable
tanks. However, this definition does not include portable tanks having
a rated capacity under one thousand gallons.
(((19))) (20) "United States" means the fifty states and the
District of Columbia.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.25.060 and 2002 c 352 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No person may be issued a commercial driver's license unless
that person is a resident of this state and has passed a knowledge and
skills test for driving a commercial motor vehicle that complies with
minimum federal standards established by federal regulation enumerated
in 49 C.F.R. part 383, subparts G and H, and has satisfied all other
requirements of the CMVSA in addition to other requirements imposed by
state law or federal regulation. The tests must be prescribed and
conducted by the department. In addition to the fee charged for
issuance or renewal of any license, the applicant shall pay a fee of no
more than ten dollars for each classified knowledge examination,
classified endorsement knowledge examination, or any combination of
classified license and endorsement knowledge examinations. The
applicant shall pay a fee of no more than fifty dollars for each
classified skill examination or combination of classified skill
examinations conducted by the department.
(b) The department may authorize a person, including an agency of
this or another state, an employer, a private driver training facility,
or other private institution, or a department, agency, or
instrumentality of local government, to administer the skills test
specified by this section under the following conditions:
(i) The test is the same which would otherwise be administered by
the state;
(ii) The third party has entered into an agreement with the state
that complies with the requirements of 49 C.F.R. part 383.75; and
(iii) The director has adopted rules as to the third party testing
program and the development and justification for fees charged by any
third party.
(2) The department shall work with the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to develop modified P1 and P2 skill examinations
that also include the skill examination components required to obtain
an "S" endorsement. In no event may a new applicant for an "S"
endorsement be required to take two separate examinations to obtain an
"S" endorsement and either a P1 or P2 endorsement, unless that
applicant is upgrading his or her existing commercial driver's license
to include an "S" endorsement. The combined P1/S or P2/S skill
examination must be offered to the applicant at the same cost as a
regular P1 or P2 skill examination.
(3) The department may waive the skills test specified in this
section for a commercial driver's license applicant who meets the
requirements of 49 C.F.R. part 383.77.
(((3))) (4) A commercial driver's license or commercial driver's
instruction permit may not be issued to a person while the person is
subject to a disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle,
or while the person's driver's license is suspended, revoked, or
canceled in any state, nor may a commercial driver's license be issued
to a person who has a commercial driver's license issued by any other
state unless the person first surrenders all such licenses, which must
be returned to the issuing state for cancellation.
(((4))) (5)(a) The department may issue a commercial driver's
instruction permit ((may be issued)) to an ((individual)) applicant who
is at least eighteen years of age and holds a valid ((automobile or
classified)) Washington state driver's license and who has submitted a
proper application, passed the general knowledge examination required
for issuance of a commercial driver's license under subsection (1) of
this section, and paid the appropriate fee for the knowledge
examination and an application fee of ten dollars.
(b) A commercial driver's instruction permit may not be issued for
a period to exceed six months. Only one renewal or reissuance may be
granted within a two-year period.
(c) The holder of a commercial driver's instruction permit may
drive a commercial motor vehicle on a highway only when accompanied by
the holder of a commercial driver's license valid for the type of
vehicle driven who occupies a seat beside the individual for the
purpose of giving instruction in driving the commercial motor vehicle.
((An application for a commercial driver's instruction permit shall be
accompanied by a fee of ten dollars.)) The holder of a commercial
driver's instruction permit is not authorized to operate a commercial
motor vehicle transporting hazardous materials.
(d) The department shall ((forthwith)) transmit the fees collected
for commercial driver's instruction permits to the state treasurer.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.25.070 and 2003 c 195 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The application for a commercial driver's license or commercial
driver's instruction permit must include the following:
(a) The full name and current mailing and residential address of
the person;
(b) A physical description of the person, including sex, height,
weight, and eye color;
(c) Date of birth;
(d) The applicant's Social Security number;
(e) The person's signature;
(f) Certifications including those required by 49 C.F.R. part
383.71(a);
(g) The names of all states where the applicant has previously been
licensed to drive any type of motor vehicle during the previous ten
years;
(h) Any other information required by the department; and
(((h))) (i) A consent to release driving record information to
parties identified in chapter 46.52 RCW and this chapter.
(2) An applicant for a hazardous materials endorsement must submit
an application and comply with federal transportation security
administration requirements as specified in 49 C.F.R. part 1572, and
meet the requirements specified in 49 C.F.R. 383.71(a)(9).
(3) When a licensee changes his or her name, mailing address, or
residence address, the person shall notify the department as provided
in RCW 46.20.205.
(((3))) (4) No person who has been a resident of this state for
thirty days may drive a commercial motor vehicle under the authority of
a commercial driver's license issued by another jurisdiction.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.25.080 and 1996 c 30 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commercial driver's license must be marked "commercial
driver's license" or "CDL," and must be, to the maximum extent
practicable, tamperproof. It must include, but not be limited to, the
following information:
(a) The name and residence address of the person;
(b) The person's color photograph;
(c) A physical description of the person including sex, height,
weight, and eye color;
(d) Date of birth;
(e) The person's Social Security number or any number or identifier
deemed appropriate by the department;
(f) The person's signature;
(g) The class or type of commercial motor vehicle or vehicles that
the person is authorized to drive, together with any endorsements or
restrictions;
(h) The name of the state; and
(i) The dates between which the license is valid.
(2) Commercial driver's licenses may be issued with the
classifications, endorsements, and restrictions set forth in this
subsection. The holder of a valid commercial driver's license may
drive all vehicles in the class for which that license is issued and
all lesser classes of vehicles except motorcycles and vehicles that
require an endorsement, unless the proper endorsement appears on the
license.
(a) Licenses may be classified as follows:
(i) Class A is a combination of vehicles with a gross combined
weight rating (GCWR) of 26,001 pounds or more, if the GVWR of the
vehicle or vehicles being towed is in excess of 10,000 pounds.
(ii) Class B is a single vehicle with a GVWR of 26,001 pounds or
more, and any such vehicle towing a vehicle not in excess of 10,000
pounds.
(iii) Class C is a single vehicle with a GVWR of less than 26,001
pounds or any such vehicle towing a vehicle with a GVWR not in excess
of 10,000 pounds consisting of:
(A) Vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more passengers,
including the driver; or
(B) Vehicles used in the transportation of hazardous materials
((that requires the vehicle to be identified with a placard under 49
C.F.R., part 172, subpart F)).
(b) The following endorsements and restrictions may be placed on a
license:
(i) "H" authorizes the driver to drive a vehicle transporting
hazardous materials.
(ii) "K" restricts the driver to vehicles not equipped with air
brakes.
(iii) "T" authorizes driving double and triple trailers.
(iv) "P1" authorizes driving all vehicles, other than school buses,
carrying passengers.
(v) "P2" authorizes driving vehicles with a GVWR of less than
26,001 pounds, other than school buses, carrying sixteen or more
passengers, including the driver.
(vi) "N" authorizes driving tank vehicles.
(vii) "X" represents a combination of hazardous materials and tank
vehicle endorsements.
(viii) "S" authorizes driving school buses.
The license may be issued with additional endorsements and
restrictions as established by rule of the director.
(3) All school bus drivers must have either a "P1" or "P2"
endorsement depending on the GVWR of the school bus being driven.
(4) Before issuing a commercial driver's license, the department
shall obtain driving record information:
(a) Through the commercial driver's license information
system((,));
(b) Through the national driver register((, and));
(c) From the current state of record; and
(d) From all states where the applicant was previously licensed
over the last ten years to drive any type of motor vehicle.
A check under (d) of this subsection need be done only once, either
at the time of application for a new commercial driver's license, or
upon application for a renewal of a commercial driver's license for the
first time after the effective date of this section, provided a
notation is made on the driver's record confirming that the driving
record check has been made and noting the date it was completed.
(5) Within ten days after issuing a commercial driver's license,
the department must notify the commercial driver's license information
system of that fact, and provide all information required to ensure
identification of the person.
(6) A commercial driver's license shall expire in the same manner
as provided in RCW 46.20.181.
(7) When applying for renewal of a commercial driver's license, the
applicant shall complete the application form required by RCW
46.25.070(1), providing updated information and required
certifications. If the applicant wishes to retain a hazardous
materials endorsement, the applicant shall take and pass the written
test for a hazardous materials endorsement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 46.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may not issue, renew, upgrade, or transfer a
hazardous materials endorsement for a commercial driver's license to
any individual authorizing that individual to operate a commercial
motor vehicle transporting a hazardous material in commerce unless the
federal transportation security administration has determined that the
individual does not pose a security risk warranting denial of the
endorsement.
(2) An individual who is prohibited from holding a commercial
driver's license with a hazardous materials endorsement under 49 C.F.R.
1572.5 must surrender any hazardous materials endorsement in his or her
possession to the department.
(3) The department may adopt such rules as may be necessary to
comply with the provisions of 49 C.F.R. part 1572.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.25.090 and 2002 c 272 s 3 and 2002 c 193 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of not less than one year if a report has been
received by the department pursuant to RCW 46.25.120, or if the person
has been convicted of a first violation, within this or any other
jurisdiction, of:
(a) Driving a ((commercial)) motor vehicle under the influence of
alcohol or any drug;
(b) Driving a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol
concentration in the person's system is 0.04 or more as determined by
any testing methods approved by law in this state or any other state or
jurisdiction;
(c) Leaving the scene of an accident involving a ((commercial))
motor vehicle driven by the person;
(d) Using a ((commercial)) motor vehicle in the commission of a
felony;
(e) Refusing to submit to a test to determine the driver's alcohol
concentration while driving a motor vehicle;
(f) Driving a commercial motor vehicle when, as a result of prior
violations committed while operating a commercial motor vehicle, the
driver's commercial driver's license is revoked, suspended, or
canceled, or the driver is disqualified from operating a commercial
motor vehicle;
(g) Causing a fatality through the negligent operation of a
commercial motor vehicle, including but not limited to the crimes of
vehicular homicide and negligent homicide.
If any of the violations set forth in this subsection occurred
while transporting ((a)) hazardous material ((required to be identified
by a placard)), the person is disqualified for a period of not less
than three years.
(2) A person is disqualified for life if it has been determined
that the person has committed or has been convicted of two or more
violations of any of the offenses specified in subsection (1) of this
section, or any combination of those offenses, arising from two or more
separate incidents. ((Only offenses committed after October 1, 1989,
may be considered in applying this subsection.))
(3) The department may adopt rules, in accordance with federal
regulations, establishing guidelines, including conditions, under which
a disqualification for life under subsection (2) of this section may be
reduced to a period of not less than ten years.
(4) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for life who uses a ((commercial)) motor vehicle in the
commission of a felony involving the manufacture, distribution, or
dispensing of a controlled substance, as defined by chapter 69.50 RCW,
or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a
controlled substance, as defined by chapter 69.50 RCW.
(5) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(a) Not less than sixty days if:
(i) Convicted of or found to have committed ((two)) a second
serious traffic ((violations,)) violation while driving a commercial
motor vehicle; or
(ii) Convicted of reckless driving, where there has been a prior
serious traffic violation; or
(b) Not less than one hundred twenty days if:
(i) Convicted of or found to have committed ((three)) a third or
subsequent serious traffic ((violations, committed in)) violation while
driving a commercial motor vehicle ((arising from separate incidents
occurring within a three-year period)); or
(ii) Convicted of reckless driving, where there has been two or
more prior serious traffic violations.
For purposes of determining prior serious traffic violations under
this subsection, each conviction of or finding that a driver has
committed a serious traffic violation while driving a commercial motor
vehicle or noncommercial motor vehicle, arising from a separate
incident occurring within a three-year period, must be counted.
(6) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(a) Not less than ninety days nor more than one year if convicted
of or found to have committed a first violation of an out-of-service
order while driving a commercial vehicle;
(b) Not less than one year nor more than five years if, during a
ten-year period, the person is convicted of or is found to have
committed two violations of out-of-service orders while driving a
commercial vehicle in separate incidents;
(c) Not less than three years nor more than five years if, during
a ten-year period, the person is convicted of or is found to have
committed three or more violations of out-of-service orders while
driving commercial vehicles in separate incidents;
(d) Not less than one hundred eighty days nor more than two years
if the person is convicted of or is found to have committed a first
violation of an out-of-service order while transporting hazardous
materials ((required to be placarded under the Hazardous Materials
Transportation Act (46 U.S.C. Sec. 1801-1813))), or while operating
motor vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more passengers,
including the driver. A person is disqualified for a period of not
less than three years nor more than five years if, during a ten-year
period, the person is convicted of or is found to have committed
subsequent violations of out-of-service orders, in separate incidents,
while transporting hazardous materials ((required to be placarded under
the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act)), or while operating motor
vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more passengers, including
the driver.
(7) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle if a report has been received by the department under RCW
46.25.125 that the person has received a confirmed positive drug or
alcohol test either as part of the testing program required by 49
C.F.R. 382 or 49 C.F.R. 40 or as part of a preemployment drug test. A
disqualification under this subsection remains in effect until the
person undergoes a drug and alcohol assessment by an agency certified
by the department of social and health services and, if the person is
classified as an alcoholic, drug addict, alcohol abuser, or drug
abuser, until the person presents evidence of satisfactory
participation in or successful completion of a drug or alcohol
treatment program that has been certified by the department of social
and health services under chapter 70.96A RCW and until the person has
met the requirements of RCW 46.25.100. The agency making a drug and
alcohol assessment under this section shall forward a diagnostic
evaluation and treatment recommendation to the department of licensing
for use in determining the person's eligibility for driving a
commercial motor vehicle. Persons who are disqualified under this
subsection more than twice in a five-year period are disqualified for
life.
(8)(a) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for the period of time specified in (b) of this subsection if
he or she is convicted of or is found to have committed one of the
following six offenses at a railroad-highway grade crossing while
operating a commercial motor vehicle in violation of a federal, state,
or local law or regulation:
(i) For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to
slow down and check that the tracks are clear of an approaching train;
(ii) For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to
stop before reaching the crossing, if the tracks are not clear;
(iii) For drivers who are always required to stop, failing to stop
before driving onto the crossing;
(iv) For all drivers, failing to have sufficient space to drive
completely through the crossing without stopping;
(v) For all drivers, failing to obey a traffic control device or
the directions of an enforcement officer at the crossing;
(vi) For all drivers, failing to negotiate a crossing because of
insufficient undercarriage clearance.
(b) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(i) Not less than sixty days if the driver is convicted of or is
found to have committed a first violation of a railroad-highway grade
crossing violation;
(ii) Not less than one hundred twenty days if the driver is
convicted of or is found to have committed a second railroad-highway
grade crossing violation in separate incidents within a three-year
period;
(iii) Not less than one year if the driver is convicted of or is
found to have committed a third or subsequent railroad-highway grade
crossing violation in separate incidents within a three-year period.
(9) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for not more than one year if a report has been received by the
department from the federal motor carrier safety administration that
the person's driving has been determined to constitute an imminent
hazard as defined by 49 C.F.R. 383.5.
(10) Within ten days after suspending, revoking, or canceling a
commercial driver's license or disqualifying a driver from operating a
commercial motor vehicle, the department shall update its records to
reflect that action. ((After suspending, revoking, or canceling a
nonresident commercial driver's privileges, the department shall notify
the licensing authority of the state that issued the commercial
driver's license.))

Sec. 8 RCW 46.25.130 and 1989 c 178 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within ten days after receiving a report of the conviction of
or finding that a traffic infraction has been committed by any
nonresident holder of a commercial driver's license, or any nonresident
operating a commercial motor vehicle, for any violation of state law or
local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than
parking violations, ((committed in a commercial motor vehicle,)) the
department shall notify the driver licensing authority in the licensing
state of the conviction.
(2)(a) No later than ten days after disqualifying any nonresident
holder of a commercial driver's license from operating a commercial
motor vehicle, or revoking, suspending, or canceling the nonresident
driving privileges of the nonresident holder of a commercial driver's
license for at least sixty days, the department must notify the state
that issued the license of the disqualification, revocation,
suspension, or cancellation.
(b) The notification must include both the disqualification and the
violation that resulted in the disqualification, revocation,
suspension, or cancellation. The notification and the information it
provides must be recorded on the driver's record.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.25.160 and 1989 c 178 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person may drive a
commercial motor vehicle if the person has a commercial driver's
license or commercial driver's instruction permit issued by any state
or jurisdiction in accordance with the minimum federal standards for
the issuance of commercial motor vehicle driver's licenses or permits,
if the person's license or permit is not suspended, revoked, or
canceled, and if the person is not disqualified from driving a
commercial motor vehicle or is subject to an out-of-service order.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.63.070 and 2000 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who receives a notice of traffic infraction shall
respond to such notice as provided in this section within fifteen days
of the date of the notice.
(2) If the person determined to have committed the infraction does
not contest the determination the person shall respond by completing
the appropriate portion of the notice of infraction and submitting it,
either by mail or in person, to the court specified on the notice. A
check or money order in the amount of the penalty prescribed for the
infraction must be submitted with the response. When a response which
does not contest the determination is received, an appropriate order
shall be entered in the court's records, and a record of the response
and order shall be furnished to the department in accordance with RCW
46.20.270.
(3) If the person determined to have committed the infraction
wishes to contest the determination the person shall respond by
completing the portion of the notice of infraction requesting a hearing
and submitting it, either by mail or in person, to the court specified
on the notice. The court shall notify the person in writing of the
time, place, and date of the hearing, and that date shall not be sooner
than seven days from the date of the notice, except by agreement.
(4) If the person determined to have committed the infraction does
not contest the determination but wishes to explain mitigating
circumstances surrounding the infraction the person shall respond by
completing the portion of the notice of infraction requesting a hearing
for that purpose and submitting it, either by mail or in person, to the
court specified on the notice. The court shall notify the person in
writing of the time, place, and date of the hearing.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, in
hearings conducted pursuant to subsections (3) and (4) of this section,
the court may defer findings, or in a hearing to explain mitigating
circumstances may defer entry of its order, for up to one year and
impose conditions upon the defendant the court deems appropriate. Upon
deferring findings, the court may assess costs as the court deems
appropriate for administrative processing. If at the end of the
deferral period the defendant has met all conditions and has not been
determined to have committed another traffic infraction, the court may
dismiss the infraction.
(b) A person may not receive more than one deferral within a seven-year period for traffic infractions for moving violations and more than
one deferral within a seven-year period for traffic infractions for
nonmoving violations.
(c) A person who is the holder of a commercial driver's license may
not receive a deferral under this section.
(6) If any person issued a notice of traffic infraction:
(a) Fails to respond to the notice of traffic infraction as
provided in subsection (2) of this section; or
(b) Fails to appear at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection
(3) or (4) of this section;
the court shall enter an appropriate order assessing the monetary
penalty prescribed for the traffic infraction and any other penalty
authorized by this chapter and shall notify the department in
accordance with RCW 46.20.270, of the failure to respond to the notice
of infraction or to appear at a requested hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1, 5, 7, 8, and 10 of this act
take effect July 1, 2005.

--- END ---