BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.290 and 1997 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In any case of a valid sale or transfer of the ownership of any
vehicle, the right to the certificates properly transferable therewith,
except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, and to the vehicle license plates
passes to the purchaser or transferee. It is unlawful for the holder
of such certificates, except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, or vehicle
license plates to fail, neglect, or refuse to endorse the certificates
and deliver the vehicle license plates to the purchaser or transferee.
If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed by the state or any
county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision
entitled to exemption as provided by law, or, if the vehicle is
licensed with personalized plates, amateur radio operator plates, medal
of honor plates, disabled person plates, disabled veteran plates,
prisoner of war plates, plates issued under RCW 46.16.233 (2) or (3),
or other special license plates issued under RCW 46.16.301 as it
existed before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, the
vehicle license plates therefor shall be retained and may be displayed
upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of the vehicle so sold or
transferred.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.316 and 1997 c 291 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.16.305:
(1) When a person who has been issued a special license plate or
plates under RCW 46.16.301 as it existed before amendment by section 5,
chapter 291, Laws of 1997, or plates under RCW 46.16.233 (2) or (3),
sells, trades, or otherwise transfers or releases ownership of the
vehicle upon which the special license plate or plates have been
displayed, he or she shall immediately report the transfer of such
plate or plates to an acquired vehicle or vehicle eligible for such
plates pursuant to departmental rule, or he or she shall surrender such
plates to the department immediately if such surrender is required by
departmental rule. If a person applies for a transfer of the plate or
plates to another eligible vehicle, a transfer fee of five dollars
shall be charged in addition to all other applicable fees. Such
transfer fees shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Failure to
surrender the plates when required is a traffic infraction.
(2) If the special license plate or plates issued by the department
become lost, defaced, damaged, or destroyed, application for a
replacement special license plate or plates shall be made and fees paid
as provided by law for the replacement of regular license plates.

--- END ---