BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.4851 and 1995 c 345 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No one who becomes a beneficiary after June 30, 1995, shall
receive a monthly retirement allowance of less than twenty-four dollars
and twenty-two cents times the number of years of service creditable to
the person whose service is the basis of such retirement allowance.
(2) If the retirement allowance payable was adjusted at the time
benefit payments to the beneficiary commenced, the minimum allowance
provided in this section shall be adjusted in a manner consistent with
that adjustment.
(3) Beginning July 1, 1996, the minimum benefit set forth in
subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted annually by the annual
increase.
(4) Those receiving a temporary disability benefit under RCW
41.32.540 shall not be eligible for the benefit provided by this
section.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2004, the minimum benefit set forth in
subsection (1) of this section, prior to adjustments set forth in
subsection (2) of this section, for a beneficiary with at least twenty-five years of service and who has been retired at least twenty years
shall be one thousand dollars per month. The minimum benefit in this
subsection shall not be adjusted by the annual increase provided in
subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.40.1984 and 1995 c 345 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section,
no one who becomes a beneficiary after June 30, 1995, shall receive a
monthly retirement allowance of less than twenty-four dollars and
twenty-two cents times the number of years of service creditable to the
person whose service is the basis of such retirement allowance.
(2) Where the retirement allowance payable was adjusted at the time
benefit payments to the beneficiary commenced, the minimum allowance
provided in this section shall be adjusted in a manner consistent with
that adjustment.
(3) Beginning July 1, 1996, the minimum benefit set forth in
subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted annually by the annual
increase.
(4) Those receiving a benefit under RCW 41.40.220(1) or under RCW
41.44.170 (3) and (5) shall not be eligible for the benefit provided by
this section.
(5) For persons who served as elected officials and whose
accumulated employee contributions and credited interest was less than
seven hundred fifty dollars at the time of retirement, the minimum
benefit under subsection (1) of this section shall be ten dollars per
month per each year of creditable service.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2004, the minimum benefit set forth in
subsection (1) of this section, prior to adjustments set forth in
subsection (2) of this section, for a beneficiary with at least twenty-five years of service and who has been retired at least twenty years
shall be one thousand dollars per month. The minimum benefit in this
subsection shall not be adjusted by the annual increase provided in
subsection (3) of this section.

--- END ---