BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the children of this state have the
right to go to and from school in a safe and secure manner without
being threatened, intimidated, harassed, confronted, or solicited by
gang members and gang activities. Gang-associated violence and sale,
use, and possession of illegal drugs and weapons are not appropriate or
conducive to a safe learning environment and must be eliminated if
student security is to be promoted on and near school grounds and
facilities. In addition to physical safety zones, schools should also
be gang-free zones that expressly prohibit gang activities on or near
school property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9A.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
sections 1, 3, and 4 of this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Gang" means a group that: (a) Consists of three or more
persons; (b) has identifiable leadership or an identifiable name, sign,
or symbol; and (c) on an ongoing basis, regularly conspires and acts in
concert mainly for criminal purposes.
(2) "Gang-related activity" means any activity that occurs by or
within a gang or advances a gang purpose, including threatening,
intimidating, harassing, confronting, or soliciting a person who
attends or is registered in a public or alternative school with or by
means of a criminal act or to participate or engage in a criminal act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9A.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal gang school activity if the
person is a gang member and engages in a gang-related activity in or
upon the premises or grounds of a public or alternative school, or
within five hundred feet of the premises of a public or alternative
school.
(2) Criminal gang school activity is a class C felony.
(3) The perimeter of the premises or grounds of any school covered
by this section shall be posted at reasonable intervals to alert the
public as to the existence of this section prohibiting criminal gang
school activity on or within five hundred feet of the premises and
grounds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9A.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal gang school trespass if the
person is a gang member and knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in
or upon the premises or grounds of a public or alternative school.
(2) Criminal gang school trespass is a gross misdemeanor.
(3) The perimeter of the premises or grounds of any school covered
by this section shall be posted at reasonable intervals to alert the
public as to the existence of this section prohibiting criminal gang
school trespass on the premises and grounds.

--- END ---