BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is an
unacceptably high level of hunger in Washington. Washington has
repeatedly ranked in the top five states with the highest levels of
hunger. Though many people in Washington have been assisted by the
food stamp program, there are significant numbers of eligible families
who do not receive food stamps. One of the barriers to receiving food
stamps is the burdensome application process. The legislature finds
that it is important to take steps to increase access and participation
in the food stamp program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall request a
waiver of the interview requirement for all Basic Food applications
completed by Basic Food outreach contractors. If the department is not
granted a federal waiver by January 1, 2005, the food bank outreach
pilot program is created. The purpose of the food bank outreach
program is to improve access to department of social and health
services food assistance programs by coordinating with existing food
bank sites. The pilot program is designed to locate a department of
social and health services intake worker at each pilot site a minimum
of one time per week in order to improve access to department programs
and services.
(2) The department shall implement the food bank outreach pilot
program no later than January 1, 2005.
(3) The department shall select six pilot sites with three sites to
be located in eastern Washington and three sites to be located in
western Washington. To be eligible as a pilot site, the site must
consist of an organization that provides food to hungry and low-income
individuals.
(4) The department shall schedule an intake worker to regularly be
available at the pilot site to assist clients. The intake worker shall
be scheduled no less than one time per week at each site.
(5) The department shall adopt rules as necessary under chapter
34.05 RCW to implement the pilot program established under this
section.
(6) The food bank outreach pilot program expires December 31, 2005.
(7) The department shall submit a report to the legislature that
summarizes the effectiveness of the program by December 31, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires December 31, 2005.

--- END ---