BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall designate a person within each of the
department's administrative regions to serve as a liaison for
community-based and faith-based social services organizations,
regardless of denomination. The liaison shall be available to such
organizations for the purpose of:
(a) Providing information as it relates to opportunities for such
organizations to cooperate with the department in providing community
services throughout the state;
(b) Identifying areas of need that are not currently being met in
the state that community-based and faith-based social services
organizations may provide;
(c) Coordinating efforts to promote involvement of community-based
and faith-based social service organizations in providing community
services.
(2) The secretary shall include provisions in its contracts
indicating that community-based and faith-based social services
organizations that receive funds from the department must not:
(a) Engage in discrimination that denies service to a potential
client on the basis of age, gender, race, sexual orientation, national
origin, creed, religion, or presence of a disability; or
(b) Engage in activities that promote conversion to a particular
faith, institution, or cause, unless participation in those activities
is voluntary.
(3) The department shall achieve the purposes of this section
through existing resources.
(4) By January 1, 2005, and annually for the four years thereafter,
the department shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on the activities of the liaisons, including identification
of the community-based and faith-based organizations served.

--- END ---