BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.015 and 1999 c 249 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a "state parks and recreation
commission" consisting of, except as provided in this section, seven
citizens of the state.
((The)) (2)(a) Nonlegislative members of the commission shall be
appointed by the governor by and with the advice and consent of the
senate and shall serve for a term of six years, expiring on December
31st of even-numbered years, and until their successors are appointed
unless there are more than seven members on the commission. In case of
a vacancy for a nonlegislative member, the governor shall fill the
vacancy for the unexpired term of the commissioner whose office has
become vacant but only if the vacancy results in fewer than three
nonlegislative members.
(b) In making ((the)) appointments to the commission, the governor
shall choose citizens who understand park and recreation needs and
interests. No person ((shall)) may serve if he or she holds any
elective or full-time appointive ((state,)) county((,)) or municipal
office.
(c) Nonlegislative members of the commission shall be compensated
in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and in addition shall be allowed their
travel expenses incurred while absent from their usual places of
residence in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(3)(a) Beginning January 1, 2005, there shall be four legislative
members of the commission. Two legislative members shall be senators,
one each selected by each of the major caucuses. Two legislative
members shall be members of the house of representatives, one each
selected by each of the major caucuses. The senate members of the
commission shall serve terms of four years. The house of
representatives members of the commission shall serve terms of two
years. Vacancies shall be filled in the manner of the original
appointment.
(b) In making appointments to the commission, the caucuses shall
select legislative members who understand park and recreation needs and
interests. No person may serve if he or she holds any elective or
full-time appointive county or municipal office.
(c) Legislative members of the commission shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(4) Payment of expenses pertaining to the operation of the
commission shall be made upon vouchers certified to by such persons as
shall be designated by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2005.

--- END ---