BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.160 and 1997 c 58 s 505 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In an action brought under this chapter, the court may inquire
into the ability of the parent or parents of the child to pay child
support and may enter an order of child support as set forth in chapter
26.19 RCW. The court may enforce the same by execution, or in any way
in which a court of equity may enforce its decrees. All child support
orders entered pursuant to this chapter shall be in compliance with the
provisions of RCW 26.23.050.
(2) For purposes of this section, if a dependent child's parent is
an unmarried minor parent or pregnant minor applicant, then the parent
or parents of the minor shall also be deemed a parent or parents of the
dependent child. However, liability for child support under this
subsection only exists if the parent or parents of the unmarried minor
parent or pregnant minor applicant are provided the opportunity for a
hearing on their ability to provide support. Any child support order
requiring such a parent or parents to provide support for the minor
parent's child may be effective only until the minor parent reaches
eighteen years of age.
(3) In the absence of a court order setting support, the department
may establish an administrative order for support upon receipt of a
referral or application for support enforcement services.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.270 and 2000 c 122 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the department places a child with a developmental
disability in out-of-home care pursuant to RCW 74.13.350, the
department shall obtain a judicial determination within one hundred
eighty days of the placement that continued placement is in the best
interests of the child. If the child's out-of-home placement ends
before one hundred eighty days have elapsed, no judicial determination
is required.
(2) To obtain the judicial determination, the department shall file
a petition alleging that there is located or residing within the county
a child who has a developmental disability and that the child has been
placed in out-of-home care pursuant to RCW 74.13.350. The petition
shall request that the court review the child's placement, make a
determination whether continued placement is in the best interests of
the child, and take other necessary action as provided in this section.
The petition shall contain the name, date of birth, and residence of
the child and the names and residences of the child's parent or legal
guardian who has agreed to the child's placement in out-of-home care.
Reasonable attempts shall be made by the department to ascertain and
set forth in the petition the identity, location, and custodial status
of any parent who is not a party to the placement agreement and why
that parent cannot assume custody of the child.
(3) Upon filing of the petition, the clerk of the court shall
schedule the petition for a hearing to be held no later than fourteen
calendar days after the petition has been filed. The department shall
provide notification of the time, date, and purpose of the hearing to
the parent or legal guardian who has agreed to the child's placement in
out-of-home care. The department shall also make reasonable attempts
to notify any parent who is not a party to the placement agreement, if
the parent's identity and location is known. Notification under this
section may be given by the most expedient means, including but not
limited to, mail, personal service, and telephone.
(4) The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the child as
provided in RCW 13.34.100, unless the court for good cause finds the
appointment unnecessary.
(5) Permanency planning hearings shall be held as provided in this
section. At the hearing, the court shall review whether the child's
best interests are served by continued out-of-home placement and
determine the future legal status of the child.
(a) For children age ten and under, a permanency planning hearing
shall be held in all cases where the child has remained in out-of-home
care for at least nine months and an adoption decree or guardianship
order under chapter 11.88 RCW has not previously been entered. The
hearing shall take place no later than twelve months following
commencement of the child's current placement episode.
(b) For children over age ten, a permanency planning hearing shall
be held in all cases where the child has remained in out-of-home care
for at least fifteen months and an adoption decree or guardianship
order under chapter 11.88 RCW has not previously been entered. The
hearing shall take place no later than eighteen months following
commencement of the current placement episode.
(c) No later than ten working days before the permanency planning
hearing, the department shall submit a written permanency plan to the
court and shall mail a copy of the plan to all parties. The plan shall
be directed toward securing a safe, stable, and permanent home for the
child as soon as possible. The plan shall identify one of the
following outcomes as the primary goal and may also identify additional
outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the
child's parent or legal guardian; adoption; guardianship; or long-term
out-of-home care, until the child is age eighteen, with a written
agreement between the parties and the child's care provider.
(d) If a goal of long-term out-of-home care has been achieved
before the permanency planning hearing, the court shall review the
child's status to determine whether the placement and the plan for the
child's care remains appropriate. In cases where the primary
permanency planning goal has not been achieved, the court shall inquire
regarding the reasons why the primary goal has not been achieved and
determine what needs to be done to make it possible to achieve the
primary goal.
(e) Following the first permanency planning hearing, the court
shall hold a further permanency planning hearing in accordance with
this section at least once every twelve months until a permanency
planning goal is achieved or the voluntary placement agreement is
terminated.
(6) Any party to the voluntary placement agreement may terminate
the agreement at any time. Upon termination of the agreement, the
child shall be returned to the care of the child's parent or legal
guardian, unless the child has been taken into custody pursuant to RCW
13.34.050 or 26.44.050, placed in shelter care pursuant to RCW
13.34.060, or placed in foster care pursuant to RCW 13.34.130. The
department shall notify the court upon termination of the voluntary
placement agreement and return of the child to the care of the child's
parent or legal guardian. Whenever a voluntary placement agreement is
terminated, an action under this section shall be dismissed.
(7) When state or federal funds are expended for the care and
maintenance of a child with a developmental disability, placed in care
as a result of an action under this chapter, the department shall refer
the case to the division of child support, unless the department finds
that there is good cause not to pursue collection of child support
against the parent or parents of the child.
(8) This section does not prevent the department from filing a
dependency petition if there is reason to believe that the child is a
dependent child as defined in RCW 13.34.030. An action filed under
this section shall be dismissed upon the filing of a dependency
petition regarding a child who is the subject of the action under this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.13.031 and 2001 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall have the duty to provide child welfare
services and shall:
(1) Develop, administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and
comprehensive plan that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for
the protection and care of runaway, dependent, or neglected children.
(2) Within available resources, recruit an adequate number of
prospective adoptive and foster homes, both regular and specialized,
i.e. homes for children of ethnic minority, including Indian homes for
Indian children, sibling groups, handicapped and emotionally disturbed,
teens, pregnant and parenting teens, and annually report to the
governor and the legislature concerning the department's success in:
(a) Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home placements; (b)
reducing the foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home studies
for legally free children; and (d) implementing and operating the
passport program required by RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include
a section entitled "Foster Home Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations."
(3) Investigate complaints of any recent act or failure to act on
the part of a parent or caretaker that results in death, serious
physical or emotional harm, or sexual abuse or exploitation, or that
presents an imminent risk of serious harm, and on the basis of the
findings of such investigation, offer child welfare services in
relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians, or persons
serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the attention
of an appropriate court, or another community agency: PROVIDED, That
an investigation is not required of nonaccidental injuries which are
clearly not the result of a lack of care or supervision by the child's
parents, legal custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis. If the
investigation reveals that a crime against a child may have been
committed, the department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement
agency.
(4) Offer, on a voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to
families who are in conflict.
(5) Monitor out-of-home placements, on a timely and routine basis,
to assure the safety, well-being, and quality of care being provided is
within the scope of the intent of the legislature as defined in RCW
74.13.010 and 74.15.010, and annually submit a report measuring the
extent to which the department achieved the specified goals to the
governor and the legislature.
(6) Have authority to accept custody of children from parents and
to accept custody of children from juvenile courts, where authorized to
do so under law, to provide child welfare services including placement
for adoption, and to provide for the physical care of such children and
make payment of maintenance costs if needed. Except where required by
Public Law 95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no private adoption agency
which receives children for adoption from the department shall
discriminate on the basis of race, creed, or color when considering
applications in their placement for adoption.
(7) Have authority to provide temporary shelter to children who
have run away from home and who are admitted to crisis residential
centers.
(8) Have authority to purchase care for children; and shall follow
in general the policy of using properly approved private agency
services for the actual care and supervision of such children insofar
as they are available, paying for care of such children as are accepted
by the department as eligible for support at reasonable rates
established by the department.
(9) Establish a children's services advisory committee which shall
assist the secretary in the development of a partnership plan for
utilizing resources of the public and private sectors, and advise on
all matters pertaining to child welfare, licensing of child care
agencies, adoption, and services related thereto. At least one member
shall represent the adoption community.
(10) Have authority to provide continued foster care or group care
for individuals from eighteen through twenty years of age to enable
them to complete their high school or vocational school program.
(11) Refer cases to the division of child support whenever state or
federal funds are expended for the care and maintenance of a child,
including a child with a developmental disability who is placed as a
result of an action under chapter 13.34 RCW, unless the department
finds that there is good cause not to pursue collection of child
support against the parent or parents of the child.
(12) Have authority within funds appropriated for foster care
services to purchase care for Indian children who are in the custody of
a federally recognized Indian tribe or tribally licensed child-placing
agency pursuant to parental consent, tribal court order, or state
juvenile court order; and the purchase of such care shall be subject to
the same eligibility standards and rates of support applicable to other
children for whom the department purchases care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through
13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through 74.13.036, or of this section all
services to be provided by the department of social and health services
under subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section, subject to the
limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program
offering such services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the
federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974.
(((12))) (13) Within amounts appropriated for this specific
purpose, provide preventive services to families with children that
prevent or shorten the duration of an out-of-home placement.
(((13))) (14) Have authority to provide independent living services
to youths, including individuals eighteen through twenty years of age,
who are or have been in foster care.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.13.350 and 1998 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that parents are responsible
for the care and support of children with developmental disabilities.
The legislature recognizes that, because of the intense support
required to care for a child with developmental disabilities, the help
of an out-of-home placement may be needed. It is the intent of the
legislature that, when the sole reason for the out-of-home placement is
the child's developmental disability, such services be offered by the
department to these children and their families through a voluntary
placement agreement. In these cases, the parents shall retain legal
custody of the child.
As used in this section, "voluntary placement agreement" means a
written agreement between the department and a child's parent or legal
guardian authorizing the department to place the child in a licensed
facility. Under the terms of this agreement, the parent or legal
guardian shall retain legal custody and the department shall be
responsible for the child's placement and care. The agreement shall at
a minimum specify the legal status of the child and the rights and
obligations of the parent or legal guardian, the child, and the
department while the child is in placement. The agreement must be
signed by the child's parent or legal guardian and the department to be
in effect, except that an agreement regarding an Indian child shall not
be valid unless executed in writing before the court and filed with the
court as provided in RCW 13.34.245. Any party to a voluntary placement
agreement may terminate the agreement at any time. Upon termination of
the agreement, the child shall be returned to the care of the child's
parent or legal guardian unless the child has been taken into custody
pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or 26.44.050, placed in shelter care pursuant
to RCW 13.34.060, or placed in foster care pursuant to RCW 13.34.130.
As used in this section, "out-of-home placement" and "out-of-home
care" mean the placement of a child in a foster family home or group
care facility licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.
Whenever the department places a child in out-of-home care under a
voluntary placement pursuant to this section, the department shall have
the responsibility for the child's placement and care. The department
shall develop a permanency plan of care for the child no later than
sixty days from the date that the department assumes responsibility for
the child's placement and care. Within the first one hundred eighty
days of the placement, the department shall obtain a judicial
determination pursuant to RCW 13.04.030(1)(j) and 13.34.270 that the
placement is in the best interests of the child. If the child's out-of-home placement ends before one hundred eighty days have elapsed, no
judicial determination under RCW 13.04.030(1)(b) is required. The
permanency planning hearings shall review whether the child's best
interests are served by continued out-of-home placement and determine
the future legal status of the child.
The department shall provide for periodic administrative reviews as
required by federal law. A review may be called at any time by either
the department, the parent, or the legal guardian.
Nothing in this section shall prevent the department from filing a
dependency petition if there is reason to believe that the child is a
dependent child as defined in RCW 13.34.030.
The department shall adopt rules providing for the implementation
of chapter 386, Laws of 1997 and the transfer of responsibility for
out-of-home placements from the dependency process under chapter 13.34
RCW to the process under this chapter.
It is the intent of the legislature that the department undertake
voluntary out-of-home placement in cases where the child's
developmental disability is such that the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian is unable to provide the necessary care for the child, and
the parent, guardian, or legal custodian has determined that the child
would benefit from placement outside of the home. If the department
does not accept a voluntary placement agreement signed by the parent,
a petition may be filed and an action pursued under chapter 13.34 RCW.
The department shall inform the parent, guardian, or legal custodian in
writing of their right to civil action under chapter 13.34 RCW.
Nothing in this section prohibits the department from seeking
support from parents of a child, including a child with a developmental
disability if the child has been placed into care as a result of an
action under chapter 13.34 RCW, when state or federal funds are
expended for the care and maintenance of that child or when the
department receives an application for services from the physical
custodian of the child, unless the department finds that there is good
cause not to pursue collection of child support against the parent or
parents.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.20A.030 and 2000 c 86 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall be subrogated to the right of any
dependent child or children or person having the care, custody, and
control of said child or children, if public assistance money is paid
to or for the benefit of the child, or for the care and maintenance of
a child, including a child with a developmental disability if the child
has been placed into care as a result of an action under chapter 13.34
RCW, under a state-funded program, or a program funded under Title IV-A
or IV-E of the federal social security act as amended by the personal
responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act of 1996, to
prosecute or maintain any support action or execute any administrative
remedy existing under the laws of the state of Washington to obtain
reimbursement of moneys expended, based on the support obligation of
the responsible parent established by a child support order.
Distribution of any support moneys shall be made in accordance with RCW
26.23.035.
(2) The department may initiate, continue, maintain, or execute an
action to establish, enforce, and collect a support obligation,
including establishing paternity and performing related services, under
this chapter and chapter 74.20 RCW, or through the attorney general or
prosecuting attorney under chapter 26.09, 26.18, 26.20, 26.21, 26.23,
or 26.26 RCW or other appropriate statutes or the common law of this
state, for so long as and under such conditions as the department may
establish by regulation.
(3) Public assistance moneys shall be exempt from collection action
under this chapter except as provided in RCW 74.20A.270.
(4) No collection action shall be taken against parents of children
eligible for admission to, or children who have been discharged from,
a residential habilitation center as defined by RCW 71A.10.020(8)
unless the child with a developmental disability is placed as a result
of an action under chapter 13.34 RCW. ((For the period July 1, 1993,
through June 30, 1995, a collection action may be taken against parents
of children with developmental disabilities who are placed in
community- based residential care. The amount of support the
department may collect from the parents shall not exceed one-half of
the parents' support obligation accrued while the child was in
community-based residential care.)) The child support obligation shall
be calculated pursuant to chapter 26.19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---