BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.22.150 and 2002 c 149 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to availability of funds, training benefits are
available for an individual who is eligible for or has exhausted
entitlement to unemployment compensation benefits and who:
(a) Is a dislocated worker as defined in RCW 50.04.075;
(b) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, has
demonstrated, through a work history, sufficient tenure in an
occupation or in work with a particular skill set. This screening will
take place during the assessment process;
(c) Is, after assessment of demand for the individual's occupation
or skills in the individual's labor market, determined to need job-related training to find suitable employment in his or her labor
market. Beginning July 1, 2001, the assessment of demand for the
individual's occupation or skill sets must be substantially based on
declining occupation or skill sets identified in local labor market
areas by the local work force development councils, in cooperation with
the employment security department and its labor market information
division, under subsection (10) of this section;
(d) Develops an individual training program that is submitted to
the commissioner for approval within sixty days after the individual is
notified by the employment security department of the requirements of
this section;
(e) Enters the approved training program by ninety days after the
date of the notification, unless the employment security department
determines that the training is not available during the ninety-day
period, in which case the individual enters training as soon as it is
available; and
(f) Is enrolled in training approved under this section on a full-time basis as determined by the educational institution, and is making
satisfactory progress in the training as certified by the educational
institution.
(2) Until June 30, 2002, the following individuals who meet the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section may, without regard to
the tenure requirements under subsection (1)(b) of this section,
receive training benefits as provided in this section:
(a) An exhaustee who has base year employment in the aerospace
industry assigned the standard industrial classification code "372" or
the North American industry classification system code "336411";
(b) An exhaustee who has base year employment in the forest
products industry, determined by the department, but including the
industries assigned the major group standard industrial classification
codes "24" and "26" or any equivalent codes in the North American
industry classification system code, and the industries involved in the
harvesting and management of logs, transportation of logs and wood
products, processing of wood products, and the manufacturing and
distribution of wood processing and logging equipment; or
(c) An exhaustee who has base year employment in the fishing
industry assigned the standard industrial classification code "0912" or
any equivalent codes in the North American industry classification
system code.
(3) An individual is not eligible for training benefits under this
section if he or she:
(a) Is a standby claimant who expects recall to his or her regular
employer;
(b) Has a definite recall date that is within six months of the
date he or she is laid off; or
(c) Is unemployed due to a regular seasonal layoff ((which
demonstrates a pattern of unemployment consistent with the provisions
of RCW 50.20.015)). Regular seasonal layoff does not include layoff
due to permanent structural downsizing or structural changes in the
individual's labor market.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Educational institution" means an institution of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or an educational institution as
defined in RCW 28C.04.410, including equivalent educational
institutions in other states.
(b) "Sufficient tenure" means earning a plurality of wages in a
particular occupation or using a particular skill set during the base
year and at least two of the four twelve-month periods immediately
preceding the base year.
(c) "Training benefits" means additional benefits paid under this
section.
(d) "Training program" means:
(i) An education program determined to be necessary as a
prerequisite to vocational training after counseling at the educational
institution in which the individual enrolls under his or her approved
training program; or
(ii) A vocational training program at an educational institution:
(A) That is targeted to training for a high demand occupation.
Beginning July 1, 2001, the assessment of high demand occupations
authorized for training under this section must be substantially based
on labor market and employment information developed by local work
force development councils, in cooperation with the employment security
department and its labor market information division, under subsection
(10) of this section;
(B) That is likely to enhance the individual's marketable skills
and earning power; and
(C) That meets the criteria for performance developed by the work
force training and education coordinating board for the purpose of
determining those training programs eligible for funding under Title I
of P.L. 105-220.
"Training program" does not include any course of education
primarily intended to meet the requirements of a baccalaureate or
higher degree, unless the training meets specific requirements for
certification, licensing, or for specific skills necessary for the
occupation.
(5) Benefits shall be paid as follows:
(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(((iii))) (ii) through (iv) of this
subsection, for exhaustees who are eligible under subsection (1) of
this section, the total training benefit amount shall be fifty-two
times the individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total
amount of regular benefits and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid,
with respect to the benefit year; or
(ii) For exhaustees who are eligible under subsection (2) of this
section, for claims filed before June 30, 2002, the total training
benefit amount shall be seventy-four times the individual's weekly
benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits and
extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit
year; or
(iii) For exhaustees eligible under subsection (1) of this section
from industries listed under subsection (2)(a) of this section, for
claims filed on or after June 30, 2002, but before January 5, 2003, the
total training benefit amount shall be seventy-four times the
individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of
regular benefits and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with
respect to the benefit year; or
(iv) The total training benefit amount shall be one hundred fifty-six times the individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total
amount of regular benefits and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid,
with respect to the benefit year, for exhaustees who:
(A) Are eligible under subsection (1) of this section;
(B) Have base year employment in the pulp, paper, and paperboard
industry assigned the North American industry classification system
code "3221";
(C) Have claims with an effective date on or after November 30,
2003, and before January 2, 2005; and
(D) Reside in a county with an annual unemployment rate twenty
percent or more above the state average.
(b) The weekly benefit amount shall be the same as the regular
weekly amount payable during the applicable benefit year and shall be
paid under the same terms and conditions as regular benefits. The
training benefits shall be paid before any extended benefits but not
before any similar federally funded program.
(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, training
benefits are not payable for weeks more than two years beyond the end
of the benefit year of the regular claim.
(ii) For exhaustees described in (a)(iv) of this subsection,
training benefits are not payable for weeks more than four years beyond
the end of the benefit year of the regular claim.
(6) The requirement under RCW 50.22.010(10) relating to exhausting
regular benefits does not apply to an individual otherwise eligible for
training benefits under this section when the individual's benefit year
ends before his or her training benefits are exhausted and the
individual is eligible for a new benefit year. These individuals will
have the option of remaining on the original claim or filing a new
claim.
(7)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, individuals
who receive training benefits under this section or under any previous
additional benefits program for training are not eligible for training
benefits under this section for five years from the last receipt of
training benefits under this section or under any previous additional
benefits program for training.
(b) With respect to claims that are filed before January 5, 2003,
an individual in the aerospace industry assigned the standard
industrial code "372" or the North American industry classification
system code "336411" who received training benefits under this section,
and who had been making satisfactory progress in a training program but
did not complete the program, is eligible, without regard to the five-year limitation of this section and without regard to the requirement
of subsection (1)(b) of this section, if applicable, to receive
training benefits under this section in order to complete that training
program. The total training benefit amount that applies to the
individual is seventy-four times the individual's weekly benefit
amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits paid, or deemed
paid, with respect to the benefit year in which the training program
resumed and, if applicable, reduced by the amount of training benefits
paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit year in which the
training program commenced.
(8) An individual eligible to receive a trade readjustment
allowance under chapter 2 of Title II of the Trade Act of 1974, as
amended, shall not be eligible to receive benefits under this section
for each week the individual receives such trade readjustment
allowance. An individual eligible to receive emergency unemployment
compensation, so called, under any federal law, shall not be eligible
to receive benefits under this section for each week the individual
receives such compensation.
(9) All base year employers are interested parties to the approval
of training and the granting of training benefits.
(10) By July 1, 2001, each local work force development council, in
cooperation with the employment security department and its labor
market information division, must identify occupations and skill sets
that are declining and occupations and skill sets that are in high
demand. For the purposes of RCW 50.22.130 through 50.22.150 and
section 9, chapter 2, Laws of 2000, "high demand" means demand for
employment that exceeds the supply of qualified workers for occupations
or skill sets in a labor market area. Local work force development
councils must use state and locally developed labor market information.
Thereafter, each local work force development council shall update this
information annually or more frequently if needed.
(11) The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---