BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that criminal history
record information background checks for employment purposes are
rapidly increasing in Washington state. While the demand for criminal
history record information background checks is growing, the existing
criminal history record information background check data transmission
infrastructure and processes are not adequate to keep pace with the
growing demand. Furthermore, employers are concerned with the current
system's ability to quickly secure results. Without adequate data
transmission infrastructure and processes to encourage efficient
criminal history record information background checks and to receive
results quickly, a public safety risk is created. This is especially
true when new or prospective employees will be working with children.
The legislature has learned that some states have recently
developed comprehensive criminal history record information background
check programs. These programs focus on making criminal history record
information background checks easily accessible to employers and
prospective employees and have eliminated long response times.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A joint task force on criminal
background check processes is established. The joint task force shall
consist of the following members:
(a) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate, appointed by the president of the senate; at least one member
from each caucus shall be a member of the senate children and family
services and corrections committee;
(b) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; at least one member from each caucus shall be a member
of the house criminal justice and corrections committee;
(c) The chief of the Washington state patrol, or the chief's
designee;
(d) The secretary of the department of social and health services,
or the secretary's designee;
(e) The state superintendent of public instruction, or the
superintendent's designee;
(f) An elected sheriff or police chief, selected by the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs; and
(g) The following seven members, jointly appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives and the president of the senate:
(i) A representative from a nonprofit service organization that
serves primarily children under sixteen years of age;
(ii) A health care provider as defined in RCW 7.70.020;
(iii) A representative from a business or organization that serves
primarily developmentally disabled persons or vulnerable adults;
(iv) A representative from a local youth athletic association;
(v) A representative from the insurance industry; and
(vi) Two representatives from a local parks and recreation program;
one member shall be selected by the association of Washington cities
and one member shall be selected by the Washington association of
counties.
(2) The task force shall choose two cochairs from among its
membership.
(3) The task force shall review and make recommendations to the
legislature and the governor regarding the criminal background check
process. In preparing the recommendations, the committee shall, at a
minimum, review the following issues:
(a) What state and federal statutes require regarding criminal
background checks;
(b) What criminal offenses are currently reportable through the
criminal background check program;
(c) What information is available through the Washington state
patrol and the federal bureau of investigation criminal background
check systems;
(d) What are the best practices among organizations for obtaining
criminal background checks on their employees and volunteers;
(e) What is the feasibility and costs for businesses and
organizations to do periodic background checks;
(f) What is the feasibility of requiring all businesses and
organizations, including nonprofit entities, to conduct criminal
background checks for all employees, contractors, agents, and
volunteers who have regularly scheduled supervised or unsupervised
access to children, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable
adults; and
(g) A review of the benefits and obstacles of implementing a
criminal history record information background check program created by
the national child protection act of 1993. The national child
protection act of 1993 increases the availability of criminal history
record information background checks for employers who have employees
or volunteers who work with children, elderly persons, or persons with
disabilities.
(4) The task force, where feasible, may consult with individuals
from the public and private sector.
(5) The task force shall use legislative facilities and staff from
senate committee services and the house office of program research.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) In consultation with the Washington
state patrol, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall conduct a study on criminal history record information background
check technology and process. The study shall focus on how Washington
state can reduce delays in the criminal history record information
background check processing time and how Washington state can make
criminal history record information background checks more accessible
and efficient.
(2) The study shall include, but is not limited to:
(a) A review and analysis of the criminal history record
information background check programs in states that have recently
implemented or are soon to implement comprehensive criminal history
record information background check programs;
(b) Recommendations on how a comprehensive criminal history record
information background check program should be designed in Washington
state, and how much a comprehensive program would cost to implement in
Washington state;
(c) A review of how a comprehensive criminal history record
information background check program could be paid for in Washington
state, which includes a determination on whether the program could be
funded solely by user fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The findings and recommendations from
the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall be
presented to the joint task force no later than November 30, 2004.
(2) The joint task force on criminal background check processes
shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature by
December 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires January 31, 2005.

--- END ---