BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.21A.900 and 2002 c 198 s 906 are each amended to
read as follows:
This act takes effect six months after (1) the amendment by
congress to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(f) authorizing or mandating states to
adopt this version of the uniform interstate family support act or (2)
the grant to the state of Washington of a federal waiver of the
provisions of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(f), whichever occurs first.

--- END ---