BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.26.330 and 2002 c 302 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
A signatory may rescind an acknowledgment or denial of paternity by
commencing a court proceeding to rescind before the earlier of:
(1) Sixty days after the effective date ((of the filing)) of the
acknowledgment or denial, as provided in RCW 26.26.315; or
(2) The date of the first hearing in a proceeding to which the
signatory is a party before a court to adjudicate an issue relating to
the child, including a proceeding that establishes support.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.26.310 and 2002 c 302 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
A presumed father of a child may sign a denial of his paternity.
The denial is valid only if:
(1) An acknowledgment of paternity signed by another man is filed
under RCW 26.26.320;
(2) The denial is in a record, and signed under penalty of perjury;
((and))
(3) The presumed father has not previously:
(a) Acknowledged his paternity, unless the previous acknowledgment
has been rescinded under RCW 26.26.330 or successfully challenged under
RCW 26.26.335; or
(b) Been adjudicated to be the father of the child; and
(4) The child's birth record indicates he or she has not attained
the age of two years.

--- END ---