BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.177 and 1997 c 429 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A county or a city may use a variety of innovative zoning
techniques in areas designated as agricultural lands of long-term
commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170. The innovative zoning
techniques should be designed to conserve agricultural lands and
encourage the agricultural economy. A county or city should encourage
nonagricultural uses to be limited to lands with poor soils or
otherwise not suitable for agricultural purposes.
(2) Innovative zoning techniques a county or city may consider
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Agricultural zoning, which limits the density of development
and restricts or prohibits nonfarm uses of agricultural land and may
allow accessory uses that support, promote, or sustain agricultural
operations and production, as provided in subsection (3) of this
section;
(b) Cluster zoning, which allows new development on one portion of
the land, leaving the remainder in agricultural or open space uses;
(c) Large lot zoning, which establishes as a minimum lot size the
amount of land necessary to achieve a successful farming practice;
(d) Quarter/quarter zoning, which permits one residential dwelling
on a one-acre minimum lot for each one-sixteenth of a section of land;
and
(e) Sliding scale zoning, which allows the number of lots for
single-family residential purposes with a minimum lot size of one acre
to increase inversely as the size of the total acreage increases.
(3)(a) Accessory uses allowed under subsection (2)(a) of this
section shall comply with the following:
(i) Accessory uses shall be located, designed, and operated so as
not to interfere with natural resource land uses and shall be accessory
to the growing of crops or raising of animals;
(ii) Accessory commercial or retail uses shall predominately
produce, store, or sell regionally produced agricultural products from
one or more producers, products derived from regional agricultural
production, agriculturally related experiences, or products produced
on-site. Accessory commercial and retail uses shall offer for sale
predominantly products or services produced on-site; and
(iii) Accessory uses may operate out of existing or new buildings
with parking and other supportive uses consistent with the size and
scale of existing agricultural buildings on the site but shall not
otherwise convert agricultural land to nonagricultural uses.
(b) Accessory uses may include compatible commercial or retail uses
including, but not limited to:
(i) Storage and refrigeration of regional agricultural products;
(ii) Production, sales, and marketing of value-added agricultural
products derived from regional sources;
(iii) Supplemental sources of on-farm income that support and
sustain on-farm agricultural operations and production;
(iv) Support services that facilitate the production, marketing,
and distribution of agricultural products; and
(v) Off-farm and on-farm sales and marketing of predominately
regional agricultural products and experiences, locally made art and
arts and crafts, and ancillary retail sales or service activities.

--- END ---