BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state water law
must take into account rights to water based in both state and federal
law, including treaties between the federal government and Indian
tribes located within the state of Washington. The legislature also
finds that it is in the interest of the people of the state, the
nation, and Indian tribes located within the state to achieve greater
certainty and security regarding the respective water rights based on
state and federal law. The legislature further finds that the federal
government is actively pursuing resolution of federal and tribal water
rights, and has initiated and proposed both informal and formal
proceedings to determine federal and tribal rights to water in
Washington state. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to
direct the state to actively participate in these federal proceedings
to represent the interests of the state, to protect rights of water
users that rely on state-based water rights, and to ensure that these
processes are conducted in a fair and respectful manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature directs the state of
Washington to proceed under the provisions of this chapter to
participate in a federal pilot process to determine and quantify water
rights claimed by the United States and the tribal governments that
agree to participate.
(a) The state shall establish a negotiating team within the office
of the governor to participate in this pilot process.
(b) The federal pilot process is expected to include a scoping
process, development of alternatives, timelines, collaborative decision
making, public review, development of funding alternatives, and
mediation.
(2) In addition to the federal pilot process described in
subsection (1) of this section, with the consent of the parties, the
state negotiating team may participate in resolving disputes that arise
between state-based water rights and water rights based on federal law
through collaborative negotiations, mediation, and voluntary
settlements among affected parties. Resolution may include, but is not
limited to, contracts and intergovernmental agreements that provide
increased certainty without quantifying the existing water rights.
(3) The state negotiating team shall report its findings and
recommendations to the governor and appropriate legislative committees
by January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---