BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
encourage attention to the wonderful Washington wine industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The question "Red or white?" is hereby designated as the official
question of the state of Washington.

--- END ---