BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
The governing documents of an association may not prohibit the
owner of residential real property located within the association's
jurisdiction from using fire resistant roofing materials that are:
(1) Compatible with the structural and architectural design of the
residence; and
(2) Compatible with the general design aesthetics of other
residential real property located within the association's
jurisdiction.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.38.020 and 1995 c 283 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise provided in the governing documents, an
association may:
(((1))) (a) Adopt and amend bylaws, rules, and regulations;
(((2))) (b) Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and
reserves, and impose and collect assessments for common expenses from
owners;
(((3))) (c) Hire and discharge or contract with managing agents and
other employees, agents, and independent contractors;
(((4))) (d) Institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or
administrative proceedings in its own name on behalf of itself or two
or more owners on matters affecting the homeowners' association, but
not on behalf of owners involved in disputes that are not the
responsibility of the association;
(((5))) (e) Make contracts and incur liabilities;
(((6))) (f) Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and
modification of common areas;
(((7))) (g) Cause additional improvements to be made as a part of
the common areas;
(((8))) (h) Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any
right, title, or interest to real or personal property;
(((9))) (i) Grant easements, leases, licenses, and concessions
through or over the common areas and petition for or consent to the
vacation of streets and alleys;
(((10))) (j) Impose and collect any payments, fees, or charges for
the use, rental, or operation of the common areas;
(((11))) (k) Impose and collect charges for late payments of
assessments and, after notice and an opportunity to be heard by the
board of directors or by the representative designated by the board of
directors and in accordance with the procedures as provided in the
bylaws or rules and regulations adopted by the board of directors, levy
reasonable fines in accordance with a previously established schedule
adopted by the board of directors and furnished to the owners for
violation of the bylaws, rules, and regulations of the association;
(((12))) (l) Exercise any other powers conferred by the bylaws;
(((13))) (m) Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in
this state by the same type of corporation as the association; and
(((14))) (n) Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for the
governance and operation of the association.
(2) No association may enact, enforce, or maintain bylaws, rules,
or regulations that prohibit the owner of residential real property
located within the association's jurisdiction from using fire resistant
roofing materials that are:
(a) Compatible with the structural and architectural design of the
residence; and
(b) Compatible with the general design aesthetics of other
residential real property located within the association's
jurisdiction.

--- END ---