BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that the
provision of safe drinking water for Washington's public school
children is of great importance because young children are especially
vulnerable to drinking water contaminants like lead, which can cause
learning disabilities, decreased growth, hyperactivity, impaired
hearing, and abnormal brain development. The legislature finds that
although water delivered from the community's public water system must
meet federal and state standards for lead and other contaminants, a
school building may still have unacceptable drinking water
contamination levels due to pipes, plumbing materials, and water use
patterns within the school facility. The legislature finds that the
best way to ensure that drinking water is safe in a particular school
building is to test drinking and cooking water outlets such as taps,
bubblers, and fountains, and to promptly correct problems where
contaminant concentrations are found to exceed safe levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Public school" means public primary and secondary schools.
(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall regulate drinking
water quality at the public schools and:
(a) Shall adopt, by rule, public school drinking water quality
standards for lead, copper, cadmium, zinc, and corrosion; and
(b) May adopt, by rule, public school drinking water quality
standards for other contaminants if the department determines that:
(i) The presence of such contaminants is not due to insufficient
implementation of public water system standards or corrosion treatment
protocols; and (ii) setting public school drinking water standards for
such contaminants is necessary to protect public health and safety.
(2) In adopting public school drinking water standards, the
department shall be guided by, but not limited to, the rules for
controlling these contaminants in drinking water as contained in 40
C.F.R. Sec. 141 and EPA guidance promulgated thereunder. The standards
shall provide reasonable margins of safety and shall emphasize
reasonable overprotection where scientific evidence is ambiguous.
(3) The department shall adopt, through emergency rule making,
interim maximum contaminant levels and testing protocols by April 1,
2005. The department shall adopt final maximum contaminant level
standards and protocols by April 1, 2006.
(4) The department shall establish, by rule: (a) Drinking water
testing protocols, which shall be established in accordance with lab
certification requirements, analytical techniques and testing protocols
specified by 40 C.F.R. Sec. 141, and EPA guidance promulgated
thereunder; (b) deadlines for school districts to complete water
quality testing; (c) requirements and deadlines for providing test
results to the department; (d) requirements and deadlines for providing
notice to students, parents, and school staff when test results exceed
public school water quality standards established by the department;
(e) facility inspection protocols to ascertain causes of water quality
problems; (f) action planning protocols to guide school districts in
promptly submitting proposed plans to correct exposure to exceedances
and to establish interim control measures to reduce exposure to
contamination while corrective actions are being implemented; (g)
review protocols for plan approval and oversight of plan implementation
by the local health jurisdiction or department; and (h) compliance
inspection and testing protocols to ensure that approved and required
actions have been taken and public school drinking water standards are
being met.
(5) Analysis of drinking water samples must be performed by a
laboratory certified by the department.
(6) Lead plumbing and solders, or other potential sources of lead
contamination of drinking water, shall not be used in the construction
of a new school facility or the modernization or renovation of an
existing school facility.
(7) No local government may establish drinking water standards for
public schools that are less protective than the standards or methods
established under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) All the enforcement provisions of RCW
70.119.030, 70.119.040, and 70.119.050 relating to public water systems
shall be applicable to the secretary's enforcement of the provisions of
this chapter to achieve the public school water quality standards and
requirements established under this chapter.
(2) A person who discriminates against or otherwise sanctions an
employee who complains to or cooperates with the department in
administering this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(3) The department shall establish, by rule, appropriate variance
provisions and procedures for any provision adopted into rules that may
create a financial hardship for a particular school district. However,
no variance shall provide for a reduction in the numerical standards
established for maximum contaminant levels in public school drinking
water.
(4) The department shall examine compliance with adopted standards
and rules and provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature biennially, beginning December 1, 2006. The report shall
include any recommendations, in bill form, for legislation that would
improve compliance with, or facilitate the enforcement or achievement
of, public school safe drinking water standards established under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department shall provide technical
assistance to public school districts and shall establish, by rule or
policy, requirements for the content and presentation of training
courses or materials to facilitate school district compliance with the
requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If a school receives notice from the
department that it is not in compliance with public school drinking
water standards, the school may not offer a construction bond issue to
the voters until the school obtains a letter of approval from the
department indicating the department's satisfaction that either: (1)
The construction bond proposal contains specific remedial provisions
and dedicated funding likely to bring the school into compliance with
public school drinking water standards; (2) the school has obtained
funding or bona fide commitments of funding from other sources
sufficient to bring the school into compliance with public school
drinking water standards; or (3) in accordance with rules established
under section 3(4) of this act, the school has submitted and received
approval for an action plan likely to reduce contamination to
acceptable levels within a fixed and reasonable time period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---