BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 57.08.050 and 2003 c 145 s 1 and 2003 c 60 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in excess of
ten thousand dollars, shall be let by contract and competitive bidding.
Before awarding any such contract the board of commissioners shall
publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation where the
district is located at least once thirteen days before the last date
upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for such
work, plans and specifications which must at the time of publication of
such notice be on file in the office of the board of commissioners
subject to the public inspection. The notice shall state generally the
work to be done and shall call for proposals for doing the same to be
sealed and filed with the board of commissioners on or before the day
and hour named therein.
Each bid shall be accompanied by a certified or cashier's check or
postal money order payable to the order of the county treasurer for a
sum not less than five percent of the amount of the bid, or accompanied
by a bid bond in an amount not less than five percent of the bid with
a corporate surety licensed to do business in the state, conditioned
that the bidder will pay the district as liquidated damages the amount
specified in the bond, unless the bidder enters into a contract in
accordance with the bidder's bid, and no bid shall be considered unless
accompanied by such check, cash or bid bond. At the time and place
named such bids shall be publicly opened and read and the board of
commissioners shall proceed to canvass the bids and may let such
contract to the lowest responsible bidder upon plans and specifications
on file or to the best bidder submitting the bidder's own plans and
specifications. The board of commissioners may reject all bids for
good cause and readvertise and in such case all checks, cash or bid
bonds shall be returned to the bidders. If the contract is let, then
all checks, cash, or bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders, except
that of the successful bidder, which shall be retained until a contract
shall be entered into for doing the work, and a bond to perform such
work furnished with sureties satisfactory to the board of commissioners
in the full amount of the contract price between the bidder and the
commission in accordance with the bid. If the bidder fails to enter
into the contract in accordance with the bid and furnish the bond
within ten days from the date at which the bidder is notified that the
bidder is the successful bidder, the check, cash, or bid bonds and the
amount thereof shall be forfeited to the district. If the bidder fails
to enter into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and the
board of commissioners deems it necessary to take legal action to
collect on any bid bond required by this section, then the district
shall be entitled to collect from the bidder any legal expenses,
including reasonable attorneys' fees occasioned thereby. A low bidder
who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from
bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is
made for the project.
(2) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (1) of this
section, a water-sewer district may let contracts using the small works
roster process under RCW 39.04.155.
(3) Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an
estimated cost in excess of ten thousand dollars, shall be by contract.
Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an estimated
cost of less than fifty thousand dollars shall be made using the
process provided in RCW 39.04.190. Any purchase of materials,
supplies, or equipment with an estimated cost of fifty thousand dollars
or more shall be made by competitive bidding following the procedure
for letting contracts for projects under subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (3) of this
section, a water-sewer district may let contracts for purchase of
materials, supplies, or equipment with the suppliers designated on
current state agency, county, city, or town purchasing rosters for the
materials, supplies, or equipment, when the roster has been established
in accordance with the competitive bidding law for purchases applicable
to the state agency, county, city, or town. The price and terms for
purchases shall be as described on the applicable roster.
(5) The board may waive the competitive bidding requirements of
this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within
that section applies to the purchase or public work.
(6) When selecting a professional engineer or professional
engineering firm to perform services on behalf of the district, the
district may, in lieu of pursuing selection under chapter 39.80 RCW,
elect to require that the person or firm submit, with its statement of
qualifications or project proposal, a declaration of the professional
fees and fee rates to be charged in performing the services. In making
its selection, the district may choose among the persons or firms
qualified to perform the services on the basis of the lowest proposed
fees and/or fee rates for the work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.80 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 39.80.040 and 39.80.050 need not be complied with by a water-sewer district selecting a professional engineer or professional
engineering firm to perform services on behalf of the district under
RCW 57.08.050(6).

--- END ---