BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
Each board of directors of a public school district and each
governing board of a private school or, if none, the chief
administrator of the private school shall adopt and implement a policy
that prohibits any school personnel from recommending the use of
psychotropic drugs for any child. School personnel may send a letter
to a parent or legal guardian recommending that an appropriate medical
or behavioral health evaluation be conducted by a licensed physician if
school personnel perceive that a child may have a behavioral or
psychological problem.

--- END ---