BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A supplemental capital budget is hereby
adopted making changes to existing appropriations and making new
appropriations which, subject to the provisions set forth in this act,
the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as
shall be necessary to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital purposes for the
biennium ending June 30, 2005, out of the several funds specified in
this act.

PART 1
ADJUSTMENTS/CORRECTIONS TO 2003-2005 CAPITAL BUDGET
Sec. 101 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE
Capital Budget Studies (04-1-950)

(1) The ((appropriations)) appropriation in this section ((are)) is
provided solely for capital studies, projects, and tasks pursuant to
sections 923 and 924 of this act.
(2) The reappropriation in this section is from 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8
s 149 for the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $164,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $664,000

Sec. 102 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (88-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $558,000
((Rural Washington Loan Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,739,295
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,297,295))
Appropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,542,969

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,353,072))
$2,549,398
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,650,367

Sec. 103 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (RWLF) (04-4-009)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
Rural Washington Loan Account--((Federal)) State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,581,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,132,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,613,000

Sec. 104 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts (04-4-007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the
provisions of RCW 43.63A.750. The following projects are eligible for
funding:

Projects Location Recommendation

Artspace (Tashiro Kaplan) Seattle $300,000

Broadway center Tacoma $400,000

Children's museum Everett $200,000

Columbia city gallery Seattle $110,000

Cornish College Seattle $700,000

Friends of Gladish Pullman $37,000

Historic cooper school Seattle $32,000

Lincoln theatre Mt. Vernon $110,000

Olympic theatre arts Sequim $265,000

Orcas sculpture park Eastsound $15,000

Pacific Northwest ballet Bellevue $268,000

Pratt fine arts center Seattle $700,000

Richland players theatre Richland $51,000

S'Klallam longhouse Kingston $200,000

Seattle art museum Seattle $700,000

Squaxin Island museum Shelton $100,000

Vashon allied arts Vashon $80,000

Velocity dance center Seattle $35,000

Western Washington center for the arts Port Orchard $165,000

((World kite museum Long Beach $32,000))

TOTAL (($4,500,000))
$4,468,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,500,000))
$4,468,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,500,000))
$20,468,000

Sec. 105 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (CERB) (04-4-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: ((The)) A maximum of twenty-five percent
of the appropriation in this section ((is provided solely for loans to
local governments)) may be used for grants.

Appropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,491,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,718,769
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,209,769

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (00-2-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding from the state public works trust
fund shall be matched with new federal sources to improve the quality
of drinking water in the state, and shall be used solely for projects
that achieve the goals of the federal safe drinking water act.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,983,356

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,716,644
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,700,000

Sec. 107 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 161 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Heritage Park (01-H-004)

Reappropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $976,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,559,774
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($0))
$1,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,035,774))
$17,135,774

Sec. 108 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 159 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Transportation Building Preservation (((98-1-008))) (02-1-008)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,001,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,964,065
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,090,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,055,065

Sec. 109 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 173 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Security (04-2-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall not purchase metal
detectors for the legislative building.

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,179,000))
$879,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,179,000))
$879,000

Sec. 110 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 169 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services (04-2-014)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section shall be used to provide
project management services to state agencies as required by RCW
43.19.450 that are essential and mandated activities defined as core
services and are included in the engineering and architectural
services' responsibilities and task list for general public works
projects of normal complexity. The general public works projects
included are all those financed by the state capital budget for the
biennium ending June 30, 2005, with individual total project values up
to $20 million.
(2) The department may negotiate agreements with agencies for
additional fees to manage projects financed by financial contracts,
other alternative financing, projects with a total value greater than
$20 million, or for the nonstate funded portion of projects with mixed
funding sources.
(3) The department shall review each community and technical
college request and the requests of other client agencies for funding
any project over $2.5 million for inclusion in the 2004 supplemental
capital budget and the 2005-07 capital budget to ensure that the amount
requested by the agency is appropriate for predesign, design, and
construction, depending on the phase of the project being requested.
The department shall pay particular attention: (a) That the budgeted
amount requested is at an appropriate level for the various components
that make up the cost of the project such as project management; and
(b) that standard measurements such as cost per square foot are
reasonable. The department shall also assist the office of financial
management with review of other agency projects as requested.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,009,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,437,000))
$974,000
General Fund--State (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,513,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,586,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,586,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital: Legal Offender Unit (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,330,537
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,580,537

Sec. 112 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 250 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections Center: 100 Bed Management and Segregation Unit
(00-2-008)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to explore the concept of
an anaerobic digester, also known as a BioGas facility, to treat dairy
waste in Snohomish county, with the Monroe honor farm being one
possible site for such a project.
(2) ((The department shall not sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of
the Monroe honor farm site prior to December 1, 2004.)) The
legislature finds that it is in the public interest to encourage
development of a BioGas facility at the Monroe honor farm to convert
dairy waste, fish processing waste, and other waste products into
energy. Such a facility will: Help improve water quality in area
streams; help restore salmon habitat; create jobs; generate green
energy; improve the economic sustainability of area dairy farms; help
stem sprawl; serve as a demonstration project for environmental
education; reduce on-going costs associated with maintaining state
ownership of this facility; encourage greater cooperation between area
tribes and agricultural interests; and be a model for other such
efforts in the state.
(3) In consideration of the multiple public benefits set forth in
this section and notwithstanding any other provision of law, within one
hundred twenty days of the requirements of subsection (4) of this
section being completed, the secretary of corrections shall transfer
the Monroe honor farm to a federally recognized tribe within Snohomish
county for construction and operation of a BioGas facility, related
agricultural-based businesses, and activities designed to promote
salmon restoration and sustainability of area dairy farms. The
secretary of corrections shall work with the federally recognized tribe
to draft appropriate deed restrictions or conservation easements for
the property to ensure that the property is used for the legislative
purposes set forth in this section.
(4) The department of corrections shall transfer the property only
if the federally recognized tribe has completed a feasibility study for
a BioGas facility at the site and only if the tribe has concluded that
development of such a facility is feasible. Further, if the property
is not used for one or more of the purposes set forth in this section
within two years from the date of transfer or if at any time the
property is used for activities inconsistent with the legislative
purposes set forth in this section, then the ownership of the property
shall automatically revert to the state of Washington.
(5) The legislature finds that the value of the public benefits set
forth in this section exceeds the fair market value of Monroe honor
farm. Accordingly, the secretary of corrections shall transfer the
property to a federally recognized tribe within Snohomish county at no
cost beyond the consideration set forth in this section. Nothing in
this section shall be deemed to affect or modify liability or
responsibility for any existing environmental contamination related to
the Monroe honor farm.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,964,679
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,575,906
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,540,585

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,674,031

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,223,416
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,438,032

Sec. 113 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 234 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (04-4-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: This appropriation is provided solely for
an interagency agreement with the department of community, trade, and
economic development to make, in cooperation with the public works
board, loans to local governments and public water systems for projects
and activities to protect and improve the state's drinking water
facilities and resources.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,122,000))
$46,222,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,122,000))
$46,222,000

Sec. 114 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 313 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (04-4-007)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $7,547,044 of the water quality account appropriation is
provided for the extended grant payment to Metro/King county.
(2) Up to $10,000,000 of the state building construction account--state appropriation is provided for the extended grant payment to
Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.
(3) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for water quality facility grants for
communities with a population of less than 5,000. The department shall
give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a
regulatory order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with
water quality regulations; (b) projects for which design work has been
completed; and (c) projects with a local match from reasonable water
quality rates and charges.
(4) (($1,500,000 of the state building construction--state
appropriation is provided solely for water conveyance facilities to
implement the 1996 memorandum of agreement regarding utilization of
Skagit river basin water resources for in-stream and out-of-stream
purposes.
(5))) $4,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the city of Duvall for
construction of a sewage treatment plant.
(((6))) (5) $1,000,000 of the state building construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for the Klickitat wastewater
treatment project.
(6) $1,100,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the comprehensive irrigation
district management program.
(7) $150,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation is
to contract with a regional salmon enhancement organization for
planning activities related to improving water quality in the Hood
Canal, particularly research, preservation, and restoration of
molluscan ecosystem including bivalves and other important filtering
organisms in Hood Canal.
(8) The remaining appropriation in this section is provided for
statewide water quality implementation and planning grants and loans.
The department shall give priority consideration to projects located in
basins with critical or depressed salmonid stocks.
(((8))) (9) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,452,000))
$28,952,000
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,948,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,400,000))
$44,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($246,400,000))
$244,900,000

Sec. 115 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 312 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (02-4-007) and (86-2-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the conditions and
limitations of section 315, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.
(2) The reappropriation for project number 86-2-007 is $793,214 for
the public works assistance account and $4,600,505 for the water
quality account. The remainder, $13,702,946 for the water quality
account, is for project number 02-4-007.

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,214
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,210,510))
$18,303,451
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,096,665

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($115,983,563))
$117,890,622
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($136,194,073))
$136,987,287

Sec. 116 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 317 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Expansion (02-2-006)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,472,891))
$1,374,553
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($693,353))
$651,208
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,166,244))
$2,025,761

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,417,196))
$2,562,128
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $568,804
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,986,000))
$3,130,932

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($527,756))
$668,239
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,680,000))
$5,824,932

Sec. 117 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Rights Purchase/Lease (04-1-005)

(1) The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided for the
purchase or lease of water rights. It is also provided for the purpose
of improving stream and river flows in fish critical basins under the
trust water rights program under chapters 90.42 and 90.38 RCW.
(2) The appropriation in this section is subject to the policies
and requirements of chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
1317), Laws of 2004.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
State Drought Preparedness--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1317), Laws of 2004, is not enacted by April 15, 2004,
section 117 of this act is null and void.

Sec. 119 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 340 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Iron Horse Trail (04-2-016)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the commission shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(2) The commission shall submit a study of potential user fees that
could support maintenance, operation, and capital renewal costs of the
agency's three cross-state trails. This study must be submitted to the
office of financial management by June 30, 2004.))
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The commission shall submit a study of
potential user fees that could support maintenance, operation, and
capital renewal costs of the commission's three cross-state trails.
This study must be submitted to the office of financial management by
June 30, 2004.

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State))
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,500

Sec. 120 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 367 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Salmon Recovery (00-2-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The agency shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2003,
on the reason for funds in this section not being expended.
(2) $974,000 of this 2004 amendment is for a fund balance
adjustment.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,263,219
Salmon Recovery Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,076,017))
$8,457,819
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,339,236))
$43,721,038

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,566,576))
$55,210,774
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($101,569,389))
$98,931,812

Sec. 121 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 369 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Fund Board Programs (SRFB) (04-4-001)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((1) $23,187,500 of the appropriation is provided for grants for
restoration projects.
(2) The remainder of)) The appropriation is provided solely for
grants for other salmon recovery efforts. These grants shall include
a grant to any regional recovery board established in the Revised Code
of Washington and the management board created in chapter ...
(Substitute Senate Bill No. 6682), Laws of 2004, and may include grants
for additional restoration projects.
(((3) By December 1, 2003, the salmon recovery funding board shall
provide a report to the house of representatives capital budget
committee and the senate ways and means committee that enumerates board
expenditures for salmon recovery projects and activities. The report
shall include a list of each project that has been approved for funding
by the board, and each project that was submitted on a lead entity
habitat project schedule and not funded by the board. Each list shall
include the project, project description, project sponsor, status of
the project including expenditures to date and completion date, and
matching funds that were available for the project. The report shall
also include a list and description of all other activities funded by
the board including consulting contracts, lead entity and regional
recovery board contracts, a description of each of these activities,
and the timeline for their completion.))

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,375,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,375,000

Sec. 122 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 354 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (WWRP) (04-4-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided for the approved list of projects
in LEAP capital document No. 2003-45, as developed on June 4, 2003, and
LEAP capital document No. 2004-17, as developed on February 25, 2004.
In addition to the annual project progress reporting requirement of RCW
43.88.160(3), the committee shall file quarterly project progress
reports with the office of financial management.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that any moneys remaining
unexpended shall be reappropriated in the 2005-07 biennium, but no
reappropriations shall be made in subsequent biennia.
(3) The department of natural resources shall manage lands acquired
through project No. 02-1090, "Bone river and Niawiakum river natural
area preserves," as natural resources conservation areas under chapter
79.71 RCW.

Appropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,500,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,000,000

Sec. 123 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 394 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation shall support the projects as listed in
section 212, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($970,000))
$1,285,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,070,000))
$1,755,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,040,000

Sec. 124 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works (02-2-001) and (00-2-011)

Reappropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $256,230
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $482,466
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $455,575
Agricultural College Trust Management Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,950
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,263,221

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,006,779
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,270,000

Sec. 125 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 408 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works--Facility Preservation (04-1-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall report to the office of financial
management by September 1, 2004, all minor works expenditures over
$100,000 for fiscal year 2004 using funds appropriated under this
section.
(2) By December 1, 2004, the office of financial management shall
report to the capital budget related committees of the legislature all
expenditures under subsection (1) of this section that were not on a
minor works list approved by the office of financial management at the
time of the expenditure.

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $224,900
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $389,700
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,200
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $813,800

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $813,800

Sec. 126 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Seattle Toxicology Lab (((00-2-009))) (00-2-008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,059,864
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,655,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,514,864

Sec. 127 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Resource Efficiency Pilot Project (04-4-851)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,350,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for costs
directly associated with the design and construction of five public K-12 schools that meet or exceed comprehensive design standards for high
performance and sustainable school building standards, including costs
associated with pilot project planning, oversight, and management.
(2) Up to $150,000 of this appropriation shall be used to:
(a) Develop a technical manual to facilitate the use of high
performance and sustainable school building standards by K-12 schools;
(b) Develop incentives for school districts participating in this
program to construct buildings that achieve a significant life-cycle
savings over current practices;
(c) Integrate the technical manual with other applicable K-12
construction manuals, rules, and policies;
(d) Report to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature on the potential for sustainable building practices to
reduce expenditures for school construction.
The board may contract with one or more entities to fulfill the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section and may require match
funding of up to one hundred percent for participating nongovernmental
entities.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Sec. 128 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Kennedy, Dry, and Irwin Buildings Preservation (04-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $1,700,000 may be used for a
predesign and design of a replacement for the Kennedy facility. Before
design funds may be released, the office of financial management, after
consultation with the legislature, must agree with the findings of the
predesign.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,279,000

Sec. 129 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 743 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Humanities/General Education
Complex (00-2-679)

Reappropriation:
((Education Construction Account--State))
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,092,690
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,350,248

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $812,310
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,255,248

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Leadbetter Acquisition/Restoration (05-1-850)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,933

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $886,067
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $994,000

Sec. 131 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 380 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Dairy Nutrient Management Grants Program (02-4-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations may be used for all
animal waste management programs.

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Appropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,950,000

Sec. 132 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 738 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Highline Community College: Higher Ed Center/Childcare (00-2-678)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $985,949
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,654,000))
$11,692,000
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,898,000))
$6,860,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,552,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,359,051
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,897,000

Sec. 133 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 805 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (Minor Improvements) (04-2-130)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
report to the office of financial management by September 1, 2004, all
minor works expenditures over $100,000 for fiscal year 2004 using funds
appropriated under this section.
(2) By December 1, 2004, the office of financial management shall
report to the capital budget related committees of the legislature all
expenditures under subsection (1) of this section that were not on a
minor works list approved by the office of financial management at the
time of the expenditure.

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,979,217))
$13,466,217
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,513,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,979,217

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,979,217

Sec. 134 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 782 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation and appropriation in this section ((is)) are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section shall support the projects
as listed in section 224, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.
(2) With the following exception, the legislature does not intend
to reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005: CWU/Wenatchee
higher education center, also known as Van Tassel center addition or
the Wenatchee Valley College portable replacement project, (04-1-201).

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $865,437
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,209,178
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,074,615

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,525,560
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,600,175

Sec. 135 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 816 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Seattle Central: Replacement North Plaza Building (04-1-275)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is solely for the design, construction, and
equipment for information technology space. As presented to the
legislature, the space for this program is created by adding a floor to
another structure.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
submit major project reports on this project to the office of financial
management with copies to the legislative fiscal committees in
accordance with the established procedures for major project reports.
(3) Following occupancy of the project, the state board for
community and technical colleges, with the assistance of the department
of general administration and the community college, shall submit a
final budget reconciliation by fund source for all costs of the
project, including equipment and furnishings.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,976,200

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,976,200

Sec. 136 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 821 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Renovation - Building 7 (04-1-313)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is solely for the design, construction, and
equipment for an extensive renovation of an instructional building and
its systems.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
submit major project reports on this project to the office of financial
management with copies to the legislative fiscal committees in
accordance with the established procedures for major project reports.
(3) Following occupancy of the project, the state board for
community and technical colleges, with the assistance of the department
of general administration and the community college, shall submit a
final budget reconciliation by fund source for all costs of the
project, including equipment and furnishings.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,988,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,988,000

(End of part)

PART 2
CAPITAL PROJECTS/PROGRAMS/ENHANCEMENTS
Sec. 201 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Account (04-4-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Expenditures of the appropriation shall comply with RCW
70.119A.170.
(2)(a) The state building construction account appropriation is
provided solely to provide assistance to counties, cities, and special
purpose districts to identify, acquire, and rehabilitate public water
systems that have water quality problems or have been allowed to
deteriorate to a point where public health is an issue. Eligibility is
confined to applicants that already own at least one group A public
water system and that demonstrate a track record of sound drinking
water utility management. Funds may be used for: Planning, design,
and other preconstruction activities; system acquisition; and capital
construction costs.
(b) The state building construction account appropriation must be
jointly administered by the department of health, the public works
board, and the department of community, trade, and economic development
using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program as an
administrative model. In order to expedite the use of these funds and
minimize administration costs, this appropriation must be administered
by guidance, rather than rule. Projects must generally be prioritized
using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program criteria.
All financing provided through this program must be in the form of
grants that must partially cover project costs. The maximum grant to
any eligible entity may not exceed twenty-five percent of the funds
allocated to this appropriation.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,500,000))
$12,700,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,500,000))
$16,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,900,000))
$49,100,000

Sec. 202 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 134 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(04-4-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) At least $9,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
weatherization administered through the energy matchmakers program.
(2) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to promote
development of safe and affordable housing units for persons eligible
for services from the division of developmental disabilities within the
department of social and health services.
(3) $2,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to nonprofit organizations and public housing authorities for revolving
loan, self-help housing programs for low and moderate income families.
(4) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
shelters, transitional housing, or other housing facilities for victims
of domestic violence.
(5) $8,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary
farmworkers. It is the intent of the legislature that operation of the
facilities built under this section be in compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec.
1342. The department shall minimize the amount of these funds that are
utilized for staff and administrative purposes or other operational
expenses. The department shall work with the farmworker housing
advisory committee to prioritize funding of projects to the areas of
highest need. Funding may also be provided, to the extent qualified
projects are submitted, for health and safety projects.
(6) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
development of emergency shelters and transitional housing
opportunities for homeless families with children. The department
shall minimize the amount of funds that are utilized for staff and
administrative purposes or other operational expenses.
(7) Up to $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to
help capitalize a self-insurance risk pool for nonprofit corporations
in Washington that develop housing units for low-income persons and
families after the pool is approved by the state risk manager. The
department shall develop a plan to create this self-insurance risk pool
for submission to the office of the risk manager no later than December
1, 2004. The department shall establish an advisory committee of
interested stakeholders to assist the department in developing the plan
required under this subsection. The plan shall provide that the self-insurance risk pool shall repay to the state the appropriation under
this section whenever the capitalization exceeds the minimum
requirements established by the office of the risk manager.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,000,000))
$81,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($280,000,000))
$281,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 If chapter . . . (Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1840), Laws of 2004 is not enacted by April 15, 2004, section
202 of this act is null and void.

Sec. 204 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects (04-4-011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
standard requirements for community projects administered by the
department, except that the Highline historical society project is land
acquisition.
(2) The appropriation is provided for the following list of
projects:

Local Community Project List Location Amount

Art Crate field Bethel $500,000

Asia Pacific cultural center Tacoma $100,000

Asotin aquatic center Clarkston $500,000

Auburn YMCA Auburn $250,000

Boys and girls clubs of Snohomish county Lake Stevens $350,000

Burke museum Seattle $500,000

Capital arts theater and sculpture garden Olympia $250,000

Capitol theater Yakima $500,000

Chinese reconciliation project Tacoma $300,000

Clark lake park Kent $400,000

Colman school Seattle $300,000

Crossroads community center Bellevue $500,000

Eastside heritage center Bellevue $200,000

Eatonville city projects Eatonville $150,000

Edgewood sewer Edgewood $100,000

Edmonds center for the arts Edmonds $500,000

El Centro de la Raza Seattle $117,000

Farmers market and maritime park Bellingham $500,000

Firstenburg community center Vancouver $500,000

Former capitol historical marker Olympia $2,000

Friends of the falls/Great Gorge park Spokane $250,000

Frontier park Pierce county $165,000

GAR cemetery Seattle $5,000

Graham fire district emergency services center Graham $150,000

Grandmother's hill Tukwila $300,000

Highline historical society Highline $300,000

Historical cabins project Federal Way $106,000

Hugs foundation Raymond $21,500

Northwest kidney centers Bellevue $300,000

Museum of flight - WWI and WWII Seattle $500,000

Naval museum Bremerton $500,000

New Phoebe house Tacoma $25,000

Northwest orthopaedic institute Tacoma $200,000

Paramount theater Seattle $250,000

Rainier historical museum/Community center Rainier $20,000

Ritzville public development authority Ritzville $50,000

Seahurst ELC Burien $100,000

South Hill community park Pierce county $250,000

South Wenatchee family services center Wenatchee $400,000

Stonerose interpretive center Republic $8,000

Sweetwater creek restoration Hood Canal $500,000

Tacoma seawall Tacoma $250,000

Thyme patch park Seattle $5,000

ToscoSports complex Ferndale $500,000

Ustalady beach acquisition Island county $135,000

Veterans memorial museum Chehalis $255,000

West Hylebos state park Federal Way $250,000

White Center apprenticeship White Center $250,000

Woodway wildlife reserve Woodway $300,000

Youth development center Federal Way $100,000

TOTAL (($12,197,500))
$12,964,500

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,197,500))
$12,964,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,197,500))
$12,964,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Port of Walla Walla Land Acquisition (2004-4-961)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Capital Budget and Facilities Management Enhancement (05-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The purpose of this appropriation is to
implement the recommendations of the higher education facilities
preservation study and other related budget and financial management
system improvements. These improvements should also be applicable to
nonhigher education institutions.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Charitable, Educational, Reformatory, and Penal
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,000

Sec. 207 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 162 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building: Rehabilitation and Capital Addition
(01-1-008)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
subject to the conditions and limitations of section 109, chapter 238,
Laws of 2002 and section 904, chapter 10, Laws of 2003.

Reappropriation:
Capital Historic District Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,450,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,450,000
Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,300,000))
$5,113,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,031,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,781,000))
$105,594,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Community Treatment Program: Capital Repairs (05-2-801)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funds are provided solely for improvements to a facility or
facilities to be used in conjunction with a residential chemical
dependency treatment program or for new construction of a facility for
residential chemical treatment located at Coyote Ridge corrections
center.
(2) Prior to allotment for construction, the department shall
submit a project planning document to the office of financial
management and legislative fiscal committees identifying and outlining
the project or projects, scope, schedule, and preliminary cost
estimates for capital projects related to the residential chemical
dependency treatment program.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,200,000

Sec. 209 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 267 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (04-1-021)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$3,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
3,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Sewer Connection Fee
(05-2-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide: Water System Plans (05-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000

Sec. 212 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants to Locals for Cleanup and Prevention (04-4-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (((1))) $8,000,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for a grant to the port of Ridgefield to continue
clean-up actions on port-owned property.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,000,000))
$45,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,000,000))
$45,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Conveyance Infrastructure Projects (05-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,500,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for water conveyance facilities to
implement the 1996 memorandum of agreement regarding utilization of
Skagit river basin water resources for in-stream and out-of-stream
purposes.
(2) $300,000 of the state and local improvements revolving
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the Bertrand
watershed improvement district to address unpermitted water use and
environmental compliance and fund early action planning, feasibility
studies, and construction of early action projects.
(3) $1,600,000 of the state and local improvements revolving
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the Middle Fork
Nooksack river water diversion system.
(4)(a) $4,200,000 of the state and local improvements revolving
account--state appropriation and $150,000 of the state building
construction account--state appropriation in this section are provided
solely for grants to finance water infrastructure and conveyance
projects in twenty-eight priority salmon basins. The purpose of this
funding is to develop projects and take other water management actions
that benefit stream flows and enhance water supply that resolves
conflicts among water needs for municipal water supply, agricultural
water supply, and fish restoration. The stream flow or other public
benefits should be commensurate with the investment of state funds.
(b) Priority for the use of these funds must be given to projects
that have been identified for early action through watershed plans,
comprehensive irrigation district management plans, or similar plan; or
to projects that are part of an approved habitat conservation plan, or
other intergovernmental agreement. Projects may precede completion of
comprehensive watershed plans if resolution of the conflicts is
necessary and the actions are compatible with the long-term planning
effort. The department shall seek local and federal funds to augment
the funding provided by this appropriation.
(c) Up to $2,000,000 of this subsection (4) money may be used for
basin flow achievement and protection projects.
(5) $50,000 of the state building construction account--state is
provided solely for Ahtanum creek watershed restoration and Pine Hollow
reservoir.

Appropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,100,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (05-2-851)

Appropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $525,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,705,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,230,000

Sec. 215 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (01-H-010)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation and reappropriation are provided solely to
provide grants to conservation districts to assist the agricultural
community to implement water conservation measures and irrigation
efficiencies in the 16 critical basins. A conservation district
receiving funds shall manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the
water saved by the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency
will be placed as a purchase or a lease in the trust water rights
program to enhance instream flows. The proportion of saved water
placed in the trust water rights program must be equal to the
percentage of the public investment in the conservation measure or
irrigation efficiency. The percentage of the public investment may not
exceed 85 percent of the total cost of the conservation measure or
irrigation efficiency. In awarding grants, a conservation district
shall give first priority to family farms.
(2) By February 1, ((2003)) 2004, the state conservation commission
shall submit a progress report to the appropriate standing committees
of the legislature on: (a) The amount of public funds expended from
this section; and (b) the location and amount of water placed in the
trust water rights program pursuant to this section.
(3) $344,000 of the water quality account reappropriation is
provided for water leases or projects in the Yakima river basin for
aquifer recharge necessary to allow the use of drought wells to meet
essential irrigation needs. Essential irrigation needs is defined as
eighty percent of the water a farmer would ordinarily receive from the
irrigation district, less the water that is actually delivered and
regardless of crops grown.
(4) $85,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is for the purchase of pipe to protect fish during the
noxious weed control board of Grant county's yellow nutsedge
eradication efforts.

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,650,000
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,117,000))
$2,148,708
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,767,000))
$4,798,708

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,233,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,000,000))
$10,031,708

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Quad City Water Right Mitigation (05-2-850)

Appropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

Sec. 217 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 315 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Program (04-4-002)

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,663,333))
$81,054,333
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,466,666
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($111,129,999))
$125,520,999

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $462,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($573,129,999))
$587,520,999

Sec. 218 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 333 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Major Park Renovation - Cama Beach (02-1-022)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided to complete
electrical power, water, and sewer utilities, and for other park
development and renovation.
(2) The state building construction account--state appropriation
shall not be allotted until a project request report has been reviewed
and approved by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,200,000))
$6,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Unforeseen Needs - Special Federal and Local Projects (04-2-024)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
General Fund--Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Sec. 220 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 356 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation Program (FARR) (04-4-006)

Appropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($150,000))
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($150,000))
$250,000

Sec. 221 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 366 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (NOVA)
(04-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $450,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to maintain
and operate existing ORV and other recreation facilities, including ORV
campgrounds, on lands managed by the department of natural resources
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2004.
(2) $325,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to the state
parks and recreation commission to construct and upgrade trails and
trail-related facilities for both motorized and nonmotorized uses
within state parks.

Appropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,226,310))
$6,926,310

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,226,310))
$6,926,310

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill
No. 2919), Laws of 2004, is not enacted by April 15, 2004, section 221
of this act is null and void.

Sec. 223 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 379 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (00-2-004 and 04-4-004)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is for project number 00-2-004. The appropriation is for project number 04-4-004.
(2) The total cumulative dollar value of state conservation reserve
enhancement program grant obligations incurred by the conservation
commission and conservation districts shall not exceed $20,000,000, as
provided in the conservation reserve enhancement program agreement
between the United States department of agriculture, commodity credit
corporation, and the state of Washington executed on October 19, 1998,
and subsequent amendments.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($0))
$4,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($0))
$8,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program - Loans (05-4-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The conservation assistance revolving
account appropriation is provided solely for loans under the
conservation reserve enhancement program.

Appropriation:
Conservation Assistance Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Sec. 225 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 399 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Internal and External Partnership Improvements (04-1-007)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Expenditures of the appropriation in this
section for fencing shall comply with chapter 16.60 RCW.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$14,800,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,500,000))
$17,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,500,000))
$17,300,000

Sec. 226 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 397 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Population and Habitat Protection (04-1-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((1))) $400,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for upland wildlife habitat.
(((2) $500,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to maintain existing mitigation agreements in the Snake
river region for upland habitat and additional agreements with
landowners.))

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,830,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,700,000))
$1,200,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,430,000))
$9,930,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,430,000))
$9,930,000

Sec. 227 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 389 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Facility, Infrastructure, Lands, and Access Condition Improvement
(04-1-003)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $301,000 of the state building construction account
appropriation is provided solely for improvements at the Centralia game
farm, to include: (1) $175,000 for a brooder barn to replace numerous
houses; (2) $50,000 to replace flight pens; and (3) $76,000 to replace
to the roofs on several buildings.
(2) The state wildlife account appropriation is provided for the
department to cover incidental moving costs and possible rent for
temporary housing for employees in the warehouse and to hire an outside
consultant to complete a master plan analysis. The analysis shall
include the benefits and costs of potential options to identify the
highest and best uses for agency-owned facilities in the Olympia,
Lacey, and Tumwater area. At a minimum, options shall include the sale
of owned facilities, exchange for replacement facilities, and potential
collocation of existing functions with other state agencies. The
department shall work with the office of financial management and the
department of general administration in developing this analysis. This
analysis shall follow the office of financial management project
request report/predesign manual format and be completed by September
15, 2004.
(3) $100,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for fishing and hunting access
improvements in Snohomish county, preferably the Snohomish county
diking district number 6. The department is directed to take all
appropriate and necessary steps to rename a portion of Snohomish county
diking district number 6 as "William E. O'Neil Jr. wildlife area." The
department shall consult with the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation to determine the feasibility of universal access for hunting
at this site or at other locations in Snohomish county. These funds
are to be used solely for fishing and hunting access purposes,
including signage, permanent structures, and improvements to existing
access features. The department is directed to work with interested
parties to accomplish the foregoing objectives, and to provide a report
to the legislature by December 31, 2004, regarding these provisions.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,875,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,475,000))
$4,725,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,475,000))
$4,725,000

Sec. 228 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 390 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Opportunity Improvements (04-2-006)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $90,000 of the wildlife account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department of fish and
wildlife to identify reforms in environmental permitting programs that
implement the alternative mitigation principles embodied in its 2003
wind power guidelines and the work of the transportation permit
efficiency and accountability committee. The department shall work
cooperatively with the department of ecology to determine how these
principles can be applied more broadly to other project types, and how
new mitigation opportunities can be applied to implementing instream
flow and other habitat programs. The department shall report back to
the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December
31, 2004.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,050,000))
$2,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,050,000))
$2,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 229 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Grazing Study (05-2-851)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is for the department to contract with the
joint legislative audit and review committee for an assessment of the
benefits and costs associated with grazing leases or related agreements
on lands managed by the department of natural resources. This
assessment shall include considerations of the following elements:
(a) The total annual dollar revenues the department of natural
resources receives from grazing leases;
(b) The total annual dollars the trust beneficiaries receive from
the total revenues from such leases;
(c) A review of any other benefits the department of natural
resources estimates as accruing from these grazing leases;
(d) An estimate of the costs associated with these grazing leases;
and
(e) A review of the department's expenditures for management of
grazing lands.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall also
review the legal requirements that apply to the management of these
grazing lands and the department's management policies and practices
for these lands.
(3) The department of natural resources shall provide the joint
legislative audit and review committee with necessary data and
information for this assessment on a timely basis. A report of this
assessment must be provided to the appropriate legislative fiscal and
policy committees by June 30, 2005.

Appropriation:
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 230 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forestry Certification Study (05-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the department of natural resources to prepare a report for the
legislature and the board of natural resources that identifies: (1)
What changes to the current state forest management practices need to
be implemented for state-managed forests to achieve third-party
sustainable forestry certification under the standards of major
sustainable forestry certification organizations; (2) what added
changes in operational costs would be associated with the changes in
management practices necessary to achieve certifications; (3) whether
and how the preferred sustainable harvest level alternative identified
by the board of natural resources would satisfy the state's
responsibilities under any applicable habitat conservation plans; and
(4) how the preferred sustainable harvest level calculation identified
by the board of natural resources increases or decreases the cost of
compliance with the standards of major sustainable forestry
certification organizations.

Appropriation:

Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Sec. 231 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 412 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Community and Technical College Trust Land Acquisition (04-2-014)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Forest Reserve
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($96,000))
$365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($96,000))
$365,000

Sec. 232 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 426 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Small Timber Landowner Program (04-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 233 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Apple Award Construction Achievement Grants (05-4-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Grants of $25,000 each are provided to
four public elementary schools that have the greatest combined average
increase in the percentage of students meeting the fourth grade
reading, mathematics, and writing standards on the Washington
assessment of student learning from 2002-03 to 2003-04. The grants
shall be used for capital construction purposes as determined by
students in the schools. The funds may be used for capital
construction projects on school property or on other public property in
the community, city, or county in which the school is located.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 234 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Infectious Disease Laboratory Facilities (04-2-851)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Allotment for this appropriation is
contingent on the commitment of at least four million dollars in
matching federal funds for this facility.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Sec. 235 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 628 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Emergency Power Expansion - Phase II (04-1-024)

((Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000))
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,448,000))
$3,148,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,948,000))
$6,648,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,813,164))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,161,164))
$6,648,000

Sec. 236 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 633 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Campus Communications Infrastructure (05-2-850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,000,000))
$18,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 237 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Classroom Improvements (05-1-850)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 238 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Spokane Riverpoint - Academic Center Building: New Facility
(00-2-906)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the project funded in this section shall constitute the university's
highest capital project priority through the 2005-07 biennium.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 239 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Wastewater Reclamation Project: Infrastructure
(05-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) This appropriation represents the total commitment of state
funding to this phase and any future phases of this project.
(2) By June 30, 2004, Washington State University and the city of
Pullman shall submit a report to the office of financial management and
standing capital budget committees of the house of representatives and
the senate that: (a) Summarizes the strategy for completion of future
phases of this project and identifies all other state, federal, local,
and private funding sources including grants and loans; (b) summarizes
the phasing and costs for this project and future phases; and (c)
identifies water conservation measures to be enacted by Washington
State University and the city of Pullman.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,063,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,463,000

Sec. 240 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 659 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Senior Hall Renovation (00-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($730,000))
$681,116
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,000,000))
$2,000,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,120,012
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,120,012

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($581,000))
$629,884
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,480,315))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,791,315))
$15,431,012

Sec. 241 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 678 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
CWU/Des Moines Higher Education Center (02-2-101)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,438,000
((Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State)) Gardner-Evans Higher Education
Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,962,000))
$4,962,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,000,000))
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,575,000))
$12,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 242 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (05-1-850)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0

TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 243 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure (05-1-851)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0

TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 244 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
CWU/Wenatchee Higher Education Center (05-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is to
fund Central Washington University's portion of a shared center and
student service addition to Van Tassell center on the Wenatchee Valley
Community College campus that replaces the space currently leased by
Central Washington University.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0

TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Sec. 245 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 695 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Lab II 3rd Floor - Chemistry Labs Remodel (04-2-007)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$1,400,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 246 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE
(SIRTI)
Emergency Repairs (05-1-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to
make concrete repairs.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $290,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 247 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Bond Hall Renovation/Asbestos Abatement (04-1-080)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000

Sec. 248 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Communications Facility (98-2-053)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
not be used for vehicles, laptop computers, small printers, disposable
items, or other items with a useful life of less than one year.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,500,000))
$13,888,908
Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,920,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,973,400))
$18,584,492
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,393,400))
$36,393,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 249 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Cheney Cowles Museum: Addition and Remodel (98-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000

Sec. 250 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 784 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Replacement Science and Technology Building
(04-1-208)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of this appropriation is to conduct a predesign
study of alternatives and design for a potential replacement of
existing science lab facilities.
(2) The predesign shall be consistent with the college's adopted
strategic and master plans and additionally address projected
enrollment demands, operating budget impacts, reuse or disposition of
existing facilities, and options for reduction of parking needs.
(3) Prior to allotment for design, the state board for community
and technical colleges shall submit a predesign document to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees identifying
and outlining the project or projects, scope, schedule, and preliminary
cost estimates for the project.

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,800
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,134,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,216,800

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,752,500))
$9,618,500
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,835,300

Sec. 251 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 786 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Welding/Auto Collision Replacement
(04-1-213)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,481,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,357,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,838,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,357,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,838,000

Sec. 252 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 798 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Everett Community College: ((Renovation)) Replacement - Monte
Cristo Hall (04-1-305)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,352,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,352,000

Sec. 253 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Replacement - Instructional Building
(04-1-204)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,263,300
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,471,749
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,735,049

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,371,700))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,635,000))
$20,735,049

Sec. 254 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 787 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Instructional/Fine Arts Building
Replacement (04-1-214)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is solely for the land acquisition for and
design of a multiple use fine arts building.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
submit major project reports to the office of financial management with
copies to the legislative fiscal committees in accordance with the
established procedures for major project reports.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,827,799
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,327,799

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,645,515
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,473,314))
$20,973,314

NEW SECTION. Sec. 255 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
South Seattle: Training Facility (05-1-854)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is solely for the design of a single shop and
classroom training facility to replace eight wood frame structures.
(2) Prior to allotment for design, the state board for community
and technical colleges shall submit a predesign document to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees identifying
and outlining the project or projects, scope, schedule, and preliminary
cost estimates for capital projects related to the replacement of the
portables.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $722,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,342,480
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,064,480

NEW SECTION. Sec. 256 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Spokane Falls: Business and Social Science Building (05-1-853)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is solely for the design of a two-story
building housing social science and business divisions to replace
buildings 3, 4, and 14 which are not cost effective to renovate.
(2) Prior to allotment for design, the state board for community
and technical colleges shall submit a predesign document to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees identifying
and outlining the project or projects, scope, schedule, and preliminary
cost estimates for capital projects related to the replacement of the
existing buildings.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,781,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,581,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 257 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Wenatchee Valley College: Anderson Hall and Portable Replacement
(05-1-852)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is solely for the design of a building to
house allied health programs, replacing Anderson hall, and
consolidating programs and staff from other locations. The
appropriation does not include the design, renovation, or demolition of
related space to be vacated.
(2) Prior to allotment for design, the state board for community
and technical colleges shall submit a predesign document to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees identifying
and outlining the project or projects, scope, schedule, and preliminary
cost estimates for capital projects related to the replacement of
Anderson hall.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,618,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,249,855
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,867,855

NEW SECTION. Sec. 258 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
Employment Resource Center (05-2-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is to purchase and
install state of the art equipment for a 40,000 square foot facility
supporting work force development programs using funds available to the
state in section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).

Appropriation:
Unemployment Compensation Administration
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

(End of part)

PART 3
OTHER FUNDING ADJUSTMENTS
Sec. 301 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Common School Construction Account Deposits

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($13,500,000)) $26,500,000 in fiscal year 2004 and $13,500,000
in fiscal year 2005 of the education savings account appropriation
shall be deposited in the common school construction account.
(2) (($67,415,000)) $63,415,000 of the education construction
account appropriation shall be deposited in the common school
construction account.

Appropriation:
Education Savings Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,000,000))
$40,000,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,415,000))
$63,415,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($94,415,000))
$103,415,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($94,415,000))
$103,415,000

Sec. 302 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
State Bonds for Common School Construction (04-4-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
deposit in the common school construction account.

Appropriation:
State Building ((and)) Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($118,050,000))
$110,593,000

Sec. 303 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 629 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(04-1-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925 of this
act, the appropriation is provided solely to maintain facilities
housing educational and general programs and to maintain its major
building systems. Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments,
repairs, and minor works for the facility or its major building systems
must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or keep it safe
and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation and that provided in section 630 of
this act, the legislature intends to improve the average condition of
state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions documented in
report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review committee.
Preventive facility maintenance project funds shall be allocated at
local discretion to achieve the above stated performance goal, with
particular attention given to buildings currently rated in superior to
adequate condition so as to maximize useful life given both the passage
of time and intensity with which the space is used.
(3) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,108,000))
$21,633,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,108,000))
$21,633,000

Sec. 304 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 650 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(04-1-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925 of this
act, the appropriation is provided solely to maintain facilities
housing educational and general programs and to maintain its major
building systems. Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments,
repairs, and minor works for the facility or its major building systems
must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or keep it safe
and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation and that provided in section 651 of
this act, the legislature intends to improve the average condition of
state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions documented in
report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review committee.
Preventive facility maintenance project funds shall be allocated at
local discretion to achieve the above stated performance goal, with
particular attention given to buildings currently rated in superior to
adequate condition so as to maximize useful life given both the passage
of time and intensity with which the space is used.
(3) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,876,000))
$8,474,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,876,000))
$8,474,000

Sec. 305 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 672 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(04-1-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925 of this
act, the appropriation is provided solely to maintain facilities
housing educational and general programs and to maintain its major
building systems. Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments,
repairs, and minor works for the facility or its major building systems
must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or keep it safe
and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation and that provided in section 673 of
this act, the legislature intends to improve the average condition of
state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions documented in
report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review committee.
Preventive facility maintenance project funds shall be allocated at
local discretion to achieve the above stated performance goal, with
particular attention given to buildings currently rated in superior to
adequate condition so as to maximize useful life given both the passage
of time and intensity with which the space is used.
(3) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,726,000))
$1,857,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,726,000))
$1,857,000

Sec. 306 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 685 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(04-1-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925 of this
act, the appropriation is provided solely to maintain facilities
housing educational and general programs and to maintain its major
building systems. Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments,
repairs, and minor works for the facility or its major building systems
must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or keep it safe
and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation and that provided in section 686 of
this act, the legislature intends to improve the average condition of
state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions documented in
report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review committee.
Preventive facility maintenance project funds shall be allocated at
local discretion to achieve the above stated performance goal, with
particular attention given to buildings currently rated in superior to
adequate condition so as to maximize useful life given both the passage
of time and intensity with which the space is used.
(3) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,886,000))
$2,029,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,886,000))
$2,029,000

Sec. 307 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 697 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(04-1-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925 of this
act, the appropriation is provided solely to maintain facilities
housing educational and general programs and to maintain its major
building systems. Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments,
repairs, and minor works for the facility or its major building systems
must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or keep it safe
and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation and that provided in section 698 of
this act, the legislature intends to improve the average condition of
state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions documented in
report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review committee.
Preventive facility maintenance project funds shall be allocated at
local discretion to achieve the above stated performance goal, with
particular attention given to buildings currently rated in superior to
adequate condition so as to maximize useful life given both the passage
of time and intensity with which the space is used.
(3) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($584,000))
$628,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($734,000))
$778,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($734,000))
$778,000

Sec. 308 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 708 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(04-1-951)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925 of this
act, the appropriation is provided solely to maintain facilities
housing educational and general programs and to maintain its major
building systems. Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments,
repairs, and minor works for the facility or its major building systems
must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or keep it safe
and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation and that provided in section 709 of
this act, the legislature intends to improve the average condition of
state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions documented in
report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review committee.
Preventive facility maintenance project funds shall be allocated at
local discretion to achieve the above stated performance goal, with
particular attention given to buildings currently rated in superior to
adequate condition so as to maximize useful life given both the passage
of time and intensity with which the space is used.
(3) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,814,000))
$3,027,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,814,000))
$3,027,000

Sec. 309 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 799 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(04-1-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925 of this
act, the appropriation is provided solely to maintain facilities
housing educational and general programs and to maintain its major
building systems. Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments,
repairs, and minor works for the facility or its major building systems
must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or keep it safe
and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation and that provided in section 800 of
this act, the legislature intends to improve the average condition of
state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions documented in
report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review committee.
Preventive facility maintenance project funds shall be allocated at the
state board's discretion to achieve the above stated performance goal,
with particular attention given to buildings currently rated in
superior to adequate condition so as to maximize useful life given both
the passage of time and intensity with which the space is used.
(3) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,754,000))
$19,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,754,000))
$19,100,000

(End of part)

PART 4
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 A new section is added to chapter 89.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The conservation assistance revolving account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. The account shall be administered by
the conservation commission. Moneys from the account may only be spent
after appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
principal and interest from the repayment of any loans granted under
this section, and any other moneys appropriated to the account by the
legislature. Expenditures from the account may be used to make loans
to landowners for projects enrolled in the conservation reserve
enhancement program.
(2) In order to aid the financing of conservation reserve
enhancement program projects, the conservation commission, through the
conservation districts, may make interest-free loans to conservation
reserve enhancement program enrollees from the conservation assistance
revolving account. The conservation commission may require such terms
and conditions as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this
section. Loans to landowners shall be for costs associated with the
installation of conservation improvements eligible for and secured by
federal farm service agency practice incentive payment reimbursement.
Loans under this program promote critical habitat protection and
restoration by bridging the financing gap between project
implementation and federal funding. The conservation commission shall
give loan preferences to those projects expected to generate the
greatest environmental benefits and that occur in basins with critical
or depressed salmonid stocks. Money received from landowners in loan
repayments made under this section shall be paid into the conservation
assistance revolving account for uses consistent with this section.

Sec. 902 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 905 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
(1) To ensure that minor works appropriations are carried out in
accordance with legislative intent, funds appropriated in this act
shall not be allotted until project lists are on file at the office of
financial management and the office of financial management has
formally approved the lists. Proposed revisions to the lists must be
filed with and approved by the office of financial management before
funds may be expended on the revisions.
(2)(a) Minor works projects are single line appropriations that
include multiple projects valued between $25,000 and $1 million each
that are of a similar nature and can generally be completed within two
years of the appropriation with the funding provided. Minor works
categories include (i) health, safety, and code requirements; (ii)
facility preservation; (iii) infrastructure preservation; and (iv)
program improvement or expansion. Improvements for accessibility in
compliance with the Americans with disabilities act may be included in
any of the above minor works categories.
(b) Minor works appropriations shall not be used for, among other
things: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or
designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor
works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works
list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment
not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office
of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a
specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; or
to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless
expressly authorized elsewhere in this act.
(3) The office of financial management shall forward copies of
these project lists and revised lists to the house of representatives
capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee. No
expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered into for minor works
appropriations until the office of financial management has approved
the allotment of the funds to be expended. ((The office of financial
management shall encourage state agencies to incorporate accessibility
planning and improvements into the normal and customary capital
program.))
(4) The legislature generally does not intend to make future
appropriations for capital expenditures or for maintenance and
operating expenses for an acquisition project or a significant
expansion project that is initiated through the minor works process and
therefore does not receive a policy and fiscal analysis by the
legislature. Minor works projects are intended to be one-time
expenditures that do not require future state resources to complete.

Sec. 903 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 907 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL
CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into financial contracts,
paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for
the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section,
agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial
contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an
agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the
authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation
therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial
contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent
provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance
committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
(1) Department of general administration: Enter into a financing
contract for an amount approved by the office of financial management
for costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to lease develop or lease purchase a state office
building of 150,000 to 200,000 square feet on state-owned property in
Tumwater according to the terms of the agreement with the Port of
Olympia when the property was acquired or within the preferred
development/leasing areas in Thurston county. The building shall be
constructed and financed so that agency occupancy costs will not exceed
comparable private market rental rates. The comparable general office
space rate shall be calculated based on the three latest Thurston
county leases of new space of at least 100,000 rentable square feet
adjusted for inflation as determined by the department of general
administration. The department of general administration shall
coordinate with potential state agency tenants whose current lease
expire near the time of occupancy so that buyout of current leases do
not add to state expense. The office of financial management shall
certify to the state treasurer: (a) The project description and dollar
amount; and (b) that all requirements of this subsection (1) have been
met.
(2) Enter into, after approval by the office of financial
management and the state finance committee, a long-term lease of up to
twenty-five years, or long-term lease with an option to purchase, with
the city of Seattle, for up to 250,000 square feet of office space that
is being lease developed by the city of Seattle. Agency occupancy
costs will not exceed comparable private market rental rates in
downtown Seattle. The comparable general office space rate shall be
calculated based on lease rates (adjusted for inflation) of the tenants
at the time of proposed occupancy as determined by the department of
general administration.
(3) Department of veterans affairs: Enter into a financing
contract in an amount not to exceed $1,441,500 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build and equip
a kitchen in existing shell space at the Spokane veterans home and
provide space for displaced functions.
(((3))) (4) Department of corrections:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $400,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct a waste transfer station and purchase a garbage truck at
the McNeil Island corrections center.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $4,588,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct a transportation services warehouse and offices for
correctional industries.
(5) Parks and recreation commission: Enter into a financing
contract in an amount not to exceed $4,800,000 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop Cama
Beach state park.
(((4))) (6) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellevue Community
College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase North Center campus.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Big Bend Community
College for up to $6,500,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an international
conference and training center and dining services center building.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark Community
College for up to $9,839,464 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a bookstore,
meeting rooms, student lounge, and study space.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $7,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase Kent
Station higher education center.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Seattle Central
Community College for up to $1,300,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for land acquisition
and development of parking facilities.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Seattle Central
Community College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an above-ground parking garage.
(((f))) (g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South
Puget Sound Community College for up to $660,000 plus financing
expenses and reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct
parking and stormwater mitigation facilities.
(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community
College for up to $725,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land.
(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $2,175,100 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and
construct a building for professional-technical instruction.
(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $504,400 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and
buildings at the Clarkston center.
(k) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce College/Ft.
Steilacoom for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an addition to the
college health and wellness center.
(l) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce
College/Puyallup for up to $8,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student
gym and fitness center.
(m) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin
College for up to $8,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct the medical
technology and science education addition to the T-Building renovation
and establish the Washington institute of science education (WISE).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 Beginning with their 2005-07 capital
budget submittal to the governor, the state board of education, in
consultation with the Washington state skills centers, shall develop
and submit a prioritized list of capital preservation, equipment with
long life-cycles, space expansion, and improvement projects. The list
shall be developed based on, but not limited to, the following factors:
Projected enrollment growth; local school district participation and
financial support; changes in the business and industry needs in the
state; and efficiency in program delivery and operations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 (1) The department of natural resources
shall conduct an inventory on state lands of old growth forests as
defined by a panel of scientists. The panel of scientists shall
include three scientific scholars with well documented expertise in
Pacific Northwest forest ecology, one of whom will serve as chair by
consensus of the panel, one representative from the department of
natural resources, and one representative from the Washington
department of fish and wildlife. The panel shall review the best
available scientific information and develop a definition for old
growth forests in Washington state. The inventory shall include maps
illustrating the distribution of old growth forests on state lands, and
tables describing the number of acres of such forest in each county,
the department's administrative unit, and forest type. The maps and
tables shall identify both structurally uniform and structurally
complex stands. The department of natural resources shall make a
report of the inventory to the appropriate committees of the
legislature.
(2)(a) On the western side of the crest of the Cascade mountains,
cutting or removal of the trees and stands 160 years or older is
prohibited, other than for reasons of safety to mitigate an imminent
hazard, for the duration of the study.
(b) On the eastern side of the crest of the Cascade mountains,
cutting or removal of the trees and stands 160 years or older is
subject to the department publishing notification of proposed cutting
or removal of old growth timber.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2005.

Sec. 906 RCW 43.82.010 and 1997 c 117 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director of general administration, on behalf of the agency
involved, shall purchase, lease, lease purchase, rent, or otherwise
acquire all real estate, improved or unimproved, as may be required by
elected state officials, institutions, departments, commissions,
boards, and other state agencies, or federal agencies where joint state
and federal activities are undertaken and may grant easements and
transfer, exchange, sell, lease, or sublease all or part of any surplus
real estate for those state agencies which do not otherwise have the
specific authority to dispose of real estate. This section does not
transfer financial liability for the acquired property to the
department of general administration.
(2) Except for real estate occupied by federal agencies, the
director shall determine the location, size, and design of any real
estate or improvements thereon acquired or held pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section. Facilities acquired or held pursuant to this
chapter, and any improvements thereon, shall conform to standards
adopted by the director and approved by the office of financial
management governing facility efficiency unless a specific exemption
from such standards is provided by the director of general
administration. The director of general administration shall report to
the office of financial management annually on any exemptions granted
pursuant to this subsection.
(3) The director of general administration may fix the terms and
conditions of each lease entered into under this chapter, except that
no lease shall extend greater than twenty years in duration. The
director of general administration may enter into a long-term lease
greater than ten years in duration upon a determination by the director
of the office of financial management that the long-term lease provides
a more favorable rate than would otherwise be available, it appears to
a substantial certainty that the facility is necessary for use by the
state for the full length of the lease term, and the facility meets the
standards adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The
director of general administration may enter into a long-term lease
greater than ten years in duration if an analysis shows that the life-cycle cost of leasing the facility is less than the life-cycle cost of
purchasing or constructing a facility in lieu of leasing the facility.
For the 2003-05 biennium, any lease entered into after the effective
date of this section with a term of ten years or less shall not contain
a nonappropriation clause.
(4) Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease for or on
behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as collateral or
security for the payment of securities offered for sale through a
public offering. Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease
for or on behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as
collateral or security for the payment of securities offered for sale
through a private placement without the prior written approval of the
state treasurer. However, this limitation shall not prevent a lessor
from assigning or encumbering its interest in a lease as security for
the repayment of a promissory note provided that the transaction would
otherwise be an exempt transaction under RCW 21.20.320. The state
treasurer shall adopt rules that establish the criteria under which any
such approval may be granted. In establishing such criteria the state
treasurer shall give primary consideration to the protection of the
state's credit rating and the integrity of the state's debt management
program. If it appears to the state treasurer that any lease has been
used or referred to in violation of this subsection or rules adopted
under this subsection, then he or she may recommend that the governor
cause such lease to be terminated. The department of general
administration shall promptly notify the state treasurer whenever it
may appear to the department that any lease has been used or referred
to in violation of this subsection or rules adopted under this
subsection.
(5) It is the policy of the state to encourage the colocation and
consolidation of state services into single or adjacent facilities,
whenever appropriate, to improve public service delivery, minimize
duplication of facilities, increase efficiency of operations, and
promote sound growth management planning.
(6) The director of general administration shall provide
coordinated long-range planning services to identify and evaluate
opportunities for colocating and consolidating state facilities. Upon
the renewal of any lease, the inception of a new lease, or the purchase
of a facility, the director of general administration shall determine
whether an opportunity exists for colocating the agency or agencies in
a single facility with other agencies located in the same geographic
area. If a colocation opportunity exists, the director of general
administration shall consult with the affected state agencies and the
office of financial management to evaluate the impact colocation would
have on the cost and delivery of agency programs, including whether
program delivery would be enhanced due to the centralization of
services. The director of general administration, in consultation with
the office of financial management, shall develop procedures for
implementing colocation and consolidation of state facilities.
(7) The director of general administration is authorized to
purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire improved or unimproved real
estate as owner or lessee and to lease or sublet all or a part of such
real estate to state or federal agencies. The director of general
administration shall charge each using agency its proportionate rental
which shall include an amount sufficient to pay all costs, including,
but not limited to, those for utilities, janitorial and accounting
services, and sufficient to provide for contingencies; which shall not
exceed five percent of the average annual rental, to meet unforeseen
expenses incident to management of the real estate.
(8) If the director of general administration determines that it is
necessary or advisable to undertake any work, construction, alteration,
repair, or improvement on any real estate acquired pursuant to
subsection (1) or (7) of this section, the director shall cause plans
and specifications thereof and an estimate of the cost of such work to
be made and filed in his or her office and the state agency benefiting
thereby is hereby authorized to pay for such work out of any available
funds: PROVIDED, That the cost of executing such work shall not exceed
the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars. Work, construction,
alteration, repair, or improvement in excess of twenty-five thousand
dollars, other than that done by the owner of the property if other
than the state, shall be performed in accordance with the public works
law of this state.
(9) In order to obtain maximum utilization of space, the director
of general administration shall make space utilization studies, and
shall establish standards for use of space by state agencies. Such
studies shall include the identification of opportunities for
colocation and consolidation of state agency office and support
facilities.
(10) The director of general administration may construct new
buildings on, or improve existing facilities, and furnish and equip,
all real estate under his or her management. Prior to the construction
of new buildings or major improvements to existing facilities or
acquisition of facilities using a lease purchase contract, the director
of general administration shall conduct an evaluation of the facility
design and budget using life-cycle cost analysis, value-engineering,
and other techniques to maximize the long-term effectiveness and
efficiency of the facility or improvement.
(11) All conveyances and contracts to purchase, lease, rent,
transfer, exchange, or sell real estate and to grant and accept
easements shall be approved as to form by the attorney general, signed
by the director of general administration or the director's designee,
and recorded with the county auditor of the county in which the
property is located.
(12) The director of general administration may delegate any or all
of the functions specified in this section to any agency upon such
terms and conditions as the director deems advisable.
(13) This section does not apply to the acquisition of real estate
by:
(a) The state college and universities for research or experimental
purposes;
(b) The state liquor control board for liquor stores and
warehouses; and
(c) The department of natural resources, the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of transportation, and the state parks and
recreation commission for purposes other than the leasing of offices,
warehouses, and real estate for similar purposes.
(14) Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary,
the department of general administration may negotiate ground leases
for public lands on which property is to be acquired under a financing
contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW under terms approved by the
state finance committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 (1)(a) The legislature acknowledges the
recommendation of the house of representatives capital budget committee
2002 interim workgroup on higher education facilities regarding
encouragement of partnerships that attract federal and private funding
for certain types of capital facilities, particularly research
facilities and facilities providing unique or targeted skills. One
incentive to attracting nonstate funding of facilities might be the
state sharing in the ongoing operating and maintenance costs through
the operating budget and sharing future capital maintenance costs. The
workgroup recommended that a process be developed to enable an
institution to request such assistance up-front at the time the
facility being funded with nonstate resources is planned, rather than
after the facility is built. While the legislature will not commit in
a present budget to providing operating and maintenance or capital
maintenance funding in the future, the institution is less likely to
receive this assistance when the facility is constructed if the
assistance was not requested up-front when the facility was being
planned. Until a more formal process is identified, the legislature
will acknowledge such a request in a budget proviso or in the
legislative budget notes. This section does not apply to facilities
that traditionally do not receive any state budget support, such as
student dining, recreation, and housing facilities.
(b) While the legislature assumes facilities funded using
alternative financing contracts approved in the capital budget will not
be receiving state budget support, exceptions to this should be
requested of the governor and legislature up-front, as provided for in
this section for nonstate funded facilities.
(2)(a) The following project, funded primarily by nonstate budget
sources, is expected to be included in the institution's operating
budget request once the facility is completed: Washington State
University's agricultural research facility, constructed using federal
funds.
(b) The legislature is not committing to providing funds for
operating and maintenance or capital maintenance on the facility
described in (a) of this subsection at this time, but will consider
that decision when the project nears completion. Considerations will
include the appropriate amount of such assistance, particularly given
the research nature of the facility and the potential for indirect cost
recovery associated with the research grants coming to the institution
as a result of the facility.

Sec. 908 RCW 43.99E.025 and 1991 c 3 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
The proceeds from the sale of the bonds deposited in the state and
local improvements revolving account -- water supply facilities of the
general fund under the terms of this chapter shall be divided into two
shares as follows:
(1) Seventy-five million dollars, or so much thereof as may be
required, shall be used for domestic, municipal, and industrial water
supply facilities; and
(2) Fifty million dollars, or so much thereof as may be required,
shall be used for water supply facilities for agricultural use alone or
in combination with fishery, recreational, or other beneficial uses of
water; for the 2003-05 biennium, proceeds may also be used for water
conveyance projects.
The share of seventy-five million dollars shall be administered by
the department of health and the share of fifty million dollars shall
be administered by the department of ecology, subject to legislative
appropriation. The administering departments may use or permit the use
of any funds derived from the sale of bonds authorized under this
chapter to accomplish the purpose for the issuance of the bonds by
direct expenditures and by grants or loans to public bodies, including
grants to public bodies as matching funds in any case where federal,
local, or other funds are made available on a matching basis for
improvements within the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 909 RCW 70.146.030 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 934 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, 82.26.025, and 82.32.390,
principal and interest from the repayment of any loans granted pursuant
to this chapter, and any other moneys appropriated to the account by
the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. For the period July
1, 2003, to June 30, 2005, moneys in the account may be used to process
applications received by the department that seek to make changes to or
transfer existing water rights, for water related mitigation or
settlements, and for grants and technical assistance to public bodies
for watershed planning under chapter 90.82 RCW. No more than three
percent of the moneys deposited in the account may be used by the
department to pay for the administration of the grant and loan program
authorized by this chapter.
(3) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31 of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

Sec. 910 RCW 28B.50.360 and 2002 c 238 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of start of each quarter all
collected building fees of each such community and technical college
shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as
follows:
(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board if
issuing bonds payable out of building fees shall certify to the state
treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve-month period to
pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such
bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so
certified in the community and technical college capital projects
account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and
technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and
secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building
bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall
be exclusively devoted to that purpose. If in any twelve-month period
it shall appear that the amount certified by the college board is
insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and
interest on the outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall
notify the college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so
that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the
principal and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be
fully met at all times.
(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is
hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the
capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended exclusively
to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds
payable out of the building fees and for the construction,
reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major
alteration of buildings and other capital assets owned by the state
board for community and technical colleges in the name of the state of
Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements,
improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto, and, during the
2003-05 biennium, engineering and architectural services provided by
the department of general administration, and for the payment of
principal of and interest on any bonds issued for such purposes.
((During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the account.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911 During the 2005-07 biennium, the state
parks and recreation commission shall study, and implement if deemed
appropriate by the commission, the transfer of Old Man House state park
to the Suquamish tribe. Any agreements shall provide for continued
public access and use of the site for public recreation, and include a
limited waiver of sovereignty by the tribe restricted to the
enforceability of the reversion clause included in RCW 79A.05.170.

Sec. 912 RCW 79.10.320 and 2003 c 334 s 538 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall manage the state-owned lands under its
jurisdiction which are primarily valuable for the purpose of growing
forest crops on a sustained yield basis insofar as compatible with
other statutory directives. To this end, the department shall
periodically adjust the acreages designated for inclusion in the
sustained yield management program and calculate a sustainable harvest
level.
(2) For the final sustainable harvest level intended to be adopted
by the board during calendar year 2004, the board may identify a single
preferred harvest level alternative. The board may adopt a final
sustainable harvest level only after:
(a) The report required in section 230 of this act has been
produced and delivered to the appropriate standing and fiscal
committees of the legislature;
(b) A legislative review of the report has been conducted by the
appropriate committees of the legislature; and
(c) At least one hearing has been held by the board on the findings
in the report and the results of the legislative review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913 Section 912 of this act expires June 30,
2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914 A new section is added to chapter 39.33
RCW to read as follows:
(1) During the 2003-05 biennium, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, the department of general administration is
authorized to sell the property and attendant parking lot located at
1058 Capitol Way, Olympia, for fair market value to a nonprofit
organization whose function is to produce television coverage of state
government deliberations and other events of statewide significance.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915 (1)(a) Washington State University shall
retain ownership of 22 acres of the lower pasture area south of the WSU
Puyallup research campus in perpetuity unless the WSU board of regents
decides to relinquish ownership of the property. Should the board of
regents decide to relinquish ownership, the 22 acres will be
transferred by the board of regents to Pierce county unless the
property is within the Puyallup city limits, in which case the property
shall be transferred to the city of Puyallup.
(b) Washington State University shall cause to be filed a deed
restriction on the property described in (a) of this subsection
requiring that, should the university dispose of the property, it must
be transferred to the county or city as required in (a) of this
subsection.
(2) In consideration for the contingency set forth in subsection
(1) of this section, unencumbered title to 160 acres of timber land
currently under the cognizance and control of Washington State
University pursuant to RCW 72.01.142 will transfer to Washington State
University, and the remaining approximately 550 acres will revert to
the control of the department of social and health services. The
aforementioned property shall be the 80 acres located on the south half
of the northwest quarter of section 12 and the 80 acres on the north
half of the south west quarter of section 12.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2005.

Sec. 916 RCW 28B.30.810 and 1988 c 57 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in any transaction which occurs during the
2003-05 biennium under section 915 of this act, Washington State
University shall establish and operate a dairy/forage and agricultural
research facility at the Rainier school farm.
(2) Local funds generated through operation of this facility shall
be managed in a revolving fund, established herewith, by the
university. This fund shall consist of all moneys received in
connection with the operation of the facility and any moneys
appropriated to the fund by law. Disbursements from the revolving fund
shall be on authorization of the president of the university or the
president's designee. In order to maintain an effective expenditure
and revenue control, this fund, to be known as the dairy/forage
facility revolving fund, shall be subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditures and
payment of obligations from the fund.
(3) In the event state funding is not sufficient to operate the
dairy cattle herd, the university is authorized to lease the herd,
together with the land necessary to maintain the same, for such period
and upon such terms as the university board of regents shall deem
proper.

Sec. 917 RCW 28B.30.820 and 1981 c 238 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in any transaction which occurs during the 2003-05 biennium under section 915 of this act, Washington State University
shall assume cognizance of all real property, improvements thereon,
livestock, equipment, supplies, and other items transferred by the
secretary of social and health services pursuant to RCW 72.01.142.
The secretary of social and health services and the university may
negotiate for a division of services and expenses related to road
maintenance, water, and sewer services and buildings and grounds
included in the transfer pursuant to RCW 72.01.142 or on other matters
concerning this transfer. Any differences which cannot be agreed upon
shall be resolved by the office of financial management and certify the
same to the state agencies concerned.

Sec. 918 RCW 72.01.142 and 1981 c 238 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The secretary of social and health services shall transfer
on July 1, 1981, cognizance and control of all real property and
improvements thereon owned by the state at the Rainier school, used for
agricultural purposes, other than the school buildings and school
grounds, to Washington State University for use as a dairy/forage
research facility established pursuant to RCW 28B.30.810.
(b) All livestock and the supplies, equipment, implements,
documents, records, papers, vehicles, appropriations, tangible
property, and other items used in the dairy operation or production of
forage shall also be transferred to the university.
(2) On the effective date of this section, Washington State
University shall transfer back to the department of social and health
services the cognizance and control of a portion of the approximately
550 acres described in subsection (1)(a) of this section during the
2003-05 biennium as provided in section 915 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 919 (1) All transaction costs associated with
the exchange required under chapter . . . (House Bill No. 3045), Laws
of 2004, shall be included in the valuation of the lands exchanged.
(2) The department of natural resources is authorized to use moneys
derived from the sale of lands acquired by the common school trust
through the exchange required under chapter . . . (House Bill No.
3045), Laws of 2004, to acquire commercial or industrial properties for
the common school trust.
(3) If chapter . . . (House Bill No. 3045), Laws of 2004, is not
enacted by April 15, 2004, this section expires April 16, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 920 Part headings in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 921 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 922 Except for sections 117 and 202 of this
act, which take effect April 16, 2004, this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 48, 61
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 19, 20, 52, 64
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2, 24
CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 48, 61
ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 10, 31
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 56
FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 16, 39
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 5, 29
HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 14, 36, 37
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 17, 44
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE (SIRTI) . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 18, 44, 58
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 20, 38
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 13, 20, 35
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 50, 62
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 47, 60
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 51, 63
--- END ---