BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.36.250 and 2003 c 356 s 1 and 2003 c 53 s 259 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) If the department or its delegate determines at any time for
any part of the public highway system that the unsafe conditions of the
roadway require particular tires, tire chains, or traction equipment in
addition to or beyond the ordinary pneumatic rubber tires, the
department may establish the following recommendations or requirements
with respect to the use of such equipment for all persons using such
public highway:
(a) Traction advisory - oversize vehicles prohibited.
(b) Traction advisory - oversize vehicles prohibited. Vehicles
over 10,000 GVW - chains required.
(c) Traction advisory - oversize vehicles prohibited. All vehicles
- chains required, except all wheel drive.
(2) Any equipment that may be required by this section shall be
approved by the state patrol as authorized under RCW 46.37.420.
(3) The department shall place and maintain signs and other traffic
control devices on the public highways that indicate the tire, tire
chain, or traction equipment recommendation or requirement determined
under this section. ((Such signs or traffic control devices shall in
no event prohibit the use of studded tires from November 1st to April
1st, but when the department determines that chains are required and
that no other traction equipment will suffice, the requirement is
applicable to all types of tires including studded tires.)) The
Washington state patrol or the department may specify different
recommendations or requirements for four wheel drive vehicles in gear.
(4) Failure to obey a requirement indicated under this section is
a traffic infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW subject to a penalty of
five hundred dollars including all statutory assessments.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.37.420 and 1999 c 208 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful to operate a vehicle upon the public highways of
this state unless it is completely equipped with pneumatic rubber tires
except vehicles equipped with temporary-use spare tires that meet
federal standards that are installed and used in accordance with the
manufacturer's instructions.
(2) No tire on a vehicle moved on a highway may have on its
periphery any block, flange, cleat, or spike or any other protuberance
of any material other than rubber which projects beyond the tread of
the traction surface of the tire, except that it is permissible (a) to
use farm machinery equipped with pneumatic tires or solid rubber tracks
having protuberances that will not injure the highway, and ((except
also that it is permissible)) (b) to use tire chains ((or metal studs
imbedded within the tire of reasonable proportions and of a type
conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol, upon any vehicle when
required for safety because of snow, ice, or other conditions tending
to cause a vehicle to skid. It is unlawful to use metal studs imbedded
within the tire between April 1st and November 1st. The state
department of transportation may, from time to time, determine
additional periods in which the use of tires with metal studs imbedded
therein is lawful)).
(3) The state department of transportation and local authorities in
their respective jurisdictions may issue special permits authorizing
the operation upon a highway of traction engines or tractors having
movable tracks with transverse corrugations upon the periphery of the
movable tracks or farm tractors or other farm machinery, the operation
of which upon a highway would otherwise be prohibited under this
section.
(((4) Tires with metal studs imbedded therein may be used between
November 1st and April 1st upon school buses and fire department
vehicles, any law or regulation to the contrary notwithstanding.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---