BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.18.016 and 2002 c 338 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is not subject to division
under RCW 36.18.025 or 27.24.070.
(2) For the filing of a petition for modification of a decree of
dissolution or paternity, within the same case as the original action,
a fee of twenty dollars must be paid.
(3)(a) The party making a demand for a jury of six in a civil
action shall pay, at the time, a fee of one hundred twenty-five
dollars; if the demand is for a jury of twelve, a fee of two hundred
fifty dollars. If, after the party demands a jury of six and pays the
required fee, any other party to the action requests a jury of twelve,
an additional one hundred twenty-five dollar fee will be required of
the party demanding the increased number of jurors.
(b) Upon conviction in criminal cases a jury demand charge of fifty
dollars for a jury of six, or one hundred dollars for a jury of twelve
may be imposed as costs under RCW 10.46.190.
(4) For preparing((, transcribing, or certifying)) a certified copy
of an instrument on file or of record in the clerk's office, ((with or
without seal,)) for the first page or portion of the first page, a fee
of two dollars, and for each additional page or portion of a page, a
fee of one dollar must be charged. For authenticating or exemplifying
an instrument, a fee of ((one)) two dollars for each additional seal
affixed must be charged. For preparing a copy of an instrument on file
or of record in the clerk's office without a seal, a fee of up to fifty
cents per page must be charged. When copying a document without a seal
or file that is in an electronic format, a fee of twenty-five cents per
page must be charged. For copies made on a compact disc, an additional
fee of twenty dollars for each compact disc must be charged.
(5) For executing a certificate, with or without a seal, a fee of
two dollars must be charged.
(6) For a garnishee defendant named in an affidavit for garnishment
and for a writ of attachment, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(7) For approving a bond, including justification on the bond, in
other than civil actions and probate proceedings, a fee of two dollars
must be charged.
(8) For the issuance of a certificate of qualification and a
certified copy of letters of administration, letters testamentary, or
letters of guardianship, there must be a fee of two dollars.
(9) For the preparation of a passport application, the clerk may
collect an execution fee as authorized by the federal government.
(10) For clerk's services such as processing ex parte orders,
performing historical searches, compiling statistical reports, and
conducting exceptional record searches, the clerk may collect a fee not
to exceed twenty dollars per hour or portion of an hour.
(11) For duplicated recordings of court's proceedings there must be
a fee of ten dollars for each audio tape and twenty-five dollars for
each videotape or compact disc.
(12) ((For the filing of oaths and affirmations under chapter 5.28
RCW, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(13) For filing a disclaimer of interest under RCW 11.86.031(4), a
fee of two dollars must be charged.
(14))) For registration of land titles, Torrens Act, under RCW
65.12.780, a fee of ((five)) twenty dollars must be charged.
(((15))) (13) For the issuance of extension of judgment under RCW
6.17.020 and chapter 9.94A RCW, a fee of one hundred ten dollars must
be charged.
(((16))) (14) A facilitator surcharge of ten dollars must be
charged as authorized under RCW 26.12.240.
(((17))) (15) For filing a water rights statement under RCW
90.03.180, a fee of twenty-five dollars must be charged.
(((18))) (16) For preparation of a change of venue, a fee of
twenty dollars must be charged by the originating court in addition to
the per page charges in subsection (4) of this section.
(17) A service fee of three dollars for the first page and one
dollar for each additional page must be charged for receiving faxed
documents, pursuant to Washington state rules of court, general rule
17.
(((19))) (18) For preparation of clerk's papers under RAP 9.7, a
fee of fifty cents per page must be charged.
(((20))) (19) For copies and reports produced at the local level as
permitted by RCW 2.68.020 and supreme court policy, a variable fee must
be charged.
(((21))) (20) Investment service charge and earnings under RCW
36.48.090 must be charged.
(((22))) (21) Costs for nonstatutory services rendered by clerk by
authority of local ordinance or policy must be charged.
(((23))) (22) For filing a request for mandatory arbitration, a
filing fee may be assessed against the party filing a statement of
arbitrability not to exceed two hundred twenty dollars as established
by authority of local ordinance. This charge shall be used solely to
offset the cost of the mandatory arbitration program.
(((24))) (23) For filing a request for trial de novo of an
arbitration award, a fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars as
established by authority of local ordinance must be charged.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.12.090 and 1969 ex.s. c 144 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before a trial or entry of a judgment, when an order is made
transferring an action or proceeding for trial, the clerk of the court
must transmit the pleadings and papers therein to the court to which it
is transferred and charge a fee as provided in RCW 36.18.016. The
costs and fees thereof and of filing the papers anew must be paid by
the party at whose instance the order was made, except in the cases
mentioned in RCW 4.12.030(1), in which case the plaintiff shall pay
costs of transfer and, in addition thereto, if the court finds that the
plaintiff could have determined the county of proper venue with
reasonable diligence, it shall order the plaintiff to pay the
reasonable attorney's fee of the defendant for the changing of venue to
the proper county. The court to which an action or proceeding is
transferred has and exercises over the same the like jurisdiction as if
it had been originally commenced therein.
(2) In acting on any motion for dismissal without prejudice in a
case where a motion for change of venue under subsection (1) of this
section has been made, the court shall, if it determines the motion for
change of venue proper, determine the amount of attorney's fee properly
to be awarded to defendant and, if the action be dismissed, the
attorney's fee shall be a setoff against any claim subsequently brought
on the same cause of action.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.18.012 and 2001 c 146 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is subject to division
with the state for deposit in the public safety and education account
under RCW 36.18.025.
(2) The party filing a transcript or abstract of judgment or
verdict from a United States court held in this state, or from the
superior court of another county or from a district court in the county
of issuance, shall pay at the time of filing a fee of ((fifteen))
twenty dollars.
(3) The clerk shall collect a fee of twenty dollars for: Filing a
paper not related to or a part of a proceeding, civil or criminal, or
a probate matter, required or permitted to be filed in the clerk's
office for which no other charge is provided by law.
(4) If the defendant serves or files an answer to an unlawful
detainer complaint under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW, the plaintiff
shall pay before proceeding with the unlawful detainer action eighty
dollars.
(5) For a restrictive covenant for filing a petition to strike
discriminatory provisions in real estate under RCW 49.60.227 a fee of
twenty dollars must be charged.
(6) A fee of twenty dollars must be charged for filing a will only,
when no probate of the will is contemplated.
(7) A fee of two dollars must be charged for filing a petition,
written agreement, or written memorandum in a nonjudicial probate
dispute under RCW 11.96A.220.
(8) A fee of thirty-five dollars must be charged for filing a
petition regarding a common law lien under RCW 60.70.060.
(9) ((For certification of delinquent taxes by a county treasurer
under RCW 84.64.190, a fee of five dollars must be charged.
(10))) For the filing of a tax warrant for unpaid taxes or
overpayment of benefits by any agency of the state of Washington, a fee
of five dollars on or after July 22, 2001, and for the filing of such
a tax warrant or overpayment of benefits on or after July 1, 2003, a
fee of twenty dollars, of which forty-six percent of the first five
dollars is directed to the public safety and education account
established under RCW 43.08.250.

--- END ---