BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 5.44.130 and Code 1881 s 434 are each amended to read
as follows:
A seal of court or public office, when required to any writ,
process, or proceeding to authenticate a copy of any record or
document, may be affixed by making an inked, printed, or embossed
impression directly on the ((paper which)) document and shall be ((as))
considered valid ((as if made upon a wafer or on wax)).

--- END ---