BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.80.150 and 1987 c 456 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every law enforcement agency in this state or other agency
authorized to issue notices of civil infractions shall provide in
appropriate form notices of civil infractions which shall be issued in
books with notices in quadruplicate and meeting the requirements of
this section, or issued by an electronic device capable of producing a
printed copy and electronic copies of the citations.
The chief administrative officer of every such agency shall be
responsible for the issuance of such books or electronic devices and
shall maintain a record of every such book or electronic device and
each notice contained therein issued to individual members or employees
of the agency and shall require and retain a receipt for every book or
electronic device so issued.
(2) Every law enforcement officer or other person upon issuing a
notice of civil infraction to an alleged perpetrator of a civil
infraction under the laws of this state or of any ordinance of any city
or town shall deposit the original or a printed or electronic copy of
such notice of civil infraction with a court having competent
jurisdiction over the civil infraction, as provided in RCW 7.80.050.
Upon the deposit of the original or a printed or electronic copy of
such notice of civil infraction with a court having competent
jurisdiction over the civil infraction, the original or copy may be
disposed of only as provided in this chapter.
(3) It is unlawful and is official misconduct for any law
enforcement officer or other officer or public employee to dispose of
a notice of civil infraction or copies thereof or of the record of the
issuance of the same in a manner other than as required in this
section.
(4) The chief administrative officer of every law enforcement
agency or other agency authorized to issue notices of civil infractions
shall require the return to him or her of a copy of every notice issued
by a person under his or her supervision to an alleged perpetrator of
a civil infraction under any law or ordinance and of all copies of
every notice which has been spoiled or upon which any entry has been
made and not issued to an alleged perpetrator.
Such chief administrative officer shall also maintain or cause to
be maintained in connection with every notice issued by a person under
his or her supervision a record of the disposition of the charge by the
court in which the original or copy of the notice was deposited.
(5) Any person who cancels or solicits the cancellation of any
notice of civil infraction, in any manner other than as provided in
this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(6) Every record of notices required in this section shall be
audited monthly by the appropriate fiscal officer of the government
agency to which the law enforcement agency or other agency authorized
to issue notices of civil infractions is responsible.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.84.030 and 1987 c 380 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An infraction proceeding is initiated by the issuance((,)) and
service((,)) of a printed notice of infraction and filing of a printed
or electronic copy of the notice of infraction.
(2) A notice of infraction may be issued by a person authorized to
enforce the provisions of the title or chapter in which the infraction
is established when the infraction occurs in that person's presence.
(3) A court may issue a notice of infraction if a person authorized
to enforce the provisions of the title or chapter in which the
infraction is established files with the court a written statement that
the infraction was committed in that person's presence or that the
officer has reason to believe an infraction was committed.
(4) Service of a notice of infraction issued under subsection (2)
or (3) of this section shall be as provided by court rule.
(5) A notice of infraction shall be filed with a court having
jurisdiction within five days of issuance, excluding Saturdays,
Sundays, and holidays.
(6) Failure to sign an infraction notice shall constitute a
misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 20.01.482 and 2003 c 53 s 161 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall have the authority to issue a notice of
civil infraction if an infraction is committed in his or her presence
or, if after investigation, the director has reasonable cause to
believe an infraction has been committed.
(2) It is a misdemeanor for any person to refuse to properly
identify himself or herself for the purpose of issuance of a notice of
infraction or to refuse to sign the written or electronic promise to
appear or respond to a notice of infraction.
(3) Any person willfully violating a written or electronic and
signed promise to respond to a notice of infraction is guilty of a
misdemeanor regardless of the disposition of the notice of infraction.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.64.010 and 2003 c 53 s 247 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every traffic enforcement agency in this state shall provide in
appropriate form traffic citations containing notices to appear which
shall be issued in books with citations in quadruplicate and meeting
the requirements of this section, or issued by an electronic device
capable of producing a printed copy and electronic copies of the
citations. The chief administrative officer of every such traffic
enforcement agency shall be responsible for the issuance of such books
or electronic devices and shall maintain a record of every such book
and each citation contained therein and every such electronic device
issued to individual members of the traffic enforcement agency and
shall require and retain a receipt for every book and electronic device
so issued.
(2) Every traffic enforcement officer upon issuing a traffic
citation to an alleged violator of any provision of the motor vehicle
laws of this state or of any traffic ordinance of any city or town
shall deposit the original or a printed or electronic copy of such
traffic citation with a court having competent jurisdiction over the
alleged offense or with its traffic violations bureau. Upon the
deposit of the original or a copy of such traffic citation with a court
having competent jurisdiction over the alleged offense or with its
traffic violations bureau as aforesaid, the original or copy of such
traffic citation may be disposed of only by trial in the court or other
official action by a judge of the court, including forfeiture of the
bail or by the deposit of sufficient bail with or payment of a fine to
the traffic violations bureau by the person to whom such traffic
citation has been issued by the traffic enforcement officer.
(3) It shall be unlawful and official misconduct for any traffic
enforcement officer or other officer or public employee to dispose of
a traffic citation or copies thereof or of the record of the issuance
of the same in a manner other than as required in this section.
(4) The chief administrative officer of every traffic enforcement
agency shall require the return to him or her of a printed or
electronic copy of every traffic citation issued by an officer under
his or her supervision to an alleged violator of any traffic law or
ordinance and of all copies of every traffic citation which has been
spoiled or upon which any entry has been made and not issued to an
alleged violator. Such chief administrative officer shall also
maintain or cause to be maintained in connection with every traffic
citation issued by an officer under his or her supervision a record of
the disposition of the charge by the court or its traffic violations
bureau in which the original or copy of the traffic citation was
deposited.
(5) Any person who cancels or solicits the cancellation of any
traffic citation, in any manner other than as provided in this section,
is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(6) Every record of traffic citations required in this section
shall be audited monthly by the appropriate fiscal officer of the
government agency to which the traffic enforcement agency is
responsible.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.64.015 and 1987 c 345 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any person is arrested for any violation of the traffic
laws or regulations which is punishable as a misdemeanor or by
imposition of a fine, the arresting officer may serve upon him or her
a traffic citation and notice to appear in court. Such citation and
notice shall conform to the requirements of RCW 46.64.010, and in
addition, shall include spaces for the name and address of the person
arrested, the license number of the vehicle involved, the driver's
license number of such person, if any, the offense or violation
charged, the time and place where such person shall appear in court,
and a place where the person arrested may sign. Such spaces shall be
filled with the appropriate information by the arresting officer. The
arrested person, in order to secure release, and when permitted by the
arresting officer, must give his or her written promise to appear in
court as required by the citation and notice by signing in the
appropriate place the written or electronic citation and notice served
by the arresting officer, and if the arrested person is a nonresident
of the state, shall also post a bond, cash security, or bail as
required under RCW 46.64.035. An officer may not serve or issue any
traffic citation or notice for any offense or violation except either
when the offense or violation is committed in his or her presence or
when a person may be arrested pursuant to RCW 10.31.100, as now or
hereafter amended. The detention arising from an arrest under this
section may not be for a period of time longer than is reasonably
necessary to issue and serve a citation and notice, except that the
time limitation does not apply under any of the following
circumstances:
(1) Where the arrested person refuses to sign a written promise to
appear in court as required by the citation and notice provisions of
this section;
(2) Where the arresting officer has probable cause to believe that
the arrested person has committed any of the offenses enumerated in RCW
10.31.100(3), as now or hereafter amended;
(3) When the arrested person is a nonresident and is being detained
for a hearing under RCW 46.64.035.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---