BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.190 and 1999 c 303 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Counties may submit a petition for relief to the office of public
defense for reimbursement of extraordinary criminal justice costs.
Extraordinary criminal justice costs are defined as those associated
with investigation, prosecution, indigent defense, jury impanelment,
expert witnesses, interpreters, incarceration, and other adjudication
costs of ((aggravated murder)) homicide cases.
(1) The office of public defense, in consultation with the
Washington association of prosecuting attorneys and the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, shall develop procedures for
processing the petitions, for auditing the veracity of the petitions,
and for prioritizing the petitions. Prioritization of the petitions
shall be based on, but not limited to, such factors as disproportionate
fiscal impact relative to the county budget, efficient use of
resources, and whether the costs are extraordinary and could not be
reasonably accommodated and anticipated in the normal budget process.
(2) Before January 1st of each year, the office of public defense,
in consultation with the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys and the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs,
shall develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives a prioritized list of submitted
petitions that are recommended for funding by the legislature.

--- END ---