BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 57.08.016 and 1999 c 153 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be no private sale of real property where the
initial appraised value exceeds the sum of two thousand five hundred
dollars. An initial appraised value shall be determined by the board
of commissioners based upon an appraisal from a real estate appraiser
as it considers appropriate. Subject to the provisions of subsection
(2) of this section, no real property of the district shall be sold for
less than ninety percent of the value ((thereof as)). Where the
initial appraised value exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars, a
formal appraised value shall be established by a written appraisal made
not more than six months prior to the date of sale by three
disinterested real estate brokers licensed under the laws of the state
or by three professionally designated real estate appraisers as defined
in RCW 74.46.020. The appraisal shall be signed by the appraisers and
filed with the secretary of the board of commissioners of the district,
who shall keep it at the office of the district open to public
inspection. Any notice of intention to sell real property of the
district shall recite the appraised value ((thereof)).
(2) If no purchasers can be obtained for the property at ninety
percent or more of its appraised value after one hundred twenty days of
offering the property for sale, the board of commissioners of the
district may adopt a resolution stating that the district has been
unable to sell the property at the ninety percent amount. The district
then may sell the property at the highest price it can obtain at public
auction. A notice of intention to sell at public auction shall be
published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the district. The notice shall describe the
property, state the time and place at which it will be offered for sale
and the terms of sale, and shall call for bids, fix the conditions
thereof, and reserve the right to reject any and all bids for good
cause.

--- END ---