BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that persons with
medical or physical conditions that prevent them from wearing safety
belts in motor vehicles are being unnecessarily stopped by law
enforcement officers and issued citations for failing to wear safety
belts under RCW 46.61.688. This act is intended to assist law
enforcement officers in identifying persons with medical or physical
exemptions to safety belt requirements.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.688 and 2003 c 353 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, the term "motor vehicle"
includes:
(a) "Buses," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except
trailers, designed to carry more than ten passengers;
(b) "Multipurpose passenger vehicles," meaning motor vehicles with
motive power, except trailers, designed to carry ten persons or less
that are constructed either on a truck chassis or with special features
for occasional off-road operation;
(c) "Neighborhood electric vehicle," meaning a self-propelled,
electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle whose speed attainable
in one mile is more than twenty miles per hour and not more than
twenty-five miles per hour and conforms to federal regulations under
Title 49 C.F.R. Part 571.500;
(d) "Passenger cars," meaning motor vehicles with motive power,
except multipurpose passenger vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers,
designed for carrying ten passengers or less; and
(e) "Trucks," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except
trailers, designed primarily for the transportation of property.
(2) This section only applies to motor vehicles that meet the
manual seat belt safety standards as set forth in federal motor vehicle
safety standard 208 and to neighborhood electric vehicles. This
section does not apply to a vehicle occupant for whom no safety belt is
available when all designated seating positions as required by federal
motor vehicle safety standard 208 are occupied.
(3) Every person sixteen years of age or older operating or riding
in a motor vehicle shall wear the safety belt assembly in a properly
adjusted and securely fastened manner.
(4) No person may operate a motor vehicle unless all child
passengers under the age of sixteen years are either: (a) Wearing a
safety belt assembly or (b) are securely fastened into an approved
child restraint device.
(5) A person violating this section shall be issued a notice of
traffic infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW. A finding that a person
has committed a traffic infraction under this section shall be
contained in the driver's abstract but shall not be available to
insurance companies or employers.
(6) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section does
not constitute negligence, nor may failure to wear a safety belt
assembly be admissible as evidence of negligence in any civil action.
(7) This section does not apply to an operator or passenger who
possesses written verification from a licensed physician that the
operator or passenger is unable to wear a safety belt for physical or
medical reasons. A person who is unable to wear a safety belt for
physical or medical reasons may apply to the department of licensing
for a sticker to be displayed in a vehicle transporting the person.
The sticker must be displayed as required by the rules adopted by the
chief of the Washington state patrol.
(8) The state patrol may adopt rules exempting operators or
occupants of farm vehicles, construction equipment, and vehicles that
are required to make frequent stops from the requirement of wearing
safety belts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of licensing shall issue a safety belt exemption
sticker under RCW 46.61.688(7) for a person on whose behalf a statement
signed by a licensed physician is presented. For a physician's
statement to qualify under this section, the physician giving the
statement must set forth reasons in the statement why use of a safety
belt by the person would be impractical or harmful to the person. The
department shall charge a fee of not more than five dollars to cover
the costs of the sticker. Fees collected must be deposited into the
highway safety fund.
(2) The sticker must be designed to show distinguishing marks,
letters, or numerals indicating that the vehicle is being used to
transport a person with a physical or medical condition that prevents
him or her from wearing a safety belt.
(3) A safety belt exemption sticker is valid for six months unless
a shorter time period is indicated in the physician's statement. The
safety belt exemption sticker may be renewed once for an additional
consecutive six-month period.
(4) The applications for safety belt medical exemption stickers are
official state documents. Knowingly providing false information with
the intent to obtain an exemption in conjunction with the application
is a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(5) Unauthorized use of a safety belt medical exemption sticker is
a traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty
dollars.

--- END ---