BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.630 and 1999 c 248 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person who goes onto the land of another and who removes,
damages, or destroys livestock, timber, crops, minerals, or other
similar valuable property from the land, or wrongfully causes waste or
injury to the land, or wrongfully injures personal property or
improvements to real estate on the land, is liable to the injured party
for treble the amount of the damages caused by the removal, waste, or
injury. For purposes of this section, a person acts "wrongfully" if
the person intentionally and unreasonably commits the act or acts while
knowing, or having reason to know, that he or she lacks authorization
to so act. Damages recoverable under this section include, but are not
limited to, damages for the market value of the property removed or
injured, and for injury to the land, including the costs of
restoration. In addition, the person is liable for reimbursing the
injured party for the party's reasonable costs, including but not
limited to investigative costs and reasonable attorneys' fees and other
litigation-related costs.
(2) As used in this section "livestock" means an animal kept or
raised for home use, amusement, profit, animal control, research, food,
fur, fiber, animal testing, or breeding.
(3) This section does not apply in any case where liability for
damages is provided under RCW 64.12.030, ((79.01.756, 79.01.760,
79.40.070)) 79.02.320, 79.02.300, 79.02.340, or where there is immunity
from liability under RCW 64.12.035.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---