BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall ensure that audible pedestrian crossing
signals be installed along any state highway that is being
reconstructed and where the project meets the following conditions:
(1) The project scope includes the addition of pedestrian crossing
signals;
(2) The project borders two or more general purpose local
jurisdictions; and
(3) The inclusion of audible signals is consistent with local
zoning and land use patterns and each local jurisdiction bordering the
project requests the installation of the devices.
The department may work with local jurisdictions to identify other
appropriate technologies as necessary to carry out the intent of this
section. The department must ensure that, to the extent possible, all
crossings at that location are uniformly equipped. Signals must
conform to the guidelines approved by the American Association of State
Highway Officials and as set out in the Manual on Uniform Traffic
Control Devices.

--- END ---