BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington state
driver's licenses are useful for identification purposes and that an
applicant for a driver's license must meet strict identification
requirements in order to obtain a license. It is critical that the
true identity of persons who have been extended the privilege of
driving within the state of Washington can be positively identified by
their driver's licenses. The state has a compelling interest in
ensuring the identity of a person who is applying for a driver's
license, that someone who displays a driver's license is actually the
person indicated on the license, and that the person is in compliance
with the law. The legislature finds that this act is in the best
interest of the people of the state of Washington and is rationally
related to the legitimate goals of ensuring positive identification of
individuals in order to promote the health, safety, and well-being of
law enforcement officers and the public in general.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.035 and 1999 c 6 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
The department may not issue an identicard or a Washington state
driver's license that is valid for identification purposes unless the
applicant meets the identification requirements of subsection (1), (2),
or (3) of this section.
(1) A driver's license or identicard applicant must provide the
department with at least one of the following pieces of valid
identifying documentation that contains the signature and a photograph
of the applicant:
(a) A valid or recently expired driver's license or instruction
permit that includes the date of birth of the applicant;
(b) A Washington state identicard or an identification card issued
by another state;
(c) An identification card issued by the United States, a state, or
an agency of either the United States or a state, of a kind commonly
used to identify the members or employees of the government agency;
(d) A military identification card;
(e) A United States passport; or
(f) An Immigration and Naturalization Service form.
(2) An applicant who is a minor may establish identity by providing
an affidavit of the applicant's parent or guardian. The parent or
guardian must accompany the minor and display or provide:
(a) At least one piece of documentation in subsection (1) of this
section establishing the identity of the parent or guardian; and
(b) Additional documentation establishing the relationship between
the parent or guardian and the applicant.
(3) A person unable to provide identifying documentation as
specified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section may request that the
department review other available documentation in order to ascertain
identity. The department may waive the requirement if it finds that
other documentation clearly establishes the identity of the applicant.
(4) The form of an applicant's name, as established under this
section, must be the person's name of record for the purposes of this
chapter.
(5) If the applicant is unable to prove his or her identity under
this section, the department shall ((plainly label the license "not
valid for identification purposes.")) not issue an identicard or
Washington state driver's license.

--- END ---