BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.710 and 2000 c 28 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department for an offense categorized as a sex offense, including those
sex offenses also included in other offense categories, committed on or
after June 6, 1996, and before July 1, 2000, the court shall, in
addition to other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to
community custody for three years or up to the period of earned release
awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728, whichever is longer. The community
custody shall begin either upon completion of the term of confinement
or at such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in
lieu of earned release.
(2) ((Unless a condition is waived by the court,)) The terms of
community custody imposed under this section shall include the
condition that offenders classified pursuant to RCW 72.09.345 as risk
level II or III offenders shall not establish a residence with, or
within one thousand feet of, other risk level II or III offenders
currently under community custody for the commission of a sex offense
and, unless waived by the court, other conditions shall be the same as
those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4) and may include those provided
for in RCW 9.94A.700(5). As part of any sentence that includes a term
of community custody imposed under this section, the court shall also
require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the
department under RCW 9.94A.720.
(3) At any time prior to the completion of a sex offender's term of
community custody, if the court finds that public safety would be
enhanced, the court may impose and enforce an order extending any or
all of the conditions imposed pursuant to this section for a period up
to the maximum allowable sentence for the crime as it is classified in
chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the expiration of the offender's term
of community custody. If a violation of a condition extended under
this subsection occurs after the expiration of the offender's term of
community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of the sentence for
the purposes of RCW 9.94A.631 and may be punishable as contempt of
court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.712 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 303 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) An offender who is not a persistent offender shall be sentenced
under this section if the offender:
(a) Is convicted of:
(i) Rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a
child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion;
(ii) Any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual
motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second
degree, assault of a child in the first degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or
(iii) An attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection
(1)(a);
committed on or after September 1, 2001; or
(b) Has a prior conviction for an offense listed in RCW
9.94A.030(32)(b), and is convicted of any sex offense which was
committed after September 1, 2001.
For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), failure to register is not
a sex offense.
(2) An offender convicted of rape of a child in the first or second
degree or child molestation in the first degree who was seventeen years
of age or younger at the time of the offense shall not be sentenced
under this section.
(3) Upon a finding that the offender is subject to sentencing under
this section, the court shall impose a sentence to a maximum term
consisting of the statutory maximum sentence for the offense and a
minimum term either within the standard sentence range for the offense,
or outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW 9.94A.535, if
the offender is otherwise eligible for such a sentence.
(4) A person sentenced under subsection (3) of this section shall
serve the sentence in a facility or institution operated, or utilized
under contract, by the state.
(5) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department under this section, the court shall, in addition to the
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody
under the supervision of the department and the authority of the board
for any period of time the person is released from total confinement
before the expiration of the maximum sentence.
(6)(a) ((Unless a condition is waived by the court,)) The
conditions of community custody for those offenders convicted of the
crimes listed in subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section and classified
pursuant to RCW 72.09.345 as risk level II or III offenders shall
include the condition that those offenders shall not establish a
residence with, or within one thousand feet of, other risk level II or
III offenders currently under community custody for the commission of
a sex offense and, unless waived by the court, shall include those
provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4). The conditions may also include
those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5). The court may also order the
offender to participate in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform
affirmative conduct reasonably related to the circumstances of the
offense, the offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the
community, and the department and the board shall enforce such
conditions pursuant to RCW 9.94A.713, 9.95.425, and 9.95.430.
(b) As part of any sentence under this section, the court shall
also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the
board under RCW 9.94A.713 and 9.95.420 through 9.95.435.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.715 and 2003 c 379 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department for a sex offense not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, a
violent offense, any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or
a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or
after July 1, 2000, the court shall in addition to the other terms of
the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for the
community custody range established under RCW 9.94A.850 or up to the
period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2),
whichever is longer. The community custody shall begin: (a) Upon
completion of the term of confinement; (b) at such time as the offender
is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2); or (c) with regard to
offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660, upon failure to complete or
administrative termination from the special drug offender sentencing
alternative program. Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.501, the
department shall supervise any sentence of community custody imposed
under this section.
(2)(a) ((Unless a condition is waived by the court,)) The
conditions of community custody for those persons convicted of a sex
offense and classified pursuant to RCW 72.09.345 as risk level II or
III offenders shall include the condition that those offenders shall
not establish a residence with, or within one thousand feet of, other
risk level II or III offenders currently under community custody for
the commission of a sex offense and, unless waived by the court, other
conditions shall include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4). The
conditions may also include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5).
The court may also order the offender to participate in rehabilitative
programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct reasonably related to
the circumstances of the offense, the offender's risk of reoffending,
or the safety of the community, and the department shall enforce such
conditions pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(b) As part of any sentence that includes a term of community
custody imposed under this subsection, the court shall also require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department under
RCW 9.94A.720. The department shall assess the offender's risk of
reoffense and may establish and modify additional conditions of the
offender's community custody based upon the risk to community safety.
In addition, the department may require the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and
to obey all laws.
(c) The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to
those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court
imposed conditions. The department shall notify the offender in
writing of any such conditions or modifications. In setting,
modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the
department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.
(3) If an offender violates conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to this section during community custody, the
department may transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement
status and impose other available sanctions as provided in RCW
9.94A.737 and 9.94A.740.
(4) Except for terms of community custody under RCW 9.94A.670, the
department shall discharge the offender from community custody on a
date determined by the department, which the department may modify,
based on risk and performance of the offender, within the range or at
the end of the period of earned release, whichever is later.
(5) At any time prior to the completion or termination of a sex
offender's term of community custody, if the court finds that public
safety would be enhanced, the court may impose and enforce an order
extending any or all of the conditions imposed pursuant to this section
for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for the crime as it
is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a condition
extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of
the sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.631 and may be punishable as
contempt of court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040. If the court
extends a condition beyond the expiration of the term of community
custody, the department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender's compliance with the condition.
(6) Within the funds available for community custody, the
department shall determine conditions and duration of community custody
on the basis of risk to community safety, and shall supervise offenders
during community custody on the basis of risk to community safety and
conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this subsection.
(7) By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of
a condition imposed or modified by the department, an offender may
request an administrative review under rules adopted by the department.
The condition shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds
that it is not reasonably related to any of the following: (a) The
crime of conviction; (b) the offender's risk of reoffending; or (c) the
safety of the community.

--- END ---