BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, as many video
and computer games become more realistic and more violent, protecting
children from the harm caused by these interactive games becomes
increasingly important. Combating the exposure of children to violent
video and computer games depends in large part on retailers complying
with industry game-rating standards when selling or renting the games
to children. Voluntary efforts to ensure that sales and rentals comply
with these industry standards have been relatively unsuccessful in the
past. Protection of children will occur if the retailers of these
games improve their ability to self-enforce game sales and rentals in
accordance with the industry's game-rating standards. It is the
legislature's intent to establish a monitoring program to obtain
information about the effectiveness of voluntary compliance with
industry game-rating standards and to communicate findings to the
public regarding retailers' voluntary compliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall develop a monitoring program for sales of violent video and
computer games. Under this program, the department shall conduct
periodic monitoring of a sample group of businesses that retail violent
video and computer games to children. The sample group of businesses
selected by the department shall be made up of thirty businesses, ten
of which shall be located in eastern Washington. The department shall
make reports as required in this section on compliance by the monitored
retailers with industry game-rating standards when selling or renting
violent video or computer games to children. The program must conduct
monitoring operations of sample groups of businesses at least twice per
year to determine whether retailers are complying with the industry
game-rating standards as noted on the game packaging. The department
may contract with an organization or organizations having expertise in
similar monitoring operations to conduct the program.
(b) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development may appoint an uncompensated advisory group to
assist the department in the development of the monitoring program. If
appointed, the advisory group membership should include, but is not
limited to, representatives of parent-teacher organizations, law
enforcement officers, sheriffs and police chiefs, retailers, and
pediatricians.
(2) The department shall make a preliminary report to the governor
and appropriate committees of the legislature by July 1, 2004. In
addition, the department shall release the report to the public through
a press release and by posting the report on the department's internet
web site. Thereafter, the department shall make these reports annually
by December 1st, beginning December 1, 2004.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---