BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.047 and 1996 c 295 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time a person is convicted or found not guilty by reason
of insanity of an offense making the person ineligible to possess a
firearm, or at the time a person is committed by court order under RCW
71.05.320, 71.34.090, or chapter 10.77 RCW for mental health treatment,
the convicting or committing court shall notify the person, orally and
in writing, that the person must immediately surrender any concealed
pistol license and that the person may not possess a firearm unless his
or her right to do so is restored by a court of record. For purposes
of this section a convicting court includes a court in which a person
has been found not guilty by reason of insanity.
The convicting or committing court also shall forward a copy of the
person's driver's license or identicard, or comparable information, to
the department of licensing, along with the date of conviction or
commitment.
(2) Upon receipt of the information provided for by subsection (1)
of this section, the department of licensing shall determine if the
convicted or committed person has a concealed pistol license. If the
person does have a concealed pistol license, the department of
licensing shall immediately notify the license-issuing authority which,
upon receipt of such notification, shall immediately revoke the
license.
(3)(a) A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm, by
reason of having been involuntarily committed for mental health
treatment under RCW 71.05.320, 71.34.090, chapter 10.77 RCW, or
equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction may, upon discharge,
petition a court of record to have his or her right to possess a
firearm restored. At the time of commitment, the court shall
specifically state to the person that he or she is barred from
possession of firearms.
(b) The secretary of social and health services shall develop
appropriate rules to create an approval process under this subsection.
The rules must provide for the restoration of the right to possess a
firearm upon a showing in a court of competent jurisdiction that the
person is no longer required to participate in an inpatient or
outpatient treatment program, is no longer required to take medication
to treat any condition related to the commitment, and does not present
a substantial danger to himself or herself, others, or the public.
Unlawful possession of a firearm under this subsection shall be
punished as a class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(c) A person petitioning the court under this subsection (3) shall
bear the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the
circumstances resulting in the commitment no longer exist and are not
reasonably likely to recur. If a preponderance of the evidence in the
record supports a finding that the person petitioning the court has
engaged in violence and that it is more likely than not that the person
will engage in violence after his or her right to possess a firearm is
restored, the person shall bear the burden of proving by clear, cogent,
and convincing evidence that he or she does not present a substantial
danger to the safety of others.
(4) No person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity
may petition a court for restoration of the right to possess a firearm
unless the person meets the requirements for the restoration of the
right to possess a firearm that would have applied under RCW
9.41.040(4) if the person had been found guilty of the crime.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements, the conflicting part of this act is
hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict,
and such finding or determination does not affect the operation of the
remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---