BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.82.280 and 1986 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Concurrent method of instruction" means the behind-the-wheel
component of driver training instruction is integrated with the
classroom component of driver training instruction.
(2) "Consecutive method of instruction" means the behind-the-wheel
component of driver training instruction is taught separately from the
classroom component of driver training instruction.
(3) "Driver training school" means a commercial driver training
school engaged in the business of giving instruction, for a fee, in the
operation of automobiles.
(((2))) (4) "Director" means the director of the department of
licensing of the state of Washington.
(((3))) (5) "Advisory committee" means the driving instructors'
advisory committee as created in this chapter.
(((4))) (6) "Fraudulent practices" means any conduct or
representation on the part of a licensee under this chapter tending to
induce anyone to believe, or to give the impression, that a license to
operate a motor vehicle or any other license granted by the director
may be obtained by any means other than those prescribed by law, or
furnishing or obtaining the same by illegal or improper means, or
requesting, accepting, or collecting money for such purposes.
(((5))) (7) "Instructor" means any person employed by a driver
training school to instruct persons in the operation of automobiles.
(((6))) (8) "Place of business" means a designated location at
which the business of a driver training school is transacted and its
records are kept.
(((7))) (9) "Person" means any individual, firm, corporation,
partnership, or association.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.82.300 and 2002 c 195 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall be assisted in the duties and
responsibilities of this chapter by the driver instructors' advisory
committee, consisting of five members. Members of the advisory
committee shall be appointed by the director for two-year terms and
shall consist of a representative of the driver training schools, a
representative of the driving instructors (who shall not be from the
same school as the school member), a representative of the
superintendent of public instruction, a representative of the
department of licensing, and a representative from the Washington state
traffic safety commission. Members shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. A member who
is receiving a salary from the state shall not receive compensation
other than travel expenses incurred in such service.
(2) The advisory committee shall meet at least semiannually and
shall have additional meetings as may be called by the director. The
director or the director's representative shall attend all meetings of
the advisory committee and shall serve as chairman.
(3) Duties of the advisory committee shall be to:
(a) Advise and confer with the director or the director's
representative on matters pertaining to the establishment of rules
necessary to carry out this chapter;
(b) Review violations of this chapter and to recommend to the
director appropriate enforcement or disciplinary action as provided in
this chapter;
(c) Review and update when necessary a curriculum consisting of a
list of items of knowledge and the processes of driving a motor vehicle
specifying the minimum requirements adjudged necessary in teaching a
proper and adequate course of driver education. Driver training
curricula may be based on either consecutive methods of instruction or
concurrent methods of instruction;
(d) Review and update instructor certification standards to be
consistent with RCW 46.82.330 and take into consideration those
standards required to be met by traffic safety education teachers under
RCW 28A.220.020(3); and
(e) Prepare the examination for a driver instructor's certificate
and review examination results at least once each calendar year for the
purpose of updating and revising examination standards.

--- END ---