BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.82.320 and 2002 c 352 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person, including the owner, operator, partner, officer, or
stockholder of a driver training school shall give instruction in the
operation of an automobile for a fee without a license issued by the
director for that purpose. An application for an instructor's license
shall be filed with the director, containing such information as
prescribed by the director, accompanied by an application fee of
seventy-five dollars, which shall in no event be refunded. If the
application is approved by the director and the applicant
satisfactorily meets the examination requirements as prescribed in RCW
46.82.330, the applicant shall be granted a license valid for a period
of one year from the date of issuance. A ninety-day temporary license
will be issued immediately upon the satisfactory completion of both the
examination requirements in RCW 46.82.330 and the background clearance
as prescribed in RCW 46.82.325. An instructor shall take a
requalification examination every five years.
(2) The annual fee for renewal of an instructor's license shall be
twenty-five dollars. The director shall issue a license certificate to
each licensee which shall be conspicuously displayed in the place of
business of the employing driver training school. Unless revoked,
canceled, or denied by the director, the license shall remain the
property of the licensee in the event of termination of employment or
employment by another driver training school. If a renewal application
has not been received by the director within sixty days from the date
a notice of license expiration was mailed to the licensee, the license
will be voided requiring a new application as provided for in this
chapter, including examination and payment of all fees.
(3) Persons who qualify under the rules jointly adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction and the director of licensing to
teach only the laboratory phase, shall be subject to a ten dollar
examination fee.
(4) Each licensee shall be provided with a wallet-size
identification card by the director at the time the license is issued
which shall be carried on the instructor's person at all times while
engaged in instructing.
(5) The person to whom an instructor's license has been issued
shall notify the director in writing within thirty days of any change
of employment or termination of employment, providing the name and
address of the new driver training school by whom the instructor will
be employed.

--- END ---