BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state department of transportation and the local authorities
are authorized to reserve all or any portion of any highway under their
respective jurisdictions, including any designated lane or ramp, for
the exclusive or preferential use of public transportation vehicles or
private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified number of
passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient utilization
of the highway or will aid in the conservation of energy resources.
Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of a highway
facility may be declared to be effective ((at all times or at specified
times of day or on specified days)) from 6:00 a.m. through 9:00 a.m.
and from 3:00 p.m. through 6:00 p.m. Monday through Friday, but may
never be effective on Saturday or Sunday. Violation of a restriction
of highway usage prescribed by the appropriate authority under this
section is a traffic infraction.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.52.025 and 1974 ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Highway authorities of the state, counties, and incorporated cities
and towns, in addition to the specific powers granted in this chapter,
shall also have, and may exercise, relative to limited access
facilities, any and all additional authority, now or hereafter vested
in them relative to highways or streets within their respective
jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use of such
limited access facilities by various classes of vehicles or traffic.
Such highway authorities may reserve any limited access facility or
portions thereof, including designated lanes or ramps for the exclusive
or preferential use of public transportation vehicles, privately owned
buses, or private motor vehicles carrying not less than a specified
number of passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient
utilization of the highway facility or will aid in the conservation of
energy resources. Regulations authorizing such exclusive or
preferential use of a highway facility may be declared to be effective
((at all time or at specified times of day or on specified days)) from
6:00 a.m. through 9:00 a.m. and from 3:00 p.m. through 6:00 p.m. Monday
through Friday, but may never be effective on Saturday or Sunday.

--- END ---