BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.64.090 and 2003 c 373 s 3 and 2003 c 91 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in ((section 203, chapter 83, Laws of 2003))
RCW 47.60.656 and subsection (2) of this section, or as provided in
((section 303, chapter 83, Laws of 2003)) RCW 36.54.130 and subsection
(3) of this section, or as provided in subsection (4) of this section,
if any party assumes the operation and maintenance of any ferry or
ferry system by rent, lease, or charter from the department of
transportation, such party shall assume and be bound by all the
provisions herein and any agreement or contract for such operation of
any ferry or ferry system entered into by the department shall provide
that the wages to be paid, hours of employment, working conditions, and
seniority rights of employees will be established by the marine
employees' commission in accordance with the terms and provisions of
this chapter and it shall further provide that all labor disputes shall
be adjudicated in accordance with chapter 47.64 RCW.
(2) If a public transportation benefit area meeting the
requirements of ((section 201, chapter 83, Laws of 2003)) RCW
36.57A.200 has voter approval to operate passenger-only ferry service,
it may enter into an agreement with Washington State Ferries to rent,
lease, or purchase passenger-only vessels, related equipment, or
terminal space for purposes of loading and unloading the passenger-only
ferry. Charges for the vessels, equipment, and space must be fair
market value taking into account the public benefit derived from the
ferry service. A benefit area or subcontractor of that benefit area
that qualifies under this subsection is not subject to the restrictions
of subsection (1) of this section, but is subject to:
(a) The terms of those collective bargaining agreements that it or
its subcontractors negotiate with the exclusive bargaining
representatives of its or its subcontractors' employees under chapter
41.56 RCW or the National Labor Relations Act, as applicable;
(b) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, a
requirement that the benefit area and any contract with its
subcontractors, give preferential hiring to former employees of the
department of transportation who separated from employment with the
department because of termination of the ferry service by the state of
Washington; and
(c) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, a
requirement that the benefit area and any contract with its
subcontractors, on any questions concerning representation of employees
for collective bargaining purposes, may be determined by conducting a
cross-check comparing an employee organization's membership records or
bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the
employer.
(3) If a ferry district is formed under ((section 301, chapter 83,
Laws of 2003)) RCW 36.54.110 to operate passenger-only ferry service,
it may enter into an agreement with Washington State Ferries to rent,
lease, or purchase vessels, related equipment, or terminal space for
purposes of loading and unloading the ferry. Charges for the vessels,
equipment, and space must be fair market value taking into account the
public benefit derived from the ferry service. A ferry district or
subcontractor of that district that qualifies under this subsection is
not subject to the restrictions of subsection (1) of this section, but
is subject to:
(a) The terms of those collective bargaining agreements that it or
its subcontractors negotiate with the exclusive bargaining
representatives of its or its subcontractors' employees under chapter
41.56 RCW or the National Labor Relations Act, as applicable;
(b) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, a
requirement that the ferry district and any contract with its
subcontractors, give preferential hiring to former employees of the
department of transportation who separated from employment with the
department because of termination of the ferry service by the state of
Washington; and
(c) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, a
requirement that the ferry district and any contract with its
subcontractors, on any questions concerning representation of employees
for collective bargaining purposes, may be determined by conducting a
cross-check comparing an employee organization's membership records or
bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the
employer.
(4) The department of transportation shall make its terminal, dock,
and pier space available to private operators of passenger-only ferries
if the space can be made available without limiting the operation of
car ferries operated by the department. The department may also enter
into agreements with private operators of passenger-only ferries for
those operators to rent or lease its passenger-only ferry vessels.
These private operators are not bound by the provisions of subsection
(1) of this section. Charges for the equipment and space must be fair
market value taking into account the public benefit derived from the
passenger-only ferry service. Revenue from the charges shall be
deposited in the passenger-only ferry account created in section 4 of
this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.84.020 and 2003 c 373 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of an application the commission shall give
reasonable notice to the department, affected cities, counties, and
public transportation benefit areas and any common carrier which might
be adversely affected, of the time and place for hearing on such
application. The commission shall have power after hearing, to issue
the certificate as prayed for, or to refuse to issue it, or to issue it
for the partial exercise only of the privilege sought, and may attach
to the exercise of the rights granted by said certificate such terms
and conditions as in its judgment the public convenience and necessity
may require; but the commission shall not have power to grant a
certificate to operate between districts and/or into any territory
prohibited by RCW 47.60.120 or already served by an existing
certificate holder, unless such existing certificate holder has failed
or refused to furnish reasonable and adequate service or has failed to
provide the service described in its certificate or tariffs after the
time period allowed to initiate service has elapsed: PROVIDED, A
certificate shall be granted when it shall appear to the satisfaction
of the commission that the commercial ferry was actually operating in
good faith over the route for which such certificate shall be sought,
on January 15, 1927: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That in case two or more
commercial ferries shall upon said date have been operating vessels
upon the same route, or between the same districts the commission shall
determine after public hearing whether one or more certificates shall
issue, and in determining to whom a certificate or certificates shall
be issued, the commission shall consider all material facts and
circumstances including the prior operation, schedules, and services
rendered by either of the ferries, and in case more than one
certificate shall issue, the commission shall fix and determine the
schedules and services of the ferries to which the certificates are
issued to the end that duplication of service be eliminated and public
convenience be furthered.
(2) Before issuing a certificate, the commission shall determine
that the applicant has the financial resources to operate the proposed
service for at least twelve months, based upon the submission by the
applicant of a pro forma financial statement of operations. Issuance
of a certificate shall be determined upon, but not limited to, the
following factors: Ridership and revenue forecasts; the cost of
service for the proposed operation; an estimate of the cost of the
assets to be used in providing the service; a statement of the total
assets on hand of the applicant that will be expended on the proposed
operation; and a statement of prior experience, if any, in such field
by the applicant. The documentation required of the applicant under
this section shall comply with the provisions of RCW 9A.72.085.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to an application
for a certificate that is pending as of July 25, 1993.
(4) In granting a certificate for passenger-only ferries and
determining what conditions to place on the certificate, the commission
shall consider and give substantial weight to the effect of its
decisions on public agencies operating, or eligible to operate,
passenger-only ferry service.
(((5) Until March 1, 2005, the commission shall not consider an
application for passenger-only ferry service serving any county in
Puget Sound, unless the public transportation benefit area authority or
ferry district serving that county, by resolution, agrees to the
application.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of transportation shall provide grants to private
operators of passenger-only ferries whose routes operating on routes
serving terminals, docks, or pier space under RCW 47.64.090 to provide
service on routes utilizing those facilities. The grants shall be from
the passenger-only ferry account and shall be used to contract for
reduced-cost tickets based on services provided by the private
operators for the benefit of the passenger-only ferry users. The
amount of the grant each year to each operator is limited to the amount
paid annually by each operator for use of the facilities under RCW
47.64.090. No appropriation is required for department expenditures
from the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The passenger-only ferry account is hereby created in the custody
of the state treasurer as a nonappropriated account. Moneys paid by
private operators of passenger-only ferries for use of terminals,
docks, pier space, or vessels under RCW 47.64.090 shall be deposited
into the account and shall be used by the department of transportation
to fund grants pursuant to section 3 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.60.120 and 2003 c 373 s 2 and 2003 c 83 s 204 are
each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) If the department acquires or constructs, maintains, and
operates any ferry crossings upon or toll bridges over Puget Sound or
any of its tributary or connecting waters, there shall not be
constructed, operated, or maintained any other ferry crossing upon or
bridge over any such waters within ten miles of any such crossing or
bridge operated or maintained by the department excepting such bridges
or ferry crossings in existence, and being operated and maintained
under a lawfully issued franchise at the time of the location of the
ferry crossing or construction of the toll bridge by the department.
(2) The ten-mile distance in subsection (1) of this section means
ten statute miles measured by airline distance. The ten-mile
restriction shall be applied by comparing the two end points (termini)
of a state ferry crossing to those of a private ferry crossing.
(3) The Washington utilities and transportation commission may,
upon written petition of a commercial ferry operator certificated or
applying for certification under chapter 81.84 RCW, and upon notice and
hearing, grant a waiver from the ten-mile restriction. The waiver must
not be detrimental to the public interest. In making a decision to
waive the ten-mile restriction, the commission shall consider, but is
not limited to, the impact of the waiver on transportation congestion
mitigation, air quality improvement, and the overall impact on the
Washington state ferry system. The commission shall act upon a request
for a waiver within ninety days after the conclusion of the hearing.
A waiver is effective for a period of five years from the date of
issuance. At the end of five years the waiver becomes permanent unless
appealed within thirty days by the commission on its own motion, the
department, or an interested party.
(4) The department shall not maintain and operate any ferry
crossing or toll bridge over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or
connecting waters that would infringe upon any franchise lawfully
issued by the state and in existence and being exercised at the time of
the location of the ferry crossing or toll bridge by the department,
without first acquiring the rights granted to such franchise holder
under the franchise.
(5) This section does not apply to the operation of passenger-only
ferry service by public transportation benefit areas meeting the
requirements of RCW 36.57A.200 or to the operation of passenger-only
ferry service by ferry districts.

Sec. 6 RCW 81.84.010 and 2003 c 373 s 4 and 2003 c 83 s 211 are
each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) No commercial ferry may hereafter operate any vessel or ferry
for the public use for hire between fixed termini or over a regular
route upon the waters within this state, including the rivers and lakes
and Puget Sound, without first applying for and obtaining from the
commission a certificate declaring that public convenience and
necessity require such operation. Service authorized by certificates
issued before or after July 25, 1993, to a commercial ferry operator
shall be exercised by the operator in a manner consistent with the
conditions established in the certificate or tariffs: PROVIDED, That
no certificate shall be required for a vessel primarily engaged in
transporting freight other than vehicles, whose gross earnings from the
transportation of passengers and/or vehicles, are not more than ten
percent of the total gross annual earnings of such vessel: PROVIDED,
That nothing herein shall be construed to affect the right of any
county public transportation benefit area or other public agency within
this state to construct, condemn, purchase, operate, or maintain,
itself or by contract, agreement, or lease, with any person, firm, or
corporation, ferries or boats across or wharfs at or upon the waters
within this state, including rivers and lakes and Puget Sound, provided
such operation is not over the same route or between the same
districts, being served by a certificate holder without first acquiring
the rights granted to the certificate holder under the certificate, nor
shall this chapter be construed to affect, amend, or invalidate any
contract entered into prior to January 15, 1927, for the operation of
ferries or boats upon the waters within this state, which was entered
into in good faith by any county with any person, firm, or corporation,
except that in case of the operation or maintenance by any county,
city, town, port district, or other political subdivision by contract,
agreement, or lease with any person, firm, or corporation, of ferries
or boats across or wharfs at or upon the waters within this state,
including rivers and lakes and Puget Sound, the commission shall have
power and authority to regulate rates and services of such operation or
maintenance of ferries, boats, or wharfs, to make, fix, alter, or amend
said rates, and to regulate service and safety of operations thereof,
in the manner and to the same extent as it is empowered to regulate a
commercial ferry, notwithstanding the provisions of any act or parts of
acts inconsistent herewith.
(2) The holder of a certificate of public convenience and necessity
granted under this chapter must initiate service within five years of
obtaining the certificate, except that the holder of a certificate of
public convenience and necessity for passenger-only ferry service in
Puget Sound must initiate service within twenty months of obtaining the
certificate. The certificate holder shall report to the commission
every six months after the certificate is granted on the progress of
the certificated route. The reports shall include, but not be limited
to, the progress of environmental impact, parking, local government
land use, docking, and financing considerations. Except in the case of
passenger-only ferry service in Puget Sound, if service has not been
initiated within five years of obtaining the certificate, the
commission may extend the certificate on a twelve-month basis for up to
three years if the six-month progress reports indicate there is
significant advancement toward initiating service.
(3) The commission shall review certificates in existence as of
July 25, 1993, where service is not being provided on all or any
portion of the route or routes certificated. Based on progress reports
required under subsection (2) of this section, the commission may grant
an extension beyond that provided in subsection (2) of this section.
Such additional extension may not exceed a total of two years.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2003 c 403 s 9, 2003 c 313 s 10, 2003
c 191 s 7, 2003 c 148 s 15, 2003 c 92 s 8, and 2003 c 19 s 12 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism
promotion account, the passenger-only ferry account, the produce
railcar pool account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and
exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account,
the children's trust fund, and the investing in innovation account.
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---