BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.01.290 and 1994 c 258 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes that environmental review of
transportation projects is a continuous process that should begin at
the earliest stages of planning and continue through final project
construction. ((Early and extensive involvement of the relevant
environmental regulatory authorities is critical in order to avoid
significant changes in substantially completed project design and
engineering.)) Streamlining the permit writing and approval process is
essential for reducing project delays and for making the most efficient
use of every transportation dollar. It is the expectation of the
legislature that if a comprehensive environmental approach is
integrated throughout various transportation processes, onerous,
duplicative, and time-consuming permit processes will be minimized.
The legislature finds that the greatest efficiency and effectiveness in
expediting the permit writing process will include the inclusion of
qualified private sector parties in the preparation of required project
permits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.06C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By June 30, 2004, the committee shall develop guidelines for a
certification program to enable third party persons to draft
environmental permits.
(2) By January 1, 2005, the departments of transportation, ecology,
and fish and wildlife shall, using the guidelines developed by the
committee, develop rules that allow a third party writer to write
permits that the department of ecology and the department of fish and
wildlife are responsible for issuing. The rules may address permit
writing requirements, qualifications of the third party in writing
permits, and other requirements.
(3) The permit writing process must provide that the appropriate
responsible agency for permit issuance will have a single review period
for review of the permit drafted by the third party. The agency shall
provide any comments or suggested revisions to the permit writer within
sixty days of the draft permit being provided to the agency. If the
third party writer complies with the original guidelines and rules
established by the permitting agency and addresses comments by the
agency and any suggested revisions, the permit must be approved by the
agency within ten days of the permit being resubmitted to the agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the transportation permit efficiency and accountability
committee is not funded or ceases to exist, the departments of
transportation, ecology, and fish and wildlife shall by January 1,
2005, jointly develop rules that allow a third party writer to write
permits that the department of ecology and the department of fish and
wildlife are responsible for issuing. The rules may address permit
writing requirements, qualifications of the third party in writing
permits, and other requirements.
(2) The permit writing process must provide that the appropriate
responsible agency for permit issuance will have a single review period
for review of the permit drafted by the third party. The agency shall
provide any comments or suggested revisions to the permit writer within
sixty days of the draft permit being provided to the agency. If the
third party writer complies with the original guidelines and rules
established by the permitting agency and addresses comments by the
agency and any suggested revisions, the permit must be approved by the
agency within ten days of the permit being resubmitted to the agency.

--- END ---