BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The legislature finds
that creating partnerships between private and public sector
organizations can most effectively use available resources for the
benefit of the citizens of the state. The legislature intends to
encourage and promote these ventures by creating a program that allows
private entities to finance and construct improvements to the state's
highway infrastructure that are financed and constructed with the
resources and best attributes of the public and private sectors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 ESTABLISHING P4 PROGRAM WITHIN THE DOT. The
public-private partnership program (P4) is established within the
department of transportation. The department shall solicit proposals
for improvements to the state highway system from private entities, or
from public entities that have entered into an agreement with a private
entity that will provide more than fifty percent of financing for the
project.
Cities, counties, and public port districts are eligible to form
partnerships with private entities to sponsor a project for development
and construction under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PROJECT DEFINITION. New improvements to the
existing state transportation system, as well as reconstruction of
existing highway facilities, are eligible to be proposed by public or
private sponsors. Improvements must meet applicable standards of
design and operability of the state highway system or have deviations
that can be approved by the department before construction of the
project. Improvements include but are not limited to new or improved
access interchanges, facilities such as park and ride lots, highway
safety rest areas, and any other new or modified improvement to the
state highway system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 CREATION OF P4 INFRASTRUCTURE ACCOUNT. The
public-private partners (P4) infrastructure account is established in
the state treasury. Revenues collected from state sales taxes on
transportation projects constructed under this chapter must be
deposited into the account. Money may be placed in the account from
the proceeds of bonds or from any other lawful source. Money in the
account may be used to provide, in whole or in part, financial
guarantees and payments as part of a negotiated development agreement
for state highway construction projects authorized in section 8 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 ELIGIBILITY FOR FUNDING UNDER RURAL ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT FUND. Projects developed under this chapter qualify for
investment in rural counties from the rural economic development fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RESPONSIBILITIES OF PRIVATE SPONSORS. All
projects constructed under this chapter must conform with the ASHTO
highway design standards in effect at the time of commencing project
construction. Private sponsors of projects constructed under this
chapter must pay for all project construction and permitting costs.
Compensation to the private sector for their participation in this
program will be under section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 PROJECT PRIORITIZATION AND SELECTION. (1)
Projects funded under this chapter may not exceed fifty million
dollars.
(2) The department shall develop criteria for prioritizing projects
submitted for funding under this chapter. The selection criteria for
projects are:
(a) Economic development potential; and
(b) Amount of private investment as a percentage of total project
cost.
(3) After reaching a tentative negotiated agreement with a project
sponsor, the department shall forward the proposed project and
negotiated agreement to the legislative transportation committee for
review, comment, and final approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 NEGOTIATED AGREEMENTS. The department shall
review and evaluate proposals from private sponsors, or public sponsors
that have majority financial participation from private sector
partners. The department shall negotiate the terms and compensation
for projects constructed and delivered. The total amount of
compensation to be agreed upon must be comprised of a mix of funds from
the P4 infrastructure account in section 4 of this act and tax credits
and incentives provided in section 9 of this act. The department shall
make every effort to maximize compensation from tax incentives and
credits, and minimize direct payments from the P4 infrastructure
account. Payments to project sponsors must be completed within twenty-five years of the date the project is certified as complete and control
returned to the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 TAX INCENTIVES SUBJECT TO NEGOTIATED
AGREEMENTS. In negotiating agreements under this chapter, the
department shall propose compensating private sector participants with
a combination of funds from the P4 infrastructure account and from tax
incentives. Tax incentives eligible for compensation include:
(1) Proceeds from tax increment financing, based upon new
development associated with the project;
(2) Property tax deferrals for new development associated with the
project;
(3) Property tax exemptions for new development associated with the
project;
(4) Sales tax deferrals for new development associated with the
project; and
(5) Sales tax exemptions for new development associated with the
project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Projects developed under this chapter are
not considered public works projects under Title 39 RCW. Projects
authorized for development under this chapter are subject to the
expedited permitting process as authorized under chapter 47.06C RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RESPONSIBILITIES AFTER PROJECT COMPLETION.
Project sponsors may not own the finished transportation facility after
construction is certified as complete. Private sector sponsors may not
impose tolls or other charges for use of the facility. The department
shall assume all maintenance and operation of the facility upon project
completion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Captions used in this act are not part of
the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 12 of this act are each
added to chapter 47.46 RCW.

--- END ---