BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares that it is the
responsibility of governments to implement requirements of voter-approved initiatives. The legislature further recognizes that with the
approval of Initiative 776, voters expect license tab fees to be
reduced in accordance with that act, both at the state and local level.
While certain local government tax revenues are pledged as security for
bond indebtedness, every effort should be made to retire those
outstanding bonds and to eliminate collection of those taxes repealed
by Initiative 776 as soon as possible.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.112.130 and 1992 c 101 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding RCW 39.36.020(1), and subject to the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section, an authority may at any
time contract indebtedness or borrow money for authority purposes and
may issue general obligation bonds in an amount not exceeding, together
with any existing indebtedness of the authority not authorized by the
voters, one and one-half percent of the value of the taxable property
within the boundaries of the authority; and with the assent of three-fifths of the voters therein voting at an election called for that
purpose, may contract indebtedness or borrow money for authority
purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor, provided the
total indebtedness of the authority shall not exceed five percent of
the value of the taxable property therein. Such bonds shall be issued
and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.
(2) An authority may not issue new bonds under this section secured
by the pledge of revenues from the excise tax authorized under RCW
81.104.160 nor may it issue new bonds when it has outstanding bond
indebtedness secured by the pledge of revenues from the excise tax
authorized under RCW 81.104.160. An authority with bonds outstanding
on the effective date of this act which are secured by the pledge of
revenues from any excise tax authorized under RCW 81.104.160 shall
immediately use unused bond proceeds, current tax revenues, and cash
reserves to defease those bonds.
(3) The term "value of the taxable property" shall have the meaning
set forth in RCW 39.36.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---