BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.31.422 and 1998 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Hanford area economic investment fund is established in the
custody of the state treasurer. Moneys in the fund shall only be used
for reasonable assistant attorney general costs in support of the
committee or pursuant to the ((recommendations)) decisions of the
committee created in RCW 43.31.425 ((and the approval of the director
of community, trade, and economic development)) for Hanford area
revolving loan funds, Hanford area infrastructure projects, or other
Hanford area economic development and diversification projects, but may
not be used for government or nonprofit organization operating
expenses. Up to five percent of moneys in the fund may be used for
program administration. For the purpose of this chapter "Hanford area"
means Benton and Franklin counties. ((Disbursements from the fund
shall be on the authorization of)) The director of community, trade,
and economic development or the director's designee shall authorize
disbursements from the fund after an affirmative vote of at least six
members of the committee created in RCW 43.31.425 on any
((recommendations)) decisions reached by the committee created in RCW
43.31.425. The fund is subject to the allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements.
The legislature intends to establish similar economic investment funds
for areas that develop low-level radioactive waste disposal facilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.31.428 and 1998 c 76 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Hanford area economic investment fund committee created under
RCW 43.31.425 may:
(1) Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct
of its business;
(2) Utilize the services of other governmental agencies;
(3) Accept from any federal or state agency loans or grants for the
purposes of funding Hanford area revolving loan funds, Hanford area
infrastructure projects, or Hanford area economic development projects;
(4) ((Recommend to the director)) Adopt rules for the
administration of the program, including the terms and rates pertaining
to its loans, and criteria for awarding grants, loans, and financial
guarantees;
(5) ((Recommend to the director)) Adopt a spending strategy for the
moneys in the fund created in RCW 43.31.422. The strategy shall
include five and ten year goals for economic development and
diversification for use of the moneys in the Hanford area;
(6) Recommend to the director no more than two allocations eligible
for funding per calendar year, with a first priority on Hanford area
revolving loan allocations, and Hanford area infrastructure allocations
followed by other Hanford area economic development and diversification
projects if the committee finds that there are no suitable allocations
in the priority allocations described in this section;
(7) Establish and administer a revolving fund consistent with this
section and RCW 43.31.422 and 43.31.425; and
(8) Make grants from the Hanford area economic investment fund
consistent with this section and RCW 43.31.422 and 43.31.425.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.200.230 and 1991 c 272 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of the department of ecology shall require that
generators of waste pay a fee for each cubic foot of waste disposed at
any facility in the state equal to six dollars and fifty cents until
July 1, 2004. Beginning July 1, 2004, the fee shall be eight dollars
and seventy-five cents. Beginning July 1, 2005, and each July 1st
thereafter, the department shall adjust the fee by the rate of yearly
increase in the most recently published consumer price index, all urban
consumers, for the United States, over the consumer price index for the
preceding year, as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United
States department of labor, rounded up to the nearest cent. The fee
shall be imposed specifically on the generator of the waste and shall
not be considered to apply in any way to the low-level site operator's
disposal activities. The fee shall be allocated in accordance with RCW
43.200.233 and 43.200.235. This subsection shall be invalidated and
the authorization to collect a surcharge removed if the legislature or
any administrative agency of the state of Washington prior to January
1, 1993, (1) imposes fees, assessments, or charges other than perpetual
care and maintenance, site surveillance, and site closing fees
currently applicable to the Hanford commercial low-level waste site
operator's activities, (2) imposes any additional fees, assessments, or
charges on generators using the Hanford commercial low-level waste
site, or (3) increases any existing fees, assessments, or charges.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.200.233 and 1991 c 272 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
A portion of the surcharge received under RCW 43.200.230 shall be
remitted monthly to the county in which the low-level radioactive waste
disposal facility is located in the following manner:
(1) ((During 1993, six dollars and fifty cents per cubic foot of
waste;
(2) During 1994, three dollars and twenty-five cents per cubic foot
of waste; and
(3) During 1995 and thereafter,)) Two dollars per cubic foot of
waste until July 1, 2004;
(2) Beginning July 1, 2004, the surcharge shall be two dollars and
sixty-five cents per cubic foot of waste; and
(3) Beginning July 1, 2005, and each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall adjust the surcharge by the rate of yearly increase in
the most recently published consumer price index, all urban consumers,
for the United States, over the consumer price index for the preceding
year, as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States
department of labor, rounded up to the nearest cent.

--- END ---