BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.02.230 and 1990 c 250 s 90 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may exempt from compliance with the vessel
dealer requirements of this chapter, any person who is engaged in the
business of selling in this state at wholesale or retail, human-powered
watercraft which is: (a) Under sixteen feet in length; (b) unable to
be powered by propulsion machinery or wind propulsion as designed by
the manufacturer; and (c) not designed for use on commonly-used
navigable waters.
(2) Any person engaged in the business of selling at wholesale or
retail, exempt and nonexempt watercraft under this section shall only
be required to comply with the provisions of this chapter in regard to
the sale of nonexempt watercraft.
(3) An auction company licensed under chapter 18.11 RCW and
licensed as a motor vehicle dealer under chapter 46.70 RCW may sell at
auction all vessels that a vessel dealer is authorized to sell.

--- END ---