BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.34.030 and 1992 c 161 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any power or powers, privileges or authority exercised or
capable of exercise by a public agency of this state may be exercised
and enjoyed jointly with any other public agency of this state having
the power or powers, privilege or authority, and jointly with any
public agency of any other state or of the United States to the extent
that laws of such other state or of the United States permit such joint
exercise or enjoyment. Any agency of the state government when acting
jointly with any public agency may exercise and enjoy all of the
powers, privileges and authority conferred by this chapter upon a
public agency.
(2) Any two or more public agencies may enter into agreements with
one another for joint or cooperative action pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter: PROVIDED, That any such joint or cooperative action
by public agencies which are educational service districts and/or
school districts shall comply with the provisions of RCW 28A.320.080.
Appropriate action by ordinance, resolution or otherwise pursuant to
law of the governing bodies of the participating public agencies shall
be necessary before any such agreement may enter into force.
(3) Any such agreement shall specify the following:
(a) Its duration;
(b) The precise organization, composition and nature of any
separate legal or administrative entity created thereby together with
the powers delegated thereto, provided such entity may be legally
created. Such entity may include a nonprofit corporation organized
pursuant to chapter 24.03 or 24.06 RCW whose membership is limited
solely to the participating public agencies or a partnership organized
pursuant to chapter 25.04 RCW whose partners are limited solely to
participating public agencies and the funds of any such corporation or
partnership shall be subject to audit in the manner provided by law for
the auditing of public funds;
(c) Its purpose or purposes;
(d) The manner of financing the joint or cooperative undertaking
and of establishing and maintaining a budget therefor;
(e) The permissible method or methods to be employed in
accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and
for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination;
(f) Any other necessary and proper matters.
(4) In the event that the agreement does not establish a separate
legal entity to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking, the
agreement shall, in addition to items (a), (c), (d), (e) and (f)
enumerated in subdivision (3) hereof, contain the following:
(a) Provision for an administrator or a joint board responsible for
administering the joint or cooperative undertaking. In the case of a
joint board, public agencies party to the agreement shall be
represented;
(b) The manner of acquiring, holding and disposing of real and
personal property used in the joint or cooperative undertaking. Any
joint board is authorized to establish a special fund with a state,
county, city, or district treasurer servicing an involved public agency
designated "Operating fund of . . . . . . joint board".
(5) No agreement made pursuant to this chapter ((shall)) relieves
any public agency of any obligation or responsibility imposed upon it
by law except that:
(a) To the extent of actual and timely performance thereof by a
joint board or other legal or administrative entity created by an
agreement made hereunder, the performance may be offered in
satisfaction of the obligation or responsibility; and
(b) With respect to one or more public agencies purchasing or
otherwise contracting through a bid, proposal, or contract awarded by
another public agency or by a group of public agencies, any statutory
obligation to provide notice for bids or proposals that applies to the
public agencies involved is satisfied if the public agency or group of
public agencies that awarded the bid, proposal, or contract complied
with its own statutory requirements and either (i) posted the bid or
solicitation notice on a web site established and maintained by a
public agency, purchasing cooperative, or similar service provider, for
purposes of posting public notice of bid or proposal solicitations, or
(ii) provided an access link on the state's web portal to the notice.
(6) Financing of joint projects by agreement shall be as provided
by law.

--- END ---