BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.57.020 and 2003 c 326 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall be the recorder of livestock brands and such
brands shall not be recorded elsewhere in this state. Any person
desiring to record a livestock brand shall apply on a form prescribed
by the director. The application shall be accompanied by a facsimile
of the brand applied for and, except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, a one hundred twenty dollar recording fee. The director
shall, upon his or her satisfaction that the application and brand
facsimile meet the requirements of this chapter and its rules, record
the brand.
(2) A person who is seventy or more years of age who applies to the
department to record a brand under this section is exempt from paying
a recording fee if the person owns not more than a total of ten head of
cattle and horses at any one time during the period the recording is in
effect.

Sec. 2 RCW 16.57.080 and 2003 c 326 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall establish by rule a schedule for the renewal
of recorded brands. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, the fee for renewal of a recorded brand shall be one hundred
twenty dollars for each four-year period of brand ownership, except
that the director may, in adopting a renewal schedule, provide for the
collection of renewal fees on a prorated basis. At least sixty days
before the expiration of a recorded brand, the director shall notify by
letter the owner of record of the brand that on the payment of the
renewal fee the director shall issue proof of payment allowing the
brand owner exclusive ownership and use of the brand for the subsequent
ownership period. The failure of the owner to pay the renewal fee by
the date required by rule shall cause ownership of the brand to expire.
For one year following the expiration, the director shall record the
brand only to the prior owner upon payment of the renewal fee and a
late fee of twenty-five dollars. If the brand is not recorded within
one year to the prior owner, the director may issue the brand to any
other applicant.
(2) A person who is seventy or more years of age who applies to the
department to renew a recorded brand under this section is exempt from
paying a renewal fee as long as the person owns not more than a total
of ten head of cattle and horses at any one time during the period the
recording is in effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 16.57 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a recorded brand is owned by a person who is exempted from
paying brand recording or renewal fees under RCW 16.57.020 or 16.57.080
and the recording is transferred to any person who does not also
qualify for the exemption or if the total number of cattle and horses
owned by the brand owner exceeds ten head at any one time during the
period the recording is in effect, the recipient of the transfer or the
owner of the brand must pay a prorated portion of the one hundred
twenty dollar fee for recording the brand or renewing the recording.
The prorated fee must be based on the portion of the recording period
that remains after the transfer or after the ten-head limit is
exceeded.
(2) Any prorated fee due upon the transfer of a brand recording
under subsection (1) of this section is in addition to any fee for
transferring the recording.

--- END ---