BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.520 and 2000 c 107 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A personal use shellfish and seaweed license is required for
all persons other than residents or nonresidents under fifteen years of
age to fish for, take, dig for, or possess seaweed or shellfish,
including razor clams, for personal use from state waters or offshore
waters including national park beaches.
(2) A razor clam license allows a person to harvest only razor
clams for personal use from state waters, including national park
beaches.
(3) The fees for annual personal use shellfish and seaweed licenses
are:
(a) For a resident fifteen years of age or older, seven dollars;
(b) For a nonresident fifteen years of age or older, twenty
dollars; and
(c) For a senior, five dollars.
(((3) The license fee for a two-day personal use shellfish and
seaweed license is six dollars for residents or nonresidents fifteen
years of age or older.))
(4) The fee for an annual razor clam license is five dollars and
fifty cents for residents and eleven dollars for nonresidents.
(5) The fee for a three-day razor clam license is three dollars and
fifty cents for both residents and nonresidents.
(6) A personal use shellfish and seaweed license ((shall)) or razor
clam license must be visible on the licensee while harvesting shellfish
or seaweed.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.32.555 and 2003 c 263 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the fees authorized in this chapter, the department
shall include a surcharge to fund biotoxin testing and monitoring by
the department of health of beaches used for recreational shellfishing,
and to fund monitoring by the Olympic region harmful algal bloom
program of the Olympic natural resources center at the University of
Washington. A surcharge of three dollars applies to resident and
nonresident shellfish and seaweed licenses as authorized by RCW
77.32.520(((2))) (3) (a) and (b); ((and)) a surcharge of two dollars
applies to resident and nonresident adult combination licenses as
authorized by RCW 77.32.470(2)(a); a surcharge of two dollars applies
to annual resident and nonresident razor clam licenses as authorized by
RCW 77.32.520(4); and a surcharge of one dollar applies to the three-day razor clam license authorized by RCW 77.32.520(5). Amounts
collected from these surcharges must be deposited in the general fund--local account managed by the department of health, except that one
hundred fifty thousand dollars per year shall be deposited in the
general fund--local account managed by the University of Washington.
Amounts in excess of the annual costs of the department of health
recreational shellfish testing and monitoring program shall be
transferred to the general fund by the department of health.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.32.070 and 1998 c 191 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Applicants for a license, permit, tag, or stamp shall furnish the
information required by the director. However, the director may not
require the purchaser of a razor clam license under RCW 77.32.520 to
provide any personal information except for proof of residency. The
commission may adopt rules requiring licensees or permittees to keep
records and make reports concerning the taking of fish, shellfish, and
wildlife.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.12.170 and 2003 c 317 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
fund which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes;
(c) The sale of licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by
chapter 77.32 RCW and RCW 77.65.490, except annual resident adult
saltwater and all annual razor clam and shellfish licenses, which shall
be deposited into the state general fund;
(d) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(e) Fees for personalized vehicle license plates as provided in
chapter 46.16 RCW;
(f) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(g) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320;
(h) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(i) The sale of personal property seized by the department for
fish, shellfish, or wildlife violations;
(j) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission; and
(k) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under RCW 77.32.560.
(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife fund.

--- END ---