BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.177 and 2001 c 253 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this title, state and county officers
receiving the following moneys shall deposit them in the state general
fund:
(a) The sale of commercial licenses required under this title,
except for licenses issued under RCW 77.65.490; and
(b) Moneys received for damages to food fish or shellfish.
(2) The director shall make weekly remittances to the state
treasurer of moneys collected by the department.
(3) All fines and forfeitures collected or assessed by a district
court for a violation of this title or rule of the department shall be
remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW.
(4) Proceeds from the sale of food fish or shellfish taken in test
fishing conducted by the department((, to the extent that these
proceeds exceed the estimates in the budget approved by the
legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW
43.79.270)) shall be deposited in the fish management and research
account created in section 2 of this act to reimburse the department
for unanticipated costs for test fishing operations ((in excess of the
allowance in the budget approved by the legislature)).
(5) Proceeds from the sale of salmon carcasses and salmon eggs from
state general funded hatcheries by the department of general
administration shall be deposited in the regional fisheries enhancement
group account established in RCW 77.95.090.
(6) Moneys received by the commission under RCW 77.12.039, to the
extent these moneys exceed estimates in the budget approved by the
legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW
43.79.270. Allocations under this subsection shall be made only for
the specific purpose for which the moneys were received, unless the
moneys were received in settlement of a claim for damages to food fish
or shellfish, in which case the moneys may be expended for the
conservation of these resources.
(7) Proceeds from the sale of herring spawn on kelp fishery
licenses by the department((, to the extent those proceeds exceed
estimates in the budget approved by the legislature, may be allocated
as unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.270)) shall be deposited in
the fish management and research account created in section 2 of this
act. Allocations under this subsection shall be made only for herring
management, enhancement, and enforcement.
(8) Moneys received by the department from the forfeiture of
coastal groundfish in excess of vessel trip or cumulative limits shall
be deposited in the fish management and research account created in
section 2 of this act. Allocations under this subsection shall be made
only for coastal groundfish management and research.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The fish management and research account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. Revenues to the account are received by the
department under RCW 77.12.177 (4), (7), and (8). Expenditures from
this account may be made only for purposes for which the moneys were
received. Only the director of the department or the director's
designee has authority to make expenditures from the account, and no
appropriation is required for expenditure.

--- END ---