BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.32A.200 and 2000 c 123 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
All hearings pursuant to this chapter may be conducted at any time
or place within the county of the residence of the parent and such
cases ((shall not)) may be heard in conjunction with the business of
any other division of the superior court. The public shall not be
excluded from hearings ((and only such persons who are found by the
court to have a direct interest in the case or the work of the court
shall be admitted to the proceedings)) except if the judge finds that
excluding the public is in the best interests of the child.

--- END ---