BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.50.100 and 2003 c 105 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section governs records not covered by RCW 13.50.050.
(2) Records covered by this section shall be confidential and shall
be released only pursuant to this section and RCW 13.50.010.
(3) Information pertaining to the date, time, and location of court
hearings held pursuant to chapters 28A.225, 13.32A, and 13.34 RCW is
not confidential and shall be made available to the public.
(4) Records retained or produced by any juvenile justice or care
agency may be released to other participants in the juvenile justice or
care system only when an investigation or case involving the juvenile
in question is being pursued by the other participant or when that
other participant is assigned the responsibility of supervising the
juvenile. Records covered under this section and maintained by the
juvenile courts which relate to the official actions of the agency may
be entered in the statewide judicial information system. However,
truancy records associated with a juvenile who has no other case
history, and records of a juvenile's parents who have no other case
history, shall be removed from the judicial information system when the
juvenile is no longer subject to the compulsory attendance laws in
chapter 28A.225 RCW. A county clerk is not liable for unauthorized
release of this data by persons or agencies not in his or her employ or
otherwise subject to his or her control, nor is the county clerk liable
for inaccurate or incomplete information collected from litigants or
other persons required to provide identifying data pursuant to this
section.
(((4))) (5) Subject to (a) of this subsection, the department of
social and health services may release information retained in the
course of conducting child protective services investigations to a
family or juvenile court hearing a petition for custody under chapter
26.10 RCW.
(a) Information that may be released shall be limited to
information regarding investigations in which: (i) The juvenile was an
alleged victim of abandonment or abuse or neglect; or (ii) the
petitioner for custody of the juvenile, or any individual aged sixteen
or older residing in the petitioner's household, is the subject of a
founded or currently pending child protective services investigation
made by the department subsequent to October 1, 1998.
(b) Additional information may only be released with the written
consent of the subject of the investigation and the juvenile alleged to
be the victim of abandonment or abuse and neglect, or the parent,
custodian, guardian, or personal representative of the juvenile, or by
court order obtained with notice to all interested parties.
(((5))) (6) Any disclosure of records or information by the
department of social and health services pursuant to this section shall
not be deemed a waiver of any confidentiality or privilege attached to
the records or information by operation of any state or federal statute
or regulation, and any recipient of such records or information shall
maintain it in such a manner as to comply with such state and federal
statutes and regulations and to protect against unauthorized
disclosure.
(((6))) (7) A contracting agency or service provider of the
department of social and health services that provides counseling,
psychological, psychiatric, or medical services may release to the
office of the family and children's ombudsman information or records
relating to services provided to a juvenile who is dependent under
chapter 13.34 RCW without the consent of the parent or guardian of the
juvenile, or of the juvenile if the juvenile is under the age of
thirteen years, unless such release is otherwise specifically
prohibited by law.
(((7))) (8) A juvenile, his or her parents, the juvenile's attorney
and the juvenile's parent's attorney, shall, upon request, be given
access to all records and information collected or retained by a
juvenile justice or care agency which pertain to the juvenile except:
(a) If it is determined by the agency that release of this
information is likely to cause severe psychological or physical harm to
the juvenile or his or her parents the agency may withhold the
information subject to other order of the court: PROVIDED, That if the
court determines that limited release of the information is
appropriate, the court may specify terms and conditions for the release
of the information; or
(b) If the information or record has been obtained by a juvenile
justice or care agency in connection with the provision of counseling,
psychological, psychiatric, or medical services to the juvenile, when
the services have been sought voluntarily by the juvenile, and the
juvenile has a legal right to receive those services without the
consent of any person or agency, then the information or record may not
be disclosed to the juvenile's parents without the informed consent of
the juvenile unless otherwise authorized by law; or
(c) That the department of social and health services may delete
the name and identifying information regarding persons or organizations
who have reported alleged child abuse or neglect.
(((8))) (9) A juvenile or his or her parent denied access to any
records following an agency determination under subsection (((7))) (8)
of this section may file a motion in juvenile court requesting access
to the records. The court shall grant the motion unless it finds
access may not be permitted according to the standards found in
subsection (((7))) (8)(a) and (b) of this section.
(((9))) (10) The person making a motion under subsection (((8)))
(9) of this section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all
parties to the original action and to any agency whose records will be
affected by the motion.
(((10))) (11) Subject to the rules of discovery in civil cases, any
party to a proceeding seeking a declaration of dependency or a
termination of the parent-child relationship and any party's counsel
and the guardian ad litem of any party, shall have access to the
records of any natural or adoptive child of the parent, subject to the
limitations in subsection (((7))) (8) of this section. A party denied
access to records may request judicial review of the denial. If the
party prevails, he or she shall be awarded attorneys' fees, costs, and
an amount not less than five dollars and not more than one hundred
dollars for each day the records were wrongfully denied.
(((11))) (12) No unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect as
defined in RCW 26.44.020(12) may be disclosed to a child-placing
agency, private adoption agency, or any other licensed provider.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.105 and 2000 c 124 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise directed by the court, the duties of the
guardian ad litem include but are not limited to the following:
(a) To investigate, collect relevant information about the child's
situation, and report to the court factual information regarding the
best interests of the child;
(b) To monitor all court orders for compliance and to bring to the
court's attention any change in circumstances that may require a
modification of the court's order;
(c) To report to the court information on the legal status of a
child's membership in any Indian tribe or band;
(d) Court-appointed special advocates and guardians ad litem may
make recommendations based upon an independent investigation regarding
the best interests of the child, which the court may consider and weigh
in conjunction with the recommendations of all of the parties; and
(e) To represent and be an advocate for the best interests of the
child.
(2) A guardian ad litem shall be deemed an officer of the court for
the purpose of immunity from civil liability.
(3) Except for information or records specified in RCW
13.50.100(((5))) (8), the guardian ad litem shall have access to all
information available to the state or agency on the case. Upon
presentation of the order of appointment by the guardian ad litem, any
agency, hospital, school organization, division or department of the
state, doctor, nurse, or other health care provider, psychologist,
psychiatrist, police department, or mental health clinic shall permit
the guardian ad litem to inspect and copy any records relating to the
child or children involved in the case, without the consent of the
parent or guardian of the child, or of the child if the child is under
the age of thirteen years, unless such access is otherwise specifically
prohibited by law.
(4) A guardian ad litem may release confidential information,
records, and reports to the office of the family and children's
ombudsman for the purposes of carrying out its duties under chapter
43.06A RCW.
(5) The guardian ad litem shall release case information in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 13.50.100.

--- END ---