BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds, declares, and
determines that public confidence in the responsible management and
fiduciary oversight of all public pension funds under the authority of
the state investment board is best served by an open and accountable
process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.33A RCW
to read as follows:
There is hereby created an audit and accountability committee of
the state investment board consisting of the state treasurer, the two
members of the senate appointed to the board under RCW 43.33A.020(6),
and the two members of the house of representatives appointed to the
board under RCW 43.33A.020(5). The state treasurer is the chair of the
committee.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.33A.020 and 2002 c 303 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created the state investment board to consist of
((fifteen)) eighteen members to be appointed as provided in this
section.
(1) ((One member who is an)) Two members who are active members of
the public employees' retirement system and ((has)) have been ((an))
active members for at least five years. ((This member)) One member
shall represent state government employees and one member shall
represent local government employees. These members shall be appointed
by the governor, subject to confirmation by the senate, from a list of
nominations submitted by organizations representing active members of
the system. The initial term of appointment shall be one year.
(2) One member who is an active member of the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system and has been an active
member for at least five years. This member shall be appointed by the
governor, subject to confirmation by the senate, from a list of
nominations submitted by organizations representing active members of
the system. The initial term of appointment shall be two years.
(3) One member who is an active member of the teachers' retirement
system and has been an active member for at least five years. This
member shall be appointed by the superintendent of public instruction
subject to confirmation by the senate. The initial term of appointment
shall be three years.
(4) The state treasurer or the assistant state treasurer if
designated by the state treasurer.
(5) ((A member of the state house of representatives. This member
shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.
(6) A member of the state senate. This member shall be appointed
by the president of the senate.)) Two members of the house of
representatives, with one being a member of the majority party
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and the other
being a member of the minority party appointed by the minority leader
of the house of representatives.
(6) Two members of the senate, with one being a member of the
majority party appointed by the president of the senate, and the other
being a member of the minority party appointed by the minority leader
of the senate.
(7) One member who is a retired member of a state retirement system
shall be appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the
senate. The initial term of appointment shall be three years.
(8) The director of the department of labor and industries.
(9) The director of the department of retirement systems.
(10) One member who is an active member of the school employees'
retirement system and has at least five years of service credit. This
member shall be appointed by the superintendent of public instruction
subject to confirmation by the senate. The initial term of appointment
shall be three years.
(11) Five nonvoting members appointed by the state investment board
who are considered experienced and qualified in the field of
investments.
The legislative members shall serve terms of two years. The
initial legislative members appointed to the board shall be appointed
no sooner than January 10, 1983. The position of a legislative member
on the board shall become vacant at the end of that member's term on
the board or whenever the member ceases to be a member of the senate or
house of representatives from which the member was appointed.
After the initial term of appointment, all other members of the
state investment board, except ex officio members, shall serve terms of
three years and shall hold office until successors are appointed.
Members' terms, except for ex officio members, shall commence on
January 1 of the year in which the appointments are made.
Members may be reappointed for additional terms. Appointments for
vacancies shall be made for the unexpired terms in the same manner as
the original appointments. Any member may be removed from the board
for cause by the member's respective appointing authority or by a vote
of sixty percent of the members of the audit and accountability
committee recommending removal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.33A RCW
to read as follows:
The state investment board is prohibited from any direct or
indirect equity or debt participation or holding in any investment
services provider, securities dealer or brokerage firm, or any type of
domestic or foreign investment partnership, that invests pension funds
on behalf of the state investment board or receives fees for services
rendered to the board.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.33A.025 and 2000 c 188 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of RCW 43.43.700 through
43.43.815, the state investment board shall require a criminal history
record check for conviction records through the Washington state patrol
criminal identification system, and through the federal bureau of
investigation, as well as a check for records of disciplinary actions
or investigations by the federal securities and exchange commission,
for the purpose of conducting preemployment evaluations of each
finalist candidate for a board staff position exempt from the
provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW, or for any other position in which the
employee will have authority for or access to: (a) Funds under the
jurisdiction or responsibility of the investment board; or (b) data or
security systems of the investment board or designs for such systems.
The record check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete
Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card, which shall
be forwarded by the state patrol to the federal bureau of
investigation.
(2) Information received by the investment board pursuant to this
section shall be made available by the investment board only to board
employees involved in the selection, hiring, background investigation,
or job assignment of the person who is the subject of the record check,
or to that subject person, and it shall be used only for the purposes
of making, supporting, or defending decisions regarding the appointment
or hiring of persons for these positions, or securing any necessary
bonds or other requirements for such employment. Otherwise, the
reports, and information contained therein, shall remain confidential
and shall not be subject to the disclosure requirements of chapter
42.17 RCW.
(3) Fees charged by the Washington state patrol, ((or)) the federal
bureau of investigation, the securities and exchange commission, or any
other law enforcement entity for conducting these investigations and
providing these reports shall be paid by the investment board.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.33A.035 and 1997 c 161 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board or its executive director, at the direction of the board,
may delegate by contract to private sector or other external advisors
or managers the discretionary authority, as fiduciaries, to purchase or
otherwise acquire, sell, or otherwise dispose of or manage investments
or investment properties on behalf of the board, subject to investment
or management criteria established by the board ((or its executive
director)). Such criteria relevant to particular investments or class
of investment applicable under the board's contract with an advisor or
manager must be ((incorporated by reference into)) explicitly stated in
the contract.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.33A.060 and 1981 c 3 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No member during the term of appointment may be employed by any
investment brokerage or mortgage servicing firm doing business with the
state investment board. A trust department of a commercial bank or
trust company organized under federal or state law is not considered a
mortgage servicing firm for purposes of this section.
(2) The board is prohibited from conducting business with any
former board member or former board employee for a period of two years
following the cessation of membership or employment with the board.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.33A.070 and 1981 c 3 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
No member of the state investment board is liable for the
negligence, default, or failure of any ((other person or)) other member
of the board to perform the duties of the member's office and no member
of the board shall be considered or held to be an insurer of the funds
or assets of any of the trust and retirement funds nor is any nonvoting
member liable for actions performed with the exercise of reasonable
diligence within the scope of the member's authorized activities as a
member of the board. A member of the state investment board is subject
to civil liability only if he or she knowingly engages in malfeasance.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.33A.090 and 1981 c 3 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state investment board shall keep a full and complete public
record of its proceedings in appropriate books of record and shall
electronically record all of its proceedings. The willful alteration
or destruction of any of the public records required under this section
constitutes a class B felony, if the alteration or destruction is done
with the intent to hinder or obstruct actual or potential legal
proceedings or legislative inquiry. Within sixty days of July 1, 1981,
the state investment board shall assume physical custody of all
investment accounts, files, and other records of each fund placed under
the investment authority of the board.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.33A.100 and 2001 c 302 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state investment board shall maintain appropriate offices and
employ such personnel as may be necessary to perform its duties.
Employment by the investment board shall include but not be limited to
an executive director, investment officers, and a confidential
secretary, which positions are exempt from classified service under
chapter 41.06 RCW. Employment of the executive director by the board
shall be for a term of three years, and such employment shall be
subject to confirmation by the senate pursuant to the recommendation of
the state finance committee: PROVIDED, That nothing shall prevent the
board from dismissing the director for cause before the expiration of
the term nor shall anything prohibit the board, with the confirmation
of the state finance committee, from employing the same individual as
director in succeeding terms. Compensation levels for the executive
director, a confidential secretary, and all investment officers,
including the deputy director for investment management, employed by
the investment board shall be established by the state investment
board. The investment board is authorized to maintain a retention
pool, from the earnings of the funds managed by the board, in order to
address recruitment and retention problems. The compensation levels
for investment officers shall be limited to the average of state funds
of similar size, based upon a biennial survey conducted by the
investment board, with review and comment by the joint legislative
audit and review committee. However, in any fiscal year the salary
increases granted by the investment board from the retention pool to
investment officers pursuant to this section may not exceed an average
of five percent.
The investment board shall provide notice to the director of the
department of personnel, the director of financial management, and the
chairs of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees of
proposed changes to the compensation levels for the positions. The
notice shall be provided not less than sixty days prior to the
effective date of the proposed changes.
As of July 1, 1981, all employees classified under chapter 41.06
RCW and engaged in duties assumed by the state investment board on July
1, 1981, are assigned to the state investment board. The transfer
shall not diminish any rights granted these employees under chapter
41.06 RCW nor exempt the employees from any action which may occur
thereafter in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW.
All existing contracts and obligations pertaining to the functions
transferred to the state investment board in this 1980 act shall remain
in full force and effect, and shall be performed by the board. None of
the transfers directed by this 1980 act shall affect the validity of
any act performed by a state entity or by any official or employee
thereof prior to July 1, 1981.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.33A.120 and 1981 c 3 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All accounts, files, and other records of the state investment
board which pertain to each retirement system are subject at any time
or from time to time to such reasonable periodic, special, or other
examinations by the department of retirement systems as the director of
the department of retirement systems deems necessary or appropriate.
(2) All accounts, files, and other records of the state investment
board are subject at any time to examination by the state auditor, who
shall be allowed free access to these records in order to conduct
examinations.
(3) Beginning in 2004, and every six years thereafter, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a performance
review of the board's business operations and comparative financial
performance, subject to the oversight of the board's audit and
accountability committee. Reimbursement for the performance review
shall be made from the board to the joint legislative audit and review
committee. The joint legislative audit and review committee shall
report the findings of each performance review to the appropriate
legislative committees, the ranking members of each party in the senate
and the house of representatives, the state auditor, and the governor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The joint legislative audit and review
committee, in conjunction with the state auditor, shall conduct a net
asset value audit of the state investment board private equity
portfolio and provide a written report on the findings of the audit to
the appropriate legislative committees and the governor by September
30, 2004. This audit shall be funded by the state investment board.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.33A.140 and 1998 c 14 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state investment board shall invest and manage the assets
entrusted to it with reasonable care, skill, prudence, and diligence
under circumstances then prevailing which a prudent person acting in a
like capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct
of an activity of like character and purpose.
The board shall:
(1) Consider investments not in isolation, but in the context of
the investment of the particular fund as a whole and as part of an
overall investment strategy, which should incorporate risk and return
objectives reasonably suited for that fund; ((and))
(2) Diversify the investments of the particular fund unless,
because of special circumstances that are formally noted in the board's
records, the board reasonably determines that the purposes of that fund
are better served without diversifying. However, no corporate fixed-income issue or common stock holding may exceed three percent of the
cost or six percent of the market value of the assets of that fund; and
(3) Not allow investments in private equity funds to exceed ten
percent of the investment portfolio managed by the board.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.33A.150 and 1989 c 179 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state investment board shall prepare written reports at
least quarterly summarizing both the investment activities of the
((state investment)) board and the fees paid to the vendors of services
provided to the board, which reports shall be sent to the governor, the
senate ways and means committee, the house appropriations committee,
the department of retirement systems, and other agencies having a
direct financial interest in the investment of funds by the board, and
to other persons on written request. The state investment board shall
provide information to the department of retirement systems necessary
for the preparation of monthly reports.
(2) At least annually, the board shall report on the board's
investment activities and on the fees paid to the vendors of services
provided to the board for the department of labor and industries'
accident, medical aid, and reserve funds to the senate financial
institutions and insurance committee, the senate economic development
and labor committee, and the house commerce and labor committee, or
appropriate successor committees.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.33A.160 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 32 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state investment board shall be funded from the earnings of
the funds managed by the state investment board, proportional to the
value of the assets of each fund, subject to legislative appropriation.
(2) There is established in the state treasury a state investment
board expense account from which shall be paid the operating expenses
of the state investment board. Prior to November 1 of each even-numbered year, the state investment board shall determine and certify
to the state treasurer and the office of financial management the
accounting book value and the market cash value of the various funds
managed by the investment board in order to determine the proportional
liability of the funds for the operating expenses of the state
investment board. Pursuant to appropriation, the state treasurer is
authorized to transfer such moneys from the various funds managed by
the investment board to the state investment board expense account as
are necessary to pay the operating expenses of the investment board.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.33A.180 and 1992 c 232 s 905 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state investment board shall account for and report on the
investments authorized by this chapter in the manner prescribed by the
state treasurer in coordination with the office of financial management
((under chapter 43.88 RCW)).
After approval of the director of financial management, all
positions, reports, documents, and office equipment along with any
appropriation necessary for carrying out the functions and duties
transferred shall, on July 1, 1992, be transferred from the state
treasurer's office to the state investment board. All employees
assigned to such classified positions to be transferred, are assigned,
without any loss of rights, to the state investment board.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.33A.200 and 1997 c 359 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board is authorized to create corporations under Title 23B
RCW, limited liability companies under chapter 25.15 RCW, and limited
partnerships under chapter 25.10 RCW((, of which it may or may not be
the general partner,)) for the purposes of transferring, acquiring,
holding, overseeing, operating, or disposing of real estate or other
investment assets that are not publicly traded on a daily basis or on
an organized exchange. The liability of each entity created by the
board is limited to the assets or properties of that entity. No
creditor or other person, other than the state of Washington, has any
right of action against ((the board,)) an entity created by the board
under this section or its members or employees((, or the state of
Washington)) on account of any debts, obligations, or liabilities of
the entity. Entities created under this section may be authorized by
the board to make any investment that the board may make, including but
not limited to the acquisition of: Equity interests in operating
companies, the indebtedness of operating companies, and real estate.
(2) Directors, officers, and other principals of entities created
under this section must be board members((, board staff,)) or
principals or direct employees of an advisor or manager that may be
engaged by contract by the board ((or the entity to manage real estate
or other investment assets of the entity)). Directors of entities
created under this section must be appointed by a two-thirds majority
vote of the board. Officers and other ((principals)) employees of
entities created under this section ((are)) shall be appointed by the
directors of the state entity.
(3) A public corporation, limited liability company, or limited
partnership created under this section has the same immunity or
exemption from taxation as that of the state. The entity shall pay an
amount equal to the amounts that would be paid for taxes otherwise
levied upon real property and personal property to the public official
charged with the collection of such real property and personal property
taxes as if the property were in private ownership. The proceeds of
such payments must be allocated as though the property were in private
ownership.

Sec. 18 RCW 42.17.310 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 926, 2003 c 277
s 3, and 2003 c 124 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The following are exempt from public inspection and copying:
(a) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients.
(b) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy.
(c) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would (i) be prohibited to such persons by
RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340 or (ii) violate the
taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer.
(d) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy.
(e) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the public disclosure
commission, if disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical
safety, or property. If at the time a complaint is filed the
complainant, victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or
nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed
with the public disclosure commission about any elected official or
candidate for public office must be made in writing and signed by the
complainant under oath.
(f) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination.
(g) Except as provided by chapter 8.26 RCW, the contents of real
estate appraisals, made for or by any agency relative to the
acquisition or sale of property, until the project or prospective sale
is abandoned or until such time as all of the property has been
acquired or the property to which the sale appraisal relates is sold,
but in no event shall disclosure be denied for more than three years
after the appraisal.
(h) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss.
(i) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, and intra-agency
memorandums in which opinions are expressed or policies formulated or
recommended except that a specific record shall not be exempt when
publicly cited by an agency in connection with any agency action.
(j) Records which are relevant to a controversy to which an agency
is a party but which records would not be available to another party
under the rules of pretrial discovery for causes pending in the
superior courts.
(k) Records, maps, or other information identifying the location of
archaeological sites in order to avoid the looting or depredation of
such sites.
(l) Any library record, the primary purpose of which is to maintain
control of library materials, or to gain access to information, which
discloses or could be used to disclose the identity of a library user.
(m) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (i) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (ii) highway
construction or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070.
(n) Railroad company contracts filed prior to July 28, 1991, with
the utilities and transportation commission under RCW 81.34.070, except
that the summaries of the contracts are open to public inspection and
copying as otherwise provided by this chapter.
(o) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided pursuant to
chapter 43.163 RCW and chapter 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to
export projects pursuant to RCW 43.23.035.
(p) Financial disclosures filed by private vocational schools under
chapters 28B.85 and 28C.10 RCW.
(q) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095.
(r) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW,
or during application for economic development loans or program
services provided by any local agency.
(s) Membership lists or lists of members or owners of interests of
units in timeshare projects, subdivisions, camping resorts,
condominiums, land developments, or common-interest communities
affiliated with such projects, regulated by the department of
licensing, in the files or possession of the department.
(t) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant.
(u) The residential addresses or residential telephone numbers of
employees or volunteers of a public agency which are held by any public
agency in personnel records, public employment related records, or
volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees or
volunteers of any public agency.
(v) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order.
(w)(i) The federal social security number of individuals governed
under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files of the department of
health, except this exemption does not apply to requests made directly
to the department from federal, state, and local agencies of
government, and national and state licensing, credentialing,
investigatory, disciplinary, and examination organizations; (ii) the
current residential address and current residential telephone number of
a health care provider governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in
the files of the department, if the provider requests that this
information be withheld from public inspection and copying, and
provides to the department an accurate alternate or business address
and business telephone number. On or after January 1, 1995, the
current residential address and residential telephone number of a
health care provider governed under RCW 18.130.040 maintained in the
files of the department shall automatically be withheld from public
inspection and copying unless the provider specifically requests the
information be released, and except as provided for under RCW
42.17.260(9).
(x) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090.
(y) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420.
(z) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW.
(aa) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person for two years after the date the
information was supplied when the information relates to the investment
of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure would result in
a material loss to such funds ((or in private loss to the providers of
this information)).
(bb) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120.
(cc) Client records maintained by an agency that is a domestic
violence program as defined in RCW 70.123.020 or 70.123.075 or a rape
crisis center as defined in RCW 70.125.030.
(dd) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (i) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (ii) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed.
(ee) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting a current investigation of a possible unfair practice under
chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other federal, state,
or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment.
(ff) Business related information protected from public inspection
and copying under RCW 15.86.110.
(gg) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW.
(hh) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee pursuant to
RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250, regardless of which agency is in possession of the
information and documents.
(ii) Personal information in files maintained in a data base
created under RCW 43.07.360.
(jj) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010.
(kk) Names of individuals residing in emergency or transitional
housing that are furnished to the department of revenue or a county
assessor in order to substantiate a claim for property tax exemption
under RCW 84.36.043.
(ll) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service. However, these records may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides.
(mm) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons.
(nn) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes and other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose this information to a person, employer,
educational institution, or other entity that is responsible, in whole
or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when reporting
on public transportation or public safety. This information may also
be disclosed at the agency's discretion to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety.
(oo) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310. If a request for
such information is received, the submitting entity must be notified of
the request. Within ten business days of receipt of the notice, the
submitting entity shall provide a written statement of the continuing
need for confidentiality, which shall be provided to the requester.
Upon receipt of such notice, the department of health shall continue to
treat information designated under this section as exempt from
disclosure. If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality.
(pp) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance
appeals that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation
claims filed with the board under RCW 7.68.110.
(qq) Financial and commercial information supplied by or on behalf
of a person, firm, corporation, or entity under chapter 28B.95 RCW
relating to the purchase or sale of tuition units and contracts for the
purchase of multiple tuition units.
(rr) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b).
(ss) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law.
(tt) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license.
(uu) Records maintained by the employment security department and
subject to chapter 50.13 RCW if provided to another individual or
organization for operational, research, or evaluation purposes.
(vv) Individually identifiable information received by the work
force training and education coordinating board for research or
evaluation purposes.
(ww) Those portions of records assembled, prepared, or maintained
to prevent, mitigate, or respond to criminal terrorist acts, which are
acts that significantly disrupt the conduct of government or of the
general civilian population of the state or the United States and that
manifest an extreme indifference to human life, the public disclosure
of which would have a substantial likelihood of threatening public
safety, consisting of:
(i) Specific and unique vulnerability assessments or specific and
unique response or deployment plans, including compiled underlying data
collected in preparation of or essential to the assessments, or to the
response or deployment plans; and
(ii) Records not subject to public disclosure under federal law
that are shared by federal or international agencies, and information
prepared from national security briefings provided to state or local
government officials related to domestic preparedness for acts of
terrorism.
(xx) Commercial fishing catch data from logbooks required to be
provided to the department of fish and wildlife under RCW 77.12.047,
when the data identifies specific catch location, timing, or
methodology and the release of which would result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the commercial fisher providing the catch data.
However, this information may be released to government agencies
concerned with the management of fish and wildlife resources.
(yy) Sensitive wildlife data obtained by the department of fish and
wildlife. However, sensitive wildlife data may be released to
government agencies concerned with the management of fish and wildlife
resources. Sensitive wildlife data includes:
(i) The nesting sites or specific locations of endangered species
designated under RCW 77.12.020, or threatened or sensitive species
classified by rule of the department of fish and wildlife;
(ii) Radio frequencies used in, or locational data generated by,
telemetry studies; or
(iii) Other location data that could compromise the viability of a
specific fish or wildlife population, and where at least one of the
following criteria are met:
(A) The species has a known commercial or black market value;
(B) There is a history of malicious take of that species; or
(C) There is a known demand to visit, take, or disturb, and the
species behavior or ecology renders it especially vulnerable or the
species has an extremely limited distribution and concentration.
(zz) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
recreational licenses under RCW 77.32.010 or commercial licenses under
chapter 77.65 or 77.70 RCW, except name, address of contact used by the
department, and type of license, endorsement, or tag. However, the
department of fish and wildlife may disclose personally identifying
information to:
(i) Government agencies concerned with the management of fish and
wildlife resources;
(ii) The department of social and health services, child support
division, and to the department of licensing in order to implement RCW
77.32.014 and 46.20.291; and
(iii) Law enforcement agencies for the purpose of firearm
possession enforcement under RCW 9.41.040.
(aaa)(i) Discharge papers of a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States filed at the office of the county auditor before July 1,
2002, that have not been commingled with other recorded documents.
These records will be available only to the veteran, the veteran's next
of kin, a deceased veteran's properly appointed personal representative
or executor, a person holding that veteran's general power of attorney,
or to anyone else designated in writing by that veteran to receive the
records.
(ii) Discharge papers of a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States filed at the office of the county auditor before July 1,
2002, that have been commingled with other records, if the veteran has
recorded a "request for exemption from public disclosure of discharge
papers" with the county auditor. If such a request has been recorded,
these records may be released only to the veteran filing the papers,
the veteran's next of kin, a deceased veteran's properly appointed
personal representative or executor, a person holding the veteran's
general power of attorney, or anyone else designated in writing by the
veteran to receive the records.
(iii) Discharge papers of a veteran filed at the office of the
county auditor after June 30, 2002, are not public records, but will be
available only to the veteran, the veteran's next of kin, a deceased
veteran's properly appointed personal representative or executor, a
person holding the veteran's general power of attorney, or anyone else
designated in writing by the veteran to receive the records.
(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(aaa), next of kin of
deceased veterans have the same rights to full access to the record.
Next of kin are the veteran's widow or widower who has not remarried,
son, daughter, father, mother, brother, and sister.
(bbb) Those portions of records containing specific and unique
vulnerability assessments or specific and unique emergency and escape
response plans at a city, county, or state adult or juvenile
correctional facility, the public disclosure of which would have a
substantial likelihood of threatening the security of a city, county,
or state adult or juvenile correctional facility or any individual's
safety.
(ccc) Information compiled by school districts or schools in the
development of their comprehensive safe school plans pursuant to RCW
28A.320.125, to the extent that they identify specific vulnerabilities
of school districts and each individual school.
(ddd) Information regarding the infrastructure and security of
computer and telecommunications networks, consisting of security
passwords, security access codes and programs, access codes for secure
software applications, security and service recovery plans, security
risk assessments, and security test results to the extent that they
identify specific system vulnerabilities.
(eee) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW.
(fff) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (i) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (ii)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (iii)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011.
(ggg) Proprietary information deemed confidential for the purposes
of section 923, chapter 26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.
(2) Except for information described in subsection (1)(c)(i) of
this section and confidential income data exempted from public
inspection pursuant to RCW 84.40.020, the exemptions of this section
are inapplicable to the extent that information, the disclosure of
which would violate personal privacy or vital governmental interests,
can be deleted from the specific records sought. No exemption may be
construed to permit the nondisclosure of statistical information not
descriptive of any readily identifiable person or persons.
(3) Inspection or copying of any specific records exempt under the
provisions of this section may be permitted if the superior court in
the county in which the record is maintained finds, after a hearing
with notice thereof to every person in interest and the agency, that
the exemption of such records is clearly unnecessary to protect any
individual's right of privacy or any vital governmental function.
(4) Agency responses refusing, in whole or in part, inspection of
any public record shall include a statement of the specific exemption
authorizing the withholding of the record (or part) and a brief
explanation of how the exemption applies to the record withheld.

Sec. 19 RCW 42.17.310 and 2003 c 277 s 3 and 2003 c 124 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The following are exempt from public inspection and copying:
(a) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients.
(b) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy.
(c) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would (i) be prohibited to such persons by
RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340 or (ii) violate the
taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer.
(d) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy.
(e) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the public disclosure
commission, if disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical
safety, or property. If at the time a complaint is filed the
complainant, victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or
nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed
with the public disclosure commission about any elected official or
candidate for public office must be made in writing and signed by the
complainant under oath.
(f) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination.
(g) Except as provided by chapter 8.26 RCW, the contents of real
estate appraisals, made for or by any agency relative to the
acquisition or sale of property, until the project or prospective sale
is abandoned or until such time as all of the property has been
acquired or the property to which the sale appraisal relates is sold,
but in no event shall disclosure be denied for more than three years
after the appraisal.
(h) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss.
(i) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, and intra-agency
memorandums in which opinions are expressed or policies formulated or
recommended except that a specific record shall not be exempt when
publicly cited by an agency in connection with any agency action.
(j) Records which are relevant to a controversy to which an agency
is a party but which records would not be available to another party
under the rules of pretrial discovery for causes pending in the
superior courts.
(k) Records, maps, or other information identifying the location of
archaeological sites in order to avoid the looting or depredation of
such sites.
(l) Any library record, the primary purpose of which is to maintain
control of library materials, or to gain access to information, which
discloses or could be used to disclose the identity of a library user.
(m) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (i) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (ii) highway
construction or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070.
(n) Railroad company contracts filed prior to July 28, 1991, with
the utilities and transportation commission under RCW 81.34.070, except
that the summaries of the contracts are open to public inspection and
copying as otherwise provided by this chapter.
(o) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided pursuant to
chapter 43.163 RCW and chapter 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to
export projects pursuant to RCW 43.23.035.
(p) Financial disclosures filed by private vocational schools under
chapters 28B.85 and 28C.10 RCW.
(q) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095.
(r) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW,
or during application for economic development loans or program
services provided by any local agency.
(s) Membership lists or lists of members or owners of interests of
units in timeshare projects, subdivisions, camping resorts,
condominiums, land developments, or common-interest communities
affiliated with such projects, regulated by the department of
licensing, in the files or possession of the department.
(t) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant.
(u) The residential addresses or residential telephone numbers of
employees or volunteers of a public agency which are held by any public
agency in personnel records, public employment related records, or
volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees or
volunteers of any public agency.
(v) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order.
(w)(i) The federal social security number of individuals governed
under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files of the department of
health, except this exemption does not apply to requests made directly
to the department from federal, state, and local agencies of
government, and national and state licensing, credentialing,
investigatory, disciplinary, and examination organizations; (ii) the
current residential address and current residential telephone number of
a health care provider governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in
the files of the department, if the provider requests that this
information be withheld from public inspection and copying, and
provides to the department an accurate alternate or business address
and business telephone number. On or after January 1, 1995, the
current residential address and residential telephone number of a
health care provider governed under RCW 18.130.040 maintained in the
files of the department shall automatically be withheld from public
inspection and copying unless the provider specifically requests the
information be released, and except as provided for under RCW
42.17.260(9).
(x) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090.
(y) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420.
(z) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW.
(aa) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person for two years after the date the
information was supplied when the information relates to the investment
of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure would result in
a material loss to such funds ((or in private loss to the providers of
this information)).
(bb) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120.
(cc) Client records maintained by an agency that is a domestic
violence program as defined in RCW 70.123.020 or 70.123.075 or a rape
crisis center as defined in RCW 70.125.030.
(dd) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (i) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (ii) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed.
(ee) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting a current investigation of a possible unfair practice under
chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other federal, state,
or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment.
(ff) Business related information protected from public inspection
and copying under RCW 15.86.110.
(gg) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW.
(hh) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee pursuant to
RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250, regardless of which agency is in possession of the
information and documents.
(ii) Personal information in files maintained in a data base
created under RCW 43.07.360.
(jj) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010.
(kk) Names of individuals residing in emergency or transitional
housing that are furnished to the department of revenue or a county
assessor in order to substantiate a claim for property tax exemption
under RCW 84.36.043.
(ll) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service. However, these records may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides.
(mm) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons.
(nn) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes and other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose this information to a person, employer,
educational institution, or other entity that is responsible, in whole
or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when reporting
on public transportation or public safety. This information may also
be disclosed at the agency's discretion to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety.
(oo) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310. If a request for
such information is received, the submitting entity must be notified of
the request. Within ten business days of receipt of the notice, the
submitting entity shall provide a written statement of the continuing
need for confidentiality, which shall be provided to the requester.
Upon receipt of such notice, the department of health shall continue to
treat information designated under this section as exempt from
disclosure. If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality.
(pp) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance
appeals that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation
claims filed with the board under RCW 7.68.110.
(qq) Financial and commercial information supplied by or on behalf
of a person, firm, corporation, or entity under chapter 28B.95 RCW
relating to the purchase or sale of tuition units and contracts for the
purchase of multiple tuition units.
(rr) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b).
(ss) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law.
(tt) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license.
(uu) Records maintained by the employment security department and
subject to chapter 50.13 RCW if provided to another individual or
organization for operational, research, or evaluation purposes.
(vv) Individually identifiable information received by the work
force training and education coordinating board for research or
evaluation purposes.
(ww) Those portions of records assembled, prepared, or maintained
to prevent, mitigate, or respond to criminal terrorist acts, which are
acts that significantly disrupt the conduct of government or of the
general civilian population of the state or the United States and that
manifest an extreme indifference to human life, the public disclosure
of which would have a substantial likelihood of threatening public
safety, consisting of:
(i) Specific and unique vulnerability assessments or specific and
unique response or deployment plans, including compiled underlying data
collected in preparation of or essential to the assessments, or to the
response or deployment plans; and
(ii) Records not subject to public disclosure under federal law
that are shared by federal or international agencies, and information
prepared from national security briefings provided to state or local
government officials related to domestic preparedness for acts of
terrorism.
(xx) Commercial fishing catch data from logbooks required to be
provided to the department of fish and wildlife under RCW 77.12.047,
when the data identifies specific catch location, timing, or
methodology and the release of which would result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the commercial fisher providing the catch data.
However, this information may be released to government agencies
concerned with the management of fish and wildlife resources.
(yy) Sensitive wildlife data obtained by the department of fish and
wildlife. However, sensitive wildlife data may be released to
government agencies concerned with the management of fish and wildlife
resources. Sensitive wildlife data includes:
(i) The nesting sites or specific locations of endangered species
designated under RCW 77.12.020, or threatened or sensitive species
classified by rule of the department of fish and wildlife;
(ii) Radio frequencies used in, or locational data generated by,
telemetry studies; or
(iii) Other location data that could compromise the viability of a
specific fish or wildlife population, and where at least one of the
following criteria are met:
(A) The species has a known commercial or black market value;
(B) There is a history of malicious take of that species; or
(C) There is a known demand to visit, take, or disturb, and the
species behavior or ecology renders it especially vulnerable or the
species has an extremely limited distribution and concentration.
(zz) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
recreational licenses under RCW 77.32.010 or commercial licenses under
chapter 77.65 or 77.70 RCW, except name, address of contact used by the
department, and type of license, endorsement, or tag. However, the
department of fish and wildlife may disclose personally identifying
information to:
(i) Government agencies concerned with the management of fish and
wildlife resources;
(ii) The department of social and health services, child support
division, and to the department of licensing in order to implement RCW
77.32.014 and 46.20.291; and
(iii) Law enforcement agencies for the purpose of firearm
possession enforcement under RCW 9.41.040.
(aaa)(i) Discharge papers of a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States filed at the office of the county auditor before July 1,
2002, that have not been commingled with other recorded documents.
These records will be available only to the veteran, the veteran's next
of kin, a deceased veteran's properly appointed personal representative
or executor, a person holding that veteran's general power of attorney,
or to anyone else designated in writing by that veteran to receive the
records.
(ii) Discharge papers of a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States filed at the office of the county auditor before July 1,
2002, that have been commingled with other records, if the veteran has
recorded a "request for exemption from public disclosure of discharge
papers" with the county auditor. If such a request has been recorded,
these records may be released only to the veteran filing the papers,
the veteran's next of kin, a deceased veteran's properly appointed
personal representative or executor, a person holding the veteran's
general power of attorney, or anyone else designated in writing by the
veteran to receive the records.
(iii) Discharge papers of a veteran filed at the office of the
county auditor after June 30, 2002, are not public records, but will be
available only to the veteran, the veteran's next of kin, a deceased
veteran's properly appointed personal representative or executor, a
person holding the veteran's general power of attorney, or anyone else
designated in writing by the veteran to receive the records.
(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(aaa), next of kin of
deceased veterans have the same rights to full access to the record.
Next of kin are the veteran's widow or widower who has not remarried,
son, daughter, father, mother, brother, and sister.
(bbb) Those portions of records containing specific and unique
vulnerability assessments or specific and unique emergency and escape
response plans at a city, county, or state adult or juvenile
correctional facility, the public disclosure of which would have a
substantial likelihood of threatening the security of a city, county,
or state adult or juvenile correctional facility or any individual's
safety.
(ccc) Information compiled by school districts or schools in the
development of their comprehensive safe school plans pursuant to RCW
28A.320.125, to the extent that they identify specific vulnerabilities
of school districts and each individual school.
(ddd) Information regarding the infrastructure and security of
computer and telecommunications networks, consisting of security
passwords, security access codes and programs, access codes for secure
software applications, security and service recovery plans, security
risk assessments, and security test results to the extent that they
identify specific system vulnerabilities.
(eee) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW.
(fff) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (i) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (ii)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (iii)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011.
(2) Except for information described in subsection (1)(c)(i) of
this section and confidential income data exempted from public
inspection pursuant to RCW 84.40.020, the exemptions of this section
are inapplicable to the extent that information, the disclosure of
which would violate personal privacy or vital governmental interests,
can be deleted from the specific records sought. No exemption may be
construed to permit the nondisclosure of statistical information not
descriptive of any readily identifiable person or persons.
(3) Inspection or copying of any specific records exempt under the
provisions of this section may be permitted if the superior court in
the county in which the record is maintained finds, after a hearing
with notice thereof to every person in interest and the agency, that
the exemption of such records is clearly unnecessary to protect any
individual's right of privacy or any vital governmental function.
(4) Agency responses refusing, in whole or in part, inspection of
any public record shall include a statement of the specific exemption
authorizing the withholding of the record (or part) and a brief
explanation of how the exemption applies to the record withheld.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 RCW 43.33A.210 (Assets not publicly
traded--Treatment of rent and income--Management accounts--Application
of this chapter and chapter 39.58 RCW) and 1997 c 359 s 2 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Section 18 of this act expires June 30,
2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Section 19 of this act takes effect June
30, 2005.

--- END ---