BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.28.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 366 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Operating property" means all of the property utilized by a
public utility district in the operation of a plant or system for the
generation, transmission, or distribution of electric energy for sale;
(2) "Taxing districts" means counties, cities, towns, school
districts, and road districts;
(3) "Distributes to consumers" means the sale of electric energy to
ultimate consumers thereof, and does not include sales of electric
energy for resale by the purchaser;
(4) "Wholesale value" means all costs of a public utility district
associated with the generation and transmission of energy from its own
generation and transmission system to the point or points of inter-
connection with a distribution system owned and used by a district to
distribute such energy to consumers, or in the event a distribution
system owned by a district is not used to distribute such energy, then
the term means the gross revenues derived by a district from the sale
of such energy to consumers;
(5) "Thermal electric generating facility" means a steam-powered
electrical energy producing facility utilizing nuclear or fossil fuels;
(6) "Placed in operation" means delivery of energy into a
transmission or distribution system for use or sale in such a manner as
to establish a value accruing to the power plant operator, except
operation incidental to testing or startup adjustments;
(7) "Impacted area" for a thermal electric generating facility on
a federal reservation means that area in the state lying within thirty-five statute miles of the most commonly used entrance of the federal
reservation ((and which is south of the southern boundary of township
fifteen north)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act applies to tax
distributions made after June 1, 2005.

--- END ---