BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.080 and 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
A special meeting may be called at any time by the presiding
officer of the governing body of a public agency or by a majority of
the members of the governing body by delivering written notice
personally ((or)), by mail ((written notice)), by fax, or by electronic
mail to each member of the governing body; and to each local newspaper
of general circulation and to each local radio or television station
which has on file with the governing body a written request to be
notified of such special meeting or of all special meetings. Such
notice must be delivered personally ((or)), by mail, by fax, or by
electronic mail at least twenty-four hours before the time of such
meeting as specified in the notice. The call and notice shall specify
the time and place of the special meeting and the business to be
transacted. Final disposition shall not be taken on any other matter
at such meetings by the governing body. Such written notice may be
dispensed with as to any member who at or prior to the time the meeting
convenes files with the clerk or secretary of the governing body a
written waiver of notice. Such waiver may be given by telegram, by
fax, or electronic mail. Such written notice may also be dispensed
with as to any member who is actually present at the meeting at the
time it convenes. The notices provided in this section may be
dispensed with in the event a special meeting is called to deal with an
emergency involving injury or damage to persons or property or the
likelihood of such injury or damage, when time requirements of such
notice would make notice impractical and increase the likelihood of
such injury or damage.

--- END ---