BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as "the
Washington paralysis research act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The spinal cord research account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from collection of the assessment under
RCW 46.63.110(9) must be deposited in the account. The account may
receive moneys through gift, grant, or donation to the state for the
purposes of the account. Only the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account to be
used for spinal cord research grants as provided in section 3 of this
act. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Any
residue in the account shall accumulate in the account and shall not
revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium. Costs incurred
by the department in administering the account shall be paid from the
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall administer the spinal cord research account
created in section 2 of this act. Expenditures from the account may be
used only to make grants to public or private agencies, organizations,
and research institutions, located in Washington, to conduct spinal
cord research programs that focus on the cure of paralysis and other
dysfunctions caused by spinal cord injuries. The department may adopt
rules necessary for administration of the spinal cord research account
and grant program. The department shall provide to the legislature an
annual report by December 31st of each year that summarizes the status
of funds granted by the department and the results of spinal cord
research projects funded under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.63.110 and 2003 c 380 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and
fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or
title.
(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.55.105(2) is two
hundred fifty dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this
subsection (2) may be reduced.
(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of
monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall
also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise
discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions.
The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this
schedule every two years for inflation.
(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction
relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to
this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not
to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty
set by the local legislative body.
(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are
civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of
chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles
are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties
which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this
chapter it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at
that time the court may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the
period in which the penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on
or before the time established for payment the court shall notify the
department of the failure to pay the penalty, and the department shall
suspend the person's driver's license or driving privilege until the
penalty has been paid and the penalty provided in subsection (4) of
this section has been paid.
(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed
a fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances shall
this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040.
(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this
section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this
section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other
than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be assessed an additional penalty of twenty
dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend the additional
penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If a
community restitution program for offenders is available in the
jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to offset all or a part
of the penalty due under this subsection (8) by participation in the
community restitution program.
(b) Eight dollars and fifty cents of the additional penalty under
(a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The
remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under
chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited as
provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of the revenue received by the
county or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into
the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city
or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.
(9) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction that is a moving
violation shall be assessed a fee of one dollar per infraction. This
fee shall not be reduced or waived under any circumstances. Revenue
from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in
the spinal cord research account under section 2 of this act.

--- END ---