BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that qualified
and experienced attorneys who have expertise as guardians ad litem or
as judicial officers should be permitted to use their expertise to
serve the judicial system. However, if a potential conflict of
interest exists when an attorney seeks to act as a pro tempore judge or
commissioner, the attorney should not be permitted to act in a judicial
capacity. The legislature finds that it is necessary to prohibit these
situations to protect the integrity of the judicial system and the
interests of the children involved in these cases.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.08.185 and 1996 c 249 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
An attorney may not serve as a ((superior court)) judge pro tempore
or a ((superior court)) commissioner pro tempore in ((a judicial
district while appointed to or serving on a case in that judicial
district as a guardian ad litem for compensation under Title 11, 13, or
26 RCW, if that judicial district is contained within division one or
two of the court of appeals and has a population of more than one
hundred thousand)) any matter in which the attorney has ever served as
an attorney for any party or guardian ad litem for the child of any
party. An attorney is disqualified from serving as a guardian ad litem
in any matter in which the attorney has ever served as a judge pro
tempore or a court commissioner pro tempore.

--- END ---