BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW
to read as follows:
A port district may provide advisory consulting services for
compensation on matters within the scope of this title or Title 14 RCW.
A port district may provide these services only to other public
agencies and governments, including foreign governments and government-sponsored organizations. A port district providing consulting services
must create and maintain an open roster of Washington firms interested
in bidding on opportunities generated as a result.
By enacting this legislation, the legislature intends to enhance
the ability of Washington port districts to facilitate economic
opportunities for the benefit of Washington businesses. Nothing in
this section is intended to authorize direct competition by port
districts with private business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The authority to provide advisory consulting services under section
1 of this act shall be terminated on July 1, 2008, as provided in
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 1 of this act, as now existing or hereafter amended, is
repealed, effective July 1, 2009.

--- END ---