BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.20.110 and 2003 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall make or cause to be made, at least every
eighteen months with an annual average of fifteen months, an inspection
and investigation of all boarding homes. However, the department may
delay an inspection to twenty-four months if the boarding home has had
three consecutive inspections with no written notice of violations and
has received no written notice of violations resulting from complaint
investigation during that same time period. The department may at
anytime make an unannounced inspection of a licensed home to assure
that the licensee is in compliance with this chapter and the rules
adopted under this chapter. Every inspection shall focus primarily on
actual or potential resident outcomes, and may include an inspection of
every part of the premises and an examination of all records (other
than financial records), methods of administration, the general and
special dietary, and the stores and methods of supply. Financial
records of the boarding home may be examined when the department has
reasonable cause to believe that financial obligations related to
resident care or services will not be met, such as a complaint that
staff or utilities have not been paid, or when necessary for the
department to investigate alleged financial exploitation of a resident.
Following ((such an)) the department's inspection or inspections,
written notice of any violation of this law or the rules adopted
hereunder shall be given to the applicant or licensee and the
department. The department may prescribe by rule that any licensee or
applicant desiring to make specified types of alterations or additions
to its facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before
commencing such alteration, addition, or new construction, submit plans
and specifications therefor to the agencies responsible for plan
reviews for preliminary inspection and approval or recommendations with
respect to compliance with the rules and standards herein authorized.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.20.120 and 2000 c 47 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
All information received by the department through filed reports,
inspections, or as otherwise authorized under this chapter ((shall not
be disclosed publicly in any manner as to identify individuals or
boarding homes, except at the specific request of a member of the
public and disclosure is)), or used by the department in connection
with this chapter, is subject to public records disclosure consistent
with RCW 42.17.260(1).

Sec. 3 RCW 18.20.125 and 2003 c 231 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Inspections must be outcome based and responsive to resident
complaints and based on a clear set of health, quality of care, and
safety standards that are easily understandable and have been made
available to facilities, residents, and other interested parties. This
includes that when conducting licensing inspections, the department
shall interview an appropriate percentage of residents, family members,
and advocates in addition to interviewing appropriate staff. At the
conclusion of the on-site license inspection, the department shall
conduct an exit meeting at the facility to explain the department's
preliminary findings and to provide the facility and the resident
council, or other representatives of the residents, the opportunity to
provide clarifying information.
(2) Prompt and specific enforcement remedies shall also be
implemented without delay, consistent with RCW 18.20.190, for
facilities found to have delivered care or failed to deliver care
resulting in problems that are serious, recurring, or uncorrected, or
that create a hazard that is causing or likely to cause death or
serious harm to one or more residents. These enforcement remedies may
also include, when appropriate, reasonable conditions on a license. In
the selection of remedies, the safety, health, and well-being of
residents shall be of paramount importance.
(3) To the extent funding is available, the licensee,
administrator, and their staff should be screened through background
checks in a uniform and timely manner to ensure that they do not have
a criminal history that would disqualify them from working with
vulnerable adults. Employees may be provisionally hired pending the
results of the background check if they have been given three positive
references.
(4) No licensee, administrator, or staff, or prospective licensee,
administrator, or staff, with a stipulated finding of fact, conclusion
of law, and agreed order, or finding of fact, conclusion of law, or
final order issued by a disciplining authority, a court of law, or
entered into the state registry finding him or her guilty of abuse,
neglect, exploitation, or abandonment of a minor or a vulnerable adult
as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW shall be employed in the care of and
have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.20.195 and 2001 c 193 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The licensee or its designee has the right to an informal
dispute resolution process to dispute any violation found or
enforcement remedy imposed by the department during a licensing
inspection or complaint investigation. The purpose of the informal
dispute resolution process is to provide an opportunity for an exchange
of information that may lead to the modification, deletion, or removal
of a violation, or parts of a violation, or enforcement remedy imposed
by the department. If the dispute concerns a complaint investigation,
the complainant shall be given the opportunity to provide the
department with clarifying information before the department reaches a
decision. If the dispute concerns a licensing inspection, the resident
council or other representatives of the residents shall be given the
opportunity to provide the department with clarifying information
before the department reaches a decision.
(2) The informal dispute resolution process provided by the
department shall include, but is not necessarily limited to, an
opportunity for review by a department employee who did not participate
in, or oversee, the determination of the violation or enforcement
remedy under dispute. The department shall develop, or further
develop, an informal dispute resolution process consistent with this
section.
(3) A request for an informal dispute resolution shall be made to
the department within ten working days from the receipt of a written
finding of a violation or enforcement remedy. The request shall
identify the violation or violations and enforcement remedy or remedies
being disputed. The department shall convene a meeting, when possible,
within ten working days of receipt of the request for informal dispute
resolution, unless by mutual agreement a later date is agreed upon.
(4) If the department determines that a violation or enforcement
remedy should not be cited or imposed, the department shall delete the
violation or immediately rescind or modify the enforcement remedy. If
the department determines that a violation should have been cited or an
enforcement remedy imposed, the department shall add the citation and
enforcement remedy. Upon request, the department shall issue a clean
copy of the revised report, statement of deficiencies, or notice of
enforcement action.
(5) The request for informal dispute resolution does not delay the
effective date of any enforcement remedy imposed by the department,
except that civil monetary fines are not payable until the exhaustion
of any formal hearing and appeal rights provided under this chapter.
The licensee shall submit to the department, within the time period
prescribed by the department, a plan of correction to address any
undisputed violations, and including any violations that still remain
following the informal dispute resolution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---