BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.030 only, a retail
sale consisting solely of the sale of a motor vehicle, as defined in
RCW 46.04.320, shall be deemed to have occurred at the address of the
person who is to be the registered owner of the vehicle under RCW
46.12.030.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.020 and 2003 c 168 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property shall be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet
at or from which delivery is made to the consumer, except as provided
in section 1 of this act;
(2) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place at which such services were primarily performed,
except that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in
RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;
(3) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property shall be deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the place of primary use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (b) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;
(4) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
shall be deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and
services involved were primarily performed;
(5)(a) A retail sale consisting of the providing to a consumer of
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of
tangible personal property under subsection (1) of this section or a
rental of tangible personal property under subsection (3) of this
section or a sale of mobile telecommunications services, shall be
deemed to have occurred at the situs of the telephone or other
instrument through which the telephone service is rendered;
(b) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520;
(6) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202;
(7) "City" means a city or town;
(8) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04,
82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, insofar as
applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under authority of this chapter;
(9) "Taxable event" shall mean any retail sale, or any use, upon
which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW, as
they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant to RCW
82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;
(10) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the treasurer
or legal depository of a county or city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2005.

--- END ---