BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.91.025 and 1994 c 45 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful bus conduct if while on or in a
municipal transit vehicle as defined by RCW 46.04.355 or in or at a
municipal transit station and with knowledge that ((such)) the conduct
is prohibited, he or she:
(a) Except while in or at a municipal transit station, smokes or
carries a lighted or smoldering pipe, cigar, or cigarette;
(b) Discards litter other than in designated receptacles;
(c) Plays any radio, recorder, or other sound-producing equipment
except that nothing herein ((shall)) prohibits the use of ((such)) the
equipment when connected to earphones that limit the sound to
individual listeners or the use of a communication device by an
employee of the owner or operator of the municipal transit vehicle or
municipal transit station;
(d) Spits or expectorates;
(e) Carries any flammable liquid, explosive, acid, or other article
or material likely to cause harm to others except that nothing herein
((shall)) prevents a person from carrying a cigarette, cigar, or pipe
lighter or carrying a firearm or ammunition in a way that is not
otherwise prohibited by law;
(f) Intentionally obstructs or impedes the flow of municipal
transit vehicles or passenger traffic, hinders or prevents access to
municipal transit vehicles or stations, or otherwise unlawfully
interferes with the provision or use of public transportation services;
(g) Intentionally disturbs others by engaging in loud, raucous,
unruly, harmful, or harassing behavior; or
(h) Destroys, defaces, or otherwise damages property of a
municipality as defined in RCW 35.58.272 or a regional transit
authority authorized by chapter 81.112 RCW employed in the provision or
use of public transportation services.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "municipal transit station"
means all facilities, structures, lands, interest in lands, air rights
over lands, and rights of way of all kinds that are owned, leased,
held, or used by a municipality as defined in RCW 35.58.272, or a
regional transit authority authorized by chapter 81.112 RCW for the
purpose of providing public transportation services, including, but not
limited to, park and ride lots, transit centers and tunnels, and bus
shelters.
(3) Unlawful bus conduct is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.04.355 and 1984 c 167 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Municipal transit vehicle includes every motor vehicle, street car,
train, trolley vehicle, and any other device, which (1) is capable of
being moved within, upon, above, or below a public highway, (2) is
owned or operated by a city, county, county transportation authority,
public transportation benefit area, regional transit authority, or
metropolitan municipal corporation within the state, and (3) is used
for the purpose of carrying passengers together with incidental baggage
and freight on a regular schedule.

--- END ---