BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that public peace and safety are an essential
element of the service provided to the traveling public that ride the
Washington State Ferries. To that end, the Washington state department
of transportation shall adopt administrative rules or policies to
implement the following:
(1) The purchase of a ticket for passage by the public for
transport on any established route maintained by the Washington State
Ferries entitles the ticket holder to the use of a single seat during
vessel passage. Once a vessel is under way, use of one or more
unclaimed seats is permitted by a ticket holder under the following
conditions:
(a) No such seat is reserved or blocked from use before departure;
and
(b) No other ticket holder who lacks a seat may be denied or
prevented from using additional seats being used by a single ticket
holder;
(2) A process for crew members to assist ticket holders who are
seeking a vacant seat and are unable to find one; and
(3) A process for ticket holders to file a complaint and receive
assistance from the crew when unable to obtain a seat from another
ticket holder who is occupying more than one seat.
Washington State Ferries may deny passage to a ticket holder who
ignores or abuses the seating conditions outlined in this section. To
ensure public notice and understanding of the one ticket/one seat
policy, Washington State Ferries shall include the limitation as a
notice on the ticket and on signs posted in each terminal and vessel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---