BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.320 RCW
to read as follows:
As a part of or in connection with an application for any license
from the department, the applicant shall furnish information concerning
his or her identity, including fingerprints for submission to the
Washington state patrol, the federal bureau of investigation, and any
governmental agency or entity authorized to receive this information
for a state and national criminal history background check; personal
history; experience; business record; purposes; and other pertinent
facts, as the director may reasonably require. This section does not
apply to financial institutions regulated under chapters 31.12 and
31.13 RCW and Titles 30, 32, and 33 RCW.

--- END ---