BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 3.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or county that operates a court under this title may
establish and operate one or more drunk driving courts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "drunk driving court" means
a court that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a
reduction in recidivism and substance abuse among drunk driving
offenders by increasing their likelihood for successful rehabilitation
through early, continuous, and intense judicially supervised treatment;
mandatory periodic alcohol or drug testing; and the use of appropriate
sanctions and other rehabilitation services.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
drunk driving court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding received for the support of the
operations of its drunk driving court and associated services; and
(ii) Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state money allocated for
drunk driving court programs with local cash or in-kind resources.
Moneys allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant,
other federal, state, and local funds for drunk driving court
operations and associated services.
(b) Any jurisdiction that establishes a drunk driving court
pursuant to this section shall establish minimum requirements for the
participation of offenders in the program. The drunk driving court may
adopt local requirements that are more stringent than the minimum. The
minimum requirements are:
(i) The drunk driving court is designed for offenders charged with
or being given deferred prosecutions for a violation of RCW 46.61.502
or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance, or a violation of RCW
46.61.5249 or an equivalent local ordinance if the charge was
originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an
equivalent local ordinance; and
(ii) The drunk driving court is designed for offenders who would
benefit from substance abuse treatment, including but not limited to
repeat drunk driving offenders and offenders with higher blood or
breath alcohol concentrations at the time of the offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city that operates a court under this chapter may establish
and operate one or more drunk driving courts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "drunk driving court" means
a court that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a
reduction in recidivism and substance abuse among drunk driving
offenders by increasing their likelihood for successful rehabilitation
through early, continuous, and intense judicially supervised treatment;
mandatory periodic alcohol or drug testing; and the use of appropriate
sanctions and other rehabilitation services.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
drunk driving court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding received for the support of the
operations of its drunk driving court and associated services; and
(ii) Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state money allocated for
drunk driving court programs with local cash or in-kind resources.
Moneys allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant,
other federal, state, and local funds for drunk driving court
operations and associated services.
(b) Any jurisdiction that establishes a drunk driving court
pursuant to this section shall establish minimum requirements for the
participation of offenders in the program. The drunk driving court may
adopt local requirements that are more stringent than the minimum. The
minimum requirements are:
(i) The drunk driving court is available for offenders charged with
or being given deferred prosecutions for a violation of RCW 46.61.502
or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance, or a violation of RCW
46.61.5249 or an equivalent local ordinance if the charge was
originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an
equivalent local ordinance; and
(ii) The drunk driving court is available for offenders who would
benefit from substance abuse treatment, including but not limited to
repeat drunk driving offenders and offenders with higher blood or
breath alcohol concentrations at the time of the offense.

--- END ---