BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.06.335 and 2000 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington quality award council shall be organized as a
private, nonprofit corporation, in accordance with chapter 24.03 RCW
and this section.
(2) The council shall oversee the governor's Washington state
quality award program. The purpose of the program is to improve the
overall competitiveness of the state's economy by stimulating
Washington state industries, business, and organizations to bring about
measurable success through setting standards of organizational
excellence, encouraging organizational self-assessment, identifying
successful organizations as role models, and providing a valuable
mechanism for promoting and strengthening a commitment to continuous
quality improvement in all sectors of the state's economy. The
governor shall annually present the award to organizations that improve
the quality of their products and services and are noteworthy examples
of high-performing work organizations, as determined by the council in
consultation with the governor or appointed representative.
(3) The governor shall appoint a representative to serve on the
board of directors of the council.
(4) The council shall establish a board of examiners, a recognition
committee, and such other committees or subgroups as it deems
appropriate to carry out its responsibilities.
(5) The council may conduct such public information, research,
education, and assistance programs as it deems appropriate to further
quality improvement in organizations operating in the state of
Washington.
(6) The council shall:
(a) Approve and announce award recipients;
(b) Approve guidelines to examine applicant organizations;
(c) Approve appointment of board of examiners; and
(d) Arrange appropriate annual awards and recognition for
recipients.
(((7) The council shall cease to exist on July 1, 2004, unless
otherwise extended by law.))

--- END ---