BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.77.065 and 2001 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board may cause any county road to be constructed or improved
by day labor as provided in this section.
(1) As used in this section, "county road construction budget"
means the aggregate total of those costs as defined by the budgeting,
accounting, and reporting system for counties and cities and other
local governments authorized under RCW 43.09.200 and 43.09.230 as
prescribed in the state auditor's budget, accounting, and reporting
manual's (BARS) road and street construction accounts ((541.00 through
541.90 in effect April 1, 1975)): PROVIDED, That such costs shall not
include those costs assigned to the ((preliminary engineering account
541.11,)) right of way account((s 541.20 through 541.25)), ancillary
operations account ((541.80)), and ((ferries account 541.81)) that
portion of the engineering account that is preliminary engineering in
the budget, accounting, and reporting manual.
(2) For counties with a population that equals or exceeds fifty
thousand people, the total amount of day labor construction programs
one county may perform annually shall total no more than the amounts
determined in the following manner:
(a) Any county with a total annual county road construction budget
of four million dollars or more may accumulate a day labor road
construction budget equal to no more than eight hundred thousand
dollars or fifteen percent of the county's total annual county road
construction budget, whichever is greater.
(b) Any county with a total annual county road construction budget
of one million five hundred thousand dollars or more and less than four
million dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget
equal to not more than five hundred twenty-five thousand dollars or
twenty percent of the county's total annual county road construction
budget, whichever is greater.
(c) Any county with a total annual county road construction budget
of five hundred thousand dollars or more and less than one million five
hundred thousand dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction
budget equal to two hundred fifty thousand dollars or thirty-five
percent of the county's total annual county road construction budget,
whichever is greater.
(d) Any county with a total annual county road construction budget
less than five hundred thousand dollars may accumulate a day labor road
construction budget equal to two hundred fifty thousand dollars:
PROVIDED, That any county with a total annual road construction budget
of less than five hundred thousand dollars may, by resolution of the
board at the time the county road construction budget is adopted, elect
to construct or improve county roads by day labor in an amount not to
exceed thirty-five thousand dollars on any one project, including
labor, equipment, and materials; such election to be in lieu of the two
hundred fifty thousand dollar limit provided for in this section,
except that any project means a complete project and the division of
any project into units of work or classes of work so as to permit
construction by day labor is not authorized.
(3) For counties with a population of less than fifty thousand
people, the total amount of day labor construction programs one county
may perform annually may total no more than the amounts determined in
the following manner:
(a) A county with a total annual county road construction budget of
four million dollars or more may accumulate a day labor road
construction budget equal to not more than eight hundred eighty
thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of the county's total annual
county road construction budget, whichever is greater;
(b) A county with a total annual county road construction budget of
one million five hundred thousand dollars or more and less than four
million dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget
equal to not more than five hundred seventy-seven thousand dollars or
thirty percent of the county's total annual county road construction
budget, whichever is greater;
(c) A county with a total annual county road construction budget of
five hundred thousand dollars or more and less than one million five
hundred thousand dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction
budget equal to two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars or forty-five
percent of the county's total annual county road construction budget,
whichever is greater;
(d) A county with a total annual county road construction budget
less than five hundred thousand dollars may accumulate a day labor road
construction budget equal to two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars.
However, such a county may, by resolution of the board at the time the
county road construction budget is adopted, elect instead to construct
or improve county roads by day labor in an amount not to exceed thirty-eight thousand five hundred dollars on any one project, including
labor, equipment, and materials. That election is in lieu of the two
hundred seventy-five thousand dollar limit provided for in this
section. As used in this section, "any project" means a complete
project, and a county may not divide a project into units of work or
classes of work so as to permit construction by day labor.
(4) Any county that adopts a county road construction budget
unreasonably exceeding that county's actual road construction
expenditures for the same budget year which has the effect of
permitting the county to exceed the day labor amounts established in
this section is in violation of the county road administration board's
standards of good practice under RCW 36.78.020 and is in violation of
this section. Any county, whose expenditure for day labor for road
construction projects unreasonably exceeds the limits specified in this
section, is in violation of the county road administration board's
standards of good practice under RCW 36.78.020 and is in violation of
this section.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, whenever
the construction work or improvement is the installation of electrical
traffic control devices, highway illumination equipment, electrical
equipment, wires, or equipment to convey electrical current, in an
amount exceeding ten thousand dollars for any one project including
labor, equipment, and materials, such work shall be performed by
contract as in this chapter provided. This section means a complete
project and does not permit the construction of any project by day
labor by division of the project into units of work or classes of work.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.81.130 and 1991 c 363 s 86 are each amended to read
as follows:
The laying out, construction, and maintenance of all county roads
shall hereafter be in accordance with the following procedure:
On or before the first Monday in October of each year each county
road engineer shall file with the county legislative authority a
recommended plan for the laying out, construction, ((maintenance,)) and
((special)) maintenance of county roads for the ensuing fiscal year.
Such recommended plan need not be limited to but shall include the
following items: Recommended projects, including capital expenditures
for ferries, docks, and related facilities, and their priority; the
estimated cost of all work, including labor and materials for each
project recommended; a statement as to whether such work is to be done
by the county forces or by publicly advertised contract; a list of all
recommended ((repairs to and)) purchases of road equipment, together
with the estimated costs thereof. Amounts to be expended for
maintenance ((and special maintenance)) shall be recommended, but
details of these proposed expenditures shall not be made. The
recommended plan shall conform as nearly as practicable to the county's
long range road program.
After filing of the road engineer's recommended plan, the county
legislative authority shall consider the same. Revisions and changes
may be made until a plan which is agreeable to a majority of the
members of the county legislative authority has been adopted:
PROVIDED, That such revisions shall conform as nearly as practicable to
the county's long range road program. Any appropriations contained in
the county road budget shall be void unless the county's road plan was
adopted prior to such appropriation.
The final road plan for the fiscal year shall not thereafter be
changed except by unanimous vote of the county legislative authority.

--- END ---