BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington has a rich variety of birds,
wildlife, and fish that its citizens and visitors enjoy. With over
three hundred sixty-five bird species, Washington can use this natural
asset to attract nature tourists and sportsmen from all over the
country and the world. According to a United States fish and wildlife
service report, thirty-six percent of Washington's residents currently
participate in bird watching, and the watchable wildlife industry
brings nearly one billion dollars per year into the state's economy.
The economic benefits delivered to rural economies in Washington by
those choosing to recreate by hunting waterfowl or upland game birds is
equally as impressive.
The legislature has long recognized the important role of waterfowl
and upland game bird hunting and other sporting pursuits in both the
state's economy and the quality of life for Washington residents.
Additionally, the 2003 legislature recognized the economic value of
promoting watchable wildlife and nature tourism when it required the
departments of fish and wildlife and community, trade, and economic
development to host a watchable wildlife and nature tourism conference
and write a statewide strategic plan. The 2002 legislature recognized
the value of identifying and conserving our state's biodiversity for
future generations when it created the biodiversity task force and
required a plan be developed to recommend ways to conserve
biodiversity. Furthermore, over the past fifteen years, the
legislature has recognized the important contributions volunteers and
nonprofit organizations have made in restoring and monitoring salmon
and wildlife habitat. Therefore, it is the goal of the legislature to
promote: Partnerships with volunteers; rural economic development;
nature tourism; and conservation of biodiversity by encouraging
partnerships between state government agencies, volunteers, and
nonprofit organizations to designate and conserve natural assets that
attract nature tourists and bird watchers to Washington's rural areas.
To accomplish this goal, the legislature recognizes the scientific
work by volunteer organizations to use internationally recognized
scientific criteria and protocols to identify, conserve, and monitor
areas of the state that are important for migrating and resident birds.
Scientists, ornithologists, and qualified volunteers have identified
important bird areas. Wildlife conservation organizations and their
volunteers are working to develop mutually agreed-upon bird
conservation plans and monitoring plans in cooperation with public land
managers and private landowners. Volunteers and scientists in more
than one hundred countries around the world have already completed
identification of fourteen thousand two hundred sixty sites that
qualify as important bird areas.
Qualified volunteers and scientists have already successfully used
the international criteria to identify fifty-three sites important for
birds in Washington. Following the final round of site selection,
volunteer organizations plan to work with landowners, businesses, and
local and state governments to develop plans to maintain or enhance
sites that will then become destinations for nature tourists to promote
rural economic development. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to have Washington participate in the recognition portion
of the important bird area program by directing the natural heritage
program at the department of natural resources to officially recognize
important bird areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The program may use information collected by a qualifying
nonprofit organization to recognize important bird areas. The program
should, to the greatest extent possible, coordinate with and use
internationally agreed-upon, scientific criteria and protocols
developed by a qualifying nonprofit organization to officially
recognize these sites throughout Washington. Prior to using
information collected by a qualifying nonprofit organization, the
program must verify that the information was collected by individuals
trained in scientific data collection, wildlife biology, or
ornithology.
(2) When the program recognizes an important bird area, that
information will be included in the program's data bank. An important
bird area shall not be designated as a natural area or a natural area
preserve unless that area satisfies the substantive and procedural
requirements for becoming a natural area or natural area preserve under
this chapter.
(3) The qualifying nonprofit organization that collected the
information used to recognize important bird areas should be available
to work with interested landowners, businesses, and state and local
governments to identify ways to maintain or enhance the important bird
areas.
(4) The recognition of private property as an important bird area
under this chapter, or the inclusion of private property in the
program's data bank, does not confer nor imply any rights of access or
trespass onto the important bird area without full knowledge and
consent of the owner pursuant to any state statutory and common laws
dealing with trespass and access to private property.
(5) Recognition of an important bird area does not require nor
preclude critical area designation under chapter 36.70A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.70 RCW
to read as follows:
Prior to recognizing an important bird area under this chapter, the
department must:
(1) Publish notice of the proposed important bird area in the
Washington state register;
(2) Publish notice of the proposed important bird area in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county where the proposed
important bird area is located; and
(3) Conduct at least one public hearing in the county where the
proposed important bird area is located.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.70.020 and 2003 c 334 s 548 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(2) "Natural areas" and "natural area preserves" include such
public or private areas of land or water which have retained their
natural character, although not necessarily completely natural and
undisturbed, or which are important in preserving rare or vanishing
flora, fauna, geological, natural historical or similar features of
scientific or educational value and which are acquired or voluntarily
registered or dedicated by the owner under this chapter.
(3) "Public lands" and "state lands" have the meaning set out in
RCW 79.02.010.
(4) "Council" means the natural heritage advisory council as
established in RCW 79.70.070.
(5) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(6) "Important bird area" means those areas jointly identified by
the natural heritage program and a qualifying nonprofit organization
using internationally recognized scientific criteria. These areas have
been found to be necessary to conserve populations of wild waterfowl,
upland game birds, songbirds, and other birds native to and migrating
through Washington, and contain the habitats that birds are dependent
upon for breeding, migration, shelter, and sustenance.
(7) "Instrument of dedication" means any written document intended
to convey an interest in real property pursuant to chapter 64.04 RCW.
(((7))) (8) "Natural heritage resources" means the plant community
types, aquatic types, unique geologic types, and special plant and
animal species and their critical habitat as defined in the natural
heritage plan established under RCW 79.70.030.
(((8))) (9) "Plan" means the natural heritage plan as established
under RCW 79.70.030.
(((9))) (10) "Program" means the natural heritage program as
established under RCW 79.70.030.
(((10))) (11) "Qualifying nonprofit organization" means a national
nonprofit organization, or a branch of a national nonprofit
organization, that conserves and restores natural ecosystems, focusing
on birds, other wildlife, and their habitat.
(12) "Register" means the Washington register of natural area
preserves as established under RCW 79.70.030.

--- END ---