BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2003 c 379 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, the term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned release
time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by
the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency
shall not credit the offender with earned release credits in advance of
the offender actually earning the credits. Any program established
pursuant to this section shall allow an offender to earn early release
credits for presentence incarceration. If an offender is transferred
from a county jail to the department, the administrator of a county
jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time spent
in custody at the facility and the amount of earned release time. An
offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23,
1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good time credits
or earned release time for that portion of his or her sentence that
results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In the
case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex
offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 2003,
the aggregate earned release time may not exceed ten percent of the
sentence.
(b)(i) In the case of an offender who qualifies under (b)(ii) or
(iii) of this subsection, the aggregate earned release time may not
exceed fifty percent of the sentence.
(ii) An offender convicted of a crime committed prior to the
effective date of this act, is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time under this subsection (1)(b) if he or
she:
(A) Is classified in one of the two lowest risk categories under
(b)(((iii))) (iv) of this subsection;
(B) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
and
(C) Has no prior conviction for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor).
(iii) An offender convicted of a crime committed on or after the
effective date of this act is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time under this subsection (1)(b) if he or
she:
(A) Meets the qualifications in (b)(ii)(A), (B), and (C) of this
subsection; and
(B) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence, and has no prior
conviction for:
(I) A violation of RCW 46.52.020(4)(a) (hit and run - death); or
(II) A violation of RCW 46.52.020(4)(b) (hit and run - injury).
(iv) For purposes of determining an offender's eligibility under
this subsection (1)(b), the department shall perform a risk assessment
of every offender committed to a correctional facility operated by the
department who has no current or prior conviction for ((a sex offense,
a violent offense, a crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411,
a felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020, a
violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary), a violation of, or
an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.401 by
manufacture or delivery or possession with intent to deliver
methamphetamine, or a violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled
substance to a minor))) an offense listed in (b)(ii)(B) or (C) or
(b)(iii)(B) or (C) of this subsection. The department must classify
each assessed offender in one of four risk categories between highest
and lowest risk.
(((iv))) (v) The department shall recalculate the earned release
time and reschedule the expected release dates for each qualified
offender under ((this subsection (1)))(b) (ii) of this subsection.
(((v))) (vi) With the exception of (b)(iii) of this subsection,
this subsection (1)(b) applies retroactively to eligible offenders
serving terms of total confinement in a state correctional facility as
of July 1, 2003.
(((vi))) (vii) This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to offenders
convicted after July 1, 2010.
(c) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence;
(2)(a) A person convicted of a sex offense or an offense
categorized as a serious violent offense, assault in the second degree,
vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, assault of a child in the second
degree, any crime against persons where it is determined in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed before July 1, 2000, may become
eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the department, for
transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned release time
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(b) A person convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, any
crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or a felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or after July 1, 2000, may
become eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the
department, for transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned
release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(c) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community placement or community
custody terms eligible for release to community custody status in lieu
of earned release shall provide an approved residence and living
arrangement prior to release to the community;
(d) The department may deny transfer to community custody status in
lieu of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
if the department determines an offender's release plan, including
proposed residence location and living arrangements, may violate the
conditions of the sentence or conditions of supervision, place the
offender at risk to violate the conditions of the sentence, place the
offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk to victim safety or
community safety. The department's authority under this section is
independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence or statutory
provision regarding conditions for community custody or community
placement;
(3) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(4)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious enough to
require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is physically incapacitated due to age or the medical condition;
and
(iii) Granting the extraordinary medical placement will result in
a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the
monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time;
(5) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(6) No more than the final six months of the sentence may be served
in partial confinement designed to aid the offender in finding work and
reestablishing himself or herself in the community;
(7) The governor may pardon any offender;
(8) The department may release an offender from confinement any
time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section; and
(9) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an offender
sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a
mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not be released
from total confinement before the completion of the listed mandatory
minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless allowed
under RCW 9.94A.540, however persistent offenders are not eligible for
extraordinary medical placement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---