BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.170.010 and 1991 c 334 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Armed private security guard" means a private security guard
who has a current firearms certificate issued by the commission and is
licensed as an armed private security guard under this chapter.
(2) "Armored vehicle guard" means a person who transports in an
armored vehicle under armed guard, from one place to another place,
valuables, jewelry, currency, documents, or any other item that
requires secure delivery.
(3) "Burglar alarm response runner" means a person employed by a
private security company to respond to burglar alarm system signals.
(4) "Burglar alarm system" means a device or an assembly of
equipment and devices used to detect or signal unauthorized intrusion,
movement, or exit at a protected premises, other than in a vehicle, to
which police or private security guards are expected to respond.
(5) "Chief law enforcement officer" means the elected or appointed
police administrator of a municipal, county, or state police or
sheriff's department that has full law enforcement powers in its
jurisdiction.
(6) "Classroom instruction" means instruction that takes place in
a setting where individuals receiving training are assembled together
and learn through lectures, study papers, class discussion, textbook
study, or other means of organized formal education techniques, such as
video, closed circuit, or other forms of electronic means, and as
distinguished from on-the-job education or training.
(7) "Commission" means the criminal justice training commission
established in chapter 43.101 RCW.
(((7))) (8) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((8))) (9) "Director" means the director of the department of
licensing.
(((9))) (10) "Employer" includes any individual, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor,
subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent of any of
the foregoing that employs or seeks to enter into an arrangement to
employ any person as a private security guard.
(((10))) (11) "Firearms certificate" means the certificate issued
by the commission.
(((11))) (12) "Licensee" means a person granted a license required
by this chapter.
(((12))) (13) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor,
subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent or employee
of any of the foregoing.
(((13))) (14) "Postassignment or on-the-job training" means
training that occurs in either an assisted field environment or in a
classroom instruction setting, or both.
(15) "Preassignment training" means the classroom training
completed prior to being assigned to work independently.
(16) "Principal corporate officer" means the president, vice-
president, treasurer, secretary, comptroller, or any other person who
performs the same functions for the corporation as performed by these
officers.
(((14))) (17) "Private security company" means a person or entity
licensed under this chapter and engaged in the business of providing
the services of private security guards on a contractual basis.
(((15))) (18) "Private security guard" means an individual who is
licensed under this chapter and principally employed as or typically
referred to as one of the following:
(a) Security officer or guard;
(b) Patrol or merchant patrol service officer or guard;
(c) Armed escort or bodyguard;
(d) Armored vehicle guard;
(e) Burglar alarm response runner; or
(f) Crowd control officer or guard.
(((16))) (19) "Qualifying agent" means an officer or manager of a
corporation who meets the requirements set forth in this chapter for
obtaining a license to own or operate a private security company.
(((17))) (20) "Sworn peace officer" means a person who is an
employee of the federal government, the state, a political subdivision,
agency, or department branch of a municipality, or other unit of local
government, and has law enforcement powers.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.170.100 and 1995 c 277 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The director shall adopt rules establishing preassignment
and postassignment or on-the-job training and testing requirements((,
which shall)).
(b) Beginning July 1, 2005, all security guards licensed on or
after July 1, 2005, must complete at least eight hours of preassignment
training. Preassignment training must include a minimum of four hours
of ((classes)) classroom instruction, and a minimum of four additional
hours that may be of classroom training, on-the-job training, or any
combination of the two. A department certified trainer must report the
preassignment training to the department. The director may establish,
by rule, ((continuing education)) training requirements for private
security guards.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2005, all security guards must complete at
least eight hours of postassignment or on-the-job training.
(a) For security guards initially licensed on or after July 1,
2005, four hours of postassignment training must be completed within
six months of the date an initial private security guard license is
issued by the director and the remaining four hours completed within
twelve months of the date an initial private security guard license is
issued by the department.
(b) For security guards licensed prior to July 1, 2005, at least
four hours of postassignment training must be completed by December 31,
2005, and the remaining four hours by July 1, 2006.
(c) Postassignment or on-the-job training must be in the topic
areas established by the director and may occur in a classroom setting,
in the field, or a combination of the two. A department certified
trainer need not report postassignment or on-the-job training.
However, a department-certified trainer must attest in writing that the
training occurred.
(d) The number of required postassignment training hours must be
increased by one hour on January 1st of every year until January 1,
2012. The number of postassignment training hours required of a
security guard is the number required on the date the security guard
was initially licensed by the department. These additional hours of
training must be completed within eighteen months after the date a
security guard initial license is issued by the department.
(e) The director shall require companies to maintain records
regarding the postassignment training hours completed by each employee.
All such records are subject to inspection by the department. The
training requirements and test results must be recorded and attested to
as appropriate by a certified trainer.
(3) The director shall consult with the private security industry
and law enforcement before adopting or amending the ((preassignment))
training ((or continuing education)) requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.170 RCW
to read as follows:
The director has the authority to negotiate reciprocity agreements
with other states allowing licensed security officers from Washington
to work in those other states.

--- END ---