BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A taxpayer may claim a credit against the tax imposed by this
chapter equal to costs the taxpayer incurred, including accounting
costs, because of regulatory requirements in the reporting period.
(2) For purposes of this section, "regulatory requirements" means:
(a) Reporting requirements imposed by statute or a state agency;
(b) Inspections performed by a state agency;
(c) Technical assistance visits performed by a state agency under
chapter 43.05 RCW; and
(d) Actions a state agency requires a taxpayer to take in order to
avoid a civil penalty after an inspection or a technical assistance
visit.
(3) Application for credits under this section must be made to the
department of revenue in a form and manner as required by the
department. A credit must be claimed in the year in which the
expenditure is made.
(4) Credits may not exceed the greater of two thousand dollars or
five percent of the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under
this chapter for a reporting period, and in no event may the credits
exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter
for a reporting period. Unused credits may be carried forward and used
in future reporting periods.

--- END ---