BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city may charge a general license fee upon a person for
registration or certification purposes that ensures efficient
administration of the city's business taxes.
(2) A city may only charge a person the general license fee
provided in subsection (1) of this section when:
(a) The person's gross income earned within the geographical
boundaries of the city triggers the city's gross receipts tax;
(b) The person engages in business activities within the
geographical boundaries of the city for more than one hundred hours in
a calendar year; or
(c) The person maintains a direct physical presence within the
geographical boundaries of the city. For the purposes of this
subsection, "direct physical presence" means:
(i) Maintaining, occupying, or using a permanent building or
facility, or fixed location as an office or location for conducting
business;
(ii) A location where the regular business of the taxpayer is
conducted and which is either owned by the taxpayer or over which the
taxpayer exercises legal dominion and control; and
(iii) A place where the taxpayer holds himself or herself out to do
business with the public at large.
(3) The rate of the general license fee provided in subsection (1)
of this section must be applied uniformly among all persons regardless
of employment levels, gross receipts, type of business, square footage,
or any other measure and not exceed the equivalent of one hundred
dollars per calendar year.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits a city from charging license
fees on persons for a regulatory or similar nonrevenue generating
purpose.

--- END ---