BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.05.140 and 2003 c 220 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition, the
court shall order that the petitioner shall not operate a motor vehicle
upon the public highways without a valid operator's license and proof
of liability insurance. The amount of liability insurance shall be
established by the court at not less than that established by RCW
46.29.490. As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition
on any alcohol-related case, the court shall also order the
installation of an ignition interlock ((or other device)) under RCW
46.20.720 ((for a petitioner who has previously been convicted of a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local
ordinance or a petitioner who has been charged with such an offense and
had an alcohol concentration of at least .15, or by reason of the
person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there
is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration. For
any other petitioner, the court may order the installation of an
interlock device under RCW 46.20.720(1) as a condition of granting a
deferred prosecution petition)). The required periods of use of the
interlock shall be not less than the periods provided for in RCW
46.20.720(2) (a), (b), and (c). As a condition of granting a deferred
prosecution petition, the court may order the petitioner to make
restitution and to pay costs as defined in RCW 10.01.160. To help
ensure continued sobriety and reduce the likelihood of reoffense, the
court may order reasonable conditions during the period of the deferred
prosecution including, but not limited to, attendance at self-help
recovery support groups for alcoholism or drugs, complete abstinence
from alcohol and all nonprescribed mind-altering drugs, periodic
urinalysis or breath analysis, and maintaining law-abiding behavior.
The court may terminate the deferred prosecution program upon violation
of the deferred prosecution order.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.311 and 2003 c 366 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall not suspend a driver's license or
privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways for a fixed
period of more than one year, except as specifically permitted under
RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.342, or other provision of law.
(b) Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.289,
46.20.291(5), 46.61.740, or 74.20A.320, whenever the license or driving
privilege of any person is suspended by reason of a conviction, a
finding that a traffic infraction has been committed, pursuant to
chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the
suspension shall remain in effect until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided
in chapter 46.29 RCW.
(c) If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502
or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's eligibility
for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcoholism agency
or probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny
reinstatement until enrollment and participation in an approved program
has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the
suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504,
and the person is required pursuant to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a
motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock ((or other
biological or technical device)), the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon written verification by
a company doing business in the state that it has installed the
required device on a vehicle owned ((and/or)) or operated by the person
seeking reinstatement. If, based upon notification from the interlock
provider or otherwise, the department determines that an interlock
required under RCW 46.20.720 is no longer installed or functioning as
required, the department shall suspend the person's license or
privilege to drive. Whenever the license or driving privilege of any
person is suspended or revoked as a result of noncompliance with an
ignition interlock requirement, the suspension shall remain in effect
until the person provides notice issued by a company doing business in
the state that a vehicle owned or operated by the person is equipped
with a functioning ignition interlock device.
(d) Whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is
suspended as a result of certification of noncompliance with a child
support order under chapter 74.20A RCW or a residential or visitation
order, the suspension shall remain in effect until the person provides
a release issued by the department of social and health services
stating that the person is in compliance with the order.
(((b))) (e)(i) The department shall not issue to the person a new,
duplicate, or renewal license until the person pays a reissue fee of
twenty dollars.
(ii) If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of administrative action under
RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars.
(2)(a) Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor
vehicle on the public highways has been revoked, unless the revocation
was for a cause which has been removed, is not entitled to have the
license or privilege renewed or restored until: (i) After the
expiration of one year from the date the license or privilege to drive
was revoked; (ii) after the expiration of the applicable revocation
period provided by RCW 46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055; (iii) after the
expiration of two years for persons convicted of vehicular homicide; or
(iv) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided
by RCW 46.20.265.
(b)(i) After the expiration of the appropriate period, the person
may make application for a new license as provided by law together with
a reissue fee in the amount of twenty dollars.
(ii) If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW
46.20.308, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, the reissue fee shall be one
hundred fifty dollars. If the revocation is the result of a violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by
the alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW
46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit, or privilege
to drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program has
been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the
revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504,
and the person is required pursuant to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a
motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other
biological or technical device, the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon written verification by
a company doing business in the state that it has installed the
required device on a vehicle owned ((and/or)) or operated by the person
applying for a new license. If, following issuance of a new license,
the department determines, based upon notification from the interlock
provider or otherwise, that an interlock required under RCW 46.20.720
is no longer functioning, the department shall suspend the person's
license or privilege to drive until the department has received written
verification from an interlock provider that a functioning interlock is
installed.
(c) Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department
shall not then issue a new license unless it is satisfied after
investigation of the driving ability of the person that it will be safe
to grant the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public
highways, and until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of
financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29
RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not
issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the
driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person
the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.
(3)(a) Whenever the driver's license of any person is suspended
pursuant to Article IV of the nonresident violators compact or RCW
46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or 46.20.291(5), the department shall not issue
to the person any new or renewal license until the person pays a
reissue fee of twenty dollars.
(b) If the suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of
this or any other state, province, or other jurisdiction involving (i)
the operation or physical control of a motor vehicle upon the public
highways while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or
(ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical test of the driver's blood
alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.3101 and 1998 c 213 s 2, 1998 c 209 s 2, and
1998 c 207 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Pursuant to RCW 46.20.308, the department shall suspend, revoke, or
deny the arrested person's license, permit, or privilege to drive as
follows:
(1) In the case of a person who has refused a test or tests:
(a) For a first refusal within seven years, where there has not
been a previous incident within seven years that resulted in
administrative action under this section, revocation or denial for one
year. A revocation or denial imposed under this subsection (1)(a)
shall run concurrently with the period of any suspension, revocation,
or denial imposed for a criminal conviction arising out of the same
incident;
(b) For a second or subsequent refusal within seven years, or for
a first refusal where there has been one or more previous incidents
within seven years that have resulted in administrative action under
this section, revocation or denial for two years or until the person
reaches age twenty-one, whichever is longer. A revocation imposed
under this subsection (1)(b) shall run ((consecutively to))
concurrently with the period of any suspension, revocation, or denial
imposed pursuant to a criminal conviction arising out of the same
incident.
(2) In the case of an incident where a person has submitted to or
been administered a test or tests indicating that the alcohol
concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.08 or more:
(a) For a first incident within seven years, where there has not
been a previous incident within seven years that resulted in
administrative action under this section, suspension for ninety days.
A suspension or denial imposed under this subsection (2)(a) shall run
concurrently with the period of any suspension, revocation, or denial
imposed for a criminal conviction arising out of the same incident;
(b) For a second or subsequent incident within seven years,
revocation or denial for two years. A suspension or denial imposed
under this subsection (2)(b) shall run concurrently with the period of
any suspension, revocation, or denial imposed for a criminal conviction
arising out of the same incident.
(3) In the case of an incident where a person under age twenty-one
has submitted to or been administered a test or tests indicating that
the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was in
violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504:
(a) For a first incident within seven years, suspension or denial
for ninety days. A suspension or denial imposed under this subsection
(3)(a) shall run concurrently with the period of any suspension,
revocation, or denial imposed for a criminal conviction arising out of
the same incident;
(b) For a second or subsequent incident within seven years,
revocation or denial for one year or until the person reaches age
twenty-one, whichever is longer. A suspension or denial imposed under
this subsection (3)(b) shall run concurrently with the period of any
suspension, revocation, or denial imposed for a criminal conviction
arising out of the same incident.
(4) The department, after considering the requirements of federal
law regarding state eligibility for grants or other funding, shall
provide by rule that a person whose license, permit, or privilege to
drive has been suspended, revoked, or denied under this section may
apply for a temporary restricted driver's license under RCW 46.20.391.
(a) The department shall establish as the minimum portions of the
periods of suspension, revocation, or denial set forth in this section
after which a person may apply for such a temporary restricted driver's
license, the minimum periods established by federal law under which the
state will maintain its eligibility, or establish eligibility to obtain
incentive grants or any other federal funding.
(b) A person applying for such a temporary restricted driver's
license shall provide proof to the satisfaction of the department that
a functioning ignition interlock device has been installed on a vehicle
owned or operated by the person.
(i) The department shall require the person to maintain such a
device on a vehicle owned or operated by the person and shall restrict
the person to operating only vehicles equipped with such a device, for
the remainder of the period of suspension, revocation, or denial.
(ii) Subject to any periodic renewal requirements established by
the department pursuant to this section and subject to any applicable
compliance requirements under this chapter or other law, a temporary
restricted driver's license granted as the result of an application
under this section extends through the remaining portion of any
suspension, revocation, or denial under this section and also through
the period of any suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under a
criminal conviction arising out of the same incident.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.342 and 2001 c 325 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to drive a motor vehicle in this
state while that person is in a suspended or revoked status or when his
or her privilege to drive is suspended or revoked in this or any other
state. Any person who has a valid Washington driver's license is not
guilty of a violation of this section.
(a) A person found to be an habitual offender under chapter 46.65
RCW, who violates this section while an order of revocation issued
under chapter 46.65 RCW prohibiting such operation is in effect, is
guilty of driving while license suspended or revoked in the first
degree, a gross misdemeanor. Upon the first such conviction, the
person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ten days.
Upon the second conviction, the person shall be punished by
imprisonment for not less than ninety days. Upon the third or
subsequent conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for
not less than one hundred eighty days. If the person is also convicted
of the offense defined in RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, when both
convictions arise from the same event, the minimum sentence of
confinement shall be not less than ninety days. The minimum sentence
of confinement required shall not be suspended or deferred. A
conviction under this subsection does not prevent a person from
petitioning for reinstatement as provided by RCW 46.65.080.
(b) A person who violates this section while an order of suspension
or revocation prohibiting such operation is in effect and while the
person is not eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or
driving privilege, other than for a suspension for the reasons
described in (c) of this subsection, is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the second degree, a gross misdemeanor. This
subsection applies when a person's driver's license or driving
privilege has been suspended or revoked by reason of:
(i) A conviction of a felony in the commission of which a motor
vehicle was used;
(ii) A previous conviction under this section;
(iii) A notice received by the department from a court or diversion
unit as provided by RCW 46.20.265, relating to a minor who has
committed, or who has entered a diversion unit concerning an offense
relating to alcohol, legend drugs, controlled substances, or imitation
controlled substances;
(iv) A conviction of RCW 46.20.410, relating to the violation of
restrictions of an occupational or a temporary restricted driver's
license;
(v) A conviction of RCW 46.20.345, relating to the operation of a
motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;
(vi) A conviction of RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of
injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(vii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.024, relating to attempting to
elude pursuing police vehicles;
(viii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.500, relating to reckless driving;
(ix) A conviction of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to a
person under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(x) A conviction of RCW 46.61.520, relating to vehicular homicide;
(xi) A conviction of RCW 46.61.522, relating to vehicular assault;
(xii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.527(4), relating to reckless
endangerment of roadway workers;
(xiii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.530, relating to racing of
vehicles on highways;
(xiv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.685, relating to leaving children
in an unattended vehicle with motor running;
(xv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.740, relating to theft of motor
vehicle fuel;
(xvi) A conviction of RCW 46.64.048, relating to attempting,
aiding, abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(xvii) An administrative action taken by the department under
chapter 46.20 RCW; or
(xviii) A conviction of a local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution of a political subdivision of this state, the federal
government, or any other state, of an offense substantially similar to
a violation included in this subsection.
(c) A person who violates this section when his or her driver's
license or driving privilege is, at the time of the violation,
suspended or revoked solely because (i) the person must furnish proof
of satisfactory progress in a required alcoholism or drug treatment
program, (ii) the person must furnish proof of financial responsibility
for the future as provided by chapter 46.29 RCW, (iii) the person has
failed to comply with the provisions of chapter 46.29 RCW relating to
uninsured accidents, (iv) the person has failed to respond to a notice
of traffic infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing,
violated a written promise to appear in court, or has failed to comply
with the terms of a notice of traffic infraction or citation, as
provided in RCW 46.20.289, (v) the person has committed an offense in
another state that, if committed in this state, would not be grounds
for the suspension or revocation of the person's driver's license, (vi)
the person has been suspended or revoked by reason of one or more of
the items listed in (b) of this subsection, but was eligible to
reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege at the time
of the violation, or (vii) the person has received traffic citations or
notices of traffic infraction that have resulted in a suspension under
RCW 46.20.267 relating to intermediate drivers' licenses, or any
combination of (i) through (vii), is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the third degree, a misdemeanor.
(2) Upon receiving a record of conviction of any person or upon
receiving an order by any juvenile court or any duly authorized court
officer of the conviction of any juvenile under this section, the
department shall:
(a) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
first degree, as provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, extend
the period of administrative revocation imposed under chapter 46.65 RCW
for an additional period of one year from and after the date the person
would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license or have
his or her driving privilege restored; or
(b) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
second degree, as provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, not
issue a new license or restore the driving privilege for an additional
period of one year from and after the date the person would otherwise
have been entitled to apply for a new license or have his or her
driving privilege restored; or
(c) Not extend the period of suspension or revocation if the
conviction was under subsection (1)(c) of this section. If the
conviction was under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section and the
court recommends against the extension and the convicted person has
obtained a valid driver's license, the period of suspension or
revocation shall not be extended.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.380 and 1985 ex.s. c 1 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person may file an application for an occupational or a
temporary restricted driver's license as provided in RCW 46.20.391
unless he or she first pays to the director or other person authorized
to accept applications and fees for driver's licenses a fee of twenty-five dollars. The applicant shall receive upon payment an official
receipt for the payment of such fee. All such fees shall be forwarded
to the director who shall transmit such fees to the state treasurer in
the same manner as other driver's license fees.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.20.391 and 1999 c 274 s 4 and 1999 c 272 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Any person licensed under this chapter who is convicted of
an offense relating to motor vehicles for which suspension or
revocation of the driver's license is mandatory, other than vehicular
homicide or vehicular assault, or who ((has had his or her license
suspended under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a))) is authorized under
RCW 46.20.3101(4), may submit to the department an application for ((an
occupational)) a temporary restricted driver's license. The
department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining
that the petitioner is ((engaged in an occupation or trade that makes
it essential that the petitioner operate a motor vehicle)) eligible to
receive the license, may issue ((an occupational)) a temporary
restricted driver's license and may set definite restrictions as
provided in RCW 46.20.394. No person may petition for, and the
department shall not issue, ((an occupational)) a temporary restricted
driver's license that is effective during the first thirty days of any
suspension or revocation imposed either for a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or ((under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), or
for both a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and under RCW
46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a) where the action arises from the same
incident. A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for an occupational driver's license may request a hearing
as provided by rule of the department)) during the required minimum
periods of suspension, revocation, or denial established under RCW
46.20.3101(4).
(b) An applicant under this subsection whose driver's license is
suspended or revoked for an alcohol-related offense shall provide proof
to the satisfaction of the department that a functioning ignition
interlock device has been installed on a vehicle owned or operated by
the person.
(i) The department shall require the person to maintain such a
device on a vehicle owned or operated by the person and shall restrict
the person to operating only vehicles equipped with such a device, for
the remainder of the period of suspension, revocation, or denial.
(ii) Subject to any periodic renewal requirements established by
the department pursuant to this section and subject to any applicable
compliance requirements under this chapter or other law, a temporary
restricted driver's license granted after a suspension or revocation
under RCW 46.61.5055 or 46.20.3101 extends through the remaining
portion of any concurrent or consecutive suspension or revocation that
may be imposed as the result of administrative action and criminal
conviction arising out of the same incident.
(iii) The time period during which the person is licensed under
this section shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the
period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is required
under RCW 46.20.720 (1) and (2) (a), (b), and (c).
(2)(a) A person licensed under this chapter whose driver's license
is suspended administratively due to failure to appear or pay a traffic
ticket under RCW 46.20.289; a violation of the financial responsibility
laws under chapter 46.29 RCW; or for multiple violations within a
specified period of time under RCW 46.20.291, may apply to the
department for an occupational driver's license ((if the applicant
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that one of the
following additional conditions are met:
(i) The applicant is in an apprenticeship program or an on-the-job
training program for which a driver's license is required;
(ii) The applicant presents evidence that he or she has applied for
a position in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program and the
program has certified that a driver's license is required to begin the
program, provided that a license granted under this provision shall be
in effect no longer than fourteen days;
(iii) The applicant is in a program that assists persons who are
enrolled in a WorkFirst program pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to
become gainfully employed and the program requires a driver's license;
or
(iv) The applicant is undergoing substance abuse treatment or is
participating in meetings of a twelve-step group such as alcoholics
anonymous)).
(b) If the suspension is for failure to respond, pay, or comply
with a notice of traffic infraction or conviction, the applicant must
enter into a payment plan with the court.
(c) An occupational driver's license issued to an applicant
described in (a) of this subsection shall be valid for the period of
the suspension or revocation but not more than two years.
(((d) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an occupational
driver's license granted under this subsection is no longer enrolled in
an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program, the director shall
give written notice by first class mail to the driver that the
occupational driver's license shall be canceled. The effective date of
cancellation shall be fifteen days from the date of mailing the notice.
If at any time before the cancellation goes into effect the driver
submits evidence of continued enrollment in the program, the
cancellation shall be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective,
the driver may obtain, at no additional charge, a new occupational
driver's license upon submittal of evidence of enrollment in another
program that meets the criteria set forth in this subsection.
(e) The department shall not issue an occupational driver's license
under (a)(iv) of this subsection if the applicant is able to receive
transit services sufficient to allow for the applicant's participation
in the programs referenced under (a)(iv) of this subsection.))
(3) An applicant for an occupational or temporary restricted
driver's license who qualifies under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section is eligible to receive such license only if:
(a) Within one year immediately preceding the date of the offense
that gave rise to the present conviction, the applicant has not
committed any other offense relating to motor vehicles for which
suspension or revocation of a driver's license is mandatory; and
(b) Within seven years immediately preceding the date of the
offense that gave rise to the present conviction or incident, the
applicant has not committed ((any of the following offenses: (i)
Driving or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor; (ii))) vehicular homicide
under RCW 46.61.520((;)) or (((iii))) vehicular assault under RCW
46.61.522; and
(c) The applicant demonstrates that it is necessary for him or her
to operate a motor vehicle because he or she:
(i) Is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential
that he or she operate a motor vehicle((, except as allowed under
subsection (2)(a) of this section));
(ii) Is undergoing continuing health care or providing continuing
health care to another who is dependent upon the applicant;
(iii) Is enrolled in an educational institution and pursuing a
course of study leading to a diploma, degree, or other certification of
successful educational completion;
(iv) Is undergoing substance abuse treatment or is participating in
meetings of a twelve-step group such as Alcoholics Anonymous that
requires the petitioner to drive to or from the treatment or meetings;
(v) Is fulfilling court-ordered community service responsibilities;
(vi) Is in a program that assists persons who are enrolled in a
WorkFirst program pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to become gainfully
employed and the program requires a driver's license;
(vii) Is in an apprenticeship, on-the-job training, or welfare-to-work program; or
(viii) Presents evidence that he or she has applied for a position
in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program for which a
driver's license is required to begin the program, provided that a
license granted under this provision shall be in effect for no longer
than fourteen days; and
(d) The applicant files satisfactory proof of financial
responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW; and
(e) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an occupational
driver's license granted under this subsection is no longer enrolled in
an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program, the director shall
give written notice by first class mail to the driver that the
occupational driver's license shall be canceled. The effective date of
cancellation shall be fifteen days from the date of mailing the notice.
If at any time before the cancellation goes into effect the driver
submits evidence of continued enrollment in the program, the
cancellation shall be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective,
the driver may obtain, at no additional charge, a new occupational
driver's license upon submittal of evidence of enrollment in another
program that meets the criteria set forth in this subsection; and
(f) The department shall not issue an occupational driver's license
under (c)(iv) of this subsection if the applicant is able to receive
transit services sufficient to allow for the applicant's participation
in the programs referenced under (c)(iv) of this subsection.
(4) A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for an occupational or temporary restricted driver's
license may request a hearing as provided by rule of the department.
(5) The director shall cancel an occupational or temporary
restricted driver's license upon receipt of notice that the holder
thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of
its restrictions, or of a separate offense that under chapter 46.20 RCW
would warrant suspension or revocation of a regular driver's license.
The cancellation is effective as of the date of the conviction, and
continues with the same force and effect as any suspension or
revocation under this title.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.20.394 and 1999 c 272 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In issuing an occupational or a temporary restricted driver's
license under RCW 46.20.391, the department shall describe the type of
((occupation permitted)) qualifying circumstances for the license and
shall set forth in detail the specific hours of the day during which
the person may drive to and from his ((place of work)) or her
residence, which may not exceed twelve hours in any one day; the days
of the week during which the license may be used; and the general
routes over which the person may travel. In issuing an occupational or
temporary restricted driver's license that meets the qualifying
circumstance under RCW 46.20.391 (((2)(a)(iv))) (3)(c)(iv), the
department shall set forth in detail the specific hours during which
the person may drive to and from substance abuse treatment or meetings
of a twelve-step group such as alcoholics anonymous, the days of the
week during which the license may be used, and the general routes over
which the person may travel. These restrictions shall be prepared in
written form by the department, which document shall be carried in the
vehicle at all times and presented to a law enforcement officer under
the same terms as the occupational or temporary restricted driver's
license. Any violation of the restrictions constitutes a violation of
RCW 46.20.342 and subjects the person to all procedures and penalties
therefor.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.20.400 and 1967 c 32 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
If an occupational or a temporary restricted driver's license is
issued and is not revoked during the period for which issued the
licensee may obtain a new driver's license at the end of such period,
but no new driver's ((permit shall)) license may be issued to such
person until he or she surrenders his or her occupational or temporary
restricted driver's license and his or her copy of the order, and the
director is satisfied that ((he)) the person complies with all other
provisions of law relative to the issuance of a driver's license.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.20.410 and 1967 c 32 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person convicted for violation of any restriction of an
occupational or a temporary restricted driver's license shall in
addition to the immediate revocation of such license and any other
penalties provided by law be fined not less than fifty nor more than
two hundred dollars or imprisoned for not more than six months or both
such fine and imprisonment.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.20.720 and 2003 c 366 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court may order that after a period of suspension,
revocation, or denial of driving privileges, and for up to as long as
the court has jurisdiction, any person convicted of any offense
involving the use, consumption, or possession of alcohol while
operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with
a functioning ignition interlock ((or other biological or technical
device)). The court shall establish a specific calibration setting at
which the interlock will prevent the vehicle from being started. The
court shall also establish the period of time for which interlock use
will be required.
(2)(((a))) The department shall require that, after any applicable
period of suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges, a
person may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning
ignition interlock or other biological or technical device if the
person is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 ((or)), 46.61.504,
or 46.61.5249 or an equivalent local ordinance ((and it is:
(i) The person's first conviction or a deferred prosecution under
chapter 10.05 RCW and his or her alcohol concentration was at least
0.15, or by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the
person's alcohol concentration;
(ii) The person's second or subsequent conviction; or
(iii) The person's first conviction and the person has a previous
deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW or it is a deferred
prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW and the person has a previous
conviction)).
(((b))) The department may waive the requirement for the use of
such a device if it concludes that such devices are not reasonably
available in the local area. ((Nothing in this section may be
interpreted as entitling a person to more than one deferred
prosecution.
(3) In the case of a person under subsection (1) of this section,
the court shall establish a specific calibration setting at which the
ignition interlock or other biological or technical device will prevent
the motor vehicle from being started and the period of time that the
person shall be subject to the restriction. In the case of a person
under subsection (2) of this section,)) The ignition interlock or other
biological or technical device shall be calibrated to prevent the motor
vehicle from being started when the breath sample provided has an
alcohol concentration of 0.025 or more((, and)). The period of time of
the restriction will be as follows:
(a) For a person (((i) who is subject to RCW 46.61.5055 (1)(b),
(2), or (3), or who is subject to a deferred prosecution program under
chapter 10.05 RCW; and (ii))) who has not previously been restricted
under this section, a period of one year;
(b) For a person who has previously been restricted under (a) of
this subsection, a period of five years;
(c) For a person who has previously been restricted under (b) of
this subsection, a period of ten years.
((For purposes of this section, "convicted" means being found
guilty of an offense or being placed on a deferred prosecution program
under chapter 10.05 RCW.))

Sec. 11 RCW 46.20.740 and 2001 c 55 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall attach or imprint a notation on the
driving record of any person restricted under RCW 46.20.720 stating
that the person may operate only a motor vehicle equipped with ((an))
a functioning ignition interlock ((or other biological or technical))
device. The department shall determine the person's eligibility for
licensing based upon written verification by a company doing business
in the state that it has installed the required device on a vehicle
owned or operated by the person seeking reinstatement. If, based upon
notification from the interlock provider or otherwise, the department
determines that an ignition interlock required under this section is no
longer installed or functioning as required, the department shall
suspend the person's license or privilege to drive. Whenever the
license or driving privilege of any person is suspended or revoked as
a result of noncompliance with an ignition interlock requirement, the
suspension shall remain in effect until the person provides notice
issued by a company doing business in the state that a vehicle owned or
operated by the person is equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock device.
(2) It is a misdemeanor for a person with such a notation on his or
her driving record to operate a motor vehicle that is not so equipped.

Sec. 12 RCW 46.61.5055 and 2003 c 103 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be
punished as follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than one
year. Twenty-four consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection
(1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than fifteen days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home
monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of
alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than one
year. Two consecutive days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory
minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence
is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason
for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term
of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court may
order not less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county
or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine
the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the
court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent((; and
(iii) By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720)).
(2) A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be
punished as follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than one
year and sixty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall
pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the
cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of
imprisonment and sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; ((and
(iii) By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720;)) or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than
one year and ninety days of electronic home monitoring. The offender
shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the
cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of
imprisonment and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent((; and
(iii) By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720)).
(3) A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 and who has two or more prior offenses within seven years
shall be punished as follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than one
year and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The
county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall
determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may
consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring.
Ninety days of imprisonment and one hundred twenty days of electronic
home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds
that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based;
and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent((; and
(iii) By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720)); or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor
more than one year and one hundred fifty days of electronic home
monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred
fifty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory
minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence
is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason
for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars
nor more than five thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars
of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent((; and
(iii) By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720)).
(4) If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 committed the offense while a passenger under the age of
sixteen was in the vehicle, the court shall:
(a) In any case in which the installation and use of an interlock
or other device is not mandatory under RCW 46.20.720 or other law,
order the use of such a device for not less than sixty days following
the restoration of the person's license, permit, or nonresident driving
privileges; and
(b) In any case in which the installation and use of such a device
is otherwise mandatory, order the use of such a device for an
additional sixty days.
(5) In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the
limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider
the following:
(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was
responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property; and
(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in
physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers.
(6) An offender punishable under this section is subject to the
alcohol assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.
(7) The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person
convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:
(a) If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if
for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
suspended or denied by the department for ninety days;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;
(b) If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15((, or
if by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration)):
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for one year;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for nine hundred days; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or
(c) If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for three years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within
seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.
For purposes of this subsection (7), the department shall refer to
the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the
existence of prior offenses.
(8) After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or
denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive
required by this section, the department shall place the offender's
driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.
(9)(a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail
sentence required by this section, whenever the court imposes less than
one year in jail, the court shall also suspend but shall not defer a
period of confinement for a period not exceeding five years. The court
shall impose conditions of probation that include: (i) Not driving a
motor vehicle within this state without a valid license to drive and
proof of financial responsibility for the future; (ii) not driving a
motor vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration
of 0.08 or more within two hours after driving; and (iii) not refusing
to submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol
concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has
reasonable grounds to believe the person was driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor. The court may impose conditions of
probation that include nonrepetition, installation of an ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device on the probationer's
motor vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised probation, or
other conditions that may be appropriate. The sentence may be imposed
in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of probation during
the suspension period.
(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under
(a)(i) ((and)), (ii), or (((a)(i) and)) (iii) of this subsection, the
court shall order the convicted person to be confined for thirty days,
which shall not be suspended or deferred.
(c) For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory
condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license,
permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the
court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to
drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding
of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial
then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall
notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any
extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this
subsection.
(10) A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements
of this chapter when:
(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or
any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system;
(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or
(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the
offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring
penalty.
Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring
is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose
an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The
alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, additional
jail time, work crew, or work camp.
Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home
monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed three hundred sixty-five days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of the sentence
first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative portion of the
sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does not exceed three
hundred sixty-five days.
(11) An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or
not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to
the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(4).
(12) For purposes of this section:
(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:
(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or
9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the
result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW
46.61.520 or 46.61.522;
(vi) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have
been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this
subsection if committed in this state;
(vii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an
equivalent local ordinance; or
(viii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local
ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred prosecution was
granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or
46.61.522; and
(b) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years of the arrest for the current offense.

Sec. 13 RCW 46.63.020 and 2003 c 33 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(2) RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(3) RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(4) RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of ownership and
registration and markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed
or declared a total loss;
(6) RCW 46.16.010 relating to initial registration of motor
vehicles;
(7) RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(8) RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(9) RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or
license plate for disabled persons' parking;
(10) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's
license;
(11) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a
driver's license or instruction permit;
(12) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of
a driver's license;
(13) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked
license or status;
(14) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;
(15) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational or temporary restricted driver's license;
(16) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without
an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that
the device is required;
(17) RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another person to start a
vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device;
(18) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;
(19) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;
(20) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(21) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(22) RCW 46.37.650 relating to the sale, resale, distribution, or
installation of a previously deployed air bag;
(23) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot
vehicles;
(24) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous
articles;
(25) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(26) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(27) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen,
and appraisers;
(28) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving
record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer, and an
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(29) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a
registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(30) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck
operators;
(31) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers,
flaggers, or fire fighters;
(32) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or
cooperate with an officer;
(33) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(34) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police
vehicles;
(35) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(36) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(37) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one
driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(38) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;
(39) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(40) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;
(41) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway
workers;
(42) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;
(43) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an unattended
vehicle with the motor running;
(44) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle fuel;
(45) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or attempt
to cancel a traffic citation;
(46) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding, abetting,
coercing, and committing crimes;
(47) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic offenders;
(48) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to obtain a
refund;
(49) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle business
practices, except where that chapter provides for the assessment of
monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(50) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of passengers
in for hire vehicles;
(51) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier insurance;
(52) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine without a
vehicle certificate;
(53) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a limousine
carrier;
(54) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(55) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training schools;
(56) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a cab card,
letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued under chapter
46.87 RCW;
(57) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an unregistered or
unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

Sec. 14 RCW 46.68.041 and 1998 c 212 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall forward all funds accruing under the provisions of
chapter 46.20 RCW together with a proper identifying, detailed report
to the state treasurer who shall deposit such moneys to the credit of
the highway safety fund.
(2) Sixty-three percent of each fee collected by the department
under RCW 46.20.311 (1)(((b))) (e)(ii), (2)(b)(ii), and (3)(b) shall be
deposited in the impaired driving safety account.

Sec. 15 RCW 46.68.260 and 1998 c 212 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The impaired driving safety account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. All receipts from fees collected under RCW
46.20.311 (1)(((b))) (e)(ii), (2)(b)(ii), and (3)(b) shall be deposited
according to RCW 46.68.041. Expenditures from this account may be used
only to fund projects to reduce impaired driving and to provide funding
to local governments for costs associated with enforcing laws relating
to driving and boating while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.

--- END ---