BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some offenders,
often known as escapees or fugitives, willfully discontinue to make
themselves available to the department of corrections for supervision
by making their whereabouts unknown or by failing to maintain contact
with the department as required by their community custody officers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of corrections shall, within available resources,
establish a public list, on the department's available web site, of all
persons deemed escapees or fugitives from the department. The
department shall focus the web site on those escapees and fugitives
considered high risk offenders. The department shall submit a report
to the legislature by December 31, 2004, on the progress of the web
site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2004, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---