BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.473 and 1999 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to the Washington state patrol with respect to the
officers of the Washington state patrol appointed under RCW 43.43.020.
Subjects of bargaining include rates of pay or wage levels and wage-related matters, except that the Washington state patrol is prohibited
from negotiating ((rates of pay or wage levels and)) any matters
relating to retirement benefits or health care benefits or other
employee insurance benefits.
(2) Provisions pertaining to wage-related matters in a collective
bargaining agreement between the Washington state patrol and the
Washington state patrol officers that are entered into before the
legislature approves the funds necessary to implement the provisions
must be conditioned upon the legislature's subsequent approval of the
funds.

--- END ---