BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.381 and 1998 c 333 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person shall be exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a
portion of the amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and
payable in the year following the year in which a claim is filed, and
thereafter, in accordance with the following:
(1) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence
which was occupied by the person claiming the exemption as a principal
place of residence as of the time of filing: PROVIDED, That any person
who sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or her residence may
transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement residence, but no
claimant shall receive an exemption on more than one residence in any
year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That confinement of the person to a hospital
or nursing home shall not disqualify the claim of exemption if:
(a) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;
(b) The residence is occupied by a spouse and/or a person
financially dependent on the claimant for support; or
(c) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home
or hospital costs;
(2) The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time
of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the
residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the
person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, such person must own a share
therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he
or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned
by each spouse or cotenant, and any lease for life shall be deemed a
life estate;
(3) The person claiming the exemption must be sixty-one years of
age or older on December 31st of the year in which the exemption claim
is filed, or must have been, at the time of filing, retired from
regular gainful employment by reason of physical disability: PROVIDED,
That any surviving spouse or domestic partner of a person who was
receiving an exemption at the time of the person's death shall qualify
if the surviving spouse or domestic partner is fifty-seven years of age
or older and otherwise meets the requirements of this section;
(4) The amount that the person shall be exempt from an obligation
to pay shall be calculated on the basis of combined disposable income,
as defined in RCW 84.36.383. If the person claiming the exemption was
retired for two months or more of the assessment year, the combined
disposable income of such person shall be calculated by multiplying the
average monthly combined disposable income of such person during the
months such person was retired by twelve. If the income of the person
claiming exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment
year by reason of the death of the person's spouse, or when other
substantial changes occur in disposable income that are likely to
continue for an indefinite period of time, the combined disposable
income of such person shall be calculated by multiplying the average
monthly combined disposable income of such person after such
occurrences by twelve. If it is necessary to estimate income to comply
with this subsection, the assessor may require confirming documentation
of such income prior to May 31 of the year following application;
(5)(a) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less shall
be exempt from all excess property taxes; and
(b)(i) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of twenty-four thousand dollars or less
but greater than eighteen thousand dollars shall be exempt from all
regular property taxes on the greater of forty thousand dollars or
thirty-five percent of the valuation of his or her residence, but not
to exceed sixty thousand dollars of the valuation of his or her
residence; or
(ii) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a
combined disposable income of eighteen thousand dollars or less shall
be exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater of fifty
thousand dollars or sixty percent of the valuation of his or her
residence; and
(6) For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less, the
valuation of the residence shall be the assessed value of the residence
on the later of January 1, 1995, or January 1st of the assessment year
the person first qualifies under this section. If the person
subsequently fails to qualify under this section only for one year
because of high income, this same valuation shall be used upon
requalification. If the person fails to qualify for more than one year
in succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any other
reason, the valuation upon requalification shall be the assessed value
on January 1st of the assessment year in which the person requalifies.
If the person transfers the exemption under this section to a different
residence, the valuation of the different residence shall be the
assessed value of the different residence on January 1st of the
assessment year in which the person transfers the exemption.
In no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater than
the true and fair value of the residence on January 1st of the
assessment year.
This subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to the
property in the year in which the improvements are made. Subsequent
improvements to the property shall be added to the value otherwise
determined under this subsection at their true and fair value in the
year in which they are made.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.36.383 and 1999 c 358 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the
context clearly indicates a different meaning:
(1) The term "residence" means a single family dwelling unit
whether such unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling,
including the land on which such dwelling stands not to exceed one
acre. The term shall also include a share ownership in a cooperative
housing association, corporation, or partnership if the person claiming
exemption can establish that his or her share represents the specific
unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The term
shall also include a single family dwelling situated upon lands the fee
of which is vested in the United States or any instrumentality thereof
including an Indian tribe or in the state of Washington, and
notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a
residence shall be deemed real property.
(2) The term "real property" shall also include a mobile home which
has substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its
being fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the
mobile home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed
pipe, connections with sewer, water, or other utilities. A mobile home
located on land leased by the owner of the mobile home is subject, for
tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the personal
property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.
(3) "Department" means the state department of revenue.
(4) "Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the
person claiming the exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her
spouse or domestic partner, and the disposable income of each cotenant
occupying the residence for the assessment year, less amounts paid by
the person claiming the exemption or his or her spouse during the
assessment year for:
(a) Drugs supplied by prescription of a medical practitioner
authorized by the laws of this state or another jurisdiction to issue
prescriptions; and
(b) The treatment or care of either person received in the home or
in a nursing home.
(5) "Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in
the federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989,
or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent
with the purpose of this section, plus all of the following items to
the extent they are not included in or have been deducted from adjusted
gross income:
(a) Capital gains, other than gain excluded from income under
section 121 of the federal internal revenue code to the extent it is
reinvested in a new principal residence;
(b) Amounts deducted for loss;
(c) Amounts deducted for depreciation;
(d) Pension and annuity receipts;
(e) Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and
medical-aid payments;
(f) Veterans benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid
payments;
(g) Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;
(h) Dividend receipts; and
(i) Interest received on state and municipal bonds.
(6) "Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming
the exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.36.387 and 2003 c 53 s 408 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All claims for exemption shall be made and signed by the person
entitled to the exemption, by his or her attorney in fact or in the
event the residence of such person is under mortgage or purchase
contract requiring accumulation of reserves out of which the holder of
the mortgage or contract is required to pay real estate taxes, by such
holder or by the owner, either before two witnesses or the county
assessor or his or her deputy in the county where the real property is
located: PROVIDED, That if a claim for exemption is made by a person
living in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or
partnership, such claim shall be made and signed by the person entitled
to the exemption and by the authorized agent of such cooperative.
(2) If the taxpayer is unable to submit his or her own claim, the
claim shall be submitted by a duly authorized agent or by a guardian or
other person charged with the care of the person or property of such
taxpayer.
(3) All claims for exemption and renewal applications shall be
accompanied by such documented verification of income as shall be
prescribed by rule adopted by the department of revenue.
(4)(a) For the purposes of the exemption, if the taxpayer
participates in a domestic partnership, he or she shall provide an
affidavit in a form prescribed by the department in which the taxpayer
attests that:
(i) The taxpayer is participating in a domestic partnership;
(ii) The taxpayer and the domestic partner:
(A) Share the same regular and permanent residence;
(B) Have a close personal relationship;
(C) Have agreed to be jointly responsible for basic living expenses
incurred during the domestic partnership;
(D) Are not married to anyone;
(E) Are each eighteen years of age or older;
(F) Are not related to each other by blood closer than would bar
marriage in this state;
(G) Were mentally competent to consent to contract when their
domestic partnership began; and
(H) Are each other's sole domestic partner and are responsible for
each other's common welfare; and
(iii) Any prior domestic partnership in which the taxpayer or his
or her domestic partner participated with a third party was terminated
not less than ninety days prior to the date of the affidavit, or by the
death of that third party, whichever was earlier.
(b) The department may require by rule that the affidavit include
other information deemed necessary to establishing a domestic
partnership.
(5) Any person signing a false claim with the intent to defraud or
evade the payment of any tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72
RCW.
(((5))) (6) The tax liability of a cooperative housing association,
corporation, or partnership shall be reduced by the amount of tax
exemption to which a claimant residing therein is entitled and such
cooperative shall reduce any amount owed by the claimant to the
cooperative by such exact amount of tax exemption or, if no amount be
owed, the cooperative shall make payment to the claimant of such exact
amount of exemption.
(((6))) (7) A remainderman or other person who would have otherwise
paid the tax on real property that is the subject of an exemption
granted under RCW 84.36.381 for an estate for life shall reduce the
amount which would have been payable by the life tenant to the
remainderman or other person to the extent of the exemption. If no
amount is owed or separately stated as an obligation between these
persons, the remainderman or other person shall make payment to the
life tenant in the exact amount of the exemption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2005 and thereafter.

--- END ---