BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.369 and 2000 c 237 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((By July 1, 1999,)) The commission shall make available to
candidates, public officials, ((and)) political committees, lobbyists,
and lobbyists' employers that are required to file reports under this
chapter an electronic filing alternative for submitting financial
affairs reports, contribution reports, and expenditure reports,
including but not limited to filing by diskette, modem, satellite, or
the internet.
(2) ((By January 1, 2002, the commission shall make available to
lobbyists and lobbyists' employers required to file reports under RCW
42.17.150, 42.17.170, 42.17.175, or 42.17.180 an electronic filing
alternative for submitting these reports including but not limited to
filing by diskette, modem, satellite, or the Internet.
(3))) The commission shall make available to candidates, public
officials, political committees, lobbyists, and lobbyists' employers an
electronic copy of the appropriate reporting forms at no charge.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.3691 and 2000 c 237 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Beginning January 1, 2002, each candidate or political
committee that expended twenty-five thousand dollars or more in the
preceding year or expects to expend twenty-five thousand dollars or
more in the current year shall file all contribution reports and
expenditure reports required by this chapter by the electronic
alternative provided by the commission under RCW 42.17.369. The
commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis for candidates
whose authorized committees lack the technological ability to file
reports using the electronic alternative provided by the commission.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2004,)) Each candidate or political
committee that expended ten thousand dollars or more in the preceding
year or expects to expend ten thousand dollars or more in the current
year shall file all contribution reports and expenditure reports
required by this chapter by the electronic alternative provided by the
commission under RCW 42.17.369. ((The commission may make exceptions
on a case-by-case basis for candidates whose authorized committees lack
the technological ability to file reports using the electronic
alternative provided by the commission.
(3))) (2)(a)(i) Beginning January 1, 2007, lobbyists required to
register under RCW 42.17.150, or report under RCW 42.17.170, whose
total reportable accrued compensation and expenses for lobbying,
whether from or on behalf of one or more lobbyist employers, was
twenty-five thousand dollars or more for the previous calendar year, or
is expected to be twenty-five thousand dollars or more for the current
calendar year, must file all reports required by this chapter by the
electronic alternative provided by the commission under RCW 42.17.369.
(ii) Beginning January 1, 2009, lobbyists required to register
under RCW 42.17.150, or report under RCW 42.17.170, whose total
reportable accrued compensation and expenses for lobbying, whether from
or on behalf of one or more lobbyist employers, was ten thousand
dollars or more for the previous calendar year, or is expected to be
ten thousand dollars or more for the current calendar year, must file
all reports required by this chapter by the electronic alternative
provided by the commission under RCW 42.17.369.
(b)(i) Beginning January 1, 2008, lobbyist employers required to
report under RCW 42.17.180 whose total reportable accrued expenses and
payments for lobbying, including those through or on behalf of one or
more lobbyists, was twenty-five thousand dollars or more for the
previous calendar year, or is expected to be twenty-five thousand
dollars or more for the current calendar year, must file all reports
required by this chapter by the electronic alternative provided by the
commission under RCW 42.17.369.
(ii) Beginning January 1, 2010, lobbyist employers required to
report under RCW 42.17.180 whose total reportable accrued expenses and
payments for lobbying, including those through or on behalf of one or
more lobbyists, was ten thousand dollars or more for the previous
calendar year, or is expected to be ten thousand dollars or more for
the current calendar year, must file all reports required by this
chapter by the electronic alternative provided by the commission under
RCW 42.17.369.
(3) The commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis for
candidates, lobbyists, or lobbyist employers who lack the technological
ability to file reports using the electronic alternative provided by
the commission.
(4) Failure by a candidate ((or)), political committee, lobbyist,
or lobbyist employer to comply with this section is a violation of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2004, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---