BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the intent of the legislature that
each county develop programs or procedures that are consistent with the
welfare of indigent and suffering veterans and eligible family members
of those veterans. These programs and procedures must adequately
include the veterans' community at large and provide for the public
good. The legislature recognizes:
(a) The benefits of the veteran's assistance fund and seeks to
ensure that future generations of indigent and suffering veterans and
their eligible family members have access to the fund and the programs
and services that have been established by the individual counties;
(b) That all thirty-nine counties in Washington state have varying
methods of implementing the veteran's assistance fund;
(c) That each of the counties has administered the fund based on
the needs of the veterans in each county;
(d) That interpretation of the statute governing the fund varies
widely from county to county; and
(e) That chapter 73.08 RCW requires further study and potential
future revision to ensure that counties are able to provide assistance
according to the best interests of indigent and suffering veterans and
their eligible family members.
(2) The legislature recognizes that counties have continued to
modify services to meet the evolving needs of indigent veterans and
their families. Nothing in this act is intended to interfere with the
veterans' relief programs or procedures of the counties until a full
study of those programs and procedures has been conducted.
(3) The legislature encourages counties to review their programs to
provide aid to indigent veterans and to ensure that the amount of aid
provided is sufficient to account for inflation in the cost-of-living.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature recognizes that the
current practices of the counties in providing relief to indigent
veterans and their families must not be disrupted. Counties, with or
without veterans' advisory boards, may continue practices and programs
that:
(a) Provide services to veterans other than financial assistance
and aid;
(b) Allow the use of nonprofit organizations and coalitions to
provide indigent veterans' services;
(c) Allow funding from collections made under RCW 73.08.080 to
support current programs providing life changing services; and
(d) Allow funding from collections made under RCW 73.08.080 to
reimburse the county for reasonable administrative costs of providing
veterans' services.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The joint committee on veterans' and
military affairs, created in RCW 73.04.150, shall conduct a study of
matters affecting the administration of the veteran's assistance fund
and shall inform the governor and the legislature on its findings. The
joint committee on veterans' and military affairs shall meet in the
interim preceding the 2005 legislative session to study, investigate,
and weigh the options available with regard to providing relief to
indigent veterans and their families. The study must include:
(a) An analysis of the various methods of implementing the fund
amongst the counties of Washington state. In conducting this analysis,
the committee may consider which of these methods best addresses the
needs of present day and future veterans; and
(b) An examination of whether chapter 73.08 RCW should be amended
to better address the needs of indigent veterans and their families.
(2) Counties, local legislative authorities, veterans' service
programs, and other public or private entities that provide services
under chapter 73.08 RCW shall provide to the joint committee in a
timely manner information concerning the selection, design,
implementation, management, costs, performance, and outcomes of
possible changes to chapter 73.08 RCW.
(3) Any recommendations made by the joint committee must be
reported to the legislature in the form of suggested legislation prior
to the start of the 2005 legislative session.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2005.

Sec. 4 RCW 73.08.010 and 2002 c 292 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the relief of indigent and suffering veterans as defined in RCW
41.04.007 and their families or the families of those deceased, who
need assistance in any city, town or precinct in this state, the
legislative authority of the county in which the city, town or precinct
is situated may provide programs and services which advertise the
availability of aid under this chapter, and shall provide such sum or
sums of money as may be necessary, to be drawn upon by the commander
and quartermaster, or commander and adjutant or commander and service
officer of any post, camp or chapter of any national organization of
veterans now, or which may hereafter be, chartered by an act of
congress in the city or town upon recommendation of the relief
committee of said post, camp or chapter: PROVIDED, Said veteran or the
families of those deceased are and have been residents of the state for
at least twelve months, and the orders of said commander and
quartermaster, or commander and adjutant or commander and service
officer shall be the proper voucher for the expenditure of said sum or
sums of money.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---