BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.040 and 2003 c 53 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree, if the
person owns, has in his or her possession, or has in his or her control
any firearm after having previously been convicted in this state or
elsewhere of any serious offense as defined in this chapter.
(b) Unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree is a class
B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2)(a) A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree, if the
person does not qualify under subsection (1) of this section for the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree and the
person owns, has in his or her possession, or has in his or her control
any firearm:
(i) After having previously been convicted in this state or
elsewhere of any felony not specifically listed as prohibiting firearm
possession under subsection (1) of this section, or any of the
following crimes when committed by one family or household member
against another, committed on or after July 1, 1993: Assault in the
fourth degree, coercion, stalking, reckless endangerment, criminal
trespass in the first degree, or violation of the provisions of a
protection order or no-contact order restraining the person or
excluding the person from a residence (RCW 26.50.060, 26.50.070,
26.50.130, or 10.99.040);
(ii) After having previously been involuntarily committed for
mental health treatment under RCW 71.05.320, 71.34.090, chapter 10.77
RCW, or equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction, unless his or her
right to possess a firearm has been restored as provided in RCW
9.41.047;
(iii) If the person is under eighteen years of age, except as
provided in RCW 9.41.042; and/or
(iv) If the person is free on bond or personal recognizance pending
trial, appeal, or sentencing for a serious offense as defined in RCW
9.41.010.
(b) Unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree is a
class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) ((Notwithstanding RCW 9.41.047 or any other provisions of law,
as used in this chapter, a person has been "convicted", whether in an
adult court or adjudicated in a juvenile court, at such time as a plea
of guilty has been accepted, or a verdict of guilty has been filed,
notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings including but
not limited to sentencing or disposition, post-trial or post-factfinding motions, and appeals. Conviction includes a dismissal
entered after a period of probation, suspension or deferral of
sentence, and also includes equivalent dispositions by courts in
jurisdictions other than Washington state. A person shall not be
precluded from possession of a firearm if the conviction has been the
subject of a pardon, annulment, certificate of rehabilitation, or other
equivalent procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the
person convicted or the conviction or disposition has been the subject
of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a
finding of innocence. Where no record of the court's disposition of
the charges can be found, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that
the person was not convicted of the charge.
(4))) Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (2) of this section, a
person ((convicted of an offense prohibiting the possession of a
firearm under this section other than murder, manslaughter, robbery,
rape, indecent liberties, arson, assault, kidnapping, extortion,
burglary, or violations with respect to controlled substances under RCW
69.50.401 and 69.50.410, who received a probationary sentence under RCW
9.95.200, and who received a dismissal of the charge under RCW
9.95.240, shall not be precluded from possession of a firearm as a
result of the conviction. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this
section, if a person is prohibited from possession of a firearm under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section and has not previously been
convicted of a sex offense prohibiting firearm ownership under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section and/or any felony defined under
any law as a class A felony or with a maximum sentence of at least
twenty years, or both, the individual)) may petition a court of record
to have his or her right to possess a firearm restored when authorized:
(a) Under RCW 9.41.047; and/or
(b)(((i) If the conviction was for a felony offense, after five or
more consecutive years in the community without being convicted or
currently charged with any felony, gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor
crimes, if the individual has no prior felony convictions that prohibit
the possession of a firearm counted as part of the offender score under
RCW 9.94A.525; or
(ii) If the conviction was for a nonfelony offense, after three or
more consecutive years in the community without being convicted or
currently charged with any felony, gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor
crimes, if the individual has no prior felony convictions that prohibit
the possession of a firearm counted as part of the offender score under
RCW 9.94A.525 and the individual has completed all conditions of the
sentence.
(5))) Under section 2 of this act.
(4) In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, if a
person under the age of eighteen years is found by a court to have
possessed a firearm in a vehicle in violation of subsection (1) or (2)
of this section or to have committed an offense while armed with a
firearm during which offense a motor vehicle served an integral
function, the court shall notify the department of licensing within
twenty-four hours and the person's privilege to drive shall be revoked
under RCW 46.20.265.
(((6))) (5) Nothing in chapter 129, Laws of 1995 shall ever be
construed or interpreted as preventing an offender from being charged
and subsequently convicted for the separate felony crimes of theft of
a firearm or possession of a stolen firearm, or both, in addition to
being charged and subsequently convicted under this section for
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree.
Notwithstanding any other law, if the offender is convicted under this
section for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second
degree and for the felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of
a stolen firearm, or both, then the offender shall serve consecutive
sentences for each of the felony crimes of conviction listed in this
subsection.
(((7))) (6) Each firearm unlawfully possessed under this section
shall be a separate offense.
(7) Notwithstanding RCW 9.41.047 or any other provision of law, as
used in this chapter, a person has been "convicted," whether in an
adult court or adjudicated in a juvenile court, at such time as a plea
of guilty has been accepted, or a verdict of guilty has been filed,
notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings including but
not limited to sentencing or disposition, post-trial or post-factfinding motions, and appeals. Conviction includes a dismissal
entered after a period of probation, suspension, or deferral of
sentence, and also includes equivalent dispositions by courts in
jurisdictions other than Washington state. Where no record of the
court's disposition of the charges can be found, there shall be a
rebuttable presumption that the person was not convicted of the charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person shall not be precluded from possession of a firearm if
the conviction has been the subject of a pardon, or other equivalent
procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the person
convicted or the conviction or disposition has been the subject of a
pardon, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of innocence.
These procedures are the only ones by which a person who has been
convicted of a class A felony or a sex offense can have his or her
right to possess a firearm restored.
(2) Notwithstanding RCW 9.41.040(1), a person convicted of an
offense prohibiting the possession of a firearm other than murder,
manslaughter, robbery, rape, indecent liberties, arson, assault in the
first, second, or third degree, kidnapping, extortion, burglary, or
violations with respect to controlled substances under RCW 69.50.401(a)
and 69.50.410, who received a probationary sentence under RCW 9.95.200,
and who received a dismissal of the charge under RCW 9.95.240, shall
not be precluded from possession of a firearm as a result of the
conviction. A person convicted of any of the offenses listed in this
subsection, other than a class A or sex offense, or a person convicted
of an offense not listed in this subsection who did not obtain a
dismissal of charge under RCW 9.95.240 may petition to have his or her
right to possess a firearm restored pursuant to subsection (3) or (4)
of this section.
(3) Notwithstanding RCW 9.41.040(1), a person convicted in
Washington of any class B felony that is not a sex offense, any class
C felony that is not a sex offense, any gross misdemeanor that is not
a sex offense, or any misdemeanor that is not a sex offense who is
prohibited by such conviction from possessing a firearm under RCW
9.41.040(1) may petition a court of record to have his or her right to
possess a firearm restored.
(a) The petition must be filed as a civil suit in the superior
court of the county where the conviction occurred and judgment was
entered. If the person has disqualifying convictions from more than
one county, a separate petition must be filed in each county. The
filing fee for such suit shall be that specified in RCW
36.18.020(2)(a).
(b) The petition must be served on the prosecuting attorney's
office or city attorney's office that prosecuted the crime or crimes
for which relief is sought. Failure to serve the proper prosecuting
attorney's office or city attorney's office will result in a void
order.
(c) The petition shall include a statement, under oath, setting out
the petitioner's criminal history.
(4) A person convicted in another state, in a court-martial or in
a federal court of an offense which is the equivalent to a Washington
class B felony that is not a sex offense, any class C felony that is
not a sex offense, any gross misdemeanor that is not a sex offense, or
any misdemeanor that is not a sex offense, who is prohibited by such
conviction from possessing a firearm under RCW 9.41.040(1) may petition
to have his or her right to possess a firearm restored.
(a) The petition must be filed as a civil suit in the Thurston
county superior court. The filing fee for such suit shall be that
specified in RCW 36.18.020(2)(a).
(b) The petition must be served on the attorney general for the
state of Washington. Failure to properly serve the attorney general
will result in the entry of a void order.
(c) The petition shall include a statement, under oath, setting out
the petitioner's criminal history.
(5) No court shall grant a petition for restoration of the right to
possess a firearm if the disqualifying conviction was for a felony
offense if any one of the following is present:
(a) The petitioner does not currently have five or more consecutive
years in the community without being convicted of any felony, gross
misdemeanor, or misdemeanor crime;
(b) There are any criminal charges against the applicant pending in
any court of this state or another state, or in any federal court;
(c) The petitioner has any prior felony conviction that would
prohibit the possession of a firearm and that count or would count, at
the time the petition is filed, as part of the offender score under RCW
9.94A.525;
(d) The petitioner has not completed all conditions of the sentence
imposed when he or she was convicted of the disqualifying conviction;
or
(e) The petitioner has not provided proper notice of the hearing on
the petition for restoration of firearm rights to the prosecuting
attorney or to the attorney general as required by subsections (1) and
(2) of this section.
(6) No court shall grant a petition for restoration of the right to
possess a firearm if the disqualifying conviction was for a nonfelony
offense if any one of the following is present:
(a) The petitioner does not have three or more consecutive years in
the community without being convicted of any felony, gross misdemeanor,
or misdemeanor crime;
(b) There are any criminal charges against the applicant pending in
any court of this state or another state, or in any federal court;
(c) The petitioner has any prior felony conviction that would
prohibit the possession of a firearm and that count or would count, at
the time the petition is filed, as part of the offender score under RCW
9.94A.525;
(d) The petitioner has not completed all conditions of the sentence
imposed when he or she was convicted of the disqualifying conviction;
or
(e) The petitioner has not provided proper notice of the hearing on
the petition for restoration of firearm rights to the prosecuting
attorney or to the attorney general as required by subsections (1) and
(2) of this section.
(7) In cases where the person has disqualifying convictions in more
than one county or from another state or the federal government, a
court may only issue an order indicating that the disqualification
arising from the conviction or convictions for offenses committed
within that county is hereby removed, unless the person presents orders
demonstrating that the disqualification arising from convictions for
all offenses committed outside the county has been removed. In such a
case, the county court may issue an order restoring the person's right
to possess a firearm.
(8) This section and RCW 9.41.047(3) are the exclusive means by
which a Washington court can restore a person's right to possess a
firearm.
(9) The clerk of the court in which an order granting a petition
restoring a petitioner's right to possess a firearm within the state of
Washington is entered shall immediately transmit the order restoring
the right to possess a firearm to the Washington state patrol
identification section. The Washington state patrol shall immediately
update their records to reflect the entry of the order restoring the
petitioner's right to possess a firearm.
(10) Any order restoring the right to possess a firearm shall
contain a warning substantially as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal
law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you
are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you
may be prosecuted in federal court. An order restoring your
right to possess a firearm in Washington is not a defense to a
federal prosecution or to a prosecution under the laws of
another state.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.92.066 and 2003 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Upon termination of any suspended sentence under RCW 9.92.060
or 9.95.210, such person may apply to the court for restoration of his
or her civil rights. Thereupon the court may in its discretion enter
an order directing that such defendant shall thereafter be released
from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense or crime
of which he or she has been convicted.
(2)(a) Upon termination of a suspended sentence under RCW 9.92.060
or 9.95.210, the person may apply to the sentencing court for a
vacation of the person's record of conviction under RCW 9.94A.640. The
court may, in its discretion, clear the record of conviction if it
finds the person has met the equivalent of the tests in RCW
9.94A.640(2) as those tests would be applied to a person convicted of
a crime committed before July 1, 1984.
(b) The clerk of the court in which the vacation order is entered
shall immediately transmit the order vacating the conviction to the
Washington state patrol identification section and to the local police
agency, if any, which holds criminal history information for the person
who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state patrol and
any such local police agency shall immediately update their records to
reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall transmit the order
vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of investigation. A
conviction that has been vacated under this section may not be
disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement
agency to any person, except other criminal justice enforcement
agencies.
(3) An order entered under subsection (1) or (2) of this section
does not restore the person's right to possess a firearm. Any order
entered under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall clearly
advise the person that the person's right to restore a firearm is not
affected by the entry of the order and that the right to possess a
firearm may only be restored pursuant to section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.637 and 2003 c 379 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When an offender has completed all requirements of the
sentence, including any and all legal financial obligations, and while
under the custody and supervision of the department, the secretary or
the secretary's designee shall notify the sentencing court, which shall
discharge the offender and provide the offender with a certificate of
discharge by issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by
mailing the certificate to the offender's last known address.
(b)(i) When an offender has reached the end of his or her
supervision with the department and has completed all the requirements
of the sentence except his or her legal financial obligations, the
secretary's designee shall provide the county clerk with a notice that
the offender has completed all nonfinancial requirements of the
sentence.
(ii) When the department has provided the county clerk with notice
that an offender has completed all the requirements of the sentence and
the offender subsequently satisfies all legal financial obligations
under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the sentencing court,
including the notice from the department, which shall discharge the
offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the
certificate to the offender's last known address.
(2) The court shall send a copy of every signed certificate of
discharge to the auditor for the county in which the court resides and
to the department. The department shall create and maintain a data
base containing the names of all felons who have been issued
certificates of discharge, the date of discharge, and the date of
conviction and offense.
(3) An offender who is not convicted of a violent offense or a sex
offense and is sentenced to a term involving community supervision may
be considered for a discharge of sentence by the sentencing court prior
to the completion of community supervision, provided that the offender
has completed at least one-half of the term of community supervision
and has met all other sentence requirements.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
discharge shall have the effect of restoring all civil rights lost by
operation of law upon conviction except for the right to possess a
firearm, and the certificate of discharge shall so state. Nothing in
this section prohibits the use of an offender's prior record for
purposes of determining sentences for later offenses as provided in
this chapter. Nothing in this section affects or prevents use of the
offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution either as
an element of an offense or for impeachment purposes. A certificate of
discharge is not based on a finding of rehabilitation. The right to
possess a firearm may only be restored pursuant to section 2 of this
act.
(5) Unless otherwise ordered by the sentencing court, a certificate
of discharge shall not terminate the offender's obligation to comply
with an order issued under chapter 10.99 RCW that excludes or prohibits
the offender from having contact with a specified person or coming
within a set distance of any specified location that was contained in
the judgment and sentence. An offender who violates such an order
after a certificate of discharge has been issued shall be subject to
prosecution according to the chapter under which the order was
originally issued.
(6) Upon release from custody, the offender may apply to the
department for counseling and help in adjusting to the community. This
voluntary help may be provided for up to one year following the release
from custody.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.640 and 1987 c 486 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every offender who has been discharged under RCW 9.94A.637 may
apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of the offender's record
of conviction. If the court finds the offender meets the tests
prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the court may clear the
record of conviction by: (a) Permitting the offender to withdraw the
offender's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty; or (b) if
the offender has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, by the
court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (c) by the court
dismissing the information or indictment against the offender.
(2) An offender may not have the record of conviction cleared if:
(a) There are any criminal charges against the offender pending in any
court of this state or another state, or in any federal court; (b) the
offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; (c) the
offense was a crime against persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830; (d)
the offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state, another
state, or federal court since the date of the offender's discharge
under RCW 9.94A.637; (e) the offense is a class B felony and less than
ten years have passed since the date the applicant was discharged under
RCW 9.94A.637; and (f) the offense was a class C felony and less than
five years have passed since the date the applicant was discharged
under RCW 9.94A.637.
(3) Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection
(1) of this section, the fact that the offender has been convicted of
the offense shall not be included in the offender's criminal history
for purposes of determining a sentence in any subsequent conviction,
and the offender shall be released from all penalties and disabilities
resulting from the offense except as set forth in subsection (4) of
this section. For all purposes, including responding to questions on
employment applications, an offender whose conviction has been vacated
may state that the offender has never been convicted of that crime.
Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use of an offender's
prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.
(4) The order vacating a record of conviction under subsection (1)
of this section does not restore the offender's right to possess a
firearm. The order vacating the record of conviction shall clearly
advise the offender that the offender's right to restore a firearm is
not affected by the entry of the order and that the right to possess a
firearm may only be restored pursuant to section 2 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.95.240 and 2003 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Every defendant who has fulfilled the conditions of his or her
probation for the entire period thereof, or who shall have been
discharged from probation prior to the termination of the period
thereof, may at any time prior to the expiration of the maximum period
of punishment for the offense for which he or she has been convicted be
permitted in the discretion of the court to withdraw his or her plea of
guilty and enter a plea of not guilty, or if he or she has been
convicted after a plea of not guilty, the court may in its discretion
set aside the verdict of guilty; and in either case, the court may
thereupon dismiss the information or indictment against such defendant,
who shall thereafter be released from all penalties and disabilities
resulting from the offense or crime of which he or she has been
convicted, except as stated in subsection (3) of this section. The
probationer shall be informed of this right in his or her probation
papers: PROVIDED, That in any subsequent prosecution, for any other
offense, such prior conviction may be pleaded and proved, and shall
have the same effect as if probation had not been granted, or the
information or indictment dismissed.
(2)(a) After the period of probation has expired, the defendant may
apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of the defendant's record
of conviction under RCW 9.94A.640. The court may, in its discretion,
clear the record of conviction if it finds the defendant has met the
equivalent of the tests in RCW 9.94A.640(2) as those tests would be
applied to a person convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984.
(b) The clerk of the court in which the vacation order is entered
shall immediately transmit the order vacating the conviction to the
Washington state patrol identification section and to the local police
agency, if any, which holds criminal history information for the person
who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state patrol and
any such local police agency shall immediately update their records to
reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall transmit the order
vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of investigation. A
conviction that has been vacated under this section may not be
disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement
agency to any person, except other criminal justice enforcement
agencies.
(3) The order dismissing the information or indictment under
subsection (1) of this section does not restore the offender's right to
possess a firearm. The order dismissing the information or indictment
under subsection (1) of this section shall clearly advise the offender
that the offender's right to restore a firearm is not affected by the
entry of the order and that the right to possess a firearm may only be
restored pursuant to section 2 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.96.050 and 2002 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
When a prisoner on parole has performed all obligations of his or
her release, including any and all legal financial obligations, for
such time as shall satisfy the indeterminate sentence review board that
his or her final release is not incompatible with the best interests of
society and the welfare of the paroled individual, the board may make
a final order of discharge and issue a certificate of discharge to the
prisoner. The certificate of discharge shall be issued to the offender
in person or by mail to the prisoner's last known address.
The board shall send a copy of every signed certificate of
discharge to the auditor for the county in which the offender was
sentenced and to the department of corrections. The department shall
create and maintain a data base containing the names of all felons who
have been issued certificates of discharge, the date of discharge, and
the date of conviction and offense.
The board retains the jurisdiction to issue a certificate of
discharge after the expiration of the prisoner's or parolee's maximum
statutory sentence. If not earlier granted, the board shall make a
final order of discharge three years from the date of parole unless the
parolee is on suspended or revoked status at the expiration of the
three years. Such discharge, regardless of when issued, shall have the
effect of restoring all civil rights lost by operation of law upon
conviction, and the certification of discharge shall so state. This
restoration of civil rights shall not restore the right to receive,
possess, own, or transport firearms, and the certification of discharge
shall so state.
The discharge provided for in this section shall be considered as
a part of the sentence of the convicted person and shall not in any
manner be construed as affecting the powers of the governor to pardon
any such person.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.96.060 and 2001 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
offense who has completed all of the terms of the sentence for the
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense may apply to the sentencing
court for a vacation of the applicant's record of conviction for the
offense. If the court finds the applicant meets the tests prescribed
in subsection (2) of this section, the court may in its discretion
vacate the record of conviction by: (a)(i) Permitting the applicant to
withdraw the applicant's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not
guilty; or (ii) if the applicant has been convicted after a plea of not
guilty, the court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (b) the
court dismissing the information, indictment, complaint, or citation
against the applicant and vacating the judgment and sentence.
(2) An applicant may not have the record of conviction for a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense vacated if any one of the
following is present:
(a) There are any criminal charges against the applicant pending in
any court of this state or another state, or in any federal court;
(b) The offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030
or an attempt to commit a violent offense;
(c) The offense was a violation of RCW 46.61.502 (driving while
under the influence), 46.61.504 (actual physical control while under
the influence), or 9.91.020 (operating a railroad, etc. while
intoxicated);
(d) The offense was any misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor violation,
including attempt, of chapter 9.68 RCW (obscenity and pornography),
chapter 9.68A RCW (sexual exploitation of children), or chapter 9A.44
RCW (sex offenses);
(e) The applicant was convicted of a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor offense as defined in RCW 10.99.020, or the court
determines after a review of the court file that the offense was
committed by one family member or household member against another, or
the court, after considering the damage to person or property that
resulted in the conviction, any prior convictions for crimes defined in
RCW 10.99.020, or for comparable offenses in another state or in
federal court, and the totality of the records under review by the
court regarding the conviction being considered for vacation,
determines that the offense involved domestic violence, and any one of
the following factors exist:
(i) The applicant has not provided written notification of the
vacation petition to the prosecuting attorney's office that prosecuted
the offense for which vacation is sought, or has not provided that
notification to the court;
(ii) The applicant has previously had a conviction for domestic
violence. For purposes of this subsection, however, if the current
application is for more than one conviction that arose out of a single
incident, none of those convictions counts as a previous conviction;
(iii) The applicant has signed an affidavit under penalty of
perjury affirming that the applicant has not previously had a
conviction for a domestic violence offense, and a criminal history
check reveals that the applicant has had such a conviction; or
(iv) Less than five years have elapsed since the person completed
the terms of the original conditions of the sentence, including any
financial obligations and successful completion of any treatment
ordered as a condition of sentencing;
(f) For any offense other than those described in (e) of this
subsection, less than three years have passed since the person
completed the terms of the sentence, including any financial
obligations;
(g) The offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state,
another state, or federal court since the date of conviction;
(h) The applicant has ever had the record of another conviction
vacated; or
(i) The applicant is currently restrained, or has been restrained
within five years prior to the vacation application, by a domestic
violence protection order, a no-contact order, an antiharassment order,
or a civil restraining order which restrains one party from contacting
the other party.
(3) Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection
(1) of this section, the person shall be released from all penalties
and disabilities resulting from the offense except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section and the fact that the person has been
convicted of the offense shall not be included in the person's criminal
history for purposes of determining a sentence in any subsequent
conviction. For all purposes, including responding to questions on
employment or housing applications, a person whose conviction has been
vacated under subsection (1) of this section may state that he or she
has never been convicted of that crime. Nothing in this section
affects or prevents the use of an offender's prior conviction in a
later criminal prosecution.
(4) The order vacating a record of conviction under subsection (1)
of this section does not restore the person's right to possess a
firearm if such right was revoked by RCW 9.41.040. The order vacating
the record of conviction shall clearly advise the offender that the
offender's right to restore a firearm is not affected by the entry of
the order and that the right to possess a firearm may only be restored
pursuant to section 2 of this act.
(5) All costs incurred by the court and probation services shall be
paid by the person making the motion to vacate the record unless a
determination is made pursuant to chapter 10.101 RCW that the person
making the motion is indigent, at the time the motion is brought.
(((5))) (6) The clerk of the court in which the vacation order is
entered shall immediately transmit the order vacating the conviction to
the Washington state patrol identification section and to the local
police agency, if any, which holds criminal history information for the
person who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state
patrol and any such local police agency shall immediately update their
records to reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall transmit
the order vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of
investigation. A conviction that has been vacated under this section
may not be disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law
enforcement agency to any person, except other criminal justice
enforcement agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---