BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The chief of the Washington state patrol,
through the director of fire protection, shall convene a task force to
assess whether county and city governments should be authorized, when
adopting ordinances more restrictive than state law, to have these
ordinances go into effect sooner than one year after adoption. The
task force shall consist of four representatives of local fire
officials and four representatives of businesses that sell fireworks in
Washington. The director of fire protection shall serve as chair of
the task force. The task force must submit recommendations to the
legislature by December 1, 2004.
This section expires July 1, 2005.

--- END ---