BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.0491 and 1999 c 311 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Qualifying project" means a project designed to achieve job
creation or business retention, to add or upgrade nonelectrical
infrastructure, to add or upgrade health and safety facilities, to
accomplish energy and water use efficiency improvements, including
renewable energy development, or to add or upgrade emergency services
in any designated qualifying rural area.
(b) "Qualifying rural area" means:
(i) A rural county, which on the date that a contribution is made
to an electric utility rural economic development revolving fund is a
county with a population density of less than one hundred persons per
square mile as determined by the office of financial management ((and
published each year by the department for the period July 1st to June
30th)); or
(ii) Any geographic area in the state that receives electricity
from a light and power business with twelve thousand or fewer customers
((and with fewer than twenty-six meters per mile of distribution line
as determined and published by the department of revenue effective July
1st of each year. The department shall use current data provided by
the electricity industry)).
(c) "Electric utility rural economic development revolving fund"
means a fund devoted exclusively to funding qualifying projects in
qualifying rural areas.
(d) "Local board" is a board of directors with at least, but not
limited to, three members representing local businesses and community
groups who have been appointed by the sponsoring electric utility to
oversee and direct the activities of the electric utility rural
economic development revolving fund.
(2) A light and power business ((with fewer than twenty-six active
meters per mile of distribution line in any geographic area in the
state)) shall be allowed a credit against taxes due under this chapter
in an amount equal to fifty percent of contributions made in any
((calendar)) fiscal year directly to an electric utility rural economic
development revolving fund. The credit shall be taken in a form and
manner as required by the department. The credit under this section
shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars per ((calendar)) fiscal
year per light and power business. The credit may not exceed the tax
that would otherwise be due under this chapter. Refunds shall not be
granted in the place of credits. Expenditures not used to earn a
credit in one ((calendar)) fiscal year may not be used to earn a credit
in subsequent years, except that this limitation does not apply to
expenditures made between January 1, 2004, and March 31, 2004, which
expenditures may be used to earn a credit through December 30, 2004.
(3) The right to earn tax credits under this section expires
((December 31, 2005)) June 30, 2011.
(4) To qualify for the credit in subsection (2) of this section,
the light and power business shall establish an electric utility rural
economic development revolving fund which is governed by a local board
whose members shall reside or work in the qualifying rural area served
by the light and power business. The local board shall have authority
to determine all criteria and conditions for the expenditure of funds
from the electric utility rural economic development (([revolving]))
revolving fund, and for the terms and conditions of repayment.
(5) Any funds repaid to the electric utility rural economic
development (([revolving])) revolving fund by recipients shall be made
available for additional qualifying projects.
(6) If at any time the electric utility rural economic development
(([revolving])) revolving fund is dissolved, any moneys claimed as a
tax credit under this section shall either be granted to a qualifying
project or refunded to the state within two years of termination.
(7) The total amount of credits that may be used in any fiscal year
shall not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars in any fiscal
year. The department shall allow the use of earned credits on a first-come, first-served basis. Unused earned credits may be carried over to
subsequent years.
(8) The following provisions apply to expenditures under subsection
(2) of this section made between January 1, 2004, and March 31, 2004:
(a) Credits earned from such expenditures are not considered in
computing the statewide limitation set forth in subsection (7) of this
section for the period July 1, 2004, through December 31, 2004; and
(b) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, the credit allowed
under this section for light and power businesses making expenditures
is limited to thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that
accountability and effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax
policy. In order to make policy choices regarding the best use of
limited state resources the legislature needs information to evaluate
whether the stated goals of legislation were achieved.
(2) The goal of the tax credit available to light and power
businesses for contributing to an electric utility rural economic
development revolving fund in section 1 of this act is to support
qualifying projects that create or retain jobs, add or upgrade health
and safety facilities, facilitate energy and water conservation, or
develop renewable sources of energy in a qualified area. The goal of
this tax credit is achieved when the investment of the revolving funds
established under section 1 of this act have generated capital
investment in an amount of four million seven hundred fifty thousand
dollars or more within a five-year period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---