BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.225.225 and 2003 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for students who reside out-of-state, a district
((shall)) must accept applications from nonresident students who are
the children of full-time certificated and classified school employees,
and those children ((shall be)) are permitted to enroll:
(a) At the school to which the employee is assigned; or
(b) At a school forming the district's K through 12 continuum which
includes the school to which the employee is assigned.
(2) A district also must accept applications from nonresident
students who are transferring under section 2 of this act and permit
those children to enroll and attend school for the duration of the
school calendar year during which a strike or work stoppage occurs.
(3) A district may reject applications under this section if:
(a) The student's disciplinary records indicate a history of
convictions for offenses or crimes, violent or disruptive behavior, or
gang membership;
(b) The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school
for more than ten consecutive days. Any policy allowing for
readmission of expelled or suspended students under this subsection
(((2))) (3)(b) must apply uniformly to both resident and nonresident
applicants; or
(c) Enrollment of a child under subsection (1) of this section
would displace a child who is a resident of the district, except that
if a child is admitted under subsection (1) of this section, that child
((shall be)) is permitted to remain enrolled at that school, or in that
district's kindergarten through twelfth grade continuum, until he or
she has completed his or her schooling.
(((3))) (4) Except as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, all districts accepting applications from nonresident students
or from students receiving home-based instruction for admission to the
district's schools ((shall)) must consider equally all applications
received. Each school district ((shall)) must adopt a policy
establishing rational, fair, and equitable standards for ((acceptance
and rejection of)) accepting and rejecting applications by June 30,
1990. The policy may include ((rejection of)) rejecting a nonresident
student if:
(a) ((Acceptance of)) Accepting a nonresident student would result
in the district experiencing a financial hardship;
(b) The student's disciplinary records indicate a history of
convictions for offenses or crimes, violent or disruptive behavior, or
gang membership; or
(c) The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school
for more than ten consecutive days. Any policy allowing for
readmission of expelled or suspended students under this subsection
(((3))) (4)(c) must apply uniformly to both resident and nonresident
applicants.
For purposes of subsections (((2))) (3)(a) and (((3))) (4)(b) of
this section, "gang" means a group ((which)) that: (i) Consists of
three or more persons; (ii) has identifiable leadership; and (iii) on
an ongoing basis, regularly conspires and acts in concert mainly for
criminal purposes.
(((4))) (5) The district ((shall)) must provide to applicants
written notification of ((the approval or denial of)) accepting or
rejecting the application in a timely manner. If the application is
rejected, the notification ((shall)) must include the reason or reasons
for denial and a statement of the right to appeal under RCW
28A.225.230(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If a concerted work stoppage or strike by teachers in a school
district continues for one or more regularly scheduled school days, the
students residing in and currently enrolled in that district are
eligible to enroll in another district or a private school approved
under chapter 28A.195 RCW. Students seeking to enroll in an approved
private school are subject to the limitations and restrictions of the
private school.
(2) For each student who enrolls under this section in a private
school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW, the superintendent of public
instruction must provide prompt and timely funding to private schools
through the apportionment funding formulas in amounts the student would
have generated if the student was enrolled in a public school in the
district in which the private school is located, except that a private
school is not eligible for small school assistance or remote and
necessary assistance. Funding for private schools:
(a) Continues until the end of the school year in which the strike
occurred or until the student is no longer enrolled in the school,
whichever occurs first;
(b) Includes regular apportionment, categorical, student
achievement, and other nonbasic education moneys, as appropriate; and
(c) Is based on enrollment, staffing, and other financial
information submitted by the district in which the private school is
located to the superintendent as required to determine state
apportionment amounts.
Private schools may be required to provide additional necessary
information to the superintendent to be eligible for funding.
Allocations to private schools that are included in RCW
84.52.0531(3) (a) through (c) must be included in the levy base of the
district in which the private school is located.
(3) To be eligible to receive state categorical program funding, an
approved private school must serve students who would be eligible for
program funding if served by the school district in which the private
school is located, and must actually provide the program for which
funding is received.
(4) Approved private schools receiving moneys under this section
must submit, by November 1st of each year, to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction annual year-end financial
information, as prescribed by the superintendent.

--- END ---