BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.345.020 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.61.020 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Each board of directors of the school districts of the state
must be a member of the Washington state school directors' association
or another organization within the state that provides services that
include but need not be limited to:
(a) Coordinating policymaking, control, and management of school
districts;
(b) Conducting studies and disseminating information on ways to
increase the efficiency of school board administration;
(c) Purchasing liability insurance for school directors, which may
indemnify the directors against any or all liabilities for personal or
bodily injuries and property damage arising from their acts or
omissions while performing or while in good faith purporting to perform
their official duties as school directors;
(d) Providing advice and assistance to local boards to promote
their primary duty of representing the public interest; and
(e) Upon request by a local school district board of directors,
providing specialized services, research information, and consultants
to advise and assist the board in particular problem areas, if the
information or services or consultants are not already available from
other state agencies, educational service districts, or from
information and research services authorized by RCW 28A.320.110.
(2) The membership of the school directors' association ((shall
comprise the members of the boards)) is composed of school directors
((of the)) from school districts ((of the state)) located in Washington
that choose to join the association.

--- END ---