BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds:
(a) Childhood obesity has reached epidemic levels in Washington and
throughout the nation. Nearly one in five Washington adolescents in
grades nine through twelve were recently found to be either overweight
or at risk of being overweight;
(b) Overweight and obese children are at higher risk for developing
severe long-term health problems, including but not limited to Type 2
diabetes, cardiovascular disease, high blood pressure, and certain
cancers;
(c) Overweight youth also are often affected by discrimination,
psychological stress, and low self-esteem;
(d) Obesity and subsequent diseases are largely preventable through
diet and regular physical activity;
(e) A child who has eaten a well-balanced meal and is healthy is
more likely to be prepared to learn in the classroom;
(f) Encouraging adolescents to adopt healthy lifelong eating habits
can increase their productivity and reduce their risk of dying
prematurely;
(g) Frequent eating of carbohydrate-rich foods or drinking sweet
liquids throughout the day increases a child's risk for dental decay,
the most common chronic childhood disease; and
(h) Schools are a logical place to address the issue of obesity in
children and adolescents and to provide students with skills,
opportunities, and encouragement to adopt a healthy lifestyle. Primary
responsibility for the issue of obesity in children and adolescents,
however, remains with parents and guardians.
(2) While the United States department of agriculture regulates the
nutritional content of meals sold in schools under its school breakfast
and lunch program, limited standards are in place to regulate
"competitive foods," which may be high in added sugars, sodium, and
saturated fat content. However, the United States department of
agriculture does call for states and local entities to add restrictions
on competitive foods, as necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Consistent with the essential academic learning requirements
for health and fitness, including nutrition, the department, with the
assistance of the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
the Washington state school directors association, the state board of
education, and the board of health, shall convene an advisory committee
to develop a model policy regarding access to nutritious foods,
opportunities for developmentally appropriate exercise, and accurate
information related to these topics. The policy shall address the
nutritional content of foods and beverages, including fluoridated
bottled water, sold or provided throughout the school day or sold in
competition with the federal school breakfast and lunch program,
commercial marketing of products and services in schools, and the
availability and quality of health, nutrition, and physical education
curricula.
(2) The department shall submit the model policy and
recommendations on the related issues, along with a recommendation for
local adoption to the governor and the legislature, and shall post the
model policy on its web site by January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
After reviewing the model policy developed under section 2 of this
act, each district's board of directors shall establish its own policy
by August 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---