BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the higher
education system in Washington state has historically provided
opportunities for advanced study for thousands of residents, produced
high quality scholars and graduates, and facilitated world class
research and innovation. But the new global economy demands even more
from our colleges and universities in terms of highly trained and
skilled workers and research to fuel future economic growth.
(2) The legislature further finds that, since 1997, public
institutions of higher education have developed and maintained a system
of performance measures to monitor progress in improving graduation
efficiency, faculty productivity, student achievement of degrees and
certifications, and other topics. However, the current performance
measurement system is too limited in scope and scale. Only a few
measures reflect the unique role and mission of an institution. There
is little dialog between state policymakers and institution leaders
regarding the challenges facing our colleges and universities and the
outcomes expected by the public and the state.
(3) The legislature further finds that procedures for operating
budgets, enrollment management, and strategic planning for higher
education are not adequately coordinated. The state and institutions
must jointly discuss and establish clear priorities and acknowledge
potential trade-offs of funding decisions.
(4) Therefore, the legislature intends to explore a new
relationship between the state and public institutions of higher
education that includes dialog and negotiation over goals, priorities,
performance, and resources, and also includes explicit commitments made
by each party aimed at achieving agreed-upon outcomes. The mechanism
to implement this relationship is a performance contract, to be
initiated on a pilot basis with selected institutions beginning in
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 As used in this chapter, a performance
contract:
(1) Is an agreement reached between the governor and the governing
board of an institution of higher education, or in the case of
community or technical colleges the state board for community and
technical colleges, as provided in section 3 of this act and approved
by the legislature as provided in section 6 of this act;
(2) Addresses statewide goals and priorities of the legislature;
(3) Addresses resident undergraduate enrollment levels;
(4) Contains goals and commitments from both the institution and
the state;
(5) Includes quantifiable performance measures and benchmarks; and
(6) Reflects the unique role and mission of the institution within
the state's higher education system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The governor's office with assistance
from the higher education coordinating board shall enter into
negotiations with the governing boards of one state research university
and one state regional university, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, to
create a performance contract on a pilot basis with each institution.
A governing board of a four-year institution may nominate its
institution for the pilot performance contract by communicating to the
governor and higher education coordinating board that it is ready and
willing to participate in the contract process. If more than one
research and one regional university are nominated, the governor's
office with assistance from the higher education coordinating board
shall select those institutions that offer the best opportunity for a
pilot test of the feasibility of performance contracts.
(2) The governor's office with assistance from the higher education
coordinating board shall enter into negotiations with the state board
for community and technical colleges to create performance contracts on
a pilot basis with one state community or technical college, as defined
in RCW 28B.10.016. A governing board of a community or technical
college may nominate its college for the pilot performance contract by
communicating to the state board that it is ready and willing to
participate in the contract process. If more than one college is
nominated, the state board shall select the college that offers the
best opportunity for a pilot test of the feasibility of a performance
contract.
(3) In developing a contract, the negotiating team from an
institution of higher education must involve student and faculty
representatives.
(4) The term of a performance contract negotiated under this
section is six years, beginning with the 2005-06 academic year and
ending with the 2010-11 academic year.
(5) During the contract negotiation process, the governor's office
shall consult with the contract evaluator under section 7 of this act
to ensure the contract terms and indicators are suitable for evaluation
by 2008.
(6) The institutions shall report all data necessary to implement,
evaluate, and monitor each performance contract to the office of
financial management, the legislature, and the higher education
coordinating board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Performance contracts shall contain:
(a) Indicators that measure outcomes concerning cost, price,
quality, improvements in faculty salaries and faculty ratios, and
timeliness of student progress toward degrees and certifications;
(b) Indicators that measure the efficiency and effectiveness of
institutional processes; and
(c) Strategies, actions, and results committed to by the
institution in order to achieve statewide goals.
(2) Examples of possible topics that could be addressed in a
performance contract include student retention, graduation, and
completion rates; graduation efficiency; student learning outcomes;
postgraduation employment in field of study; faculty productivity;
facilities stewardship; efficient and effective fiscal and management
practices; cost of degrees; and research productivity.
(3) The governor and institutional negotiating teams shall identify
indicators and levels of performance that are clearly linked to the
role, mission, and strategic plan of the institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Performance contracts shall include
grants to the institution, under the terms of the contract, of
flexibility or waivers from state controls or regulations.
(2) The higher education coordinating board and institutional
negotiating teams shall identify areas where statutory change is
necessary to grant an institution flexibility or waivers of state
regulations. The governor shall submit legislation necessary to
implement a performance contract to the higher education committees of
the senate and house of representatives for the 2005 legislative
session.
(3) The following areas may not be included in a performance
contract:
(a) Flexibility or waivers of requirements in a collective
bargaining agreement negotiated under chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 41.59,
41.76, or 41.80 RCW;
(b) Flexibility or waivers of administrative rules or processes
governed by chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 41.59, 41.76, or 41.80 RCW;
(c) Rules, processes, duties, rights, and responsibilities of the
academic faculty as contained in the faculty codes of the four-year
institution;
(d) Flexibility or waivers of requirements under chapter 39.12 RCW;
(e) Flexibility or waivers of administrative rules or other
regulations that address health and safety, civil rights, and
nondiscrimination laws that apply to institutions of higher education;
and
(f) State laws covering terms and conditions of employment,
including but not limited to salaries, job security, and health,
retirement, unemployment, or any other employment benefits.
(4) Unlimited authority for institutions to establish tuition for
resident undergraduate students under the terms of a contract may not
be a subject of negotiation. The terms of a contract must include
assurance that the proportion of tuition revenue allocated to
institutional financial aid for needy students will be maintained or
increased. In turn, it is the legislature's intent to maintain state
support for higher education during the term of the contract and not
have students bear a disproportionate share of any increase in tuition.
(5) Under the terms of the contract with the research university,
return from technology transfer shall be maximized to generate
increased investment in undergraduate and graduate instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The governor shall present a preliminary
draft of the performance contracts at a joint meeting of the higher
education committees of the senate and house of representatives in
December 2004 for their review and input. The governor shall submit
the completed performance contracts to the legislature by January 15,
2005. Following public hearings, the legislature shall have the
opportunity, by concurrent resolution, to approve or reject each
performance contract as a whole.
(2) If the legislature rejects a submission, the performance
contract shall be returned to the parties for renegotiation. If the
legislature fails to act on a submission, the performance contract
shall be terminated and the pilot process concluded for that
institution.
(3) All cost items contained within a performance contract shall be
subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Beginning September 2005, the higher
education coordinating board shall provide annual progress reports to
the higher education committees of the senate and house of
representatives on implementation of the performance contracts and any
short-term outcomes. The overall purpose of the progress reports is to
focus attention on key measures of institution performance and gain an
improved understanding of the causes of success or lack of success in
making progress in achieving the goals in the contract.
(2) The Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct
an evaluation of the pilot performance contracts and make
recommendations regarding change, continuation, or expansion of the
contract process to include additional colleges and universities. The
evaluation shall be submitted to the governor and higher education
committees of the senate and house of representatives by January 15,
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---