BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.310 and 1995 c 403 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To meet the intent of providing greater public access to
administrative rule making and to promote consensus among interested
parties, agencies shall solicit comments from the public on a subject
of possible rule making before filing with the code reviser a notice of
proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320. The agency shall prepare a
statement of inquiry that:
(a) Identifies the specific statute or statutes authorizing the
agency to adopt rules on this subject;
(b) Discusses why rules on this subject may be needed and what they
might accomplish;
(c) Identifies other federal and state agencies that regulate this
subject, and describes the process whereby the agency would coordinate
the contemplated rule with these agencies;
(d) Discusses the process by which the rule might be developed,
including, but not limited to, negotiated rule making, pilot rule
making, or agency study;
(e) Specifies the process by which interested parties can
effectively participate in the decision to adopt a new rule and
formulation of a proposed rule before its publication.
The statement of inquiry shall be filed with the code reviser for
publication in the state register at least thirty days before the date
the agency files notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320 and
the statement, or a summary of the information contained in that
statement, shall be sent to any party that has requested receipt of the
agency's statements of inquiry.
(2) Agencies are encouraged to develop and use new procedures for
reaching agreement among interested parties before publication of
notice and the adoption hearing on a proposed rule. Examples of new
procedures include, but are not limited to:
(a) Negotiated rule making by which representatives of an agency
and of the interests that are affected by a subject of rule making,
including, where appropriate, county and city representatives, seek to
reach consensus on the terms of the proposed rule and on the process by
which it is negotiated; and
(b) Pilot rule making which includes testing the feasibility of
complying with or administering draft new rules or draft amendments to
existing rules through the use of volunteer pilot groups in various
areas and circumstances, as provided in RCW 34.05.313 or as otherwise
provided by the agency.
(3)(a) An agency must make a determination whether negotiated rule
making, pilot rule making, or another process for generating
participation from interested parties prior to development of the rule
is appropriate.
(b) An agency must include a written justification in the rule-making file if an opportunity for interested parties to participate in
the rule-making process prior to publication of the proposed rule has
not been provided.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(b) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that
are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;
(c) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes,
rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs
other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(d) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect;
(e) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute;
(f) Rules that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative
standards; or
(g) Rules that adopt, amend, or repeal:
(i) A procedure, practice, or requirement relating to agency
hearings; or
(ii) A filing or related process requirement for applying to an
agency for a license or permit.

Sec. 2 RCW 34.05.320 and 2003 c 165 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At least twenty days before the rule-making hearing at which
the agency receives public comment regarding adoption of a rule, the
agency shall cause notice of the hearing to be published in the state
register. The publication constitutes the proposal of a rule. The
notice shall include all of the following:
(a) A title, a description of the rule's purpose, and any other
information which may be of assistance in identifying the rule or its
purpose;
(b) Citations of the statutory authority for adopting the rule and
the specific statute the rule is intended to implement;
(c) A ((summary)) short explanation of the rule, its purpose, and
anticipated effects, including in the case of a proposal that would
modify existing rules, a short description of the changes the proposal
would make, and a statement of the reasons supporting the proposed
action;
(d) The agency personnel, with their office location and telephone
number, who are responsible for the drafting, implementation, and
enforcement of the rule;
(e) The name of the person or organization, whether private,
public, or governmental, proposing the rule;
(f) Agency comments or recommendations, if any, regarding statutory
language, implementation, enforcement, and fiscal matters pertaining to
the rule;
(g) Whether the rule is necessary as the result of federal law or
federal or state court action, and if so, a ((copy of)) citation to
such law or court decision ((shall be attached to the purpose
statement));
(h) When, where, and how persons may present their views on the
proposed rule;
(i) The date on which the agency intends to adopt the rule;
(j) ((A short explanation of the rule, its purpose, and anticipated
effects, including in the case of a proposal that would modify existing
rules, a short description of the changes the proposal would make;
(k))) A copy of the small business economic impact statement
prepared under chapter 19.85 RCW, or an explanation for why the agency
did not prepare the statement;
(((l))) (k) A statement indicating whether RCW 34.05.328 applies to
the rule adoption; and
(((m))) (l) If RCW 34.05.328 does apply, a statement indicating
that a copy of the preliminary cost-benefit analysis described in RCW
34.05.328(1)(c) is available.
(2)(a) Upon filing notice of the proposed rule with the code
reviser, the adopting agency shall have copies of the notice on file
and available for public inspection ((and)). Except as provided in (b)
of this subsection, the agency shall forward three copies of the notice
to the rules review committee.
(b) A pilot of at least ten agencies, including the departments of
labor and industries, fish and wildlife, revenue, ecology, retirement
systems, and health, shall file the copies required under this
subsection, as well as under RCW 34.05.350 and 34.05.353, with the
rules review committee electronically for a period of four years from
the effective date of this section. The office of regulatory
assistance shall negotiate the details of the pilot among the agencies,
the legislature, and the code reviser.
(3) No later than three days after its publication in the state
register, the agency shall cause either a copy of the notice of
proposed rule adoption, or a summary of the information contained on
the notice, to be mailed to each person, city, and county that has made
a request to the agency for a mailed copy of such notices. An agency
may charge for the actual cost of providing a requesting party mailed
copies of these notices.
(4) In addition to the notice required by subsections (1) and (2)
of this section, an institution of higher education shall cause the
notice to be published in the campus or standard newspaper of the
institution at least seven days before the rule-making hearing.

Sec. 3 RCW 34.05.230 and 2001 c 25 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An agency is encouraged to advise the public of its current
opinions, approaches, and likely courses of action by means of
interpretive or policy statements. Current interpretive and policy
statements are advisory only. To better inform and involve the public,
an agency is encouraged to convert long-standing interpretive and
policy statements into rules.
(2) A person may petition an agency requesting the conversion of
interpretive and policy statements into rules. Upon submission, the
agency shall notify the joint administrative rules review committee of
the petition. Within sixty days after submission of a petition, the
agency shall either deny the petition in writing, stating its reasons
for the denial, or initiate rule-making proceedings in accordance with
this chapter.
(3) Each agency shall maintain a roster of interested persons,
consisting of persons who have requested in writing to be notified of
all interpretive and policy statements issued by that agency. Each
agency shall update the roster ((once each year)) periodically and
eliminate persons who do not indicate a desire to continue on the
roster. Whenever an agency issues an interpretive or policy statement,
it shall send a copy of the statement to each person listed on the
roster. The agency may charge a nominal fee to the interested person
for this service.
(4) Whenever an agency issues an interpretive or policy statement,
it shall submit to the code reviser for publication in the Washington
State Register a statement describing the subject matter of the
interpretive or policy statement, and listing the person at the agency
from whom a copy of the interpretive or policy statement may be
obtained.

Sec. 4 RCW 34.05.353 and 2001 c 25 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An agency may file notice for the expedited adoption of rules
in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section for rules
meeting any one of the following criteria:
(a) The proposed rules relate only to internal governmental
operations that are not subject to violation by a person;
(b) The proposed rules adopt or incorporate by reference without
material change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state
statutes, rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master
programs other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(c) The proposed rules only correct typographical errors, make
address or name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing
its effect;
(d) The content of the proposed rules is explicitly and
specifically dictated by statute;
(e) The proposed rules have been the subject of negotiated rule
making, pilot rule making, or some other process that involved
substantial participation by interested parties before the development
of the proposed rule; or
(f) The proposed rule is being amended after a review under RCW
34.05.328.
(2) An agency may file notice for the expedited repeal of rules
under the procedures set forth in this section for rules meeting any
one of the following criteria:
(a) The statute on which the rule is based has been repealed and
has not been replaced by another statute providing statutory authority
for the rule;
(b) The statute on which the rule is based has been declared
unconstitutional by a court with jurisdiction, there is a final
judgment, and no statute has been enacted to replace the
unconstitutional statute;
(c) The rule is no longer necessary because of changed
circumstances; or
(d) Other rules of the agency or of another agency govern the same
activity as the rule, making the rule redundant.
(3) The expedited rule-making process must follow the requirements
for rule making set forth in RCW 34.05.320, except that the agency is
not required to prepare a small business economic impact statement
under RCW 19.85.025, a statement indicating whether the rule
constitutes a significant legislative rule under RCW
34.05.328(5)(c)(iii), or a significant legislative rule analysis under
RCW 34.05.328. An agency is not required to prepare statements of
inquiry under RCW 34.05.310 or conduct a hearing for the expedited rule
making. The notice for the expedited rule making must contain a
statement in at least ten-point type, that is substantially in the
following form:

NOTICE

THIS RULE IS BEING PROPOSED UNDER AN EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS THAT WILL ELIMINATE THE NEED FOR THE AGENCY TO
HOLD PUBLIC HEARINGS, PREPARE A SMALL BUSINESS ECONOMIC IMPACT
STATEMENT, OR PROVIDE RESPONSES TO THE CRITERIA FOR A
SIGNIFICANT LEGISLATIVE RULE. IF YOU OBJECT TO THIS USE OF THE
EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS, YOU MUST EXPRESS YOUR OBJECTIONS
IN WRITING AND THEY MUST BE SENT TO (INSERT NAME AND ADDRESS)
AND RECEIVED BY (INSERT DATE).

(4) The agency shall send either a copy of the notice of the
proposed expedited rule making, or a summary of the information on the
notice, to any person who has requested notification of proposals for
expedited rule making or of regular agency rule making, as well as the
joint administrative rules review committee, within three days after
its publication in the Washington State Register. An agency may charge
for the actual cost of providing a requesting party mailed copies of
these notices. The notice of the proposed expedited rule making must
be preceded by a statement substantially in the form provided in
subsection (3) of this section. The notice must also include an
explanation of the reasons the agency believes the expedited rule-making process is appropriate.
(5) The code reviser shall publish the text of all rules proposed
for expedited adoption, and the citation and caption of all rules
proposed for expedited repeal, along with the notice required in this
section in a separate section of the Washington State Register. Once
the notice of expedited rule making has been published in the
Washington State Register, the only changes that an agency may make in
the noticed materials before their final adoption or repeal are to
correct typographical errors.
(6) Any person may file a written objection to the expedited rule
making. The objection must be filed with the agency rules coordinator
within forty-five days after the notice of the proposed expedited rule
making has been published in the Washington State Register. A person
who has filed a written objection to the expedited rule making may
withdraw the objection.
(7) If no written objections to the expedited rule making are filed
with the agency within forty-five days after the notice of proposed
expedited rule making is published, or if all objections that have been
filed are withdrawn by the persons filing the objections, the agency
may enter an order adopting or repealing the rule without further
notice or a public hearing. The order must be published in the manner
required by this chapter for any other agency order adopting, amending,
or repealing a rule.
(8) If a written notice of objection to the expedited rule making
is timely filed with the agency and is not withdrawn, the notice of
proposed expedited rule making published under this section is
considered a statement of inquiry for the purposes of RCW 34.05.310,
and the agency may initiate further rule-making proceedings in
accordance with this chapter.
(9) As used in this section, "expedited rule making" includes both
the expedited adoption of rules and the expedited repeal of rules.

--- END ---