BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.70.060 and 1989 c 175 s 123 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director or the director's authorized representative may:
(a) Make necessary public or private investigations within or
outside of this state to determine whether any person has violated or
is about to violate this chapter or any rule or order ((hereunder))
adopted under this title, or to aid in the enforcement of this chapter
or in the prescribing of rules and forms ((hereunder; and)) adopted
under this title;
(b) Inspect the books, documents, and records of any person lending
money to or in any manner financing any license holder or applicant for
a license or receiving any income or profits from the use of such
license for the purpose of determining compliance or noncompliance with
the provisions of this chapter or the rules ((and regulations)) adopted
((pursuant thereto)) under this chapter; and
(c) Conduct necessary criminal history background checks on any
person seeking employment or a contract with the lottery, and any
person seeking a license under this chapter. All national criminal
history background checks must include the submission of applicant
fingerprints to the United States department of justice, federal bureau
of investigation.
(2) For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this
chapter, the director or an administrative law judge appointed under
chapter 34.12 RCW may conduct hearings, administer oaths or
affirmations, or upon the director's or administrative law judge's
motion or upon request of any party may subpoena witnesses, compel
attendance, take depositions, take evidence, or require the production
of any matter which is relevant to the investigation or proceeding,
including but not limited to the existence, description, nature,
custody, condition, or location of any books, documents, or other
tangible things, or the identity or location of persons having
knowledge or relevant facts, or any other matter reasonably calculated
to lead to the discovery of material evidence.
(3) Upon failure to obey a subpoena or to answer questions
propounded by the administrative law judge and upon reasonable notice
to all persons affected thereby, the director may apply to the superior
court for an order compelling compliance.
(4) The administrative law judges appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW
may conduct hearings respecting the suspension, revocation, or denial
of licenses, may administer oaths, admit or deny admission of evidence,
compel the attendance of witnesses, issue subpoenas, issue orders, and
exercise all other powers and perform all other functions set out in
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all proceedings
under this chapter shall be in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---