BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
persons engaged in a rural county in the business of manufacturing
computer software or programming, as those terms are defined in this
section.
(2) A person who partially or totally relocates a business from one
rural county to another rural county is eligible for any new qualifying
employment positions created as a result of the relocation but is not
eligible to receive credit for the jobs moved from one county to the
other.
(3)(a) To qualify for the credit, the qualifying activity of the
person must be conducted in a rural county and the new qualified
employment position must be located in the rural county.
(b) If an activity is conducted both from a rural county and
outside of a rural county, the credit is available if at least ninety
percent of the qualifying activity is conducted within a rural county.
If the qualifying activity is a service taxable activity, the place
where the work is performed is the place at which the activity is
conducted.
(4)(a) The credit under this section shall equal one thousand
dollars for each new qualified employment position created after
January 1, 2004, in an eligible area. A credit is earned for the
calendar year the person is hired to fill the position. Additionally
a credit is earned for each year the position is maintained over the
subsequent consecutive years, up to four years. The county must meet
the definition of a rural county at the time the position is filled.
If the county does not have a rural county status the following year or
years, the position is still eligible for the remaining years if all
other conditions are met.
(b) Participants who claimed credit under RCW 82.04.4456 for
qualified employment positions created before December 31, 2003, are
eligible to earn credit for each year the position is maintained over
the subsequent consecutive years, for up to four years, which four
years include any years claimed under RCW 82.04.4456 Those persons who
did not receive a credit under RCW 82.04.4456 before December 31, 2003,
are not eligible to earn credit for qualified employment positions
created before December 31, 2003.
(c) Credit is authorized for new employees hired for new qualified
employment positions created on or after January 1, 2004. New
qualified employment positions filled by existing employees are
eligible for the credit under this section only if the position vacated
by the existing employee is filled by a new hire. A business that is
a sole proprietorship without any employees is equivalent to one
employee position and this type of business is eligible to receive
credit for one position.
(d) If a position is filled before July 1st, the position is
eligible for the full yearly credit for that calendar year. If it is
filled after June 30th, the position is eligible for half of the credit
for that calendar year.
(5) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. This information includes information relating to
description of qualifying activity conducted in the rural county and
outside the rural county by the person as well as detailed records on
positions and employees.
(6) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed shall be immediately due. The
department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes for
which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken,
and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are
repaid.
(7) The credit under this section may be used against any tax due
under this chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one
calendar year be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in
a subsequent calendar year. A person is not eligible to receive a
credit under this section if the person is receiving credit for the
same position under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW 82.04.44525 or is taking
a credit under this chapter for information technology help desk
services conducted from a rural county. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(8) Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility.
However, the successive credits are available to the successor for
remaining periods in the five years only if the eligibility conditions
of this section are met.
(9) A person taking tax credits under this section shall make an
annual report to the department. The report shall be in a letter form
and shall include the following information: Number of positions for
which credit is being claimed, type of position for which credit is
being claimed, type of activity in which the person is engaged in the
county, how long the person has been located in the county, and
taxpayer name and registration number. The report must be filed by
January 30th of each year for which credit was claimed during the
previous year. Failure to file a report will not result in the loss of
eligibility under this section. However, the department, through its
research division, shall contact taxpayers who have not filed the
report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the taxpayer in
the filing of the report, so that the data and information necessary to
measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) "Computer software" has the meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.215
after June 30, 2004, and includes "software" as defined in RCW
82.04.215 before July 1, 2004.
(b) "Manufacturing" means the same as "to manufacture" under RCW
82.04.120. Manufacturing includes the activities of both manufacturers
and processors for hire.
(c) "Programming" means the activities that involve the creation or
modification of computer software, as that term is defined in this
chapter, and that are taxable as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2) or as
a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050.
(d) "Qualifying activity" means manufacturing of computer software
or programming.
(e) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
position doing programming of computer software or manufacturing of
computer software. This excludes administrative, professional,
service, executive, and other similar positions. If an employee is
either voluntarily or involuntarily separated from employment, the
employment position is considered filled on a full-time basis if the
employer is either training or actively recruiting a replacement
employee. Full-time means a position for at least thirty-five hours a
week.
(f) "Rural county" means the same as in RCW 82.14.370.
(11) No credit may be taken or accrued under this section on or
after January 1, 2011.
(12) This section expires January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
persons engaged in a rural county in the business of providing
information technology help desk services to third parties.
(2) To qualify for the credit, the help desk services must be
conducted from a rural county.
(3) The amount of the tax credit for persons engaged in the
activity of providing information technology help desk services in
rural counties shall be equal to one hundred percent of the amount of
tax due under this chapter that is attributable to providing the
services from the rural county. In order to qualify for the credit
under this subsection, the county must meet the definition of rural
county at the time the person begins to conduct qualifying business in
the county.
(4) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. These records include information relating to
description of activity engaged in a rural county by the person.
(5) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been used is immediately due. The department shall
assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited taxes for which the
person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, shall be
assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken, and shall
accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(6) The credit under this section may be used against any tax due
under this chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one
calendar year be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in
a subsequent calendar year. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.
(7) Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility.
However, the credit is available to the successor only if the
eligibility conditions of this section are met.
(8) A person taking tax credits under this section shall make an
annual report to the department. The report shall be in a letter form
and shall include the following information: Type of activity in which
the person is engaged in the county, number of employees in the rural
county, how long the person has been located in the county, and
taxpayer name and registration number. The report must be filed by
January 30th of each year for which credit was claimed during the
previous year. Failure to file a report will not result in the loss of
eligibility under this section. However, the department, through its
research division, shall contact taxpayers who have not filed the
report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the taxpayer in
the filing of the report, so that the data and information necessary to
measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.
(9) As used in this section:
(a) "Information technology help desk services" means the following
services performed using electronic and telephonic communication:
(i) Software and hardware maintenance;
(ii) Software and hardware diagnostics and troubleshooting;
(iii) Software and hardware installation;
(iv) Software and hardware repair;
(v) Software and hardware information and training; and
(vi) Software and hardware upgrade.
(b) "Rural county" means the same as in RCW 82.14.370.
(10) This section expires January 1, 2011.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.60.020 and 1999 sp.s. c 9 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means a ((county with fewer than one hundred
persons per square mile as determined annually by the office of
financial management and published by the department of revenue
effective for the period July 1st through June 30th)) rural county as
defined in RCW 82.14.370.
(4)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project in
an eligible area as defined in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The ((lessor/owner)) lessor or owner of a qualified building is
not eligible for a deferral unless:
(i) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person((,)); or ((unless))
(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee ((in the form of reduced rent
payments));
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual report
required under RCW 82.60.070; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(c) "Eligible investment project" does not include any portion of
an investment project undertaken by a light and power business as
defined in RCW 82.16.010(5), other than that portion of a cogeneration
project that is used to generate power for consumption within the
manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an integral
part, or investment projects which have already received deferrals
under this chapter.
(5) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project.
(6) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the
activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories.
(7) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(8) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and
expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for manufacturing
and research and development activities, including plant offices and
warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw material or
finished goods if such facilities are an essential or an integral part
of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory used for manufacturing or
research and development. If a building is used partly for
manufacturing or research and development and partly for other
purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department.
(9) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed in the eligible investment project during the entire
tax year. The term "entire tax year" means a full-time position that
is filled for a period of twelve consecutive months. The term "full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred fifty-five
hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours a year.
(10) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a manufacturing or research and
development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes:
Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment;
manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving
parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all equipment
used to control or operate the machinery.
(((10))) (11) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral
under this chapter.
(((11))) (12) "Research and development" means the development,
refinement, testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product,
service, or process before commercial sales have begun. As used in
this subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or
sales for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of
the product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.60.040 and 1999 c 164 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral
certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment project that is
located in an eligible area as defined in RCW 82.60.020.
(2) The department shall keep a running total of all deferrals
granted under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.
(3) This section expires July 1, ((2004)) 2010.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.60.049 and 2000 c 106 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Eligible area" also means a designated community empowerment
zone approved under RCW ((43.63A.700)) 43.31C.020 or a county
containing a community empowerment zone.
(b) "Eligible investment project" also means an investment project
in an eligible area as defined in this section.
(((c) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed in the eligible investment project during the entire
year.))
(2) In addition to the provisions of RCW 82.60.040, the department
shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for state and
local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14
RCW, on each eligible investment project that is located in an eligible
area, if the applicant establishes that at the time the project is
operationally complete:
(a) The applicant will hire at least one qualified employment
position for each seven hundred fifty thousand dollars of investment
((on)) for which a deferral is requested; and
(b) The positions will be filled by persons who at the time of hire
are residents of the community empowerment zone. As used in this
subsection, "resident" means the person makes his or her home in the
community empowerment zone. A mailing address alone is insufficient to
establish that a person is a resident for the purposes of this section.
The persons must be hired after the date the application is filed with
the department.
(3) All other provisions and eligibility requirements of this
chapter apply to applicants eligible under this section.
(4) The qualified employment position must be filled by the end of
the calendar year following the year in which the project is certified
as operationally complete. If a person does not meet the requirements
for qualified employment positions by the end of the second calendar
year following the year in which the project is certified as
operationally complete, all deferred taxes are immediately due.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.60.050 and 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
RCW 82.60.030 and 82.60.040 shall expire July 1, ((2004)) 2010.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.60.070 and 1999 c 164 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) Each recipient of a deferral granted under this chapter after
June 30, 1994, shall ((submit a report to the department on December
31st of the year in which the investment project is certified by the
department as having been operationally completed, and on December 31st
of each of the seven succeeding calendar years. The report shall
contain information, as required by the department, from which the
department may determine whether the recipient is meeting the
requirements of this chapter. If the recipient fails to submit a
report or submits an inadequate report, the department may declare the
amount of deferred taxes outstanding to be immediately assessed and
payable)) complete an annual survey. If the economic benefits of the
deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.63.010(7), the
lessee shall agree to complete the annual survey and the applicant is
not required to complete the annual survey. The survey is due by March
31st of the year following the calendar year in which the investment
project is certified by the department as having been operationally
complete and the seven succeeding calendar years. The survey shall
include the amount of tax deferred, the number of new products or
research projects by general classification, and the number of
trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with activities at the
investment project. The survey shall also include the following
information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax deferral taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on the amount of tax
deferral taken is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(e) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(f) The department shall also use the information to study the tax
deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department shall
report to the legislature by December 1, 2009. The report shall
measure the effect of the program on job creation, the number of jobs
created for residents of eligible areas, company growth, the
introduction of new products, the diversification of the state's
economy, growth in research and development investment, the movement of
firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and
such other factors as the department selects.
(2) If, on the basis of a ((report)) survey under this section or
other information, the department finds that an investment project is
not eligible for tax deferral under this chapter, the amount of
deferred taxes outstanding for the project shall be immediately due.
(3) Notwithstanding any other subsection of this section, deferred
taxes need not be repaid on machinery and equipment for lumber and wood
products industries, and sales of or charges made for labor and
services, of the type which qualifies for exemption under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 to the extent the taxes have not been repaid
before July 1, 1995.
(4) Notwithstanding any other subsection of this section, deferred
taxes on the following need not be repaid:
(a) Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, which at the time of purchase would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and
(b) Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would
have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
April 1, 2004.

--- END ---