BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.90.480 and 2003 c 310 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, annual rent rates for
the lease of state-owned aquatic lands for water-dependent uses shall
be determined as follows:
(1)(a) The assessed land value, exclusive of improvements, as
determined by the county assessor, of the upland tax parcel used in
conjunction with the leased area or, if there are no such uplands, of
the nearest upland tax parcel used for water-dependent purposes divided
by the parcel area equals the upland value.
(b) The upland value times the area of leased aquatic lands times
thirty percent equals the aquatic land value.
(2) As of July 1, 1989, and each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the real capitalization rate to be applied
to water-dependent aquatic land leases commencing or being adjusted
under subsection (3)(a) of this section in that fiscal year. The real
capitalization rate shall be the real rate of return, except that until
June 30, 1989, the real capitalization rate shall be five percent and
thereafter it shall not change by more than one percentage point in any
one year or be more than seven percent or less than three percent.
(3) The annual rent shall be:
(a) Determined initially, and redetermined every four years or as
otherwise provided in the lease, by multiplying the aquatic land value
times the real capitalization rate; and
(b) Adjusted by the inflation rate each year in which the rent is
not determined under subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(4) If the upland parcel used in conjunction with the leased area
is not assessed or has an assessed value inconsistent with the purposes
of the lease, the nearest comparable upland parcel used for similar
purposes shall be substituted and the lease payment determined in the
same manner as provided in this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "upland tax parcel" is a tax
parcel, some portion of which has upland characteristics. Filled
tidelands or shorelands with upland characteristics which abut state-owned aquatic land shall be considered as uplands in determining
aquatic land values.
(6) The annual rent for filled state-owned aquatic lands that have
the characteristics of uplands shall be determined in accordance with
RCW 79.90.500 in those cases in which the state owns the fill and has
a right to charge for the fill.
(7)(a) For leases for marina uses only, as of July 1, ((2004))
2005, lease rates will be a percentage of the annual gross revenues
generated by that marina. ((It is the intent of the legislature that
additional legislation be enacted prior to July 1, 2004, to establish
the percentage of gross revenues that will serve as the basis for a
marina's rent and a definition of gross revenues.)) Annual rent must
be recalculated each year based upon the marina's gross revenues from
the previous year, as reported to the department consistent with this
subsection (7).
(b) ((By December 31, 2003, the department will develop a
recommended formula for calculating marina rents consistent with this
subsection (7) and report the recommendation to the legislature. The
formula recommended by the department must include a percentage or a
range of percentages of gross revenues, a system for implementing such
percentages, and the designation of revenue sources to be considered
for rent calculation purposes. The department must also ensure, given
the available information, that the rent formula recommended by the
department is initially calculated to maintain state proceeds from
marina rents as of July 1, 2003, and that if the department does not
receive income reporting forms representing at least ninety percent of
the projected annual marina revenue and at least seventy-five percent
of all marinas, the current model for calculating marina rents, as
described in subsections (1) through (6) of this section, will continue
to be the method used to calculate marina rents, and the income method,
as described in (a) of this subsection, will not be applied. In
addition to the percent of marina income, the department shall
determine its direct administrative costs (cost of hours worked
directly on applications and leases, based on salaries and benefits,
plus travel reimbursement and other actual out-of-pocket costs) to
calculate, audit, execute, and monitor marina leases, and shall recover
these costs from lessees. All administrative costs recovered by the
department must be deposited into the resource management cost account
created in RCW 79.64.020. Prior to making recommendations to the
legislature, a work session consisting of the department, marina
owners, and stakeholders must be convened to discuss the rate-setting
criteria. The legislature directs the department to deliver
recommendations to the legislature by December 2003, including any
minority reports by the participating parties.
(c) When developing its recommendation for a marina lease formula
consistent with this subsection (7), the department shall ensure that
the percentage of revenue established is applied to the income of the
direct lessee, as well as to the income of any person or entity that
subleases, or contracts to operate the marina, with the direct lessee,
less the amount paid by the sublease to the direct lessee.
(d) All marina operators under lease with the department must
return to the department an income reporting form, provided by the
department, and certified by a licensed certified public accountant,
before July 1, 2003, and again)) To aid the department with its
responsibility to recalculate the rent of a marina, all marinas under
lease with the department must annually, on a date set by the
department, return to the department an income reporting form provided
by the department and certified by a licensed public accountant. On
the income reporting form, the department may require a marina to
disclose to the department any information about income from all
marina-related sources, excluding restaurants and bars. All income
reports submitted to the department are subject to either audit or
verification, or both, by the department, and the department may
inspect all of the lessee's books, records, and documents, including
state and federal income tax returns relating to the operation of the
marina and leased aquatic lands at all reasonable times. If the lessee
fails to submit the required income reporting form once the new method
for calculating marina rents is effective, the department may conduct
an audit at the lessee's expense or cancel the lease.
(((e))) (c) Initially, the marina rent ((formula developed by the
department)) calculated pursuant to (((b))) (a) of this subsection will
be applied to each marina on its anniversary date, beginning on July 1,
((2004)) 2005, and will be based on that marina's ((2003)) 2004 income
information. Thereafter, rents will be recalculated each year, based
on the marina's gross revenue from the previous year.
(((f))) (d) No marina lease may be for less than five hundred
dollars plus direct administrative costs.
(8) For all new leases for other water-dependent uses, issued after
December 31, 1997, the initial annual water-dependent rent shall be
determined by the methods in subsections (1) through (6) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature intends to enact
additional legislation prior to July 1, 2005, that establishes the
actual percentage of gross revenues generated by a marina that will
serve as the rent charged by the department of natural resources, as
well as a clear definition of which revenue streams will be considered
the gross revenue of a marina for the purposes of calculating rent.
(2) To aid the 2005 legislature with this task, the department of
natural resources shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 31, 2004, with a recommended formula for
calculating marina rents based on a percentage of a marina's gross
revenues. The formula recommended by the department of natural
resources must include a percentage, or a range of percentages, of
gross revenues, a system for implementing such percentages, and the
designation of revenue sources to be considered for rent calculation
purposes. The department of natural resources must also ensure that
the recommended rent formula is initially calculated to maintain state
proceeds from marina rents as of July 1, 2004. In addition to the
percent of marina income, the department of natural resources's
recommended formula shall include a mechanism for the recovery of its
direct administrative costs to calculate, audit, execute, and monitor
marina leases from lessees. The administrative costs may include the
cost of travel reimbursement, other actual out-of-pocket costs, and the
cost of hours worked directly on applications and leases, based on the
salaries and benefits of employees. The department of natural
resources's recommended formula must also ensure that the percentage of
revenue established is applied to the income of the direct lessee, as
well as to the income of any person or entity that subleases, or
contracts to operate the marina, with the direct lessee, less the
amount paid by the sublessee to the direct lessee.
(3) In preparing a recommended formula for the legislature pursuant
to this section, the department of natural resources shall rely on
marina income data collected under section 1, chapter 310, Laws of
2003.
(4) Prior to making recommendations to the legislature, a work
session consisting of the department of natural resources, marina
owners, and stakeholders must be convened to discuss the rate-setting
criteria. The report delivered to the legislature should include any
minority reports by the parties participating in the work session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---