BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds in the
"Environmental Education in Washington Status Report 2003," that
environmental education has been demonstrated to improve: Student
behavior and achievement, Washington assessment of student learning
scores, and teacher and community engagement. The legislature finds
environmental education programs aligned with the state's essential
academic learning requirements that integrate the basic subject areas
of the common school curriculum, identified in chapter 28A.230 RCW,
help implement the goals of Washington state education reform.
(2) The legislature finds that environmental education is one of
the most effective strategies for meeting the educational and quality
of life needs of Washington citizens. Environmental education is found
to:
(a) Improve student academic achievement;
(b) Create economic efficiencies for state agencies' programs
including restoration, habitat assessments and wildlife monitoring, and
public health protection;
(c) Foster successful public/private partnerships to promote and
deliver quality education initiatives;
(d) Increase community involvement in public schools and students'
civic engagement in their communities; and
(e) Promote sustainability and stewardship of our great natural
heritage.
(3) The legislature finds that Washington lacks a unified approach
and infrastructure to support environmental education partnerships and
programs that enhance student learning and maintain the health and
sustainability of Washington's schools, communities, and environments.
(4) The intent of the legislature is to promote environmental
education efficacy through the development of a comprehensive statewide
environmental education strategic plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The governor's council on environmental education shall develop
a comprehensive statewide environmental education strategic plan. The
term "environment" is to be broadly interpreted to include natural,
cultural, historical, and economic environments as well as how
environmental factors can harm human health. The term "education" is
also to be broadly interpreted to include formal and nonformal
community education. The plan shall provide coordinated direction to
integrate environmental education as a standard part of Washington's
teaching and learning. Through the coordinated development of the
plan, the governor's council on environmental education and
environmental education stakeholders shall develop strategies to:
(a) Meet school teacher and administrator demand;
(b) Adhere to the essential academic learning requirements;
(c) Provide sufficient in-service and preservice teacher training;
(d) Increase support within state agencies to promote volunteer
participation, student learning, and economic efficiencies;
(e) Promote economic, environmental, and ecological health;
(f) Draw from Washington's diverse cultural heritage, rich history,
and stewardship approaches;
(g) Consolidate statewide coordination;
(h) Centralize accessibility to environmental education resources;
(i) Standardize quality assurance through assessment and
evaluation;
(j) Develop a systemic accounting of environmental education
policies, funding structures, programs, and associated costs;
(k) Recommend sustainable public and private revenue streams and
funding mechanisms; and
(l) Support the implementation of agencies' sustainability plans as
directed by executive order 02-03.
(2) To the extent funds and staff are available, state agencies
shall participate in developing the comprehensive statewide
environmental education plan including but not limited to the following
state agencies:
(a) Department of agriculture;
(b) Department of ecology;
(c) Department of fish and wildlife;
(d) Department of health;
(e) Office of Indian affairs;
(f) Department of natural resources;
(g) Parks and recreation commission;
(h) Department of transportation;
(i) Office of superintendent of public instruction; and
(j) Conservation commission.
(3) The plan shall include input and perspectives from interested
public and private stakeholders including, but not limited to:
Agriculture; business; colleges and universities; federal agencies;
forestry; public and private school administrators, teachers, and
directors; education associations; community educators; environmental
health organizations; counties; cities; tribes; conservation
organizations; and service clubs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The governor's council on environmental education shall partner
with private environmental education stakeholders to secure resources
for and to develop the comprehensive statewide environmental education
strategic plan.
(2) Developing the plan may include:
(a) A series of regional planning meetings to ensure the
participation of all local community stakeholders; and
(b) A working conference to engage interested stakeholders
statewide in developing the plan.
(3) Annual status reports shall be made to the legislature no later
than December 2004 and December 2005. The final comprehensive
statewide environmental education strategic plan shall be presented to
the legislature by July 1, 2006.

--- END ---