BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.22.178 and 2002 c 294 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
surcharge of ten dollars per instrument shall be charged by the county
auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any
other charge authorized by law. The auditor may retain up to five
percent of these funds collected to administer the collection of these
funds. Of the remaining funds, forty percent of the revenue generated
through this surcharge will be transmitted monthly to the state
treasurer who will deposit the funds into the Washington housing trust
account. The office of community development of the department of
community, trade, and economic development will develop guidelines for
the use of these funds to support building operation and maintenance
costs of housing projects or units within housing projects that are
affordable to extremely low-income persons with incomes at or below
thirty percent of the area median income, and that require a supplement
to rent income to cover ongoing operating expenses. ((Sixty percent of
the revenue)) All of the remaining funds generated by this surcharge
will be retained by the county and be deposited into a fund that must
be used by the county and its cities and towns for housing projects or
units within housing projects that are affordable to very low-income
persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median
income. The portion of the surcharge retained by a county shall be
allocated to very low-income housing projects or units within such
housing projects in the county and the cities within a county according
to an interlocal agreement between the county and the cities within the
county, consistent with countywide and local housing needs and
policies. The funds generated with this surcharge shall not be used
for construction of new housing if at ((any)) the time funds are
dedicated for this purpose the vacancy rate for available low-income
housing within the county rises above ten percent, unless the new
construction is designed to provide housing to identifiable populations
with special housing needs within the county or within a city or town
within the county, who are not being adequately served by the private
housing market, such as persons with developmental disabilities, senior
citizens, homeless persons or families, seasonal farm workers, or
victims of domestic violence. The vacancy rate for each county shall
be developed using the state low- income vacancy rate standard
developed under subsection (3) of this section. Permissible uses of
these local funds are limited to:
(a) Acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing
projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to very
low-income persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area
median income;
(b) Supporting building operation and maintenance costs of housing
projects or units within housing projects ((built with)) eligible to
receive housing trust funds, that are affordable to very low-income
persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median
income, and that require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing
operating expenses;
(c) Rental assistance vouchers, payable to a landlord, including
rental assistance or vouchers for payment of first and last month's
rent and security and other deposits required of all other new tenants
by a landlord, for housing projects or units within housing projects
that are affordable to very low-income persons with incomes at or below
fifty percent of the area median income, to be administered ((by a
local public housing authority or other local organization that has an
existing rental assistance voucher program,)) consistent with the
United States department of housing and urban development's section 8
rental assistance voucher program standards regarding dwelling
inspections, lease terms, affordability, eligibility for receiving
rental assistance vouchers, and grounds for eviction and termination of
receipt of voucher funds; and
(d) Operating costs for emergency shelters and licensed overnight
youth shelters.
(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.
(3) The real estate research center at Washington State University
shall develop a vacancy rate standard for low-income housing in the
state as described in RCW 18.85.540(1)(i).

Sec. 2 RCW 18.85.540 and 2002 c 294 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of a real estate research center in Washington
state is to provide credible research, value-added information,
education services, and project-oriented research to real estate
licensees, real estate consumers, real estate service providers,
institutional customers, public agencies, and communities in Washington
state and the Pacific Northwest region. The center may:
(a) Conduct studies and research on affordable housing and
strategies to meet the affordable housing needs of the state;
(b) Conduct studies in all areas directly or indirectly related to
real estate and urban or rural economics and economically isolated
communities;
(c) Disseminate findings and results of real estate research
conducted at or by the center or elsewhere, using a variety of
dissemination media;
(d) Supply research results and educational expertise to the
Washington state real estate commission to support its regulatory
functions, as requested;
(e) Prepare information of interest to real estate consumers and
make the information available to the general public, universities, or
colleges, and appropriate state agencies;
(f) Encourage economic growth and development within the state of
Washington;
(g) Support the professional development and continuing education
of real estate licensees in Washington; and
(h) Study and recommend changes in state statutes relating to real
estate((; and
(i) Develop a vacancy rate standard for low-income housing in the
state)).
(2) The director shall establish a memorandum of understanding with
an institution of higher learning that establishes a real estate
research center for the purposes under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) This section expires September 30, 2005.

--- END ---