BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington state parks will mark its
centennial year in 2013. The legislature finds it fitting to
commemorate the Washington state parks centennial through a coordinated
effort by the state parks and recreation commission, the governor, the
legislature, and the people of the state of Washington by implementing
the Washington state parks centennial 2013 plan developed by the state
parks and recreation commission in response to the directive of the
legislature in section 347, chapter 26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state parks centennial
advisory committee is established, composed of eleven members selected
as follows:
(a) The chair and vice-chair of the state parks and recreation
commission, who shall serve as the chair and vice-chair of the
committee;
(b) A representative of the governor;
(c) A member of each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(d) A member of each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(e) The director of the office of financial management or his or
her designee; and
(f) Three members of the public, appointed by the chair of the
commission, consisting of a representative of the commission employees,
a representative of private sector donors, and a representative of
state park users.
(2) The committee will be staffed by the commission and by other
staff as may be provided by the legislature, the governor, the office
of financial management, or other sources that choose to donate staff
assistance.
(3) The committee will meet at the call of the chair.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Nonlegislative committee members will be
reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. Legislative members will be reimbursed as provided in RCW
44.04.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The Washington state parks centennial
advisory committee will develop a proposal to implement the centennial
2013 plan. The proposal must include:
(a) A complete description of the policy and fiscal components of
the plan;
(b) The roles of the commission, the governor, the legislature, the
public, and other entities in implementing the plan;
(c) Time frames for implementing the plan;
(d) Cost estimates for implementing the plan, including total
estimated costs for each component of the plan, and estimates on a
yearly or biennial basis for implementing the plan in phases.
(2) The commission will review and may revise the plan. The
commission will submit a draft proposal to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the legislature, no later than
September 1, 2004. That proposal must include at least the portion of
the plan that would need to be considered during the 2005 legislative
session to be implemented during the 2005-07 biennium. The commission
will submit the complete proposal to the office of financial management
and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature no
later than January 1, 2005. Thereafter, the commission must submit
revised proposals to the office of financial management and the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature no later
than June 30 of each even-numbered year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires December 31, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 79A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---