BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.92.180 and 1995 c 297 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A guardian or limited guardian shall be allowed such compensation
for his or her services as guardian or limited guardian as the court
shall deem just and reasonable. Guardians and limited guardians shall
not be compensated at county or state expense. Additional compensation
may be allowed for other administrative costs, including services of an
attorney and for other services not provided by the guardian or limited
guardian. Where a guardian or limited guardian is an attorney, the
guardian or limited guardian shall separately account for time for
which compensation is requested for services as a guardian or limited
guardian as contrasted to time for which compensation for legal
services provided to the guardianship is requested. In all cases,
compensation of the guardian or limited guardian and his or her
expenses including attorney's fees shall be fixed by the court and may
be allowed at any annual or final accounting; but at any time during
the administration of the estate, the guardian or limited guardian or
his or her attorney may apply to the court for an allowance upon the
compensation or necessary expenses of the guardian or limited guardian
and for attorney's fees for services already performed. If the court
finds that the guardian or limited guardian has failed to discharge his
or her duties as such in any respect, it may deny the guardian any
compensation whatsoever or may reduce the compensation which would
otherwise be allowed. Where the incapacitated person is a department
of social and health services client residing in a nursing facility or
in a residential or home setting and is required by the department of
social and health services to contribute a portion of their income
towards the cost of residential or supportive services then the
department shall be entitled to notice of proceedings as described in
RCW 11.92.150. ((The amount of guardianship fees and additional
compensation for administrative costs shall not exceed the amount
allowed by the department of social and health services by rule.))

--- END ---