BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 60.28.010 and 1986 c 181 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Contracts for public improvements or work, other than for
professional services, by the state, or any county, city, town,
district, board, or other public body, herein referred to as "public
body", shall provide, and there shall be reserved by the public body
from the moneys earned by the contractor on estimates during the
progress of the improvement or work, a sum not to exceed five percent,
((said)) this sum to be retained by the state, county, city, town,
district, board, or other public body, as a trust fund for the
protection and payment of any person or persons, mechanic,
subcontractor, or materialman who shall perform any labor upon such
contract or the doing of ((said)) the work((, and)); all persons who
shall supply such person or persons or subcontractors with provisions
and supplies for the carrying on of such work((,)); the public body
party to the contract for public improvements or work; and the state
with respect to taxes imposed pursuant to Title 82 RCW which may be due
from such contractor. Every person performing labor or furnishing
supplies toward the completion of ((said)) the improvement or work
shall have a lien upon ((said)) the moneys so reserved: PROVIDED, That
such notice of the lien of such claimant shall be given in the manner
and within the time provided in RCW 39.08.030 ((as now existing and in
accordance with any amendments that may hereafter be made thereto)):
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the board, council, commission, trustees,
officer or body acting for the state, county or municipality or other
public body; (a) at any time after fifty percent of the original
contract work has been completed, if it finds that satisfactory
progress is being made, may make any of the partial payments which
would otherwise be subsequently made in full; but in no event shall the
amount to be retained be reduced to less than five percent of the
amount of the moneys earned by the contractor: PROVIDED, That the
contractor may request that retainage be reduced to one hundred percent
of the value of the work remaining on the project; and (b) thirty days
after completion and acceptance of all contract work other than
landscaping, may release and pay in full the amounts retained during
the performance of the contract (other than continuing retention of
five percent of the moneys earned for landscaping) subject to the
provisions of RCW 60.28.020.
(2) The moneys reserved under the provisions of subsection (1) of
this section, at the option of the contractor, shall be:
(a) Retained in a fund by the public body until thirty days
following the final acceptance of ((said)) the improvement or work as
completed;
(b) Deposited by the public body in an interest bearing account in
a bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan association, not
subject to withdrawal until after the final acceptance of ((said)) the
improvement or work as completed, or until agreed to by both parties:
PROVIDED, That interest on such account shall be paid to the
contractor;
(c) Placed in escrow with a bank or trust company by the public
body until thirty days following the final acceptance of ((said)) the
improvement or work as completed. When the moneys reserved are to be
placed in escrow, the public body shall issue a check representing the
sum of the moneys reserved payable to the bank or trust company and the
contractor jointly. Such check shall be converted into bonds and
securities chosen by the contractor and approved by the public body and
such bonds and securities shall be held in escrow. Interest on such
bonds and securities shall be paid to the contractor as the ((said))
interest accrues.
(3) The contractor or subcontractor may withhold payment of not
more than five percent from the moneys earned by any subcontractor or
sub-subcontractor or supplier contracted with by the contractor to
provide labor, materials, or equipment to the public project. Whenever
the contractor or subcontractor reserves funds earned by a
subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier, the contractor or
subcontractor shall pay interest to the subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier at a rate equal to that received by the
contractor or subcontractor from reserved funds.
(4) With the consent of the public body the contractor may submit
a bond for all or any portion of the amount of funds retained by the
public body in a form acceptable to the public body. Such bond and any
proceeds therefrom shall be made subject to all claims and liens and in
the same manner and priority as set forth for retained percentages in
this chapter. The public body shall release the bonded portion of the
retained funds to the contractor within thirty days of accepting the
bond from the contractor. Whenever a public body accepts a bond in
lieu of retained funds from a contractor, the contractor shall accept
like bonds from any subcontractors or suppliers from which the
contractor has retained funds. The contractor shall then release the
funds retained from the subcontractor or supplier to the subcontractor
or supplier within thirty days of accepting the bond from the
subcontractor or supplier.
(5) If the public body administering a contract, after a
substantial portion of the work has been completed, finds that an
unreasonable delay will occur in the completion of the remaining
portion of the contract for any reason not the result of a breach
thereof, it may, if the contractor agrees, delete from the contract the
remaining work and accept as final the improvement at the stage of
completion then attained and make payment in proportion to the amount
of the work accomplished and in such case any amounts retained and
accumulated under this section shall be held for a period of thirty
days following such acceptance. In the event that the work shall have
been terminated before final completion as provided in this section,
the public body may thereafter enter into a new contract with the same
contractor to perform the remaining work or improvement for an amount
equal to or less than the cost of the remaining work as was provided
for in the original contract without advertisement or bid. The
provisions of this chapter 60.28 RCW shall be deemed exclusive and
shall supersede all provisions and regulations in conflict herewith.
(6) Whenever the department of transportation has contracted for
the construction of two or more ferry vessels, thirty days after
completion and final acceptance of each ferry vessel, the department
may release and pay in full the amounts retained in connection with the
construction of such vessel subject to the provisions of RCW 60.28.020:
PROVIDED, That the department of transportation may at its discretion
condition the release of funds retained in connection with the
completed ferry upon the contractor delivering a good and sufficient
bond with two or more sureties, or with a surety company, in the amount
of the retained funds to be released to the contractor, conditioned
that no taxes shall be certified or claims filed for work on such ferry
after a period of thirty days following final acceptance of such ferry;
and if such taxes are certified or claims filed, recovery may be had on
such bond by the department of revenue and the materialmen and laborers
filing claims.
(7) Contracts on projects funded in whole or in part by farmers
home administration and subject to farmers home administration
regulations shall not be subject to subsections (1) through (6) of this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 60.28.011 and 2003 c 301 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Public improvement contracts shall provide, and public bodies
shall reserve, a contract retainage not to exceed five percent of the
moneys earned by the contractor as a trust fund for the protection and
payment of: (a) The claims of any person arising under the contract;
and (b) the state with respect to taxes imposed pursuant to Title 82
RCW which may be due from such contractor.
(2) Every person performing labor or furnishing supplies toward the
completion of a public improvement contract and the public body party
to the contract for public improvements or work shall have a lien upon
moneys reserved by a public body under the provisions of a public
improvement contract. However, the notice of the lien of the claimant
shall be given within forty-five days of completion of the contract
work, and in the manner provided in RCW 39.08.030.
(3) The contractor at any time may request the contract retainage
be reduced to one hundred percent of the value of the work remaining on
the project.
(a) After completion of all contract work other than landscaping,
the contractor may request that the public body release and pay in full
the amounts retained during the performance of the contract, and sixty
days thereafter the public body must release and pay in full the
amounts retained (other than continuing retention of five percent of
the moneys earned for landscaping) subject to the provisions of
chapters 39.12 and 60.28 RCW.
(b) Sixty days after completion of all contract work the public
body must release and pay in full the amounts retained during the
performance of the contract subject to the provisions of chapters 39.12
and 60.28 RCW.
(4) The moneys reserved by a public body under the provisions of a
public improvement contract, at the option of the contractor, shall be:
(a) Retained in a fund by the public body;
(b) Deposited by the public body in an interest bearing account in
a bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan association. Interest
on moneys reserved by a public body under the provision of a public
improvement contract shall be paid to the contractor;
(c) Placed in escrow with a bank or trust company by the public
body. When the moneys reserved are placed in escrow, the public body
shall issue a check representing the sum of the moneys reserved payable
to the bank or trust company and the contractor jointly. This check
shall be converted into bonds and securities chosen by the contractor
and approved by the public body and the bonds and securities shall be
held in escrow. Interest on the bonds and securities shall be paid to
the contractor as the interest accrues.
(5) The contractor or subcontractor may withhold payment of not
more than five percent from the moneys earned by any subcontractor or
sub-subcontractor or supplier contracted with by the contractor to
provide labor, materials, or equipment to the public project. Whenever
the contractor or subcontractor reserves funds earned by a
subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier, the contractor or
subcontractor shall pay interest to the subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier at a rate equal to that received by the
contractor or subcontractor from reserved funds.
(6) A contractor may submit a bond for all or any portion of the
contract retainage in a form acceptable to the public body and from a
bonding company meeting standards established by the public body. The
public body shall accept a bond meeting these requirements unless the
public body can demonstrate good cause for refusing to accept it. This
bond and any proceeds therefrom are subject to all claims and liens and
in the same manner and priority as set forth for retained percentages
in this chapter. The public body shall release the bonded portion of
the retained funds to the contractor within thirty days of accepting
the bond from the contractor. Whenever a public body accepts a bond in
lieu of retained funds from a contractor, the contractor shall accept
like bonds from any subcontractors or suppliers from which the
contractor has retained funds. The contractor shall then release the
funds retained from the subcontractor or supplier to the subcontractor
or supplier within thirty days of accepting the bond from the
subcontractor or supplier.
(7) If the public body administering a contract, after a
substantial portion of the work has been completed, finds that an
unreasonable delay will occur in the completion of the remaining
portion of the contract for any reason not the result of a breach
thereof, it may, if the contractor agrees, delete from the contract the
remaining work and accept as final the improvement at the stage of
completion then attained and make payment in proportion to the amount
of the work accomplished and in this case any amounts retained and
accumulated under this section shall be held for a period of sixty days
following the completion. In the event that the work is terminated
before final completion as provided in this section, the public body
may thereafter enter into a new contract with the same contractor to
perform the remaining work or improvement for an amount equal to or
less than the cost of the remaining work as was provided for in the
original contract without advertisement or bid. The provisions of this
chapter are exclusive and shall supersede all provisions and
regulations in conflict herewith.
(8) Whenever the department of transportation has contracted for
the construction of two or more ferry vessels, sixty days after
completion of all contract work on each ferry vessel, the department
must release and pay in full the amounts retained in connection with
the construction of the vessel subject to the provisions of RCW
60.28.020 and chapter 39.12 RCW. However, the department of
transportation may at its discretion condition the release of funds
retained in connection with the completed ferry upon the contractor
delivering a good and sufficient bond with two or more sureties, or
with a surety company, in the amount of the retained funds to be
released to the contractor, conditioned that no taxes shall be
certified or claims filed for work on the ferry after a period of sixty
days following completion of the ferry; and if taxes are certified or
claims filed, recovery may be had on the bond by the department of
revenue and the materialmen and laborers filing claims.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
reservation by a public body for any purpose from the moneys earned by
a contractor by fulfilling its responsibilities under public
improvement contracts is prohibited.
(10) Contracts on projects funded in whole or in part by farmers
home administration and subject to farmers home administration
regulations are not subject to subsections (1) through (9) of this
section.
(11) This subsection applies only to a public body that has
contracted for the construction of a facility using the general
contractor/construction manager procedure, as defined under RCW
39.10.061. If the work performed by a subcontractor on the project has
been completed within the first half of the time provided in the
general contractor/construction manager contract for completing the
work, the public body may accept the completion of the subcontract.
The public body must give public notice of this acceptance. After a
forty-five day period for giving notice of liens, and compliance with
the retainage release procedures in RCW 60.28.021, the public body may
release that portion of the retained funds associated with the
subcontract. Claims against the retained funds after the forty-five
day period are not valid.
(12) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Contract retainage" means an amount reserved by a public body
from the moneys earned by a person under a public improvement contract.
(b) "Person" means a person or persons, mechanic, subcontractor, or
materialperson who performs labor or provides materials for a public
improvement contract, and any other person who supplies the person with
provisions or supplies for the carrying on of a public improvement
contract.
(c) "Public body" means the state, or a county, city, town,
district, board, or other public body.
(d) "Public improvement contract" means a contract for public
improvements or work, other than for professional services, or a work
order as defined in RCW 39.10.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 60.28.040 and 1985 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The amount of all taxes, increases and penalties due or to become
due under Title 82 RCW, from a contractor or the contractor's
successors or assignees with respect to a public improvement contract
wherein the contract price is twenty thousand dollars or more shall be
a lien prior to all other liens upon the amount of the retained
percentage withheld by the disbursing officer under such contract,
except that the employees of a contractor or the contractor's
successors or assignees who have not been paid the prevailing wage
under such a public improvement contract shall have a first priority
lien against the bond or retainage prior to all other liens. Except
for claims or judgments made by or for the public body party to the
contract for public improvements or work, the amount of all other
taxes, increases and penalties due and owing from the contractor shall
be a lien upon the balance of such retained percentage remaining in the
possession of the disbursing officer after all other statutory lien
claims have been paid.

--- END ---