BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that over three hundred sixty thousand
individuals are living with AIDS in the United States, over four
thousand six hundred of whom reside in Washington. Of those
individuals, over forty-eight thousand are females from fifteen to
forty-four years of age, three hundred seventeen of whom reside in
Washington, and over two thousand five hundred are under thirteen years
of age, nine of whom reside in Washington. Since 1985, the proportion
of the cumulative total of AIDS cases reported among adult and
adolescent women has more than tripled, totaling twenty-six percent,
with an estimated ten thousand five hundred new cases diagnosed in
women and adolescent girls each year. It is unknown how many
individuals are living with HIV in Washington, since there is no
requirement in the state for reporting of HIV infection. However, in
the vast majority of areas of the United States in which reporting of
HIV infection is required, the numbers of individuals living with HIV
exceeds the numbers of individuals living with AIDS. Thus, the
legislature recognizes that the total number of individuals in the
state living with HIV or AIDS far outnumbers the known number of
individuals in the state living with AIDS.
The legislature finds that of those women who are living with HIV
or AIDS, there is a one-in-four chance of transmitting that infection
to a newborn child if the woman does not receive any preventive
treatment. HIV infection can be definitively diagnosed in most
infected infants by one month of age and in virtually all infected
infants by six months of age. Diagnosis of HIV infection in newborn
infants is particularly important since the youngest children infected
with HIV are at greatest risk for rapid disease progression.
The legislature further finds that the American academy of
pediatrics has developed recommendations specifically relating to HIV
exposure and infection of children in foster care in recognition of the
fact that the biological parents of those children are more likely to
have engaged in activities that would put them at an increased risk of
HIV infection. The American academy of pediatrics recommends that all
infants in foster care be tested for HIV antibody, if possible, when
the HIV status of the biological mother is unknown. The American
academy of pediatrics also recommends that all foster parents receive
up-to-date education concerning HIV infection, and be informed of the
HIV exposure or infection status of infants and children in their care.
The legislature intends to establish a policy that corresponds to
the recommendations of the American academy of pediatrics with the goal
of ensuring that the health and well-being of both infants in foster
care and the families providing for their care are protected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall ensure that the
HIV status of each child under one year of age placed in out-of-home
care is determined at the earliest practicable opportunity by the
child's physician.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to any placement, the department of social and health
services shall inform each out-of-home care provider of the HIV status,
if known, of the child to be placed in that provider's care.
(2) All out-of-home care providers licensed by the department shall
receive training related to HIV, including prevention, transmission,
infection control, treatment, testing, and confidentiality.
(3) Any disclosure of information related to HIV must be in
accordance with RCW 70.24.105.

--- END ---