BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.570 and 2002 c 285 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall direct and be responsible for the
acquisition, operation, maintenance, storage, repair, and replacement
of state motor vehicles under its control. The department shall
utilize state facilities available for the maintenance, repair, and
storage of such motor vehicles, and may provide directly or by contract
for the maintenance, repair, and servicing of all motor vehicles, and
other property related thereto and under its control.
(2) The department may arrange, by agreement with agencies, for the
utilization by one of the storage, repair, or maintenance facilities of
another, with such provision for charges and credits as may be agreed
upon. The department may acquire and maintain storage, repair, and
maintenance facilities for the motor vehicles under its control from
such funds as may be appropriated by the legislature.
(3)(a) The legislature finds that a clean environment is important
and that global warming effects may be offset by decreasing the
emissions of harmful compounds from motor vehicles. The legislature
further finds that the state is in a position to set an example of
large scale use of alternative fuels in motor vehicles and other clean
technologies.
(b) The department shall consider the use of state vehicles to
conduct field tests on alternative fuels in areas where air pollution
constraints may be eased by these optional fuels. These fuels should
include but are not limited to gas-powered and electric-powered
vehicles.
(c) For planned purchases of vehicles using alternative fuels, the
department and other state agencies shall explore opportunities to
purchase these vehicles together with the federal government, agencies
of other states, other Washington state agencies, local governments, or
private organizations for less cost. All state agencies must
investigate and determine whether or not they can make clean
technologies more cost-effective by combining their purchasing power
before completing a planned vehicle purchase.
(d) For the period July 1, 2004, through June 30, 2009, at least
fifty percent of all new vehicles purchased by the department must be
electric hybrid vehicles, vehicles that use alternative fuels, or a
combination of both.

--- END ---