BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.52.560 and 1998 c 245 s 69 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided otherwise in this chapter, a joint operating
agency shall purchase any item or items of materials, equipment, or
supplies, the estimated cost of which is ((in excess of five)) more
than ten thousand dollars exclusive of sales tax, or order work for
construction of generating projects and associated facilities, the
estimated cost of which is ((in excess of)) more than ten thousand
dollars exclusive of sales tax, by contract in accordance with RCW
54.04.070 and 54.04.080, which require sealed bids for contracts.

--- END ---