BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of a school district may operate
alternative learning experience programs for eligible full-time
students, or eligible part-time students who meet the provisions of RCW
28A.150.350. The board of directors may also provide such programs
through contract to the extent permitted under RCW 28A.150.305. The
board of directors of a school district claiming state funding for
alternative learning experiences shall adopt and periodically review
written policies for such programs. The alternative learning
experience programs:
(a) Must address the diverse needs of students for courses of study
provided in nontraditional learning environments;
(b) Must be supervised by certificated staff, who may be employed
either by the school district or by a contractor selected by the school
district;
(c) Must provide each student with direct personal contact at least
weekly with certificated staff designated by either the school district
or by the contractor with the approval of the school district. Direct
personal contact is for the purposes of instruction, assignment review,
testing, evaluation of student progress, or other learning activities.
Direct personal contact may include the use of telephone, e-mail,
interactive computer, or interactive video communication;
(d) Must provide each student with an individualized written
student learning plan developed with the assistance of and monitored by
certificated staff or, for a student enrolled in an on-line learning
program, a description of course objectives monitored by certificated
staff;
(e) Must assess the educational progress of enrolled students at
least annually, using, for full-time students, the state assessment
provided for the student's grade level, and using any other annual
assessments required by the school district. Part-time students must
also be assessed at least annually. Part-time students who are either
receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW or who are
enrolled in private schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW are not required
to participate in the assessments required under RCW 28A.655.060;
(f) May include significant participation by students, parents, and
families in the design and implementation of a student's learning
experience; and
(g) May provide individualized courses of study for students.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt rules for the implementation of this section, including program
implementation standards and enrollment documentation and reporting.

--- END ---