BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that: There are unmet
needs for community-based services for persons with developmental
disabilities and excess resources at residential habilitation centers
unrelated to current residential habilitation center operations;
funding shortfalls in the 2003-2005 biennium and beyond may adversely
impact the ability of the state to fund programs for growing numbers of
unserved persons with developmental disabilities who need
community-based services; and statistics generated by the department of
social and health services' division of developmental disabilities
demonstrate a growing caseload with insufficient funding and planning
to address this growth.
The December 4, 2002, capital study of the division of
developmental disabilities residential habilitation centers by the
joint legislative audit and review committee identifies options to
dispose of excess property at Lakeland Village, Rainier School, and
Yakima Valley School that would not impact current residential
habilitation center operations.
It is the intent of the legislature to allow use of these excess
capital properties at residential habilitation centers for persons with
developmental disabilities and to place the proceeds from their use
into a perpetual trust account for unserved persons with developmental
disabilities waiting for community-based developmental disability
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Excess property identified in the 2002 joint legislative audit
and review committee capital study of the division of developmental
disabilities residential habilitation centers must be managed to
provide as much income as feasible and this income deposited into the
developmental disabilities community trust account created in section
3 of this act. Income may come from lease of the land, conservation
easements, sale of timber, or other activities short of sale of the
property.
(2) The department shall report on its efforts and strategies to
provide income to the developmental disabilities community trust
account from the excess property identified in subsection (1) of this
section from the lease of the property, sale of timber, or other
activity short of sale of the property. The department shall report by
June 30, 2005.
(3) This section and section 3 of this act shall not apply to the
portion of excess property at Rainier school under the cognizance and
control of Washington State University used for extension services and
not a dairy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The developmental disabilities community trust account is created
in the state treasury. All income from the use of excess property
identified in the 2002 joint legislative audit and review committee
capital study of the division of developmental disabilities residential
habilitation centers, any building, facility, or tract of land not held
in trust at any of the residential habilitation centers identified in
this chapter, or sale of timber on these excess lands, must be
deposited into this account. Only investment income from the principal
of the proceeds deposited into the trust account may be spent from the
account. Investment income from the account may be spent only after
appropriation and must be used solely for community developmental
disability services for persons with developmental disabilities who are
unserved. Moneys in the account may not be used to supplant ongoing
expenditures for community services to persons with developmental
disabilities.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.84.092 and 2003 c 361 s 602, 2003 c 324 s 1, and
2003 c 48 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account,
the regional transportation investment district account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account,
the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund,
the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.84.092 and 2003 c 361 s 602, 2003 c 324 s 1, 2003
c 150 s 2, and 2003 c 48 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the regional transportation
investment district account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University
of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express
account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be
distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for section 5 of this act which takes effect July
1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 4 of this act expires July 1, 2005.

--- END ---