BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In 1989, the legislature created five branch campuses to be
operated by the state's two public research universities. Located in
growing urban areas, the branch campuses were charged with two
missions:
(a) Increasing access to higher education by focusing on upper
division and graduate programs, targeting placebound students, and
operating as models of a two plus two educational system in cooperation
with the community colleges; and
(b) Promoting regional economic development by responding to demand
for degrees from local businesses and supporting regional economies
through research activities.
(2) Fifteen years later, the legislature finds that branch campuses
are responding to their original mission:
(a) Branch campuses accounted for half of statewide upper division
and graduate public enrollment growth since 1990;
(b) Branch campuses have grown steadily and enroll increasing
numbers of transfer students each year;
(c) Branch campuses enroll proportionately more older and part-time
students than their main campuses and attract increasing proportions of
students from nearby counties;
(d) Although the extent of their impact has not been measured,
branch campuses positively affect local economies and offer degree
programs that roughly correspond with regional occupational
projections; and
(e) The capital investments made by the state to support branch
campuses represent a significant benefit to regional economic
development.
(3) However, the legislature also finds the policy landscape in
higher education has changed since the original creation of the branch
campuses. Demand for access to baccalaureate and graduate education is
increasing rapidly. Economic development efforts increasingly
recognize the importance of focusing on local and regional economic
clusters and improving collaboration among communities, businesses, and
colleges and universities. Each branch campus has evolved into a
unique institution, and it is appropriate to assess the nature of this
evolution to ensure the role and mission of each campus is aligned with
the state's higher education goals and the needs of the region where
the campus is located.
(4) Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to recognize the
unique nature of Washington's higher education branch campuses,
reaffirm the role and mission of each, and set the course for their
continued future development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The primary mission of the higher education branch campuses
created under this chapter remains to expand access to baccalaureate
and master's level graduate education in under-served urban areas of
the state in collaboration with community and technical colleges.
(2) Branch campuses shall collaborate with the community and
technical colleges in their region to develop articulation agreements,
dual admissions policies, and other partnerships to ensure that branch
campuses serve as innovative models of a two plus two educational
system. Other possibilities for collaboration include but are not
limited to joint development of curricula and degree programs,
colocation of instruction, and arrangements to share faculty.
(3) However, the legislature recognizes there are alternative
models for achieving this primary mission. Some campuses may have
additional missions in response to regional needs and demands. At
selected branch campuses, an innovative combination of instruction and
research targeted to support regional economic development may be
appropriate to meet the region's needs for both access and economic
viability. Other campuses should focus on becoming models of a two
plus two educational system through continuous improvement of
partnerships and agreements with community and technical colleges.
Still other campuses may be best suited to transition to a four-year
comprehensive university or be removed from designation as a branch
campus entirely.
(4) It is the legislature's intent that each branch campus be
funded commensurate with its unique mission, the degree programs
offered, and the institutional combination of instruction and research,
but at a level less than a research university.
(5) In consultation with the higher education coordinating board,
a branch campus may propose legislation to authorize practice-oriented
or professional doctoral programs if: (a) Unique research facilities
and equipment are located near the campus; or (b) the campus can
clearly demonstrate student and employer demand in the region that is
linked to regional economic development.
(6) It is not the legislature's intent to have each campus chart
its own future path without legislative guidance. Instead, the
legislature intends to consider carefully the mission and model of
education that best suits each campus and best meets the needs of
students, the community, and the region.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.45.050 and 1991 c 205 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Washington State University and Eastern Washington University ((are
responsible for providing upper-division and graduate level)) shall
collaborate with one another and with local community colleges in
providing educational pathways and programs to the citizens of the
Spokane area((, under rules or guidelines adopted by the joint center
for higher education. However, before any degree is authorized under
this section it shall be subject to the review and approval of the
higher education coordinating board. Washington State University shall
meet its responsibility through the operation of a branch campus in the
Spokane area. Eastern Washington University shall meet its
responsibility through the operation of programs and facilities in
Spokane)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Each branch campus shall examine its
instructional programs, costs, research initiatives, student enrollment
characteristics, and regional context and make a recommendation by
January 15, 2005, to the higher education committees of the senate and
house of representatives for the future evolution of the campus. The
recommendations must address:
(a) The model of education that best suits the campus, including
the possibility of continuing as a two plus two model, making a
transition to a four-year university or some other alternative;
(b) The mission that best suits the campus, including the
possibility of focusing on upper division baccalaureate education,
combining instruction and research targeted to support regional
economic development, or some other alternative;
(c) Data and analysis that illustrate how the model will increase
baccalaureate and master's degree production; and
(d) An estimate of the costs to implement the recommendation.
(2) In developing its recommendation, each branch campus shall
solicit input from students, local community and technical colleges,
the main campus and other four-year institutions, and community
stakeholders such as economic development councils and business and
labor leaders.
(3) The higher education coordinating board, in cooperation with
the branch campuses, shall develop parameters and a standard format for
the evaluation and recommendations to permit comparison by the
legislative committees.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.80.510 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
((In rules and guidelines adopted for purposes of chapter 7, Laws
of 1989 1st ex. sess.,)) The higher education coordinating board shall
adopt performance measures to ensure a collaborative partnership
between the community and technical colleges and the ((four-year
institutions)) branch campuses. The partnership shall be one in which
the community and technical colleges prepare students for transfer to
the upper-division programs of the branch campuses and the branch
campuses work with community and technical colleges to enable students
to transfer and obtain degrees efficiently.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) RCW 28B.80.510 as amended by this act is
recodified as a new section in chapter 28B.45 RCW.
(2) RCW 28B.45.050 as amended by this act is recodified as a new
section in chapter 28B.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.45.070 (Authorization subject to legislative
appropriation) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 14;
(2) RCW 28B.80.500 (Branch campuses -- Adjustment of enrollment lids)
and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 2; and
(3) RCW 28B.80.520 (Branch campuses -- Facilities acquisition) and
1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 9.

--- END ---