BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.102.010 and 1987 c 437 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that encouraging outstanding students to
enter the teaching profession is of paramount importance to the state
of Washington. By creating the future teachers conditional scholarship
and loan repayment program, the legislature intends to assist in the
effort to recruit as future teachers ((students)) individuals who have
distinguished themselves through outstanding academic achievement or
demonstrated their commitment to teaching through work as a
paraprofessional in the public school system, and ((students)) who can
act as role models for children ((including those from targeted ethnic
minorities)). The legislature urges business, industry, and
philanthropic community organizations to join with state government in
making this program successful.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.102.020 and 1996 c 53 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Conditional scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in
whole or in part if the recipient renders service as a teacher in an
approved education program in this state.
(2) "Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a
college or university in the state of Washington ((which)) that is
accredited by an accrediting association recognized as such by rule of
the higher education coordinating board.
(3) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(4) "Eligible student" means a student who is registered for at
least ((ten)) six credit hours or the equivalent, demonstrates high
academic achievement ((of at least a 3.30 grade point average for
students entering an institution of higher education directly from high
school or maintains at least a 3.00 grade point average or the
equivalent for each academic year in an institution of higher
education)), is a resident student as defined by RCW 28B.15.012 and
28B.15.013, ((and has a declared intention to complete)) is completing
an approved preparation program leading to initial teacher
certification or required for earning an additional endorsement, ((or
a college or university graduate who meets the same credit hour
requirements and is seeking an additional teaching endorsement or
initial teacher certification. Resident students defined in RCW
28B.15.012(2)(e) are not eligible students under this chapter)) and
commits to teaching service in the state of Washington.
(5) "Public school" means an elementary school, a middle school,
junior high school, or high school within the public school system
referred to in Article IX of the state Constitution.
(6) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means to render
service as a teacher in an approved education program in the state of
Washington in lieu of monetary repayment.
(7) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.
(8) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a
conditional scholarship or loan repayment under this chapter.
(9) (("Targeted ethnic minority" means a group of Americans with a
common ethnic or racial heritage selected by the board for program
consideration due to societal concerns such as high dropout rates or
low rates of college participation by members of the group.)) "Loan
repayment" means a federal student loan that is repaid in whole or in
part if the recipient renders service as a teacher in an approved
education program in Washington state.
(10) "Approved education program" means an education program in the
state of Washington for knowledge and skills generally learned in
preschool through twelfth grade. Approved education programs may
include but are not limited to:
(a) K-12 schools under Title 28A RCW; or
(b) ((Early childhood education and assistance programs under RCW
28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200 or the federal head start program;
(c) An approved school under chapter 28A.195 RCW;
(d) Education centers under chapter 28A.205 RCW;
(e) English as a second language programs and programs leading to
high school graduation or the equivalency operated by community or
technical colleges; and
(f) Tribal schools in Washington approved by the federal bureau of
Indian affairs.)) Other K-12 educational sites in the state of
Washington as designated by the board.
(11) "Equalization fee" means the additional amount added to the
principal of a loan under this chapter to equate the debt to that which
the student would have incurred if the loan had been received through
the federal subsidized Stafford student loan program.
(12) "Teacher shortage area" means a shortage of elementary or
secondary school teachers in a specific subject area, discipline,
classification, or geographic area as defined by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.102.030 and 1987 c 437 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The future teachers conditional scholarship and loan repayment
program is established. The program shall be administered by the
higher education coordinating board. In administering the program, the
board shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) Select students to receive conditional scholarships((, with the
assistance of a screening committee composed of teachers and leaders in
government, business, and education)) or loan repayments;
(2) Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;
(3) Publicize the program;
(4) Collect and manage repayments from students who do not meet
their teaching obligations under this chapter; and
(5) Solicit and accept grants and donations from public and private
sources for the program.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.102.040 and 1987 c 437 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((higher education coordinating)) board may select
participants based on an application process conducted by the board or
the board may utilize selection processes for similar students in
cooperation with the professional educator standards board or the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(2) If the board selects participants for the program, it shall
establish a ((planning)) selection committee ((to develop criteria))
for ((the)) screening and ((selection of)) selecting recipients of the
conditional scholarships. ((These)) The criteria shall emphasize
factors demonstrating excellence including but not limited to superior
scholastic achievement, leadership ability, community contributions,
bilingual ability, willingness to commit to providing teaching service
in shortage areas, and an ability to act as a role model for ((targeted
ethnic minority)) students. ((These criteria also may include, for
approximately half of the recipients, requirements that those
recipients meet the definition of "needy student" under RCW
28B.10.802.)) Priority will be given to individuals seeking
certification or an additional endorsement in math, science,
technology, or special education.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.102.045 and 1988 c 125 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The board may waive grade point requirements for an otherwise
eligible individual student under special circumstances.)) To receive
additional disbursements under the program under this chapter, a
participant must be considered by his or her institution of higher
education to be in a satisfactory progress condition.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.102.050 and 1987 c 437 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board may award conditional scholarships or provide loan
repayments to eligible ((students)) participants from the funds
appropriated to the board for this purpose, or from any private
donations, or any other funds given to the board for this program. The
amount of the conditional scholarship or loan repayment awarded an
individual shall not exceed ((three thousand dollars)) the amount of
tuition and fees at the institution of higher education attended by the
participant or resident undergraduate tuition and fees at the
University of Washington per academic year for a full-time student,
whichever is lower. ((Students)) Participants are eligible to receive
conditional scholarships or loan repayments for a maximum of five
years.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.102.060 and 1996 c 53 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Participants in the conditional scholarship program incur an
obligation to repay the conditional scholarship, with interest and an
equalization fee, unless they teach for two years in an approved
education program for each year of scholarship received, under rules
adopted by the board. Participants who teach in a designated teacher
shortage area shall have one year of loan canceled for each year they
teach in the shortage area.
(2) The interest rate shall be ((eight percent for the first four
years of repayment and ten percent beginning with the fifth year of
repayment)) determined annually by the board. Participants who fail to
complete the teaching service shall incur an equalization fee based on
the remaining unforgiven balance of the loan. The equalization fee
shall be added to the remaining balance and repaid by the participant.
(3) The minimum payment shall be set by the board. The maximum
period for repayment shall be ten years, with payments of principal and
interest accruing quarterly commencing ((nine)) six months from the
date the participant completes or discontinues the course of study.
Provisions for deferral of payment shall be determined by the board.
(4) The entire principal and interest of each payment shall be
forgiven for each payment period in which the participant teaches in an
approved education program until the entire repayment obligation is
satisfied. Should the participant cease to teach in an approved
education program in this state before the participant's repayment
obligation is completed, payments on the unsatisfied portion of the
principal and interest shall begin the next payment period and continue
until the remainder of the participant's repayment obligation is
satisfied.
(5) The board is responsible for collection of repayments made
under this section and shall exercise due diligence in such collection,
maintaining all necessary records to insure that maximum repayments are
made. Collection and servicing of repayments under this section shall
be pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment
if necessary. The board is responsible to forgive all or parts of such
repayments under the criteria established in this section and shall
maintain all necessary records of forgiven payments.
(6) Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or any other
subsidies to which the board as administrator is entitled, which are
paid by or on behalf of participants under this section, shall be
deposited ((with the higher education coordinating board)) in the
future teachers conditional scholarship account and shall be used to
cover the costs of granting the conditional scholarships, maintaining
necessary records, and making collections under subsection (5) of this
section. The board shall maintain accurate records of these costs, and
all receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs shall be used to
grant conditional scholarships to eligible students.
(7) The board shall ((temporarily or, in special circumstances,
permanently defer the requirements of this section for eligible
students as defined in RCW 28B.10.017.
(8) The board may cancel a recipient's repayment obligation due to
the recipient's total and permanent disability or death, subject to
documentation as required by the board.
(9) This section applies to recipients of conditional scholarships
awarded before or after July 1, 1996)) adopt rules to define the terms
of repayment, including applicable interest rates, fees, and
deferments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28B.102
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Upon documentation of federal student loan indebtedness, the
board may enter into agreements with participants to repay all or part
of a federal student loan in exchange for teaching service in an
approved educational program. The ratio of loan repayment to years of
teaching service for the loan repayment program shall be the same as
established for the conditional scholarship program.
(2) The agreement shall specify the period of time it is in effect
and detail the obligations of the board and the participant, including
the amount to be paid to the participant. The agreement may also
specify the geographic location and subject matter area of teaching
service for which loan repayment will be provided.
(3) At the end of each school year, a participant under this
section shall provide evidence to the board that the requisite teaching
service has been provided. Upon receipt of the evidence, the board
shall pay the participant the agreed-upon amount for one year of full-time teaching service or a prorated amount for less than full-time
teaching service. To qualify for additional loan repayments, the
participant must be engaged in continuous teaching service as defined
by the board.
(4) The board may, at its discretion, arrange to make the loan
repayment directly to the holder of the participant's federal student
loan.
(5) The board's obligations to a participant under this section
shall cease when:
(a) The terms of the agreement have been fulfilled;
(b) The participant fails to maintain continuous teaching service
as determined by the board; or
(c) All of the participant's federal student loans have been
repaid.
(6) The board shall adopt rules governing loan repayments,
including approved leaves of absence from continuous teaching service
and other deferments as may be necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28B.102
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The future teachers conditional scholarship account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures of funds from the account. The account is
not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW except for
moneys used for program administration.
(2) The board shall deposit in the account all moneys received for
the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds
appropriated by the legislature for the future teachers conditional
scholarship and loan repayment program, private contributions to the
program, and receipts from participant repayments. Beginning July 1,
2004, the board shall also deposit into the account: (a) All funds
from the institution of higher education loan account that are
traceable to any conditional scholarship program for teachers or
prospective teachers established by the legislature before the
effective date of this act; and (b) all amounts repaid by individuals
under any such program.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for
conditional loans and loan repayments to participants in the program
established by this chapter and costs associated with program
administration by the board.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the board.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2003 c 403 s 9, 2003 c 313 s 10, 2003
c 191 s 7, 2003 c 148 s 15, 2003 c 92 s 8, and 2003 c 19 s 12 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future
teachers conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative
account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion
account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic
facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, and the children's trust fund((, and the investing
in innovation account)). However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.102.070 (Transfer of administration of program) and
1987 c 437 s 7; and
(2) RCW 28B.102.905 (Severability -- 1987 c 437) and 1987 c 437 s 10.

--- END ---