BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.58.550 and 1983 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within this section the following definitions apply:
(a) "Exploration activity" means reconnaissance or survey work
related to gathering information about geologic features and formations
underlying or adjacent to marine waters;
(b) "Marine waters" include the waters of Puget Sound north to the
Canadian border, the waters of the Strait of Juan de Fuca, the waters
between the western boundary of the state and the ordinary high water
mark, and related bays and estuaries;
(c) "Significant underwater noise" means underwater sound levels of
one hundred eighty decibels or more generated from vessels, sonar
devices, acoustic surveys, and other devices that have the potential to
harm marine life;
(d) "Vessel" includes ships, boats, barges, or any other floating
craft.
(2) A person desiring to perform oil or natural gas exploration
activities or activities that generate significant underwater noise by
a vessel located on or within marine waters of the state shall first
obtain a permit from the department of ecology. The department may
approve an application for a permit only if it determines that the
proposed activity will not:
(a) Interfere materially with the normal public uses of the marine
waters of the state;
(b) Interfere with activities authorized by a permit issued under
RCW 90.58.140(2);
(c) Injure the marine biota, beds, or tidelands of the waters;
(d) Violate water quality standards established by the department;
or
(e) Create a public nuisance.
(3) Decisions on an application under subsection (2) of this
section are subject to review only by the pollution control hearings
board under chapter 43.21B RCW.
(4) This section does not apply to activities conducted by an
agency of the United States ((or the state of Washington)) military
during times of war.
(5) This section does not lessen, reduce, or modify RCW 90.58.160.
(6) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.
(7) The attorney general shall enforce this section.

--- END ---