BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Health care research has demonstrated
positive correlations between nurse staffing and quality nursing care
including better patient outcomes, improvements in safety of staff, job
satisfaction, retention, and reduction of workplace injuries. Among
the factors to be considered in analyzing the nurses' work environment
include the current and future nursing and health work force shortages;
health care facility efforts related to health personnel work
environment; the relationship between patient safety, patient outcomes,
staff safety, job satisfaction, nurse staffing, and retention
initiatives; and variability of health care facility location and size.
Therefore, the legislature finds that a task force to examine the
nurses' work environment is necessary to ensure quality patient care in
Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The secretary of health shall convene a task
force on nurses' work environment to prepare a report to the
legislature and propose measures aimed at improving patient safety by
addressing the features of nurses' current work environments related to
patient safety, patient outcomes, nurse job satisfaction, and nurse
retention.
(1) In preparing its report, the task force shall:
(a) Consider available information, including authoritative sources
and research related to nurses' work environments including, but not
limited to, the Institute of Medicine's 2003 report, Keeping Patients
Safe: Transforming the Work Environment of Nurses, the Joint
Commission for Accreditation of Health Care Organization's standards,
and state and federal legal requirements;
(b) Address priorities for implementing recommendations of the
Institute of Medicine's report in Washington, as well as other means of
improving patient safety;
(c) Analyze and propose strategies to improve those features of
nurses' current work environments related to patient safety, patient
outcomes, nurse job satisfaction, and nurse retention;
(d) Consider examples of staffing systems designed to improve
patient safety, quality of care, and retention of nursing staff;
(e) Consider the variability of health care facility size and
setting in Washington state that may affect staffing patterns and other
activities related to staffing;
(f) Consider the effect of the current and future nursing and
health care work force shortages on staffing; and
(g) Consider initiatives of Washington state health care facilities
on staffing and how they relate to and interact with other efforts that
address patient safety, staff safety, and nursing and other health
personnel job satisfaction and retention.
(2) The task force shall consist of fifteen members appointed by
the secretary of health. Members shall include:
(a) Six representatives from organizations representing nurses
involved in direct patient care, to include at least four registered
nurses. One member shall be a health care professional working in a
long-term care setting;
(b) One representative of an organization representing hospitals;
(c) Two registered nurses in managerial or executive roles, who are
representatives of an organization representing nurse executives;
(d) One faculty member of an academic institution preparing
registered nurses;
(e) One consumer representative;
(f) The secretary of health or the secretary's designee;
(g) One chief executive officer or chief operating officer of a
hospital;
(h) One human resources director or executive of a health care
facility who is a representative of an organization representing health
care human resources executives; and
(i) One representative of organizations representing long-term care
facilities.
(3) The task force shall issue its report to the legislature by
January 1, 2005.
(4) Any administrative costs of the department of health shall be
borne from nursing license fee revenues from existing fees deposited
into the health professions account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires January 1, 2005.

--- END ---