BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of licensing, in
cooperation with the age and driving advisory committee established in
this section, shall conduct a study of the effects of aging on driving
ability to develop a comprehensive approach to licensing drivers and
certification of driver fitness. This study must include, but not be
limited to:
(a) Identification of driver cohorts who may be at risk for being
involved in a motor vehicle accident because of age;
(b) Availability and effectiveness of remedial measures such as
skills training, adaptive equipment, physical therapy, and adjustment
of driving practices;
(c) Prevalence and effect of degenerative processes affecting
vision, mobility, cognitive functions, and reaction time;
(d) Effectiveness of public education initiatives;
(e) Identification of best practices from other states addressing
similar issues of an aging population; and
(f) Recommendations for improving processes for certification of
driver fitness and safety for older drivers.
(2) The department shall appoint the age and driving advisory
committee to participate in the study. The committee must include
representatives of organizations involved with issues facing older
drivers, including but not limited to:
(a) Medical professionals;
(b) Senior citizen advocacy groups;
(c) Providers of services to senior citizens; and
(d) Legislators to include, at a minimum, one legislator from each
caucus of both the house of representatives and the senate.
(3) The committee shall assist the department in reviewing existing
studies and other available information to identify where gaps exist in
understanding the issues and potential solutions associated with an
aging driving population, and to develop recommendations for
administrative and legislative action.
(4) The department shall provide a status report to the legislature
on December 1, 2004, and a final report on October 1, 2005. The report
must include any findings of the study, any recommendations of the
advisory committee, and any recommendations for statutory change that
result from the study.
(5) The department shall provide staff support to the committee as
needed.

--- END ---