BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the importance of
public confidence in government. It further recognizes public
confidence will be enhanced through more efficient and effective
management and operation of state agencies and programs. Therefore,
the legislature intends to provide greater accountability to the public
through an independent performance audit of government agencies. The
legislature finds that performance audit findings may include the
identification of potential cost savings and ways to improve service
delivery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state auditor shall contract for a performance audit of the
executive branch of state government.
(2) The performance audit shall include an examination of the
efficiency and effectiveness of major management policies, practices,
and functions across all executive branch agencies. The audit shall be
done in accordance with generally accepted government auditing
standards. The performance audit of executive branch agencies may
encompass entire departments, agencies, or institutions, or similar
programs in several departments. The audit shall include, but not be
limited to, the following:
(a) Planning, budgeting, and program evaluation policies and
practices;
(b) Personnel systems operations and management;
(c) State purchasing operations and management policies and
practices;
(d) Information processing and telecommunications systems policy,
organization, and management; and
(e) Organizational and staffing patterns, especially in terms of
the ratio of managers and supervisors to nonmanagement personnel.
(3) Audit staff shall have access to any state agency records,
data, and other information deemed necessary to carry out the audit.
State agencies shall provide the requested information at no cost and
in a timely manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state auditor shall report the results of the audit to the
legislature by September 1, 2005. Findings and recommendations, to the
extent practicable, shall be quantified in terms of cost and benefit.
The report shall also include identification of and recommendations for
best practices.
(2) State agencies shall have ninety days to respond to the
legislature regarding the findings and recommendations of the audit.
In their report, state agencies shall identify actions planned to
implement audit findings and recommendations as well as a timeline for
implementation.
(3) The legislature shall establish a joint committee on government
reform. The joint committee shall include the chairs and ranking
members of the house of representatives committees on state government
and appropriations, and the senate committees on government operations
and elections and ways and means. Senate committee services and the
office of program research shall staff the committee. The committee
shall:
(a) Hold four public hearings in different geographic areas across
the state to receive public input regarding the audit;
(b) Develop legislation, as appropriate, based on the findings and
recommendations of the audit and public comment.
(c) Terminate December 31, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the authority given the state auditor in RCW
43.88.160(6), the state auditor may contract for and oversee
performance audits under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The sum of five million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2005, from the general fund to the state auditor to carry out
the purposes of this act.

--- END ---