BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When any person is found guilty in any superior, district, or
juvenile court of having committed any of the crimes listed in
subsection (2) of this section where the victim is an elderly person or
a vulnerable adult, the court may impose upon the convicted person a
penalty assessment. If the penalty is imposed, it shall be in addition
to any other penalty or fine imposed by law, including a penalty
assessment imposed under RCW 7.68.035. The amount of the penalty shall
be up to ten thousand dollars per conviction for felonies, up to five
thousand dollars per conviction for gross misdemeanors, and up to one
thousand dollars per conviction for misdemeanors.
(2) A superior or district court may impose a penalty assessment
under subsection (1) of this section if the person is found guilty of
any of the following crimes where the victim is an elderly person or a
vulnerable adult:
(a) Identity theft in the first degree under RCW 9.35.020;
(b) Identity theft in the second degree under RCW 9.35.020;
(c) Theft in the first degree under RCW 9A.56.030;
(d) Theft in the second degree under RCW 9A.56.040;
(e) Theft in the third degree under RCW 9A.56.050;
(f) Forgery under RCW 9A.60.020;
(g) Obtaining a signature by deception or duress under RCW
9A.60.030;
(h) Criminal impersonation in the first degree under RCW 9A.60.040;
(i) Criminal impersonation in the second degree under RCW
9A.60.045;
(j) False certification under RCW 9A.60.050;
(k) A violation of RCW 18.27.020; or
(l) A securities act violation under RCW 21.20.400.
(3) Moneys collected under this section shall be transmitted to the
state treasurer for deposit in the elder and vulnerable adult fraud
prevention account.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Elderly person" means a person sixty years of age or older.
(b) "Vulnerable adult" means a person found incapacitated under
chapter 11.88 RCW, a person over eighteen years of age who has a
developmental disability under chapter 71A.10 RCW, a person admitted to
a long-term care facility that is licensed or required to be licensed
under chapter 18.20, 18.51, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW, or a person receiving
services from a home health, hospice, or home care agency licensed or
required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2003 c 53 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670,
9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or 9.94A.545, served in the
community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and
activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department
shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and
modify conditions of community custody, in addition to those imposed by
the court, based upon the risk to community safety.
(6) "Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period
of community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW
9.94A.715, as established by the commission or the legislature under
RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.
(7) "Community placement" means that period during which the
offender is subject to the conditions of community custody and/or
postrelease supervision, which begins either upon completion of the
term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release.
Community placement may consist of entirely community custody, entirely
postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.
(8) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(9) "Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other
sentence conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW
16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the court finds that any offender has
a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense, the
conditions of supervision may, subject to available resources, include
treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state
supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be
considered the same as probation by other states.
(10) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(11) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(12) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(13) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(14) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(15) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision
designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with
sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report
daily to a specific location designated by the department or the
sentencing court.
(16) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(17) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with
exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community supervision, the
number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or
dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of
confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a
determinate sentence.
(18) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(19) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent
offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW
9.94A.660.
(20) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(21) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as
provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(22) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(23) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(24) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of
time.
(25) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior
convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender
waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(26) "Home detention" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private
residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(27) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is
ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal
financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim,
statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed
pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, statutorily imposed penalty assessments under
section 1 of this act, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds,
court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any
other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result
of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense
of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction,
subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(28) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or
a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.
(29) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent
offense.
(30) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(31) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one
year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract
by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention or
work crew has been ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for
a substantial portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in
the community. Partial confinement includes work release, home
detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.
(32) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit
any crime listed in this subsection (32)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(33) "Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's
community placement that is not community custody.
(34) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(35) "Risk assessment" means the application of an objective
instrument supported by research and adopted by the department for the
purpose of assessing an offender's risk of reoffense, taking into
consideration the nature of the harm done by the offender, place and
circumstances of the offender related to risk, the offender's
relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be
based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(36) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual physical control while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving
(RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5));
or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(37) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense
and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(38) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(11);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.070 or 9.68A.080; or
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(39) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which
the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her
sexual gratification.
(40) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's
discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(41) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time
for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as
prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the
crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(42) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical
boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four
hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(43) "Transition training" means written and verbal instructions
and assistance provided by the department to the offender during the
two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work
ethic camp program. The transition training shall include instructions
in the offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's
period of community custody.
(44) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as
a direct result of the crime charged.
(45) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(46) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting
of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that
complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(47) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program
as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower
the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(48) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.86.010 and 1961 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Assets" include any property, tangible or intangible, real,
personal, or mixed, and wherever situate, and any other thing of value.
(2) "Elderly person" means a person sixty years of age or older.
(3) "Person" shall include, where applicable, natural persons,
corporations, trusts, unincorporated associations, and partnerships.
(((2))) (4) "Trade" and "commerce" shall include the sale of assets
or services, and any commerce directly or indirectly affecting the
people of the state of Washington.
(((3) "Assets" shall include any property, tangible or intangible,
real, personal, or mixed, and wherever situate, and any other thing of
value.))
(5) "Vulnerable adult" means a person found incapacitated under
chapter 11.88 RCW, a person over eighteen years of age who has a
developmental disability under chapter 71A.10 RCW, a person admitted to
a long-term care facility that is licensed or required to be licensed
under chapter 18.20, 18.51, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW, or a person receiving
services from a home health, hospice, or home care agency licensed or
required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.86.080 and 1970 ex.s. c 26 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The attorney general may bring an action in the name of the
state against any person to restrain and prevent the doing of any act
herein prohibited or declared to be unlawful; and the prevailing party
may, in the discretion of the court, recover the costs of said action
including a reasonable attorney's fee.
(2)(a) The court may make such additional orders or judgments as
may be necessary to restore to any person in interest any moneys or
property, real or personal, which may have been acquired by means of
any act herein prohibited or declared to be unlawful.
(b) If the prohibited or unlawful act was committed against an
elderly person or a vulnerable adult, the court may assess a civil fine
of up to ten thousand dollars for each elderly person injured by the
act, which must be deposited in the elder and vulnerable adult fraud
prevention account.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.86.090 and 1987 c 202 s 187 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a)(i) Any person who is injured in his or her business or
property by a violation of RCW 19.86.020, 19.86.030, 19.86.040,
19.86.050, or 19.86.060, or any person so injured because he or she
refuses to accede to a proposal for an arrangement which, if
consummated, would be in violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040,
19.86.050, or 19.86.060, may bring a civil action in the superior court
to enjoin further violations, to recover the actual damages sustained
by him or her, or both, together with the costs of the suit, including
a reasonable attorney's fee, and the court may in its discretion,
increase the award of damages to an amount not to exceed three times
the actual damages sustained((: PROVIDED, That)). Such increased
damage award for violation of RCW 19.86.020 may not exceed ten thousand
dollars((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such)).
(ii) If the person is an elderly person or a vulnerable adult, the
superior court may assess a civil fine of up to ten thousand dollars,
which must be deposited in the elder and vulnerable adult fraud
prevention account.
(b) A person may bring a civil action in the district court to
recover his or her actual damages, except for damages which exceed the
amount specified in RCW 3.66.020, and the costs of the suit, including
reasonable attorney's fees.
(i) The district court may, in its discretion, increase the award
of damages to an amount not more than three times the actual damages
sustained, but such increased damage award shall not exceed the amount
specified in RCW 3.66.020. ((For the purpose of this section "person"
shall include the counties, municipalities, and all political
subdivisions of this state.))
(ii) If the person is an elderly person or a vulnerable adult, the
superior court may, in its discretion, assess a civil fine of up to ten
thousand dollars, which must be deposited in the elder and vulnerable
adult fraud prevention account.
(2) Whenever the state of Washington is injured by reason of a
violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or 19.86.060, it may
sue therefor in the superior court to recover the actual damages
sustained by it and to recover the costs of the suit including a
reasonable attorney's fee.
(3) For the purpose of this section "person" shall include the
counties, municipalities, and all political subdivisions of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 9A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following are subject to seizure and forfeiture and no
property right exists in them:
(a) Proceeds traceable to or derived from a violation, where the
victim is an elderly person or a vulnerable adult, of this chapter, RCW
9.35.020, 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, 9A.56.050, 18.27.020, or 21.20.400; and
(b) Instrumentalities used significantly to facilitate a violation,
where the victim is an elderly person or a vulnerable adult, of this
chapter, RCW 9.35.020, 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, 9A.56.050, 18.27.020, or
21.20.400, subject to the following limitations:
(i) An instrumentality is not subject to forfeiture under this
section, to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any
act or omission committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or
consent;
(ii) A forfeiture of an instrumentality encumbered by a bona fide
security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if
the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the
violation; and
(iii) A conveyance, including an aircraft, a vehicle, or a vessel,
used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business
as a common carrier is not subject to forfeiture under this section
unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the
conveyance is a consenting party or privy to the violation.
(2) Real or personal property subject to forfeiture under this
chapter may be seized by any law enforcement officer of this state upon
process issued by any superior court having jurisdiction over the
property. Seizure of real property shall include the filing of a lis
pendens by the seizing agency. Real property seized under this section
shall not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until ninety days after
seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered, whichever is
later: PROVIDED, That real property seized under this section may be
transferred or conveyed to any person or entity who acquires title by
foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a security interest.
Seizure of personal property without process may be made if:
(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search
warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;
(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior
judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture
proceeding based upon this chapter;
(c) A law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that
the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety;
or
(d) The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that
the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of this
chapter.
(3) In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the
seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure
was made shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following
the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in
charge thereof, the office of crime victims' advocacy, and any person
having any known right or interest therein, including any community
property interest, of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized
property. Service of notice of seizure of real property shall be made
according to the rules of civil procedure. However, the state may not
obtain a default judgment with respect to real property against a party
who is served by substituted service absent an affidavit stating that
a good faith effort has been made to ascertain if the defaulted party
is incarcerated within the state, and that there is no present basis to
believe that the party is incarcerated within the state. Notice of
seizure in the case of property subject to a security interest that has
been perfected by filing a financing statement in accordance with
chapter 62A.9A RCW, or a certificate of title, shall be made by service
upon the secured party or the secured party's assignee at the address
shown on the financing statement or the certificate of title. The
notice of seizure in other cases may be served by any method authorized
by law or court rule including but not limited to service by certified
mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail shall be deemed
complete upon mailing within the fifteen-day period following the
seizure.
(4) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
items seized under subsection (2) of this section within forty-five
days of the seizure in the case of personal property and ninety days in
the case of real property, the item seized shall be deemed forfeited.
The community property interest in real property of a person whose
spouse committed a violation giving rise to seizure of the real
property may not be forfeited if the person did not participate in the
violation.
(5) If any person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
items seized under subsection (2) of this section within forty-five
days of the seizure in the case of personal property and ninety days in
the case of real property, the person or persons shall be afforded a
reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The
hearing shall be before the chief law enforcement officer of the
seizing agency or the chief law enforcement officer's designee, except
where the seizing agency is a state agency as defined in RCW
34.12.020(4), the hearing shall be before the chief law enforcement
officer of the seizing agency or an administrative law judge appointed
under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that any person asserting a claim or
right may remove the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction.
Removal of any matter involving personal property may only be
accomplished according to the rules of civil procedure. The person
seeking removal of the matter must serve process against the state,
county, political subdivision, or municipality that operates the
seizing agency, and any other party of interest, in accordance with RCW
4.28.080 or 4.92.020, within forty-five days after the person seeking
removal has notified the seizing law enforcement agency of the person's
claim of ownership or right to possession. The court to which the
matter is to be removed shall be the district court when the aggregate
value of personal property is within the jurisdictional limit set forth
in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing before the seizing agency and any appeal
therefrom shall be under Title 34 RCW. In all cases, the burden of
proof is upon the law enforcement agency to establish, by a
preponderance of the evidence, that the property is subject to
forfeiture.
The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the
article or articles to the claimant upon a determination by the
administrative law judge or court that the claimant is the present
lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession thereof of items
seized under subsection (2) of this section.
(6) In any proceeding to forfeit property under this title, where
the claimant substantially prevails, the claimant is entitled to
reasonable attorneys' fees reasonably incurred by the claimant. In
addition, in a court hearing between two or more claimants to the
article or articles involved, the prevailing party is entitled to a
judgment for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(7)(a) When property is forfeited, the seizing agency shall keep a
record indicating the identity of the prior owner, if known, a
description of the property, the disposition of the property, the value
of the property at the time of seizure, and the amount of proceeds
realized from disposition of the property.
(b) Each seizing agency shall retain records of forfeited property
for at least seven years.
(c) Each seizing agency shall file a report including a copy of the
records of forfeited property with the state treasurer each calendar
quarter.
(d) The quarterly report need not include a record of forfeited
property that is still being held for use as evidence during the
investigation or prosecution of a case or during the appeal from a
conviction.
(8)(a) The net proceeds of any property forfeited under this
section shall be paid as restitution to any person readily
ascertainable by the seizing agency at the time of the forfeiture who
was damaged by the crime giving rise to the forfeiture. The seizing
agency shall then remit ten percent of the remainder to the state
treasurer. Money remitted shall be deposited in the elder and
vulnerable adult fraud prevention account.
(b) The net proceeds of forfeited property is the value of the
forfeitable interest in the property after deducting the cost of
satisfying any bona fide security interest to which the property is
subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of sold property, after
deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or commissions
paid to independent selling agents, and the cost of any valid
landlord's claim for damages under subsection (11) of this section.
(c) The value of sold forfeited property is the sale price. The
value of retained forfeited property is the fair market value of the
property at the time of seizure, determined when possible by reference
to an applicable commonly used index, such as the index used by the
department of licensing for valuation of motor vehicles. A seizing
agency may use, but need not use, an independent qualified appraiser to
determine the value of retained property. If an appraiser is used, the
value of the property appraised is net of the cost of the appraisal.
The value of destroyed property and retained firearms or illegal
property is zero.
(9)(a) Forfeited property and net proceeds not required to be paid
as restitution or to the state treasurer shall be retained by the
seizing law enforcement agency.
(b) When property is retained under this subsection, the seizing
law enforcement agency may:
(i) Retain it for official use, or upon application by any law
enforcement agency of this state, release such property to such agency
for the exclusive use of preventing fraud-related crimes against
elderly persons and vulnerable adults;
(ii) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and
which is not harmful to the public; or
(iii) Request the appropriate sheriff or director of public safety
to take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in
accordance with law.
(c) Money retained under this subsection may not be used to
supplant preexisting funding sources.
(10) Upon the entry of an order of forfeiture of real property, the
court shall forward a copy of the order to the assessor of the county
in which the property is located. Orders for the forfeiture of real
property shall be entered by the superior court, subject to court
rules. Such an order shall be filed by the seizing agency in the
county auditor's records in the county in which the real property is
located.
(11)(a) A landlord may assert a claim against proceeds from the
sale of assets seized and forfeited under subsection (9)(b)(ii) of this
section, only if:
(i) A law enforcement officer, while acting in his or her official
capacity, directly caused damage to the complaining landlord's property
while executing a search of a tenant's residence; and
(ii) The landlord has applied any funds remaining in the tenant's
deposit, to which the landlord has a right under chapter 59.18 RCW, to
cover the damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer prior to
asserting a claim under the provisions of this section.
(b) Only if the funds applied under (a)(ii) of this subsection are
insufficient to satisfy the damage directly caused by a law enforcement
officer may the landlord seek compensation for the damage by filing a
claim against the governmental entity under whose authority the law
enforcement agency operates within thirty days after the search.
(c) Only if the governmental entity denies or fails to respond to
the landlord's claim within sixty days of the date of filing may the
landlord collect damages under this subsection by filing within thirty
days of denial or the expiration of the sixty-day period, whichever
occurs first, a claim with the seizing law enforcement agency. The
seizing law enforcement agency must notify the landlord of the status
of the claim by the end of the thirty-day period. Nothing in this
section requires the claim to be paid by the end of the sixty-day or
thirty-day period.
(d) For any claim filed under this subsection, the law enforcement
agency shall pay the claim unless the agency provides substantial proof
that the landlord knew or consented to the unlawful actions of the
tenant that led to the seizure under this section.
(12) The landlord's claim for damages under subsection (11) of this
section may not include a claim for loss of business and is limited to:
(a) Damage to tangible property and clean-up costs;
(b) The lesser of the cost of repair or fair market value of the
damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer;
(c) The proceeds from the sale of the specific tenant's property
seized and forfeited under subsection (9)(b)(ii) of this section; and
(d) The proceeds available after the seizing law enforcement agency
satisfies any bona fide security interest in the tenant's property and
costs related to sale of the tenant's property as provided by
subsection (8)(b) of this section.
(13) Subsections (11) and (12) of this section do not limit any
other rights a landlord may have against a tenant to collect for
damages. However, if a law enforcement agency satisfies a landlord's
claim under subsection (11) of this section, the rights the landlord
has against the tenant for damages directly caused by a law enforcement
officer under the terms of the landlord and tenant's contract are
subrogated to the law enforcement agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The elder and vulnerable adult fraud
prevention account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts from fines, assessments, or forfeitures collected under
RCW 19.86.080(2)(b), 19.86.090(1) (a)(ii) or (b)(ii), or section 1 or
6 of this act must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may only be used to fund activities relating to advocating on
behalf of, or preventing fraud against, elderly persons or vulnerable
adults.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---