BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.120.030 and 2002 c 282 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The owner or operator in charge of any vessel covered by this
chapter is required to ensure that the vessel under their ownership or
control does not discharge ballast water into the waters of the state
except as authorized by this section.
(1) Discharge into waters of the state is authorized if the vessel
has conducted an open sea exchange of ballast water. A vessel is
exempt from this requirement if the vessel's master reasonably
determines that such a ballast water exchange operation will threaten
the safety of the vessel or the vessel's crew, or is not feasible due
to vessel design limitations or equipment failure. If a vessel relies
on this exemption, then it may discharge ballast water into waters of
the state, subject to any requirements of treatment under subsection
(2) of this section and subject to RCW 77.120.040.
(2) After July 1, ((2004)) 2008, discharge of ballast water into
waters of the state is authorized only if there has been an open sea
exchange or if the vessel has treated its ballast water to meet
standards set by the department. When weather or extraordinary
circumstances make access to treatment unsafe to the vessel or crew,
the master of a vessel may delay compliance with any treatment required
under this subsection until it is safe to complete the treatment.
(3) The requirements of this section do not apply to a vessel
discharging ballast water or sediments that originated solely within
the waters of Washington state, the Columbia river system, or the
internal waters of British Columbia south of latitude fifty degrees
north, including the waters of the Straits of Georgia and Juan de Fuca.
(4) Open sea exchange is an exchange that occurs fifty or more
nautical miles offshore. If the United States coast guard requires a
vessel to conduct an exchange further offshore, then that distance is
the required distance for purposes of compliance with this chapter.

--- END ---