BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
significantly improve the financial accountability and service delivery
of state activities and functions by establishing standardized
administrative districts for all state agencies. Uniform
administrative districts will result in enhanced reporting of revenue
and expense by region, better state program customer service,
integrated planning and development of state infrastructure, and
improved regional economic development opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following state agencies shall organize services and
functions according to uniform administrative districts: Social and
health services; ecology; labor and industries; agriculture; fish and
wildlife; transportation; licensing; general administration; community,
trade, and economic development; veterans affairs; revenue; retirement
systems; corrections; health; financial institutions; information
services; military department; personnel; and the state auditor.
(2) State campuses shall be established in each district and each
state agency shall have an administrative office in every state campus
of each administrative district. Existing field offices of state
agencies shall be aligned with the campus center.
(3) Administrative districts and campus centers are as follows:

DISTRICT COUNTIES CAMPUS CENTERS

Peninsula Clallam, Jefferson, Kitsap Port Angeles

Pacific Coast Grays Harbor, Pacific, Wahkiakum Raymond

Southwest Clark, Skamania, Cowlitz Vancouver

South Sound Lewis, Thurston, Mason Olympia

Puget Sound Snohomish, King, Pierce Bellevue

Northwest Whatcom, Skagit, Island, San Juan Mt. Vernon

Okanogan Okanogan, Douglas, Chelan Wenatchee

Yakima Kittitas, Yakima, Klickitat Yakima

Tri-Cities Benton, Franklin, Walla Walla Pasco

Mid-State Grant, Adams, Lincoln Ritzville

Northeast Stevens, Ferry, Pend Oreille Colville

Spokane Spokane, Whitman Spokane

Palouse Columbia, Garfield, Asotin Pomeroy

(4) The location of state campuses may be changed only by a
majority vote of all county commissioners located within the district
within the first one hundred eighty days following the effective date
of this act.
(5) All state agencies, boards, and commissions shall report all
revenues and expenditures, in aggregate and by program or project, to
the office of financial management by uniform administrative district.
Budget requests shall be submitted by agencies, boards, and commissions
as a whole and organized by uniform administrative district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of financial management shall maintain state agency data
by uniform administrative districts created in section 2 of this act
and shall report this information to the legislature at least
semiannually. The office of financial management shall fund conversion
costs within existing appropriations and shall provide a progress
report on these conversions to the legislature on or before July 1,
2005.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.88C.020 and 1997 c 168 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In consultation with the caseload forecast work group
established under RCW 43.88C.030, and subject to the approval of the
caseload forecast council under RCW 43.88C.010, the supervisor shall
prepare:
(a) An official state caseload forecast; and
(b) Other caseload forecasts based on alternative assumptions as
the council may determine.
(2) The supervisor shall submit caseload forecasts prepared under
this section, along with any unofficial forecasts provided under RCW
43.88C.010, to the governor and the members of the legislative fiscal
committees, including one copy to the staff of each of the committees.
Caseload forecasts shall be organized and reported according to uniform
administrative districts created in section 2 of this act. The
forecasts shall be submitted at least three times each year and on such
dates as the council determines will facilitate the development of
budget proposals by the governor and the legislature.
(3) All agencies of state government shall provide to the
supervisor immediate access to all information relating to caseload
forecasts.
(4) The administrator of the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee may request, and the supervisor shall
provide, alternative caseload forecasts based on assumptions specified
by the administrator.
(5) The official state caseload forecast under this section shall
be the basis of the governor's budget document as provided in RCW
43.88.030 and utilized by the legislature in the development of the
omnibus biennial appropriations act.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.88.094 and 1998 c 299 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The budget amount designated in RCW 43.88.093(1) is the sum of
the base amount and the growth component as calculated under subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall calculate the tourism development division
budget, organized as a whole and by uniform administrative districts
created in section 2 of this act, in consultation with the appropriate
agencies in the following manner:
(a) The base amount, beginning in the budget for the biennium
ending June 30, 2001, and for each subsequent biennium thereafter,
equals the previous biennial budget, including any supplemental
allocations and any growth component amounts from previous biennia.
(b) For the growth component, beginning in the budget for the
biennium ending June 30, 2001: (i) Compute the state retail sales tax
revenues for the target business categories for the calendar year two
years prior to the beginning of the biennium for which the budget
request will be made; (ii) compute the state retail sales tax revenues
for the target business categories for the calendar year four years
prior to the beginning of the biennium for which the budget request
will be made; (iii) calculate the percentage change in these two sales
tax revenue amounts; (iv) if the percentage exceeds eight percent
growth, calculate the amount of sales tax revenue that represents the
excess in revenue growth greater than six percent; and (v) calculate
the growth component by dividing the excess revenue growth by two. The
amount of the growth component for any biennium shall not exceed two
million dollars per fiscal year for the biennium.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Target business categories" means businesses in standard
industrial classification codes 58 (eating and drinking), 70 (lodging),
7514 (auto rental), and 79 (recreation). If at any time the United
States office of management and budget or a successor agency should
change or replace the present standard industrial classification code
system, the department of community, trade, and economic development
shall use the code system issued by the office of management and budget
or its successor agency to determine codes corresponding to those
listed in this definition.
(b) "Retail sales" means the gross sales subject to the tax imposed
in chapter 82.08 RCW received by businesses identified in department of
revenue records by standard industrial classification codes 58, 70,
7514, and 79.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2008.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.33.020 and 1992 c 231 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Four times each year the supervisor shall prepare, subject to
the approval of the economic and revenue forecast council under RCW
82.33.010:
(a) An official state economic and revenue forecast;
(b) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
optimistic economic and revenue projections; and
(c) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
pessimistic economic and revenue projections.
(2) The supervisor shall submit forecasts prepared under this
section, along with any unofficial forecasts provided under RCW
82.33.010, to the governor and the members of the committees on ways
and means and the chairs of the committees on transportation of the
senate and house of representatives and the chair of the legislative
transportation committee, including one copy to the staff of each of
the committees, on or before November 20th, February 20th in the even-numbered years, March 20th in the odd-numbered years, June 20th, and
September 20th. All forecasts shall include both estimated receipts
and estimated revenues in conformance with generally accepted
accounting principles as provided by RCW 43.88.037. All forecasts
shall be organized and reported according to uniform administrative
districts created in section 2 of this act.
(3) All agencies of state government shall provide to the
supervisor immediate access to all information relating to economic and
revenue forecasts. Revenue collection information shall be available
to the supervisor the first business day following the conclusion of
each collection period.
(4) The economic and revenue forecast supervisor and staff shall
co-locate and share information, data, and files with the tax research
section of the department of revenue but shall not duplicate the duties
and functions of one another.
(5) As part of its forecasts under subsection (1) of this section,
the supervisor shall provide estimated revenue from tuition fees as
defined in RCW 28B.15.020.
(6) The caseload forecast council shall create and maintain an
index of uniform economic indicators and a uniform purchasing power
index and track these activities according to the uniform
administrative districts created in section 2 of this act. The council
shall report this information to the legislature on a semiannual basis
beginning on or before July 1, 2005.

Sec. 7 RCW 44.48.070 and 1977 ex.s. c 373 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The committee shall acquire a data processing service capability
under the exclusive jurisdiction and control of the legislature acting
through the committee and its administrator for the purpose of
providing the legislature and its staff with the type of information
required for in-depth analysis and monitoring of state agency
expenditures, budgets, and related fiscal matters. The committee shall
be able to provide information according to the uniform administrative
districts created in section 2 of this act. The legislative evaluation
and accountability program established in this section may be referred
to in this chapter as the LEAP administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28A.310
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall organize
educational service district services and functions according to
administrative districts created in section 2 of this act. An
educational service district shall have an administrative office in the
designated administrative center of each district.
(2) Educational service districts shall report all revenues and
expenditures, in aggregate and by program or project, to the
superintendent of public instruction by uniform administrative
district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28A.310
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall maintain educational
service district data by uniform administrative districts created in
section 2 of this act and shall report this information to the
legislature at least quarterly. The superintendent of public
instruction shall fund conversion costs within existing appropriations
and shall provide reporting conversions to the legislature on or before
July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature shall establish a joint committee to review and
assess the effectiveness of the uniform administrative districts in
meeting its legislative intent. The joint committee shall include four
members, one from each major caucus from the senate and the house of
representatives selected by the caucus leadership.
(2) The committee shall hold at least four public meetings each
year to allow for public comment and to gather information on the
effectiveness of uniform administrative districts.
(3) The committee shall evaluate the effectiveness of the uniform
administrative districts and make recommendations to expand the number
of state agencies required to organize by uniform administrative
district and procedures to align agency efforts to successfully
accomplish that goal.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2008.

--- END ---