BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.127 and 2003 c 111 s 122 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Primary" or "primary election" means a statutory procedure for
nominating candidates to nonpartisan public office at the polls.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.157 and 2003 c 111 s 128 are each amended to
read as follows:
"September primary" means the primary election held in September to
nominate candidates for nonpartisan office to be voted for at the
ensuing election.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.04.310 and 2003 c 111 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
For nonpartisan offices, nominating primaries for general elections
to be held in November must be held on the third Tuesday of the
preceding September or on the seventh Tuesday immediately preceding
such general election, whichever occurs first.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.04.420 and 2003 c 111 s 147 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever state officers or measures are voted upon at a state
primary or general election held in an odd-numbered year under RCW
29A.04.320, the state of Washington shall assume a prorated share of
the costs of that state primary or general election.
(2) Whenever a ((primary or)) vacancy election is held to fill a
vacancy in the position of United States senator or United States
representative under chapter 29A.28 RCW, the state of Washington shall
assume a prorated share of the costs of that ((primary or)) vacancy
election.
(3) The county auditor shall apportion the state's share of these
expenses when prorating election costs under RCW 29A.04.410 and shall
file such expense claims with the secretary of state.
(4) The secretary of state shall include in his or her biennial
budget requests sufficient funds to carry out this section.
Reimbursements for election costs shall be from appropriations
specifically provided by law for that purpose.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.04.570 and 2003 c 111 s 155 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The election review staff of the office of the secretary of
state shall conduct a review of election-related policies, procedures,
and practices in an affected county or counties:
(i) If the unofficial returns of a ((primary or)) general election
for a position in the state legislature indicate that a mandatory
recount is likely for that position; or
(ii) If unofficial returns indicate a mandatory recount is likely
in a statewide election or an election for federal office.
Reviews conducted under (ii) of this subsection shall be performed
in as many selected counties as time and staffing permit. Reviews
conducted as a result of mandatory recounts shall be performed between
the time the unofficial returns are complete and the time the recount
is to take place, if possible.
(b) In addition to conducting reviews under (a) of this subsection,
the election review staff shall also conduct such a review in a county
periodically, in conjunction with a county primary or special or
general election, at the direction of the secretary of state or at the
request of the county auditor. If any resident of this state believes
that an aspect of a primary or election has been conducted
inappropriately in a county, the resident may file a complaint with the
secretary of state. The secretary shall consider such complaints in
scheduling periodic reviews under this section.
(c) Before an election review is conducted in a county, the
secretary of state shall provide the county auditor of the affected
county and the chair of the state central committee of each major
political party with notice that the review is to be conducted. When
a periodic review is to be conducted in a county at the direction of
the secretary of state under (b) of this subsection, the secretary
shall provide the affected county auditor not less than thirty days'
notice.
(2) Reviews shall be conducted in conformance with rules adopted
under RCW 29A.04.630. In performing a review in a county under this
chapter, the election review staff shall evaluate the policies and
procedures established for conducting the primary or election in the
county and the practices of those conducting it. As part of the
review, the election review staff shall issue to the county auditor and
the members of the county canvassing board a report of its findings and
recommendations regarding such policies, procedures, and practices. A
review conducted under this chapter shall not include any evaluation,
finding, or recommendation regarding the validity of the outcome of a
primary or election or the validity of any canvass of returns nor does
the election review staff have any jurisdiction to make such an
evaluation, finding, or recommendation under this title.
(3) The county auditor of the county in which a review is conducted
under this section or a member of the canvassing board of the county
may appeal the findings or recommendations of the election review staff
regarding the review by filing an appeal with the board created under
RCW 29A.04.510.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.08.605 and 2003 c 111 s 236 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the case-by-case maintenance required under RCW
29A.08.620 and 29A.08.630 and the canceling of registrations under RCW
29A.08.510, the county auditor shall establish a general program of
voter registration list maintenance. This program must be a thorough
review that is applied uniformly throughout the county and must be
nondiscriminatory in its application. Any program established must be
completed at least once every two years and not later than ninety days
before the date of a ((primary or)) general election for federal
office. The county may fulfill its obligations under this section in
one of the following ways:
(1) The county auditor may enter into one or more contracts with
the United States postal service, or its licensee, which permit the
auditor to use postal service change-of-address information. If the
auditor receives change of address information from the United States
postal service that indicates that a voter has changed his or her
residence address within the county, the auditor shall transfer the
registration of that voter and send a confirmation notice informing the
voter of the transfer to the new address. If the auditor receives
postal change of address information indicating that the voter has
moved out of the county, the auditor shall send a confirmation notice
to the voter and advise the voter of the need to reregister in the new
county. The auditor shall place the voter's registration on inactive
status;
(2) A direct, nonforwardable, nonprofit or first-class mailing to
every registered voter within the county bearing the postal endorsement
"Return Service Requested." If address correction information for a
voter is received by the county auditor after this mailing, the auditor
shall place that voter on inactive status and shall send to the voter
a confirmation notice;
(3) Any other method approved by the secretary of state.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.16.040 and 2003 c 111 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Precinct boundaries may be altered at any time as long as
sufficient time exists prior to a given election for the necessary
procedural steps to be honored. Except as permitted under subsection
(4) of this section, no precinct boundaries may be changed during the
period starting on the thirtieth day prior to the first day for
candidates to file ((for the primary election)) declarations of
candidacy and ending with the day of the general election.
(2) Precincts in which voting machines or electronic voting devices
are used may contain as many as nine hundred active registered voters.
The number of poll-site ballot counting devices at each polling place
is at the discretion of the auditor. The number of devices must be
adequate to meet the expected voter turnout.
(3) On petition of twenty-five or more voters resident more than
ten miles from any polling site, the county legislative authority shall
establish a separate voting precinct therefor.
(4) The county auditor shall temporarily adjust precinct boundaries
when a city or town annexes unincorporated territory to the city or
town, or whenever unincorporated territory is incorporated as a city or
town. The adjustment must be made as soon as possible after the
approval of the annexation or incorporation. The temporary adjustment
must be limited to the minimum changes necessary to accommodate the
addition of the territory to the city or town, or to establish the
eligible voters within the boundaries of the new city or town, and
remains in effect only until precinct boundary modifications reflecting
the annexation or incorporation are adopted by the county legislative
authority.
The county legislative authority may establish by ordinance a
limitation on the maximum number of active registered voters in each
precinct within its jurisdiction. The limitation may be different for
precincts based upon the method of voting used for such precincts and
the number may be less than the number established by law, but in no
case may the number exceed that authorized by law.
The county legislative authority of each county in the state
hereafter formed shall, at their first session, divide their respective
counties into election precincts and establish the boundaries of the
precincts. The county auditor shall thereupon designate the voting
place for each such precinct or whether the precinct is a vote by mail
precinct.
(5) In determining the number of active registered voters for the
purposes of this section, persons who are ongoing absentee voters under
RCW 29A.40.040 shall not be counted. Nothing in this subsection may be
construed as altering the vote tallying requirements of RCW 29A.60.230.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.20.020 and 2003 c 111 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person filing a declaration of candidacy for an office shall,
at the time of filing, be a registered voter and possess the
qualifications specified by law for persons who may be elected to the
office.
(2) Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a
temporary elected position such as a charter review board member or
freeholder, no person may file for more than one office.
(3) The name of a candidate for an office shall not appear on a
ballot for that office unless, except as provided in RCW 3.46.067 and
3.50.057, the candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of
candidacy is filed, properly registered to vote in the geographic area
represented by the office. For the purposes of this section, each
geographic area in which registered voters may cast ballots for an
office is represented by that office. If a person elected to an office
must be nominated from a district or similar division of the geographic
area represented by the office, the name of a candidate for the office
shall not appear on a ((primary)) ballot for that office unless the
candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of candidacy is
filed, properly registered to vote in that district or division. The
officer with whom declarations of candidacy must be filed under this
title shall review each such declaration filed regarding compliance
with this subsection.
(4) This section does not apply to the office of a member of the
United States Congress.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.20.120 and 2003 c 111 s 506 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any nomination of a candidate for partisan public office by
other than a major political party may be made only: (a) In a
convention held not earlier than the last Saturday in June and not
later than the first Saturday in July or during any of the seven days
immediately preceding the first day for filing declarations of
candidacy as fixed in accordance with RCW 29A.28.040; (b) as provided
by RCW 29A.60.020; or (c) as otherwise provided in this section.
(2) Nominations of candidates for president and vice president of
the United States other than by a major political party may be made
either at a convention conducted under subsection (1) of this section,
or at a similar convention taking place not earlier than the first
Sunday in July and not later than seventy days before the general
election. Conventions held during this time period may not nominate
candidates for any public office other than president and vice
president of the United States, except as provided in subsection (3) of
this section.
(3) If a special filing period for a partisan office is opened
under RCW 29A.24.210, candidates of minor political parties and
independent candidates may file for office during that special filing
period. The names of those candidates may not appear on the ballot
unless they are nominated by convention held no later than five days
after the close of the special filing period and a certificate of
nomination is filed with the filing officer no later than three days
after the convention. The requirements of RCW 29A.20.130 do not apply
to such a convention. ((If primary ballots or a voters' pamphlet are
ordered to be printed before the deadline for submitting the
certificate of nomination and the certificate has not been filed, then
the candidate's name will be included but may not appear on the general
election ballot unless the certificate is timely filed and the
candidate otherwise qualifies to appear on that ballot.))
(4) A minor political party may hold more than one convention but
in no case shall any such party nominate more than one candidate for
any one partisan public office or position. For the purpose of
nominating candidates for the offices of president and vice president,
United States senator, or a statewide office, a minor party or
independent candidate holding multiple conventions may add together the
number of signatures of different individuals from each convention
obtained in support of the candidate or candidates in order to obtain
the number required by RCW 29A.20.140. For all other offices for which
nominations are made, signatures of the requisite number of registered
voters must be obtained at a single convention.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.20.140 and 2003 c 111 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To be valid, a convention must be attended by at least
((twenty-five)) one hundred registered voters.
(2) In order to nominate candidates for the offices of president
and vice president of the United States, United States senator, United
States representative, or any statewide office, a nominating convention
shall obtain and submit to the filing officer the signatures of at
least ((two hundred)) one thousand registered voters of the state of
Washington. In order to nominate candidates for any other office, a
nominating convention shall obtain and submit to the filing officer the
signatures of ((twenty-five)) one hundred persons who are registered to
vote in the jurisdiction of the office for which the nominations are
made.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.20.150 and 2003 c 111 s 509 are each amended to
read as follows:
A nominating petition submitted under this chapter shall clearly
identify the name of the minor party or independent candidate
convention as it appears on the certificate of nomination as required
by RCW 29A.20.160(3). The petition shall also contain a statement that
the person signing the petition is a registered voter of the state of
Washington and shall have a space for the voter to sign his or her name
and to print his or her name and address. No person may sign more than
one nominating petition under this chapter for ((an)) a single office
((for a primary or election)).

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.20.200 and 2003 c 111 s 514 are each amended to
read as follows:
Not later than the Friday immediately preceding the first day for
candidates to file, the secretary of state shall notify the county
auditors of the names and designations of all minor party and
independent candidates who have filed valid convention certificates and
nominating petitions with that office. Except for the offices of
president and vice president, persons nominated under this chapter
shall file declarations of candidacy as provided by RCW 29A.24.030 and
29A.24.070. The name of a candidate nominated at a convention shall
not be printed upon the ((primary)) general election ballot unless he
or she pays the fee required by law ((to be paid by candidates for the
same office to be nominated at a primary)).

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.24.030 and 2003 c 111 s 603 are each amended to
read as follows:
A candidate who desires to ((have his or her name printed on the
ballot)) be among the candidates considered for election to an office
other than president of the United States, vice president of the United
States, or an office for which ownership of property is a prerequisite
to voting shall complete and file a declaration of candidacy. The
secretary of state shall adopt, by rule, a declaration of candidacy
form for the office of precinct committee officer and a separate
standard form for candidates for all other offices filing under this
chapter. Included on the standard form shall be:
(1) A place for the candidate to declare that he or she is a
registered voter within the jurisdiction of the office for which he or
she is filing, and the address at which he or she is registered;
(2) A place for the candidate to indicate the position for which he
or she is filing;
(3) A place for the candidate to indicate a party designation, if
applicable;
(4) A place for the candidate to indicate the amount of the filing
fee accompanying the declaration of candidacy or for the candidate to
indicate that he or she is filing a nominating petition in lieu of the
filing fee under RCW 29A.24.090;
(5) A place for the candidate to sign the declaration of candidacy,
stating that the information provided on the form is true and swearing
or affirming that he or she will support the Constitution and laws of
the United States and the Constitution and laws of the state of
Washington.
In the case of a declaration of candidacy filed electronically,
submission of the form constitutes agreement that the information
provided with the filing is true, that he or she will support the
Constitutions and laws of the United States and the state of
Washington, and that he or she agrees to electronic payment of the
filing fee established in RCW 29A.24.090.
The secretary of state may require any other information on the
form he or she deems appropriate to facilitate the filing process.

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.24.080 and 2003 c 111 s 608 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any candidate may mail his or her declaration of candidacy for an
office to the filing officer. Such declarations of candidacy shall be
processed by the filing officer in the following manner:
(1) Any declaration received by the filing officer by mail before
the tenth business day immediately preceding the first day for
candidates to file for office shall be returned to the candidate
submitting it, together with a notification that the declaration of
candidacy was received too early to be processed. The candidate shall
then be permitted to resubmit his or her declaration of candidacy
during the filing period.
(2) Any properly executed declaration of candidacy received by mail
on or after the tenth business day immediately preceding the first day
for candidates to file for office and before the close of business on
the last day of the filing period shall be included with filings made
in person during the filing period. In ((partisan and)) judicial
elections the filing officer shall determine by lot the order in which
the names of those candidates shall appear upon sample and absentee
primary ballots.
(3) Any declaration of candidacy received by the filing officer
after the close of business on the last day for candidates to file for
office shall be rejected and returned to the candidate attempting to
file it.

Sec. 15 RCW 29A.24.100 and 2003 c 111 s 610 are each amended to
read as follows:
The nominating petition authorized by RCW 29A.24.090 shall be
printed on sheets of uniform color and size, shall contain no more than
twenty numbered lines, and must be in substantially the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

We, the undersigned registered voters of (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision for which the nomination is
made) , hereby petition ((that the name of)) (candidate's name)
be ((printed on the official primary ballot)) included among the
persons declaring themselves candidates for the office of (insert
name of office) .

The petition must include a place for each individual to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.

Sec. 16 RCW 29A.24.130 and 2003 c 111 s 613 are each amended to
read as follows:
A candidate may withdraw his or her declaration of candidacy at any
time before the close of business on the Thursday following the last
day for candidates to file under RCW 29A.24.050 by filing, with the
officer with whom the declaration of candidacy was filed, a signed
request that his or her name ((not be printed on the ballot)) be
withdrawn from the list of persons declaring themselves candidates for
a particular office. There shall be no withdrawal period for
declarations of candidacy filed during special filing periods held
under this title. The filing officer may permit the withdrawal of a
filing for the office of precinct committee officer at the request of
the candidate at any time if no absentee ballots have been issued for
that office and the general election ballots for that precinct have not
been printed. The filing officer may permit the withdrawal of a filing
for any elected office of a city, town, or special district at the
request of the candidate at any time before a primary if the primary
ballots for that city, town, or special district have not been ordered.
No filing fee may be refunded to any candidate who withdraws under this
section. Notice of the deadline for withdrawal of candidacy and that
the filing fee is not refundable shall be given to each candidate at
the time he or she files.

Sec. 17 RCW 29A.24.210 and 2003 c 111 s 621 are each amended to
read as follows:
Filings for a partisan elective office shall be opened for a period
of three normal business days whenever, on or after the first day of
the regular filing period and before the ((sixth)) thirteenth Tuesday
prior to a ((primary)) general election, a vacancy occurs in that
office, leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an election for which
filings have not been held.
Any such special three-day filing period shall be fixed by the
election officer with whom declarations of candidacy for that office
are filed. The election officer shall give notice of the special
three-day filing period by notifying the press, radio, and television
in the county or counties involved, and by such other means as may be
required by law.
Candidacies validly filed within the special three-day filing
period ((shall appear on the primary ballot)) must be treated as if
filed during the regular filing period.

Sec. 18 RCW 29A.24.310 and 2003 c 111 s 622 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who desires to be a write-in candidate and have such
votes counted at a primary or election may file a declaration of
candidacy with the officer designated in RCW 29A.24.070 not later than
the day before the primary or election. Declarations of candidacy for
write-in candidates must be accompanied by a filing fee in the same
manner as required of other candidates filing for the office as
provided in RCW 29A.24.090.
Votes cast for write-in candidates who have filed such declarations
of candidacy and write-in votes for persons appointed by political
parties pursuant to RCW 29A.28.020 need only specify the name of the
candidate in the appropriate location on the ballot in order to be
counted. Write-in votes cast for any other candidate, in order to be
counted, must designate the office sought and position number or
political party, if the manner in which the write-in is done does not
make the office or position clear. In order for write-in votes to be
valid in jurisdictions employing optical-scan mark sense ballot systems
the voter must complete the proper mark next to the write-in line for
that office.
No person may file as a write-in candidate where:
(1) At a general election, the person attempting to file ((either
filed as a write-in candidate for the same office at the preceding
primary or the person's name appeared on the ballot for the same office
at the preceding primary)) already declared himself or herself a
candidate for the same office the same year;
(2) The person attempting to file as a write-in candidate has
already filed a valid write-in declaration for that primary or
election, unless one or the other of the two filings is for the office
of precinct committeeperson;
(3) The name of the person attempting to file already appears on
the ballot as a candidate for another office, unless one of the two
offices for which he or she is a candidate is precinct committeeperson.
The declaration of candidacy shall be similar to that required by
RCW 29A.24.030. No write-in candidate filing under this section may be
included in any voter's pamphlet produced under chapter 29A.32 RCW
unless that candidate qualifies to have his or her name printed on the
general election ballot. The legislative authority of any jurisdiction
producing a local voter's pamphlet under chapter 29A.32 RCW may
provide, by ordinance, for the inclusion of write-in candidates in such
pamphlets.

Sec. 19 RCW 29A.28.020 and 2003 c 111 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
A vacancy caused by the death or disqualification of any candidate
or nominee of a major or minor political party may be filled at any
time up to and including the day prior to the general election for that
position. For state partisan offices in any political subdivision
voted on solely by electors of a single county, an individual shall be
appointed to fill such vacancy by the county central committee in the
case of a major political party or by the state central committee or
comparable governing body in the case of a minor political party. For
other partisan offices, including federal or statewide offices, an
individual shall be appointed to fill such vacancy by the state central
committee or comparable governing body of the appropriate political
party.
If the vacancy occurs no later than the sixth Tuesday prior to the
((state primary or)) general election concerned and the ballots have
been printed, it shall be mandatory that they be corrected by the
appropriate election officers. In making such correction, it shall not
be necessary to reprint complete ballots if any other less expensive
technique can be used and the resulting correction is reasonably clear.
If the vacancy occurs after the sixth Tuesday prior to the ((state
primary or)) general election and time does not exist in which to
correct ballots (including absentee ballots), either in total or in
part, then the votes cast or recorded for the person who has died or
become disqualified shall be counted for the person who has been named
to fill such vacancy.
When the secretary of state is the person with whom the appointment
by the major or minor political party is filed, the secretary shall, in
certifying candidates or nominations to the various county officers
insert the name of the person appointed to fill a vacancy.
If the secretary of state has already sent forth the certificate
when the appointment to fill a vacancy is filed, the secretary shall
forthwith certify to the county auditors of the proper counties the
name and place of residence of the person appointed to fill a vacancy,
the office for which the person is a candidate or nominee, the party
the person represents, and all other pertinent facts pertaining to the
vacancy.

Sec. 20 RCW 29A.28.040 and 2003 c 111 s 704 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the United States house of
representatives or the United States senate from this state, the
governor shall order a special election to fill the vacancy.
(2) Within ten days of such vacancy occurring, he or she shall
issue a writ of election fixing a date for the special vacancy election
not less than ninety days after the issuance of the writ, fixing a date
((for the primary for nominating candidates for the special vacancy
election)) not less than thirty days before ((the day fixed for
holding)) the special vacancy election by which major and minor
political parties must submit certificates of nomination, fixing the
dates for the special filing period, and designating the term or part
of the term for which the vacancy exists. If the vacancy is in the
office of United States representative, the writ of election shall
specify the congressional district that is vacant.
(3) If the vacancy occurs less than six months before a state
general election and before the second Friday following the close of
the filing period for that general election, the ((special primary
and)) special vacancy ((elections shall)) election must be held in
concert with the ((state primary and)) state general election in that
year.
(4) If the vacancy occurs on or after the first day for filing
under RCW 29A.24.050 and on or before the second Friday following the
close of the filing period, a special filing period of three normal
business days shall be fixed by the governor and notice thereof given
to all media, including press, radio, and television within the area in
which the vacancy election is to be held, to the end that, insofar as
possible, all interested persons will be aware of such filing period.
The last day of the filing period shall not be later than ((the third
Tuesday before the primary at which candidates are to be nominated.
The names of candidates who have filed valid declarations of candidacy
during this three-day period shall appear on the approaching primary
ballot)) three weeks before the date by which major and minor political
parties must submit certificates of nomination.
(5) If the vacancy occurs later than the second Friday following
the close of the filing period, a ((special primary and)) special
vacancy election to fill the position shall be held after the next
state general election but, in any event, no later than the ninetieth
day following the ((November)) general election.

Sec. 21 RCW 29A.28.050 and 2003 c 111 s 705 are each amended to
read as follows:
After calling a ((special primary and)) special vacancy election to
fill a vacancy in the United States house of representatives or the
United States senate from this state, the governor shall immediately
notify the secretary of state who shall, in turn, immediately notify
the county auditor of each county wholly or partly within which the
vacancy exists.
Each county auditor shall publish notices of the ((special primary
and the)) special vacancy election at least once in any legal newspaper
published in the county, as provided by RCW ((29A.52.310 and))
29A.52.350 ((respectively)).

Sec. 22 RCW 29A.28.060 and 2003 c 111 s 706 are each amended to
read as follows:
The general election laws ((and laws relating to partisan primaries
shall)) apply to the special ((primaries and)) vacancy ((elections))
election provided for in RCW 29A.28.040 through 29A.28.050 to the
extent that they are not inconsistent with the provisions of these
sections. Statutory time deadlines relating to availability of
absentee ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures
that cannot be met in a timely fashion may be modified for the purposes
of a specific ((primary or)) vacancy election under this chapter by the
secretary of state through emergency rules adopted under RCW
29A.04.610.

Sec. 23 RCW 29A.36.010 and 2003 c 111 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
On or before the day following the last day for political parties
to fill vacancies in the ticket as provided by RCW 29A.28.010, the
secretary of state shall certify to each county auditor a list of the
nonpartisan candidates who have filed declarations of candidacy in his
or her office ((for the primary)), and shall certify to each major
political party a list of the partisan candidates who have filed
declarations of candidacy in his or her office. For each office, the
certificate shall include the name of each candidate, his or her
address, and his or her party designation, if any.

Sec. 24 RCW 29A.36.100 and 2003 c 111 s 910 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except for ((the candidates for the positions of president and vice
president or for a partisan or)) a nonpartisan office for which no
primary is required, the names of all nonpartisan candidates who, under
this title, filed a declaration of candidacy((, were certified as a
candidate to fill a vacancy on a major party ticket, or were nominated
as an independent or minor party candidate)) will appear on the
appropriate ballot at the primary throughout the jurisdiction in which
they are to be nominated.

Sec. 25 RCW 29A.36.120 and 2003 c 111 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The positions or offices on a primary ballot shall be arranged
in substantially the following order: ((United States senator; United
States representative; governor; lieutenant governor; secretary of
state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney general; commissioner
of public lands;)) Superintendent of public instruction; ((insurance
commissioner; state senator; state representative; county officers;))
justices of the supreme court; judges of the court of appeals; judges
of the superior court; and judges of the district court. For all other
jurisdictions on the primary ballot, the offices in each jurisdiction
shall be grouped together and be in the order of the position numbers
assigned to those offices, if any.
(2) The order of the positions or offices on ((an)) a general
election ballot shall be arranged in substantially the ((same as on a
primary ballot except that the)) following order: United States
senator; United States representative; governor; lieutenant governor;
secretary of state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney general;
commissioner of public lands; superintendent of public instruction;
insurance commissioner; state senator; state representative; county
officers; justices of the supreme court; judges of the court of
appeals; judges of the superior court; and judges of the district
court. For all other jurisdictions on the general election ballot, the
offices in each jurisdiction must be grouped together and be in the
order of the position numbers assigned to those offices, if any. The
offices of president and vice president of the United States shall
precede all other offices on a presidential election ballot. State
ballot issues shall be placed before all offices on ((an)) a general
election ballot. The positions on a ballot to be assigned to ballot
measures regarding local units of government shall be established by
the secretary of state by rule.
(3) The political party or independent candidacy of each candidate
for partisan office shall be indicated next to the name of the
candidate on the ((primary and)) general election ballot. A candidate
shall file a written notice with the filing officer within three
business days after the close of the filing period designating the
political party to be indicated next to the candidate's name on the
ballot if either: (a) The candidate has been nominated by two or more
minor political parties or independent conventions; or (b) the
candidate has both filed a declaration of candidacy declaring an
affiliation with a major political party and been nominated by a minor
political party or independent convention. If no written notice is
filed the filing officer shall give effect to the party designation
shown upon the first document filed. A candidate may be deemed
nominated by a minor party or independent convention only if all
documentation required by chapter 29A.20 RCW has been timely filed.

Sec. 26 RCW 29A.36.130 and 2003 c 111 s 913 are each amended to
read as follows:
After the close of business on the last day for candidates to file
for office, the filing officer shall, from among ((those)) the filings
((made in person and by mail)) for nonpartisan office, determine by lot
the order in which the names of those candidates will appear on all
sample and absentee ballots((. In the case of candidates for city,
town, and district office, this procedure shall also determine the
order for candidate names on)) and the official primary ballot used at
the polling place. The determination shall be done publicly and may be
witnessed by the media and by any candidate. If no primary is required
for any nonpartisan office under RCW 29A.52.010 or 29A.52.220, the
names shall appear on the general election ballot in the order
determined by lot.

Sec. 27 RCW 29A.36.190 and 2003 c 111 s 919 are each amended to
read as follows:
The name of a candidate for a partisan office ((for which a primary
was conducted shall)) may not be printed on the ballot for that office
at the ((subsequent)) general election unless the candidate ((receives
a number of votes equal to at least one percent of the total number
cast for all candidates for that position sought and a plurality of the
votes cast for the candidates of his or her party for that office at
the preceding primary)) was nominated for that office by a major or
minor political party, evidenced by a valid certificate of nomination
filed with the county auditor or secretary of state.

Sec. 28 RCW 29A.36.200 and 2003 c 111 s 920 are each amended to
read as follows:
The names of the persons certified as nominees by the secretary of
state ((or)), the county canvassing board, or a major or minor
political party shall be printed on the ballot at the ensuing general
election.
No name of any candidate whose nomination at a primary or party
convention is required by law shall be placed upon the ballot at a
general or special election unless it appears upon the certificate of
either (1) the secretary of state, ((or)) (2) the county canvassing
board, ((or)) (3) a major or minor party convention, or ((the state or
county central committee of a major)) (4) a political party to fill a
vacancy on its ticket under RCW 29A.28.020.
Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a temporary
elected position such as a charter review board member or freeholder,
a candidate's name shall not appear more than once upon a ballot for a
position regularly nominated or elected at the same election.

Sec. 29 RCW 29A.44.020 and 2003 c 111 s 1102 are each amended to
read as follows:
At any general or special election, ((general or special, or at any
primary,)) any political party or committee may designate a person
other than a precinct election officer, for each polling place to check
a list of registered voters of the precinct to determine who has and
who has not voted. The lists must be furnished by the party or
committee concerned.

Sec. 30 RCW 29A.44.130 and 2003 c 111 s 1112 are each amended to
read as follows:
In precincts where votes are cast on paper ballots, the following
supplies, in addition to those specified in RCW 29A.44.110, must be
provided:
(1) Two tally books in which the names of the candidates will be
listed in the order in which they appear on the sample ballots and in
each case have the proper party designation, if any, at the head
thereof;
(2) Two certificates or two sample ballots prepared as blanks, for
recording of the unofficial results by the precinct election officers.

Sec. 31 RCW 29A.48.030 and 2003 c 111 s 1203 are each amended to
read as follows:
In an odd-numbered year, the county auditor may conduct a primary
or a special election by mail ballot concurrently with the primary:
(1) For an office or ballot measure of a special purpose district
that is entirely within the county;
(2) For an office or ballot measure of a special purpose district
that lies in the county and one or more other counties if the auditor
first secures the concurrence of the county auditors of those other
counties to conduct the primary in this manner district-wide; and
(3) For a ballot measure or nonpartisan office of a county, city,
or town if the auditor first secures the concurrence of the legislative
authority of the county, city, or town involved.
The county auditor shall notify an election jurisdiction for which
a primary is to be held that the primary will be conducted by mail
ballot.
A primary in an odd-numbered year may not be conducted by mail
ballot in a precinct with two hundred or more active registered voters
if a ((partisan office or)) state office or state ballot measure is to
be voted upon at that primary in the precinct.
To the extent they are not inconsistent with other provisions of
law, the laws governing the conduct of mail ballot special elections
apply to nonpartisan primaries conducted by mail ballot.

Sec. 32 RCW 29A.52.010 and 2003 c 111 s 1301 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever it shall be necessary to hold a special election in an
odd-numbered year to fill an unexpired term of any office which is
scheduled to be voted upon for a full term in an even-numbered year, no
September primary election shall be held in the odd-numbered year if,
after the last day allowed for candidates to withdraw, ((either of the
following circumstances exist:
(1) No more than one candidate of each qualified political party
has filed a declaration of candidacy for the same partisan office to be
filled; or
(2))) no more than two candidates have filed a declaration of
candidacy for a single nonpartisan office to be filled.
((In either event,)) The officer with whom the declarations of
candidacy were filed shall immediately notify all candidates concerned
and the names of the candidates that would have been printed upon the
September primary ballot, but for the provisions of this section, shall
be printed as nominees for the positions sought upon the November
general election ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
A "convention" for the purposes of this chapter is an organized
assemblage of registered voters representing a major political party
candidate or candidates. As used in this chapter, the term "election
jurisdiction" means the state or a political subdivision or
jurisdiction of the state from which partisan officials are elected.
This term includes county commissioner districts or council districts
for members of a county legislative authority, counties for county
officials who are nominated and elected on a county-wide basis,
legislative districts for members of the legislature, congressional
districts for members of Congress, and the state for members of the
United States senate and state officials who are elected on a statewide
basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Nomination of a candidate for partisan public office by a major
political party may be made only: (a) In a convention held not earlier
than the last day for candidates to withdraw as provided by RCW
29A.24.130 and not later than the third Tuesday of September or the
seventh Tuesday immediately before the general election, whichever
occurs first; or (b) as otherwise provided in this section.
(2) If a special filing period for a partisan office is opened
under RCW 29A.24.210, candidates of major political parties may file
for office during that special filing period. Nomination of a
candidate for a partisan office for which a special filing period was
opened may be made at a convention held not earlier than the last day
of the special filing period and not later than the third Tuesday of
September or the seventh Tuesday immediately before the general
election, whichever occurs first. The requirements of section 35 of
this act do not apply to such a convention.
(3) A major political party may not nominate more than one
candidate for any one partisan public office. Only persons registered
to vote in the jurisdiction of the office for which a nomination is
made may participate in the nominating process. Only candidates who
have already filed valid declarations of candidacy for a particular
partisan office may be nominated for that office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
Each major political party must publish a notice in a newspaper of
general circulation within the county in which the party intends to
hold a convention. The notice must appear at least ten days before the
convention is to be held, and must state the date, time, and place of
the convention. Additionally, it must include the mailing address of
the person or organization sponsoring the convention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
A certificate evidencing nominations made at major political party
conventions must:
(1) Be in writing;
(2) Contain the name of each person nominated, his or her
residence, and the office for which he or she is nominated;
(3) Identify the major political party on whose behalf the
conventions were held;
(4) Be verified by the oath of the presiding officer and secretary;
(5) Contain proof of publication of the notice of calling the
convention; and
(6) Be submitted to the appropriate filing officer not later than
one week after the adjournment of the last convention at which the
nominations were made. If the nomination is for an office whose
jurisdiction is entirely within one county, the certificate must be
filed with the county auditor. If the nomination is for an office
whose jurisdiction encompasses more than one county, the certificate
must be filed with the secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If two or more valid certificates of nomination are filed
purporting to nominate different candidates for the same position using
the same party name, the filing officer must give effect to both
certificates. If conflicting claims to the party name are not resolved
either by mutual agreement or by a judicial determination of the right
to the name, the candidates must be treated as independent candidates.
Disputes over the right to the name must not be permitted to delay the
printing of either ballots or a voters' pamphlet for the general
election. Other candidates nominated by the same conventions may
continue to use the partisan affiliation unless a court of competent
jurisdiction directs otherwise.
(2) A person affected may petition the superior court of the county
in which the filing officer is located for a judicial determination of
the right to the name of a major political party, either before or
after documents are filed with the filing officer. The court shall
resolve the conflict between competing claims to the use of the same
party name according to the following principles: (a) The prior
established public use of the name during previous elections by a party
composed of or led by the same individuals or individuals in documented
succession; (b) prior established public use of the name earlier in the
same election cycle; (c) the nomination of a more complete slate of
candidates for a number of offices or in a number of different regions
of the state; (d) documented affiliation with a national or statewide
party organization with an established use of the name; (e) the first
date of filing of a certificate of nomination; and (f) such other
indicia of an established right to use of the name as the court may
deem relevant. If more than one filing officer is involved, and one of
them is the secretary of state, the petition must be filed in the
superior court for Thurston county. Upon resolving the conflict
between competing claims, the court may also address any ballot
designation for the candidate who does not prevail.

Sec. 38 RCW 29A.52.310 and 2003 c 111 s 1309 are each amended to
read as follows:
Not more than ten nor less than three days before the primary the
county auditor shall publish notice of such primary in one or more
newspapers of general circulation within the county. The notice must
contain the ((proper party designations)) offices to be voted upon at
that primary, the names and addresses of all persons who have filed a
declaration of candidacy to be voted upon at that primary, the hours
during which the polls will be open, and the polling places for each
precinct, giving the address of each polling place. ((The names of all
candidates for nonpartisan offices must be published separately with
designation of the offices for which they are candidates but without
party designation.)) This is the only notice required for the holding
of any primary.

Sec. 39 RCW 29A.52.320 and 2003 c 111 s 1310 are each amended to
read as follows:
No later than the day following the certification of the returns of
any primary, the secretary of state shall certify to the appropriate
county auditors((,)) the names of all persons nominated in the primary
election for nonpartisan offices, the returns of which have been
canvassed by the secretary of state, along with the names of all
persons nominated in party conventions for partisan offices.

Sec. 40 RCW 29A.60.020 and 2003 c 111 s 1502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For any office at any election or primary, any voter may write
in on the ballot the name of any person for an office who has filed as
a write-in candidate for the office in the manner provided by RCW
29A.24.310 and such vote shall be counted the same as if the name had
been printed on the ballot and marked by the voter. No write-in vote
made for any person who has not filed a declaration of candidacy
pursuant to RCW 29A.24.310 is valid if that person already filed a
declaration of candidacy for the same office, either as a regular
candidate or a write-in candidate, ((at the preceding primary)) the
same year. Any abbreviation used to designate office, position, or
political party shall be accepted if the canvassing board can
determine, to their satisfaction, the voter's intent.
(2) The number of write-in votes cast for each office must be
recorded and reported with the canvass for the election.
(3) Write-in votes cast for an individual candidate for an office
need not be tallied if the total number of write-in votes cast for the
office is not greater than the number of votes cast for the candidate
apparently nominated or elected, and the write-in votes could not have
altered the outcome of the primary or election. In the case of write-in votes for statewide office or for any office whose jurisdiction
encompasses more than one county, write-in votes for an individual
candidate must be tallied whenever the county auditor is notified by
either the office of the secretary of state or another auditor in a
multicounty jurisdiction that it appears that the write-in votes could
alter the outcome of the primary or election.
(4) In the case of statewide offices or jurisdictions that
encompass more than one county, if the total number of write-in votes
cast for an office within a county is greater than the number of votes
cast for a candidate apparently nominated or elected in a primary or
election, the auditor shall tally all write-in votes for individual
candidates for that office and notify the office of the secretary of
state and the auditors of the other counties within the jurisdiction,
that the write-in votes for individual candidates should be tallied.

Sec. 41 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2003 c 111 s 1519 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On the tenth day after a special election or primary and on the
fifteenth day after a general election, the county canvassing board
shall complete the canvass and certify the results. Each absentee
ballot that was returned before the closing of the polls on the date of
the primary or election for which it was issued, and each absentee
ballot with a postmark on or before the date of the primary or election
for which it was issued and received on or before the date on which the
primary or election is certified, must be included in the canvass
report.
(2) At the request of a caucus of the state legislature, the county
auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and
legislative ((primaries or)) elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house ((or [of])) of representatives.

Sec. 42 RCW 29A.60.220 and 2003 c 111 s 1522 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the requisite number of any ((federal, state, county, city,
or district offices)) officers have not been nominated in a primary by
reason of two or more persons having an equal and requisite number of
votes for being placed on the general election ballot, the official
empowered by state law to certify candidates for the general election
ballot shall give notice to the several persons so having the equal and
requisite number of votes to attend at the appropriate office at the
time designated by that official, who shall then and there proceed
publicly to decide by lot which of those persons will be declared
nominated and placed on the general election ballot.
(2) If the requisite number of any ((federal, state, county, city,
district, or precinct)) officers have not been elected by reason of two
or more persons having an equal and highest number of votes for one and
the same office, the official empowered by state law to issue the
original certificate of election shall give notice to the several
persons so having the highest and equal number of votes to attend at
the appropriate office at the time to be appointed by that official,
who shall then and there proceed publicly to decide by lot which of
those persons will be declared duly elected, and the official shall
make out and deliver to the person thus duly declared elected a
certificate of election.

Sec. 43 RCW 29A.60.240 and 2003 c 111 s 1524 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall, as soon as possible but in any event
not later than the third Tuesday following the primary, canvass and
certify the returns of all primary elections as to candidates ((for
state offices, United States senators and representatives in Congress,
and all other candidates)) whose district extends beyond the limits of
a single county.

Sec. 44 RCW 29A.64.010 and 2003 c 111 s 1601 are each amended to
read as follows:
((An officer of a political party or any)) A person for whom votes
were cast in a primary who was not declared nominated may file a
written application for a recount of the votes or a portion of the
votes cast at that primary for all persons for whom votes were cast for
nomination to that office.
An officer of a political party or any person for whom votes were
cast at any election may file a written application for a recount of
the votes or a portion of the votes cast at that election for all
candidates for election to that office.
Any group of five or more registered voters may file a written
application for a recount of the votes or a portion of the votes cast
upon any question or issue. They shall designate one of the members of
the group as chair and shall indicate the voting residence of each
member of the group.
An application for a recount of the votes cast for an office or on
a ballot measure must be filed with the officer with whom filings are
made for the jurisdiction.
An application for a recount must specify whether the recount will
be done manually or by the vote tally system. A recount done by the
vote tally system must use programming that recounts and reports only
the office or ballot measure in question. The county shall also
provide for a test of the logic and accuracy of that program.
An application for a recount must be filed within three business
days after the county canvassing board or secretary of state has
declared the official results of the primary or election for the office
or issue for which the recount is requested.
This chapter applies to the recounting of votes cast by paper
ballots and to the recounting of votes recorded on ballots counted by
a vote tally system.

Sec. 45 RCW 29A.80.010 and 2003 c 111 s 2001 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each political party organization may:
(a) Make its own rules and regulations; ((and))
(b) Nominate candidates for partisan office; and
(c) Perform all functions inherent in such an organization.
(2) Only major political parties may designate candidates to
((appear on the state primary ballot)) fill vacancies as provided in
RCW 29A.28.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 46 Sections 33 through 37 of this act
constitute a new subpart of chapter 29A.52 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 47 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.36.140 (Primaries -- Rotating names of candidates) and
2003 c 111 s 914;
(2) RCW 29A.52.110 (Application of chapter) and 2003 c 111 s 1302;
(3) RCW 29A.52.120 (General election laws govern primaries) and
2003 c 111 s 1303;
(4) RCW 29A.52.130 (Blanket primary authorized) and 2003 c 111 s
1304; and
(5) RCW 29A.04.903 (Effective date--2003 c 111) and 2003 c 111 s
2405.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 48 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---