BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.18.100 and 1997 c 428 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No insurance policy form ((other than surety bond forms, forms
exempt under RCW 48.18.103,)) or application form where written
application is required and is to be attached to the policy, or printed
life or disability rider or endorsement form, shall be issued,
delivered, or used unless it has been filed with and approved by the
commissioner. This section shall not apply to:
(a) Surety bond forms;
(b) Forms filed under RCW 48.18.103;
(c) Forms exempted from filing requirements by the commissioner
under RCW 48.18.103; or
(d) Manuscript policies, riders, or endorsements of unique
character designed for and used with relation to insurance upon a
particular subject.
(2) Every such filing containing a certification, in a form
approved by the commissioner, by either the chief executive officer of
the insurer or by an actuary who is a member of the American academy of
actuaries, attesting that the filing complies with Title 48 RCW and
Title 284 of the Washington Administrative Code, may be used by such
insurer immediately after filing with the commissioner. The
commissioner may order an insurer to cease using a certified form upon
the grounds set forth in RCW 48.18.110. This subsection shall not
apply to certain types of policy forms designated by the commissioner
by rule.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 48.18.103, every filing that does not
contain a certification pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
shall be made not less than thirty days in advance of any such
issuance, delivery, or use. At the expiration of such thirty days the
form so filed shall be deemed approved unless prior thereto it has been
affirmatively approved or disapproved by order of the commissioner.
The commissioner may extend by not more than an additional fifteen days
the period within which he or she may so affirmatively approve or
disapprove any such form, by giving notice of such extension before
expiration of the initial thirty-day period. At the expiration of any
such period as so extended, and in the absence of such prior
affirmative approval or disapproval, any such form shall be deemed
approved. The commissioner may withdraw any such approval at any time
for cause. By approval of any such form for immediate use, the
commissioner may waive any unexpired portion of such initial thirty-day
waiting period.
(4) The commissioner's order disapproving any such form or
withdrawing a previous approval shall state the grounds therefor.
(5) No such form shall knowingly be so issued or delivered as to
which the commissioner's approval does not then exist.
(6) The commissioner may, by ((order)) rule, exempt from the
requirements of this section ((for so long as he or she deems proper,))
any class or type of insurance ((document or form or type thereof as
specified in such order, to which in his or her opinion this section
may not practicably be applied, or the)) policy forms if filing and
approval ((of which are, in his or her opinion,)) is not desirable or
necessary for the protection of the public.
(7) Every member or subscriber to a rating organization shall
adhere to the form filings made on its behalf by the organization.
Deviations from such organization are permitted only when filed with
the commissioner in accordance with this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.18.103 and 2003 c 248 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to assist the purchasers of
commercial property casualty insurance by allowing policies to be
issued more expeditiously and provide a more competitive market for
forms.
(2) Commercial property casualty policies may be issued prior to
filing the forms.
(3) All commercial property casualty forms shall be filed with the
commissioner within thirty days after an insurer issues any policy
using them. This subsection does not apply to:
(a) types or classes of forms that the commissioner exempts from
filing by rule; and
(b) Manuscript policies, riders, or endorsements of unique
character designed for and used with relation to insurance upon a
particular subject.
(((3))) (4) If, within thirty days after a commercial property
casualty form has been filed, the commissioner finds that the form does
not meet the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner shall
disapprove the form and give notice to the insurer or rating
organization that made the filing, specifying how the form fails to
meet the requirements and stating when, within a reasonable period
thereafter, the form shall be deemed no longer effective. The
commissioner may extend the time for review another fifteen days by
giving notice to the insurer prior to the expiration of the original
thirty-day period.
(((4))) (5) Upon a final determination of a disapproval of a policy
form under subsection (((3))) (4) of this section, the insurer shall
amend any previously issued disapproved form by endorsement to comply
with the commissioner's disapproval.
(((5))) (6) For purposes of this section, "commercial property
casualty" means insurance pertaining to a business, profession,
occupation, nonprofit organization, or public entity for the lines of
property and casualty insurance defined in RCW 48.11.040, 48.11.050,
48.11.060, or 48.11.070.
(((6))) (7) Except as provided in subsection (((4))) (5) of this
section, the disapproval shall not affect any contract made or issued
prior to the expiration of the period set forth in the notice of
disapproval.
(((7))) (8) Every member or subscriber to a rating organization
shall adhere to the form filings made on its behalf by the
organization. Deviations from the organization are permitted only when
filed with the commissioner in accordance with this chapter.
(9) In the event a hearing is held on the actions of the
commissioner under subsection (((3))) (4) of this section, the burden
of proof shall be on the commissioner.

--- END ---