BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.19.035 and 2002 c 360 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Affiliate" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.31B.005(1).
(b) "Consumer" means an individual policyholder or applicant for
insurance.
(((b))) (c) "Credit history" means any written, oral, or other
communication of any information by a consumer reporting agency bearing
on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity
that is used or expected to be used, or collected in whole or in part,
for the purpose of serving as a factor in determining personal
insurance premiums or eligibility for coverage.
(((c))) (d) "Insurance score" means a number or rating that is
derived from an algorithm, computer application, model, or other
process that is based in whole or in part on credit history.
(((d))) (e) "Personal insurance" means:
(i) Private passenger automobile coverage;
(ii) Homeowner's coverage, including mobile homeowners,
manufactured homeowners, condominium owners, and renter's coverage;
(iii) Dwelling property coverage;
(iv) Earthquake coverage for a residence or personal property;
(v) Personal liability and theft coverage;
(vi) Personal inland marine coverage; and
(vii) Mechanical breakdown coverage for personal auto or home
appliances.
(2)(a) Credit history shall not be used to determine personal
insurance rates, premiums, or eligibility for coverage unless the
insurance scoring models are filed with the commissioner. Insurance
scoring models include all attributes and factors used in the
calculation of an insurance score. RCW 48.19.040(5) does not apply to
any information filed under this subsection, and the information shall
be withheld from public inspection and kept confidential by the
commissioner. All information filed under this subsection shall be
considered trade secrets under RCW 48.02.120(3). Information filed
under this subsection may be made public by the commissioner for the
sole purpose of enforcement actions taken by the commissioner.
(b) Each insurer that uses credit history or an insurance score to
determine personal insurance rates, premiums, or eligibility for
coverage must file all rates and rating plans with the commissioner.
This requirement applies equally to a single insurer and two or more
affiliated insurers. RCW 48.19.040(5) applies to information filed
under this subsection.
(3) Insurers shall not use the following types of credit history to
calculate a personal insurance score or determine personal insurance
premiums or rates:
(a) The absence of credit history or the inability to determine the
consumer's credit history, unless the insurer has filed actuarial data
segmented by demographic factors in a manner prescribed by the
commissioner that demonstrates compliance with RCW 48.19.020;
(b) The number of credit inquiries;
(c) Credit history or an insurance score based on collection
accounts identified with a medical industry code;
(d) The initial purchase or finance of a vehicle or house that adds
a new loan to the consumer's existing credit history, if evident from
the consumer report; however, an insurer may consider the bill payment
history of any loan, the total number of loans, or both;
(e) The consumer's use of a particular type of credit card, charge
card, or debit card; or
(f) The consumer's total available line of credit; however, an
insurer may consider the total amount of outstanding debt in relation
to the total available line of credit.
(4) If a consumer is charged higher premiums due to disputed credit
history, the insurer shall rerate the policy retroactive to the
effective date of the current policy term. As rerated, the consumer
shall be charged the same premiums they would have been charged if
accurate credit history was used to calculate an insurance score. This
subsection applies only if the consumer resolves the dispute under the
process set forth in the fair credit reporting act and notifies the
insurer in writing that the dispute has been resolved.
(5) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section.
(6) This section applies to all personal insurance policies issued
or renewed on or after June 30, 2003.

--- END ---