BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.02.180 and 1981 c 339 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((In addition to such publications as are otherwise authorized
under this code,)) The commissioner may ((from time to time))
periodically prepare and publish:
(a) ((Booklets containing the insurance code, or supplements
thereto, and such related statutes as the commissioner deems suitable
and useful for inclusion in an appendix of such booklet or
supplement.)) Title 48 RCW, Title 284 WAC, insurance bulletins and
technical assistance advisories, and other laws or regulations relevant
to the regulation of insurance;
(b) Manuals and other material ((relative)) relating to
examinations for ((licensing as provided in chapter 48.17 RCW))
licensure; and
(c) Any other publications authorized under Title 48 RCW.
(2) The commissioner may ((furnish)) provide copies of the
((insurance code, supplements thereto, and related statutes))
publications referred to in subsection (1)(a) of this section free of
charge to:
(a) Public offices and officers in this state ((concerned
therewith, to));
(b) Public officials of other states and jurisdictions ((having
supervision of)) that regulate insurance((, to));
(c) The library of congress((,)); and ((to))
(d) Officers of the armed forces of the United States of America
located at military installations in this state who are concerned with
insurance transactions at or involving ((such)) the military
installations.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
commissioner shall sell ((copies of the insurance code, supplements
thereto, examination manuals, and materials as)) the publications
referred to in subsection (1) of this section((, at)). The
commissioner may charge a reasonable price((, fixed by the
commissioner, in amount)) that is not less than the cost of
publication, handling, and distribution ((thereof)). The commissioner
((shall)) must promptly deposit all funds received ((by him pursuant
to)) under this subsection with the state treasurer to the credit of
the ((general fund)) insurance commissioner's regulatory account. For
appropriation purposes, ((such)) the funds received and deposited by
the commissioner ((shall)) must be treated as a recovery of a previous
expenditure.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.05.340 and 1995 c 83 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 48.05.350 ((and 48.05.360)) to qualify for
authority to transact any one kind of insurance as defined in chapter
48.11 RCW or combination of kinds of insurance as ((shown below)) set
forth in this subsection, a foreign or alien insurer, whether stock or
mutual, or a domestic insurer ((hereafter)) formed ((shall)) after the
effective date of this section must possess unimpaired paid-in capital
stock, if a stock insurer, or unimpaired surplus if a mutual insurer,
and additional funds in surplus, as follows, and ((shall)) must
thereafter maintain unimpaired a combined total of: (a) The paid-in
capital stock if a stock insurer or surplus if a mutual insurer, plus
(b) ((such)) additional funds in surplus equal to the total of the
following initial requirements:

Kind or kinds
of insurance Paid-in
capital
stock or
basic surplus
Additional
surplus

Life . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000 $2,000,000

Disability . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,000,000 2,000,000

Life and disability . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,400,000 2,400,000

Property . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,000,000 2,000,000

Marine &
transportation . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,000,000 2,000,000

General casualty . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,400,000 2,400,000

Vehicle . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,000,000 2,000,000

Surety . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,000,000 2,000,000

Any two of the
following kinds
of insurance:
Property, marine
& transportation,
general casualty,
vehicle, surety,
disability . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,000,000 3,000,000

Multiple lines (all
insurances except
life and title
insurance) . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,000,000 3,000,000

Title(( (in accordance
with the
provisions of
chapter 48.29
RCW))) 2,000,000 2,000,000

(2) Capital and surplus requirements are based upon all the kinds
of insurance transacted by the insurer wherever it ((may)) operates or
proposes to operate, whether or not only a portion of ((such)) the
kinds are to be transacted in this state.
(3) Until December 31, 1996, a foreign or alien insurer holding a
certificate of authority to transact insurance in this state
immediately prior to June 9, 1994, may continue to be authorized to
transact the same kinds of insurance as long as it is otherwise
qualified for ((such)) that authority. A domestic insurer, except a
title insurer, holding a certificate of authority to transact insurance
in this state immediately prior to June 9, 1994, may continue to be
authorized to transact the same kinds of insurance as long as it is
otherwise qualified for such an authority and thereafter maintains
unimpaired the amount of paid-in capital stock, if a stock insurer, or
basic surplus, if a mutual or reciprocal insurer, and special or
additional surplus as required of it under laws in force immediately
prior to June 9, 1994.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.11.100 and 1947 c 79 s .11.10 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Title insurance" is insurance of owners of real property or others
having an interest ((therein)) in real property, against loss by
encumbrance, or defective titles, or adverse claim to title, and
associated services ((connected therewith)).

Sec. 4 RCW 48.11.140 and 1993 c 462 s 53 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((No)) An insurer ((shall)) may not retain any risk on any one
subject of insurance, whether located or to be performed in this state
or elsewhere, in an amount exceeding ten percent of its surplus to
policyholders.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a "subject of insurance" as
to insurance against fire includes all properties insured by the same
insurer ((which)) that are reasonably subject to loss or damage from
the same fire.
(3) Reinsurance in an alien reinsurer not qualified under RCW
((48.05.300)) 48.12.166 may not be deducted in determining risk
retained for the purposes of this section.
(4) In the case of surety insurance, the net retention shall be
computed after deduction of reinsurances, the amount assumed by any
co-surety, the value of any security deposited, pledged, or held
subject to the consent of the surety and for the protection of the
surety.
(5) This section does not apply to life insurance, disability
insurance, title insurance, or insurance of marine risks or marine
protection and indemnity risks.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.18.430 and 1949 c 190 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The benefits, rights, privileges, and options ((which)) under
any annuity contract ((heretofore or hereafter issued are due or
prospectively)) that are due the annuitant who paid the consideration
for the annuity contract((, shall not be)) are not subject to execution
((nor shall)) and the annuitant may not be compelled to exercise ((any
such)) those rights, powers, or options, ((nor shall)) and creditors
((be)) are not allowed to interfere with or terminate the contract,
except:
(a) As to amounts paid for or as premium on ((any such)) an annuity
with intent to defraud creditors, with interest thereon, and of which
the creditor has given the insurer written notice at its home office
prior to ((the)) making ((of)) the payments to the annuitant out of
which the creditor seeks to recover. ((Any such)) The notice ((shall))
must specify the amount claimed or ((such)) the facts ((as)) that will
enable the insurer to ((ascertain such)) determine the amount, and
((shall)) must set forth ((such)) the facts ((as)) that will enable the
insurer to ((ascertain)) determine the insurance or annuity contract,
the person insured or annuitant and the payments sought to be avoided
on the ((ground)) basis of fraud.
(b) The total exemption of benefits presently due and payable to
((any)) an annuitant periodically or at stated times under all annuity
contracts ((under which he is an annuitant, shall)) may not at any time
exceed two thousand five hundred ((and fifty)) dollars per month for
the length of time represented by ((such)) the installments, and ((that
such)) a periodic payment in excess of two thousand five hundred ((and
fifty)) dollars per month ((shall be)) is subject to garnishee
execution to the same extent as are wages and salaries.
(c) If the total benefits presently due and payable to ((any)) an
annuitant under all annuity contracts ((under which he is an annuitant,
shall)) at any time exceeds payment at the rate of two thousand five
hundred ((and fifty)) dollars per month, then the court may order
((such)) the annuitant to pay to a judgment creditor or apply on the
judgment, in installments, ((such)) the portion of ((such)) the excess
benefits ((as to)) that the court ((may appear)) determines to be just
and proper, after due regard for the reasonable requirements of the
judgment debtor and ((his family, if dependent upon him)) the judgment
debtor's dependent family, as well as any payments required to be made
by the annuitant to other creditors under prior court orders.
(2) The benefits, rights, privileges, or options accruing under
((such)) an annuity contract to a beneficiary or assignee ((shall not
be)) are not transferable ((nor)) or subject to commutation, and if the
benefits are payable periodically or at stated times, the same
exemptions and exceptions contained ((herein)) in this section for the
annuitant((, shall apply with respect to such)) apply to the
beneficiary or assignee.
(3) An annuity contract within the meaning of this section ((shall
be)) is any obligation to pay certain sums at stated times, during life
or lives, or for a specified term or terms, issued for a valuable
consideration, regardless of whether or not ((such)) the sums are
payable to one or more persons, jointly or otherwise, but does not
include payments under life insurance contracts at stated times during
life or lives, or for a specified term or terms.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.21.047 and 1995 c 265 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((No insurer shall)) An insurer may not offer any health
benefit plan to any small employer without complying with ((the
provisions of)) RCW 48.21.045(((5))) (3).
(2) Employers purchasing health plans provided through associations
or through member-governed groups formed specifically for the purpose
of purchasing health care ((shall not be considered)) are not small
employers and ((such plans shall not be subject to the provisions of
RCW 48.21.045(5))) the plans are not subject to RCW 48.21.045(3).
(3) For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.23.010 and 1979 c 130 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The provisions of this chapter apply)) This chapter applies to
contracts of life insurance and annuities other than group life
insurance, group annuities, and, except for RCW 48.23.260, 48.23.270,
and 48.23.340, ((and 48.23.350,)) other than industrial life
insurance((: PROVIDED, That the provisions of)). However, Title 48
RCW ((shall)) does not apply to charitable gift annuities issued by a
board of a state university, regional university, or a state college,
nor to the issuance thereof.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.24.030 and 1993 c 132 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Insurance under any group life insurance policy issued
((pursuant to)) under RCW 48.24.020, ((or)) 48.24.050, ((or))
48.24.060, ((or)) 48.24.070, or 48.24.090 may, if seventy-five percent
of the then insured employees or labor union members or public employee
association members or members of the Washington state patrol elect, be
extended to insure the spouse and dependent children, or any class or
classes thereof, of each ((such)) insured employee or member who so
elects, in amounts in accordance with a plan ((which)) that precludes
individual selection by the employees or members or by the employer or
labor union or trustee((, and which insurance on the life of any one
family member including a spouse shall not be in excess of fifty
percent of the insurance on the life of the insured employee or
member)).
Premiums for the insurance on ((such)) the family members shall be
paid by the policyholder, either from the employer's funds or funds
contributed by him, trustee's funds, or labor union funds, and/or from
funds contributed by the insured employees or members, or from both.
(2) ((Such)) A spouse insured ((pursuant to)) under this section
((shall have)) has the same conversion right as to the insurance on his
or her life as is vested in the employee or member under this chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 48.29.010 and 1997 c 14 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter relates only to title insurers for real property.
(2) ((None of the provisions of)) This code ((shall be deemed to))
does not apply to persons engaged in the business of preparing and
issuing abstracts of title to property and certifying to ((the)) their
correctness ((thereof)) so long as ((such)) the persons do not
guarantee or insure ((such)) the titles.
(3) For purposes of this chapter, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise:
(a) "Title policy" means any written instrument, contract, or
guarantee by means of which title insurance liability is assumed.
(b) "Abstract of title" means a written representation, provided
((pursuant to)) under contract, whether written or oral, intended to be
relied upon by the person who has contracted for the receipt of
((such)) this representation, listing all recorded conveyances,
instruments, or documents ((which)) that, under the laws of the state
of Washington, impart constructive notice with respect to the chain of
title to the real property described. An abstract of title is not a
title policy as defined in this subsection.
(c) "Preliminary report," "commitment," or "binder" means reports
furnished in connection with an application for title insurance and are
offers to issue a title policy subject to the stated exceptions ((set
forth)) in the reports, the conditions and stipulations of the report
and the issued policy, and ((such)) other matters as may be
incorporated by reference. The reports are not abstracts of title, nor
are any of the rights, duties, or responsibilities applicable to the
preparation and issuance of an abstract of title applicable to the
issuance of any report. ((Any such)) The report ((shall not be
construed as, nor constitute,)) is not a representation as to the
condition of the title to real property, but ((shall constitute)) is a
statement of terms and conditions upon which the issuer is willing to
issue its title policy, if ((such)) the offer is accepted.

Sec. 10 RCW 48.29.020 and 1990 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A title insurer ((shall not be)) is not entitled to have a
certificate of authority unless it otherwise qualifies ((therefor,
nor)) for a certificate of authority, or unless:
(1) It is a stock corporation.
(2) It owns or leases and maintains a complete set of tract indexes
of the county in this state in which its principal office ((within this
state)) is located.
(3) ((It deposits and keeps on deposit with the commissioner a
guaranty fund in amount as set forth in RCW 48.29.030 and comprised of
cash or public obligations as specified in RCW 48.13.040.)) It has and
maintains the capital and surplus requirements set forth in RCW
48.05.340.

Sec. 11 RCW 48.29.120 and 1947 c 79 s .29.12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) Each title insurer shall annually apportion to a special
reserve fund an amount determined by applying the rate of twenty-five
cents for each one thousand dollars of net increase of insurance it has
in force as at the end of such year. Such apportionment shall be
continued or resumed as needed to maintain the special reserve fund at
an amount equal to not less than the guaranty fund deposit required of
the insurer.
(2) The special reserve fund shall be held by the insurer as an
additional guaranty fund, and shall be used only for the payment of
losses after the insurer's liquid resources available for the payment
of losses, other than such special reserve fund or the guaranty fund
deposit, have been exhausted.
(3) For the purposes of computing the special reserve fund as
provided in subsection (1) of this section, net increase of insurance
in force resulting from reinsurance of the risks of another title
insurer shall not be included to the extent that a like special reserve
fund on such insurance is maintained by the ceding insurer.)) In
determining the financial condition of a title insurer doing business
under this title, the general provisions of chapter 48.12 RCW requiring
the establishment of reserves sufficient to cover all known and unknown
liabilities including allocated and unallocated loss adjustment expense
apply, except that a title insurer shall establish and maintain:
(1) A known claim reserve in an amount estimated to be sufficient
to cover all unpaid losses, claims, and allocated loss adjustment
expenses arising under title insurance policies, guaranteed
certificates of title, guaranteed searches, and guaranteed abstracts of
title, and all unpaid losses, claims, and allocated loss adjustment
expenses for which the title insurer may be liable, and for which the
insurer has received notice by or on behalf of the insured, holder of
a guarantee or escrow, or security depositor;
(2)(a) A statutory or unearned premium reserve consisting of:
(i) The amount of the special reserve fund that was required prior
to the effective date of this section, which balance must be released
in accordance with (b) of this subsection; and
(ii) Additions to the reserve after the effective date of this
section must be made out of total charges for title insurance policies
and guarantees written, as set forth in the title insurer's most recent
annual statement on file with the commissioner, equal to the sum of
the following:
(A) For each title insurance policy on a single risk written or
assumed after the effective date of this section, fifteen cents per one
thousand dollars of net retained liability for policies under five
hundred thousand dollars; and
(B) For each title insurance policy on a single risk written or
assumed after the effective date of this section, ten cents per one
thousand dollars of net retained liability for policies of five hundred
thousand or greater.
(b) The aggregate of the amounts set aside in this reserve in any
calendar year pursuant to (a) of this subsection must be released from
the reserve and restored to net profits over a period of twenty years
under the following formula:
(i) Thirty-five percent of the aggregate sum on July 1st of the
year next succeeding the year of addition;
(ii) Fifteen percent of the aggregate sum on July 1st of each of
the succeeding two years;
(iii) Ten percent of the aggregate sum on July 1st of the next
succeeding year;
(iv) Three percent of the aggregate sum on July 1st of each of the
next three succeeding years;
(v) Two percent of the aggregate sum on July 1st of each of the
next three succeeding years; and
(vi) One percent of the aggregate sum on July 1st of each of the
next succeeding ten years.
(c) The insurer shall calculate an adjusted statutory unearned
premium reserve as of the effective date of this section. The adjusted
reserve is calculated as if (a)(ii) and (b) of this subsection had been
in effect for all years beginning twenty years prior to the effective
date of this section. For purposes of this calculation, the balance of
the reserve as of that date is deemed to be zero. If the adjusted
reserve so calculated exceeds the aggregate amount set aside for
statutory or unearned premiums in the insurer's annual statement on
file with the commissioner on the effective date of this section, the
insurer shall, out of total charges for policies of title insurance,
increase its statutory or unearned premium reserve by an amount equal
to one-sixth of that excess in each of the succeeding six years,
commencing with the calendar year that includes the effective date of
this section, until the entire excess has been added.
(d) The aggregate of the amounts set aside in this reserve in any
calendar year as adjustments to the insurer's statutory or unearned
premium reserve under (c) of this subsection shall be released from the
reserve and restored to net profits, or equity if the additions
required by (c) of this subsection reduced equity directly, over a
period not exceeding ten years under to the following table:

Year of Addition Release

Year 1* Equally over 10 years

Year 2 Equally over 9 years

Year 3 Equally over 8 years

Year 4 Equally over 7 years

Year 5 Equally over 6 years

Year 6 Equally over 5 years

*(The calendar year following the effective date of this section).
(3) A supplemental reserve shall be established consisting of any
other reserves necessary, when taken in combination with the reserves
required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section, to cover the
company's liabilities with respect to all losses, claims, and loss
adjustment expenses.
(4) The supplemental reserve required under subsection (3) of this
section shall be phased in as follows: Twenty-five percent of the
otherwise applicable supplemental reserve will be required until
December 31, 2006; fifty percent of the otherwise applicable
supplemental reserve will be required until December 31, 2007; and
seventy-five percent of the otherwise applicable supplemental reserve
will be required until December 31, 2008.

Sec. 12 RCW 48.29.130 and 1967 c 150 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The funds of a domestic title insurer, other than those
representing its guaranty fund deposit, shall be invested)) A domestic
title insurer shall invest its funds as follows:
(1) Funds in an amount not less than its reserve required ((special
reserve shall)) by RCW 48.29.120 must be kept invested in investments
eligible for domestic life insurers.
(2) Other funds may be invested in:
(a) The insurer's plant and equipment, up to a maximum of fifty
percent of capital plus surplus.
(b) Stocks and bonds of abstract companies when approved by the
commissioner.
(c) Investments eligible for the investment of funds of any
domestic insurer.

Sec. 13 RCW 48.29.170 and 1981 c 223 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Title insurance agents ((shall be)) are exempt from the provisions
of RCW ((48.17.090(2) and)) 48.17.180(1) ((which otherwise)) that
require that each individual empowered to exercise the authority of a
licensed firm or corporation must be separately licensed.

Sec. 14 RCW 48.30.300 and 1993 c 492 s 287 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision contained in Title 48 RCW to the
contrary:
(((1) No)) A person or entity engaged in the business of insurance
in this state ((shall)) may not refuse to issue any contract of
insurance or cancel or decline to renew such contract because of the
sex or marital status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical handicap of the insured or prospective insured. The amount of
benefits payable, or any term, rate, condition, or type of coverage
((shall)) may not be restricted, modified, excluded, increased, or
reduced on the basis of the sex or marital status, or be restricted,
modified, excluded, or reduced on the basis of the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical handicap of the insured or prospective
insured. ((Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section
these provisions shall)) This subsection does not prohibit fair
discrimination on the basis of sex, or marital status, or the presence
of any sensory, mental, or physical handicap when bona fide statistical
differences in risk or exposure have been substantiated.
(((2) With respect to disability policies issued or renewed on and
after July 1, 1994, that provide coverage against loss arising from
medical, surgical, hospital, or emergency care services:
(a) Policies shall guarantee continuity of coverage. Such
provision, which shall be included in every policy, shall provide that:
(i) The policy may be canceled or nonrenewed without the prior
written approval of the commissioner only for nonpayment of premium or
as permitted under RCW 48.18.090; and
(ii) The policy may be canceled or nonrenewed because of a change
in the physical or mental condition or health of a covered person only
with the prior written approval of the commissioner. Such approval
shall be granted only when the insurer has discharged its obligation to
continue coverage for such person by obtaining coverage with another
insurer, health care service contractor, or health maintenance
organization, which coverage is comparable in terms of premiums and
benefits as defined by rule of the commissioner.
(b) It is an unfair practice for a disability insurer to modify the
coverage provided or rates applying to an in-force disability insurance
policy and to fail to make such modification in all such issued and
outstanding policies.
(c) Subject to rules adopted by the commissioner, it is an unfair
practice for a disability insurer to:
(i) Cease the sale of a policy form unless it has received prior
written authorization from the commissioner and has offered all
policyholders covered under such discontinued policy the opportunity to
purchase comparable coverage without health screening; or
(ii) Engage in a practice that subjects policyholders to rate
increases on discontinued policy forms unless such policyholders are
offered the opportunity to purchase comparable coverage without health
screening.
The insurer may limit an offer of comparable coverage without
health screening to a period not less than thirty days from the date
the offer is first made.))

Sec. 15 RCW 48.30A.045 and 1997 c 92 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each insurer licensed to write direct insurance in this state,
except those exempted in subsection (2) of this section, ((shall)) must
institute and maintain an insurance antifraud plan. ((An insurer
licensed on July 1, 1995, shall file its antifraud plan with the
insurance commissioner no later than December 31, 1995.)) An insurer
licensed after July 1, 1995, ((shall)) must file its antifraud plan
within six months of licensure. An insurer ((shall)) must file any
change to the antifraud plan with the insurance commissioner within
thirty days after the plan has been modified.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) Health carriers, as defined in RCW 48.43.005((,));
(b) Life insurers((, or));
(c) Title insurers; ((or))
(d) Property or casualty insurers with annual gross written medical
malpractice insurance premiums in this state that exceed fifty percent
of their total annual gross written premiums in this state; ((or all))
(e) Credit-related insurance written in connection with a credit
transaction in which the creditor is named as a beneficiary or loss
payee under the policy, except vendor single-interest or collateral
protection coverage as defined in RCW 48.22.110(4); or
(f) Insurers with gross written premiums of less than one thousand
dollars in Washington during the reporting year.

Sec. 16 RCW 48.30A.060 and 1995 c 285 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
By March 31st of each year, each insurer ((shall annually)) must
provide to the insurance commissioner a summary report on actions taken
under its antifraud plan to prevent and combat insurance fraud. The
report must also include, but not be limited to, measures taken to
protect and ensure the integrity of electronic data processing-generated data and manually compiled data, statistical data on the
amount of resources committed to combatting fraud, and the amount of
fraud identified and recovered during the reporting period. The
antifraud plans and summary of the insurer's antifraud activities are
not public records and are exempt from chapter 42.17 RCW, are
proprietary, are not subject to public examination, and are not
discoverable or admissible in civil litigation.

Sec. 17 RCW 48.30A.065 and 1995 c 285 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
An insurer that fails to file a timely antifraud plan or ((who does
not)) summary report or that fails to make a good faith attempt to file
an antifraud plan that complies with RCW 48.30A.050 or a summary report
that complies with RCW 48.30A.060, is subject to the penalty provisions
of RCW 48.01.080, but no penalty may be imposed for the first filing
made by an insurer under this chapter. An insurer that fails to follow
the antifraud plan is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten
thousand dollars for each violation, at the discretion of the
commissioner after consideration of all relevant factors, including the
willfulness of the violation.

Sec. 18 RCW 48.31.100 and 1947 c 79 s .31.10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An order to conserve the assets of a foreign or alien insurer
((shall)) must direct the commissioner ((forthwith)) immediately to
take possession of the property of the insurer within this state and to
conserve it, subject to the further direction of the court.
(2) Whenever a domiciliary receiver is appointed for ((any such))
a foreign or alien insurer in its domiciliary state ((which)) that is
also a reciprocal state, as defined in RCW ((48.31.110)) 48.99.010, the
court shall on application of the commissioner appoint the commissioner
as the ancillary receiver in this state, subject to the provisions of
the uniform insurers liquidation act.

Sec. 19 RCW 48.38.030 and 1979 c 130 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each charitable annuity contract or policy form ((shall)) must
include the following information:
(1) The value of the property to be transferred;
(2) The amount of the annuity to be paid to the transferor or the
transferor's nominee;
(3) The manner in which and the intervals at which payment is to be
made;
(4) The age of the person during whose life payment is to be made;
and
(5) The reasonable value as of the date of the agreement of the
benefits ((thereby)) created. This value ((shall)) may not exceed by
more than fifteen percent the net single premium for the benefits,
determined ((in accordance with)) according to the standard of
valuation set forth in RCW 48.38.020(((1))) (3).

Sec. 20 RCW 48.44.240 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 3 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
Each group contract for health care services ((which)) that is
delivered or issued for delivery or renewed, on or after January 1,
1988, ((shall)) must contain provisions providing benefits for the
treatment of chemical dependency rendered to covered persons by a
provider ((which)) that is an "approved treatment ((facility or))
program" under RCW 70.96A.020(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 48.66 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An issuer may not deny or condition the issuance or
effectiveness of any medicare supplement policy or certificate
available for sale in this state, or discriminate in the pricing of a
policy or certificate because of the health status, claims experience,
receipt of health care, or medical condition of an applicant in the
case of an application for a policy or certificate that is submitted
prior to or during the six-month period beginning with the first day of
the first month in which an individual is both sixty-five years of age
or older and is enrolled for benefits under medicare part B. Each
medicare supplement policy and certificate currently available from an
insurer must be made available to all applicants who qualify under this
subsection without regard to age.
(2) If an applicant qualifies under this section and submits an
application during the time period referenced in subsection (1) of this
section and, as of the date of application, has had a continuous period
of creditable coverage of at least six months, the issuer may not
exclude benefits based on a preexisting condition.
(3) If an applicant qualified under this section and submits an
application during the time period referenced in subsection (1) of this
section and, as of the date of application, has had a continuous period
of creditable coverage that is less than six months, the issuer must
reduce the period of any preexisting condition exclusion by the
aggregate of the period of creditable coverage applicable to the
applicant as of the enrollment date.

Sec. 22 RCW 48.66.020 and 1996 c 269 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Medicare supplemental insurance" or "medicare supplement
insurance policy" refers to a group or individual policy of disability
insurance or a subscriber contract of a health care service contractor,
a health maintenance organization, or a fraternal benefit society,
which relates its benefits to medicare, or which is advertised,
marketed, or designed primarily as a supplement to reimbursements under
medicare for the hospital, medical, or surgical expenses of persons
eligible for medicare. Such term does not include:
(a) A policy or contract of one or more employers or labor
organizations, or of the trustees of a fund established by one or more
employers or labor organizations, or combination thereof, for employees
or former employees, or combination thereof, or for members or former
members, or combination thereof, of the labor organizations; or
(b) A policy issued pursuant to a contract under Section 1876 of
the federal social security act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.), or an
issued policy under a demonstration specified in 42 U.S.C. Sec.
1395(g)(1); or
(c) Insurance policies or health care benefit plans, including
group conversion policies, provided to medicare eligible persons, that
are not marketed or held to be medicare supplement policies or benefit
plans.
(2) "Medicare" means the "Health Insurance for the Aged Act," Title
XVIII of the Social Security Amendments of 1965, as then constituted or
later amended.
(3) "Medicare eligible expenses" means health care expenses of the
kinds covered by medicare, to the extent recognized as reasonable and
medically necessary by medicare.
(4) "Applicant" means:
(a) In the case of an individual medicare supplement insurance
policy or subscriber contract, the person who seeks to contract for
insurance benefits; and
(b) In the case of a group medicare supplement insurance policy or
subscriber contract, the proposed certificate holder.
(5) "Certificate" means any certificate delivered or issued for
delivery in this state under a group medicare supplement insurance
policy.
(6) "Loss ratio" means the incurred claims as a percentage of the
earned premium computed under rules adopted by the insurance
commissioner.
(7) "Preexisting condition" means a covered person's medical
condition that caused that person to have received medical advice or
treatment during a specified time period immediately prior to the
effective date of coverage.
(8) "Disclosure form" means the form designated by the insurance
commissioner which discloses medicare benefits, the supplemental
benefits offered by the insurer, and the remaining amount for which the
insured will be responsible.
(9) "Issuer" includes insurance companies, health care service
contractors, health maintenance organizations, fraternal benefit
societies, and any other entity delivering or issuing for delivery
medicare supplement policies or certificates to a resident of this
state.
(10)(a) "Creditable coverage" means, with respect to an individual,
coverage of the individual provided under any of the following:
(i) A group health plan;
(ii) Health insurance coverage;
(iii) Part A or Part B of Title XVIII of the social security act
(medicare);
(iv) Title XIX of the social security act (medicaid), other than
coverage consisting solely of benefits under section 1928;
(v) Chapter 55 of Title 10 United States Code (CHAMPUS);
(vi) A medical care program of the Indian health service or of a
tribal organization;
(vii) A state health benefits risk pool;
(viii) A health plan offered under chapter 89 of Title 5 United
States Code (federal employees health benefits program);
(ix) A public health plan as defined in federal regulation; and
(x) A health benefit plan under section 5(e) of the peace corps act
(22 U.S.C. Sec. 2504(e)).
(b) "Creditable coverage" does not include one or more, or any
combination, of the following:
(i) Coverage only for accident or disability income insurance, or
any combination thereof;
(ii) Coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance;
(iii) Liability insurance, including general liability insurance
and automobile liability insurance;
(iv) Worker's compensation or similar insurance;
(v) Automobile medical payment insurance;
(vi) Credit-only insurance;
(vii) Coverage for on-site medical clinics; and
(viii) Other similar insurance coverage, specified in federal
regulations, under which benefits for medical care are secondary or
incidental to other insurance benefits.
(c) "Creditable coverage" does not include the following benefits
if they are provided under a separate policy, certificate, or contract
of insurance or are otherwise not an integral part of the plan:
(i) Limited scope dental or vision benefits;
(ii) Benefits for long-term care, nursing home care, home health
care, community-based care, or any combination thereof; and
(iii) Other similar, limited benefits as are specified in federal
regulations.
(d) "Creditable coverage" does not include the following benefits
if offered as independent, noncoordinated benefits:
(i) Coverage only for a specified disease or illness; and
(ii) Hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity insurance.
(e) "Creditable coverage" does not include the following if it is
offered as a separate policy, certificate, or contract of insurance:
(i) Medicare supplemental health insurance as defined under section
1882(g)(1) of the social security act;
(ii) Coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under chapter
55 of Title 10, United States Code; and
(iii) Similar supplemental coverage provided to coverage under a
group health plan.

Sec. 23 RCW 48.66.055 and 2002 c 300 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Under this section, persons eligible for a medicare supplement
policy or certificate are those individuals described in subsection (3)
of this section who, subject to subsection (3)(b)(ii) of this section,
apply to enroll under the policy not later than sixty-three days after
the date of the termination of enrollment described in subsection (3)
of this section, and who submit evidence of the date of termination or
disenrollment with the application for a medicare supplement policy.
(2) With respect to eligible persons, an issuer may not deny or
condition the issuance or effectiveness of a medicare supplement policy
described in subsection (4) of this section that is offered and is
available for issuance to new enrollees by the issuer, ((shall)) may
not discriminate in the pricing of such a medicare supplement policy
because of health status, claims experience, receipt of health care, or
medical condition, and ((shall)) may not impose an exclusion of
benefits based on a preexisting condition under such a medicare
supplement policy.
(3) "Eligible persons" means an individual that meets the
requirements of (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of this subsection, as
follows:
(a) The individual is enrolled under an employee welfare benefit
plan that provides health benefits that supplement the benefits under
medicare; and the plan terminates, or the plan ceases to provide all
such supplemental health benefits to the individual;
(b)(i) The individual is enrolled with a medicare+choice
organization under a medicare+choice plan under part C of medicare, and
any of the following circumstances apply, or the individual is sixty-five years of age or older and is enrolled with a program of all
inclusive care for the elderly (PACE) provider under section 1894 of
the social security act, and there are circumstances similar to those
described in this subsection (3)(b) that would permit discontinuance of
the individual's enrollment with the provider if the individual were
enrolled in a medicare+choice plan:
(A) The certification of the organization or plan under this
subsection (3)(b) has been terminated, or the organization or plan has
notified the individual of an impending termination of such a
certification;
(B) The organization has terminated or otherwise discontinued
providing the plan in the area in which the individual resides, or has
notified the individual of an impending termination or discontinuance
of such a plan;
(C) The individual is no longer eligible to elect the plan because
of a change in the individual's place of residence or other change in
circumstances specified by the secretary of the United States
department of health and human services, but not including termination
of the individual's enrollment on the basis described in section
1851(g)(3)(B) of the federal social security act (where the individual
has not paid premiums on a timely basis or has engaged in disruptive
behavior as specified in standards under section 1856 of the federal
social security act), or the plan is terminated for all individuals
within a residence area;
(D) The individual demonstrates, in accordance with guidelines
established by the secretary of the United States department of health
and human services, that:
(I) The organization offering the plan substantially violated a
material provision of the organization's contract under this part in
relation to the individual, including the failure to provide an
enrollee on a timely basis medically necessary care for which benefits
are available under the plan or the failure to provide such covered
care in accordance with applicable quality standards; or
(II) The organization, an agent, or other entity acting on the
organization's behalf materially misrepresented the plan's provisions
in marketing the plan to the individual; or
(E) The individual meets other exceptional conditions as the
secretary of the United States department of health and human services
may provide.
(ii)(A) An individual described in (b)(i) of this subsection may
elect to apply (a) of this subsection by substituting, for the date of
termination of enrollment, the date on which the individual was
notified by the medicare+choice organization of the impending
termination or discontinuance of the medicare+choice plan it offers in
the area in which the individual resides, but only if the individual
disenrolls from the plan as a result of such notification.
(B) In the case of an individual making the election under
(b)(ii)(A) of this subsection, the issuer involved shall accept the
application of the individual submitted before the date of termination
of enrollment, but the coverage under subsection (1) of this section
((shall only become)) is only effective upon termination of coverage
under the medicare+choice plan involved;
(c)(i) The individual is enrolled with:
(A) An eligible organization under a contract under section 1876
(medicare risk or cost);
(B) A similar organization operating under demonstration project
authority, effective for periods before April 1, 1999;
(C) An organization under an agreement under section 1833(a)(1)(A)
(health care prepayment plan); or
(D) An organization under a medicare select policy; and
(ii) The enrollment ceases under the same circumstances that would
permit discontinuance of an individual's election of coverage under
(b)(i) of this subsection;
(d) The individual is enrolled under a medicare supplement policy
and the enrollment ceases because:
(i)(A) Of the insolvency of the issuer or bankruptcy of the
nonissuer organization; or
(B) Of other involuntary termination of coverage or enrollment
under the policy;
(ii) The issuer of the policy substantially violated a material
provision of the policy; or
(iii) The issuer, an agent, or other entity acting on the issuer's
behalf materially misrepresented the policy's provisions in marketing
the policy to the individual;
(e)(i) The individual was enrolled under a medicare supplement
policy and terminates enrollment and subsequently enrolls, for the
first time, with any medicare+choice organization under a
medicare+choice plan under part C of medicare, any eligible
organization under a contract under section 1876 (medicare risk or
cost), any similar organization operating under demonstration project
authority, any PACE program under section 1894 of the social security
act, an organization under an agreement under section 1833(a)(1)(A)
(health care prepayment plan), or a medicare select policy; and
(ii) The subsequent enrollment under (e)(i) of this subsection is
terminated by the enrollee during any period within the first twelve
months of such subsequent enrollment (during which the enrollee is
permitted to terminate such subsequent enrollment under section 1851(e)
of the federal social security act); or
(f) The individual, upon first becoming eligible for benefits under
part A of medicare at age sixty-five, enrolls in a medicare+choice plan
under part C of medicare, or in a PACE program under section 1894, and
disenrolls from the plan or program by not later than twelve months
after the effective date of enrollment.
(4) An eligible person under subsection (3) of this section is
entitled to a medicare supplement policy as follows:
(a) A person eligible under subsection (3)(a), (b), (c), and (d) of
this section is entitled to a medicare supplement policy that has a
benefit package classified as plan A through G offered by any issuer;
(b) A person eligible under subsection (3)(e) of this section is
entitled to the same medicare supplement policy in which the individual
was most recently previously enrolled, if available from the same
issuer, or, if not so available, a policy described in (a) of this
subsection; and
(c) A person eligible under subsection (3)(f) of this section is
entitled to any medicare supplement policy offered by any issuer.
(5)(a) At the time of an event described in subsection (3) of this
section, and because of which an individual loses coverage or benefits
due to the termination of a contract, agreement, policy, or plan, the
organization that terminates the contract or agreement, the issuer
terminating the policy, or the administrator of the plan being
terminated, respectively, must notify the individual of his or her
rights under this section, and of the obligations of issuers of
medicare supplement policies under subsection (1) of this section. The
notice must be communicated contemporaneously with the notification of
termination.
(b) At the time of an event described in subsection (3) of this
section, and because of which an individual ceases enrollment under a
contract, agreement, policy, or plan, the organization that offers the
contract or agreement, regardless of the basis for the cessation of
enrollment, the issuer offering the policy, or the administrator of the
plan, respectively, must notify the individual of his or her rights
under this section, and of the obligations of issuers of medicare
supplement policies under subsection (1) of this section. The notice
must be communicated within ten working days of the issuer receiving
notification of disenrollment.
(6) In the case of an individual described in subsection (3)(e) of
this section whose enrollment with an organization or provider
described in subsection (3)(e)(i) of this section is involuntarily
terminated within the first twelve months of enrollment, and who,
without an intervening enrollment, enrolls with another organization or
provider, the subsequent enrollment is an initial enrollment as
described in subsection (3)(e) of this section.
(7) In the case of an individual described in subsection (3)(f) of
this section whose enrollment with a plan or in a program described in
subsection (3)(f) of this section is involuntarily terminated within
the first twelve months of enrollment, and who, without an intervening
enrollment, enrolls in another plan or program, the subsequent
enrollment is an initial enrollment as described in subsection (3)(f)
of this section.
(8) For purposes of subsection (3)(e) and (f) of this section, an
enrollment of an individual with an organization or provider described
in subsection (3)(e)(i) of this section, or with a plan or in a program
described in subsection (3)(f) of this section is not an initial
enrollment under this subsection after the two-year period beginning on
the date on which the individual first enrolled with such an
organization, provider, plan, or program.

Sec. 24 RCW 48.92.120 and 1993 c 462 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((No)) A person may not act or aid in any manner in soliciting,
negotiating, or procuring liability insurance in this state from a risk
retention group unless the person is licensed as an insurance agent or
broker for casualty insurance in accordance with chapter 48.17 RCW and
pays the fees designated for the license under RCW 48.14.010.
(2)(a) ((No)) A person may not act or aid in any manner in
soliciting, negotiating, or procuring liability insurance in this state
for a purchasing group from an authorized insurer or a risk retention
group chartered in a state unless the person is licensed as an
insurance agent or broker for casualty insurance in accordance with
chapter 48.17 RCW and pays the fees designated for the license under
RCW 48.14.010.
(b) ((No)) A person may not act or aid in any manner in soliciting,
negotiating, or procuring liability insurance coverage in this state
for a member of a purchasing group under a purchasing group's policy
unless the person is licensed as an insurance agent or broker for
casualty insurance in accordance with chapter 48.17 RCW and pays the
fees designated for the license under RCW 48.14.010.
(c) ((No)) A person may not act or aid in any manner in soliciting,
negotiating, or procuring liability insurance from an insurer not
authorized to do business in this state on behalf of a purchasing group
located in this state unless the person is licensed as a surplus lines
broker in accordance with chapter 48.15 RCW and pays the fees
designated for the license under RCW 48.14.010.
(3) For purposes of acting as an agent or broker for a risk
retention group or purchasing group under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, the requirement of residence in this state does not
apply.
(4) Every person licensed under chapters 48.15 and 48.17 RCW, on
business placed with risk retention groups or written through a
purchasing group, ((shall)) must inform each prospective insured of the
provisions of the notice required under RCW 48.92.040(7) in the case of
a risk retention group and RCW 48.92.090(((3))) (2) in the case of a
purchasing group.

Sec. 25 RCW 48.98.015 and 1993 c 462 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
((No)) A managing general agent may not place business with an
insurer unless there is in force a written contract between the
managing general agent and the insurer that sets forth the
responsibilities of each party and, where both parties share
responsibility for a particular function, that specifies the division
of the responsibilities, and that contains the following minimum
provisions:
(1) The insurer may terminate the contract for cause upon written
notice to the managing general agent. The insurer may suspend the
underwriting authority of the managing general agent during the
pendency of a dispute regarding the cause for termination.
(2) The managing general agent ((shall)) must render accounts to
the insurer detailing all transactions and remit all funds due under
the contract to the insurer on not less than a monthly basis.
(3) The managing general agent ((shall)) must hold funds collected
for the account of an insurer in a fiduciary capacity in ((a)) an FDIC
insured financial institution ((located in this state that is a member
of the federal reserve system)). This account must be used for all
payments on behalf of the insurer. The managing general agent may
retain no more than three months' estimated claims payments and
allocated loss adjustment expenses.
(4) The managing general agent ((shall)) must maintain separate
records of business written for each insurer. The insurer has access
to and the right to copy all accounts and records related to its
business in a form usable by the insurer, and the commissioner has
access to all books, bank accounts, and records of the managing general
agent in a form usable to the commissioner. Those records ((shall))
must be retained according to the requirements of this title and rules
adopted under it.
(5) The managing general agent may not assign the contract in whole
or part.
(6)(a) Appropriate underwriting guidelines must include at least
the following: The maximum annual premium volume; the basis of the
rates to be charged; the types of risks that may be written; maximum
limits of liability; applicable exclusions; territorial limitations;
policy cancellation provisions; and the maximum policy period.
(b) The insurer has the right to cancel or not renew any policy of
insurance, subject to the applicable laws and rules, including those in
chapter 48.18 RCW.
(7) If the contract permits the managing general agent to settle
claims on behalf of the insurer:
(a) All claims must be reported to the insurer in a timely manner.
(b) A copy of the claim file must be sent to the insurer at its
request or as soon as it becomes known that the claim:
(i) Has the potential to exceed an amount determined by the
commissioner, or exceeds the limit set by the insurer, whichever is
less;
(ii) Involves a coverage dispute;
(iii) May exceed the managing general agent's claims settlement
authority;
(iv) Is open for more than six months; or
(v) Is closed by payment in excess of an amount set by the
commissioner or an amount set by the insurer, whichever is less.
(c) All claim files are the joint property of the insurer and the
managing general agent. However, upon an order of liquidation of the
insurer, those files become the sole property of the insurer or its
liquidator or successor. The managing general agent has reasonable
access to and the right to copy the files on a timely basis.
(d) Settlement authority granted to the managing general agent may
be terminated for cause upon the insurer's written notice to the
managing general agent or upon the termination of the contract. The
insurer may suspend the managing general agent's settlement authority
during the pendency of a dispute regarding the cause for termination.
(8) Where electronic claims files are in existence, the contract
must address the timely transmission of the data.
(9) If the contract provides for a sharing of interim profits by
the managing general agent, and the managing general agent has the
authority to determine the amount of the interim profits by
establishing loss reserves or controlling claim payments or in any
other manner, interim profits ((shall)) may not be paid to the managing
general agent until one year after they are earned for property
insurance business and five years after they are earned on casualty
business and not until the profits have been verified under RCW
48.98.020.
(10) The managing general agent may not:
(a) Bind reinsurance or retrocessions on behalf of the insurer,
except that the managing general agent may bind automatic reinsurance
contracts under obligatory automatic agreements if the contract with
the insurer contains reinsurance underwriting guidelines including, for
both reinsurance assumed and ceded, a list of reinsurers with which the
automatic agreements are in effect, the coverages and amounts or
percentages that may be reinsured, and commission schedules;
(b) Commit the insurer to participate in insurance or reinsurance
syndicates;
(c) Use an agent that is not appointed to represent the insurer in
accordance with the requirements of chapter 48.17 RCW;
(d) Without prior approval of the insurer, pay or commit the
insurer to pay a claim over a specified amount, net of reinsurance,
that ((shall)) may not exceed one percent of the insurer's policyholder
surplus as of December 31st of the last-completed calendar year;
(e) Collect a payment from a reinsurer or commit the insurer to a
claim settlement with a reinsurer, without prior approval of the
insurer. If prior approval is given, a report ((shall)) must be
promptly forwarded to the insurer;
(f) Permit an agent appointed by it to serve on the insurer's board
of directors;
(g) Jointly employ an individual who is employed by the insurer; or
(h) Appoint a submanaging general agent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 48.05.360 (Special surplus requirements for certain
combinations) and 1963 c 195 s 9;
(2) RCW 48.29.030 (Amount of deposit) and 1957 c 193 s 16 & 1947 c
79 s .29.03;
(3) RCW 48.29.060 (Impairment of deposit) and 1947 c 79 s .29.06;
(4) RCW 48.29.070 (Levy of execution against deposit) and 1955 c 86
s 14 & 1947 c 79 s .29.07;
(5) RCW 48.29.090 (Purpose of deposit) and 1955 c 86 s 16 & 1947 c
79 s .29.09;
(6) RCW 48.29.100 (Termination of deposit) and 1947 c 79 s .29.10;
(7) RCW 48.29.110 (Release of securities) and 1955 c 86 s 17 & 1947
c 79 s .29.11; and
(8) RCW 48.34.910 (Small loan act [Consumer finance act] not
affected) and 1961 c 219 s 14.

--- END ---