BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.104 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every licensed operator shall complete, during their compliance
period, the continuing education unit requirement as determined by the
department. Continuing education units will be on the subjects of (a)
well construction, testing, operation, and maintenance; (b) well
construction equipment, tools, safety, and methods; (c) well
construction, operation, and maintenance codes and rules; (d) operator
licensing codes and rules and local ordinances concerning the
construction, operation, and maintenance of wells; and (e) other
subjects that apply to the ground water and well construction industry
as established by rule. Every licensed operator shall obtain the
required continuing education units during the compliance period and
submit to the department verification of completion statements from
approved providers.
(2) Any organization or individual may apply to the department to
become an approved continuing education provider. The department will
be a continuing education provider of last resort by only providing
continuing education courses for licensees in the event that no other
approved providers are available. Continuing education providers may
only be organizations or individuals with a history of providing
continuing education courses that comply with the requirements for
course approval under this section and the rules adopted under this
section. In the case where an applicant cannot demonstrate a history
of providing continuing education courses, the applicant must submit a
continuing education provider comprehensive plan to the department.
The department, with the assistance of the technical advisory group,
will establish by rule the necessary elements for the comprehensive
plan. The purpose of the comprehensive plan is to determine the
applicant's resources and ability to comply with all of the
requirements of an approved course provider. An approved continuing
education provider must, at a minimum, develop and implement methods to
evaluate its course offerings to determine their effectiveness and the
extent to which they meet the needs of licensed operators. The
continuing education provider must be able to provide, upon request
from the department, course evaluations from attendees. The continuing
education provider will obtain course approval and credit value prior
to offering the course to licensees. The continuing education provider
must present courses consistent with this section and rules adopted by
the department and make the course available to all licensed operators
and trainees at locations logistically chosen to facilitate the
attendance of licensees throughout the state.
(3) The department, with the help of the technical advisory group,
must adopt by rule methods to approve courses and establish course
credit for continuing education units and the amount of continuing
education units required by licensees. To be approved for credit, a
continuing education course must be of intellectual or practical
content, contribute directly to the ground water and well construction
industry, and promote professional competence, skills, and
understanding of professional or ethical obligations. If a course does
not bear entirely on the general requirements for continuing education
of the ground water or well construction industry, or if the method of
presenting the course is below minimum standards, the department may
assign partial credit. Courses must be presented in a suitable setting
devoted to the educational activity of the program. A continuing
education may not consist solely of television viewing in the home
correspondence work, or self-study, except as the department may
approve to accommodate the needs of the handicapped, incapacitated, or
any licensee who may be out of state for the majority of his or her
compliance period. Video, motion picture, or audiotape presentations
may be used, but only if a presenter is in attendance at all
presentations to comment and answer questions. The course must be
opened to all licensed operators and trainees. The department must
make available to all interested parties, upon request, a list of all
approved continuing education providers and courses. The department
must, with the assistance of the technical advisory group, adopt rules
that will allow providers to obtain prior approval of continuing
education courses or which may allow providers to obtain
postpresentation approval of continuing education courses. The
department may, with the assistance of the technical advisory group,
establish by rule other requirements for course approval.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.104.100 and 1993 c 387 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall be renewed every
two years. A license shall be renewed upon payment of a renewal fee
and completion of continuing education required by this chapter and
rules adopted by the department. If a licensee fails to submit an
application for renewal, the renewal fee, and proof of completion of
the required continuing education, the license shall ((expire)) be
suspended at the end of its effective term. The licensee is not
allowed to perform work authorized by the license during the time that
it is suspended. The licensee has ninety days to submit an application
for renewal, the renewal fee, and proof of completion of the required
continuing education for the renewal period. Continuing education
obtained during the ninety-day suspension period may be applied only to
the next renewal period. If a licensee fails to submit an application
for renewal, the renewal fee, and proof of completion of the required
continuing education by the end of the ninety-day suspension period,
the license expires.
(2) The department shall send a notice of suspension to all
licensees within ten days of their license being suspended. A person
whose license has expired must apply for a new license as provided in
this chapter. The department may, upon demonstration of good cause,
waive the requirement for a written examination and on-site testing for
a person whose license has expired.
(3) The department ((may)) shall refuse to renew a license if the
licensee has not complied with an order issued by the department or has
not paid a penalty imposed in accordance with this chapter, unless the
order or penalty is under appeal.
(4) The department may issue a conditional license to enable a
former licensee to comply with an order to correct problems with a
well.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.104.120 and 1993 c 387 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person ((with an economic or noneconomic interest)) who can
demonstrate being materially harmed by the actions or inactions of a
well contractor or operator may make a complaint against ((any)) the
well contractor or operator for violating this chapter or any
((regulations)) rules adopted under it to the department ((of
ecology)). The complaint shall be in writing, signed by the complain-
ant, and specify the grievances against the licensee. The department
((shall)) may investigate and establish the validity of the complaint.
In the event evidence is gathered to establish a violation of this
chapter or the rules adopted under it has occurred, the department
shall respond to the complaint by issuance of an order ((it deems))
appropriate to the violation. Review of the order shall be subject to
the hearings procedures set forth in RCW 18.104.130.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.104.180 and 1993 c 387 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
No license under this chapter shall be required of:
(1) Any individual who personally constructs a well on land which
is owned or leased by the individual or in which the individual has a
beneficial interest as a contract purchaser and is used by the
individual for farm or single-family residential use only. An
individual who constructs a well without a license pursuant to this
subsection shall comply with all other requirements of this chapter and
rules adopted by the department, including but not limited to, well
construction standards, payment of well construction fees, and
notification of well construction required by RCW 18.104.048. An
individual without a license may construct not more than one well every
two years pursuant to the provisions of this subsection.
(2) An individual who performs labor or services for a well
contractor in connection with the construction of a well at the
direction and under the supervision and control of a licensed operator
who is present at the construction site.
(3) A person licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.08,
18.235, or 18.43 RCW if in the performance of duties covered by those
licenses.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.104.190 and 1993 c 387 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter,
the director shall appoint a technical advisory group, chaired by the
department. The technical advisory group shall have twelve members:
Two members shall represent the department of ecology((,)); six members
shall represent resource protection well contractors or water well
contractors((,)); one member, who regularly works on issues related to
drinking water wells, shall represent the department of health((,));
one member, who regularly works on issues related to drinking water
wells, shall represent local health departments((,)); one member,
knowledgeable in the design and construction of wells, shall represent
licensed professional engineers((,)); and one member ((shall be a
scientist)), who is a licensed hydrogeologist, knowledgeable in the
design and construction of wells.
(2) The technical advisory group shall assist the department in the
development and revision of rules; the preparation and revision of
licensing requirements and examinations; the development of training
criteria for ((inspectors, well contractors, and well operators;))
qualified field investigators; and the review of proposed changes to
the minimum standards for construction and maintenance of wells by
local governments for the purpose of achieving continuity with
technology and state rules.
(3) The group shall meet at least twice each year to review rules
and suggest any necessary changes.
(4) Each member of the group shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240 and reimbursed for travel expenses while engaged in
the business of the group as prescribed in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

--- END ---