BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
Impact fees for residential construction shall only be collected by
the county, city, or town imposing the impact fee either:
(1) At the time of final inspection of the residence. A final
inspection shall be conditioned on the payment of the impact fees; or
(2) At the time the certificate of occupancy is issued. Issuance
of a certificate of occupancy shall be conditioned on the payment of
the impact fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
Impact fees under this chapter for residential construction shall
only be collected by the county, city, or town imposing the impact fee
either:
(1) At the time of final inspection of the residence. A final
inspection shall be conditioned on the payment of the impact fees; or
(2) At the time the certificate of occupancy is issued. Issuance
of a certificate of occupancy shall be conditioned on the payment of
the impact fees.

--- END ---