BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.160.020 and 1999 c 164 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board.
(2) "Bond" means any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate, or
other evidence of financial indebtedness issued by the board pursuant
to this chapter.
(3) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) "Financial institution" means any bank, savings and loan
association, credit union, development credit corporation, insurance
company, investment company, trust company, savings institution, or
other financial institution approved by the board and maintaining an
office in the state.
(5) "Industrial development facilities" means "industrial
development facilities" as defined in RCW 39.84.020.
(6) "Industrial development revenue bonds" means tax-exempt revenue
bonds used to fund industrial development facilities.
(7) "Local government" or "political subdivision" means any port
district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any other
municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state
providing for public facilities under this chapter.
(8) "Sponsor" means any of the following entities which customarily
provide service or otherwise aid in industrial or other financing and
are approved as a sponsor by the board: A bank, trust company, savings
bank, investment bank, national banking association, savings and loan
association, building and loan association, credit union, insurance
company, or any other financial institution, governmental agency, or
holding company of any entity specified in this subsection.
(9) "Umbrella bonds" means industrial development revenue bonds
from which the proceeds are loaned, transferred, or otherwise made
available to two or more users under this chapter.
(10) "User" means one or more persons acting as lessee, purchaser,
mortgagor, or borrower under a financing document and receiving or
applying to receive revenues from bonds issued under this chapter.
(11) "Public facilities" means a project of a local government or
a federally recognized Indian tribe for the planning, acquisition,
construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or
improvement of bridges, roads, domestic and industrial water, earth
stabilization, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity,
telecommunications, transportation, natural gas, buildings or
structures, and port facilities, all for the purpose of job creation,
job retention, or job expansion.
(12) "Rural county" means a county with a population density of
fewer than one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the
office of financial management.
(13) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:
(a) A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial
census, that meets three of the five criteria set forth in subsection
(14) of this section;
(b) A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty
thousand in the 1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five
criteria as set forth in subsection (14) of this section; or
(c) A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census,
that is located in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five
criteria set forth in subsection (14) of this section.
(14) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:
(a) A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(b) A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(c) Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses
of one hundred positions or more;
(d) Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses
of one hundred positions or more; and
(e) An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state
average. The counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by
the employment security department for the most recent year for which
data is available. For the purposes of administration of programs
under this chapter, the United States post office five-digit zip code
delivery areas will be used to determine residence status for
eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition, a zip code
delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an urbanized
area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by zip
codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also
considered nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make
available a zip code listing of the areas to all agencies and
organizations providing services under this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.160.060 and 2002 c 242 s 4 and 2002 c 239 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The board is authorized to make direct loans to political
subdivisions of the state and to federally recognized Indian tribes for
the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions and federally
recognized Indian tribes in financing the cost of public facilities,
including development of land and improvements for public facilities,
project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility, and marketing studies and plans; project
design, site planning, and analysis; project debt and revenue impact
analysis; as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration,
expansion, or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be
authorized for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and
to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the
limited resources of the political subdivision or the federally
recognized Indian tribe and the finding by the board that financial
circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project to move
forward. However, at least ten percent of all financial assistance
provided by the board in any biennium shall consist of grants to
political subdivisions and federally recognized Indian tribes.
Application for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the
board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board shall conform
to the following requirements:
(1) The board shall not provide financial assistance:
(a) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote a retail shopping development or expansion.
(b) For any project that evidence exists would result in a
development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other
community in the state.
(c) For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and
other fixtures which are a part of real property.
(d) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote gambling.
(2) The board shall only provide financial assistance:
(a) For those projects which would result in specific private
developments or expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food
processing, assembly, warehousing, advanced technology, research and
development, and industrial distribution; (ii) for processing
recyclable materials or for facilities that support recycling,
including processes not currently provided in the state, including but
not limited to, de-inking facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard
waste, and problem-waste processing; (iii) for manufacturing facilities
that rely significantly on recyclable materials, including but not
limited to waste tires and mixed waste paper; (iv) which support the
relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban areas to rural
counties or rural natural resources impact areas; or (v) which
substantially support the trading of goods or services outside of the
state's borders.
(b) For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for
the successful maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial
or commercial plants or will otherwise assist in the creation or
retention of long-term economic opportunities.
(c) When the application includes convincing evidence that a
specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will
occur only if the public facility improvement is made.
(3) The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to:
(a) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the
project would create, not just the total number of jobs it would create
after the project is completed and according to the unemployment rate
in the area in which the jobs would be located; and
(b) The rate of return of the state's investment, that includes the
expected increase in state and local tax revenues associated with the
project.
(4) A responsible official of the political subdivision or the
federally recognized Indian tribe shall be present during board
deliberations and provide information that the board requests.
Before any financial assistance application is approved, the
political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking
the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is
available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from
the community economic revitalization board.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.160.200 and 1999 c 164 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The economic development account is created within the public
facilities construction loan revolving fund under RCW 43.160.080.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of RCW
43.160.010(5) and this section. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) Applications under this section for assistance from the
economic development account are subject to all of the applicable
criteria set forth under this chapter, as well as procedures and
criteria established by the board, except as otherwise provided.
(3) Eligible applicants under this section are limited to political
subdivisions of the state and federally recognized Indian tribes in
rural natural resources impact areas and rural counties.
(4) Applicants must demonstrate that their request is part of an
economic development plan consistent with applicable state planning
requirements. Applicants must demonstrate that tourism projects have
been approved by the local government or federally recognized Indian
tribe. Industrial projects must be approved by the local government
and the associate development organization, or by the federally
recognized Indian tribe.
(5) Publicly owned projects may be financed under this section upon
proof by the applicant that the public project is a necessary component
of, or constitutes in whole, a tourism project.
(6) Applications must demonstrate local match and participation.
Such match may include: Land donation, other public or private funds
or both, or other means of local commitment to the project.
(7) Board financing for project-specific environmental, capital
facilities, land use, permitting, feasibility(([,])), and marketing
studies and plans; project engineering, design, and site planning and
analysis; and project debt and revenue impact analysis shall not exceed
fifty thousand dollars per study. Board funds for these purposes may
be provided as a grant and require a match.
(8) Board financing for tourism projects shall not exceed two
hundred fifty thousand dollars. Other public facility construction
projects under this section shall not exceed one million dollars.
Loans with flexible terms and conditions to meet the needs of the
applicants shall be provided. Grants may also be authorized, but only
when, and to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given
the limited resources of the political subdivision or the federally
recognized Indian tribe.
(9) The board shall develop guidelines for allowable local match
and planning and predevelopment activities.
(10) The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to
be funded if they are critically linked to the viability of the
economic development project assisted under this section.
(11) Applications under this section need not demonstrate evidence
that specific private development or expansion is ready to occur or
will occur if funds are provided.
(12) The board shall establish guidelines for providing financial
assistance under this section to ensure that the requirements of this
chapter are complied with. The guidelines shall include:
(a) A process to equitably compare and evaluate applications from
competing communities.
(b) Criteria to ensure that approved projects will have a high
probability of success and are likely to provide long-term economic
benefits to the community. The criteria shall include: (i) A minimum
amount of local participation, determined by the board per application,
to verify community support for the project; (ii) an analysis that
establishes the project is feasible using standard economic principles;
and (iii) an explanation from the applicant regarding how the project
is consistent with the communities' economic strategy and goals.
(c) A method of evaluating the impact of the financial assistance
on the economy of the community and whether the financial assistance
achieved its purpose.

--- END ---