BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the need to
streamline governance of the transportation system in order to increase
efficiency and accountability to the people it serves. The legislature
intends to create a single point of accountability for the performance
of the state department of transportation by making management of the
department directly accountable to the governor.
The legislature also desires to further streamline governance
structures. A bipartisan, bicameral review and analysis of the current
duties and responsibilities of the transportation commission must be
conducted to determine where these functions are best carried out.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A bicameral, bipartisan review panel shall
conduct a review and analysis of the statutory duties, roles,
functions, and responsibilities of the transportation commission. The
review panel must make recommendations for the disposition of these
duties, roles, functions, and responsibilities, assuming the
transportation commission is dissolved. In making its recommendations,
the review panel must, at a minimum, consider the proper separation of
powers between the executive and legislative branches of government.
The review panel is comprised of eight legislators, with equal
representation from each house and each major political caucus. The
chairpersons and ranking minority members of the house and senate
transportation committees shall make appointments from their respective
caucuses. The review panel must complete its analysis and forward its
recommendations to the house of representatives and the senate by
December 3, 2004.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.01.041 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 53 s 28 are each
amended to read as follows:
The executive head of the department of transportation shall be the
secretary of transportation, who shall be appointed by the
((transportation commission, and)) governor. The appointment of the
secretary must be confirmed by the senate. The secretary shall be paid
a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 43.03.040. ((The secretary shall be an ex officio member of the
commission without a vote. The secretary shall be the chief executive
officer of the commission and be responsible to it, and shall be guided
by policies established by it.)) The secretary shall serve ((until
removed by the commission, but only for incapacity, incompetence,
neglect of duty, malfeasance in office, or failure to carry out the
commission's policies. Before a motion for dismissal shall be acted on
by the commission, the secretary shall be granted a hearing on formal
written charges before the full commission. An action by the
commission to remove the secretary shall be final)) at the pleasure of
the governor.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of community,
trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans affairs,
(11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary of
health, and (15) the director of financial institutions.
Such officers, except the ((secretary of transportation and the))
director of fish and wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with
the consent of the senate, and hold office at the pleasure of the
governor. ((The secretary of transportation shall be appointed by the
transportation commission as prescribed by RCW 47.01.041.)) The
director of fish and wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and
wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 47.01.051 (Commission created -- Appointment of members -- Terms -- Qualifications -- Removal) and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 5; and
(2) RCW 47.01.071 (Commission -- Functions, powers, and duties) and
1981 c 59 s 2, 1980 c 87 s 45, & 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 5 of this act takes effect October
1, 2005.

--- END ---