BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 53.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Each port district with annual property tax collections of
one million dollars or greater shall annually transfer seven percent of
its gross operating revenues, excluding revenues derived from any
property tax levy, to school districts as provided by this section.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "gross operating revenues"
has the same meaning as defined by RCW 53.12.005.
(2)(a) A school district is eligible to receive the transferred
funds as provided by this section if the school district includes
within its jurisdiction, territory that is also within the jurisdiction
of the port district.
(b) The amount of funds an eligible school district may receive
from a port district shall be proportionate and shall be determined by:
(i) The total number of school district pupils that reside within
the jurisdiction of the port district; and
(ii) The total number of school district pupils that reside within
the jurisdiction of the port district from each school district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of ecology and the
department of fish and wildlife shall, for port district property and
railway corridors as provided by section 5 of this act, delegate, to
the maximum extent consistent with federal law, all environmental
permitting authority currently exercised by these agencies, including,
but not limited to, chapters 90.48, 90.58, and 77.55 RCW, to each port
district. The department of ecology and the department of fish and
wildlife shall delegate authority by certifying port commissions to
self-permit with regard to all state environmental permits currently
issued, approved, or consulted upon by the department of ecology and
the department of fish and wildlife.
(2) As part of a port district's self-permitting process, a port
commission shall, before issuing the final permit for a project on port
district property or a railway corridor as provided by section 5 of
this act, send a draft copy of the permit to both the department of
ecology and the department of fish and wildlife for review and comment.
The departments of ecology and fish and wildlife shall limit their
comments to whether the port commission has complied with the
environmental standards the departments are otherwise required to
enforce when exercising permitting authority for projects not on port
district property or a railway corridor as provided by section 5 of
this act. The departments of ecology and fish and wildlife have thirty
days to review and comment on the draft permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Upon the certification provided for by
section 2 of this act, port districts are exempt from obtaining any
permit issued by a county, city, or town, regarding projects conducted
on port district property or a railway corridor as provided by section
5 of this act, but not limited to, any permit issued under chapter
90.58 RCW, any permit related to regulation of critical areas under
chapter 36.70A RCW, and any permit required for filling, grading,
building, or construction, or any other permit required for a project
that would otherwise be issued under a local ordinance meeting the
definition of a development regulation under chapter 35.63, 35A.63,
36.70, 36.70A, or 36.70B RCW. Nothing in this section may be construed
as discouraging full and appropriate cooperation and consultation
between port districts and local governments for projects conducted on
port district property or a railway corridor as provided by section 5
of this act.
(2) For projects subject to the provisions of chapter 43.21C RCW,
the port district shall serve as the lead entity for all review
required under chapter 43.21C RCW. Nothing in this section may be
construed as limiting the ability of local governments to participate
in the process as provided for in chapter 43.21C RCW.
(3) In addition to local government participation in the process
provided for in chapter 43.21C RCW, and as part of the self-permitting
process set forth in this chapter, the port district shall, before
issuing the final permit for a project on port district property or a
railway corridor as provided by section 5 of this act, send a draft
copy of the permit to each local government in whose jurisdiction the
project is being constructed for review and comment. Each local
government will have thirty days to review and comment on the draft
permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of ecology and the department
of fish and wildlife may conduct inspections of projects conducted on
port district property or a railway corridor as provided by section 5
of this act where a port district has issued permits under authority
delegated by the department of ecology or the department of fish and
wildlife. If an inspector from the department of ecology or the
department of fish and wildlife discovers an example of substantial
noncompliance with the environmental standards the departments are
otherwise required to enforce when exercising permitting authority for
projects not on port district property or a railway corridor as
provided by section 5 of this act, the inspector shall document that
example and issue a detailed report of that example, which shall be
transmitted to the port district that issued the permits. The port
district may issue a formal response to the report addressing whether
it believes that the port district, its tenants, or a railway company
as provided by section 5 of this act failed to substantially comply
with the environmental standards the departments are otherwise required
to enforce when exercising permitting authority for projects not on
port district property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Any port district may, at the request of
a railroad company operating a class I railroad in the state of
Washington, serve as the permitting authority for any mainline railway
infrastructure project conducted in a railway corridor.
(2) Any port district acting as a permitting authority for any
qualifying project in a railway corridor shall comply with the
requirements of sections 2 through 4 of this act that are otherwise
required for projects conducted on port district property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
Where the department of fish and wildlife has delegated hydraulic
project permit approval authority contained in this chapter to port
districts under chapter 53.-- RCW (sections 2 through 5 of this act),
port districts will be substituted for the department of fish and
wildlife in an appeal of the approval of a permit concerning a
hydraulic project that is on port district property or a railway
corridor as provided by section 5 of this act. The appeal process for
the permits issued by a port district under authority delegated by the
department of fish and wildlife will operate in the same manner as for
permits granted by the department of fish and wildlife under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to a port located business.
(2) Any person maintaining places of business both on and off port
district property which contribute to the business activity shall, for
the purpose of computing this tax exemption, apportion to this
exemption that portion of gross income which is derived from activities
rendered from the business location located on port district property.
(3) Where the apportionment cannot be accurately made by separate
accounting methods, the taxpayer shall apportion to this exemption that
proportion of total income which the cost of doing business on the port
property bears to the total cost of doing business within the state.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "port located business" means
a business whose place of business is located on property owned by a
port district and rented or leased to the business. A port located
business includes a port district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
tangible personal property or services to a port located business when
the tangible personal property or services are used exclusively at the
business's location on port owned property.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "port located business" has
the same meaning as provided in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of
tangible personal property or services by a port located business when
the tangible personal property or services are used exclusively at the
business's location on port owned property.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "port located business" has
the same meaning as provided in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to amounts received
from sales to port located businesses.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "port located business" has
the same meaning as provided in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or town may not impose a tax on amounts received by a
port located business.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "port located business" has
the same meaning as provided in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 82.29A
RCW to read as follows:
All leasehold interests in property of port districts are exempt
from tax under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The personal property of a port located business which is used
by the business exclusively at the business's location on port owned
property is exempt from taxation.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "port located business" has
the same meaning as provided in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of tangible
personal property or services used for the expansion of capacity on a
mainline rail line. A mainline rail line is a rail line that carried
more than five million gross ton-miles per mile in the prior year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of tangible
personal property or services used for the expansion of capacity on a
mainline railway.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 43.33A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The board is authorized to make direct loans from the
commingled trust fund to port districts with less than one million
dollars in annual tax receipts. In the aggregate, loans to all
eligible port districts made pursuant to this section shall not exceed
five percent of the portion of the commingled trust fund allocated by
the board to fixed income investments. No loan to a port district
under this section shall be made by the board from the commingled trust
fund at less than the market rate for a comparable investment.
(2) The pledge of a port district of any revenues, income, profits,
charges, fees, or other moneys for the repayment of a loan from the
board shall be valid and binding from the time of the adoption of any
resolution or the execution of any agreement making such pledge
notwithstanding the fact that there may not then be any simultaneous
delivery thereof, that the revenues, income, receipts, profits,
charges, fees, and other moneys so pledged shall as soon as received by
the district immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without
the physical delivery thereof and without further act, and that the
lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all
parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise
against the district irrespective of whether such parties have notice
thereof. Neither the resolutions or loan agreement or any other
instrument by which the loan is created need be recorded to be
effective.
(3) Any port district accepting a loan from the board shall agree
that, in the event of any shortfall in revenues affecting the ability
of the port district to repay the loan, the port district shall
increase the levy made under RCW 53.36.020 by an amount sufficient to
repay the loan made by the board over a period no greater than the
original duration of the loan.
(4) Loans made under this section must be made in a manner
consistent with investment or management criteria established by the
board. In making loans to port districts under this section, the
board's primary objectives are to maximize return at a prudent level of
risk, as required by RCW 43.33A.110, and to maintain the diversity of
investment as required by RCW 43.33A.140.
(5) Application for loans shall be made by eligible port districts
to the board in the form and manner as the board may prescribe.

Sec. 17 RCW 53.36.020 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 56 are each
amended to read as follows:
A district may raise revenue by levy of an annual tax not to exceed
forty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the
assessed valuation of the taxable property in such port district for
general port purposes, including the establishment of a capital
improvement fund for future capital improvements, except that any levy
for the payment of the principal and interest of the general bonded
indebtedness, or any indebtedness for a loan made to the district by
the state investment board, of the port district shall be in excess of
any levy made by the port district under the forty-five cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value limitation. The levy shall be made
and taxes collected in the manner provided for the levy and collection
of taxes in school districts of the first class.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 2 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 53 RCW.

--- END ---