BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.88.010 and 1986 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Day care service providers)) Persons and entities that provide
services to children and vulnerable adults have experienced major
problems in both the availability and affordability of liability
insurance. Premiums for such insurance policies have recently grown
((as much as five hundred percent)) and the availability of such
insurance in Washington markets has greatly diminished.
The availability of quality ((day care)) services for children and
vulnerable adults is essential to achieving such goals as increased
work force productivity, family self-sufficiency, and protection for
adults and children at risk ((due to poverty and abuse)). The
unavailability of adequate liability insurance threatens to decrease
the availability of ((day care)) essential services for children and
vulnerable adults.
This chapter is intended to remedy the problem of unavailable
liability insurance ((for day care services)) by requiring all insurers
authorized to write ((commercial or professional liability)) general
casualty insurance to be members of a joint underwriting association
created to provide liability insurance for ((day care services))
persons and entities who provide services to children and vulnerable
adults.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.88.020 and 1986 c 141 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Association" means the joint underwriting association
established ((pursuant to the provisions of)) under this chapter.
(2) (("Day care)) "Board" means the governing board of the
association.
(3) "Liability insurance" means insurance coverage against the
legal liability of the insured and against loss, damage, or expense
incident to a claim arising out of the death or injury of any person as
the result of negligence or malpractice in rendering professional
service by any licensee.
(((3))) (4) "Licensee" means any ((person)) entity or facility
((licensed to provide day care)) providing services ((pursuant to
chapter 74.15 RCW)) to adult family homes as defined in RCW
70.128.010(1) or children receiving child welfare services as defined
in RCW 74.13.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.88.030 and 1986 c 141 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner ((shall approve by July 1, 1986,)) must
appoint a board by July 1, 2004. The governing board is subject to
supervision by the commissioner. Members of the governing board may be
reimbursed by the association for actual and necessary expenses
incurred to attend meetings.
(2) The board must develop a reasonable plan ((for the
establishment of)) of operation to establish a nonprofit, joint
underwriting association for ((day care)) liability insurance, subject
to the conditions and limitations contained in this chapter.
(3) The association must offer coverage by January 1, 2005.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.88.040 and 1986 c 141 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The association shall be comprised of all insurers possessing a
certificate of authority to write and engage in writing ((property
and)) general casualty insurance within this state on a direct basis,
including the liability portion of multiperil policies, but not of
ocean marine insurance. Every such insurer shall be a member of the
association and shall remain a member as a condition of its authority
to continue to transact business in this state. However, the
commissioner may exclude an insurer or risk retention group if
participation in an association may threaten the solvency of that
insurer or risk retention group.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.88.050 and 1986 c 141 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any licensee may apply to the association to purchase ((day care))
liability insurance, and the association shall offer a policy with
reasonable liability limits ((of at least one hundred thousand dollars
per occurrence. The commissioner shall require the use of a rating
plan for day care insurance that permits rates to be modified for
individual licensees according to the type, size and past loss
experience of the licensee including any other difference among
licensees that can be demonstrated to have a probable effect upon
losses)) as determined by the commissioner based on standard insurance
industry practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An association must be funded by premiums paid by businesses
and entities insured by the association.
(a) All premiums must be deposited into a fund under the management
of the association.
(b) Premiums must be used to pay claims, administrative costs, and
other expenses of the association.
(2)(a) An association must file rates and a rating plan with the
commissioner.
(b) The rates and rating plan used by the association are subject
to approval by the commissioner.
(c) When determining whether to approve the association's rates and
rating plan, the commissioner must determine that the rates and rating
plan result in premium rates that are not excessive, inadequate, or
unfairly discriminatory. A rate is reasonable and not excessive,
inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory if it is an actuarially sound
estimate of the expected value of all future costs associated with an
individual risk transfer.
(3) In developing the rates and rating plan, the association must
give due consideration to:
(a) Past and prospective loss experience in Washington state for
experience periods acceptable to the commissioner. If data from
Washington state are not available or are not statistically credible,
the association may use loss experience from those states that are
likely to produce loss experience similar to that in Washington state;
(b) Past and prospective operating expenses;
(c) Past and prospective investment income;
(d) Whether an experience rating plan is appropriate for the class
or type of risk to be insured by the association; and
(e) All other relevant factors within and outside Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 48.88 RCW
to read as follows:
The commissioner may select one or more insurers to manage the
operations of the association established under this chapter. Every
managing insurer must be admitted to transact the business of insurance
in the state of Washington.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.88.070 and 1986 c 141 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commissioner may adopt all rules necessary to ensure the
efficient, equitable operation of the association, including but not
limited to, rules requiring or limiting certain policy provisions or
requiring development and implementation of risk management programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 48.88 RCW
to read as follows:
The association is not a member of the guaranty fund created under
chapter 48.32 RCW. The guaranty fund, this state, and any political
subdivisions are not responsible for the losses sustained by the
association.

--- END ---