BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be cited as the truth in
describing sex education act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that section 912 of
the welfare reform act of 1996 amends Title V of the social security
act, that Washington state receives funding from Title V welfare, that
section 510 defines abstinence education, and that entities promoting
or teaching abstinence education must verify compliance as required by
federal law. The legislature further finds that school districts and
their community committee members are free to determine the type and
content of sex education programs used in their district. The
legislature intends by this act to help parents clearly identify the
type of education being taught, assist community committee members in
selecting the best materials to comply with school district policy, and
support teachers in complying with their school district policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 School districts shall determine the type
and content of their abstinence education or comprehensive sex
education curriculum in accordance with the following:
(1) "Abstinence education" means an educational or motivational
program that:
(a) Has as its exclusive purpose, teaching the social,
psychological, and health gains realized by abstaining from sexual
activity;
(b) Teaches abstinence from sexual activity outside marriage as the
expected standard for all school age children;
(c) Teaches that abstinence from sexual activity is the only
certain way to avoid out-of-wedlock pregnancy, sexually transmitted
diseases, and other associated health problems;
(d) Teaches that a mutually faithful monogamous relationship in
context of marriage is the expected standard of human sexual activity;
(e) Teaches that sexual activity outside of the context of marriage
is likely to have harmful psychological and physical effects;
(f) Teaches that bearing children out-of-wedlock is likely to have
harmful consequences for the child, the child's parents, and society;
(g) Teaches young people how to reject sexual advances and how
alcohol and drug use increase vulnerability to sexual advances; and
(h) Teaches the importance of attaining self-sufficiency before
engaging in sexual activity.
(2) "Comprehensive sex education" means any program for K-12
students that describes sexual behaviors not included in the definition
of abstinence education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 District committees and/or school boards
will review their sex education program in accordance with the cycle of
curriculum review provided by school district policy. A district must
refer to programs dealing with sexuality as either abstinence education
or comprehensive sex education in all communications to parents and
within the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If a district cannot decide on the
definition for their program, the district shall inform the joint
committee referred to in RCW 74.12.410(5)(b) which shall appoint a
review committee of ten volunteers to review all materials and
determine whether the program is abstinence education or comprehensive
sex education. Five members of the review committee must be familiar
with and have experience with abstinence education, and five members
must be familiar with and have experience with comprehensive sex
education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 28A.230 RCW.

--- END ---