BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 9.02.100 provides that every woman has
the fundamental right to choose or refuse to have an abortion. The
legislature finds that the right to refuse to have an abortion should
receive more emphasis in state law. The legislature intends by this
act to ensure that the right of a woman to refuse to have an abortion
and to continue her pregnancy are given equal emphasis in state law.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.02.110 and 1992 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
The state may not deny or interfere with a woman's right to choose
or refuse to have an abortion prior to viability of the fetus, or to
protect her life or health.
A physician may terminate and a health care provider may assist a
physician in terminating a pregnancy as permitted by this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.02.140 and 1992 c 1 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
Any regulation promulgated by the state relating to abortion shall
be valid only if:
(1) The regulation is medically necessary to protect the life or
health of the woman terminating her pregnancy,
(2) The regulation is consistent with established medical practice,
and
(3) Of the available alternatives, the regulation imposes the least
restrictions on the woman's right to have or to not have an abortion as
defined by RCW 9.02.100 through 9.02.170 and 9.02.900 through 9.02.902.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.02.160 and 1992 c 1 s 7 are each amended to read as
follows:
If the state provides, directly or by contract, maternity care
benefits, services, or information to women through any program
administered or funded in whole or in part by the state, the state
shall also provide women otherwise eligible for any such program with
substantially equivalent benefits, services, or information to permit
them to voluntarily terminate or continue their pregnancies.

--- END ---