BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the requirements specified in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section, the department shall release the following from
liability for industrial insurance premiums:
(a) Public entities to the extent they are liable for premiums
under RCW 51.12.050; and
(b) Persons, firms, and corporations to the extent they are liable
for premiums under RCW 51.12.070.
(2) A public agency, person, firm, or corporation that wishes to be
released from liability for industrial insurance premiums under
subsection (1) of this section must submit the following information to
the department on a form prescribed by the department:
(a) The name and address of the contractor engaged to perform the
work;
(b) The contractor's unified business identifier account number;
(c) The name of the project;
(d) The contract number for the project;
(e) The location of the project;
(f) A description of the work;
(g) The amount of the contract;
(h) The dates when work was started and completed;
(i) The total number of worker hours anticipated by the contractor
and any subcontractors required to perform the work; and
(j) Any subcontractors, including their names and addresses,
unified business identifier account numbers, locations of their
projects, descriptions of their work, amounts of their contracts, and
dates when work was started and completed.
(3) Before releasing a public agency, person, firm, or corporation
from liability for industrial insurance premiums, the department must
determine that: (a) The proper risk classification was assigned for
the work performed under the contract; and (b) the industrial insurance
premiums due for work performed under the contract have been paid.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---