BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.100 and 1997 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon all roadways of sufficient width a vehicle shall be driven
upon the right half of the roadway, except as follows:
(a) When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the
same direction under the rules governing such movement;
(b) When an obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the
left of the center of the highway; provided, any person so doing shall
yield the right of way to all vehicles traveling in the proper
direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within such
distance as to constitute an immediate hazard;
(c) Upon a roadway divided into three marked lanes and providing
for two-way movement traffic under the rules applicable thereon; or
(d) Upon a street or highway restricted to one-way traffic.
(2) Upon all roadways having two or more lanes for traffic moving
in the same direction, all vehicles shall be driven in the right-hand
lane then available for traffic, except (a) when overtaking and passing
another vehicle proceeding in the same direction, (b) when traveling at
a speed greater than the traffic flow, (c) when moving left to allow
traffic to merge, ((or)) (d) when preparing for a left turn at an
intersection, exit, or into a private road or driveway when such left
turn is legally permitted, or (e) under conditions permitted in section
2 of this act. On any such roadway, a vehicle or combination over ten
thousand pounds shall be driven only in the right-hand lane except
under the conditions enumerated in (a) through (((d))) (e) of this
subsection.
(3) No vehicle towing a trailer or no vehicle or combination over
ten thousand pounds may be driven in the left-hand lane of a limited
access roadway having three or more lanes for traffic moving in one
direction except when preparing for a left turn at an intersection,
exit, or into a private road or driveway when a left turn is legally
permitted. This subsection does not apply to a vehicle using a high-occupancy vehicle lane. A high-occupancy vehicle lane is not
considered the left-hand lane of a roadway. The department of
transportation, in consultation with the Washington state patrol, shall
adopt rules specifying (a) those circumstances where it is permissible
for other vehicles to use the left lane in case of emergency or to
facilitate the orderly flow of traffic, and (b) those segments of
limited access roadway to be exempt from this subsection due to the
operational characteristics of the roadway.
(4) It is a traffic infraction to drive continuously in the left
lane of a multilane roadway when it impedes the flow of other traffic.
(5) Upon any roadway having four or more lanes for moving traffic
and providing for two-way movement of traffic, a vehicle shall not be
driven to the left of the center line of the roadway except when
authorized by official traffic control devices designating certain
lanes to the left side of the center of the roadway for use by traffic
not otherwise permitted to use such lanes, or except as permitted under
subsection (1)(b) of this section. However, this subsection shall not
be construed as prohibiting the crossing of the center line in making
a left turn into or from an alley, private road or driveway.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of transportation, in consultation with the
Washington state patrol, shall adopt rules for dividing vehicular
traffic over Snoqualmie Pass during winter driving conditions or other
hazardous driving conditions. The paramount guideline in establishing
the rules is to provide for the highest level of safety and safe
driving conditions for drivers and passengers. Furthermore, the
department shall incorporate the following guidelines:
(1) A vehicle towing a trailer or a vehicle or combination over ten
thousand pounds may be driven only in the right-hand lane, except to
pass. All other vehicles are to keep left;
(2) The department must notify the traveling public that the rules
are in effect with the use of existing variable message signs and the
traffic advisory radio message system;
(3) This section only applies to Interstate 90;
(4) Implementation of divided vehicular traffic may not be
implemented when only two or fewer lanes of traffic are operational for
the direction of traffic on the section affected.

--- END ---