BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that trust
beneficiaries, rural communities, and sustainable forest harvest
management may benefit if wood produced on state-owned forests can be
certified as sustainable and marketed as such. It is the intent of
this legislation to provide the legislature, the board of natural
resources, and other interested parties with the information that will
allow for an informed decision on this policy question prior to the
final adoption of a sustainable harvest calculation by the board of
natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of natural resources
shall prepare a report for the legislature and the board of natural
resources that identifies:
(a) What changes to the current state forest management practices,
including the provisions of any applicable habitat conservation plans,
need to be implemented for state-managed forests to achieve third-party
sustainable forestry certification under the standards of major
sustainable forestry certification organizations;
(b) What added changes in operational costs would be associated
with the changes in management practices necessary to achieve
certifications;
(c) Whether and how the preferred sustainable harvest level
alternative identified by the board of natural resources would satisfy
the state's responsibilities under any applicable habitat conservation
plans; and
(d) How the preferred sustainable harvest level calculation
identified by the board of natural resources increases or decreases the
cost of compliance with the standards of major sustainable forestry
certification organizations.
(2) The department of natural resources shall complete its report
and submit it to the board of natural resources and the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature no later than September 14,
2004. The department shall include in its report sufficient detail on
its calculations to facilitate the review and comment process
established in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The department of natural resources shall make copies of the
report available to any interested party who wishes to review and
comment on the report. Comments should be addressed to the chairs of
the appropriate standing committees of the legislature.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.10.320 and 2003 c 334 s 538 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall manage the state-owned lands under its
jurisdiction which are primarily valuable for the purpose of growing
forest crops on a sustained yield basis insofar as compatible with
other statutory directives. To this end, the department shall
periodically adjust the acreages designated for inclusion in the
sustained yield management program and calculate a sustainable harvest
level.
(2) For the final sustainable harvest level intended to be adopted
by the board during calendar year 2004, the board may identify a single
preferred harvest level alternative, and may only adopt a sustainable
harvest level after:
(a) The report required in section 2 of this act has been produced
and delivered to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature;
(b) A legislative review of the report has been conducted by the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature; and
(c) At least one hearing has been held by the board of natural
resources on the findings in the report and the results of the
legislative review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires July 1, 2005.

--- END ---