BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of social and health services, in cooperation with
the state congressional delegation, shall actively seek waivers of
federal requirements and such modifications of federal regulations as
are necessary to allow federal medicaid reimbursement for ongoing
supported employment services for persons with mental illness.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.24.035 and 2001 c 334 s 7 and 2001 c 323 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department is designated as the state mental health
authority.
(2) The secretary shall provide for public, client, and licensed
service provider participation in developing the state mental health
program, developing contracts with regional support networks, and any
waiver request to the federal government under medicaid.
(3) The secretary shall provide for participation in developing the
state mental health program for children and other underserved
populations, by including representatives on any committee established
to provide oversight to the state mental health program.
(4) The secretary shall be designated as the county authority if a
county fails to meet state minimum standards or refuses to exercise
responsibilities under RCW 71.24.045.
(5) The secretary shall:
(a) Develop a biennial state mental health program that
incorporates county biennial needs assessments and county mental health
service plans and state services for mentally ill adults and children.
The secretary may also develop a six-year state mental health plan;
(b) Assure that any regional or county community mental health
program provides access to treatment for the county's residents in the
following order of priority: (i) The acutely mentally ill; (ii)
chronically mentally ill adults and severely emotionally disturbed
children; and (iii) the seriously disturbed. Such programs shall
provide:
(A) Outpatient services;
(B) Emergency care services for twenty-four hours per day;
(C) Day treatment for mentally ill persons which includes training
in basic living and social skills, supported work, vocational
rehabilitation, and day activities. Such services may include
therapeutic treatment. In the case of a child, day treatment includes
age-appropriate basic living and social skills, educational and
prevocational services, day activities, and therapeutic treatment;
(D) Screening for patients being considered for admission to state
mental health facilities to determine the appropriateness of admission;
(E) Employment services, which ((may)) shall include supported
employment, transitional work, placement in competitive employment, and
other work-related services, that result in mentally ill persons
becoming engaged in meaningful and gainful full or part-time work.
Supported employment services shall provide ongoing support to persons
with mental illness who have become employed. Other sources of funding
such as the division of vocational rehabilitation may be utilized by
the secretary to maximize federal funding and provide for integration
of services;
(F) Consultation and education services; and
(G) Community support services;
(c) Develop and adopt rules establishing state minimum standards
for the delivery of mental health services pursuant to RCW 71.24.037
including, but not limited to:
(i) Licensed service providers. The secretary shall provide for
deeming of compliance with state minimum standards for those entities
accredited by recognized behavioral health accrediting bodies
recognized and having a current agreement with the department;
(ii) Regional support networks; and
(iii) Inpatient services, evaluation and treatment services and
facilities under chapter 71.05 RCW, resource management services, and
community support services;
(d) Assure that the special needs of minorities, the elderly,
disabled, children, and low-income persons are met within the
priorities established in this section;
(e) Establish a standard contract or contracts, consistent with
state minimum standards, which shall be used in contracting with
regional support networks or counties. The standard contract shall
include a maximum fund balance, which shall not exceed ten percent;
(f) Establish, to the extent possible, a standardized auditing
procedure which minimizes paperwork requirements of county authorities
and licensed service providers. The audit procedure shall focus on the
outcomes of service and not the processes for accomplishing them;
(g) Develop and maintain an information system to be used by the
state, counties, and regional support networks that includes a tracking
method which allows the department and regional support networks to
identify mental health clients' participation in any mental health
service or public program on an immediate basis. The information
system shall not include individual patient's case history files.
Confidentiality of client information and records shall be maintained
as provided in this chapter and in RCW 71.05.390, 71.05.400, 71.05.410,
71.05.420, 71.05.430, and 71.05.440((. The design of the system and
the data elements to be collected shall be reviewed by the work group
appointed by the secretary under section 5(1) of this act and
representing the department, regional support networks, service
providers, consumers, and advocates. The data elements shall be
designed to provide information that is needed to measure performance
and achieve the service outcomes identified in section 5 of this act));
(h) License service providers who meet state minimum standards;
(i) Certify regional support networks that meet state minimum
standards;
(j) Periodically monitor the compliance of certified regional
support networks and their network of licensed service providers for
compliance with the contract between the department, the regional
support network, and federal and state rules at reasonable times and in
a reasonable manner;
(k) Fix fees to be paid by evaluation and treatment centers to the
secretary for the required inspections;
(l) Monitor and audit counties, regional support networks, and
licensed service providers as needed to assure compliance with
contractual agreements authorized by this chapter; and
(m) Adopt such rules as are necessary to implement the department's
responsibilities under this chapter.
(6) The secretary shall use available resources only for regional
support networks.
(7) Each certified regional support network and licensed service
provider shall file with the secretary, on request, such data,
statistics, schedules, and information as the secretary reasonably
requires. A certified regional support network or licensed service
provider which, without good cause, fails to furnish any data,
statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent
reports thereof, may have its certification or license revoked or
suspended.
(8) The secretary may suspend, revoke, limit, or restrict a
certification or license, or refuse to grant a certification or license
for failure to conform to: (a) The law; (b) applicable rules and
regulations; (c) applicable standards; or (d) state minimum standards.
(9) The superior court may restrain any regional support network or
service provider from operating without certification or a license or
any other violation of this section. The court may also review,
pursuant to procedures contained in chapter 34.05 RCW, any denial,
suspension, limitation, restriction, or revocation of certification or
license, and grant other relief required to enforce the provisions of
this chapter.
(10) Upon petition by the secretary, and after hearing held upon
reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a
warrant to an officer or employee of the secretary authorizing him or
her to enter at reasonable times, and examine the records, books, and
accounts of any regional support network or service provider refusing
to consent to inspection or examination by the authority.
(11) Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy,
the secretary may file an action for an injunction or other process
against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the
establishment, conduct, or operation of a regional support network or
service provider without certification or a license under this chapter.
(12) The standards for certification of evaluation and treatment
facilities shall include standards relating to maintenance of good
physical and mental health and other services to be afforded persons
pursuant to this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW, and shall
otherwise assure the effectuation of the purposes of these chapters.
(13)(a) The department, in consultation with affected parties,
shall establish a distribution formula that reflects county needs
assessments based on the number of persons who are acutely mentally
ill, chronically mentally ill, severely emotionally disturbed children,
and seriously disturbed. The formula shall take into consideration the
impact on counties of demographic factors in counties which result in
concentrations of priority populations as set forth in subsection
(5)(b) of this section. These factors shall include the population
concentrations resulting from commitments under chapters 71.05 and
71.34 RCW to state psychiatric hospitals, as well as concentration in
urban areas, at border crossings at state boundaries, and other
significant demographic and workload factors.
(b) The formula shall also include a projection of the funding
allocations that will result for each county, which specifies
allocations according to priority populations, including the allocation
for services to children and other underserved populations.
(c) After July 1, 2003, the department may allocate up to two
percent of total funds to be distributed to the regional support
networks for incentive payments to reward the achievement of superior
outcomes, or significantly improved outcomes, as measured by a
statewide performance measurement system consistent with the framework
recommended in the joint legislative audit and review committee's
performance audit of the mental health system. The department shall
annually report to the legislature on its criteria and allocation of
the incentives provided under this subsection.
(14) The secretary shall assume all duties assigned to the
nonparticipating counties under chapters 71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW.
Such responsibilities shall include those which would have been
assigned to the nonparticipating counties under regional support
networks.
The regional support networks, or the secretary's assumption of all
responsibilities under chapters 71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW, shall be
included in all state and federal plans affecting the state mental
health program including at least those required by this chapter, the
medicaid program, and P.L. 99-660. Nothing in these plans shall be
inconsistent with the intent and requirements of this chapter.
(15) The secretary shall:
(a) Disburse funds for the regional support networks within sixty
days of approval of the biennial contract. The department must either
approve or reject the biennial contract within sixty days of receipt.
(b) Enter into biennial contracts with regional support networks.
The contracts shall be consistent with available resources. No
contract shall be approved that does not include progress toward
meeting the goals of this chapter by taking responsibility for: (i)
Short-term commitments; (ii) residential care; and (iii) emergency
response systems.
(c) Allocate one hundred percent of available resources to the
regional support networks in accordance with subsection (13) of this
section. Incentive payments authorized under subsection (13) of this
section may be allocated separately from other available resources.
(d) Notify regional support networks of their allocation of
available resources at least sixty days prior to the start of a new
biennial contract period.
(e) Deny funding allocations to regional support networks based
solely upon formal findings of noncompliance with the terms of the
regional support network's contract with the department. Written
notice and at least thirty days for corrective action must precede any
such action. In such cases, regional support networks shall have full
rights to appeal under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(16) The department, in cooperation with the state congressional
delegation, shall actively seek waivers of federal requirements and
such modifications of federal regulations as are necessary to allow
federal medicaid reimbursement for services provided by free-standing
evaluation and treatment facilities certified under chapter 71.05 RCW.
The department shall periodically report its efforts to the appropriate
committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---