BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that empowering mental
health consumers by allowing them to direct and pay for their care will
improve the delivery of mental health services. The creation of a
voucher-based system of care will reduce administrative expenses and
increase funding available for direct care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a system of serving mental
health consumers based on a voucher system. After being determined
eligible for services under this chapter, a consumer shall be provided
a voucher that may be used to purchase mental health services from
qualified providers. Vouchers may be redeemed through qualified
community-based case managers, designated by the department.
(2) The department shall provide for statewide access to crisis
services, housing services, and ombudsman services.
(3) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---