BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the use of
renewable energy resources generated from local sources such as solar
and wind power benefit our state by reducing the load on the state's
electric energy grid, by providing nonpolluting sources of electricity
generation, and by the creation of jobs for local industries that
develop and sell renewable energy products and technologies.
The legislature finds that Washington state has become a national
and international leader in the technologies related to the solar
electric markets. The state can support these industries by providing
incentives for the purchase of locally made renewable energy products.
Locally made renewable technologies benefit and protect the state's
environment. The legislature also finds that the state's economy can
be enhanced through the creation of incentives to develop additional
renewable energy industries in the state.
The legislature intends to provide incentives for the greater use
of locally created renewable energy technologies, support and retain
existing local industries, and create new opportunities for renewable
energy industries to develop in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Customer-generated electricity" means the electricity that is
generated from a renewable energy system located on an individual's,
businesses', or local government's real property and is measured by a
utility-grade meter. A system located on a leasehold interest does not
qualify under this definition. "Customer-generated electricity" does
not include electricity generated by a light and power business or a
gas distribution business.
(2) "Gas distribution business" has the same meaning as described
in RCW 82.16.010.
(3) "Utility-grade meter" means an electric meter that meets the
accuracy and quality standards set by the climate and rural energy
development center at Washington State University.
(4) "Light and power business" has the same meaning as described in
RCW 82.16.010.
(5) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(6) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system or a wind
generator used for producing electricity.
(7) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(8) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert direct
current to alternating current in a photovoltaic cell system.
(9) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The renewable energy incentive account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) Until June 30, 2013, one and three-quarters percent of the
money collected under RCW 82.16.020(1), on light and power businesses
and gas distribution businesses, shall be deposited into the account
created in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Only the director of the department of revenue or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
(4) The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(5) Expenditures from the account may not exceed the balance in the
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Any individual, business, or local
governmental entity, not in the light and power business or in the gas
distribution business, may apply to the department of revenue, on an
annual basis, for an investment cost recovery incentive for each
kilowatt-hour from a customer-generated electricity renewable energy
system installed on its property. To qualify for the incentive the
individual, business, or local governmental entity shall: (a) Install
the renewable energy system using a licensed and bonded contractor
employing certified electricians in accordance with chapter 19.28 RCW
unless exempt under RCW 19.28.261; (b) install the renewable energy
system according to the National Electrical Code; and (c) obtain an
electrical permit and inspection from the electrical code authority
having jurisdiction for the construction and operation of the renewable
energy system.
(2) The application for the incentive shall be on a form prepared
by the department of revenue. The applicant shall submit a
certification, in a form approved by the department of revenue, from
any in-state manufacturer of any inverter, solar module, or wind
generator used by the applicant, verifying the applicant's use of in-state qualifying equipment. In-state manufacture of solar inverters,
solar modules, and wind generators shall be authenticated by the
climate and rural energy development center at Washington State
University. This shall be done each year in which this legislation is
in effect. The application shall include a statement verifying
electrical production issued by the climate and rural energy
development center at Washington State University. The application
shall include verification of the requirements of subsection (1)(a),
(b), and (c) of this section.
(3) The investment cost recovery incentive shall be paid at the
following rate unless requests exceed the amount contained in the
renewable energy incentive fund:
(a) Up to forty-eight cents per kilowatt-hour for systems with
solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in Washington state;
(b) Up to twenty-five cents per kilowatt-hour for systems using
wind generators manufactured in Washington state;
(c) Up to thirty-seven cents per kilowatt-hour for systems that use
a solar inverter or solar module manufactured in Washington state; or
(d) Up to twenty-five cents per kilowatt-hour for systems using
solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington state.
(4) No individual, household, business, or local governmental
entity is eligible for an incentive payment that exceeds four thousand
five hundred dollars per year.
(5) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive exceed
the amount of funds available in the renewable energy incentive
account, the incentive amounts will be reduced proportionately.
(6) The climate and rural energy development center at Washington
State University energy program shall be reimbursed by the department
of revenue five percent of annual funds allocated to the fund, to apply
toward the administrative and educational expenses related to this
program. The center will establish guidelines and standards for
technologies that are identified as Washington manufactured and
therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(7) The department of revenue shall retain one percent of each
incentive payment to apply toward the administrative expenses related
to this program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This chapter expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

--- END ---