BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds:
(a) Childhood obesity has reached epidemic levels. Nearly fifteen
percent of youth are overweight;
(b) Overweight and obese children are at higher risk for developing
severe and costly long-term health problems, including but not limited
to, type 2 diabetes, cardiovascular disease, high blood pressure, and
asthma. Seventy percent of overweight adolescents become overweight
adults;
(c) Overweight youth also are often affected by discrimination,
psychological stress, low self-esteem, and depression;
(d) Poor diet negatively affects the ability to learn and decreases
motivation and attentiveness. In addition, poor diet contributes to
poor oral health which also negatively affects school performance;
(e) Obesity-related illness costs our United States health care
system close to seventy-five billion dollars a year;
(f) There are many factors that contribute to childhood obesity,
including increased access to high-calorie, high-fat foods and
sugar-sweetened beverages; increased portion sizes; decreased
opportunities for physical activity; and aggressive marketing by the
food industry;
(g) Schools play a highly influential role in the formation of
children's eating and physical activity habits;
(h) Schools providing nonnutritious food and beverages in vending
machines, school stores, a la carte lines, and as fundraisers are
contributing to the problem of childhood obesity and are sending a
message to youth that good nutrition is not important to their health
or education.
(2) While the United States department of agriculture requires that
meals sold in schools as part of the national school lunch and school
breakfast programs be consistent with the dietary guidelines for
Americans, limited effective standards are in place to regulate
competitive foods, which are often high in calories, fat, sodium, and
added sugars. However, the United States department of agriculture
does call for states and local entities to add restrictions on
competitive foods, as necessary. Schools are encouraged to develop
policies to encourage children to purchase and consume healthful food
and beverages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.235
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In elementary and middle/junior high schools:
(a) Any food sold in competition with the federally funded school
meal programs, must meet the following standards:
(i) No more than thirty percent of its total calories are from fat,
unless the food is nuts or seeds;
(ii) No more than ten percent of its total calories are from
saturated fat;
(iii) No more than thirty-five percent of its total weight is
composed of sugar, unless the food is unsweetened fruit and/or
vegetables;
(b) During regular school hours, and during federally funded school
meal programs, water, nonfat or low-fat plain or flavored milk, nonfat
or low-fat plain or flavored soy milk or rice milk, and one hundred
percent fruit juices that have no added sweeteners are the only
beverages that may be sold to pupils. Beverages that contain more than
ten milligrams of caffeine per serving are prohibited. Serving sizes
may not exceed twelve ounces.
(c) No foods defined by the United States department of agriculture
as foods of minimal nutrition value may be served on school campuses
during regular school hours.
(2) This section does not apply to holiday events, special
celebrations, or class parties for which food and beverages are brought
into the school.
(3) Teachers are encouraged not to use food as a reward or
incentive for student behavior or academic performance.
(4) Beginning September 1, 2004, the office of superintendent of
public instruction shall review and test compliance with this section
as required by federal law. If a district is found not in compliance,
it must submit a corrective plan to the office of superintendent of
public instruction and implement the plan within six months from the
finding of noncompliance.

--- END ---