BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that on January 8,
2002, President George Bush signed the no child left behind act of
2001, reauthorizing and amending federal education programs established
under the elementary and secondary education act of 1965. The
legislature further finds that the major focus of the no child left
behind act is to provide all children with a fair, equal, and
significant opportunity to obtain a high-quality education. In
response to the no child left behind legislation, Washington has
developed a single statewide accountability system that is required to
ensure that: All K-12 public school students are included in the state
assessment system; at least ninety-five percent of the students
enrolled in the tested grades are assessed; all student groups reach
the state's proficiency level in reading and mathematics by 2013-14;
schools and districts that do not meet the state's adequate yearly
progress requirements are identified as needing improvement.
The legislature finds that in 2003 over one-third of school
districts in Washington did not make adequate yearly progress and more
dramatically, the state, itself, did not meet its adequate yearly
progress goal overall. The legislature finds that failure to meet this
goal was most apparent with students from the historically marginalized
groups such as African-American, American Indian/Alaskan Native,
Hispanic-American, special education, English language learners, and
low socio-economic status.
The legislature further finds that the office of the superintendent
of public instruction's comprehensive research entitled, Addressing the
Achievement Gap: A Challenge for Washington State Educators (November,
2002) concludes that, low-income and minority students encounter fewer
opportunities to learn, inadequate instruction and support, and lower
expectations from their schools and teachers. Research has also
pointed out that schools are more reflective of white, middle-class
society. This can lead to a disconnect between students who come from
different cultures and family conditions and the traditional school
structure and expectations.
The legislature recognizes that the multiethnic think tank, brought
together by the superintendent of public instruction under the unity
project, identifies five contributing factors to inequitable education:
The existing euro-centric paradigm; the cultural biases of the testing
instruments; the socio-economic disparities; postsecondary education
and work force ramifications; and insufficient data collection and
reporting.
The legislature also recognizes that the national association of
state boards of education reports that: Disproportionate numbers of
students of color are placed in special education and other lower-track
programs; students of color get a lower-level curriculum; most students
do not get a full curriculum that presents a complete picture of
diverse contributions to the American way of life; diverse learning
styles are not addressed in many schools; and schools do not encourage
students to engage in cultural inquiry based on shared values.
The legislature acknowledges that the Washington state school
directors association reports that: Serious attention must be given to
creating learning environments that are intolerant of racism and
exclusion and in which high expectations are held for all students;
curriculum and teaching practices must recognize differences in
ethnicity, language, and culture and teachers must be skilled in
teaching students unlike themselves; and in order to close the
achievement gap, there must be understanding of the impact of language,
culture, race, and poverty on student achievement.
The legislature finds that the social, economic, and psychological
fallout from failure to meet adequate yearly progress threatens all
levels of our society and its stability. The legislature intends to
transform systems to enable the state and school districts to meet
adequate yearly progress, particularly with historically marginalized
students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall convene a work
group to:
(a) Review, evaluate, and recommend refinements to the essential
academic learning requirements and grade level expectations for
learning goals one through four in RCW 28A.150.210 to ensure that the
requirements and expectations respect and value the diversity among all
people, and that all students learn to effectively live and communicate
with diverse people in cross-culturally appropriate ways;
(b) Make recommendations on whether a new learning goal is
necessary to ensure that all students are able to understand, accept,
and demonstrate the value of various cultures and heritages; become
responsible and respectful citizens in multicultural settings; and use
their cultural knowledge as a foundation to achieve personal and
academic success;
(c) Advise the superintendent on the types of assessments or other
strategies that have been found to be valid and reliable with persons
of different learning styles based on race, culture, gender, and
disability and that should be used to determine student achievement of
any new or revised learning goals that may be developed as a result of
the work group's recommendations;
(d) Make recommendations on the minimum number of students that
should be included in a subgroup for which scores are separately
reported for state purposes;
(e) Make recommendations on a set of effective strategies and best
practices that districts may use to eliminate the achievement gap among
children in subgroups for which scores are separately reported under
the no child left behind act of 2001. The superintendent of public
instruction shall post on the agency's web site, information on the
strategies and best practices identified by the work group;
(f) Make recommendations on ways to ensure that teacher preparation
programs and professional development opportunities provide new and
experienced teachers with the knowledge and skill to work effectively
and respectfully with students with diverse learning styles based on
the students' race, culture, gender, and disability;
(g) Make recommendations on effective strategies to recruit and
retain teachers from racial and ethnic minorities; and
(h) Report their findings and recommendations on (a) through (g) of
this subsection to the governor, the legislative education committees,
the superintendent's multiethnic think tank, the academic achievement
and accountability commission, the professional educator standards
board, and the state board of education by October 5, 2006.
(2) The work group shall include, but need not be limited to:
Educators, including educators who work primarily with children in one
or more of the subgroups for which scores are separately reported under
the no child left behind act of 2001; members of the superintendent's
multiethnic think tank; parents of children who are in each of the
subgroups for which scores are separately reported under the no child
left behind act of 2001; principals; administrators; school directors;
and members of organizations representing employees and employers. The
work group shall proportionately reflect the subgroups that are not
meeting the requirements for adequate yearly progress under federal
law.
(3) During its deliberations, the work group shall consult widely
with organizations and agencies concerned with the educational
achievement of children in each of the subgroups for which scores are
separately reported under the no child left behind act of 2001, the
Washington state commissions on African-American affairs, Asian Pacific
American affairs, and Hispanic affairs, the multiethnic think tank, the
Washington association of multicultural education, the first peoples'
language/culture committee, and other interested parties.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.070 and 1999 c 388 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall identify the
knowledge and skills all public school students need to know and be
able to do based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210,
develop student assessments, and implement the accountability
recommendations and requests regarding assistance, rewards, and
recognition of the academic achievement and accountability commission.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
educators, parents, and others, including persons concerned with the
educational achievement of children in each of the subgroups for which
scores are separately reported under the no child left behind act of
2001, shall periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four
and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential
academic learning requirements.
(3) In consultation with the academic achievement and
accountability commission, educators, parents, and others, including
persons concerned with the educational achievement of children in each
of the subgroups for which scores are separately reported under the no
child left behind act of 2001, the superintendent of public instruction
shall maintain and continue to develop and revise a statewide academic
assessment system for use in the elementary, middle, and high school
years designed to determine if each student has mastered the essential
academic learning requirements identified in subsection (1) of this
section. The academic assessment system shall include a variety of
assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
(4) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(5) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(6) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(7) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(8) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the unique
needs of special education students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(9) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the unique
needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments under
this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.655.090 and 1999 c 388 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By September 10, 1998, and by September 10th each year
thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall report to
schools, school districts, and the legislature on the results of the
Washington assessment of student learning and state-mandated norm-referenced standardized tests.
(2) The reports shall include the assessment results by school and
school district, and include changes over time. For the Washington
assessment of student learning, results shall be reported as follows:
(a) The percentage of students meeting the standards, including
students as a whole, and students by subgroups as required under the no
child left behind act of 2001;
(b) The percentage of students performing at each level of the
assessment; and
(c) A learning improvement index that shows changes in student
performance within the different levels of student learning reported on
the Washington assessment of student learning.
(3) The reports shall contain data regarding the different
characteristics of schools, such as poverty levels, percent of English
as a second language students, dropout rates, attendance, percent of
students in special education, and student mobility so that districts
and schools can learn from the improvement efforts of other schools and
districts with similar characteristics.
(4) The reports shall contain student scores on mandated tests by
comparable Washington schools of similar characteristics.
(5) The reports shall contain information on public school choice
options available to students, including vocational education.
(6) The reports shall be posted on the superintendent of public
instruction's internet web site.
(7) To protect the privacy of students, the results of schools and
districts that test fewer than ten students in a grade level shall not
be reported. In addition, in order to ensure that results are reported
accurately, the superintendent of public instruction shall maintain the
confidentiality of statewide data files until the superintendent
determines that the data are complete and accurate.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor the
percentage and number of special education and limited English-proficient students exempted from taking the assessments by schools and
school districts to ensure the exemptions are in compliance with
exemption guidelines.

--- END ---