BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that schools are
increasingly required to play an expanding role in protecting our
children's health. Schools are responsible for monitoring the
immunization of children, evaluating children's hearing and vision, and
screening for scoliosis. Chronically ill children often require
medically ordered treatment to enable them to attend school.
Medication is often required to be given to children during the school
day. Schools are also responsible for identifying and reporting child
abuse, identifying drug and alcohol problems, treating emergencies,
providing counseling and assistance for teenage parents, and providing
AIDS, human growth and development, and personal safety education.
Schools are asked to coordinate with families and community services to
manage students with significant health problems and to make referrals
to appropriate community services. Schools are required to abide by
rules of confidentiality and to properly maintain health care records.
The legislature finds that additional school nurses with the
appropriate expertise are needed in our schools to play a pivotal role
in improving the health and educational success of the school-age
child.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2005-06 school year, each class I school
district shall maintain a ratio of at least one school nurse for every
two thousand full-time equivalent students. Beginning in the 2007-08
school year, each class I school district shall maintain a ratio of at
least one school nurse for every one thousand five hundred full-time
equivalent students.
(2) The state board of education shall adopt rules providing for
the initial and continuing certification for certified school nurses.
(a) All school nurses in class I school districts must apply for
certification within one year after the effective date of this section.
(b) A class II school district may continue to hire persons who
meet the requirements of RCW 28A.210.300 and are not required to be
certified under this section.
(3) As used in this section, "school nurse" means a person who:
(a) Holds a bachelor of science degree in nursing, including
training in public health nursing;
(b) Holds a valid license as a registered nurse (RN) in Washington
state; and
(c) Is certified as an educational staff associate under the
requirements established by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By December 31, 2007, the superintendent of
public instruction shall submit a report to the legislature on the
implementation of section 2 of this act and the impact of the services
provided. The report shall include recommendations about whether
funding for school nurses should be an ongoing responsibility of the
state and part of basic education. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction has the authority to write rules necessary to
implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of . . . . . ., or as much thereof
as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2005, from the general fund to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The school nurse account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from gifts, grants, or
endowments obtained under section 6 of this act must be deposited into
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
supporting the ratio provided in section 2 of this act. Only the
superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or
private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise,
for the use and benefit of the purposes of this act and spend gifts,
grants, or endowments or income from the public or private sources to
support the ratios provided for in section 2 of this act, unless the
receipt of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act expires December 31, 2007.

--- END ---