BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The legislature finds that early intervention services providers,
school districts and educational service districts, and the Washington
school for the deaf should integrate their work in order to provide
appropriate and consistent services throughout the state to children
who are deaf or hard of hearing, from birth through twelfth grade.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The governor and the superintendent of public instruction shall
establish an oversight committee to explore possibilities for the
integration of the state's education services provided through the
birth-to-three early intervention system, the preschool through twelfth
grade system, and the Washington school for the deaf.
(2) Membership of the oversight committee shall include the
following: Representatives of the governor's office, the office of
superintendent of public instruction, the Washington school for the
deaf, and the infant toddler early intervention program in the
department of social and health services; one or more parents of a
child who is deaf or hard of hearing; one or more adults who are deaf
or hard of hearing; one or more researchers on hearing loss; and one or
more teachers of the deaf and hard of hearing.
(3) The oversight committee established pursuant to this section
shall report its recommendations concerning integration of the state's
education services provided through the birth-to-three early
intervention system, the preschool through twelfth grade system, and
the Washington school for the deaf to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2004.

--- END ---