BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that children who
are deaf or hard of hearing and their families have unique needs
specific to the hearing loss. These unique needs reflect the
challenges children with hearing loss and their families encounter
related to their lack of full access to auditory communication.
(2) The legislature further finds that early detection of hearing
loss in a child and early intervention and treatment have been
demonstrated to be highly effective in facilitating a child's healthy
development in a manner consistent with the child's age and cognitive
ability.
(3) These combined factors support the need for early intervention
services providers with specialized training and expertise, spanning
the spectrum of available approaches and educational options, who can
address the unique characteristics and needs of each child who is deaf
or hard of hearing and that child's family.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) There is established an advisory council
in the department of social and health services for the purpose of
advancing the development of a comprehensive and effective statewide
system to provide prompt and effective early interventions for children
in the state who are deaf or hard of hearing and their families.
(2) Members of the advisory council shall have training,
experience, or interest in hearing loss in children. Membership shall
include, but not be limited to, the following: Pediatricians;
audiologists; teachers of the deaf and hard of hearing; parents of
children who are deaf or hard of hearing; and representatives of the
infant toddler early intervention program in the department of social
and health services, the department of health, and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The advisory council shall develop
statewide standards for early intervention services and early
intervention services providers specifically related to children who
are deaf or hard of hearing.
(2) The advisory council shall develop these standards by January
1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The advisory council shall create a
pamphlet to be provided to the parents of a child in the state who is
diagnosed with hearing loss by their child's pediatrician or
audiologist, as appropriate, upon diagnosis of hearing loss. The
pamphlet shall contain, at minimum, information on the following: The
variety of interventions and treatments available for children who are
deaf or hard of hearing; and resources for parent support, counseling,
financing, and education related to hearing loss in children.
(2) The pamphlet shall be available for distribution by July 1,
2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---