BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is essential that
the legislature and state agencies spend tax dollars in a manner that
is both responsible and consistent with the economic interests of the
state and the nation. The legislature and state agencies should,
therefore, consider indirect benefits that may be achieved when
entering into contracts for public works, personal services, purchased
services, information services, and highway design and construction.
Such benefits include, but are not limited to, job creation, capital
investment, and economic stimulus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
HIGHER EDUCATION. All work under a public works, personal
services, purchased services, or information services contract that is
entered into by the state under this chapter, or under any subcontract
awarded under such a contract, must be performed by citizens of the
United States or persons authorized by federal law to work in the
United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
PUBLIC WORKS. All work under a public works contract that is
entered into by the state under this chapter, or under any subcontract
awarded under such a contract, must be performed by citizens of the
United States or persons authorized by federal law to work in the
United States.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.19.1932 and 1989 c 185 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
department of corrections shall be exempt from the following provisions
of this chapter in respect to goods or services purchased or sold
pursuant to the operation of correctional industries: RCW 43.19.180,
43.19.190, 43.19.1901, 43.19.1905, 43.19.1906, 43.19.1908, 43.19.1911,
43.19.1913, 43.19.1915, 43.19.1917, 43.19.1919, 43.19.1921, 43.19.1925,
and 43.19.200.
(2) All work under a public works, personal services, purchased
services, or information services contract that is entered into by the
department of corrections, or under any subcontract awarded under such
a contract, must be performed by citizens of the United States or
persons authorized by federal law to work in the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 47.28 RCW
to read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION. All work under a public works,
personal services, purchased services, information services, or highway
design and construction contract that is entered into by the state
under this chapter, or under any subcontract awarded under such a
contract, must be performed by citizens of the United States or persons
authorized by federal law to work in the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 FEDERAL SEVERABILITY. If any part of this
act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a
prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state,
the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of
the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and
this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act
in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this
act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to
the receipt of federal funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are not
any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 APPLICABILITY. This act shall not apply to
contracts entered into before July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---