BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that hunger and
food insecurity are serious problems in the state. Since the United
States department of agriculture began to collect data on hunger and
food insecurity in 1995, Washington has been ranked each year within
the top five states with the highest levels of hunger. A significant
number of these households classified as hungry are families with
children.
The legislature recognizes the correlation between adequate
nutrition and a child's development and school performance. This
problem can be greatly diminished through improved access to federal
nutrition programs.
The legislature also recognizes that improved access to federal
nutrition and assistance programs, such as the federal food stamp
program, can be a critical factor in enabling recipients to gain the
ability to support themselves and their families. This is an important
step towards self-sufficiency and decreased long-term reliance on
governmental assistance and will serve to strengthen families in this
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.235
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Free or reduced-price lunch" means a lunch served by a school
district participating in the national school lunch program to a
student qualifying for national school lunch program benefits based on
family size-income criteria.
(b) "School lunch program" means a meal program meeting the
requirements defined by the superintendent of public instruction under
subsection (4) of this section.
(c) "Summer food service program" means a meal or snack program
meeting the requirements defined by the superintendent of public
instruction under subsection (5) of this section.
(2) School districts shall implement a school lunch program in each
public school in the district in which educational services are
provided to children in any of the grades kindergarten through four and
in which twenty-five percent or more of the enrolled students qualify
for a free or reduced-price lunch. In developing and implementing its
school lunch program, each school district may consult with an advisory
committee including school staff, community members, and others
appointed by the board of directors of the district.
(3) Applications to determine free or reduced-price lunch
eligibility shall be distributed and collected for all households of
children in schools containing any of the grades kindergarten through
four and in which there are no United States department of agriculture
child nutrition programs. The applications that are collected must be
reviewed to determine eligibility for free or reduced-price lunches.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to require completion or
submission of the application by a parent or guardian.
(4) Using the most current available school data on free and
reduced-price lunch eligibility, the superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt a schedule for implementation of school lunch
programs at each school required to offer such a program under
subsection (2) of this section as follows:
(a) Schools not offering a school lunch program and in which
twenty-five percent or more of the enrolled students are eligible for
free or reduced-price lunch shall implement a school lunch program not
later than the second day of school in the 2005-06 school year and in
each school year thereafter.
(b) Schools not offering a school lunch program and in which less
than twenty-five percent of the enrolled students are eligible for free
or reduced-price lunch shall implement a school lunch program not later
than the second day of school in the 2006-07 school year and in each
school year thereafter.
(c) The superintendent shall establish minimum standards defining
the lunch meals to be served, and such standards must be sufficient to
qualify the meals for any available federal reimbursement.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prevent a
school from implementing a school lunch program earlier than the school
is required to do so.
(5) Each school district shall implement a summer food service
program in each public school in the district in which a summer program
of academic, enrichment, or remedial services is provided and in which
fifty percent or more of the children enrolled in the school qualify
for free or reduced-price lunch. However, the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop rules establishing criteria to permit an
exemption for a school that can demonstrate availability of an adequate
alternative summer feeding program. Sites providing meals should be
open to all children in the area, unless a compelling case can be made
to limit access to the program. The superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt a definition of compelling case and a schedule
for implementation as follows:
(a) Beginning the summer of 2005 if the school currently offers a
school breakfast or lunch program; or
(b) Beginning the summer following the school year during which a
school implements a school lunch program under subsection (4) of this
section.
(6) Schools not offering a breakfast or lunch program may meet the
meal service requirements of subsections (4) and (5) of this section
through any of the following:
(a) Preparing the meals on-site;
(b) Receiving the meals from another school that participates in a
United States department of agriculture child nutrition program; or
(c) Contracting with a nonschool entity that is a licensed food
service establishment under RCW 69.07.010.
(7) Requirements that school districts have a school lunch program
under this section shall not create or imply any state funding
obligation for these costs. The legislature does not intend to include
these programs within the state's obligation for basic education
funding under Article IX of the state Constitution.
(8) The requirements in this section shall lapse if the federal
reimbursement for any school breakfasts, lunches, or summer food
service programs is eliminated.
(9) School districts may be exempted from the requirements of this
section by showing good cause why they cannot comply with the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to the extent that such
exemption is not in conflict with federal or state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the maximum extent allowable by federal law, the department
shall implement simplified reporting for the food stamp program by
October 31, 2004.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "simplified reporting" means
the only changes in circumstance that a recipient of a benefit program
must report between eligibility reviews are a change of address or an
increase of income that would result in ineligibility for the benefit
program. Every six months the assistance unit must either complete a
semiannual report or participate in an eligibility review.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.08A.010 and 1997 c 58 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A family that includes an adult who has received temporary
assistance for needy families for sixty months after July 27, 1997,
shall be ineligible for further temporary assistance for needy families
assistance.
(2) For the purposes of applying the rules of this section, the
department shall count any month in which an adult family member
received a temporary assistance for needy families cash assistance
grant unless the assistance was provided when the family member was a
minor child and not the head of the household or married to the head of
the household.
(3) The department shall refer recipients who require specialized
assistance to appropriate department programs, crime victims' programs
through the department of community, trade, and economic development,
or the crime victims' compensation program of the department of labor
and industries.
(4) The department may exempt a recipient and the recipient's
family from the application of subsection (1) of this section by reason
of hardship or if the recipient meets the family violence options of
section 402(A)(7) of Title IVA of the federal social security act as
amended by P.L. 104-193. The number of recipients and their families
exempted from subsection (1) of this section for a fiscal year shall
not exceed twenty percent of the average monthly number of recipients
and their families to which assistance is provided under the temporary
assistance for needy families program.
(5) The department shall not exempt a recipient and his or her
family from the application of subsection (1) of this section until
after the recipient has received fifty-two months of assistance under
this chapter.
(6) To the maximum extent allowable by federal law, beginning on
October 31, 2005, the department shall provide transitional food stamp
assistance for a period of five months to a household that ceases to
receive temporary assistance for needy families assistance. If
necessary, the department shall extend the household's food stamp
certification until the end of the transition period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2004, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---