BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Respect for human rights includes respect for fundamental
worker rights;
(2) The foundation of worker rights is freedom of association and
the effective recognition of the right to collectively bargain over
terms and conditions of employment;
(3) These rights have been adopted and proclaimed by the General
Assembly of the United Nations and the International Labor
Organization, of which the United States is a member state;
(4) As a member state, the United States has pledged to ensure that
its domestic labor law fully protects these fundamental worker rights;
(5) These fundamental worker rights are also a statutory right
under the law of the state of Washington;
(6) These worker rights are not adequately protected when
enforcement under the federal law is ineffective because of lengthy
delays and procedural barriers; and
(7) To ensure that workers are free of discrimination when
exercising their rights, a mechanism for supporting these rights is
necessary in state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A petition may be filed with the commission by a person
claiming to be aggrieved because the exercise of his or her right under
RCW 49.36.010, or under any statute, treaty, or agreement of the United
States, to form, join, or assist, or to seek to form, join, or assist,
a labor organization, has been interfered with, restrained, or coerced
by another. Such a petition must be filed within six months of the
alleged interference, restraint, or coercion.
(2) Upon receiving a petition under this section, the chair of the
commission shall request the appointment of an administrative law judge
under Title 34 RCW to hear the petition in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW, and shall cause to be issued and served in the name of the
commission a written notice, together with a copy of the petition,
requiring the respondent to appear at a hearing before the
administrative law judge, at a time and place to be specified in the
notice.
(3) The administrative law judge, within thirty days after the
conclusion of the hearing, shall issue and file with the commission
findings of fact determining whether the petitioner's rights have been
interfered with, restrained, or coerced. The commission shall cause
the findings to be served to the petitioner and respondent in an order
in the name of the commission.
(4) If the petitioner or the respondent is aggrieved by the order
issued under this section by the commission, the aggrieved party may
ask for reconsideration of the order by the commission within twenty
days of the party's receipt of the order. The commission shall review
the findings based on the record of the administrative law judge and
issue a further determinative order. The further determinative order
issued by the commission is final and not subject to further commission
or judicial review.

--- END ---