BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.18.480 and 1957 c 193 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
((No)) An insurer shall not make or permit any unfair
discrimination between insureds or subjects of insurance having
substantially like insuring, risk, and exposure factors, and expense
elements, in the terms or conditions of any insurance contract, or in
the rate or amount of premium charged therefor, or in the benefits
payable or in any other rights or privileges accruing thereunder. This
((provision shall)) section does not prohibit fair discrimination by a
life insurer as between individuals having unequal expectation of life,
except that insurers may not require a person to undergo a genetic test
or provide the results of a previous genetic test as a condition of
offering or renewing insurance. If an insurer has information from a
genetic test, the insurer may only use that information if it
demonstrates the active presence of disease or illness. An insurer may
not use information from a genetic test if the information only
demonstrates a propensity for a condition or illness and not the active
presence of disease or illness.
(1) "Genetic information" means written or recorded information
about genes, gene products, or genetic characteristics derived from an
individual or a family member of the individual. "Gene product" is a
scientific term that means messenger RNA and translated protein. For
purposes of this chapter, "genetic information" shall not include
routine physical measurements: Chemical, blood, and urine analysis,
unless conducted purposely to diagnose a genetic characteristic; tests
for the abuse of drugs; tests for cholesterol; and tests for the
presence of HIV. Family histories do not constitute genetic
information.
(2) "Genetic test" means a test of human DNA, RNA, mitochondrial
DNA, chromosomes, or other material for the purpose of identifying
genes, inherited or acquired genetic abnormalities, or the presence or
absence of inherited or acquired characteristics in the genetic
material. For the purposes of this section, "genetic test" does not
include tests given for cholesterol or HIV. Employers may test for the
presence of drugs or alcohol, but may not use the results of these
tests to gain genetic information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.44 RCW
to read as follows:
It is unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, or the state of
Washington, its political subdivisions, or municipal corporations to
require, directly or indirectly, that any employee or prospective
employee submit genetic information or submit to screening for genetic
information as a condition of employment or continued employment. On
the effective date of this section, if an employer possesses genetic
information about an employee, it is unlawful for the employer to
disclose the genetic information without the employee's informed
consent.
(1) "Genetic information" means written or recorded information
about genes, gene products, or genetic characteristics derived from an
individual or a family member of the individual. "Gene product" is a
scientific term that means messenger RNA and translated protein. For
purposes of this chapter, "genetic information" shall not include
routine physical measurements: Chemical, blood, and urine analysis,
unless conducted purposely to diagnose a genetic characteristic; tests
for the abuse of drugs; tests for cholesterol; and tests for the
presence of HIV. Family histories do not constitute genetic
information.
(2) "Genetic test" means a test of human DNA, RNA, mitochondrial
DNA, chromosomes, or other material for the purpose of identifying
genes, inherited or acquired genetic abnormalities, or the presence or
absence of inherited or acquired characteristics in the genetic
material. For the purposes of this section, "genetic test" does not
include tests given for cholesterol or HIV. Employers may test for the
presence of drugs or alcohol, but may not use the results of these
tests to gain genetic information.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.60.020 and 1993 c 510 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The provisions of)) This chapter shall be construed liberally for
the accomplishment of the purposes thereof. ((Nothing contained in))
This chapter ((shall be deemed to)) does not repeal any of the
provisions of any other law of this state relating to discrimination
because of race, color, creed, national origin, sex, genetic
information, marital status, age, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability, other than a law which purports to
require or permit doing any act which is an unfair practice under this
chapter. ((Nor shall anything herein contained be construed to)) This
chapter does not deny the right to any person to institute any action
or pursue any civil or criminal remedy based upon an alleged violation
of his or her civil rights.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.60.030 and 1997 c 271 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to be free from discrimination because of race,
creed, color, national origin, sex, genetic information, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of
a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person is
recognized as and declared to be a civil right. This right shall
include, but not be limited to:
(a) The right to obtain and hold employment without discrimination;
(b) The right to the full enjoyment of any of the accommodations,
advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement;
(c) The right to engage in real estate transactions without
discrimination, including discrimination against families with
children;
(d) The right to engage in credit transactions without
discrimination;
(e) The right to engage in insurance transactions or transactions
with health maintenance organizations without discrimination((:
PROVIDED, That)). A practice ((which)) that is not unlawful under RCW
48.18.480, 48.30.300, 48.44.220, or 48.46.370 does not constitute an
unfair practice for the purposes of this subparagraph; and
(f) The right to engage in commerce free from any discriminatory
boycotts or blacklists. Discriminatory boycotts or blacklists for
purposes of this section shall be defined as the formation or execution
of any express or implied agreement, understanding, policy or
contractual arrangement for economic benefit between any persons which
is not specifically authorized by the laws of the United States and
which is required or imposed, either directly or indirectly, overtly or
covertly, by a foreign government or foreign person in order to
restrict, condition, prohibit, or interfere with or in order to exclude
any person or persons from any business relationship on the basis of
race, color, creed, religion, sex, the presence of any sensory, mental,
or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service
animal by a disabled person, or national origin or lawful business
relationship((: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That)). Nothing herein contained
shall prohibit the use of boycotts as authorized by law pertaining to
labor disputes and unfair labor practices.
(2) Any person deeming himself or herself injured by any act in
violation of this chapter shall have a civil action in a court of
competent jurisdiction to enjoin further violations, or to recover the
actual damages sustained by the person, or both, together with the cost
of suit including reasonable attorneys' fees or any other appropriate
remedy authorized by this chapter or the United States Civil Rights Act
of 1964 as amended, or the Federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988
(42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).
(3) Except for any unfair practice committed by an employer against
an employee or a prospective employee, or any unfair practice in a real
estate transaction which is the basis for relief specified in the
amendments to RCW 49.60.225 contained in chapter 69, Laws of 1993, any
unfair practice prohibited by this chapter which is committed in the
course of trade or commerce as defined in the Consumer Protection Act,
chapter 19.86 RCW, is, for the purpose of applying that chapter, a
matter affecting the public interest, is not reasonable in relation to
the development and preservation of business, and is an unfair or
deceptive act in trade or commerce.

Sec. 5 RCW 49.60.040 and 1997 c 271 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives, legal
representatives, trustees and receivers, or any group of persons; it
includes any owner, lessee, proprietor, manager, agent, or employee,
whether one or more natural persons; and further includes any political
or civil subdivisions of the state and any agency or instrumentality of
the state or of any political or civil subdivision thereof;
(2) "Commission" means the Washington state human rights
commission;
(3) "Employer" includes any person acting in the interest of an
employer, directly or indirectly, who employs eight or more persons,
and does not include any religious or sectarian organization not
organized for private profit;
(4) "Employee" does not include any individual employed by his or
her parents, spouse, or child, or in the domestic service of any
person;
(5) "Labor organization" includes any organization which exists for
the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning
grievances or terms or conditions of employment, or for other mutual
aid or protection in connection with employment;
(6) "Employment agency" includes any person undertaking with or
without compensation to recruit, procure, refer, or place employees for
an employer;
(7) "Marital status" means the legal status of being married,
single, separated, divorced, or widowed;
(8) "National origin" includes "ancestry";
(9) "Full enjoyment of" includes the right to purchase any service,
commodity, or article of personal property offered or sold on, or by,
any establishment to the public, and the admission of any person to
accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of
public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, without acts
directly or indirectly causing persons of any particular race, creed,
color, sex, national origin, or with any sensory, mental, or physical
disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person, to be treated as not welcome, accepted, desired, or
solicited;
(10) "Any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or
amusement" includes, but is not limited to, any place, licensed or
unlicensed, kept for gain, hire, or reward, or where charges are made
for admission, service, occupancy, or use of any property or
facilities, whether conducted for the entertainment, housing, or
lodging of transient guests, or for the benefit, use, or accommodation
of those seeking health, recreation, or rest, or for the burial or
other disposition of human remains, or for the sale of goods,
merchandise, services, or personal property, or for the rendering of
personal services, or for public conveyance or transportation on land,
water, or in the air, including the stations and terminals thereof and
the garaging of vehicles, or where food or beverages of any kind are
sold for consumption on the premises, or where public amusement,
entertainment, sports, or recreation of any kind is offered with or
without charge, or where medical service or care is made available, or
where the public gathers, congregates, or assembles for amusement,
recreation, or public purposes, or public halls, public elevators, and
public washrooms of buildings and structures occupied by two or more
tenants, or by the owner and one or more tenants, or any public library
or educational institution, or schools of special instruction, or
nursery schools, or day care centers or children's camps: PROVIDED,
That nothing contained in this definition shall be construed to include
or apply to any institute, bona fide club, or place of accommodation,
which is by its nature distinctly private, including fraternal
organizations, though where public use is permitted that use shall be
covered by this chapter; nor shall anything contained in this
definition apply to any educational facility, columbarium, crematory,
mausoleum, or cemetery operated or maintained by a bona fide religious
or sectarian institution;
(11) "Real property" includes buildings, structures, dwellings,
real estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, interests in real estate
cooperatives, condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and
incorporeal, or any interest therein;
(12) "Real estate transaction" includes the sale, appraisal,
brokering, exchange, purchase, rental, or lease of real property,
transacting or applying for a real estate loan, or the provision of
brokerage services;
(13) "Dwelling" means any building, structure, or portion thereof
that is occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a
residence by one or more families, and any vacant land that is offered
for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any such
building, structure, or portion thereof;
(14) "Sex" means gender;
(15) "Aggrieved person" means any person who: (a) Claims to have
been injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction; or (b)
believes that he or she will be injured by an unfair practice in a real
estate transaction that is about to occur;
(16) "Complainant" means the person who files a complaint in a real
estate transaction;
(17) "Respondent" means any person accused in a complaint or
amended complaint of an unfair practice in a real estate transaction;
(18) "Credit transaction" includes any open or closed end credit
transaction, whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment
transaction, credit card issue or charge, or otherwise, and whether for
personal or for business purposes, in which a service, finance, or
interest charge is imposed, or which provides for repayment in
scheduled payments, when such credit is extended in the regular course
of any trade or commerce, including but not limited to transactions by
banks, savings and loan associations or other financial lending
institutions of whatever nature, stock brokers, or by a merchant or
mercantile establishment which as part of its ordinary business permits
or provides that payment for purchases of property or service therefrom
may be deferred;
(19) "Families with children status" means one or more individuals
who have not attained the age of eighteen years being domiciled with a
parent or another person having legal custody of such individual or
individuals, or with the designee of such parent or other person having
such legal custody, with the written permission of such parent or other
person. Families with children status also applies to any person who
is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal custody of any
individual who has not attained the age of eighteen years;
(20) "Covered multifamily dwelling" means: (a) Buildings
consisting of four or more dwelling units if such buildings have one or
more elevators; and (b) ground floor dwelling units in other buildings
consisting of four or more dwelling units;
(21) "Premises" means the interior or exterior spaces, parts,
components, or elements of a building, including individual dwelling
units and the public and common use areas of a building;
(22) "Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of
guiding blind persons or a dog that is trained for the purpose of
assisting hearing impaired persons;
(23) "Service animal" means an animal that is trained for the
purpose of assisting or accommodating a disabled person's sensory,
mental, or physical disability;
(24) "Genetic information" means written or recorded information
about genes, gene products, or genetic characteristics derived from an
individual or a family member of the individual. "Gene product" is a
scientific term that means messenger RNA and translated protein. For
purposes of this chapter, "genetic information" shall not include
routine physical measurements: Chemical, blood, and urine analysis,
unless conducted purposely to diagnose a genetic characteristic; tests
for the abuse of drugs; tests for cholesterol; and tests for the
presence of HIV. Family histories do not constitute genetic
information.
(25) "Genetic test" means a test of human DNA, RNA, mitochondrial
DNA, chromosomes, or other material for the purpose of identifying
genes, inherited or acquired genetic abnormalities, or the presence or
absence of inherited or acquired characteristics in the genetic
material. For the purposes of this section, "genetic test" does not
include tests given for cholesterol or HIV. Employers may test for the
presence of drugs or alcohol, but may not use the results of these
tests to gain genetic information.

Sec. 6 RCW 49.60.180 and 1997 c 271 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is an unfair practice for any employer:
(1) To refuse to hire any person because of age, sex, marital
status, race, creed, color, national origin, genetic information, or
the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use
of a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person, unless
based upon a bona fide occupational qualification: PROVIDED, That the
prohibition against discrimination because of such disability shall not
apply if the particular disability prevents the proper performance of
the particular worker involved.
(2) To discharge or bar any person from employment because of age,
sex, marital status, race, creed, color, national origin, genetic
information, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person.
(3) To discriminate against any person in compensation or in other
terms or conditions of employment because of age, sex, marital status,
race, creed, color, national origin, genetic information, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of
a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person: PROVIDED,
That it shall not be an unfair practice for an employer to segregate
washrooms or locker facilities on the basis of sex, or to base other
terms and conditions of employment on the sex of employees where the
commission by regulation or ruling in a particular instance has found
the employment practice to be appropriate for the practical realization
of equality of opportunity between the sexes.
(4) To print, or circulate, or cause to be printed or circulated
any statement, advertisement, or publication, or to use any form of
application for employment, or to make any inquiry in connection with
prospective employment, which expresses any limitation, specification,
or discrimination as to age, sex, marital status, race, creed, color,
national origin, genetic information, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person, or any intent to make any such
limitation, specification, or discrimination, unless based upon a bona
fide occupational qualification((: PROVIDED, Nothing contained herein
shall)). This subsection does not prohibit advertising in a foreign
language.
(5) To offer a person an inducement to disclose genetic
information; to question a person about his or her genetic information;
to solicit submission to, require, or administer a genetic test to any
person as a condition of employment; or to collect, solicit, or require
disclosure of genetic information from any person as a condition of
employment.

Sec. 7 RCW 49.60.190 and 1997 c 271 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is an unfair practice for any labor union or labor organization:
(1) To deny membership and full membership rights and privileges to
any person because of age, sex, marital status, race, creed, color,
national origin, genetic information, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person.
(2) To expel from membership any person because of age, sex,
marital status, race, creed, color, national origin, genetic
information, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person.
(3) To discriminate against any member, employer, employee, or
other person to whom a duty of representation is owed because of age,
sex, marital status, race, creed, color, national origin, genetic
information, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person.
(4) To offer a person an inducement to disclose genetic
information; to question a person about his or her genetic information;
to solicit submission to, require, or administer a genetic test to any
person as a condition of membership; or to collect, solicit, or require
disclosure of genetic information from any person as a condition of
membership.

Sec. 8 RCW 49.60.200 and 1997 c 271 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is an unfair practice for any employment agency:
(1) To fail or refuse to classify properly or refer for employment,
or otherwise to discriminate against, an individual because of age,
sex, marital status, race, creed, color, national origin, genetic
information, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person, or to print or circulate, or cause to be printed or
circulated any statement, advertisement, or publication, or to use any
form of application for employment, or to make any inquiry in
connection with prospective employment, which expresses any limitation,
specification or discrimination as to age, sex, race, creed, color, or
national origin, genetic information, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person, or any intent to make any such
limitation, specification, or discrimination, unless based upon a bona
fide occupational qualification((: PROVIDED, Nothing contained herein
shall)). This subsection does not prohibit advertising in a foreign
language.
(2) To offer a person an inducement to disclose genetic
information; to question a person about his or her genetic information;
to solicit submission to, require, or administer a genetic test to any
person as a condition of employment classification, assignment, or
referral; or to collect, solicit, or require disclosure of genetic
information from any person as a condition of employment
classification, assignment, or referral.

--- END ---