BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A commission on noneconomic damages is
established. The commission shall develop a plan for implementing an
advisory schedule of noneconomic damages in actions for injuries
resulting from health care under chapter 7.70 RCW. The commission
shall present the plan to the relevant policy committees of the
legislature by October 31, 2005.
(2) The commission's goal is to develop a plan that will increase
the predictability and proportionality of settlements and awards for
noneconomic damages in actions for injuries resulting from health care.
In developing its plan, the commission shall consider:
(a) The information that can most appropriately be used to provide
guidance to the trier of fact regarding noneconomic damage awards,
giving consideration to: (i) Past noneconomic damage awards for
similar injuries, considering severity and duration of the injuries;
(ii) past noneconomic damage awards for similar claims for damages; and
(iii) such other information or methodologies the commission finds
appropriate;
(b) The most appropriate format in which to present the information
to the trier of fact; and
(c) When and under what circumstances an advisory schedule should
be utilized in alternative dispute resolution settings and presented to
the trier of fact at trial.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "noneconomic damages" has the
meaning given in RCW 4.56.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The commission is composed of fifteen
members, as follows: (a) One member from each of the two largest
caucuses in the senate, to be appointed by the secretary of the senate,
and one member from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of
representatives, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; (b) one health care ethicist; (c) one economist; (d)
one actuary; (e) two attorneys, one representing the plaintiff's bar
and one representing the insurance defense bar; (f) two superior court
judges; (g) one hospital; (h) two physicians; and (i) one medical
malpractice insurer. The governor shall appoint the nonlegislative
members of the commission.
(2) The governor shall select a chair of the commission from among
those commission members that are not health care providers, medical
malpractice insurers, or attorneys.
(3) Legislative members of the commission shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members of the
commission shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Travel expenses of nonlegislative members of
the commission shall be paid jointly by the house of representatives
and senate.
(4) The office of financial management shall provide support to the
commission to enable it to perform its functions, with the assistance
of staff from the administrative office of the courts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2006.

--- END ---