BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.41.190 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 29 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Any pharmacist filling a prescription under a state purchased
health care program as defined in RCW 41.05.011(2) shall substitute,
where identified, a preferred drug for any nonpreferred drug in a given
therapeutic class, unless the endorsing practitioner has indicated on
the prescription that the nonpreferred drug must be dispensed as
written, or the prescription is for a refill of an antipsychotic,
antidepressant, chemotherapy, antiretroviral, or immunosuppressive
drug, in which case the pharmacist shall dispense the prescribed
nonpreferred drug. For the purposes of this subsection, "refill"
includes the continuation of therapy with the same drug, including the
renewal of a previous prescription or adjustments in dosage, when a
prescription is for a patient on a stable treatment regimen in one of
the five enumerated classes.
(2) When a substitution is made under subsection (1) of this
section, the dispensing pharmacist shall notify the prescribing
practitioner of the specific drug and dose dispensed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---