BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The costs to society of problem gambling include family
disintegration, criminal activity, and financial insolvencies;
(b) Problem gamblers suffer a higher incidence of addictive
disorders such as alcohol and substance abuse;
(c) Residents of the state of Washington have the opportunity to
participate in a variety of legal gambling activities. These include:
Horse racing, the state lottery, punch boards and pull-tabs, bingo,
card rooms, and gambling in casinos and bingo halls operated by Indian
tribes;
(d) A 1999 study funded by the Washington state lottery commission
found that five percent of adult residents of Washington state and
eight percent of adolescent residents could be classified as problem
gamblers; and
(e) There are no publicly or privately funded treatment programs
for problem gamblers in Washington state and a very limited number of
professionals trained in identification and treatment of the disorder.
(2) Therefore, it is the policy of the state of Washington to set
a dedicated source of funding to increase treatment services for
problem gamblers, training in the identification and treatment of
problem gambling, public awareness and education regarding problem
gambling, and specific education and treatment programs regarding
problem gambling for adolescents.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.46.100 and 2002 c 371 s 901 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created the gambling revolving fund which shall
consist of all moneys receivable for licensing, penalties, forfeitures,
and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the commission.
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys
received by the commission or any employee thereof, except for change
funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by rule or regulation of the
commission, shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the
state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited
to the gambling revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving fund
shall be on authorization of the commission or a duly authorized
representative thereof. In order to maintain an effective expenditure
and revenue control the gambling revolving fund shall be subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall be required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from such fund. All
expenses relative to commission business, including but not limited to
salaries and expenses of the director and other commission employees
shall be paid from the gambling revolving fund.
During the ((2001-2003)) 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the gambling revolving fund to the state general fund
and the problem gambling treatment account such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the fund ((and reductions made by the 2002
supplemental appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and
savings)). Of any amount transferred to the problem gambling treatment
account, half must derive from gambling establishments operated by
federally recognized Indian tribes, and half must derive from
commercial gambling establishments regulated by the gambling
commission.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.70.230 and 1985 c 375 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created and established a separate account, to be
known as the state lottery account. Such account shall be managed,
maintained, and controlled by the commission and shall consist of all
revenues received from the sale of lottery tickets or shares, and all
other moneys credited or transferred thereto from any other fund or
source pursuant to law. The account shall be a separate account
outside the state treasury. No appropriation is required to permit
expenditures and payment of obligations from the account.
During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the state lottery account to the problem gambling treatment
account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.20A.890 and 2002 c 349 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A program for: (a) The prevention and treatment of
((pathological)) problem gambling; and (b) the training of
professionals in the identification and treatment of problem gambling
is established within the department of social and health services, to
be administered by a qualified person who has training and experience
in ((handling pathological)) problem gambling ((problems)) or the
organization and administration of treatment services for persons
suffering from ((pathological)) problem gambling ((problems)). The
department shall track program participation and client outcomes.
(2) To receive treatment under subsection (1) of this section, a
person must:
(a) Need treatment for ((pathological)) problem gambling, but be
unable to afford treatment; and
(b) Be targeted by the department of social and health services as
to be most amenable to treatment.
(3) Treatment under this section is ((limited to)) available only
to the extent of the funds ((available)) appropriated to the department
of social and health services for this specific purpose.
(4) ((The department of social and health services shall report to
the legislature by September 1, 2002, with a plan for implementing this
section.
(5) The department of social and health services shall report to
the legislature by November 1, 2003, on program participation and
client outcomes.)) For the purposes of this section, "problem
gambling" includes patterns of gambling behavior that negatively impact
the lives of gamblers and their families, with serious personal,
financial, or legal consequences. Problem gambling may take two major
forms: Compulsive gambling and underage gambling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
The problem gambling treatment account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of the
program established under RCW 43.20A.890.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A joint legislative task force on
funding the treatment of problem gambling is established, with members
as provided in this section.
(2) The joint task force shall include the following voting
members:
(a) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate, appointed by the president of the senate;
(b) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(c) One member representing the governor, appointed by the
governor.
(3) The joint task force shall include the following nonvoting
members:
(a) One member representing commercial gambling establishments
regulated by the gambling commission, appointed jointly by the
president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(b) One member representing gambling establishments operated by
federally recognized tribes, appointed jointly by the president of the
senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, in consultation
with the tribes;
(c) One member representing a nonprofit organization involved in
prevention and/or treatment of problem gambling appointed jointly by
the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(d) Two members representing the public appointed jointly by the
president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(e) One liaison representative from each of the following: The
state lottery commission, the Washington horse racing commission, the
Washington state gambling commission, and the department of social and
health services.
(4) The task force shall choose cochairs from among its voting
members.
(5) The task force shall develop a recommendation to the
legislature regarding: (a) The scope of the need for problem gambling
prevention and treatment based on the experience of other states with
problem gambling treatment programs and research findings; (b) a
mechanism for all who conduct legal gambling and gaming activities to
contribute fairly to funding for prevention and treatment of problem
gambling; and (c) a mechanism to ensure that funding for treatment of
problem gambling increases in proportion to increases in gambling
activities.
(6) The task force shall consult with: (a) All sectors of the
gambling and gaming industry, including but not limited to inviting
representatives of these sectors to present information and
recommendations at meetings of the task force; and (b) individuals and
organizations with expertise in the treatment of problem gambling.
(7) The task force shall use legislative facilities and staff from
senate committee services and the house of representatives office of
program research.
(8) Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer
or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, such reimbursement to be
paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives.
(9) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by December 1, 2004.
(10) This section expires July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act may be known and cited as Ben's
bill.

--- END ---