BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that unsupervised
children, when left alone after school, have higher absentee rates at
school, lower academic test scores, and higher levels of stress, fear,
nightmares, loneliness, and boredom than children who are not left
alone after school. Children who are left alone also are more likely
to smoke cigarettes and use alcohol than their peers who are not left
alone. The legislature further finds that the rate of violent juvenile
crime soars in the hours immediately after school, and that children
are most likely to be victims of violent crimes committed by people
other than family members between 2:00 p.m. and 6:00 p.m.
The legislature finds that good after-school programs and
activities can provide safe and effective learning environments for
children who would otherwise be alone and unsupervised after school.
The legislature also finds that most Americans believe that children
should have access to organized activities after school and that many
of them would be willing to support those programs with their taxes.
The legislature further finds that students who participate in good
after-school care programs:
(1) Miss fewer days of school and have better behavior in school,
test scores, grades, and records of homework completion than children
who are left alone;
(2) Spend more time actively learning in a variety of settings and
less time watching television than their peers who are left alone; and
(3) Have better peer relations, emotional adjustment, and conflict
resolution skills than children who are left alone.
Therefore, the legislature intends to direct the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the department of social and
health services to work with the Washington after-school network to
develop a statewide vision and strategic plan that will create a road
map for after-school programs in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The superintendent of public instruction and
the department of social and health services, with assistance from and
in coordination with the Washington after-school network, shall:
(1) Assess the state of after-school programs available in the
state, including the number of children and youth served through those
programs and the numbers and locations of children and youth who do not
have access to such programs;
(2) Identify the funding sources supporting after-school programs;
(3) Study model after-school programs operating in the state and
nation and identify the components that make the programs effective;
(4) Develop a statewide vision and strategic plan to coordinate
after-school programs at the state and local levels and to ensure the
availability of programs for every school-aged child and youth in the
state. The plan shall include strategies that promote research-based
best practices and shall include input from children and youth; and
(5) Report to the governor, the house of representatives and senate
education committees, the house of representatives children and family
services committee, and the senate children and family services and
corrections committee by October 31, 2004, on the strategic plan and
any findings and recommendations included in the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The superintendent of public instruction and
the department of social and health services may provide, by grant or
contract, funding to the Washington after-school network for the
purposes of section 2 of this act. The agencies may also seek and
expend funds from federal, state, and local governmental agencies and
private organizations for the purposes of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---