BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that employers are
becoming increasingly discouraged from disclosing job reference
information. The legislature further finds that full disclosure of
such information will increase productivity, enhance the safety of the
workplace, and provide greater opportunities to disadvantaged groups
who may not have the educational background or resumes of other
workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer who discloses information about a former or current
employee's job performance, conduct, or other work-related information
to a prospective employer, or employment agency as defined by RCW
49.60.040, at the specific request of that individual employer or
employment agency, is presumed to be acting in good faith and is immune
from civil liability for such disclosure or its consequences. For
purposes of this section, the presumption of good faith may only be
rebutted upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence that the
employer knew that the information was false or misleading.
(2) The employer must retain a written record of the substance of
any information disclosed under this section for a minimum of two years
from the date of the disclosure. The employee has a right to inspect
the written record upon request. The written record shall become part
of the employee's personnel file, subject to the provisions of chapter
49.12 RCW. Failure to maintain a written record of the disclosure
waives the immunity provided under subsection (1) of this section, and
civil liability for such disclosure shall be evaluated under common law
standards without regard to this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "job performance" means the
manner in which the employee performs the duties of a position of
employment and includes an analysis of the employee's attendance at
work; conduct, attitude, effort, knowledge, behavior, and skills that
are work related; and adherence to the employer's lawful employment
policies and to safety and health laws subject to the limitation of RCW
51.48.025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Any written record made under section 2 of this act shall become
part of an employee's personnel file.

--- END ---