BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that early learning
and child care are an essential part of the daily lives of Washington
families. The early years of a child's life are critical to the
child's healthy brain development and the quality of caregiving during
those early years can significantly impact the child's intellectual and
emotional growth and social adjustment.
The legislature further finds that the state is involved in
numerous early learning and child care programs and services that are
administered through at least three state agencies. A more cohesive
and integrated early learning and child care system would result in
greater efficiencies for the state and greater accessibility for the
families that the programs are intended to serve. An effective system
of governance would provide leadership, voice, and vision for early
learning and child care in state government.
It is therefore the purpose of this act to initiate a process to
develop a strategic vision and specific goals for early learning and
child care programs and services throughout the state in order to
provide support to families in preparing for and maintaining children's
success in school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) There is established an early learning
and child care legislative work group to make recommendations for
developing a strategic vision and specific goals for early learning and
child care programs and services in the state.
(2) Members of the work group shall be appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives and the president of the senate.
Membership of the work group shall consist of members of the house
children and family services committee, education committee, and
appropriations committee and the senate children and family services
and corrections committee, education committee, and ways and means
committee. Cochairs of the work group shall be appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the
senate.
(3) The work group shall:
(a) Define legislative expectations and provide policy direction
for a statewide strategic plan for quality early learning and child
care programs and services, which places early learning and child care
within the context of life-long learning;
(b) Identify the most efficient system for the administration and
fiscal management of quality early learning and child care programs and
services in the state;
(c) Make recommendations regarding consolidation of early learning
and child care programs and services in the state; and
(d) Seek involvement from families, community groups, stakeholder
groups, and state agencies involved with early learning and child care
programs and services throughout the state.
(4) The work group shall use legislative facilities and staff from
the office of program research and senate committee services.
(5) The work group shall report its progress to the legislature by
December 5, 2004.
(6) The work group shall report its recommendations to the
legislature by January 10, 2005.

--- END ---