BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.106 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each county and city proposing adoption of a comprehensive plan
or development regulations under this chapter shall notify the
department of its intent to adopt such plan or regulations at least
sixty days prior to final adoption. State agencies including the
department may provide comments to the county or city on the proposed
comprehensive plan, or proposed development regulations, during the
public review process prior to adoption.
(2) Each county and city planning under this chapter shall transmit
a complete and accurate copy of its comprehensive plan or development
regulations to the department within ten days after final adoption.
(3)(a) Any amendments for permanent changes to a comprehensive plan
or development regulation that are proposed by a county or city to its
adopted plan or regulations shall be submitted to the department in the
same manner as initial plans and development regulations under this
section. Any amendments to a comprehensive plan or development
regulations that are adopted by a county or city shall be transmitted
to the department in the same manner as the initial plans and
regulations under this section.
(b) Each county and city planning under this chapter may request
expedited review for any amendments for permanent changes to a
development regulation. Upon receiving a request for expedited review,
and after consultation with other state agencies, the department may
grant expedited review if the department determines that expedited
review does not compromise the state's ability to provide timely
comments related to compliance with the goals and requirements of this
chapter or on other matters of state interest. Cities and counties may
adopt amendments for permanent changes to a development regulation
immediately following the granting of the request for expedited review
by the department.

--- END ---