BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.031 and 2003 c 291 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there shall be in
effect in all counties and cities the state building code which shall
consist of the following codes which are hereby adopted by reference:
(1)(a) The International Building Code, published by the
International Code Council(([,])), Inc.;
(b) The International Residential Code, published by the
International Code Council, Inc.;
(2) The ((International)) Uniform Mechanical Code, published by the
International ((Code Council[,] Inc., except that the standards for
liquified petroleum gas installations shall be NFPA 58 (Storage and
Handling of Liquified Petroleum Gases) and ANSI Z223.1/NFPA 54
(National Fuel Gas Code))) Association of Plumbing and Mechanical
Officials;
(3) The ((International)) Uniform Fire Code, published by the
((International Code Council[,] Inc., including those standards of
the)) National Fire Protection Association ((specifically referenced in
the International Fire Code: PROVIDED, That,)). However,
notwithstanding any wording in this code, participants in religious
ceremonies shall not be precluded from carrying hand-held candles;
(4) Except as provided in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code
and Uniform Plumbing Code Standards, published by the International
Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials: PROVIDED, That any
provisions of such code affecting sewers or fuel gas piping are not
adopted; and
(5) The rules adopted by the council establishing standards for
making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by the
physically disabled or elderly persons as provided in RCW 70.92.100
through 70.92.160.
In case of conflict among the codes enumerated in subsections (1),
(2), (3), and (4) of this section, the first named code shall govern
over those following.
The codes enumerated in this section shall be adopted by the
council as provided in RCW 19.27.074. The council shall solicit input
from first responders to ensure that fire fighter safety issues are
addressed during the code adoption process.
The council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request
of a local official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated
codes.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.110 and 2003 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each county government shall administer and enforce the
((International)) Uniform Fire Code in the unincorporated areas of the
county: PROVIDED, That any political subdivision or municipal
corporation providing fire protection pursuant to RCW 14.08.120 shall,
at its sole option, be responsible for administration and enforcement
of the ((International)) Uniform Fire Code on its facility. Any fire
protection district or political subdivision may, pursuant to chapter
39.34 RCW, the interlocal cooperation act, assume all or a portion of
the administering responsibility and coordinate and cooperate with the
county government in the enforcement of the ((International)) Uniform
Fire Code.
It is not the intent of RCW 19.27.110 and 19.27.111 to preclude or
limit the authority of any city, town, county, fire protection
district, state agency, or political subdivision from engaging in those
fire prevention activities with which they are charged.
It is not the intent of the legislature by adopting the state
building code or RCW 19.27.110 and 19.27.111 to grant counties any more
power to suppress or extinguish fires than counties currently possess
under the Constitution or other statutes.
Each county is authorized to impose fees sufficient to pay the cost
of inspections, administration, and enforcement pursuant to RCW
19.27.110 and 19.27.111.

--- END ---