BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that nonprofit
organizations and associations engaged in the education, training, and
employment of economically disadvantaged people who are involved in the
creation and expansion of businesses with marketable products and
services in a physical location provide many public benefits to the
people of the state of Washington. Therefore, the legislature finds
that it is in the best interest of the state of Washington to provide
a limited property tax exemption for the use of these facilities by
certain organizations in order to be self-sustaining for their exempt
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The real and personal property owned or used by a nonprofit
organization is exempt from taxation if the property is used to: (a)
Assist startup and expanding businesses by providing education,
training, and employment of economically disadvantaged people; and (b)
provide shared use of equipment and work areas and daily technical
resources and daily management support services that enable small
startup and expanding businesses to become successful.
(2) The organization or association must meet all of the additional
following conditions:
(a) The organization is organized and conducted for nonsectarian
purposes.
(b) The organization is qualified for exemption under section
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code.
(c) The organization is governed by a volunteer board of directors
of at least five members.
(3) In 2010, any nonprofit organization claiming the exemption
under subsection (1) of this section must report to the department the
number of businesses served by the nonprofit and the types of services
provided. Nonprofits failing to report to the department are
ineligible for the exemption under subsection (1) of this section. The
department shall compile the information and share it with the
appropriate committees of the legislature.
(4) The exemption expires in 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The levy for a taxing district in any year shall be reduced as
necessary to prevent exemptions under section 2 of this act resulting
in a higher tax rate than would have occurred in the absence of the
exemptions in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.36.810 and 2003 c 344 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Upon cessation of a use under which an exemption has been
granted pursuant to RCW 84.36.030, 84.36.037, 84.36.040, 84.36.041,
84.36.042, 84.36.043, 84.36.046, 84.36.050, 84.36.060, 84.36.550,
84.36.650, 84.36.560, ((and)) 84.36.570, and section 2 of this act,
except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the county treasurer
shall collect all taxes which would have been paid had the property not
been exempt during the three years preceding, or the life of such
exemption, if such be less, together with the interest at the same rate
and computed in the same way as that upon delinquent property taxes.
If the property has been granted an exemption for more than ten
consecutive years, taxes and interest shall not be assessed under this
section.
(b) Upon cessation of use by an institution of higher education of
property exempt under RCW 84.36.050(2) the county treasurer shall
collect all taxes which would have been paid had the property not been
exempt during the seven years preceding, or the life of the exemption,
whichever is less.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies only when ownership of
the property is transferred or when fifty-one percent or more of the
area of the property loses its exempt status. The additional tax under
subsection (1) of this section shall not be imposed if the cessation of
use resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation for a use which also qualifies and is granted exemption
under this chapter;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the property is located which disallows
the present use of such property;
(d) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or
other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the
organization, association, or corporation changing the use of such
property;
(e) Relocation of the activity and use of another location or site
except for undeveloped properties of camp facilities exempted under RCW
84.36.030;
(f) Cancellation of a lease on leased property that had been exempt
under this chapter; or
(g) A change in the exempt portion of a home for the aging under
RCW 84.36.041(3), as long as some portion of the home remains exempt.
(3) Subsections (2)(e) and (f) of this section do not apply to
property leased to a state institution of higher education and exempt
under RCW 84.36.050(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2005 and thereafter.

--- END ---