BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Thousands of patients are injured each year in the United
States as a result of medical errors, and that a comprehensive approach
is needed to effectively reduce the incidence of medical errors in our
health care system. Implementation of proven patient safety strategies
can reduce medical errors, and thereby potentially reduce the need for
disciplinary actions against licensed health care professionals and
facilities, and the frequency and severity of medical malpractice
claims; and
(b) Health care providers, health care facilities, and health
carriers can and should be supported in their efforts to improve
patient safety and reduce medical errors by authorizing the sharing of
successful quality improvement efforts, encouraging health care
facilities and providers to communicate openly with patients regarding
medical errors that have occurred and steps that can be taken to
prevent errors from occurring in the future, encouraging health care
facilities and providers to work cooperatively in their patient safety
efforts, and increasing funding available to implement proven patient
safety strategies.
(2) Through the adoption of this act, the legislature intends to
positively influence the safety and quality of care provided in
Washington state's health care system.

PART I: ENCOURAGING PATIENT SAFETY THROUGH
SHARED QUALITY IMPROVEMENT EFFORTS
Sec. 101 RCW 4.24.250 and 1981 c 181 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any health care provider as defined in RCW 7.70.020 (1) and (2)
as now existing or hereafter amended who, in good faith, files charges
or presents evidence against another member of their profession based
on the claimed incompetency or gross misconduct of such person before
a regularly constituted review committee or board of a professional
society or hospital whose duty it is to evaluate the competency and
qualifications of members of the profession, including limiting the
extent of practice of such person in a hospital or similar institution,
or before a regularly constituted committee or board of a hospital
whose duty it is to review and evaluate the quality of patient care,
shall be immune from civil action for damages arising out of such
activities. The proceedings, reports, and written records of such
committees or boards, or of a member, employee, staff person, or
investigator of such a committee or board, shall not be subject to
subpoena or discovery proceedings in any civil action, except actions
arising out of the recommendations of such committees or boards
involving the restriction or revocation of the clinical or staff
privileges of a health care provider as defined above.
(2) A coordinated quality improvement program maintained in
accordance with RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200 may share information and
documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by a coordinated quality
improvement committee or committees or boards under subsection (1) of
this section, with one or more other coordinated quality improvement
programs for the improvement of the quality of health care services
rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical
malpractice. The privacy protections of chapter 70.02 RCW and the
federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 and
its implementing regulations apply to the sharing of individually
identifiable patient information held by a coordinated quality
improvement program and the department shall assure that all rules
relating to coordinated quality improvement programs and the sharing of
individually identifiable patient information by these programs comply
with these laws. Information and documents disclosed by one
coordinated quality improvement program to another coordinated quality
improvement program and any information and documents created or
maintained as a result of the sharing of information and documents
shall not be subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall
be respected as required by subsection (1) of this section and by RCW
43.70.510(4) and 70.41.200(3).

Sec. 102 RCW 43.70.510 and 1995 c 267 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Health care institutions and medical facilities, other than
hospitals, that are licensed by the department, professional societies
or organizations, health care service contractors, health maintenance
organizations, health carriers approved pursuant to chapter 48.43 RCW,
and any other person or entity providing health care coverage under
chapter 48.42 RCW that is subject to the jurisdiction and regulation of
any state agency or any subdivision thereof may maintain a coordinated
quality improvement program for the improvement of the quality of
health care services rendered to patients and the identification and
prevention of medical malpractice as set forth in RCW 70.41.200.
(b) All such programs shall comply with the requirements of RCW
70.41.200(1)(a), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h) as modified to
reflect the structural organization of the institution, facility,
professional societies or organizations, health care service
contractors, health maintenance organizations, health carriers, or any
other person or entity providing health care coverage under chapter
48.42 RCW that is subject to the jurisdiction and regulation of any
state agency or any subdivision thereof, unless an alternative quality
improvement program substantially equivalent to RCW 70.41.200(1)(a) is
developed. All such programs, whether complying with the requirement
set forth in RCW 70.41.200(1)(a) or in the form of an alternative
program, must be approved by the department before the discovery
limitations provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section and the
exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and subsection (5) of this section
shall apply. In reviewing plans submitted by licensed entities that
are associated with physicians' offices, the department shall ensure
that the exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and the discovery
limitations of this section are applied only to information and
documents related specifically to quality improvement activities
undertaken by the licensed entity.
(2) Health care provider groups of ((ten)) five or more providers
may maintain a coordinated quality improvement program for the
improvement of the quality of health care services rendered to patients
and the identification and prevention of medical malpractice as set
forth in RCW 70.41.200. All such programs shall comply with the
requirements of RCW 70.41.200(1)(a), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h)
as modified to reflect the structural organization of the health care
provider group. All such programs must be approved by the department
before the discovery limitations provided in subsections (3) and (4) of
this section and the exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and
subsection (5) of this section shall apply.
(3) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such
activity. Any person or entity participating in a coordinated quality
improvement program that shares information or documents with one or
more other programs in good faith and in accordance with applicable
confidentiality and disclosure requirements of the coordinated quality
improvement committee is not subject to an action for civil damages or
other relief arising out of the act of sharing them.
(4) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected, and maintained by a
quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or
introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was
in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the
creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents
specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to
testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or
the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee.
This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the
discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that
is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of
any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the
testimony of any person concerning the facts that form the basis for
the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal
knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil
action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or
revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges,
introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by
quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d)
in any civil action challenging the termination of a contract by a
state agency with any entity maintaining a coordinated quality
improvement program under this section if the termination was on the
basis of quality of care concerns, introduction into evidence of
information created, collected, or maintained by the quality
improvement committees of the subject entity, which may be under terms
of a protective order as specified by the court; (e) in any civil
action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or
restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any and the
reasons for the restrictions; or (f) in any civil action, discovery and
introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by
rule of the department of health to be made regarding the care and
treatment received.
(5) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee are exempt
from disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.
(6) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by a quality improvement
committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 with one or
more other coordinated quality improvement programs maintained in
accordance with this section or with RCW 70.41.200, for the improvement
of the quality of health care services rendered to patients and the
identification and prevention of medical malpractice. The privacy
protections of chapter 70.02 RCW and the federal health insurance
portability and accountability act of 1996 and its implementing
regulations apply to the sharing of individually identifiable patient
information held by a coordinated quality improvement program and the
department shall assure that all rules relating to coordinated quality
improvement programs and the sharing of individually identifiable
patient information by these programs comply with these laws.
Information and documents disclosed by one coordinated quality
improvement program to another coordinated quality improvement program
and any information and documents created or maintained as a result of
the sharing of information and documents shall not be subject to the
discovery process and confidentiality shall be respected as required by
subsection (4) of this section and RCW 4.24.250.
(7) The department of health shall adopt rules as are necessary to
implement this section.

Sec. 103 RCW 70.41.200 and 2000 c 6 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every hospital shall maintain a coordinated quality improvement
program for the improvement of the quality of health care services
rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical
malpractice. The program shall include at least the following:
(a) The establishment of a quality improvement committee with the
responsibility to review the services rendered in the hospital, both
retrospectively and prospectively, in order to improve the quality of
medical care of patients and to prevent medical malpractice. The
committee shall oversee and coordinate the quality improvement and
medical malpractice prevention program and shall ensure that
information gathered pursuant to the program is used to review and to
revise hospital policies and procedures;
(b) A medical staff privileges sanction procedure through which
credentials, physical and mental capacity, and competence in delivering
health care services are periodically reviewed as part of an evaluation
of staff privileges;
(c) The periodic review of the credentials, physical and mental
capacity, and competence in delivering health care services of all
persons who are employed or associated with the hospital;
(d) A procedure for the prompt resolution of grievances by patients
or their representatives related to accidents, injuries, treatment, and
other events that may result in claims of medical malpractice;
(e) The maintenance and continuous collection of information
concerning the hospital's experience with negative health care outcomes
and incidents injurious to patients, patient grievances, professional
liability premiums, settlements, awards, costs incurred by the hospital
for patient injury prevention, and safety improvement activities;
(f) The maintenance of relevant and appropriate information
gathered pursuant to (a) through (e) of this subsection concerning
individual physicians within the physician's personnel or credential
file maintained by the hospital;
(g) Education programs dealing with quality improvement, patient
safety, medication errors, injury prevention, staff responsibility to
report professional misconduct, the legal aspects of patient care,
improved communication with patients, and causes of malpractice claims
for staff personnel engaged in patient care activities; and
(h) Policies to ensure compliance with the reporting requirements
of this section.
(2) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such
activity. Any person or entity participating in a coordinated quality
improvement program that shares information or documents with one or
more other programs in good faith and in accordance with applicable
confidentiality and disclosure requirements of the coordinated quality
improvement committee is not subject to an action for civil damages or
other relief arising out of the act of sharing them.
(3) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected, and maintained by a
quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or
introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was
in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the
creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents
specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to
testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or
the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee.
This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the
discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that
is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of
any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the
testimony of any person concerning the facts which form the basis for
the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal
knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil
action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or
revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges,
introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by
quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d)
in any civil action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were
terminated or restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed,
if any and the reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil
action, discovery and introduction into evidence of the patient's
medical records required by regulation of the department of health to
be made regarding the care and treatment received.
(4) Each quality improvement committee shall, on at least a
semiannual basis, report to the governing board of the hospital in
which the committee is located. The report shall review the quality
improvement activities conducted by the committee, and any actions
taken as a result of those activities.
(5) The department of health shall adopt such rules as are deemed
appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this section.
(6) The medical quality assurance commission or the board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery, as appropriate, may review and audit
the records of committee decisions in which a physician's privileges
are terminated or restricted. Each hospital shall produce and make
accessible to the commission or board the appropriate records and
otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall
not be subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be
respected as required by subsection (3) of this section. Failure of a
hospital to comply with this subsection is punishable by a civil
penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.
(7) The department, the joint commission on accreditation of health
care organizations, and any other accrediting organization may review
and audit the records of a quality improvement committee or peer review
committee in connection with their inspection and review of hospitals.
Information so obtained shall not be subject to the discovery process,
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section. Each hospital shall produce and make accessible to the
department the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review
and audit.
(8) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by a quality improvement
committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 with one or
more other coordinated quality improvement programs maintained in
accordance with this section or with RCW 43.70.510, for the improvement
of the quality of health care services rendered to patients and the
identification and prevention of medical malpractice. The privacy
protections of chapter 70.02 RCW and the federal health insurance
portability and accountability act of 1996 and its implementing
regulations apply to the sharing of individually identifiable patient
information held by a coordinated quality improvement program and the
department shall assure that all rules relating to coordinated quality
improvement programs and the sharing of individually identifiable
patient information by these programs comply with these laws.
Information and documents disclosed by one coordinated quality
improvement program to another coordinated quality improvement program
and any information and documents created or maintained as a result of
the sharing of information and documents shall not be subject to the
discovery process and confidentiality shall be respected as required by
subsection (3) of this section and RCW 4.24.250.
(9) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence
per se.

PART II: FUNDING PATIENT SAFETY EFFORTS
Sec. 201 RCW 43.70.110 and 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 918 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining
a license. After June 30, 1995, municipal corporations providing
emergency medical care and transportation services pursuant to chapter
18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees, provided that such other
emergency services shall only be charged for their pro rata share of
the cost of licensure and inspection, if appropriate. The secretary
may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the secretary, the fees
would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when
the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.
(2) Except as provided in section 203 of this act, fees charged
shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the department for
the licensure of the activity or class of activities and may include
costs of necessary inspection.
(3) Department of health advisory committees may review fees
established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the
appropriateness of the level of such fees.

Sec. 202 RCW 43.70.250 and 1996 c 191 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of
each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. The
secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all
application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees,
permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing
or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered
by the department. In fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the
fees for each program at a sufficient level to defray the costs of
administering that program and the patient safety fee established in
section 203 of this act. All such fees shall be fixed by rule adopted
by the secretary in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 43.70
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall increase the licensing fee established
under RCW 43.70.110 by two dollars per year for the health care
professionals designated in subsection (2) of this section and by two
dollars per licensed bed per year for the health care facilities
designated in subsection (2) of this section. Proceeds of the patient
safety fee must be deposited into the patient safety account in section
207 of this act and dedicated to patient safety and medical error
reduction efforts that have been proven to improve, or have a
substantial likelihood of improving the quality of care provided by
health care professionals and facilities.
(2) The health care professionals and facilities subject to the
patient safety fee are:
(a) The following health care professionals licensed under Title 18
RCW:
(i) Advanced registered nurse practitioners, registered nurses, and
licensed practical nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;
(ii) Chiropractors licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) Dentists licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW;
(iv) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(v) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(vi) Nursing home administrators licensed under chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vii) Optometrists licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(viii) Osteopathic physicians licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW;
(ix) Osteopathic physicians' assistants licensed under chapter
18.57A RCW;
(x) Pharmacists and pharmacies licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW;
(xi) Physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;
(xii) Physician assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW;
(xiii) Podiatrists licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW; and
(xiv) Psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(b) Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW and psychiatric
hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) One percent of any attorney contingency fee as contracted
with a prevailing plaintiff in any action for damages based upon
injuries resulting from health care shall be deducted from the
contingency fee as a patient safety set aside. Proceeds of the patient
safety set aside will be distributed by the department of health in the
form of grants, loans, or other appropriate arrangements to support
strategies that have been proven to reduce medical errors and enhance
patient safety, or have a substantial likelihood of reducing medical
errors and enhancing patient safety, as provided in section 203 of this
act.
(b) A patient safety set aside shall be transmitted to the
secretary of the department of health by the person or entity paying
the claim, settlement, or verdict for deposit into the patient safety
account established in section 207 of this act.
(c) The supreme court shall by rule adopt procedures to implement
this section.
(2) If the patient safety set aside established by this section is
invalidated by the Washington state supreme court, then any attorney
representing a claimant who receives a settlement or verdict in any
action for damages based upon injuries resulting from health care under
this chapter shall provide information to the claimant regarding the
existence and purpose of the patient safety account and notify the
claimant that he or she may make a contribution to that account under
section 206 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 A new section is added to chapter 43.70
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Patient safety fee and set aside proceeds shall be
administered by the department, after seeking input from health care
providers engaged in direct patient care activities, health care
facilities, and other interested parties. In developing criteria for
the award of grants, loans, or other appropriate arrangements under
this section, the department shall rely primarily upon evidence-based
practices to improve patient safety that have been identified and
recommended by governmental and private organizations, including, but
not limited to:
(i) The federal agency for health care quality and research;
(ii) The institute of medicine of the national academy of sciences;
(iii) The joint commission on accreditation of health care
organizations; and
(iv) The national quality forum.
(b) The department shall award grants, loans, or other appropriate
arrangements for at least two strategies that are designed to meet the
goals and recommendations of the federal institute of medicine's
report, "Keeping Patients Safe: Transforming the Work Environment of
Nurses."
(2) Projects that have been proven to reduce medical errors and
enhance patient safety shall receive priority for funding over those
that are not proven, but have a substantial likelihood of reducing
medical errors and enhancing patient safety. All project proposals
must include specific performance and outcome measures by which to
evaluate the effectiveness of the project. Project proposals that do
not propose to use a proven patient safety strategy must include, in
addition to performance and outcome measures, a detailed description of
the anticipated outcomes of the project based upon any available
related research and the steps for achieving those outcomes.
(3) The department may use a portion of the patient safety fee
proceeds for the costs of administering the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 A new section is added to chapter 43.70
RCW to read as follows:
The secretary may solicit and accept grants or other funds from
public and private sources to support patient safety and medical error
reduction efforts under this act. Any grants or funds received may be
used to enhance these activities as long as program standards
established by the secretary are followed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 A new section is added to chapter 43.70
RCW to read as follows:
The patient safety account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from the fees and set asides created in sections 203 and 204
of this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the purposes of this act. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to chapter 43.70
RCW to read as follows:
By December 1, 2007, the department shall report the following
information to the governor and the health policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature:
(1) The amount of patient safety fees and set asides deposited to
date in the patient safety account;
(2) The criteria for distribution of grants, loans, or other
appropriate arrangements under this act; and
(3) A description of the medical error reduction and patient safety
grants and loans distributed to date, including the stated performance
measures, activities, timelines, and detailed information regarding
outcomes for each project.

PART III: ENCOURAGING PATIENT SAFETY THROUGH
COMMUNICATIONS WITH PATIENTS
Sec. 301 RCW 5.64.010 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In any civil action against a health care provider for personal
injuries which is based upon alleged professional negligence ((and
which is against:
(1) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or
related services, including, but not limited to, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatrist,
chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist, pharmacist, optician,
physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's assistant, nurse
practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive care paramedic,
including, in the event such person is deceased, his estate or personal
representative;
(2) An employee or agent of a person described in subsection (1) of
this section, acting in the course and scope of his employment,
including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased, his estate
or personal representative; or
(3) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in subsection (1)
of this section, including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic,
health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an officer,
director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of
his employment, including, in the event such officer, director,
employee, or agent is deceased, his estate or personal
representative;)), evidence of furnishing or offering or promising to
pay medical, hospital, or similar expenses occasioned by an injury is
not admissible to prove liability for the injury.
(2) In a civil action against a health care provider for personal
injuries which is based upon alleged professional negligence, evidence
of an early offer of settlement is inadmissible, not discoverable, and
otherwise unavailable for use in the action. An early offer of
settlement means an offer that is made before the filing of a claim and
that makes an offer of compensation for the injury suffered. An early
offer of settlement may include an apology or an admission of fault on
the part of the person making the offer, or a statement regarding
remedial actions that may be taken to address the act or omission that
is the basis for the allegation of negligence, and does not become
admissible, discoverable, or otherwise available for use in the action
because it contains an apology, admission of fault, or statement of
remedial actions that may be taken. Compensation means payment of
money or other property to or on behalf of the injured party, rendering
of services to the injured party free of charge, or indemnification of
expenses incurred by or on behalf of the injured party.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "health care provider" has
the same meaning provided in RCW 7.70.020.

PART IV: MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 Sections 201 through 208 of this act
expire December 31, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 Section 203 of this act takes effect July
1, 2004.

--- END ---