BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.517 and 2002 c 290 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)

TABLE 3

DRUG OFFENSE SENTENCING GRID

Seriousness
Level Offender Score
0 to 2 Offender Score
3 to 5 Offender Score
6 to 9 or more

III 51 to 68 months 68+ to 100 months 100+ to 120 months

II 12+ to 20 months 20+ to 60 months 60+ to 120 months

I 0 to 6 months 6+ to ((18 months))
12 months 12+ to 24 months

References to months represent the standard sentence ranges. 12+
equals one year and one day.
(2) The court may utilize any other sanctions or alternatives as
authorized by law, including but not limited to the special drug
offender sentencing alternative under RCW 9.94A.660 or drug court under
RCW 2.28.170.
(3) Nothing in this section creates an entitlement for a criminal
defendant to any specific sanction, alternative, sentence option, or
substance abuse treatment.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.28.170 and 2002 c 290 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties may establish and operate drug courts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "drug court" means a court
that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a reduction
in recidivism and substance abuse among nonviolent, substance abusing
offenders by increasing their likelihood for successful rehabilitation
through early, continuous, and intense judicially supervised treatment;
mandatory periodic drug testing; and the use of appropriate sanctions
and other rehabilitation services.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
drug court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding received from the office of
national drug control policy that is available to support the
operations of its drug court and associated services; and
(ii) ((Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis,)) Make a ten percent
match to state moneys allocated for drug court programs with local cash
((or in-kind)) resources. Moneys allocated by the state must be used
to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds for
drug court operations and associated services.
(b) Any county that establishes a drug court pursuant to this
section shall establish minimum requirements for the participation of
offenders in the program. The drug court may adopt local requirements
that are more stringent than the minimum. The minimum requirements
are:
(i) The offender would benefit from substance abuse treatment;
(ii) The offender has not previously been convicted of a serious
violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and
(iii) Without regard to whether proof of any of these elements is
required to convict, the offender is not currently charged with or
convicted of an offense:
(A) That is a sex offense;
(B) That is a serious violent offense;
(C) During which the defendant used a firearm; or
(D) During which the defendant caused substantial or great bodily
harm or death to another person.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.96A.350 and 2003 c 379 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a)
Substance abuse treatment and treatment support services for offenders
with an addiction or a substance abuse problem that, if not treated,
would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a
prosecuting attorney in Washington state; and (b) the provision of drug
and alcohol treatment services and treatment support services for
nonviolent offenders within a drug court program. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's
successful completion of his or her substance abuse treatment program,
but does not include the following services: Housing other than that
provided as part of an inpatient substance abuse treatment program,
vocational training, and mental health counseling; and
(b) "Treatment support" means transportation to or from inpatient
or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and
child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's
ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.
(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of:
(a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b)
any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.
(4)(a)(i) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million nine hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund into the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into eight equal quarterly payments.
(ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2004, the treasurer
shall transfer an additional four hundred forty-five thousand dollars
from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment account,
divided into four equal quarterly payments.
(iii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, and each
subsequent fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer eight
million ((two)) nine hundred ((fifty)) forty-seven thousand dollars
from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment account,
divided into four equal quarterly payments.
(iv) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, and each
subsequent fiscal year, the amount transferred shall be increased on an
annual basis by the implicit price deflator as published by the federal
bureau of labor statistics.
(b) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, and each
biennium thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer two million
nine hundred eighty-four thousand dollars from the general fund into
the violence reduction and drug enforcement account, divided into eight
quarterly payments. The amounts transferred pursuant to this
subsection (4)(b) shall be used solely for providing drug and alcohol
treatment services to offenders confined in a state correctional
facility who are assessed with an addiction or a substance abuse
problem that if not treated would result in addiction.
(c) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate
the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a)
of this subsection to the division of alcohol and substance abuse for
the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Moneys appropriated to the division of alcohol and substance
abuse from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed
as specified in this subsection. The department shall serve as the
fiscal agent for purposes of distribution. Until July 1, 2004, the
department may not use moneys appropriated from the criminal justice
treatment account for administrative expenses and shall distribute all
amounts appropriated under subsection (4)(c) of this section in
accordance with this subsection. Beginning in July 1, 2004, the
department may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated
under subsection (4)(c) of this section for its administrative costs.
(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the
distribution formula adopted under this section. The division of
alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of
corrections, the sentencing guidelines commission, the Washington state
association of counties, the Washington state association of drug court
professionals, the superior court judges' association, the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the criminal
defense bar, representatives of substance abuse treatment providers,
and any other person deemed by the division to be necessary, shall
establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to
counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County
or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must
be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating
offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting
attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of representatives from
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges'
association, the Washington state association of counties, the
Washington defender's association or the Washington association of
criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington
state association of drug court professionals, substance abuse
treatment providers, and the division. The panel shall review county
or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants
approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that
treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.
(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor,
county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment
provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the
criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority,
and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court
shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative
authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b)
of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the
criminal justice treatment account within that county. The funds shall
be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance abuse
treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.090 and treatment support services.
No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections
(4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties
participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for treatment
support services.
(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and
submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under
this section.
(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to
supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used
for substance abuse treatment.
(9) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW
2.28.170(3)(b).

--- END ---