BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.800 and 2002 c 302 s 704 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any court when entering an order authorized under RCW
9A.46.080, 10.14.080, ((10.99.040, 10.99.045,)) 26.09.050, 26.09.060,
26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060, ((26.50.070,)) or 26.26.590
shall, upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence, that a party
has: Used, displayed, or threatened to use a firearm or other
dangerous weapon in a felony, or previously committed any offense that
makes him or her ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions
of RCW 9.41.040:
(a) Require the party to surrender any firearm or other dangerous
weapon;
(b) Require the party to surrender any concealed pistol license
issued under RCW 9.41.070;
(c) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a firearm or
other dangerous weapon;
(d) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a concealed
pistol license.
(2) Any court when entering an order authorized under RCW
9A.46.080, 10.14.080, ((10.99.040, 10.99.045,)) 26.09.050, 26.09.060,
26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060, ((26.50.070,)) or 26.26.590
may, upon a showing by a preponderance of the evidence but not by clear
and convincing evidence, that a party has: Used, displayed, or
threatened to use a firearm or other dangerous weapon in a felony, or
previously committed any offense that makes him or her ineligible to
possess a pistol under the provisions of RCW 9.41.040:
(a) Require the party to surrender any firearm or other dangerous
weapon;
(b) Require the party to surrender a concealed pistol license
issued under RCW 9.41.070;
(c) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a firearm or
other dangerous weapon;
(d) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a concealed
pistol license.
(3) The court may order temporary surrender of a firearm or other
dangerous weapon without notice to the other party if it finds, on the
basis of the moving affidavit or other evidence, that irreparable
injury could result if an order is not issued until the time for
response has elapsed.
(4) In addition to the provisions of subsections (1), (2), and (3)
of this section, the court may enter an order requiring a party to
comply with the provisions in subsection (1) of this section if it
finds that the possession of a firearm or other dangerous weapon by any
party presents a serious and imminent threat to public health or
safety, or to the health or safety of any individual.
(5) The requirements of subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this
section may be for a period of time less than the duration of the
order.
(6) When entering an order authorized under RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.045, or 26.50.070, the court must:
(a) Require the party to surrender any firearm or other dangerous
weapon;
(b) Require the party to surrender a concealed pistol license
issued under RCW 9.41.070;
(c) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a firearm or
other dangerous weapon; and
(d) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a concealed
pistol license.
(7) When entering an order authorized under RCW 26.50.060, if a
party has committed an act of domestic violence, unless that party
shows by clear and convincing evidence they do not pose a threat to
public health or safety, or to the health or safety of any individual,
the court must:
(a) Require the party to surrender any firearm or other dangerous
weapon;
(b) Require the party to surrender a concealed pistol license
issued under RCW 9.41.070;
(c) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a firearm or
other dangerous weapon; and
(d) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a concealed
pistol license.
(8) The court may require the party to surrender any firearm or
other dangerous weapon in his or her immediate possession or control or
subject to his or her immediate possession or control to the sheriff of
the county having jurisdiction of the proceeding, the chief of police
of the municipality having jurisdiction, or to the restrained or
enjoined party's counsel or to any person designated by the court.
(9) All law enforcement agencies must accept weapons surrendered
under an order authorized by this section, RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.045,
26.50.060, or 26.50.070, and must beginning January 1, 2005, have in
place rules or policies regarding how to accept, seize, and store
weapons subject to an order of surrender.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.99.040 and 2000 c 119 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Because of the serious nature of domestic violence, the court
in domestic violence actions:
(a) Shall not dismiss any charge or delay disposition because of
concurrent dissolution or other civil proceedings;
(b) Shall not require proof that either party is seeking a
dissolution of marriage prior to instigation of criminal proceedings;
(c) Shall waive any requirement that the victim's location be
disclosed to any person, other than the attorney of a criminal
defendant, upon a showing that there is a possibility of further
violence: PROVIDED, That the court may order a criminal defense
attorney not to disclose to his or her client the victim's location;
and
(d) Shall identify by any reasonable means on docket sheets those
criminal actions arising from acts of domestic violence.
(2)(a) Because of the likelihood of repeated violence directed at
those who have been victims of domestic violence in the past, when any
person charged with or arrested for a crime involving domestic violence
is released from custody before arraignment or trial on bail or
personal recognizance, the court authorizing the release shall
determine whether that person should be prohibited from having any
contact with the victim, may prohibit that person from having any
contact with the victim, and must:
(i) Require the party to surrender any firearm or other dangerous
weapon;
(ii) Require the party to surrender a concealed pistol license
issued under RCW 9.41.070;
(iii) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a firearm or
other dangerous weapon; and
(iv) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a concealed
pistol license. ((The jurisdiction authorizing the release shall
determine whether that person should be prohibited from having any
contact with the victim.))
(b) If there is no outstanding restraining or protective order
prohibiting that person from having contact with the victim, the court
authorizing release may issue, by telephone, a no-contact order
prohibiting the person charged or arrested from having contact with the
victim or from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within,
a specified distance of a location and must:
(i) Require the party to surrender any firearm or other dangerous
weapon;
(ii) Require the party to surrender a concealed pistol license
issued under RCW 9.41.070;
(iii) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a firearm or
other dangerous weapon; and
(iv) Prohibit the party from obtaining or possessing a concealed
pistol license.
(((b) In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions
of RCW 9.41.800.))
(c) The no-contact order and order regarding firearms or other
dangerous weapons shall also be issued in writing as soon as possible.
(3)(a) At the time of arraignment the court shall determine whether
a no-contact order shall be issued or extended. The no-contact order
shall terminate if the defendant is acquitted or the charges are
dismissed. If a no-contact order is issued or extended, the court may
also include in the conditions of release a requirement that the
defendant submit to electronic monitoring. If electronic monitoring is
ordered, the court shall specify who shall provide the monitoring
services, and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed.
Upon conviction, the court may require as a condition of the sentence
that the defendant reimburse the providing agency for the costs of the
electronic monitoring.
(b) An order regarding firearms or other dangerous weapons remains
in effect until the defendant is acquitted or the charges are
dismissed.
(4)(a) Willful violation of a ((court)) no-contact order issued
under subsection (2) or (3) of this section is punishable under RCW
26.50.110.
(b) A violation of an order regarding firearms or other dangerous
weapons is punishable under chapter 9.41 RCW.
(c) The written order releasing the person charged or arrested
shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend:
"Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 26.50 RCW
and will subject a violator to arrest; any assault, drive-by shooting,
or reckless endangerment that is a violation of this order is a felony.
You can be arrested even if any person protected by the order invites
or allows you to violate the order's prohibitions. You have the sole
responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating the order's
provisions. Only the court can change the order."
(((c))) (d) A certified copy of the order shall be provided to the
victim.
(5) If a no-contact order has been issued prior to charging, that
order shall expire at arraignment or within seventy-two hours if
charges are not filed. Such orders need not be entered into the
computer-based criminal intelligence information system in this state
which is used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants.
(6) Whenever ((a no-contact)) an order is issued, modified, or
terminated under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the clerk of
the court shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next
judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the
order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order the law enforcement
agency shall enter the order for one year or until the expiration date
specified on the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence
information system available in this state used by law enforcement
agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based
criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law
enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully
enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state. Upon receipt of notice
that an order has been terminated under subsection (3) of this section,
the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from the computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

Sec. 3 RCW 10.99.045 and 2000 c 119 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A defendant arrested for an offense involving domestic violence
as defined by RCW 10.99.020 shall be required to appear in person
before a magistrate within one judicial day after the arrest.
(2) A defendant who is charged by citation, complaint, or
information with an offense involving domestic violence as defined by
RCW 10.99.020 and not arrested shall appear in court for arraignment in
person as soon as practicable, but in no event later than fourteen days
after the next day on which court is in session following the issuance
of the citation or the filing of the complaint or information.
(3) At the time of the appearances provided in subsection (1) or
(2) of this section, the court shall determine the necessity of
imposing a no-contact order or other conditions of pretrial release
according to the procedures established by court rule for a preliminary
appearance or an arraignment. The court ((may)) must include in the
order any conditions ((authorized)) required under RCW 9.41.800 and
10.99.040.
(4) Appearances required pursuant to this section are mandatory and
cannot be waived.
(5) The no-contact order shall be issued and entered with the
appropriate law enforcement agency pursuant to the procedures outlined
in RCW 10.99.040 (2) and (((4))) (6).

Sec. 4 RCW 26.50.060 and 2000 c 119 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon notice and after hearing, the court may provide relief as
follows:
(a) Restrain the respondent from committing acts of domestic
violence and, if the court finds the respondent has committed acts of
domestic violence, the court must (i) require the respondent to
surrender any firearm or other dangerous weapon, (ii) require the
respondent to surrender a concealed pistol license issued under RCW
9.41.070, (iii) prohibit the respondent from obtaining or possessing a
firearm or other dangerous weapon, and (iv) prohibit the respondent
from obtaining or possessing a concealed pistol license;
(b) Exclude the respondent from the dwelling that the parties
share, from the residence, workplace, or school of the petitioner, or
from the day care or school of a child;
(c) Prohibit the respondent from knowingly coming within, or
knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified
location;
(d) On the same basis as is provided in chapter 26.09 RCW, the
court shall make residential provision with regard to minor children of
the parties. However, parenting plans as specified in chapter 26.09
RCW shall not be required under this chapter;
(e) Order the respondent to participate in a domestic violence
perpetrator treatment program approved under RCW 26.50.150;
(f) Order other relief as it deems necessary for the protection of
the petitioner and other family or household members sought to be
protected, including orders or directives to a peace officer, as
allowed under this chapter;
(g) Require the respondent to pay the administrative court costs
and service fees, as established by the county or municipality
incurring the expense and to reimburse the petitioner for costs
incurred in bringing the action, including reasonable attorneys' fees;
(h) Restrain the respondent from having any contact with the victim
of domestic violence or the victim's children or members of the
victim's household;
(i) Require the respondent to submit to electronic monitoring. The
order shall specify who shall provide the electronic monitoring
services and the terms under which the monitoring must be performed.
The order also may include a requirement that the respondent pay the
costs of the monitoring. The court shall consider the ability of the
respondent to pay for electronic monitoring;
(j) Consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800;
(k) Order possession and use of essential personal effects. The
court shall list the essential personal effects with sufficient
specificity to make it clear which property is included; and
(l) Order use of a vehicle.
(2) If a protection order restrains the respondent from contacting
the respondent's minor children the restraint shall be for a fixed
period not to exceed one year. This limitation is not applicable to
orders for protection issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, or 26.26 RCW.
With regard to other relief, if the petitioner has petitioned for
relief on his or her own behalf or on behalf of the petitioner's family
or household members or minor children, and the court finds that the
respondent is likely to resume acts of domestic violence against the
petitioner or the petitioner's family or household members or minor
children when the order expires, the court may either grant relief for
a fixed period or enter a permanent order of protection.
If the petitioner has petitioned for relief on behalf of the
respondent's minor children, the court shall advise the petitioner that
if the petitioner wants to continue protection for a period beyond one
year the petitioner may either petition for renewal pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter or may seek relief pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 26.09 or 26.26 RCW.
(3) If the court grants an order for a fixed time period, the
petitioner may apply for renewal of the order by filing a petition for
renewal at any time within the three months before the order expires.
The petition for renewal shall state the reasons why the petitioner
seeks to renew the protection order. Upon receipt of the petition for
renewal the court shall order a hearing which shall be not later than
fourteen days from the date of the order. Except as provided in RCW
26.50.085, personal service shall be made on the respondent not less
than five days before the hearing. If timely service cannot be made
the court shall set a new hearing date and shall either require
additional attempts at obtaining personal service or permit service by
publication as provided in RCW 26.50.085 or by mail as provided in RCW
26.50.123. If the court permits service by publication or mail, the
court shall set the new hearing date not later than twenty-four days
from the date of the order. If the order expires because timely
service cannot be made the court shall grant an ex parte order of
protection as provided in RCW 26.50.070. The court shall grant the
petition for renewal unless the respondent proves by a preponderance of
the evidence that the respondent will not resume acts of domestic
violence against the petitioner or the petitioner's children or family
or household members when the order expires. The court may renew the
protection order for another fixed time period or may enter a permanent
order as provided in this section. The court may award court costs,
service fees, and reasonable attorneys' fees as provided in subsection
(1)(((f))) (g) of this section.
(4) In providing relief under this chapter, the court may realign
the designation of the parties as "petitioner" and "respondent" where
the court finds that the original petitioner is the abuser and the
original respondent is the victim of domestic violence and may issue an
ex parte temporary order for protection in accordance with RCW
26.50.070 on behalf of the victim until the victim is able to prepare
a petition for an order for protection in accordance with RCW
26.50.030.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, no order
for protection shall grant relief to any party except upon notice to
the respondent and hearing pursuant to a petition or counter-petition
filed and served by the party seeking relief in accordance with RCW
26.50.050.
(6) The court order shall specify the date the order expires if
any. The court order shall also state whether the court issued the
protection order following personal service, service by publication, or
service by mail and whether the court has approved service by
publication or mail of an order issued under this section.
(7) If the court declines to issue an order for protection or
declines to renew an order for protection, the court shall state in
writing on the order the particular reasons for the court's denial.

Sec. 5 RCW 26.50.070 and 2000 c 119 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where an application under this section alleges that
irreparable injury could result from domestic violence if an order is
not issued immediately without prior notice to the respondent, the
court may grant an ex parte temporary order for protection, pending a
full hearing, and grant relief as the court deems proper, including an
order:
(a) Restraining any party from committing acts of domestic
violence;
(b) Restraining any party from going onto the grounds of or
entering the dwelling that the parties share, from the residence,
workplace, or school of the other, or from the day care or school of a
child until further order of the court;
(c) Prohibiting any party from knowingly coming within, or
knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified
location;
(d) Restraining any party from interfering with the other's custody
of the minor children or from removing the children from the
jurisdiction of the court;
(e) Restraining any party from having any contact with the victim
of domestic violence or the victim's children or members of the
victim's household; and
(f) Considering the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.
(2) If there is reasonable cause to believe a party has committed
or will commit domestic violence, the court must (a) require the
respondent to surrender any firearm or other dangerous weapon, (b)
require the respondent to surrender a concealed pistol license issued
under RCW 9.41.070, (c) prohibit the respondent from obtaining or
possessing a firearm or other dangerous weapon, and (d) prohibit the
respondent from obtaining or possessing a concealed pistol license. An
order regarding firearms or other dangerous weapons remains in effect
until the party shows by clear and convincing evidence they do not pose
a threat to public health or safety, or to the health or safety of any
individual.
(3) Irreparable injury under this section includes but is not
limited to situations in which the respondent has recently threatened
petitioner with bodily injury or has engaged in acts of domestic
violence against the petitioner.
(((3))) (4) The court shall hold an ex parte hearing in person or
by telephone on the day the petition is filed or on the following
judicial day.
(((4))) (5) An ex parte temporary order for protection shall be
effective for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days or twenty-four
days if the court has permitted service by publication under RCW
26.50.085 or by mail under RCW 26.50.123. The ex parte order may be
reissued. A full hearing, as provided in this chapter, shall be set
for not later than fourteen days from the issuance of the temporary
order or not later than twenty-four days if service by publication or
by mail is permitted. Except as provided in RCW 26.50.050, 26.50.085,
and 26.50.123, the respondent shall be personally served with a copy of
the ex parte order along with a copy of the petition and notice of the
date set for the hearing.
(((5))) (6) Any order issued under this section shall contain the
date and time of issuance and the expiration date and shall be entered
into a statewide judicial information system by the clerk of the court
within one judicial day after issuance.
(((6))) (7) If the court declines to issue an ex parte temporary
order for protection the court shall state the particular reasons for
the court's denial. The court's denial of a motion for an ex parte
order of protection shall be filed with the court.

--- END ---