BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.026 and 2001 c 313 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
All administrative expenses of the board incurred on and after
April 1, 1963, shall be appropriated and paid from the liquor revolving
fund. These administrative expenses shall include, but not be limited
to: The salaries and expenses of the board and its employees, the cost
of establishing, leasing, maintaining, and operating state liquor
stores and warehouses, legal services, pilot projects, annual or other
audits, and other general costs of conducting the business of the
board, and the costs of supplying, installing, and maintaining
equipment used in state liquor stores and agency liquor vendor stores
for the purchase of liquor ((by nonlicensees)) using debit or credit
cards. The administrative expenses shall not, however, be deemed to
include costs of liquor and lottery tickets purchased, the cost of
transportation and delivery to the point of distribution, other costs
pertaining to the acquisition and receipt of liquor and lottery
tickets, packaging and repackaging of liquor, agency commissions for
agency liquor vendor stores, transaction fees associated with credit or
debit card purchases for liquor in state liquor stores and in the
stores of agency liquor vendors pursuant to RCW 66.16.040 and
66.16.041, sales tax, and those amounts distributed pursuant to RCW
66.08.180, 66.08.190, 66.08.200, 66.08.210 and 66.08.220. Agency
commissions for agency liquor vendor stores shall be established by the
liquor control board after consultation with and approval by the
director of the office of financial management. All expenditures and
payment of obligations authorized by this section are subject to the
allotment requirements of chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.16.041 and 1998 c 265 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state liquor control board shall accept bank credit card
and debit cards ((from nonlicensees)) for purchases in state liquor
stores, under such rules as the board may adopt. The board shall
authorize liquor vendors appointed under RCW 66.08.050 to accept bank
credit cards and debit cards for liquor purchases under this title,
under such rules as the board may adopt.
(2) If a liquor vendor operating an agency store chooses to use
credit or debit cards for liquor purchases ((by nonlicensees)), the
board shall provide equipment and installation and maintenance of the
equipment necessary to implement the use of credit and debit cards.
Any equipment provided by the board to an agency liquor vendor store
for this purpose may be used only for the purchase of liquor.
(3) If the revenues and expenditures associated with implementing
the use of credit and debit cards for the purchase of alcohol ((by
nonlicensees)) from state liquor stores and agency stores operated by
liquor vendors results in a reduction of the liquor revolving fund
balance for fiscal year 1999 and the 1999-01 biennium, the board shall
consider increasing the price of alcohol products to offset the
reduction.
(((4) The board shall provide a report evaluating the
implementation of this section, including revenue and expenditures, to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 1998.))

--- END ---