BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47.020 and 2000 c 79 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of
enrollment and payment for basic health care services, administered by
the plan administrator through participating managed health care
systems, created by this chapter.
(2) "Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Health coverage tax credit program" means the program created
by the Trade Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-210) that provides a federal tax
credit that subsidizes private health insurance coverage for displaced
workers certified to receive certain trade adjustment assistance
benefits and for individuals receiving benefits from the pension
benefit guaranty corporation.
(4) "Health coverage tax credit eligible enrollee" means individual
workers and their qualified family members who lose their jobs due to
the effects of international trade and are eligible for certain trade
adjustment assistance benefits; or are eligible for benefits under the
alternative trade adjustment assistance program; or are people who
receive benefits from the pension benefit guaranty corporation and are
at least fifty-five years old.
(5) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any
combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health
care services, as defined by the administrator and rendered by duly
licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the
plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations
under RCW 70.47.100(7).
(((4))) (6) "Subsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an
individual plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who
is not eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an area of
the state served by a managed health care system participating in the
plan; (d) whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not
exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for
family size and determined annually by the federal department of health
and human services; and (e) who chooses to obtain basic health care
coverage from a particular managed health care system in return for
periodic payments to the plan. To the extent that state funds are
specifically appropriated for this purpose, with a corresponding
federal match, "subsidized enrollee" also means an individual, or an
individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the requirements
in (a) through (c) and (e) of this subsection and whose gross family
income at the time of enrollment is more than two hundred percent, but
less than two hundred fifty-one percent, of the federal poverty level
as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal
department of health and human services.
(((5))) (7) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an
individual plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who
is not eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an area of
the state served by a managed health care system participating in the
plan; (d) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a
particular managed health care system; and (e) who pays or on whose
behalf is paid the full costs for participation in the plan, without
any subsidy from the plan.
(((6))) (8) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of
periodic payment the administrator makes to a managed health care
system on behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost
to the plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the
amount determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under
RCW 70.47.060(2).
(((7))) (9) "Premium" means a periodic payment, based upon gross
family income which an individual, their employer or another financial
sponsor makes to the plan as consideration for enrollment in the plan
as a subsidized enrollee ((or)), a nonsubsidized enrollee, or a health
coverage tax credit eligible enrollee.
(((8))) (10) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the
administrator with and paid to a participating managed health care
system, that is based upon the enrollment of subsidized ((and)),
nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees in the
plan and in that system.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.47.030 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 913 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The basic health plan trust account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Any nongeneral fund-state funds collected for this
program shall be deposited in the basic health plan trust account and
may be expended without further appropriation. Moneys in the account
shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter, including
payments to participating managed health care systems on behalf of
enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of administering the plan.
During the 1995-97 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
funds from the basic health plan trust account to the state general
fund.
(2) The basic health plan subscription account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from amounts due from or
on behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees and health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees shall be deposited into the account. Funds in the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter,
including payments to participating managed health care systems on
behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees and health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of administering
the plan. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
(3) The administrator shall take every precaution to see that none
of the funds in the separate accounts created in this section or that
any premiums paid either by subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees are
commingled in any way, except that the administrator may combine funds
designated for administration of the plan into a single administrative
account.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.47.060 and 2001 c 196 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator has the following powers and duties:
(1) To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered
basic health care services, including physician services, inpatient and
outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications, and
other services that may be necessary for basic health care. In
addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency
services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services
shall increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by
more than five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office
of financial management. All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in
any participating managed health care system under the Washington basic
health plan shall be entitled to receive covered basic health care
services in return for premium payments to the plan. The schedule of
services shall emphasize proven preventive and primary health care and
shall include all services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care. However, with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees
who are eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through the
medical assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator
shall not contract for such services except to the extent that such
services are necessary over not more than a one-month period in order
to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the
managed care provider. The schedule of services shall also include a
separate schedule of basic health care services for children, eighteen
years of age and younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees who choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only for
their dependent children. In designing and revising the schedule of
services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for assessing
health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030,
and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate.
(2)(a) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due
the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall not
require the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for
the plan. The structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to
subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (((9))) (10) of this section and to the share of the cost of
the plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees
pursuant to subsection (((10))) (11) of this section.
(b) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
shall be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(c) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. Premiums due from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees must be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to
the state for the plan, plus the administrative cost of providing the
plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201. The
administrator will consider the impact of eligibility determination by
the appropriate federal agency designated by the Trade Act of 2002
(P.L. 107-210) as well as the premium collection and remittance
activities by the United States internal revenue service when
determining the administrative cost charged for health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees.
(d) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator. The administrator shall establish a mechanism for
receiving premium payments from the United States internal revenue
service for health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees.
(((d))) (e) To develop, as an offering by every health carrier
providing coverage identical to the basic health plan, as configured on
January 1, 2001, a basic health plan model plan with uniformity in
enrollee cost-sharing requirements.
(3) To end the participation of health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees in the basic health plan if the federal government reduces or
terminates premium payments on their behalf through the United States
internal revenue service.
(4) To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing
due a managed health care system from subsidized ((and)),
nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The
structure shall discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health
care services, and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing mechanisms, but shall not be so costly to enrollees as to
constitute a barrier to appropriate utilization of necessary health
care services.
(((4))) (5) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for
subsidies so as to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for
such purposes. Whenever the administrator finds that there is danger
of such an overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment
until the administrator finds the danger no longer exists. Such a
closure does not apply to health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees
who receive a premium subsidy from the United States internal revenue
service as long as the enrollees qualify for the health coverage tax
credit program.
(((5))) (6) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized
enrollees, as defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided
to persons who qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as
defined by the administrator.
(((6))) (7) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the
delivery of services and availability of the plan to residents of the
state, subject to the limitations contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act
appropriating funds for the plan.
(((7))) (8) To solicit and accept applications from managed health
care systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible
basic health care providers under the plan for ((either)) subsidized
enrollees, ((or)) nonsubsidized enrollees, or ((both)) health coverage
tax credit eligible enrollees. The administrator shall endeavor to
assure that covered basic health care services are available to any
enrollee of the plan from among a selection of two or more
participating managed health care systems. In adopting any rules or
procedures applicable to managed health care systems and in its
dealings with such systems, the administrator shall consider and make
suitable allowance for the need for health care services and the
differences in local availability of health care resources, along with
other resources, within and among the several areas of the state.
Contracts with participating managed health care systems shall ensure
that basic health plan enrollees who become eligible for medical
assistance may, at their option, continue to receive services from
their existing providers within the managed health care system if such
providers have entered into provider agreements with the department of
social and health services.
(((8))) (9) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of
subsidized ((and)), nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees, deposit them in the basic health plan operating
account, keep records of enrollee status, and authorize periodic
payments to managed health care systems on the basis of the number of
enrollees participating in the respective managed health care systems.
(((9))) (10) To accept applications from individuals residing in
areas served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their spouses and
dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan
as subsidized ((or)), nonsubsidized, or health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees, to establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods
for enrollees as may be necessary, and to determine, upon application
and on a reasonable schedule defined by the authority, or at the
request of any enrollee, eligibility due to current gross family income
for sliding scale premiums. Funds received by a family as part of
participation in the adoption support program authorized under RCW
26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall not be counted toward
a family's current gross family income for the purposes of this
chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or income changes
accurately, the administrator shall have the authority either to bill
the enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil
penalties of up to two hundred percent of the amount of subsidy
overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly reporting income. The
administrator shall adopt rules to define the appropriate application
of these sanctions and the processes to implement the sanctions
provided in this subsection, within available resources. No subsidy
may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW
70.47.110, who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care
services under chapter 74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their
enrollment for no apparent good cause, the administrator may establish
appropriate rules or requirements that are applicable to such
individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in the plan.
(((10))) (11) To accept applications from business owners on behalf
of themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent children, as
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by
the plan. The administrator may require all or the substantial
majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in the
plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system.
The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an
amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for
medicare who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative
cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.
(((11))) (12) To determine the rate to be paid to each
participating managed health care system in return for the provision of
covered basic health care services to enrollees in the system.
Although the schedule of covered basic health care services will be the
same or actuarially equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates
negotiated with participating managed health care systems may vary
among the systems. In negotiating rates with participating systems,
the administrator shall consider the characteristics of the populations
served by the respective systems, economic circumstances of the local
area, the need to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust
account, and other factors the administrator finds relevant.
(((12))) (13) To monitor the provision of covered services to
enrollees by participating managed health care systems in order to
assure enrollee access to good quality basic health care, to require
periodic data reports concerning the utilization of health care
services rendered to enrollees in order to provide adequate information
for evaluation, and to inspect the books and records of participating
managed health care systems to assure compliance with the purposes of
this chapter. In requiring reports from participating managed health
care systems, including data on services rendered enrollees, the
administrator shall endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed
health care systems and to the plan. The administrator shall
coordinate any such reporting requirements with other state agencies,
such as the insurance commissioner and the department of health, to
minimize duplication of effort.
(((13))) (14) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private
employer- based health care coverage and to take appropriate measures
consistent with state and federal statutes that will discourage the
reduction of such coverage in the state.
(((14))) (15) To develop a program of proven preventive health
measures and to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and
consistent with this chapter.
(((15))) (16) To provide, consistent with available funding,
assistance for rural residents, underserved populations, and persons of
color.
(((16))) (17) In consultation with appropriate state and local
government agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for
persons confined or residing in government-operated institutions.
(((17))) (18) To administer the premium discounts provided under
RCW 48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with the
Washington state health insurance pool.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.43.015 and 2001 c 196 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For a health benefit plan offered to a group, every health
carrier shall reduce any preexisting condition exclusion, limitation,
or waiting period in the group health plan in accordance with the
provisions of section 2701 of the federal health insurance portability
and accountability act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg).
(2) For a health benefit plan offered to a group other than a small
group:
(a) If the individual applicant's immediately preceding health plan
coverage terminated during the period beginning ninety days and ending
sixty-four days before the date of application for the new plan and
such coverage was similar and continuous for at least three months,
then the carrier shall not impose a waiting period for coverage of
preexisting conditions under the new health plan.
(b) If the individual applicant's immediately preceding health plan
coverage terminated during the period beginning ninety days and ending
sixty-four days before the date of application for the new plan and
such coverage was similar and continuous for less than three months,
then the carrier shall credit the time covered under the immediately
preceding health plan toward any preexisting condition waiting period
under the new health plan.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, a preceding health plan
includes an employer-provided self-funded health plan, the basic health
plan's offering to health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees as
established by this act, and plans of the Washington state health
insurance pool.
(3) For a health benefit plan offered to a small group:
(a) If the individual applicant's immediately preceding health plan
coverage terminated during the period beginning ninety days and ending
sixty-four days before the date of application for the new plan and
such coverage was similar and continuous for at least nine months, then
the carrier shall not impose a waiting period for coverage of
preexisting conditions under the new health plan.
(b) If the individual applicant's immediately preceding health plan
coverage terminated during the period beginning ninety days and ending
sixty-four days before the date of application for the new plan and
such coverage was similar and continuous for less than nine months,
then the carrier shall credit the time covered under the immediately
preceding health plan toward any preexisting condition waiting period
under the new health plan.
(c) For the purpose of this subsection, a preceding health plan
includes an employer-provided self-funded health plan, the basic health
plan's offering to health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees as
established by this act, and plans of the Washington state health
insurance pool.
(4) For a health benefit plan offered to an individual, other than
an individual to whom subsection (5) of this section applies, every
health carrier shall credit any preexisting condition waiting period in
that plan for a person who was enrolled at any time during the sixty-three day period immediately preceding the date of application for the
new health plan in a group health benefit plan or an individual health
benefit plan, other than a catastrophic health plan, and (a) the
benefits under the previous plan provide equivalent or greater overall
benefit coverage than that provided in the health benefit plan the
individual seeks to purchase; or (b) the person is seeking an
individual health benefit plan due to his or her change of residence
from one geographic area in Washington state to another geographic area
in Washington state where his or her current health plan is not
offered, if application for coverage is made within ninety days of
relocation; or (c) the person is seeking an individual health benefit
plan: (i) Because a health care provider with whom he or she has an
established care relationship and from whom he or she has received
treatment within the past twelve months is no longer part of the
carrier's provider network under his or her existing Washington
individual health benefit plan; and (ii) his or her health care
provider is part of another carrier's provider network; and (iii)
application for a health benefit plan under that carrier's provider
network individual coverage is made within ninety days of his or her
provider leaving the previous carrier's provider network. The carrier
must credit the period of coverage the person was continuously covered
under the immediately preceding health plan toward the waiting period
of the new health plan. For the purposes of this subsection (4), a
preceding health plan includes an employer-provided self-funded health
plan, the basic health plan's offering to health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees as established by this act, and plans of the
Washington state health insurance pool.
(5) Every health carrier shall waive any preexisting condition
waiting period in its individual plans for a person who is an eligible
individual as defined in section 2741(b) of the federal health
insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec.
300gg-41(b)).
(6) Subject to the provisions of subsections (1) through (5) of
this section, nothing contained in this section requires a health
carrier to amend a health plan to provide new benefits in its existing
health plans. In addition, nothing in this section requires a carrier
to waive benefit limitations not related to an individual or group's
preexisting conditions or health history.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.43.018 and 2001 c 196 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in (a) through (((c))) (d) of this
subsection, a health carrier may require any person applying for an
individual health benefit plan to complete the standard health
questionnaire designated under chapter 48.41 RCW.
(a) If a person is seeking an individual health benefit plan due to
his or her change of residence from one geographic area in Washington
state to another geographic area in Washington state where his or her
current health plan is not offered, completion of the standard health
questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage if application for
coverage is made within ninety days of relocation.
(b) If a person is seeking an individual health benefit plan:
(i) Because a health care provider with whom he or she has an
established care relationship and from whom he or she has received
treatment within the past twelve months is no longer part of the
carrier's provider network under his or her existing Washington
individual health benefit plan; and
(ii) His or her health care provider is part of another carrier's
provider network; and
(iii) Application for a health benefit plan under that carrier's
provider network individual coverage is made within ninety days of his
or her provider leaving the previous carrier's provider network; then
completion of the standard health questionnaire shall not be a
condition of coverage.
(c) If a person is seeking an individual health benefit plan due to
his or her having exhausted continuation coverage provided under 29
U.S.C. Sec. 1161 et seq., completion of the standard health
questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage if application for
coverage is made within ninety days of exhaustion of continuation
coverage. A health carrier shall accept an application without a
standard health questionnaire from a person currently covered by such
continuation coverage if application is made within ninety days prior
to the date the continuation coverage would be exhausted and the
effective date of the individual coverage applied for is the date the
continuation coverage would be exhausted, or within ninety days
thereafter.
(d) If a person is seeking an individual health benefit plan due to
his or her no longer being enrolled in the basic health plan as a
health coverage tax credit program enrollee, a health carrier shall
accept an application without a standard health questionnaire if
application is made within ninety days prior to the date the enrollee's
eligibility for the health coverage tax credit program will end and the
effective date of the individual coverage applied for is the date the
eligibility for the program ends, or within ninety days thereafter.
(2) If, based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire, the person qualifies for coverage under the Washington
state health insurance pool, the following shall apply:
(a) The carrier may decide not to accept the person's application
for enrollment in its individual health benefit plan; and
(b) Within fifteen business days of receipt of a completed
application, the carrier shall provide written notice of the decision
not to accept the person's application for enrollment to both the
person and the administrator of the Washington state health insurance
pool. The notice to the person shall state that the person is eligible
for health insurance provided by the Washington state health insurance
pool, and shall include information about the Washington state health
insurance pool and an application for such coverage. If the carrier
does not provide or postmark such notice within fifteen business days,
the application is deemed approved.
(3) If the person applying for an individual health benefit plan:
(a) Does not qualify for coverage under the Washington state health
insurance pool based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire; (b) does qualify for coverage under the Washington state
health insurance pool based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire and the carrier elects to accept the person for
enrollment; or (c) is not required to complete the standard health
questionnaire designated under this chapter under subsection (1)(a) or
(b) of this section, the carrier shall accept the person for enrollment
if he or she resides within the carrier's service area and provide or
assure the provision of all covered services regardless of age, sex,
family structure, ethnicity, race, health condition, geographic
location, employment status, socioeconomic status, other condition or
situation, or the provisions of RCW 49.60.174(2). The commissioner may
grant a temporary exemption from this subsection if, upon application
by a health carrier, the commissioner finds that the clinical,
financial, or administrative capacity to serve existing enrollees will
be impaired if a health carrier is required to continue enrollment of
additional eligible individuals.

--- END ---