BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
CREATING THE HEALTH INSURANCE MARKET STABILIZATION POOL AND PREMIUM
ASSISTANCE FOR SMALL EMPLOYER GROUP HEALTH INSURANCE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature recognizes that our
current system of covering high-risk, high-cost patients for health
insurance is creating a fragile health insurance market and increasing
premiums.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to stabilize the health
insurance market and provide coverage for uninsured individuals by
broadly sharing the risk of high-cost patients throughout the health
insurance market.

Sec. 102 RCW 41.05.011 and 2001 c 165 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.
(2) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(6) "Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees
of the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and
appointed officials of the executive branch of government, including
full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees; and includes
any or all part-time and temporary employees under the terms and
conditions established under this chapter by the authority; justices of
the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and the superior
courts; and members of the state legislature or of the legislative
authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office after
February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees of a
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if
the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of
the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with
the authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee
organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option
of each such employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995,
employees of employee organizations currently pooled with employees of
school districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at
the option of each such employee organization; and (c) employees of a
school district if the authority agrees to provide any of the school
districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as
provided in RCW 28A.400.350.
(7) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(8) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(9) "Benefits contribution plan" means a premium only contribution
plan, a medical flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan
whereby state and public employees may agree to a contribution to
benefit costs which will allow the employee to participate in benefits
offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(10) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(11) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.
(12) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(13) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(40), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(14) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
and reserve officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.24.010 who
die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment as
determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and
industries.
(15) "Pool" means the health insurance market stabilization pool
created in this act.
(16) "Members" includes those health carriers as defined in RCW
48.43.005. It also means self-funded plans that voluntarily agree to
participate in the pool.
(17) "Covered person" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005, or an individual in a self-funded plan that has voluntarily
agreed to participate in the pool.
(18) "Participating enrollee" means a covered person who becomes
insured by the health insurance market stabilization pool when his or
her cost of health care services exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars
annually. A participating enrollee must continue to be a covered
person.
(19) "Cost of health care services" means the cost of allowed
health care services provided under a health plan. For the purposes of
this section, the terms "health care services" and "health plan" have
the same meaning as defined in RCW 48.43.005.
(20) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" have the same meaning
as defined in RCW 48.43.005.
(21) "Self-funded plan" means a self-funded health plan or health
benefit plan that has voluntarily agreed to participate in the pool.
(22) "Care management services" means the utilization management,
case management, disease management services, or other types of
structured administrative approaches to manage the quality or cost-effectiveness of health care services.
(23) "Premium" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 48.43.005.
(24) "Premium assistance enrollee" means an individual or an
individual plus the individual's spouse and dependent children: (a)
Who is not eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing
in a government-operated institution, unless he or she meets
eligibility criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) whose gross
family income at the time of enrollment does not exceed two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and
determined annually by the federal department of health and human
services; (d) who resides within the state of Washington; (e) who meets
the definition of eligible employee as defined in RCW 48.43.005; and
(f) who qualifies for and chooses to participate in the small employer-sponsored health insurance premium assistance option under section 109
of this act.
(25) "Small employer" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) To stabilize the health insurance
market and reduce health insurance premiums the health insurance market
stabilization pool is created. Effective July 1, 2005:
(a) All health carriers become members of the pool and self-funded
plans may voluntarily agree to become members of the pool;
(b) The pool will pay seventy-five percent of the cost of health
care services used by a participating enrollee;
(c) A member whose covered person becomes a participating enrollee
must pay twenty-five percent of the cost of health care services used
by that participating enrollee coordinated with any enrollee cost-sharing amounts;
(d) A participating enrollee's health plan or self-funded plan
remains intact when he or she becomes a participating enrollee;
(e) The participating enrollee's health plan or self-funded plan
determines the health care services used by the participating enrollee
and the cost of those health care services, including any cost-sharing
by the participating enrollee; and
(f) When the administrator determines that it is necessary for the
quality and cost-effectiveness of the health care services used by
participating enrollees, the administrator must contract for care
management services for the pool.
(2) The health insurance market stabilization pool account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
remittances collected under section 104 of this act must be deposited
in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purposes of this section, including the appropriate payment of health
care services provided to participating enrollees and the associated
administrative expenses of providing the pool. Only the administrator
or the administrator's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(3) To implement the pool, the administrator may:
(a) Enter into agreements with an authorized insurer as provided in
RCW 48.05.030 to provide reinsurance for the cost of health care
services for participating enrollees; and
(b) Enter into agreements with a reinsurance broker, other
insurance broker, or consultant to assist in selecting an authorized
insurer as provided in RCW 48.05.030 for the pool.
(4) The administrator shall provide a report to the legislature by
January 1, 2005, on the implementation activities of the pool. The
report must contain a brief action plan for completing the
implementation of the pool by July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) Beginning July 1, 2005, a member must
pay an annual remittance to the pool equal to a portion of seventy-five
percent of the annual cost of health care services and administration
for all participating enrollees.
(2) The administrator must determine a member's remittance based
upon the member's enrollment of covered persons for a twelve-month
period selected by the administrator.
(3) A member must pay its remittance on a periodic schedule to be
determined by the administrator.
(4) The total remittance for all members may not exceed twelve
percent of the annual premium of covered persons not in a self-funded
plan, plus the cost of health care services of covered persons in a
self-funded plan for a twelve-month period selected by the
administrator.
(5) To assist in determining the remittances, members must submit
annually, by a date selected by the administrator, the number of
covered persons where the cost of health care services exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars and the total cost of health care services for
these covered persons. The number of covered persons and the total
cost of health care services must be calculated for a twelve-month
period to be specified by the administrator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 (1) Beginning July 1, 2005, a member that
is not a self-funded plan must pay an initial annual remittance to the
Washington state health insurance pool premium assistance account
created in section 201 of this act, equal to 0.24 percent of that
member's annual premium.
(2) A member that is a self-funded plan will pay an initial annual
remittance to the Washington state health insurance pool premium
assistance account created in section 201 of this act, equal to 0.24
percent of that member's payments for health care services as agreed
upon by the member and the office of the insurance commissioner.
(3) The administrator shall publish all subsequent annual
remittances at least thirty days before the effective date and base the
remittances upon:
(a) A percentage of the annual premium for a member that is not a
self-funded health plan or a percentage of the annual payments for
health care services for a member that is a self-funded plan;
(b) The amount needed to provide premium assistance to a projection
of annual high risk pool premium assistance enrollees not to exceed two
thousand enrollees; and
(c) A public hearing held by the administrator at least one hundred
eighty days before the effective date of an annual remittance.
(4) A member must pay its remittance on a periodic schedule as
determined by the administrator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 (1) Beginning July 1, 2005, a member that
is not a self-funded plan will pay an initial annual remittance to the
small employer-sponsored health insurance premium assistance account,
created in section 108 of this act, equal to 0.49 percent of that
member's annual premium.
(2) A member that is a self-funded plan will pay an initial annual
remittance to the small employer-sponsored health insurance premium
assistance account created in section 108 of this act, equal to 0.49
percent of that member's payments for health care services as agreed
upon by the member and the office of the insurance commissioner.
(3) The administrator shall publish all subsequent annual
remittances at least thirty days before the effective date and base the
remittances upon:
(a) A percentage of the annual premium for a member that is not a
self-funded health plan or a percentage of the annual payments for
health care services for a member that is a self-funded plan;
(b) The amount needed to provide premium assistance to a projection
of annual high risk pool premium assistance enrollees not to exceed
twenty thousand enrollees; and
(c) A public hearing held by the administrator at least one hundred
eighty days before the effective date of an annual remittance.
(4) A member must pay its remittance on a periodic schedule as
determined by the administrator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 The administrator may adopt rules
consistent with sections 103 through 109 and 201 of this act to carry
out the purposes of this act. The rules may include but are not
limited to:
(1) Establishing and collecting remittances;
(2) Clarifying the eligibility of members;
(3) Establishing operating procedures with members to pay for a
participating enrollee's health care services; and
(4) Clarifying the eligibility of participating enrollees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 The small employer-sponsored health
insurance premium assistance account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from remittances collected under section
106 of this act must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for the purposes of providing premium
assistance, and the payment of costs of administering the collection
and verification of income for the determination of premium assistance,
as provided in section 109 of this act. Only the administrator or the
administrator's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 (1) Beginning July 1, 2005, the
administrator may accept applications to become premium assistance
enrollees from individuals whose current small employer has not offered
health insurance within the last six months, on behalf of themselves
and their spouses and dependent children, for assistance in paying
premiums to health plans, and to determine, upon application and on a
reasonable schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any
enrollee, eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding
scale premium assistance as provided under RCW 70.47.060. The
administrator may also determine the minimum premium contribution to be
paid by small employers participating in the small employer-sponsored
health insurance premium assistance option on behalf of premium
assistance enrollees. The administrator may use funds from the small
employer-sponsored health insurance premium assistance account, created
in section 108 of this act, for payment of small employer-sponsored
health insurance premiums on behalf of premium assistance enrollees
when:
(a) The cost of paying the premium assistance enrollee's employer-sponsored health insurance premium obligation would be less than the
subsidy that would be paid if the individual, or the individual plus
his or her spouse and dependent children, were to enroll in a
participating managed care system;
(b) The premium assistance enrollee agrees to provide verification
of continued enrollment in his or her small employer's employer-sponsored health insurance plan on a semiannual basis, or to notify the
administrator whenever his or her enrollment status changes, whichever
is earlier. Verification or notification may be made directly by the
employee, or through their employer or the carrier providing the small
employer health insurance product.
(2) The administrator may, in consultation with the office of the
insurance commissioner, adopt standards for minimum thresholds of small
employer-sponsored health insurance coverage under this section. The
office of the insurance commissioner is responsible for certifying
small employer health insurance products that meet any standards that
might be developed under this section.
(3) The administrator, in consultation with small employers,
carriers, and the office of the insurance commissioner, shall determine
the most efficient method for payment of premium assistance, with a
goal of minimizing the administrative burden on small employers.
(4) Funds received by a family as part of participation in the
adoption support program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100
through 74.13.145 may not be counted toward a family's current gross
family income for the purposes of this act. No premium assistance may
be paid to premium assistance enrollees whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW
70.47.110, who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care
services under chapter 74.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 A new section is added to chapter 74.09
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall make every effort to maximize
opportunities to blend public and private funds through subsidization
of small employer-sponsored health insurance premiums on behalf of
individuals eligible for medical assistance and children eligible for
the state children's health insurance program when such subsidization
is cost-effective for the state. In developing policies under this
section, the department shall consult with the health care authority
and, to the extent allowed by federal law, develop policies that are
consistent with those policies developed by the health care authority
under section 109 of this act so that entire families have the
opportunity to enroll in the same small employer-sponsored health
insurance plan.
(2) If a federal waiver is necessary to achieve consistency with
health care authority policies under section 109 of this act, the
department shall notify the relevant fiscal and policy committees of
the legislature on or before September 1, 2004. The notification must
include recommendations regarding federal waiver options that would
provide the flexibility needed to optimize the use of medical
assistance and state children's health insurance program funds to
subsidize small employer-sponsored health insurance premiums on behalf
of low-income families.

PART 2
PREMIUM ASSISTANCE FOR LOW-INCOME WASHINGTON STATE HEALTH INSURANCE
POOL ENROLLEES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The Washington state health insurance pool
premium assistance account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from remittances collected under section 105
of this act must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the purposes of providing and
administering premium assistance under RCW 48.41.200(3)(a)(iv). Only
the administrator or the administrator's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

Sec. 202 RCW 48.41.200 and 2000 c 79 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The pool shall determine the standard risk rate by calculating
the average individual standard rate charged for coverage comparable to
pool coverage by the five largest members, measured in terms of
individual market enrollment, offering such coverages in the state. In
the event five members do not offer comparable coverage, the standard
risk rate shall be established using reasonable actuarial techniques
and shall reflect anticipated experience and expenses for such coverage
in the individual market.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, maximum rates for
pool coverage shall be as follows:
(a) Maximum rates for a pool indemnity health plan shall be one
hundred fifty percent of the rate calculated under subsection (1) of
this section;
(b) Maximum rates for a pool care management plan shall be one
hundred twenty-five percent of the rate calculated under subsection (1)
of this section; and
(c) Maximum rates for a person eligible for pool coverage pursuant
to RCW 48.41.100(1)(a) who was enrolled at any time during the sixty-three day period immediately prior to the date of application for pool
coverage in a group health benefit plan or an individual health benefit
plan other than a catastrophic health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005,
where such coverage was continuous for at least eighteen months, shall
be:
(i) For a pool indemnity health plan, one hundred twenty-five
percent of the rate calculated under subsection (1) of this section;
and
(ii) For a pool care management plan, one hundred ten percent of
the rate calculated under subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) Subject to (b) and (c) of this subsection:
(i) The rate for any person aged fifty to sixty-four whose current
gross family income is less than two hundred fifty-one percent of the
federal poverty level and not receiving premium assistance as provided
in (a)(iv) of this subsection, shall be reduced by thirty percent from
what it would otherwise be;
(ii) The rate for any person aged fifty to sixty-four whose current
gross family income is more than two hundred fifty but less than three
hundred one percent of the federal poverty level shall be reduced by
fifteen percent from what it would otherwise be;
(iii) The rate for any person who has been enrolled in the pool for
more than thirty-six months shall be reduced by five percent from what
it would otherwise be;
(iv) Beginning July 1, 2005, the rate for any person whose gross
family income does not exceed two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level must be subsidized by receiving premium assistance from
the Washington state health insurance pool premium assistance account
as provided in section 201 of this act. The amount of premium
assistance must be calculated using the same percentage of subsidy
available to subsidized enrollees of the Washington basic health plan
under RCW 70.47.060.
(b) In no event shall the rate for any person, except those persons
receiving premium assistance as provided in (a)(iv) of this subsection,
be less than one hundred ten percent of the rate calculated under
subsection (1) of this section.
(c) Rate reductions under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection shall
be available only to the extent that funds are specifically
appropriated for this purpose in the omnibus appropriations act.

Sec. 203 RCW 48.41.060 and 2000 c 79 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall have the general powers and authority granted
under the laws of this state to insurance companies, health care
service contractors, and health maintenance organizations, licensed or
registered to offer or provide the kinds of health coverage defined
under this title. In addition thereto, the board shall:
(a) Designate or establish the standard health questionnaire to be
used under RCW 48.41.100 and 48.43.018, including the form and content
of the standard health questionnaire and the method of its application.
The questionnaire must provide for an objective evaluation of an
individual's health status by assigning a discreet measure, such as a
system of point scoring to each individual. The questionnaire must not
contain any questions related to pregnancy, and pregnancy shall not be
a basis for coverage by the pool. The questionnaire shall be designed
such that it is reasonably expected to identify the eight percent of
persons who are the most costly to treat who are under individual
coverage in health benefit plans, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, in
Washington state or are covered by the pool, if applied to all such
persons;
(b) Obtain from a member of the American academy of actuaries, who
is independent of the board, a certification that the standard health
questionnaire meets the requirements of (a) of this subsection;
(c) Approve the standard health questionnaire and any modifications
needed to comply with this chapter. The standard health questionnaire
shall be submitted to an actuary for certification, modified as
necessary, and approved at least every eighteen months. The
designation and approval of the standard health questionnaire by the
board shall not be subject to review and approval by the commissioner.
The standard health questionnaire or any modification thereto shall not
be used until ninety days after public notice of the approval of the
questionnaire or any modification thereto, except that the initial
standard health questionnaire approved for use by the board after March
23, 2000, may be used immediately following public notice of such
approval;
(d) Establish appropriate rates, rate schedules, rate adjustments,
expense allowances, claim reserve formulas and any other actuarial
functions appropriate to the operation of the pool. Rates shall not be
unreasonable in relation to the coverage provided, the risk experience,
and expenses of providing the coverage. Rates and rate schedules may
be adjusted for appropriate risk factors such as age and area variation
in claim costs and shall take into consideration appropriate risk
factors in accordance with established actuarial underwriting practices
consistent with Washington state individual plan rating requirements
under RCW 48.44.022 and 48.46.064;
(e) Assess members of the pool in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter, and make advance interim assessments as may be reasonable
and necessary for the organizational or interim operating expenses.
Any interim assessments will be credited as offsets against any regular
assessments due following the close of the year;
(f) Issue policies of health coverage in accordance with the
requirements of this chapter;
(g) Establish procedures for the administration of the premium
discount provided under RCW 48.41.200(3)(a)(iii);
(h) Contract with the Washington state health care authority for
the administration of the premium discounts provided under RCW
48.41.200(3)(a) (i) ((and)), (ii), and (iv);
(i) Set a reasonable fee to be paid to an insurance agent licensed
in Washington state for submitting an acceptable application for
enrollment in the pool; and
(j) Provide certification to the commissioner when assessments will
exceed the threshold level established in RCW 48.41.037.
(2) In addition thereto, the board may:
(a) Enter into contracts as are necessary or proper to carry out
the provisions and purposes of this chapter including the authority,
with the approval of the commissioner, to enter into contracts with
similar pools of other states for the joint performance of common
administrative functions, or with persons or other organizations for
the performance of administrative functions;
(b) Sue or be sued, including taking any legal action as necessary
to avoid the payment of improper claims against the pool or the
coverage provided by or through the pool;
(c) Appoint appropriate legal, actuarial, and other committees as
necessary to provide technical assistance in the operation of the pool,
policy, and other contract design, and any other function within the
authority of the pool; and
(d) Conduct periodic audits to assure the general accuracy of the
financial data submitted to the pool, and the board shall cause the
pool to have an annual audit of its operations by an independent
certified public accountant.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require or
authorize the adoption of rules under chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 204 RCW 70.47.060 and 2001 c 196 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The administrator has the following powers and duties:
(1) To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered
basic health care services, including physician services, inpatient and
outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications, and
other services that may be necessary for basic health care. In
addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency
services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services
shall increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by
more than five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office
of financial management. All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in
any participating managed health care system under the Washington basic
health plan shall be entitled to receive covered basic health care
services in return for premium payments to the plan. The schedule of
services shall emphasize proven preventive and primary health care and
shall include all services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care. However, with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees
who are eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through the
medical assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator
shall not contract for such services except to the extent that such
services are necessary over not more than a one-month period in order
to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the
managed care provider. The schedule of services shall also include a
separate schedule of basic health care services for children, eighteen
years of age and younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees who choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only for
their dependent children. In designing and revising the schedule of
services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for assessing
health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030,
and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate.
(2)(a) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due
the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall not
require the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for
the plan. The structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to
subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (9) of this section and to the share of the cost of the plan
due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees pursuant
to subsection (10) of this section.
(b) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
shall be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(c) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator.
(d) To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing
coverage identical to the basic health plan, as configured on January
1, 2001, a basic health plan model plan with uniformity in enrollee
cost-sharing requirements.
(3) To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing
due a managed health care system from subsidized and nonsubsidized
enrollees. The structure shall discourage inappropriate enrollee
utilization of health care services, and may utilize copayments,
deductibles, and other cost-sharing mechanisms, but shall not be so
costly to enrollees as to constitute a barrier to appropriate
utilization of necessary health care services.
(4) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as
to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes.
Whenever the administrator finds that there is danger of such an
overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment until the
administrator finds the danger no longer exists.
(5) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as
defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who
qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the
administrator.
(6) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery
of services and availability of the plan to residents of the state,
subject to the limitations contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act
appropriating funds for the plan.
(7) To solicit and accept applications from managed health care
systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic
health care providers under the plan for either subsidized enrollees,
or nonsubsidized enrollees, or both. The administrator shall endeavor
to assure that covered basic health care services are available to any
enrollee of the plan from among a selection of two or more
participating managed health care systems. In adopting any rules or
procedures applicable to managed health care systems and in its
dealings with such systems, the administrator shall consider and make
suitable allowance for the need for health care services and the
differences in local availability of health care resources, along with
other resources, within and among the several areas of the state.
Contracts with participating managed health care systems shall ensure
that basic health plan enrollees who become eligible for medical
assistance may, at their option, continue to receive services from
their existing providers within the managed health care system if such
providers have entered into provider agreements with the department of
social and health services.
(8) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized
and nonsubsidized enrollees, deposit them in the basic health plan
operating account, keep records of enrollee status, and authorize
periodic payments to managed health care systems on the basis of the
number of enrollees participating in the respective managed health care
systems.
(9) To accept applications from individuals residing in areas
served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their spouses and
dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan
as subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, to establish appropriate
minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as may be necessary, and to
determine, upon application and on a reasonable schedule defined by the
authority, or at the request of any enrollee, eligibility due to
current gross family income for sliding scale premiums. Funds received
by a family as part of participation in the adoption support program
authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall
not be counted toward a family's current gross family income for the
purposes of this chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or
income changes accurately, the administrator shall have the authority
either to bill the enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or to
impose civil penalties of up to two hundred percent of the amount of
subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly reporting income. The
administrator shall adopt rules to define the appropriate application
of these sanctions and the processes to implement the sanctions
provided in this subsection, within available resources. No subsidy
may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW
70.47.110, who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care
services under chapter 74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their
enrollment for no apparent good cause, the administrator may establish
appropriate rules or requirements that are applicable to such
individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in the plan.
(10) To accept applications from business owners on behalf of
themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent children, as
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by
the plan. The administrator may require all or the substantial
majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in the
plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system.
The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an
amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for
medicare who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative
cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.
(11) To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed
health care system in return for the provision of covered basic health
care services to enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of
covered basic health care services will be the same or actuarially
equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated with
participating managed health care systems may vary among the systems.
In negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator
shall consider the characteristics of the populations served by the
respective systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need
to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust account, and
other factors the administrator finds relevant.
(12) To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by
participating managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee
access to good quality basic health care, to require periodic data
reports concerning the utilization of health care services rendered to
enrollees in order to provide adequate information for evaluation, and
to inspect the books and records of participating managed health care
systems to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter. In
requiring reports from participating managed health care systems,
including data on services rendered enrollees, the administrator shall
endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care systems and
to the plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting
requirements with other state agencies, such as the insurance
commissioner and the department of health, to minimize duplication of
effort.
(13) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private employer-based health care coverage and to take appropriate measures consistent
with state and federal statutes that will discourage the reduction of
such coverage in the state.
(14) To develop a program of proven preventive health measures and
to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and consistent with
this chapter.
(15) To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for
rural residents, underserved populations, and persons of color.
(16) In consultation with appropriate state and local government
agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for persons
confined or residing in government-operated institutions.
(17) To administer the premium discounts provided under RCW
48.41.200(3)(a) (i) ((and)), (ii), and (iv) pursuant to a contract with
the Washington state health insurance pool.

PART 3
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 Sections 103 through 109 and 201 of this
act are each added to chapter 41.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---