BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.56.070 and 2003 c 53 s 72 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of taking a motor vehicle without permission
in the first degree if he or she, without the permission of the owner
or person entitled to possession, intentionally takes or drives away an
automobile or motor vehicle, whether propelled by steam, electricity,
or internal combustion engine, that is the property of another, and he
or she:
(a) Causes physical damage to the vehicle in an amount of one
thousand five hundred dollars or more in value;
(b) Alters the motor vehicle for the purpose of changing its
appearance or primary identification, including obscuring, removing, or
changing the manufacturer's serial number or the vehicle identification
number plates;
(((b))) (c) Removes, or participates in the removal of, parts from
the motor vehicle with the intent to sell the parts;
(((c))) (d) Exports, or attempts to export, the motor vehicle
across state lines or out of the United States for profit;
(((d))) (e) Intends to sell the motor vehicle; or
(((e))) (f) Is engaged in a conspiracy and the central object of
the conspiratorial agreement is the theft of motor vehicles for sale to
others for profit.
(2) Taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first degree
is a class ((B)) A felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9A.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of taking a motor vehicle without permission
in the second degree if he or she, without the permission of the owner
or person entitled to possession, intentionally takes or drives away
any automobile or motor vehicle, whether propelled by steam,
electricity, or internal combustion engine, that is the property of
another, or he or she voluntarily rides in or upon the automobile or
motor vehicle with knowledge of the fact that the automobile or motor
vehicle was unlawfully taken, and either person causes physical damage
to the vehicle in an amount of more than one hundred dollars and less
than one thousand five hundred dollars in value.
(2) Taking a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree
is a class B felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.56.075 and 2003 c 53 s 73 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of taking a motor vehicle without permission
in the ((second)) third degree if he or she, without the permission of
the owner or person entitled to possession, intentionally takes or
drives away any automobile or motor vehicle, whether propelled by
steam, electricity, or internal combustion engine, that is the property
of another, or he or she voluntarily rides in or upon the automobile or
motor vehicle with knowledge of the fact that the automobile or motor
vehicle was unlawfully taken.
(2) Taking a motor vehicle without permission in the ((second))
third degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.533 and 2003 c 53 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence
ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.
(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the
standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid
sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the
seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by
seventy-five percent.
(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is
subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is
being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to
commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to
the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class
C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both,
and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements
under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has
previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July
23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection
(4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the
enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all
felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed
felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to
the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which
underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section
based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c)
of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender
has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after
July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or
subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly
weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of
the enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to
all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense
while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender
is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If
the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in
this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility,
and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under
chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(a) or (b) or 69.50.410;
(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(c), (d), or (e);
(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.
For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a
state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part
of that facility or county jail.
(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter
69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or
9.94A.605.
(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence
range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each
prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.
(8)(a) If the offender is being sentenced for taking a motor
vehicle without permission in the first degree, taking a motor vehicle
without permission in the second degree, or taking a motor vehicle
without permission in the third degree, and the offender has previously
been sentenced on two or more occasions for any of the following:
Taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first degree, taking
a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree, or taking a
motor vehicle without permission in the third degree, an additional
five years shall be added to the standard sentence range for the crime
the offender is being sentenced for.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the entire
additional five years is mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However,
whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender
serving a sentence under this subsection may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4).

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2003 c 335 s 5, 2003 c 283 s 33, 2003 c
267 s 3, 2003 c 250 s 14, 2003 c 119 s 8, 2003 c 53 s 56, and 2003 c 52
s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

((Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)))

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(3))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (section 2 of this act)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 3 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

((Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)))

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 6 RCW 13.40.0357 and 2003 c 378 s 2, 2003 c 335 s 6, and
2003 c 53 s 97 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

JUVENILE
DISPOSITION
OFFENSE
CATEGORY DESCRIPTION (RCW CITATION) JUVENILE DISPOSITION
CATEGORY FOR
ATTEMPT, BAILJUMP,
CONSPIRACY, OR
SOLICITATION

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090(2) (a)
and (c)) E

E Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090(2)(b)) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus
with Intent to Commit Arson (9.40.105) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)
B+

Assault and Other Crimes Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary (9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Mineral Trespass (78.44.330) C

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol
(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug
(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug
with Intent to Sell (69.41.030(2)(a)) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug
(69.41.030(2)(b)) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Narcotic,
Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Sale
(69.50.401(2) (a) or (b)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale
(69.50.401(2)(c)) C

E Possession of Marihuana <40 grams
(69.50.4014) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled
Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit
(69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Narcotic,
Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam
Counterfeit Substances (69.50.4011(2) (a)
or (b)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit
Substances (69.50.4011(2) (c), (d), or (e)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled
Substance (69.50.4013) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled
Substance (69.50.4012)
C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm (9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by Minor (<18)
(9.41.040(2)(a)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon
(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use of
Weapon (9.41.270)
E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)
D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)
C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(b)) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(a)) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure (Victim <14)
(9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over)
(9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock 1 and 2 (9A.56.080 and
9A.56.083) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)) D

D Identity Theft 2 (9.35.020(3)) E

D Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (9.35.010) E

B Possession of Stolen Property 1
(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2
(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3
(9A.56.170) E

C+ Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
1 ((and)), 2, and 3 (9A.56.070, section 2 of
this act, and 9A.56.075)
D+

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License (46.20.005) E

B+ Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502 and 46.61.504)
E

Other

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls
(9.61.230) E

A Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
A Felony B+

B Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
B Felony C

C Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
C Felony D

D Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation of Order of Restitution,
Community Supervision, or Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses
and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks
confinement
2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks
confinement
3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month
period - 12 weeks confinement

2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order,
it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may
select sentencing option A, B, C, D, or RCW 13.40.167.

OPTION A
JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID
STANDARD RANGE

A+
180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

EXCEPT

30-40

WEEKS FOR

15-17

YEAR OLDS

Current B+ 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

Offense WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL 52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) 15-36 WEEKS WEEKS

C+ LS

15-36 WEEKS

C LS 15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions:

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Restitution

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4
or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of
confinement.
(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category.
The current offense category is determined by the offense of
adjudication.
(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior
adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior
felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation,
misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4
point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.
(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined
by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications
and the row defined by the current offense category.
(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense.
(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an
offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall
not include confinement.

OR

OPTION B
SUSPENDED DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

(1) If the offender is subject to a standard range disposition
involving confinement by the department, the court may impose the
standard range and suspend the disposition on condition that the
offender comply with one or more local sanctions and any educational or
treatment requirement. The treatment programs provided to the offender
must be research-based best practice programs as identified by the
Washington state institute for public policy or the joint legislative
audit and review committee.
(2) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition,
the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke
the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.
(3) An offender is ineligible for the suspended disposition option
under this section if the offender is:
(a) Adjudicated of an A+ offense;
(b) Fourteen years of age or older and is adjudicated of one or
more of the following offenses:
(i) A class A offense, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation
to commit a class A offense;
(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060); or
(iii) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021), extortion in
the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120), kidnapping in the second degree (RCW
9A.40.030), robbery in the second degree (RCW 9A.56.210), residential
burglary (RCW 9A.52.025), burglary in the second degree (RCW
9A.52.030), drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045), vehicular homicide (RCW
46.61.520), hit and run death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a)), intimidating a
witness (RCW 9A.72.110), violation of the uniform controlled substances
act (*RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)), or manslaughter 2 (RCW
9A.32.070), when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon
another or when during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the
offense the respondent was armed with a deadly weapon;
(c) Ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm violation under
RCW 13.40.193; or
(d) Adjudicated of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

OR

OPTION C
CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition
of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not
committed an A- or B+ offense, the court may impose a disposition
under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION D
MANIFEST INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under option A, B, or C
would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a
disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---