BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if he or she
knowingly transports or accepts delivery of live nonambulatory
livestock to, from, or between any livestock market, feedlot,
slaughtering facility, or similar facility that trades in livestock.
The transport or acceptance of each nonambulatory livestock animal is
considered a separate and distinct violation.
(2) Nonambulatory livestock must be humanely euthanized before
transport.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "nonambulatory livestock"
means cattle, sheep, swine, and goats and horses, mules, or other
equine that cannot rise from a recumbent position or cannot walk,
including but not limited to those with broken appendages, severed
tendons or ligaments, nerve paralysis, fractured vertebral column, or
metabolic conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---