BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.920 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to a
farmer of bedding materials used to accumulate and facilitate the
removal of chicken or livestock manure. The farmer must be raising
chickens or livestock that are sold as agricultural products.
(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.920.
(a) "Bedding materials" means wood shavings, wood chips, straw,
sawdust, shredded paper, and other similar materials.
(b) "Farmer" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.213.
(c) "Livestock" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 16.36.005.
(d) "Agricultural product" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.04.213.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.920 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use by a farmer of bedding materials used to accumulate and facilitate
the removal of chicken or livestock manure. The farmer must be raising
chickens or livestock that are sold as agricultural products.
(2) The exemption certificate, recordkeeping requirements, and
definitions of RCW 82.08.920 apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---