BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that for most
individuals and families the purchase of a home is the most important
investment decision they will make. In addition to providing shelter
and functioning as the center of one's personal and family life, the
home can be a source of future economic security as its value
appreciates over time. Increasingly, however, the buyers of new homes
are finding that deficiencies in the quality of construction are
resulting in homes that are not weather tight or structurally sound,
and which generally do not function up to the standards that the home
buyer should reasonably expect. Although state and local building
codes provide basic guidelines that must be met with respect to the
construction process, these codes do not address the actual functioning
of a home once the construction process has been completed, and are not
sufficient to ensure that a home is free of water intrusion or other
unforeseen problems related to construction deficiencies. Accordingly,
the legislature finds that explicit, detailed legal standards should be
created governing both the functioning of newly constructed homes and
the rights and responsibilities of the builder and the homeowner. By
creating these explicit standards, the legislature intends to provide
a reference point that can be used by builders and homeowners in
resolving disputes over alleged construction defects and, thus,
facilitate the resolution of homeowner claims.
The legislature further finds that the prompt and fair resolution
of construction defect claims serves the interests of homeowners,
builders, and the citizens of this state. The use of the courts for
the resolution of these claims has proven to be inefficient and costly,
insofar as legal actions often take years to resolve, clog our already
overburdened court system, and involve legal expenses that are unduly
burdensome on all parties. Furthermore, the costs associated with
protracted construction defect litigation have contributed to the
skyrocketing insurance premiums experienced in recent years by both
builders and homeowners. Therefore, the legislature finds that a
nonjudicial process should be created for the quick and fair resolution
of construction defect claims. By creating such a process, the
legislature intends to provide a mechanism by which builders and
homeowners may resolve these claims without resort to legal action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) There is no monetary liability on the
part of, and no cause of action for damages against, any person or
other legal entity that is:
(i)(A) Under contract with an applicant for a residential building
permit to provide independent quality review of the plans and
specifications provided with the application in order to determine
compliance with all applicable requirements imposed by all applicable
building codes and statutes; or (B) under contract with that applicant
to provide independent quality review of the work of improvement to
determine compliance with these plans and specifications, if the person
or other legal entity meets the requirements of this section and either
(a)(ii) or (iii) of this subsection applies;
(ii) The person, or a person employed by any other legal entity,
performing the work as described in this subsection, has completed not
less than five years of verifiable experience in the appropriate field,
has obtained certification as a building inspector from the
International Code Council, and has successfully passed the technical
written examination promulgated by the council for a building
inspector; or
(iii) The person, or a person employed by any other legal entity,
performing the work as described in this section, has completed not
less than five years of verifiable experience in the appropriate field
and is a registered professional engineer, licensed general contractor,
or a licensed architect rendering independent quality review of the
work of improvement or plan examination services within the scope of
his or her registration or licensure.
(b) The immunity provided under this section does not apply to any
action initiated by the applicant who retained the qualified person.
A "qualified person" for purposes of this section means a person
meeting the requirements set forth under subsection (1)(a)(i) and (ii)
of this section.
(2) Except for qualified persons, this section does not relieve
from, excuse, or lessen in any manner the responsibility or liability
of any person, company, contractor, builder, developer, architect,
engineer, designer, or other individual or entity who develops,
improves, owns, operates, or manages any residential building for any
damages to persons or property caused by construction or design
defects. The fact that an inspection by a qualified person has taken
place may not be introduced as evidence in a construction defect
action, including any reports or other items generated by the qualified
person. This subsection does not apply in any action initiated by the
applicant who retained the qualified person.
(3) This section, as it relates to construction inspectors or plans
examiners, does not alter the requirements for licensure, or the
jurisdiction, authority, or scope of practice, of architects,
professional engineers, or general contractors.
(4) This section does not alter the immunity of public employees
for tort claims resulting from actions taken under this chapter.
(5) The qualifying person may engage in no other construction,
design, planning, supervision, or activities of any kind on the work of
improvement, nor provide quality review services for any other party on
the work of improvement.
(6) The qualifying person, or other legal entity, must maintain
professional errors and omissions insurance coverage in an amount not
less than two million dollars.
(7) The immunity provided under subsection (1) of this section does
not inure to the benefit of the qualified person for damages caused to
the applicant solely by the negligence or willful misconduct of the
qualified person resulting from the provision of services under the
contract with the applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Structure" means a detached, single-family home and any other
building or improvement located upon the lot shared with the single-family home. "Structure" does not include condominiums.
(2) "Designed moisture barrier" means an installed moisture barrier
specified in the plans and specifications, contract documents, or
manufacturer's recommendations.
(3) "Actual moisture barrier" means any component or material,
actually installed, that serves to any degree as a barrier against
moisture, whether or not intended as such.
(4) "Unintended water" means water that passes beyond, around, or
through a component or the material that is designed to prevent that
passage.
(5) "Close of escrow" means the date of the close of escrow between
the builder and the original homeowner. With respect to claims by a
homeowners association, "close of escrow" means the date of substantial
completion of structures on properties located within the association's
jurisdiction.
(6) "Claimant" or "homeowner" means the individual owners of
structures or a homeowners' association as defined under chapter 64.38
RCW.
(7) "Builder" means a builder, developer, or original seller.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In any action seeking recovery of damages
arising out of, or related to deficiencies in, the residential
construction, design, specifications, surveying, planning, supervision,
testing, or observation of construction, a builder, subcontractor,
material supplier, individual product manufacturer, or design
professional is, except as specifically set forth in this chapter,
liable for, and the claimant's claims or causes of action are limited
to violation of, the following standards, except as specifically set
forth in this chapter. This chapter applies to original construction
intended to be sold as a detached, single-family home, including
appurtenant structures.
(1) The standards relating to water intrusion issues are as
follows:
(a) A door must not allow unintended water to pass beyond, around,
or through the door or its designed or actual moisture barriers, if
any;
(b) Windows, patio doors, deck doors, and their systems must not
allow water to pass beyond, around, or through the window, patio door,
or deck door or its designed or actual moisture barriers, including,
without limitation, internal barriers within the systems themselves.
For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), "systems" include, without
limitation, windows, window assemblies, framing, substrate, flashings,
and trim, if any;
(c) Windows, patio doors, deck doors, and their systems must not
allow excessive condensation to enter the structure and cause damage to
another component. For purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "systems"
include, without limitation, windows, window assemblies, framing,
substrate, flashings, and trim, if any;
(d) Roofs, roofing systems, chimney caps, and ventilation
components must not allow water to enter the structure or to pass
beyond, around, or through the designed or actual moisture barriers,
including, without limitation, internal barriers located within the
systems themselves. For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "systems"
include, without limitation, framing, substrate, and sheathing, if any;
(e) Decks, deck systems, balconies, balcony systems, exterior
stairs, and stair systems must not allow water to pass into the
adjacent structure. For purposes of this subsection (1)(e), "systems"
include, without limitation, framing, substrate, flashing, and
sheathing, if any;
(f) Decks, deck systems, balconies, balcony systems, exterior
stairs, and stair systems must not allow unintended water to pass
within the systems themselves and cause damage to the systems. For
purposes of this subsection (1)(f), "systems" include, without
limitation, framing, substrate, flashing, and sheathing, if any;
(g) Foundation systems and slabs must not allow water or vapor to
enter into the structure so as to cause damage to another building
component;
(h) Foundation systems and slabs must not allow water or vapor to
enter into the structure so as to limit the installation of the type of
flooring materials typically used for the particular application;
(i) Hardscape, including paths and patios, irrigation systems,
landscaping systems, and drainage systems, that are installed as part
of the original construction, must not be installed in such a way as to
cause water or eroded soil to enter into or come in contact with the
structure so as to cause damage to another building component;
(j) Stucco, exterior siding, exterior walls, including, without
limitation, exterior framing, and other exterior wall finishes and
fixtures and the systems of those components and fixtures, including,
but not limited to, pot shelves, horizontal surfaces, columns, and
plant-ons, must be installed in such a way so as not to allow
unintended water to pass into the structure or to pass beyond, around,
or through the designed or actual moisture barriers of the system,
including any internal barriers located within the system itself. For
purposes of this subsection (1)(j), "systems" include, without
limitation, framing, substrate, flashings, trim, wall assemblies, and
internal wall cavities, if any;
(k) Stucco, exterior siding, and exterior walls must not allow
excessive condensation to enter the structure and cause damage to
another component. For purposes of this subsection (1)(k), "systems"
include, without limitation, framing, substrate, flashings, trim, wall
assemblies, and internal wall cavities, if any;
(l) Retaining and site walls and their associated drainage systems
must not allow unintended water to pass beyond, around, or through its
designed or actual moisture barriers including, without limitation, any
internal barriers, so as to cause damage. This standard does not apply
to those portions of any wall or drainage system that are designed to
have water flow beyond, around, or through them;
(m) Retaining walls and site walls, and their associated drainage
systems must only allow water to flow beyond, around, or through the
areas designated by design;
(n) Lines and components of the plumbing system, sewer system, and
utility systems must not leak;
(o) Plumbing lines, sewer lines, and utility lines must not corrode
so as to impede the useful life of the systems;
(p) Sewer systems must be installed in such a way as to allow the
designated amount of sewage to flow through the system;
(q) Shower and bath enclosures must not leak water into the
interior of walls, flooring systems, or other components; and
(r) Ceramic tile and tile countertops must not allow water into the
interior of walls, flooring systems, or other components so as to cause
damage.
(2) The standards relating to structural issues are as follows:
(a) Foundations, load bearing components, and slabs must not
contain significant cracks or significant vertical displacement;
(b) Foundations, load bearing components, and slabs must not cause
the structure, in whole or in part, to be structurally unsafe;
(c) Foundations, load bearing components, slabs, and underlying
soils must be constructed so as to materially comply with the design
criteria set by applicable government building codes, rules,
regulations, and ordinances for chemical deterioration or corrosion
resistance in effect at the time of original construction; and
(d) A structure must be constructed so as to materially comply with
the design criteria for earthquake and wind load resistance, as set
forth in the applicable government building codes, rules, regulations,
and ordinances in effect at the time of original construction.
(3) The standards relating to soil issues are as follows:
(a) Soils and engineered retaining walls must not cause, in whole
or in part, damage to the structure built upon the soil or engineered
retaining wall;
(b) Soils and engineered retaining walls must not cause, in whole
or in part, the structure to be structurally unsafe; and
(c) Soils must not cause, in whole or in part, the land upon which
no structure is built to become unusable for the purpose represented at
the time of original sale by the builder or for the purpose for which
that land is commonly used.
(4) The standards relating to fire protection issues are as
follows:
(a) A structure shall be constructed so as to materially comply
with the design criteria of the applicable government building codes,
rules, regulations, and ordinances for fire protection of the occupants
in effect at the time of the original construction;
(b) Fireplaces, chimneys, chimney structures, and chimney
termination caps must be constructed and installed in such a way so as
not to cause an unreasonable risk of fire outside the fireplace
enclosure or chimney; and
(c) Electrical and mechanical systems must be constructed and
installed in such a way so as not to cause an unreasonable risk of
fire.
(5) The standards relating to plumbing and sewer issues are as
follows: Plumbing and sewer systems must be installed to operate
properly and must not materially impair the use of the structure by its
inhabitants. However, an action may not be brought for a violation of
this subsection more than four years after close of escrow.
(6) The standards relating to electrical system issues are as
follows: Electrical systems must operate properly and must not
materially impair the use of the structure by its inhabitants.
However, an action may not be brought for a violation of this
subsection more than four years from close of escrow.
(7) The standards relating to the functioning of the structure and
other aspects of construction are as follows:
(a) Exterior pathways, driveways, hardscape, sidewalls, sidewalks,
and patios installed by the original builder must not contain cracks
that display significant vertical displacement or that are excessive.
However, an action may not be brought for a violation of this
subsection (7)(a) more than four years from close of escrow;
(b) Stucco, exterior siding, and other exterior wall finishes and
fixtures, including, but not limited to, pot shelves, horizontal
surfaces, columns, and plant-ons, must not contain significant cracks
or separations;
(c) To the extent not otherwise covered by subsections (1) through
(7) of this section, manufactured products, including, but not limited
to, windows, doors, roofs, plumbing products and fixtures, fireplaces,
electrical fixtures, HVAC units, countertops, cabinets, paint, and
appliances must be installed so as not to interfere with the products'
useful life, if any.
(i) For purposes of this subsection, "useful life" means a
representation of how long a product is warranted or represented,
through its limited warranty or any written representations, to last by
its manufacturer, including recommended or required maintenance. If
there is no representation by a manufacturer, a builder must install
manufactured products so as not to interfere with the product's
utility.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection, "manufactured product" means
a product that is completely manufactured off-site.
(iii) If no useful life representation is made, or if the
representation is less than one year, the useful life period is not
less than one year. If a manufactured product is damaged as a result
of a violation of the standards under this section, damage to the
product is a recoverable element of damages. This subsection does not
limit recovery if there has been damage to another building component
caused by a manufactured product during the manufactured product's
useful life.
(iv) This chapter does not apply in any action seeking recovery
solely for a defect in a manufactured product located within or
adjacent to a structure;
(d) Heating, if any, must be installed so as to be capable of
maintaining a room temperature of seventy degrees Fahrenheit at a point
three feet above the floor in any living space;
(e) Living space air-conditioning, if any, must be provided in a
manner consistent with the size and efficiency design criteria
specified;
(f) Attached structures must be constructed to comply with
interunit noise transmission standards set by the applicable government
building codes, rules, regulations, or ordinances in effect at the time
of the original construction. If there is no applicable code, rule,
regulation, or ordinance, this subsection does not apply. However, an
action may not be brought for a violation of this subsection more than
one year from the original occupancy of the adjacent unit;
(g) Irrigation systems and drainage must operate properly so as not
to damage landscaping or other external improvements. However, an
action may not be brought for a violation of this subsection more than
one year from close of escrow;
(h) Untreated wood posts must not be installed in contact with soil
so as to cause unreasonable decay to the wood based upon the finish
grade at the time of original construction. However, an action may not
be brought for a violation of this subsection more than two years from
close of escrow;
(i) Untreated steel fences and adjacent components must be
installed so as to prevent unreasonable corrosion. However, an action
may not be brought for a violation of this subsection more than four
years from close of escrow;
(j) Paint and stain must be applied in such a manner so as not to
cause deterioration of the building surfaces for the length of time
specified by the paint or stain manufacturers' representations, if any.
However, an action may not be brought for a violation of this
subsection more than five years from close of escrow;
(k) Roofing materials must be installed so as to avoid materials
falling from the roof;
(l) The landscaping systems must be installed in such a manner so
as to survive for not less than one year. However, an action may not
be brought for a violation of this subsection more than two years from
close of escrow;
(m) Ceramic tile and tile backing must be installed in such a
manner that the tile does not detach;
(n) Dryer ducts must be installed and terminated pursuant to
manufacturer installation requirements. However, an action may not be
brought for a violation of this subsection more than two years from
close of escrow;
(o) Structures must be constructed in such a manner so as not to
impair the occupants' safety because they contain public health hazards
as determined by a duly authorized public health official, health
agency, or governmental entity having jurisdiction. This subsection
does not limit recovery for any damages caused by a violation of this
section on the grounds that the damages do not constitute a health
hazard.
(8) The standards set forth in this chapter are intended to address
every function or component of a structure. To the extent that a
function or component of a structure is not addressed by the standards
under this chapter, it is actionable if it causes damage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A builder may, but is not required to,
offer the homeowner an express contract that provides greater
protection than that required under section 4 of this act. This type
of express contract constitutes an enhanced protection agreement. If
a builder offers an enhanced protection agreement, the builder may
choose to be subject to its own express contractual provisions. If an
enhanced protection agreement is in place, section 4 of this act no
longer applies other than to set forth minimum standards by which to
judge the enforceability of the particular provisions of the enhanced
protection agreement. If a builder offers an enhanced protection
agreement in place of the provisions set forth in section 4 of this
act, the election to do so must be made in writing with the homeowner
no later than the close of escrow. The builder must provide the
homeowner with a complete copy of this chapter and advise the homeowner
that the builder has elected not to be subject to section 4 of this
act. If any provision of an enhanced protection agreement is later
found to be unenforceable as not meeting the minimum standards of
section 4 of this act, a builder may use this chapter in lieu of those
provisions found to be unenforceable. If a builder has elected to use
an enhanced protection agreement, and a homeowner disputes that the
particular provision or time periods of the enhanced protection
agreement are not greater than, or equal to, section 4 of this act as
they apply to the particular deficiency alleged by the homeowner, the
homeowner may seek to enforce the application of the standards set
forth in this chapter as to those claimed deficiencies. If a homeowner
seeks to enforce a particular standard in lieu of a provision of the
enhanced protection agreement, the homeowner must give the builder
written notice of that intent at the time the homeowner files a notice
of claim. If a homeowner seeks to enforce section 4 of this act, in
lieu of the enhanced protection agreement in a subsequent litigation or
other legal action, the builder has the right to have the matter
bifurcated, and to have an immediately binding determination of his or
her responsive pleading within sixty days after the filing of that
pleading, but in no event after the commencement of discovery, as to
the application of either section 4 of this act or the enhanced
protection agreement as to the deficiencies claimed by the homeowner.
If the builder fails to seek that determination in the time frame
specified, the builder waives the right to do so and the standards set
forth in this chapter apply. As to any nonoriginal homeowner, that
homeowner is in privity for purposes of an enhanced protection
agreement only to the extent that the builder has recorded the enhanced
protection agreement on title or provided actual notice to the
nonoriginal homeowner of the enhanced protection agreement. If the
enhanced protection agreement is not recorded on title or no actual
notice has been provided, the standards set forth in this chapter apply
to any nonoriginal homeowners' claims. A builder's election to use an
enhanced protection agreement addresses only the issues set forth in
section 4 of this act and does not constitute an election to use or not
use the provisions of section 7 of this act. The decision to use or
not use section 7 of this act is governed by that section.
(2) A homeowner is obligated to follow all reasonable maintenance
obligations and schedules communicated in writing to the homeowner by
the builder and product manufacturers, as well as commonly accepted
maintenance practices. A failure by a homeowner to follow these
obligations, schedules, and practices may subject the homeowner to the
affirmative defenses contained in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 As to fit and finish items, a builder must
provide a home buyer with a minimum one-year express written limited
warranty covering the fit and finish of the building components listed
in this subsection. This warranty must cover the fit and finish of
cabinets, mirrors, flooring, interior and exterior walls, countertops,
paint finishes, and trim, but does not apply to damage to those
components caused by defects in other components governed by the other
provisions of this chapter. Any fit and finish matters covered by this
warranty are not subject to the provisions of this chapter. If a
builder fails to provide the express warranty required by this section,
the warranty for these items is for a period of one year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Prior to filing an action against any
party alleged to have contributed to a violation of the standards set
forth in section 4 of this act, the claimant must initiate the
following prelitigation procedures:
(a) The claimant or his or her legal representative must provide
written notice via certified mail, overnight mail, or personal delivery
to the builder, in the manner prescribed in this section, of the
claimant's claim that the construction of his or her residence violates
any of the standards set forth in section 4 of this act. That notice
must provide the claimant's name, address, and preferred method of
contact, and must state that the claimant alleges a violation against
the builder, and must describe the claim in reasonable detail
sufficient to determine the nature and location, to the extent known,
of the claimed violation. In the case of a group of homeowners or an
association, the notice may identify the claimants solely by address or
other description sufficient to apprise the builder of the locations of
the subject residences. That document must have the same force and
effect as a notice of commencement of a legal proceeding.
(b) The notice requirements of this section do not preclude a
homeowner from seeking redress through any applicable normal customer
service procedure as set forth in any contractual, warranty, or other
builder-generated document. However, if a homeowner seeks to do so,
that request does not satisfy the notice requirements of this section.
(2) Upon receipt of the written notice required under subsection
(1)(a) of this section, a builder must do all of the following:
(a) Within thirty days of a written request by a homeowner or his
or her legal representative, the builder must provide copies of all
relevant plans, specifications, mass or rough grading plans, final
soils reports, and available engineering calculations that pertain to
a homeowner's residence specifically or as part of a larger development
tract. The request must be honored if it states that it is made
relative to structural, fire safety, or soils provisions of this
chapter. However, a builder is not obligated to provide a copying
service, and reasonable copying costs must be borne by the requesting
party. A builder may require that the documents be copied on-site by
the requesting party, except that the homeowner may, at his or her
option, use his or her own copying service, which may include an off-site copy facility that is bonded and insured. If a builder can show
that the builder maintained the documents, but that they later became
unavailable due to loss or destruction that was not the fault of the
builder, the builder may be excused from the requirements of this
subsection, in which case the builder must act with reasonable
diligence to assist the homeowner in obtaining those documents from any
applicable government authority or from the source that generated the
document. However, in that case, the time limits specified by this
section do not apply.
(b) At the expense of the homeowner, who may opt to use an off-site
copy facility that is bonded and insured, the builder must provide to
the homeowner or his or her legal representative copies of all
maintenance and preventive maintenance recommendations that pertain to
his or her residence within thirty days of service of a written request
for those documents. Those documents must also be provided to the
homeowner in conjunction with the initial sale of the residence.
(c) At the expense of the homeowner, who may opt to use an off-site
copy facility that is bonded and insured, a builder must provide to the
homeowner or his or her legal representative copies of all manufactured
products maintenance, preventive maintenance, and limited warranty
information within thirty days of a written request for those
documents. These documents must also be provided to the homeowner in
conjunction with the initial sale of the residence.
(d) At the expense of the homeowner, who may opt to use an off-site
copy facility that is bonded and insured, a builder must provide to the
homeowner or his or her legal representative copies of all of the
builder's limited contractual warranties in accordance with this
chapter in effect at the time of the original sale of the residence
within thirty days of a written request for those documents. Those
documents must also be provided to the homeowner in conjunction with
the initial sale of the residence.
(e) A builder must maintain the name and address of an agent for
notice under this chapter with the secretary of state or,
alternatively, elect to use a third party for that notice if the
builder has notified the homeowner in writing of the third party's name
and address, to whom claims and requests for information under this
section may be mailed. The name and address of the agent for notice or
third party must be included with the original sales documentation and
must be initialed and acknowledged by the purchaser and the builder's
sales representative. This subsection applies to instances in which a
builder contracts with a third party to accept claims and act on the
builder's behalf. A builder must give actual notice to the homeowner
that the builder has made such an election, and must include the name
and address of the third party.
(f) A builder must record on title a notice of the existence of the
procedures under this section and a notice that these procedures impact
the legal rights of the homeowner. This information must also be
included with the original sales documentation and must be initialed
and acknowledged by the purchaser and the builder's sales
representative.
(g) A builder must provide with the original sales documentation a
written copy of this section which must be initialed and acknowledged
by the purchaser and the builder's sales representative.
(h) As to any documents provided in conjunction with the original
sale, the builder must instruct the original purchaser to provide those
documents to any subsequent purchaser.
(i) Any builder who fails to comply with any of the requirements
under this section within the time specified is not entitled to the
protection of this chapter, and the homeowner is released from the
requirements of this chapter and may proceed with the filing of an
action, in which case the remaining sections of this chapter continue
to apply to the action.
(3) A builder or his or her representative must acknowledge, in
writing, receipt of the notice of the claim within fourteen days after
receipt of the notice of the claim. If the notice of the claim is
served by the claimant's legal representative, or if the builder
receives a written representation letter from a homeowner's attorney,
the builder must include the attorney in all subsequent substantive
communications, including, without limitation, all written
communications occurring under this chapter, and all substantive and
procedural communications, including all written communications,
following the commencement of any subsequent complaint or other legal
action, except that if the builder has retained or involved legal
counsel to assist the builder in this process, all communications by
the builder's counsel may only be with the claimant's legal
representative, if any.
(4) This section establishes a nonadversarial procedure, including
the remedies available under this section which, if the procedure does
not resolve the dispute between the parties, may result in a subsequent
action to enforce the other sections of this chapter. A builder may
attempt to commence nonadversarial contractual provisions other than
the nonadversarial procedures and remedies set forth in this section,
but may not, in addition to its own nonadversarial contractual
provisions, require adherence to the nonadversarial procedures and
remedies set forth in this section, regardless of whether the builder's
own alternative nonadversarial contractual provisions are successful in
resolving the dispute or ultimately deemed enforceable. At the time
the sales agreement is executed, the builder must notify the homeowner
whether the builder intends to engage in the nonadversarial procedure
of this section or attempt to enforce alternative nonadversarial
contractual provisions. If the builder elects to use alternative
nonadversarial contractual provisions in lieu of this section, the
election is binding, regardless of whether the builder's alternative
nonadversarial contractual provisions are successful in resolving the
ultimate dispute or are ultimately deemed enforceable.
(5) If a builder fails to acknowledge receipt of the notice of a
claim within the time specified, elects not to go through the process
set forth in this section, or fails to request an inspection within the
time specified, or at the conclusion or cessation of an alternative
nonadversarial proceeding, this section does not apply and the
homeowner is released from the requirements of this section and may
proceed with the filing of an action. However, the standards set forth
in the other sections of this chapter may continue to apply to the
action.
(6)(a) If a builder elects to inspect the claimed unmet standards,
the builder must complete the initial inspection and testing within
fourteen days after acknowledgment of receipt of the notice of the
claim, at a mutually convenient date and time. If the homeowner has
retained legal representation, the inspection must be scheduled with
the legal representative's office at a mutually convenient date and
time, unless the legal representative is unavailable during the
relevant time periods. All costs of builder inspection and testing,
including any damage caused by the builder inspection, must be borne by
the builder. The builder must also provide written proof that the
builder has liability insurance to cover any damages or injuries
occurring during inspection and testing. The builder must restore the
property to its pretesting condition within forty-eight hours of the
testing. The builder must, upon request, allow the inspections to be
observed and electronically recorded, videotaped, or photographed by
the claimant or his or her legal representative.
(b) Nothing that occurs during a builder's or claimant's inspection
or testing may be used or introduced as evidence to support a
spoliation defense by any potential party in any subsequent litigation.
(c) If a builder deems a second inspection or testing reasonably
necessary, and specifies the reasons therefor in writing within three
days following the initial inspection, the builder may conduct a second
inspection or testing. A second inspection or testing must be
completed within forty days of the initial inspection or testing. All
requirements concerning the initial inspection or testing must also
apply to the second inspection or testing.
(d) If the builder fails to inspect or test the property within the
time specified, the claimant is released from the requirements of this
section and may proceed with the filing of an action. However, the
other standards set forth in this chapter continue to apply to the
action.
(e) If a builder intends to hold a subcontractor, design
professional, individual product manufacturer, or material supplier,
including an insurance carrier, warranty company, or service company,
responsible for its contribution to the unmet standard, the builder
must provide notice to that person or entity sufficiently in advance to
allow them to attend the initial or, if requested, second inspection of
any alleged unmet standard and to participate in the repair process.
The claimant and his or her legal representative, if any, must be
advised in a reasonable time prior to the inspection as to the identity
of all persons or entities invited to attend. This subsection does not
apply to the builder's insurance company. Except with respect to any
claims involving a repair actually conducted under this section, this
subsection does not relieve a subcontractor, design professional,
individual product manufacturer, or material supplier of any liability
under an action brought by a claimant.
(7) Within thirty days of the initial or, if requested, second
inspection or testing, the builder may offer in writing to repair the
violation. The offer to repair must also compensate the homeowner for
all applicable damages recoverable under section 8(4) of this act,
within the time frame for the repair set forth in this section. An
offer under this subsection must be accompanied by a detailed,
specific, step-by-step statement identifying the particular violation
that is being repaired, explaining the nature, scope, and location of
the repair, and setting a reasonable completion date for the repair.
The offer must also include the names, addresses, telephone numbers,
and license numbers of the contractors whom the builder intends to have
perform the repair. Those contractors must be fully insured, and are
responsible, for all damages or injuries that they may cause to occur
during the repair, and evidence of that insurance must be provided to
the homeowner upon request. Upon written request by the homeowner or
his or her legal representative, and within the time frame set forth in
this section, the builder must also provide any available technical
documentation, including, without limitation, plans and specifications
pertaining to the claimed violation within the particular home or
development tract. The offer must also advise the homeowner in writing
of his or her right to request up to three additional contractors from
which to select to do the repair under this section.
(8) Upon receipt of the offer to repair, the homeowner has thirty
days to authorize the builder to proceed with the repair. The
homeowner may alternatively request, at the homeowner's option and
discretion, that the builder provide the names, addresses, telephone
numbers, and license numbers for up to three alternative contractors
who are not owned or financially controlled by the builder and who
regularly conduct business in the county where the structure is
located. If the homeowner so elects, the builder is entitled to an
additional noninvasive inspection, to occur at a mutually convenient
date and time within twenty days of the election, so as to permit the
other proposed contractors to review the proposed site of the repair.
Within thirty-five days after the request of the homeowner for
alternative contractors, the builder must present the homeowner with a
choice of contractors. Within twenty days after that presentation, the
homeowner must authorize the builder or one of the alternative
contractors to perform the repair.
(9) The offer to repair must be accompanied by an offer to mediate
the dispute if the homeowner so requests. The mediation is limited to
a four-hour mediation, except as otherwise mutually agreed before a
nonaffiliated mediator selected and paid for by the builder. At the
homeowner's option, the homeowner may agree to split the cost of the
mediator, and if he or she does so, the mediator is selected jointly.
The mediation must occur within fifteen days after the request to
mediate is received and occur at a mutually convenient location within
the county where the action is pending. If a builder has made an offer
to repair a violation, and the mediation has failed to resolve the
dispute, the homeowner must allow the repair to be performed either by
the builder, its contractor, or the selected contractor.
(10) If the builder fails to make an offer to repair or otherwise
strictly comply with this section within the time specified, the
claimant is released from the requirements of this section and may
proceed with the filing of an action. If the contractor performing the
repair does not complete the repair in the time or manner specified,
the claimant may file an action. If this occurs, the other standards
set forth in this chapter continue to apply to the action.
(11)(a) In the event that a resolution under this section involves
a repair by the builder, the builder must make an appointment with the
claimant, make all appropriate arrangements to effectuate a repair of
the claimed unmet standards, and compensate the homeowner for all
damages resulting therefrom free of charge to the claimant. The repair
must be scheduled through the claimant's legal representative, if any,
unless he or she is unavailable during the relevant time periods. The
repair must be commenced on a mutually convenient date within fourteen
days of acceptance or, if an alternative contractor is selected by the
homeowner, within fourteen days of the selection, or, if a mediation
occurs, within seven days of the mediation, or within five days after
a permit is obtained if one is required. The builder must act with
reasonable diligence in obtaining the permit.
(b) The builder must ensure that work done on the repairs is done
with the utmost diligence, and that the repairs are completed as soon
as reasonably possible. Every effort must be made to complete the
repair within one hundred twenty days of its commencement.
(12) The builder must, upon request, allow the repair to be
observed and electronically recorded, videotaped, or photographed by
the claimant or his or her legal representative. Nothing that occurs
during the repair process may be used or introduced as evidence to
support a spoliation defense by any potential party in any subsequent
litigation.
(13) The builder must provide the homeowner or his or her legal
representative, upon request, with copies of all correspondence,
photographs, and other materials pertaining or relating in any manner
to the repairs.
(14) If the builder elects to repair some, but not all, of the
claimed unmet standards, the builder shall, at the same time it makes
its offer, set forth with particularity in writing the reasons, and the
support for those reasons, for not repairing all claimed unmet
standards.
(15) If the builder fails to complete the repair within the time
specified in the repair plan, the claimant is released from the
requirements of this section and may proceed with the filing of an
action. If this occurs, the other standards set forth in this chapter
continue to apply to the action.
(16) The builder may not obtain a release or waiver of any kind in
exchange for the repair work mandated by this chapter. At the
conclusion of the repair, the claimant may proceed with filing an
action for violation of the applicable standard or for a claim of
inadequate repair, or both, including all applicable damages available
under section 8(4) of this act.
(17) If the applicable statute of limitations has otherwise run
during this process, the time period for filing a complaint or other
legal remedies for violation of any provision of this chapter, or for
a claim of inadequate repair, is extended from the time of the original
claim by the claimant to one hundred days after the repair is
completed, whether or not the particular violation is the one being
repaired. If the builder fails to acknowledge the claim within the
time specified, elects not to go through this statutory process, or
fails to request an inspection within the time specified, the time
period for filing a complaint or other legal remedies for violation of
this chapter is extended from the time of the original claim by the
claimant to forty-five days after the time for responding to the notice
of claim has expired. If the builder elects to attempt to enforce its
own nonadversarial procedure in lieu of the procedure set forth in this
section, the time period for filing a complaint or other legal remedies
for violation of this chapter is extended from the time of the original
claim by the claimant to one hundred days after either the completion
of the builder's alternative nonadversarial procedure, or one hundred
days after the builder's alternative nonadversarial procedure is deemed
unenforceable, whichever is later.
(18) If the builder has invoked this section and completed a
repair, prior to filing an action, if there has been no previous
mediation between the parties, the homeowner or his or her legal
representative must request mediation in writing. The mediation must
be limited to four hours, except as otherwise mutually agreed before a
nonaffiliated mediator selected and paid for by the builder. At the
homeowner's option, the homeowner may agree to split the cost of the
mediator and if he or she does so, the mediator is selected jointly.
The mediation must occur within fifteen days after the request for
mediation is received and must occur at a mutually convenient location
within the county where the action is pending. In the event that a
mediation is used at this point, any applicable statutes of limitations
are tolled from the date of the request to mediate until the next court
day after the mediation is completed, or the one hundred day period,
whichever is later.
(19)(a) This chapter does not prohibit the builder from making only
a cash offer and no repair. In this situation, the homeowner is free
to accept the offer, or he or she may reject the offer and proceed with
the filing of an action. If the latter occurs, the other standards of
this chapter continue to apply to the action.
(b) The builder may obtain a reasonable release in exchange for the
cash payment. The builder may negotiate the terms and conditions of
any reasonable release in terms of scope and consideration in
conjunction with a cash payment under this section.
(20)(a) The time periods and all other requirements in this section
are to be strictly construed and, unless extended by the mutual
agreement of the parties in accordance with this section, govern the
rights and obligations under this chapter. If a builder fails to act
in accordance with this section within the time frames mandated, unless
extended by the mutual agreement of the parties as evidenced by a
postclaim written confirmation by the affected homeowner demonstrating
that he or she has knowingly and voluntarily extended the statutory
time frame, the claimant may proceed with filing an action. If this
occurs, the other standards of this chapter continue to apply to the
action.
(b) If the claimant does not conform with the requirements of this
section, the builder may bring a motion to stay any subsequent court
action or other proceeding until the requirements of this section have
been satisfied. The court, in its discretion, may award the prevailing
party on such a motion his or her attorneys' fees and costs in bringing
or opposing the motion.
(21) If a claim combines causes of action or damages not covered by
this chapter, including, without limitation, personal injuries, class
actions, other statutory remedies, or fraud-based claims, the claimed
unmet standards must be administered according to this chapter,
although evidence of the property in its unrepaired condition may be
introduced to support the respective elements of any such cause of
action. As to any fraud-based claim, if the fact that the property has
been repaired under this chapter is admissible, the trier of fact must
be informed that the repair was not voluntarily accepted by the
homeowner. As to any class action claims that address solely the
incorporation of a defective component into a residence, the named and
unnamed class members need not comply with this section.
(22) Subsequently discovered claims of unmet standards must be
administered separately under this section, unless otherwise agreed to
by the parties. However, if the subsequently discovered claim is for
a violation of the same standard as that which has already been
initiated by the same claimant and the subject of a currently pending
action, the claimant need not reinitiate the process as to the same
standard.
(23) If any enforcement of the standards under this chapter is
commenced, the fact that a repair effort was made may be introduced to
the trier of fact. However, the claimant may use the condition of the
property prior to the repair as the basis for contending that the
repair work was inappropriate, inadequate, or incomplete, or that the
violation still exists. The claimant need not show that the repair
work resulted in further damage nor that damage has continued to occur
as a result of the violation.
(24) Evidence of both parties' conduct during this process may be
introduced during a subsequent enforcement action, if any, with the
exception of any mediation. Any repair efforts undertaken by the
builder are not settlement communications or offers of settlement and
are not inadmissible in evidence on such a basis.
(25) This chapter applies to subcontractors, material suppliers,
individual product manufacturers, and design professionals to the
extent that the subcontractors, material suppliers, individual product
manufacturers, and design professionals caused, in whole or in part, a
violation of a particular standard as the result of a negligent act or
omission or a breach of contract. In addition to the affirmative
defenses set forth in section 8(5) of this act, a subcontractor,
material supplier, design professional, individual product
manufacturer, or other entity may also offer common law and contractual
defenses as applicable to any claimed violation of a standard. All
actions by a claimant or builder to enforce an express contract, or any
provision thereof, against a subcontractor, material supplier,
individual product manufacturer, or design professional is preserved.
This chapter does not modify the law pertaining to joint and several
liability for subcontractors, material suppliers, individual product
manufacturers, and design professionals that contribute to any specific
violation of this chapter. In addition, this section does not apply to
any subcontractor, material supplier, individual product manufacturer,
or design professional to which strict liability would apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1)(a) Except as specifically set forth in
this chapter, a claim or cause of action may not be brought under this
chapter more than ten years after the close of escrow on the first sale
of the home.
(b) As used in this section, "action" includes an action for
indemnity brought against a person arising out of that person's
performance or furnishing of services or materials referred to in this
chapter, except that a cross-complaint for indemnity may be filed in an
action which has been brought within the time period set forth in (a)
of this subsection.
(c) The limitation prescribed by this section may not be asserted
by way of defense by any person in actual possession or the control, as
owner, tenant, or otherwise, of such an improvement, at the time any
deficiency in the improvement constitutes the proximate cause for which
it is proposed to make a claim or bring an action.
(d) Existing statutory and decisional law regarding tolling of the
statute of limitations apply to the time periods for filing an action
or making a claim under this chapter, except that repairs made under
section 7(10) of this act do not extend the period for filing an
action, or restart the relevant time limitations. If a builder
arranges for a contractor to perform a repair under section 7(10) of
this act, as to the builder the time period for calculating the
relevant statute of limitation pertains to the substantial completion
of the original construction and not to the date of repairs under this
chapter. The time limitations established by this chapter do not apply
to any action by a claimant for a contract or express contractual
provision. Causes of action and damages to which this chapter does not
apply are not limited by this section. In order to make a claim for
violation of the standards set forth in section 4 of this act, a
homeowner need only demonstrate, in accordance with the applicable
evidentiary standard, that the home does not meet the applicable
standard, subject to the affirmative defenses set forth in this
section. No further showing of causation or damages is required to
meet the burden of proof regarding a violation of a standard set forth
in section 4 of this act, provided that the violation arises out of,
pertains to, or is related to, the original construction.
(2) Except as provided in this chapter, no other cause of action
for a claim covered by this chapter or for damages recoverable under
subsection (4) of this section is allowed. In addition to the rights
under this chapter, this chapter does not apply to any action by a
claimant to enforce a contract or express contractual provision, or any
action for fraud, personal injury, or violation of a statute. Damages
awarded for the items set forth in subsection (4) of this section in
such other cause of action must be reduced by the amounts recovered
under that subsection for violation of the standards set forth in this
chapter.
(3) The homeowner's right to the reasonable value of repairing any
nonconformity is limited to the repair costs, or the diminution in
current value of the home caused by the nonconformity, whichever is
less, subject to the personal use exception as developed under common
law.
(4) If a claim for damages is made under this chapter, the
homeowner is only entitled to damages for the reasonable value of
repairing any violation of the standards set forth in this chapter, the
reasonable cost of repairing any damages caused by the repair efforts,
the reasonable cost of repairing and rectifying any damages resulting
from the failure of the home to meet the standards, the reasonable cost
of removing and replacing any improper repair by the builder,
reasonable relocation and storage expenses, lost business income if the
home was used as a principal place of a business licensed to be
operated from the home, reasonable investigative costs for each
established violation, and all other costs or fees recoverable by
contract or statute.
(5)(a) The provisions, standards, rights, and obligations set forth
in this chapter are binding upon all original purchasers and their
successors-in-interest. For purposes of this chapter, homeowners'
associations subject to chapter 64.38 RCW are considered to be original
purchasers and have standing to enforce the provisions, standards,
rights, and obligations set forth in this chapter.
(b) A builder may be excused, in whole or in part, from any
obligation, damage, loss, or liability if the builder can demonstrate
any of the following affirmative defenses in response to a claimed
violation:
(i) To the extent it is caused by an unforeseen act of nature that
caused the structure not to meet the standard. For purposes of this
section, an "unforeseen act of nature" means a weather condition,
earthquake, or manmade event such as war, terrorism, or vandalism, in
excess of the design criteria expressed by the applicable building
codes, rules, regulations, and ordinances in effect at the time of
original construction;
(ii) To the extent it is caused by a homeowner's unreasonable
failure to minimize or prevent those damages in a timely manner,
including the failure of the homeowner to allow reasonable and timely
access for inspections and repairs under this chapter. This includes
the failure to give timely notice to the builder after discovery of a
violation, but does not include damages due to the untimely or
inadequate response of a builder to the homeowner's claim;
(iii) To the extent it is caused by the homeowner or his or her
agent, employee, subcontractor, independent contractor, or consultant
by virtue of their failure to follow the builder's or manufacturer's
recommendations, or commonly accepted homeowner maintenance
obligations. In order to rely upon this defense as it relates to a
builder's recommended maintenance schedule, the builder must show that
the homeowner had written notice of these schedules and recommendations
and that the recommendations and schedules were reasonable at the time
they were issued;
(iv) To the extent it is caused by the homeowner or his or her
agent's or an independent third party's alterations, ordinary wear and
tear, misuse, abuse, or neglect, or by the structure's use for
something other than its intended purpose;
(v) To the extent that the time period for filing actions bars the
claimed violation;
(vi) As to a particular violation for which the builder has
obtained a valid release;
(vii) To the extent that the builder's repair was successful in
correcting the particular violation of the applicable standard; and
(viii) As to any causes of action to which this statute does not
apply, all applicable affirmative defenses are preserved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This chapter applies with respect to those
detached, single-family homes and appurtenant structures that are
subject to a close of escrow on the first sale of the home on or after
January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to those claims or causes of action
subject to sections 1 through 9 of this act.

Sec. 11 RCW 4.16.300 and 1986 c 305 s 703 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) RCW 4.16.300 through 4.16.320 shall apply to all claims or
causes of action of any kind against any person, arising from such
person having constructed, altered, or repaired any improvement upon
real property, or having performed or furnished any design, planning,
surveying, architectural or construction or engineering services, or
supervision or observation of construction, or administration of
construction contracts for any construction, alteration, or repair of
any improvement upon real property. This section is intended to
benefit only those persons referenced ((herein)) in this section and
shall not apply to claims or causes of action against manufacturers.
(2) This section does not apply to those claims or causes of action
subject to sections 1 through 9 of this act.

Sec. 12 RCW 4.16.310 and 2002 c 323 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All claims or causes of action as set forth in RCW 4.16.300
shall accrue, and the applicable statute of limitation shall begin to
run only during the period within six years after substantial
completion of construction, or during the period within six years after
the termination of the services enumerated in RCW 4.16.300, whichever
is later. The phrase "substantial completion of construction" shall
mean the state of completion reached when an improvement upon real
property may be used or occupied for its intended use. Any cause of
action which has not accrued within six years after such substantial
completion of construction, or within six years after such termination
of services, whichever is later, shall be barred: PROVIDED, That this
limitation shall not be asserted as a defense by any owner, tenant or
other person in possession and control of the improvement at the time
such cause of action accrues. The limitations prescribed in this
section apply to all claims or causes of action as set forth in RCW
4.16.300 brought in the name or for the benefit of the state which are
made or commenced after June 11, 1986.
If a written notice is filed under RCW 64.50.020 within the time
prescribed for the filing of an action under this chapter, the period
of time during which the filing of an action is barred under RCW
64.50.020 plus sixty days shall not be a part of the period limited for
the commencement of an action, nor for the application of this section.
(2) This section does not apply to those claims or causes of action
subject to sections 1 through 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---