BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The business and professions account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from business or professional licenses,
registrations, certifications, renewals, examinations, or civil
penalties assessed and collected by the department from the following
chapters must be deposited into the account:
(a) Chapter 18.11 RCW, auctioneers;
(b) Chapter 18.16 RCW, cosmetologists, barbers, and manicurists;
(c) Chapter 18.96 RCW, landscape architects;
(d) Chapter 18.145 RCW, court reporters;
(e) Chapter 18.165 RCW, private investigators;
(f) Chapter 18.170 RCW, security guards;
(g) Chapter 18.185 RCW, bail bond agents;
(h) Chapter 19.16 RCW, collection agencies;
(i) Chapter 19.31 RCW, employment agencies;
(j) Chapter 19.105 RCW, camping resorts;
(k) Chapter 19.138 RCW, sellers of travel;
(l) Chapter 42.44 RCW, notaries public; and
(m) Chapter 64.36 RCW, timeshares.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses incurred in
carrying out these business and professions licensing activities of the
department. Any residue in the account shall be accumulated and shall
not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium.
(2) The director shall biennially prepare a budget request based on
the anticipated costs of administering the business and professions
licensing activities listed in subsection (1) of this section, which
shall include the estimated income from these business and professions
fees.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.135.055 and 2001 c 314 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No fee may increase in any fiscal year by a percentage in
excess of the fiscal growth factor for that fiscal year without prior
legislative approval.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) An assessment made by an agricultural commodity commission or
board created by state statute or created under a marketing agreement
or order under chapter 15.65 or 15.66 RCW, or to the forest products
commission, if the assessment is approved by referendum in accordance
with the provisions of the statutes creating the commission or board or
chapter 15.65 or 15.66 RCW for approving such assessments; or
(b) Fees paid to the business and professions account created in
section 1 of this act and subject to the provisions of RCW 43.24.086.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.84.092 and 2003 c 361 s 602, 2003 c 324 s 1, 2003
c 150 s 2, and 2003 c 48 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The business and professions
account, the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River
channel construction and operation account, the Central Washington
University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal
and reformatory institutions account, the common school construction
fund, the county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales
and use tax equalization account, the data processing building
construction account, the deferred compensation administrative account,
the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the
drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington
University capital projects account, the education construction fund,
the election account, the emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State
College capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account,
the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account,
the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice
assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance
account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the regional
transportation investment district account, the resource management
cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account,
the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University
of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express
account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be
distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.96.050 and 1984 c 287 s 52 are each amended to read
as follows:
The members of the first board shall serve for the following terms:
One member for one year, one member for two years, one member for
three years, one member for four years, and one member for five years
from the date of appointment or until successors are duly appointed and
qualified. Every member of the board shall receive a certificate of
his or her appointment from the governor, and before beginning his or
her term of office shall file with the secretary of state his or her
written oath or affirmation for the faithful discharge of his or her
official duties. On the expiration of the term of each member, the
governor shall appoint a successor to serve for a term of five years,
or until his or her successor has been appointed and qualified:
PROVIDED, That no member shall serve more than ten consecutive years.
The governor may remove any member of the board for cause.
Vacancies in the board for any reason shall be filled by appointment
for the unexpired term. In carrying out the provisions of this
chapter, the members of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses
according to the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, such funds
to be provided from the ((landscape architects' account in the state
general fund)) business and professions account created in section 1 of
this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.105.380 and 2002 c 86 s 273 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the unprofessional conduct in RCW 18.235.130,
the director may take disciplinary action for the following conduct,
acts, or conditions:
(a) The applicant, registrant, or affiliate has failed to file
copies of the camping resort contract form under RCW 19.105.360;
(b) The applicant, registrant, or affiliate has failed to comply
with any provision of this chapter;
(c) The applicant's, registrant's, or affiliate's offering of
camping resort contracts has worked or would work a fraud upon
purchasers or owners of camping resort contracts;
(d) The camping resort operator or any officer, director, or
affiliate of the camping resort operator has been enjoined from or had
any civil penalty assessed for a finding of dishonest dealing or fraud
in a civil suit, or been found to have engaged in any violation of any
act designed to protect consumers, or has been engaged in dishonest
practices in any industry involving sales to consumers;
(e) The applicant or registrant has represented or is representing
to purchasers in connection with the offer or sale of a camping resort
contract that a camping resort property, facility, amenity camp site,
or other development is planned, promised, or required, and the
applicant or registrant has not provided the director with a security
or assurance of performance as required by this chapter;
(f) The applicant or registrant has not provided or is no longer
providing the director with the necessary security arrangements to
ensure future availability of titles or properties as required by this
chapter or agreed to in the permit to market;
(g) The applicant or registrant is or has been employing
unregistered salespersons or offering or proposing a membership
referral program not in compliance with this chapter;
(h) The applicant or registrant has breached any escrow, impound,
reserve account, or trust arrangement or the conditions of an order or
permit to market required by this chapter;
(i) The applicant or registrant has filed or caused to be filed
with the director any document or affidavit, or made any statement
during the course of a registration or exemption procedure with the
director, that is materially untrue or misleading;
(j) The applicant or registrant has engaged in a practice of
failing to provide the written disclosures to purchasers or prospective
purchasers as required under this chapter;
(k) The applicant, registrant, or any of its officers, directors,
or employees, if the operator is other than a natural person, have
willfully done, or permitted any of their salespersons or agents to do,
any of the following:
(i) Engage in a pattern or practice of making untrue or misleading
statements of a material fact, or omitting to state a material fact;
(ii) Employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud purchasers
or members;
(iii) Engage in a pattern or practice of failing to provide the
written disclosures to purchasers or prospective purchasers as required
under this chapter;
(l) The applicant or registrant has failed to provide a bond,
letter of credit, or other arrangement to ensure delivery of promised
gifts, prizes, awards, or other items of consideration, as required
under this chapter, breached such a security arrangement, or failed to
maintain such a security arrangement in effect because of a resignation
or loss of a trustee, impound, or escrow agent;
(m) The applicant or registrant has engaged in a practice of
selling contracts using material amendments or codicils that have not
been filed or are the consequences of breaches or alterations in
previously filed contracts;
(n) The applicant or registrant has engaged in a practice of
selling or proposing to sell contracts in a ratio of contracts to sites
available in excess of that filed in the affidavit required by this
chapter;
(o) The camping resort operator has withdrawn, has the right to
withdraw, or is proposing to withdraw from use all or any portion of
any camping resort property devoted to the camping resort program,
unless:
(i) Adequate provision has been made to provide within a reasonable
time thereafter a substitute property in the same general area that is
at least as desirable for the purpose of camping and outdoor
recreation;
(ii) The property is withdrawn because, despite good faith efforts
by the camping resort operator, a nonaffiliate of the camping resort
has exercised a right of withdrawal from use by the camping resort
(such as withdrawal following expiration of a lease of the property to
the camping resort) and the terms of the withdrawal right have been
disclosed in writing to all purchasers at or prior to the time of any
sales of camping resort contracts after the camping resort has
represented to purchasers that the property is or will be available for
camping or recreation purposes;
(iii) The specific date upon which the withdrawal becomes effective
has been disclosed in writing to all purchasers and members prior to
the time of any sales of camping resort contracts after the camping
resort has represented to purchasers that the property is or will be
available for camping or recreation purposes;
(iv) The rights of members and owners of the camping resort
contracts under the express terms of the camping resort contract have
expired, or have been specifically limited, upon the lapse of a stated
or determinable period of time, and the director by order has found
that the withdrawal is not otherwise inconsistent with the protection
of purchasers or the desire of the majority of the owners of camping
resort contracts, as expressed in their previously obtained vote of
approval;
(p) The format, form, or content of the written disclosures
provided therein is not complete, full, or materially accurate, or
statements made therein are materially false, misleading, or deceptive;
(q) The applicant or registrant has failed to file an amendment for
a material change in the manner or at the time required under this
chapter or its implementing rules;
(r) The applicant or registrant has filed voluntarily or been
placed involuntarily into a federal bankruptcy or is proposing to do
so; or
(s) A camping resort operator's rights or interest in a campground
has been terminated by foreclosure or the operations in a camping
resort have been terminated in a manner contrary to contract
provisions.
(2) An operator, registrant, or applicant against whom
administrative or legal proceedings have been filed shall be
responsible for and shall reimburse the state, by payment into the
((general fund)) business and professions account created in section 1
of this act, for all administrative and legal costs actually incurred
by the department in issuing, processing, and conducting any such
administrative or legal proceeding authorized under this chapter that
results in a final legal or administrative determination of any type or
degree in favor of the department.
(3) The director may enter into assurances of discontinuance in
lieu of issuing a statement of charges or a cease and desist order or
conducting a hearing under this chapter. The assurances shall consist
of a statement of the law in question and an agreement not to violate
the stated provision. The applicant or registrant shall not be
required to admit to any violation of the law, nor shall the assurance
be construed as such an admission. Violating or breaching an assurance
under this subsection is grounds for suspension or revocation of
registration or imposition of a fine.
(4) The director shall immediately suspend the license or
certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the
suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic
upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of
social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance
with the order.

Sec. 6 RCW 64.36.225 and 1987 c 370 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A registrant or applicant against whom an administrative or legal
proceeding authorized under this chapter has been filed, shall be
liable for and reimburse to the state of Washington by payment into the
((general fund)) business and professions account created in section 1
of this act, all administrative and legal costs, including attorneys'
fees, incurred by the department in issuing and conducting
administrative or legal proceedings that result in a final legal or
administrative determination of any type or degree, in favor of the
department or the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2005.

--- END ---