BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the timely
issuance of project permit decisions by local governments serves the
public interest. When these decisions, that are often responses to
land use and building permit applications, are issued according to
specific and locally established time periods and without unnecessary
or inappropriate delays, the public enjoys greater efficiency,
consistency, and predictability in the permitting process.
The legislature also finds that full access to relevant performance
data produced annually by local governments for each type of permit
application affords elected officials, project proponents, and the
general public the opportunity to review and compare the permit
application and processing performance of jurisdictions. Furthermore,
the legislature finds that the review and comparison of this data, and
the requirement to provide convenient and direct internet access to
germane and consistent reports, will likely foster improved methods for
processing applications, and issuing project permit decisions in a
timely manner.
The legislature, therefore, intends to continue and clarify the
requirements for certain jurisdictions to produce and provide access to
annual permitting performance reports.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70B.080 and 2001 c 322 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Development regulations adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040
((shall)) must establish and implement time periods for local
government actions ((on specific)) for each type of project permit
application((s)) and provide timely and predictable procedures to
determine whether a completed project permit application meets the
requirements of those development regulations. The time periods for
local government actions ((on specific)) for each type of complete
project permit application((s)) or project type((s)) should not exceed
one hundred twenty days, unless the local government makes written
findings that a specified amount of additional time is needed ((for
processing of)) to process specific complete project permit
applications or project types.
((Such)) The development regulations ((shall)) must, for each type
of permit application, specify the contents of a completed project
permit application necessary for the ((application of such)) complete
compliance with the time periods and procedures.
(2)(a) Counties subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215 and
the cities within those counties that have populations of at least
twenty thousand ((shall)) must, for each type of permit application,
identify the ((types)) total number of project permit applications for
which decisions are issued according to the provisions of this chapter.
For each type of project permit application identified, these counties
and cities ((shall)) must establish and implement a deadline for
issuing a notice of final decision as required by subsection (1) of
this section and minimum requirements for applications to be deemed
complete under RCW 36.70B.070 as required by subsection (1) of this
section.
(b) Counties and cities subject to the requirements of this
subsection also ((shall, through September 1, 2003,)) must prepare ((at
least two)) annual performance reports that include, at a minimum, the
following information for each type of project permit application
identified in accordance with the requirements of (a) of this
subsection:
(i) Total number of complete applications received during the year;
(ii) Number of complete applications received during the year for
which a notice of final decision was issued before the deadline
established under this subsection;
(iii) Number of applications received during the year for which a
notice of final decision was issued after the deadline established
under this subsection;
(iv) Number of applications received during the year for which an
extension of time was mutually agreed upon by the applicant and the
county or city; ((and))
(v) Variance of actual performance, excluding applications for
which mutually agreed time extensions have occurred, to the deadline
established under this subsection during the year; and
(vi) The mean processing time and the number standard deviation
from the mean.
(((b) Until July 1, 2003,)) (c) Counties and cities subject to the
requirements of this subsection ((shall)) must:
(i) Provide notice of and access to the annual performance reports
((required by this subsection)) through the county's or city's web
site; and
(ii) Post electronic facsimiles of the annual performance reports
through the county's or city's web site. Postings on a county's or
city's web site indicating that the reports are available by contacting
the appropriate county or city department or official do not comply
with the requirements of this subsection.
If a county or city subject to the requirements of this subsection
does not maintain a web site, notice of the reports ((shall)) must be
given by reasonable methods, including but not limited to those methods
specified in RCW 36.70B.110(4).
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits a county or city from
extending a deadline for issuing a decision for a specific project
permit application for any reasonable period of time mutually agreed
upon by the applicant and the local government.

--- END ---