BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.44.020 and 2000 c 162 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington,
juvenile department.
(2) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the
prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety,
or the office of the sheriff.
(3) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a
person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic
medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other
health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a person who
is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner will not be considered, for that reason
alone, a neglected person for the purposes of this chapter.
(4) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other
facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment or care.
(5) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(6) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of
eighteen years of age.
(7) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited
to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility
personnel, and school nurses.
(8) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a
professional capacity during the regular course of employment in
encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support or education of
children, or providing social services to adults or families, including
mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence
programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent
of any public or private organization or institution.
(9) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology
under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as
an employee or agent of any public or private organization or
institution.
(10) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter
18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(11) "Member of the clergy" means any regularly licensed,
accredited, or ordained minister, priest, ((or)) rabbi, imam, or
similarly situated religious or spiritual leader of any church ((or)),
religious denomination, religious body, spiritual community, or sect,
whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee ((or)),
agent, or official of any public or private organization or
institution.
(12) "Abuse or neglect" means the injury, sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, negligent treatment, or maltreatment of a child by any
person under circumstances which indicate that the child's health,
welfare, and safety is harmed, excluding conduct permitted under RCW
9A.16.100. "Sexual abuse" includes any offense defined as a sex
offense in RCW 9A.44.130. An abused child is a child who has been
subjected to child abuse or neglect as defined in this section.
(13) "Child protective services section" means the child protective
services section of the department.
(14) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or
encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b)
allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or
pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any
person.
(15) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or omission
that evidences a serious disregard of consequences of such magnitude as
to constitute a clear and present danger to the child's health,
welfare, and safety. The fact that siblings share a bedroom is not, in
and of itself, negligent treatment or maltreatment.
(16) "Child protective services" means those services provided by
the department designed to protect children from child abuse and
neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and
conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports.
Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the
alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral
to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of
children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant
to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and
neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a
permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be
provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services
solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability
to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.
(17) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an evil intent, wish, or
design to vex, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be
inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of
another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an
act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.
(18) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in
RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.
(19) "Unfounded" means available information indicates that, more
likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur. No unfounded
allegation of child abuse or neglect may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any other provider licensed
under chapter 74.15 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.44.030 and 2003 c 207 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
licensed or certified child care providers or their employees, employee
of the department, juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison
specialist, responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff,
or state family and children's ombudsman or any volunteer in the
ombudsman's office has reasonable cause to believe that a child has
suffered abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or
cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to
the department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(b) When a member of the clergy has reasonable cause to believe
that a child has suffered abuse or neglect from another member of the
clergy within the same church, religious denomination, religious body,
spiritual community, or sect, he or she shall report the incident, or
cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to
the department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(c) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(((c))) (d) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult
who has reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them,
has suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report.
For the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(((d))) (e) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but
in no case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable
cause to believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The
report must include the identity of the accused if known.
(2)(a) The reporting requirement of subsection (1)(b) of this
section does not apply to a member of the clergy with regard to
information obtained solely as a result of a confession made under the
clergy-penitent privilege as provided in RCW 5.60.060(3).
(b) Nothing in this subsection (2) exempts a member of the clergy
from making a report of child abuse or neglect as required in
subsection (1)(b) of this section when the member of the clergy is
acting in some other capacity that would otherwise require him or her
to make a report.
(3) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(((3))) (4) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe
that a child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and
health services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(((4))) (5) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident
of alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(((5))) (6) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an
incident of alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter,
involving a child who has died or has had physical injury or injuries
inflicted upon him or her other than by accidental means, or who has
been subjected to alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in
writing as provided in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or
city attorney for appropriate action whenever the law enforcement
agency's investigation reveals that a crime may have been committed.
The law enforcement agency shall also notify the department of all
reports received and the law enforcement agency's disposition of them.
In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is endangered, the law
enforcement agency shall notify the department within twenty-four
hours. In all other cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the
department within seventy-two hours after a report is received by the
law enforcement agency.
(((6))) (7) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a
report under subsection (((5))) (6) of this section shall notify the
victim, any persons the victim requests, and the local office of the
department, of the decision to charge or decline to charge a crime,
within five days of making the decision.
(((7))) (8) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(((8))) (9) Any case referred to the department by a physician
licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert
medical opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has
occurred and that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if
returned home, the department shall file a dependency petition unless
a second licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such
expert medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate
a second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(((9))) (10) Persons or agencies exchanging information under
subsection (((7))) (8) of this section shall not further disseminate or
release the information except as authorized by state or federal
statute. Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(((10))) (11) Upon receiving reports of alleged abuse or neglect,
the department or law enforcement agency may interview children. The
interviews may be conducted on school premises, at day-care facilities,
at the child's home, or at other suitable locations outside of the
presence of parents. Parental notification of the interview must occur
at the earliest possible point in the investigation that will not
jeopardize the safety or protection of the child or the course of the
investigation. Prior to commencing the interview the department or law
enforcement agency shall determine whether the child wishes a third
party to be present for the interview and, if so, shall make reasonable
efforts to accommodate the child's wishes. Unless the child objects,
the department or law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts
to include a third party in any interview so long as the presence of
the third party will not jeopardize the course of the investigation.
(((11))) (12) Upon receiving a report of alleged child abuse and
neglect, the department or investigating law enforcement agency shall
have access to all relevant records of the child in the possession of
mandated reporters and their employees.
(((12))) (13) The department shall maintain investigation records
and conduct timely and periodic reviews of all cases constituting abuse
and neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(((13))) (14) The department shall use a risk assessment process
when investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated for this
purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.
(((14))) (15) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect
the law enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making
the report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(((15))) (16) The department shall make reasonable efforts to learn
the name, address, and telephone number of each person making a report
of abuse or neglect under this section. The department shall provide
assurances of appropriate confidentiality of the identification of
persons reporting under this section. If the department is unable to
learn the information required under this subsection, the department
shall only investigate cases in which: (a) The department believes
there is a serious threat of substantial harm to the child; (b) the
report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or is
about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or (c) the department
has, after investigation, a report of abuse or neglect that has been
founded with regard to a member of the household within three years of
receipt of the referral.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.44.160 and 1993 c 402 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a law enforcement agency receives a complaint that alleges
that a child under age twelve has committed a sex offense as defined in
RCW 9.94A.030, the agency shall investigate the complaint. If the
investigation reveals that probable cause exists to believe that the
youth may have committed a sex offense and the child is at least eight
years of age, the agency shall refer the case to the proper county
prosecuting attorney for appropriate action to determine whether the
child may be prosecuted or is a sexually aggressive youth. If the
child is less than eight years old, the law enforcement agency shall
refer the case to the department.
(2) If the prosecutor or a judge determines the child cannot be
prosecuted for the alleged sex offense because the child is incapable
of committing a crime as provided in RCW 9A.04.050 and the prosecutor
believes that probable cause exists to believe that the child engaged
in acts that would constitute a sex offense, the prosecutor shall refer
the child as a sexually aggressive youth to the department. The
prosecutor shall provide the department with an affidavit stating that
the prosecutor has determined that probable cause exists to believe
that the juvenile has committed acts that could be prosecuted as a sex
offense but the case is not being prosecuted because the juvenile is
incapable of committing a crime as provided in RCW 9A.04.050.
(3) The department shall investigate any referrals that allege that
a child is a sexually aggressive youth. The purpose of the
investigation shall be to determine whether the child is abused or
neglected, as defined in this chapter, and whether the child or the
child's parents are in need of services or treatment. The department
may offer appropriate available services and treatment to a sexually
aggressive youth and his or her parents or legal guardians as provided
in RCW 74.13.075 and may refer the child and his or her parents to
appropriate treatment and services available within the community. If
the parents refuse to accept or fail to obtain appropriate treatment or
services under circumstances that indicate that the refusal or failure
is child abuse or neglect, as defined in this chapter, the department
may pursue a dependency action as provided in chapter 13.34 RCW.
(4) Nothing in this section shall affect the responsibility of a
law enforcement agency to report incidents of abuse or neglect as
required in RCW 26.44.030(((5))) (6).

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.04.080 and 1998 c 221 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prosecutions for criminal offenses shall not be commenced after
the periods prescribed in this section.
(a) The following offenses may be prosecuted at any time after
their commission:
(i) Murder;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Arson if a death results;
(iv) Vehicular homicide;
(v) Vehicular assault if a death results;
(vi) Hit-and-run injury-accident if a death results (RCW
46.52.020(4)).
(b) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than ten
years after their commission:
(i) Any felony committed by a public officer if the commission is
in connection with the duties of his or her office or constitutes a
breach of his or her public duty or a violation of the oath of office;
(ii) Arson if no death results; or
(iii) Violations of RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 if the rape is
reported to a law enforcement agency within one year of its commission;
except that if the victim is under fourteen years of age when the rape
is committed and the rape is reported to a law enforcement agency
within one year of its commission, the violation may be prosecuted up
to three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or up to ten
years after the rape's commission, whichever is later. If a violation
of RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 is not reported within one year, the rape
may not be prosecuted: (A) More than three years after its commission
if the violation was committed against a victim fourteen years of age
or older; or (B) more than three years after the victim's eighteenth
birthday or more than seven years after the rape's commission,
whichever is later, if the violation was committed against a victim
under fourteen years of age.
(c) Violations of the following statutes shall not be prosecuted
more than three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or more
than seven years after their commission, whichever is later: RCW
9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.070, 9A.44.080,
9A.44.100(1)(b), ((or)) 9A.64.020, or 26.44.080.
(d) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than six
years after their commission: Violations of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080.
(e) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than five
years after their commission: Any class C felony under chapter 74.09,
82.36, or 82.38 RCW.
(f) Bigamy shall not be prosecuted more than three years after the
time specified in RCW 9A.64.010.
(g) A violation of RCW 9A.56.030 must not be prosecuted more than
three years after the discovery of the offense when the victim is a tax
exempt corporation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3).
(h) No other felony may be prosecuted more than three years after
its commission; except that in a prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115, if
the person who was viewed, photographed, or filmed did not realize at
the time that he or she was being viewed, photographed, or filmed, the
prosecution must be commenced within two years of the time the person
who was viewed or in the photograph or film first learns that he or she
was viewed, photographed, or filmed.
(i) No gross misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than two years
after its commission.
(j) No misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than one year after its
commission.
(2) The periods of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this
section do not run during any time when the person charged is not
usually and publicly resident within this state.
(3) If, before the end of a period of limitation prescribed in
subsection (1) of this section, an indictment has been found or a
complaint or an information has been filed, and the indictment,
complaint, or information is set aside, then the period of limitation
is extended by a period equal to the length of time from the finding or
filing to the setting aside.

--- END ---