BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The recording of custodial interrogations pilot project is
created. The purpose of the pilot project is to study the use of audio
and video recording of interrogations of arrested persons as a means to
ensure the most accurate gathering of evidence for use in criminal
proceedings, increase accountability and credibility of all
participants in the criminal justice system, and potentially reduce or
avoid costs to the criminal justice system.
(2) The criminal justice training commission shall administer the
pilot project. The criminal justice training commission shall fund the
purchase of digital audio and digital video recording equipment for use
in the pilot project, establish procedures for the preservation of
recordings and the methods for making recordings available to
defendants, and develop a training program and provide training on the
methods and technical aspects of conducting recordings of
interrogations to law enforcement officers from agencies participating
in the pilot project. In administering the pilot project and
developing the training program, the criminal justice training
commission shall consult with other jurisdictions within the state, or
in other states, that have experience with recording of law enforcement
interrogations.
(3) The commission shall select for the pilot project no more than
three law enforcement agencies that agree to participate in the pilot
project. To the extent possible, the commission shall select a police
department in a small jurisdiction, a police department in a medium or
large jurisdiction, and a county sheriff's office.
(4) Interrogations of arrested persons recorded as part of the
pilot project created under this section are not subject to the
provisions of RCW 9.73.090(1)(b).
(5) The criminal justice training commission shall submit a report
on the results of the pilot project to the legislature by December 1,
2007. The report shall include information on how often interrogations
of arrested persons were recorded, why any unrecorded interrogations
were not recorded, how many of the arrested persons were criminally
charged, how many criminal charges ended in a guilty plea, the trial
outcomes of persons whose interrogations were recorded and those whose
interrogations were not recorded, how many recorded interrogations were
subject to a suppression hearing and were suppressed as a result of the
suppression hearing, and cost estimates on implementation and ongoing
expenses of the pilot project.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2008.

--- END ---