BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that students need to
know and understand the structure, workings, and roots of our state and
nation's democratic institutions and traditions. The legislature
further finds that studies on the historical and civics knowledge of
America's students suggest that too few students are learning those
lessons well. The United States department of education's national
assessment of education progress shows that fewer than twenty-five
percent of America's students are proficient in either history or
civics. In addition, while most of the states have learning standards
in the two subjects, only twelve states have enough depth and breadth
in the standards to ensure that students will understand their civic
responsibilities and opportunities once the students reach adulthood.
The legislature intends to help school districts improve instruction in
civics by providing professional development for teachers and by
creating an award program for students who demonstrate a strong
understanding of the state's civics standards and who exhibit
leadership in the civic life of their communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
The Daniel J. Evans civic education award is established to
recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of students who have
demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning
requirements. The students must demonstrate this understanding through
completion of at least one of the classroom-based civics assessment
models developed by the superintendent of public instruction, and
through leadership in the civic life of their communities. The
superintendent of public instruction shall annually select two students
from eastern Washington and two students from western Washington to
receive the award, and shall notify the governor and legislature with
the names of the recipients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Subject to available funding, for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2005, the superintendent of public instruction
shall provide professional development grants to teachers who have used
one or more of the classroom-based civics assessment models developed
by the superintendent of public instruction. The grants may be used to
attend state, regional, or national institutes, trainings, and
conferences related to civics education, if the institutes, trainings,
and conferences are covering skills and knowledge that are consistent
with Washington's civics essential academic learning requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Subject to available funding, for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2005, the superintendent of public instruction
shall provide summer professional development opportunities for
teachers in implementing the civics essential academic learning
requirements and the classroom-based civics assessments developed by
the superintendent of public instruction.

--- END ---