BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.18.290 and 1997 c 85 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Cancellation by the insurer of any policy which by its terms is
cancellable at the option of the insurer, or of any binder based on
such policy which does not contain a clearly stated expiration date,
may be effected as to any interest only upon compliance with the
following:
(a)(i) For policies other than medical malpractice liability
insurance: Written notice of such cancellation, accompanied by the
actual reason therefor, must be actually delivered or mailed to the
named insured not less than forty-five days prior to the effective date
of the cancellation ((except for cancellation of insurance policies
for));
(ii) For policies that provide medical malpractice liability
insurance: Written notice of such cancellation, accompanied by the
actual reason therefore, must be actually delivered or mailed to the
named insured not less than ninety days prior to the effective date of
the cancellation;
(iii) For policies canceled due to nonpayment of premiums,
((which)) written notice ((shall be)) must be actually delivered or
mailed to the named insured not less than ten days prior to ((such date
and except for cancellation of fire insurance policies)) the effective
date of the cancellation; and
(iv) For fire insurance policies canceled under chapter 48.53 RCW,
((which)) written notice ((shall not be)) must be actually delivered or
mailed to the named insured not less than five days prior to ((such
date)) the effective date of the cancellation;
(b) Like notice must also be so delivered or mailed to each
mortgagee, pledgee, or other person shown by the policy to have an
interest in any loss which may occur thereunder. For purposes of this
subsection (1)(b), "delivered" includes electronic transmittal,
facsimile, or personal delivery.
(2) The mailing of any such notice shall be effected by depositing
it in a sealed envelope, directed to the addressee at his or her last
address as known to the insurer or as shown by the insurer's records,
with proper prepaid postage affixed, in a letter depository of the
United States post office. The insurer shall retain in its records any
such item so mailed, together with its envelope, which was returned by
the post office upon failure to find, or deliver the mailing to, the
addressee.
(3) The affidavit of the individual making or supervising such a
mailing, shall constitute prima facie evidence of such facts of the
mailing as are therein affirmed.
(4) The portion of any premium paid to the insurer on account of
the policy, unearned because of the cancellation and in amount as
computed on the pro rata basis, must be actually paid to the insured or
other person entitled thereto as shown by the policy or by any
endorsement thereon, or be mailed to the insured or such person as soon
as possible, and no later than forty-five days after the date of notice
of cancellation to the insured for homeowners', dwelling fire, and
private passenger auto. Any such payment may be made by cash, or by
check, bank draft, or money order.
(5) This section shall not apply to contracts of life or disability
insurance without provision for cancellation prior to the date to which
premiums have been paid, or to contracts of insurance procured under
the provisions of chapter 48.15 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.18.2901 and 2002 c 347 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each insurer shall be required to renew any contract of
insurance subject to RCW 48.18.290 unless one of the following
situations exists:
(a) The insurer gives the named insured at least forty-five or
ninety days' notice in writing as provided for in RCW 48.18.290(1)(a)
(i) or (ii), that it ((proposes to refuse to renew)) will not renew the
insurance contract upon its expiration date; and sets forth in that
writing the actual reason for refusing to renew;
(b) At least twenty days prior to its expiration date, the insurer
has communicated, either directly or through its agent, its willingness
to renew in writing to the named insured and has included in that
writing a statement of the amount of the premium or portion thereof
required to be paid by the insured to renew the policy, and the insured
fails to discharge when due his or her obligation in connection with
the payment of such premium or portion thereof;
(c) The insured has procured equivalent coverage prior to the
expiration of the policy period;
(d) The contract is evidenced by a written binder containing a
clearly stated expiration date which has expired according to its
terms; or
(e) The contract clearly states that it is not renewable, and is
for a specific line, subclassification, or type of coverage that is not
offered on a renewable basis. This subsection (1)(e) does not restrict
the authority of the insurance commissioner under this code.
(2) Any insurer failing to include in the notice required by
subsection (1)(b) of this section the amount of any increased premium
resulting from a change of rates and an explanation of any change in
the contract provisions shall renew the policy if so required by that
subsection according to the rates and contract provisions applicable to
the expiring policy. However, renewal based on the rates and contract
provisions applicable to the expiring policy shall not prevent the
insurer from making changes in the rates and/or contract provisions of
the policy once during the term of its renewal after at least twenty
days' advance notice of such change has been given to the named
insured.
(3) Renewal of a policy shall not constitute a waiver or estoppel
with respect to grounds for cancellation which existed before the
effective date of such renewal, or with respect to cancellation of fire
policies under chapter 48.53 RCW.
(4) "Renewal" or "to renew" means the issuance and delivery by an
insurer of a contract of insurance replacing at the end of the contract
period a contract of insurance previously issued and delivered by the
same insurer, or the issuance and delivery of a certificate or notice
extending the term of a contract beyond its policy period or term.
However, (a) any contract of insurance with a policy period or term of
six months or less whether or not made continuous for successive terms
upon the payment of additional premiums shall for the purpose of RCW
48.18.290 and 48.18.293 through 48.18.295 be considered as if written
for a policy period or term of six months; and (b) any policy written
for a term longer than one year or any policy with no fixed expiration
date, shall, for the purpose of RCW 48.18.290 and 48.18.293 through
48.18.295, be considered as if written for successive policy periods or
terms of one year.
(5) A midterm blanket reduction in rate, approved by the
commissioner, for medical malpractice insurance shall not be considered
a renewal for purposes of this section.

--- END ---