BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that homeless families
who have access to supportive services, such as counseling, employment
support and job training, health care treatment and programs, parenting
skills education and training, child care, and transportation
assistance, are more likely to achieve housing stability than families
without access to those services. The legislature finds that linkages
between supportive services and transitional housing must be
strengthened in order to provide homeless families with the necessary
skills and supports to sustain stable housing as they transition out of
homelessness. However, the unpredictable nature of current service
funding limits new housing development and puts existing programs for
homeless families at risk.
The legislature finds that the sound families initiative in Pierce,
King, and Snohomish counties provides a successful model of combining
public funding and private support for services and housing for
homeless families. Recent outcomes of the sound families initiative
include increased work activity and increased income levels among
households eligible for the federal temporary assistance for needy
families program who were provided housing-based supportive services.
A strong partnership between private resources and public services can
greatly increase the successful transition of homeless families to
stable housing and employment.
The legislature further finds that in order to make the public-private model work statewide, an ongoing stable source of service funds
is essential. State funds could provide the catalyst for significant
private contributions that would spur development of housing-based
support services statewide. Where there is a strong public-private
partnership to support the provision of services, as is the case with
the sound families initiative, the return on the investment of public
funds far exceeds that initial expenditure. With a one-time investment
in housing-based supportive services for homeless families that is
supplemented and sustained with ongoing private investments, the long-term availability of resources for those families can be ensured.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to create, and make
an initial investment of state funds in, a homeless families services
fund that will leverage private resources and thereby ensure the long-term availability of stable housing to support homeless families
throughout the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory board" means the homeless families services fund
advisory board established under this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Director" means the director of community, trade, and economic
development.
(4) "Fund" means the homeless families services fund established
under this chapter.
(5) "Homeless family" means a family that is eligible for services
funded through the emergency shelter assistance program carried out
within the department of community, trade, and economic development.
(6) "Program" means the homeless families services fund program
established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 There is created within the department of
community, trade, and economic development the homeless families
services fund program to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
Duties established by this chapter do not commence until and unless
sufficient moneys are appropriated or otherwise provided for this
specific purpose to the fund created in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) There is created in the custody of the
state treasurer an account to be known as the homeless families
services fund. The fund shall include a one-time appropriation by the
legislature, private contributions, and all other sources.
(2) Expenditures from the fund may only be used for the purposes of
the program established under this chapter, including administrative
expenses.
(3) Expenditures from the fund are exempt from appropriations and
the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW. However, money used for
program administration by the department is subject to the allotment
and budgetary controls of chapter 43.88 RCW, and an appropriation is
required for these expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The homeless families services fund
advisory board is hereby established to advise the department in the
design and administration of the fund. The director shall provide
staff and administrative support to the advisory board in carrying out
the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The advisory board shall consist of ten members to be appointed
by the governor, as follows:
(a) A representative of the department of social and health
services;
(b) A representative of the regional support networks;
(c) A representative of a local housing authority that provides
federal section 8 vouchers to homeless families, and which primarily
serves a rural population;
(d) A representative of a local housing authority that provides
federal section 8 vouchers to homeless families, and which primarily
serves an urban population;
(e) An individual with expertise in the design or evaluation of
service delivery to homeless families;
(f) An individual with expertise in the provision of supportive
services to homeless families who primarily serves a rural population;
(g) An individual with expertise in the provision of supportive
services to homeless families who primarily serves an urban population;
(h) An individual with expertise in the development and operation
of low-income housing, including housing set aside for homeless
families; and
(i) Two individuals with expertise in private philanthropy.
(3) Members of the advisory board shall serve terms of four years
and may be appointed for successive terms of four years. The governor
may stagger the terms of the initial members of the board so that
approximately one-fourth of the members' terms expire each year. The
advisory board shall select a chair from among its members.
(4) Members of the advisory board shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Duties of the advisory board shall include
the following:
(1) Recommending criteria for determination of grant allocations
from the fund, which shall include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Guidelines for the amounts of allocations of grants from the
fund, taking into consideration the variation in housing market and
services costs throughout the state;
(b) Guidelines for the minimum amount of matching funds that an
applicant to the fund must secure in order to qualify for a grant from
the fund;
(c) Criteria that an applicant to the fund must meet in order to
demonstrate that the proposed housing and services are financially
viable and meet quality standards;
(d) Necessary qualifications and capacity of an applicant to the
fund; and
(e) Guidelines for geographic distribution of funds from the fund
in order to foster development of supportive housing statewide;
(2) Reviewing applications to the fund and making recommendations
to the director on the allocation of grants from the fund;
(3) Recommending performance and outcome measures for recipients of
grants from the fund;
(4) Recommending an evaluation method for the homeless families
services fund program;
(5) Investigating administrative options for the fund, including
administration by a community foundation or other nonprofit
organization that would manage state funds along with private
contributions to the fund on behalf of the department, which could
include contracting with recipients of grants from the fund, dispersing
funds to recipients of grants from the fund, monitoring performance of
recipients of grants from the fund, and evaluating the overall
effectiveness of the program; and
(6) Working with housing authorities, community-based service and
housing providers, or other applicants to the fund to identify
additional sources of revenue for the fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department shall use funds from the
fund and other legislative appropriations to provide state matching
funds for housing-based supportive services for homeless families over
a period of at least ten years.
(2) Services funded through the homeless families services fund
shall be coordinated with existing and available services and shall not
inappropriately duplicate any other state-funded services available to
homeless families assisted through the fund. The fund shall not be
used to supplant existing funding.
(3) Activities eligible for funding through the fund include, but
are not limited to, the following:
(a) Case management;
(b) Counseling;
(c) Referrals to employment support and job training services and
direct employment support and job training services;
(d) Domestic violence services and programs;
(e) Mental health treatment, services, and programs;
(f) Substance abuse treatment, services, and programs;
(g) Parenting skills education and training;
(h) Transportation assistance;
(i) Child care; and
(j) Other supportive services identified by the department to be an
important link for housing stability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Organizations that may receive funds from
the fund include local housing authorities, nonprofit community or
neighborhood-based organizations, public development authorities,
federally recognized Indian tribes in the state, and regional or
statewide nonprofit housing assistance organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The department shall collect information
from recipients of grants from the fund to evaluate and improve the
overall effectiveness of the homeless families services fund program.
Areas of evaluation shall include, but need not be limited to, the
following:
(1) Increases in housing stability for assisted homeless families;
(2) Increases in economic self-sufficiency of assisted homeless
families;
(3) Increases in independent living skills of assisted homeless
families; and
(4) Decreases in the use of state-funded services or the costs of
state-funded services and income support for assisted homeless
families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The department shall report to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December
1, 2004, with a preliminary plan for implementation of this chapter.
(2) The department and the advisory board shall thereafter report
on an annual basis to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of
the legislature regarding the status of applications to and grant
allocations from the fund and performance of the program.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.20A.790 and 1999 c 267 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall collaborate with the department of
community, trade, and economic development in the development of the
coordinated and comprehensive plan for homeless families with children
required under RCW 43.63A.650, which designates the department of
community, trade, and economic development as the state agency with
primary responsibility for providing shelter and housing services to
homeless families with children. In fulfilling its responsibilities to
collaborate with the department of community, trade, and economic
development pursuant to RCW 43.63A.650, the department shall develop,
administer, supervise, and monitor its portion of the plan. The
department's portion of the plan shall contain at least the following
elements:
(a) Coordination or linkage of services with shelter and housing;
(b) Accommodation and addressing the needs of homeless families in
the design and administration of department programs;
(c) Participation of the department's local offices in the
identification, assistance, and referral of homeless families; and
(d) Ongoing monitoring of the efficiency and effectiveness of the
plan's design and implementation.
(2) The department shall include community organizations involved
in the delivery of services to homeless families with children, and
experts in the development and ongoing evaluation of the plan.
(3) The department shall coordinate with the department of
community, trade, and economic development in supporting the work of
the homeless families services fund program established pursuant to
section 3 of this act. As part of its coordination efforts, the
department shall work with organizations receiving grants from the
homeless families services fund to identify and coordinate the
provision of services offered by the department that meet the goals of
the homeless families services fund program.
(4) The duties under this section shall be implemented within
amounts appropriated for that specific purpose by the legislature in
the operating and capital budgets.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2003 c 403 s 9, 2003 c 313 s 10, 2003
c 191 s 7, 2003 c 148 s 15, 2003 c 92 s 8, and 2003 c 19 s 12 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism
promotion account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural
rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the
youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the
sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's trust fund, ((and))
the investing in innovation account, and the homeless families services
fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced
by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---