BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35A.12.110 and 1993 c 199 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The city council and mayor shall meet regularly, at least once a
month, at a place and at such times as may be designated by the city
council. All final actions on resolutions and ordinances must take
place within the corporate limits of the city. Special meetings may be
called by the mayor or any three members of the council by written
notice delivered to each member of the council at least twenty-four
hours before the time specified for the proposed meeting. All actions
that have heretofore been taken at special council meetings held
pursuant to this section, but for which the number of hours of notice
given has been at variance with requirements of RCW 42.30.080, are
hereby validated. All council meetings shall be open to the public
except as permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW and the rules of the council
shall provide that citizens of the city shall have a reasonable
opportunity to be heard at any meetings in regard to any matter being
considered thereat. No ordinance or resolution shall be passed, or
contract let or entered into, or bill for the payment of money allowed
at any meeting not open to the public, nor at any public meeting the
date of which is not fixed by ordinance, resolution, or rule, unless
public notice of such meeting has been given by such notice to each
local newspaper of general circulation and to each local radio or
television station, as provided in RCW 42.30.080 as now or hereafter
amended. Meetings of the council shall be presided over by the mayor,
if present, or otherwise by the mayor pro tempore, or deputy mayor if
one has been appointed, or by a member of the council selected by a
majority of the council members at such meeting. Appointment of a
council member to preside over the meeting shall not in any way abridge
his or her right to vote on matters coming before the council at such
meeting. In the absence of the clerk, a deputy clerk or other
qualified person appointed by the clerk, the mayor, or the council, may
perform the duties of clerk at such meeting. A journal of all
proceedings shall be kept, which shall be a public record.

--- END ---