BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Inherently low-emission vehicle" means an inherently low-emission
vehicle as defined in, and conforming to the certification and labeling
requirements of, federal regulations under 40 C.F.R. Part 88, and
includes zero-emission vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Zero-emission vehicle" means a factory manufactured passenger
vehicle that is federally certified under 40 C.F.R. Part 86, and is
labeled in accordance with that regulation as a zero-emission vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall issue annually, at the time of vehicle
registration or renewal, optional permits in the form of a decal,
label, or other identifier at the request of owners of inherently low-emission vehicles that will entitle the operator of the vehicle to use
special lanes as specified in RCW 46.61.165 and 47.52.025, regardless
of the number of occupants.
(2) The department shall design the decal, label, or other
identifier and shall determine its placement on inherently low-emission
vehicles in conjunction with the Washington state patrol. The decal,
label, or other identifier must be developed so that its removal from
a vehicle cannot be accomplished without defacing or destroying the
label in whole or in part.
(3) An inherently low-emission vehicle with an ILEV label provided
by a manufacturer as provided in 40 C.F.R. Part 88 must also obtain the
decal, label, or other identifier designed and distributed by the
department to use special lanes as specified in RCW 46.61.165 and
47.52.025.
(4) The decal, label, or other identifier is nontransferable.
(5) For informational purposes only, the department shall obtain a
listing of inherently low-emission vehicles from the United States
environmental protection agency and shall post the listings on its web
site and any other medium it deems appropriate for public viewing. The
department shall update the list annually.
(6) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state department of transportation and the local authorities
are authorized to reserve all or any portion of any highway under their
respective jurisdictions, including any designated lane or ramp, for
the exclusive or preferential use of public transportation vehicles or
private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified number of
passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient utilization
of the highway or will aid in the conservation of energy resources.
The department may open these lanes to use by single-occupant
inherently low-emission vehicles at times or locations when the
addition of these vehicles would not unduly contribute to congestion or
impede the flow of traffic. The inherently low-emission vehicle must
also display a decal, label, or other identifier issued by the
department of licensing under section 3 of this act authorizing the use
of the lanes. Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential
use of a highway facility may be declared to be effective at all times
or at specified times of day or on specified days. Violation of a
restriction of highway usage prescribed by the appropriate authority
under this section is a traffic infraction.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.52.025 and 1974 ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Highway authorities of the state, counties, and incorporated cities
and towns, in addition to the specific powers granted in this chapter,
shall also have, and may exercise, relative to limited access
facilities, any and all additional authority, now or hereafter vested
in them relative to highways or streets within their respective
jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use of such
limited access facilities by various classes of vehicles or traffic.
Such highway authorities may reserve any limited access facility or
portions thereof, including designated lanes or ramps for the exclusive
or preferential use of public transportation vehicles, privately owned
buses, or private motor vehicles carrying not less than a specified
number of passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient
utilization of the highway facility or will aid in the conservation of
energy resources. The department may open these lanes to use by
single-occupant inherently low-emission vehicles at times or locations
when the addition of these vehicles would not unduly contribute to
congestion or impede the flow of traffic. The inherently low-emission
vehicle must also display a decal, label, or other identifier issued by
the department of licensing under section 3 of this act authorizing the
use of the lanes. Regulations authorizing such exclusive or
preferential use of a highway facility may be declared to be effective
at all time or at specified times of day or on specified days.

Sec. 6 RCW 81.100.020 and 1990 c 43 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Transit agency" means a city that operates a transit system,
a public transportation benefit area, a county transportation
authority, or a metropolitan municipal corporation.
(2) The "high occupancy vehicle system" includes high occupancy
vehicle lanes, related high occupancy vehicle facilities, and high
occupancy vehicle programs.
(3) "High occupancy vehicle lanes" mean lanes reserved for (a)
public transportation vehicles only; or (b) public transportation
vehicles, vehicles with special inherently low-emission decals, labels,
or other identifiers issued under section 3 of this act, and private
vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified number of passengers under
RCW 46.61.165.
(4) "Related facilities" means park and ride lots, park and pool
lots, ramps, bypasses, turnouts, signal preemption, and other
improvements designed to maximize use of the high occupancy vehicle
system.
(5) "High occupancy vehicle program" means advertising the high
occupancy vehicle system, promoting carpool, vanpool, and transit use,
providing vanpool vehicles, and enforcement of driving restrictions
governing high occupancy vehicle lanes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department of transportation shall
conduct a study on how any existing high-occupancy toll lane program or
value pricing pilot program may be expanded to include vehicles whose
combined city and highway average gasoline mileage is at least twice
the national average for passenger cars, as that figure is determined
by the United States environmental protection agency, if such vehicles
were to receive a fee waiver or discount. The department shall report
its findings to the legislature by January 1, 2005, or at the
conclusion of the department's study of high-occupancy toll lanes under
the United States federal highway's value pricing pilot program,
whichever occurs first.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 6 of this act take effect
July 1, 2004.

--- END ---