BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Persons who are taxable under this chapter may take a credit
for the purchase, or the lease for a period of at least three years, of
new alternative fuel vehicles, if the vehicles are exclusively used in
business operations. The credit is based upon the following schedule:

VEHICLE TONNAGE
CREDIT

Less than 10,000 pounds
gross vehicle weight 30 percent of the cost or
$5,000, whichever is
less

10,000 pounds or more
gross vehicle weight 30 percent of the cost or
$25,000, whichever is
less

(2) For the purposes of this section, "alternative fuel vehicles"
means a motor vehicle, as defined in RCW 46.04.320, originally designed
and equipped by the manufacturer to operate: (a) Exclusively on
hydrogen or electricity; or (b) as a fuel cell vehicle. For purposes
of this subsection, "fuel cell vehicle" is defined as a vehicle that
operates on an electric motor drawing current from combining hydrogen
and oxygen in an electrochemical process.
(3) The credit may not exceed the amount of tax that would
otherwise be due under this chapter. The credit may be accrued and
carried over until it is used. Refunds shall not be granted in place
of credits. The maximum amount of credit under this section that may
be claimed, by each person, for any calendar year shall not exceed five
hundred thousand dollars.
(4) Tax credit may not be claimed for expenditures that occurred
before the effective date of this section or expenditures that occur
after January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Persons who are taxable under this chapter may take a credit
for the costs expended for acquiring and installing alternative fuel
and electric vehicle recharging equipment, including alternative fuel
storage tanks. For purposes of this subsection, "alternative fuel"
means hydrogen. The credit is based upon the following schedule:
(a) Fifty percent of the costs incurred at facilities open to the
public not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars; and
(b) Twenty-five percent of the costs incurred at facilities not
open to the public not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(2) The credit may not exceed the amount of tax that would
otherwise be due under this chapter. The credit may be accrued and
carried over until it is used. Refunds shall not be granted in place
of credits. The maximum amount of credit under this section that may
be claimed, by each person, for any calendar year shall not exceed two
million dollars.
(3) Tax credit may not be claimed for expenditures that occurred
before the effective date of this section or expenditures that occur
after January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
constructing structures, installing, constructing, repairing,
decorating, altering, or improving of structures or machinery and
equipment, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of structures or machinery and equipment, if
the machinery, equipment, or structure is used directly for the retail
sale of hydrogen for use in a motor vehicle or is used for the
recharging of an electric vehicle.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in the form and manner prescribed
by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate
for the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, altering, or improving of eligible machinery and
equipment, or tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component of machinery and equipment used directly for the retail sale
of hydrogen or a blend of natural gas and hydrogen for use in a motor
vehicle or used for the recharging of an electric vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The legislature finds that
accountability and effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax
policy. In order to make policy choices regarding the best use of
limited state resources the legislature needs information to evaluate
whether the stated goals of legislation were achieved.
(2) The goal of the alternative fuel vehicle and electric vehicle
tax incentives in sections 1 through 4 of this act is to encourage the
use of alternative fuel vehicles and electric vehicles and to encourage
development of fueling and recharge stations. The goal of this tax
credit is achieved when the total number of alternative fuel vehicles
and electric vehicles exceeds five percent of the total number of motor
vehicles, as defined in RCW 46.04.320, that are registered in
Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 4 of this act expire
January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---