BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the timely
issuance of project permit decisions by the department of ecology and
the department of fish and wildlife serves the public interest. When
these decisions, that are often responses to environmental permit
applications, are issued according to specific and established time
periods and without unnecessary or inappropriate delays, the public
enjoys greater efficiency, consistency, and predictability in the
permitting process.
The legislature also finds that full access to relevant performance
data produced annually by the department of ecology and the department
of fish and wildlife for each type of permit application affords
elected officials, project proponents, and the general public the
opportunity to review and compare the permit application and processing
performance of agencies. Furthermore, the legislature finds that the
review and comparison of this data, and the requirement to provide
convenient and direct internet access to germane and consistent
reports, will likely foster improved methods for processing
applications, and issuing project permit decisions in a timely manner.
The legislature, therefore, intends to establish requirements for
the department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife to
produce and provide access to annual permitting performance reports.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Development regulations adopted by the
department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife must
establish and implement time periods for agency actions for each type
of project permit application and provide timely and predictable
procedures to determine whether a completed project permit application
meets the requirements of those development regulations. The time
periods for agency actions for each type of complete project permit
application or project type should not exceed one hundred twenty days,
unless the agency makes written findings that a specified amount of
additional time is needed to process specific complete project permit
applications or project types.
The development regulations must, for each type of permit
application, specify the contents of a completed project permit
application necessary for the complete compliance with the time periods
and procedures.
(2)(a) The department of ecology and the department of fish and
wildlife must, for each type of permit application, identify the total
number of project permit applications for which decisions are issued
according to the provisions of this section. For each type of project
permit application identified, these agencies must establish and
implement a deadline for issuing a notice of final decision as required
by subsection (1) of this section and minimum requirements for
applications to be deemed complete as required by subsection (1) of
this section.
(b) The department of ecology and the department of fish and
wildlife must prepare annual performance reports that include, at a
minimum, the following information for each type of project permit
application identified in accordance with the requirements of (a) of
this subsection:
(i) Total number of complete applications received during the year;
(ii) Number of complete applications received during the year for
which a notice of final decision was issued before the deadline
established under this subsection;
(iii) Number of applications received during the year for which a
notice of final decision was issued after the deadline established
under this subsection;
(iv) Number of applications received during the year for which an
extension of time was mutually agreed upon by the applicant and the
agency;
(v) Variance of actual performance, excluding applications for
which mutually agreed time extensions have occurred, to the deadline
established under this subsection during the year; and
(vi) The mean processing time and the number standard deviation
from the mean.
(c) State agencies subject to the requirements of this subsection
must:
(i) Provide notice of and access to the annual performance reports
through the agency's web site; and
(ii) Post electronic facsimiles of the annual performance reports
through the agency's web site. Postings on an agency's web site
indicating that the reports are available by contacting the appropriate
agency, department, or official do not comply with the requirements of
this subsection.
If an agency subject to the requirements of this subsection does
not maintain a web site, notice of the reports must be given by
reasonable methods.
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits an agency from extending a
deadline for issuing a decision for a specific project permit
application for any reasonable period of time mutually agreed upon by
the applicant and the agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---