BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.0293 and 2003 c 168 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
food and food ingredients. "Food and food ingredients" means
substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or
dehydrated form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and
are consumed for their taste or nutritional value. "Food and food
ingredients" does not include:
(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable
for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of
alcohol by volume; and
(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe
tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to prepared food, soft
drinks, or dietary supplements.
(a) "Prepared food" means:
(i) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;
(ii) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item; or
(iii) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or
straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food.
"Prepared food" in (a)(ii) of this subsection, does not include
food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller and raw
eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal foods
requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the federal food
and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The Food Code,
published by the food and drug administration, as amended or renumbered
as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness; or bakery
items, including bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants,
pastries, donuts, danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars,
cookies, or tortillas.
(b) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural
or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages that
contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk
substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice
by volume.
(c) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that:
(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients: A
vitamin; a mineral; an herb or other botanical; an amino acid; a
dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by
increasing the total dietary intake; or a concentrate, metabolite,
constituent, extract, or combination of any ingredient described in
this subsection; and is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule,
powder, softgel, gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for
ingestion in such form, is not represented as conventional food and is
not represented for use as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and
(ii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as
of January 1, 2003.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section shall
apply to food and food ingredients which are furnished, prepared, or
served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6); or
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, disabled persons, or
low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under
chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.
(4)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail
sale of food and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under RCW
82.08.020 if the food and food ingredients are sold through a vending
machine, and in this case the selling price for purposes of RCW
82.08.020 is ((fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts)) calculated
according to the following formula:
(i) The gross receipts multiplied by fifty-seven percent;
(ii) Divided by an amount equal to one plus the rates of tax
imposed under this chapter and chapter 82.14 RCW.
(b) This subsection (4) does not apply to hot prepared food and
food ingredients, other than food and food ingredients which are heated
after they have been dispensed from the vending machine.
(c) For tax collected under this subsection (4), the requirements
that the tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be
stated as a separate item are waived.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.080 and 1986 c 36 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of revenue may authorize a seller to pay the tax
levied under this chapter upon sales made under conditions of business
such as to render impracticable the collection of the tax as a separate
item and waive collection of the tax from the customer. Where sales
are made by ((receipt of a coin or coins dropped into a receptacle)) a
vending machine that results in delivery of the merchandise in single
purchases of smaller value than the minimum sale upon which a one cent
tax may be collected from the purchaser, according to the schedule
provided by the department under authority of RCW 82.08.060, and where
the design of the sales device is such that multiple sales of items are
not possible or cannot be detected so as practically to assess a tax,
in such a case the selling price for the purposes of the tax imposed
under RCW 82.08.020 shall be sixty percent of the gross receipts of the
vending machine through which such sales are made.
(2) No such authority shall be granted except upon application to
the department and unless the department, after hearing, finds that the
conditions of the applicant's business are such as to render
impracticable the collection of the tax in the manner otherwise
provided. The department, by ((regulation)) rule, may provide that the
applicant, under this section, furnish a proper bond sufficient to
secure the payment of the tax.
(3) "Vending machine" means a machine or other mechanical device
that accepts payment and:
(a) Dispenses tangible personal property;
(b) Provides facilities for installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, imprinting, or improving tangible personal property; or
(c) Provides a service to the buyer.

--- END ---