BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that recent tuition
increases have made avoiding indebtedness while attending colleges and
universities much more difficult. The legislature also finds that some
colleges and universities have imposed stringent tuition and fee due
date policies, ignoring situations that may arise in the lives of
students, which impact their ability to make timely tuition payments.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that students be given
every reasonable opportunity to avoid debt and make timely tuition
payments, including exempting certain students from tuition and fee due
dates for a reasonable amount of time to allow payments to be made
throughout the academic term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the fall 2004 academic term, colleges and
universities shall establish and make available an optional payment
plan to allow students to pay all tuition and fees throughout the term
in approximately equal monthly payments.
(2) Any degree-earning student shall be allowed to enroll in the
payment plan, except students receiving financial aid or scholarships
that cover the full cost of tuition and fees.
(3) Colleges and universities may impose an administrative fee to
help defray administrative costs associated with the payment plan, not
to exceed one-half of one percent of total tuition and fees due.
(4) Enrollment in the payment plan shall exempt the student from
specific lump sum payment due dates of tuition and fees of colleges and
universities, and any corresponding penalties or surcharges.
(5) Colleges and universities may disenroll a student from the
payment plan for delinquency of two or more payments.
(6) Colleges and universities shall make available specific
information regarding the availability of the payment plan to all
eligible students.
(7) Colleges and universities shall establish an enrollment
deadline that does not precede the due date of tuition and fees for the
current term.

--- END ---