BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.22.070 and 1993 c 496 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In all actions involving fault of more than one entity, the
trier of fact shall determine the percentage of the total fault which
is attributable to every entity which caused the claimant's damages
except entities immune from liability to the claimant under Title 51
RCW. The sum of the percentages of the total fault attributed to at-fault entities shall equal one hundred percent. The entities whose
fault shall be determined include the claimant or person suffering
personal injury or incurring property damage, defendants, third-party
defendants, entities released by the claimant, entities with any other
individual defense against the claimant, and entities immune from
liability to the claimant, but shall not include those entities immune
from liability to the claimant under Title 51 RCW. Judgment shall be
entered against each defendant except those who have been released by
the claimant or are immune from liability to the claimant or have
prevailed on any other individual defense against the claimant in an
amount which represents that party's proportionate share of the
claimant's total damages. The liability of each defendant shall be
several only and shall not be joint except:
(a) A party shall be responsible for the fault of another person or
for payment of the proportionate share of another party where both were
acting in concert or when a person was acting as an agent or servant of
the party.
(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, if the
trier of fact determines that the claimant or party suffering bodily
injury or incurring property damages was not at fault, the defendants
against whom judgment is entered shall be jointly and severally liable
for the sum of their proportionate shares of the ((claimants
[claimant's])) claimant's total damages.
(ii) Subsection (b)(i) of this subsection does not apply to a
hospital, as defined in RCW 70.41.020, in all cases governed by chapter
7.70 RCW with respect to judgments for noneconomic damages. In all
cases governed by chapter 7.70 RCW where the case would otherwise come
under (b)(i) of this subsection, the liability of the hospital for
noneconomic damages is several only. For the purposes of this section,
"noneconomic damages" has the meaning given in RCW 4.56.250.
(2) If a defendant is jointly and severally liable under one of the
exceptions listed in subsections (1)(a) or (1)(b) of this section, such
defendant's rights to contribution against another jointly and
severally liable defendant, and the effect of settlement by either such
defendant, shall be determined under RCW 4.22.040, 4.22.050, and
4.22.060.
(3)(a) Nothing in this section affects any cause of action relating
to hazardous wastes or substances or solid waste disposal sites.
(b) Nothing in this section shall affect a cause of action arising
from the tortious interference with contracts or business relations.
(c) Nothing in this section shall affect any cause of action
arising from the manufacture or marketing of a fungible product in a
generic form which contains no clearly identifiable shape, color, or
marking.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.56.250 and 1986 c 305 s 301 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Economic damages" means objectively verifiable monetary
losses, including medical expenses, loss of earnings, burial costs,
loss of use of property, cost of replacement or repair, cost of
obtaining substitute domestic services, loss of employment, and loss of
business or employment opportunities.
(b) "Noneconomic damages" means subjective, nonmonetary losses,
including, but not limited to pain, suffering, inconvenience, mental
anguish, disability or disfigurement incurred by the injured party,
loss of ability to enjoy life, emotional distress, loss of society and
companionship, loss of consortium, injury to reputation and
humiliation, ((and)) destruction of the parent-child relationship, and
other nonpecuniary damages of any type.
(c) "Bodily injury" means physical injury, sickness, or disease,
including death.
(d) "Average annual wage" means the average annual wage in the
state of Washington as determined under RCW 50.04.355.
(2) In no action seeking damages for personal injury or death may
a claimant recover a judgment for noneconomic damages exceeding an
amount determined by multiplying 0.43 by the average annual wage and by
the life expectancy of the person incurring noneconomic damages, as the
life expectancy is determined by the life expectancy tables adopted by
the insurance commissioner. For purposes of determining the maximum
amount allowable for noneconomic damages, a claimant's life expectancy
shall not be less than fifteen years. The limitation contained in this
subsection applies to all claims for noneconomic damages made by a
claimant who incurred bodily injury. Claims for loss of consortium,
loss of society and companionship, destruction of the parent-child
relationship, and all other derivative claims asserted by persons who
did not sustain bodily injury are to be included within the limitation
on claims for noneconomic damages arising from the same bodily injury.
(3) If a case is tried to a jury, the jury shall not be informed of
the limitation contained in subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---