BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.93 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any boundary review board established under this chapter may,
as provided by this section, initiate a review of unincorporated
territory within an urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110
for the purpose of establishing a planning boundary.
A request for review as provided by this section may only be made
by a legislative body subject to the provisions of RCW 36.70A.215 that
is within the territorial jurisdiction of the board, or a growth
management council or citizen subject to the jurisdiction of such a
legislative body.
(2) The planning boundary should be consistent with any potential
or planned annexation areas designated in an adopted county
comprehensive plan or a written annexation agreement between a county
and a city or town. The board, however, may establish a planning
boundary in a manner consistent with the review provisions established
by the board in this chapter.
(3) Following the completion of the review provided by this
section, the board shall forward the planning boundary to the
legislative authority of the county. Upon receipt of the planning
boundary, the county shall perform a fiscal analysis for the purpose of
determining whether the county will experience any revenue loss as a
result of an annexation of the territory within the planning boundary
and the amount of any related revenue loss.
(4) Following the completion of the fiscal analysis, the county
must commence a negotiation process with the city or town that, as
identified in the planning boundary, the subject territory may be
annexed to for the purpose of negotiating an interlocal agreement as
provided in chapter 39.34 RCW. The interlocal agreement shall provide:
(a) For a transfer of funds from the county in an amount equal to
the revenue loss identified by the county in the fiscal analysis
required by this section; and
(b) That all municipal services within the planning boundary,
except those provided by special purpose districts, must be provided by
the city or town that, under the proposed planning boundary, the
subject territory may be annexed to.
(5)(a) Upon completing the interlocal agreement negotiations, the
agreement shall be submitted to the county legislative authority of the
county party to the agreement.
(b) Upon receipt of the completed agreement, the question of either
approving the agreement or annexing to the city or town party to the
agreement shall be submitted by the county legislative authority to the
voters of the subject territory in a general election if one is to be
held within ninety days or at a special election called for that
purpose not less than forty-five days nor more than ninety days after
submission of the agreement to the county legislative authority.
(c) The election shall be conducted as provided in the general
election law. Upon the certification of the election:
(i) The agreement shall be deemed approved if a majority of the
votes cast on the proposition by the voters of the subject territory
are in favor thereto and shall be effective January 1st of the
following year; or
(ii) The annexation shall be deemed approved if a majority of the
votes cast on the proposition by the voters of the subject territory
are in favor thereto and shall be effective January 1st of the
following year.
(6) Should the voters choose to approve the interlocal agreement as
provided by subsection (5) of this section, the jurisdictions subject
to the agreement must renegotiate and update the agreement annually or
biennially, as appropriate.
(7) Should the voters choose to approve the annexation, the
annexing jurisdiction shall receive priority status for grant
applications for infrastructure investments from the public works trust
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.93 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A petition calling for an election as provided by section 1(5)
of this act may be filed with the boundary review board specified in
section 1(1) of this act upon the renegotiation of an interlocal
agreement as provided by section 1(6) of this act. To qualify as
sufficient, the petition for election must comply with the requirements
of RCW 35A.01.040 and be signed by not fewer than twenty percent of the
registered voters residing within the subject territory.
(2) Upon a determination of sufficiency as provided by RCW
35A.01.040, the board shall transmit the petition to the legislative
authority of the county party to the interlocal agreement. Following
this transmission, the legislative authority shall resubmit the
question of either approving the agreement or annexing to the subject
city or town in a manner consistent with the election provisions of
section 1(5) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.93 RCW
to read as follows:
The services provided by a city or town as specified in an
interlocal agreement as provided by section 1 of this act shall
correspond to the estimated revenue loss specified by a county in the
fiscal analysis required by section 1(3) of this act.

--- END ---