BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.380 and 1997 c 321 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a retailer's license to be designated as a special
occasion license to be issued to a not-for-profit society or
organization to sell spirits, beer, and wine by the individual serving
for on-premises consumption at a specified event, such as at picnics or
other special occasions, at a specified date and place; fee sixty
dollars per day.
(1) The not-for-profit society or organization is limited to sales
of no more than twelve calendar days per year. For the purposes of
this subsection, special occasion licensees that are "agricultural area
fairs" or "agricultural county and district fairs," as defined by RCW
15.76.120, that receive a special occasion license may, once per
calendar year, count as one event fairs that last multiple days, so
long as alcohol sales are at set dates, times, and locations, and the
board receives prior notification of the dates, times, and locations.
The special occasion license applicant will pay the sixty dollars per
day for this event.
(2) The licensee may sell beer and/or wine in original, unopened
containers for off-premises consumption if permission is obtained from
the board prior to the event.
(3) Sale, service, and consumption of spirits, beer, and wine is to
be confined to specified premises or designated areas only.
(4) Spirituous liquor sold under this special occasion license must
be purchased at a state liquor store or agency without discount at
retail prices, including all taxes.
(5) Any violation of this section is a class 1 civil infraction
having a maximum penalty of two hundred fifty dollars as provided for
in chapter 7.80 RCW.

--- END ---