BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I - INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that the issue of
the taxability of staffing agencies has been the subject of
considerable confusion and dispute by the staffing industry, the
department of revenue, and the courts since the Washington supreme
court issued its decision in Rho Company v. Department of Revenue in
1989. The court cleared up much of the confusion caused by the Rho
decision in City of Tacoma v. The William Rogers Company, Inc., issued
in December of 2002. The Rogers decision states that certain temporary
staffing agencies are taxable on their gross income, which includes
amounts paid as wages, benefits, and costs for the workers that they
provide to others. This decision does have an adverse fiscal impact on
those temporary staffing agencies that have been deducting the amounts
paid as wages, benefits, and costs to their workers.
The legislature has determined that it is in the best interests of
the state and the temporary staffing industry to alleviate the fiscal
impact to the industry, and to fully resolve the issues of the
classification and measure of the tax. The legislature finds that this
can be achieved by lowering the rate of tax imposed on the gross income
of a temporary staffing agency, which amount includes all wages,
benefits, and costs paid to or for workers, and clarifying that persons
providing retail services will be taxable under the retailing or
wholesaling classification.

PART II - BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX RATE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2)
of this section, upon every person engaging in this state in the
business of providing staffing services taxable under this subsection;
as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate of 0.484 percent.
(2) Persons providing staffing services to provide services
described in RCW 82.04.050 if performed for a consumer, are taxable
under RCW 82.04.250 or 82.04.270 as applicable, and liable for
collecting and remitting the retail sales tax imposed under RCW
82.08.020.
(3) For the purpose of this section and section 401 of this act,
"staffing services" means an arrangement in which the taxpayer recruits
and hires employees from the labor market and assigns them on a
temporary basis to perform services for another to support, or
supplement, the customer's work force, or to provide assistance in
special work situations such as employee absences, skill shortages, and
seasonal workloads, or to perform special assignments or projects, all
under the direction and supervision of the customer. "Staffing
services" does not include employee leasing or employee placement
services.

PART III - APPORTIONMENT
Sec. 301 RCW 82.04.460 and 1985 c 7 s 154 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person rendering services taxable under RCW 82.04.290 or
section 201 of this act and maintaining places of business both within
and without this state which contribute to the rendition of such
services shall, for the purpose of computing tax liability under RCW
82.04.290 or section 201 of this act, apportion to this state that
portion of ((his)) the person's gross income which is derived from
services rendered within this state. Where such apportionment cannot
be accurately made by separate accounting methods, the taxpayer shall
apportion to this state that proportion of ((his)) the taxpayer's total
income which the cost of doing business within the state bears to the
total cost of doing business both within and without the state.
(2) Notwithstanding the provision of subsection (1) of this
section, persons doing business both within and without the state who
receive gross income from service charges, as defined in RCW 63.14.010
(relating to amounts charged for granting the right or privilege to
make deferred or installment payments) or who receive gross income from
engaging in business as financial institutions within the scope of
chapter 82.14A RCW (relating to city taxes on financial institutions)
shall apportion or allocate gross income taxable under RCW 82.04.290 to
this state pursuant to rules promulgated by the department consistent
with uniform rules for apportionment or allocation developed by the
states.
(3) The department shall by rule provide a method or methods of
apportioning or allocating gross income derived from sales of telephone
services taxed under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales
subject to tax under this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of
the taxpayer's income attributable to this state. The rules shall be,
so far as feasible, consistent with the methods of apportionment
contained in this section and shall require the consideration of those
facts, circumstances, and apportionment factors as will result in an
equitable and constitutionally permissible division of the services.

Sec. 302 RCW 82.04.290 and 2003 c 343 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity ((other than or in addition to those)) not otherwise
enumerated in ((RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250, 82.04.255,
82.04.260, 82.04.270, 82.04.298, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2907,
82.04.272, and 82.04.2906, and subsection (1) of this section)) this
chapter; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such
activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(3) This section includes, among others, and without limiting the
scope hereof (whether or not title to materials used in the performance
of such business passes to another by accession, confusion or other
than by outright sale), persons engaged in the business of rendering
any type of service which does not constitute a "sale at retail" or a
"sale at wholesale." The value of advertising, demonstration, and
promotional supplies and materials furnished to an agent by his
principal or supplier to be used for informational, educational and
promotional purposes shall not be considered a part of the agent's
remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to taxation under
this section.

PART IV - AMNESTY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Absent a person's fraud or intentional misrepresentation of a
material fact, no assessment for taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW for staffing services, or related penalties or interest, may
be made by the department against a person who in good faith:
(a) Upon the effective date of this act, collects and remits to the
department the applicable taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW on sales made to consumers in this state; and
(b) For a period of at least thirty-six months from the effective
date of this act, continues to collect and remit to the department the
applicable taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW on sales
made to consumers in this state; provided however, that should the
person quit doing business as a staffing service, then the thirty-six
month period shall be reduced to the period that the person conducted
business as a staffing service from the effective date of this act.
(2) The provisions of this section do not apply to any persons
providing staffing services with respect to:
(a) Taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW and collected
or remitted to the department by persons providing staffing services;
or
(b) That person's liability for taxes imposed under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW in that person's capacity as a consumer.
(3) With respect to taxes described in subsection (1) of this
section and for which liability arose prior to the effective date of
this act, the periods of limitation for making an assessment or
correction of an assessment prescribed in RCW 82.32.050(3) and
82.32.100(3) do not run during the thirty-six month period in
subsection (1) of this section.
(4) If a person providing staffing services fails to meet the
requirements in subsection (1) of this section, the department may make
an assessment or correction of an assessment for the four-year period
preceding the effective date of this act.

PART V - MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---