BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.138.021 and 2001 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Director" means the director of licensing or the director's
designee.
(3) "Sale of travel-related benefits" means the sale of travel
services if the travel services are not identified at the time of the
sale with respect to dates, price, or location and includes:
(a) Sales of travel club memberships;
(b) Sales of vacation certificates or other documents that purport
to grant the holder of the certificate or other document the ability to
obtain future travel services, with or without additional
consideration; or
(c) Sales of travel-industry member benefits including those
through either or both the issuance and sale or the consulting with or
advising for consideration of persons in connection with the obtaining
of international airlines travel agent network identification cards or
memberships.
(4) "Travel club" means a seller of travel that sells memberships
to consumers, where the initial membership or maintenance dues are at
least twice the amount of the annual membership or maintenance dues.
(5) "Seller of travel-related benefits" means a person, firm, or
corporation that transacts business with Washington consumers for the
sale of travel-related benefits.
(6) "Seller of travel" means a person, firm, or corporation both
inside and outside the state of Washington, who transacts business with
Washington consumers.
(a) "Seller of travel" includes a travel agent and any person who
is an independent contractor or outside agent for a travel agency or
other seller of travel whose ((principal)) duties include consulting
with and advising persons concerning travel arrangements or
accommodations in the conduct or administration of its business. If a
seller of travel is employed by a seller of travel who is registered
under this chapter, the employee need not also be registered.
(b) "Seller of travel" does not include:
(i) An air carrier;
(ii) An owner or operator of a vessel, including an ocean common
carrier as defined in 46 U.S.C. App. 1702(18), an owner or charterer of
a vessel that is required to establish its financial responsibility in
accordance with the requirements of the federal maritime commission, 46
U.S.C. App. 817 (e), and a steamboat company whether or not operating
over and upon the waters of this state;
(iii) A motor carrier;
(iv) A rail carrier;
(v) A charter party carrier of passengers as defined in RCW
81.70.020;
(vi) An auto transportation company as defined in RCW 81.68.010;
(vii) A hotel or other lodging accommodation;
(viii) An affiliate of any person or entity described in (i)
through (vii) of this subsection (6)(b) that is primarily engaged in
the sale of travel services provided by the person or entity. For
purposes of this subsection (6)(b)(viii), an "affiliate" means a person
or entity owning, owned by, or under common ownership, with "owning,"
"owned," and "ownership" referring to equity holdings of at least
eighty percent;
(ix) Direct providers of transportation by air, sea, or ground, or
hotel or other lodging accommodations who do not book or arrange any
other travel services.
(7) "Travel services" includes transportation by air, sea, or
ground, hotel or any lodging accommodations, package tours, or vouchers
or coupons to be redeemed for future travel or accommodations for a
fee, commission, or other valuable consideration.
(8) "Advertisement" includes, but is not limited to, a written or
graphic representation in a card, brochure, newspaper, magazine,
directory listing, or display, and oral, written, or graphic
representations made by radio, television, or cable transmission that
relates to travel services.
(9) "Transacts business with Washington consumers" means to
directly offer or sell travel services or travel-related benefits to
Washington consumers, including the placement of advertising in media
based in the state of Washington or that is primarily directed to
Washington residents. Advertising placed in national print or
electronic media alone does not constitute "transacting business with
Washington consumers." Those entities who only wholesale travel
services are not "transacting business with Washington consumers" for
the purposes of this chapter.

--- END ---