BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The protection of the health and safety of the people of
Washington state is a paramount responsibility entrusted to the state.
One of the means for achieving such protection is through regulation of
health professionals and effective discipline of those health care
professionals who engage in unprofessional conduct. The vast majority
of health professionals are dedicated to their profession, and provide
quality services to those in their care. However, effective mechanisms
are needed to ensure that the small minority of health professionals
who engage in unprofessional conduct are reported and disciplined in a
timely and effective manner.
(2) Jurisdiction for health professions disciplinary processes is
divided between the secretary of health and fourteen independent boards
and commissions. While the presence of a board or commission
consisting of members of the profession that they regulate may add
value to some steps of the disciplinary process, in other instances
their involvement may be unnecessary, or even an impediment, to
safeguarding the public's health and safety. It is in the interests of
both public health and safety and credentialed health care
professionals that the health professions disciplinary system operate
effectively and appropriately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The task force on improvement of health
professions discipline is established. The governor must appoint its
members, and shall include:
(a) A representative of a medicare contracted professional review
organization in Washington state;
(b) One or more representatives of the University of Washington
school of health sciences or school of public health with expertise in
health professions regulation;
(c) A representative of the foundation for health care quality;
(d) Four representatives of a broad range of different types of
health care professionals, including one physician, none of whom
currently serve, or have served in the past, on a health professions
disciplinary board or commission;
(e) A representative of hospital-based continuous quality
improvement programs under RCW 70.41.200;
(f) A representative of a hospital peer review committee;
(g) The secretary of the department of health;
(h) A representative of the superior court judges association;
(i) A representative of the Washington state bar association who is
an attorney with expertise in defending health professionals in health
professions disciplinary proceedings in Washington;
(j) A representative of health care consumers, who does not
currently serve and has not in the past served, on a health professions
disciplinary board or commission;
(k) The attorney general or his or her designee; and
(l) Three members of the public, one of whom is a current or former
public member of a disciplining authority included in chapter 18.130
RCW.
(2) The task force shall conduct an independent review of the
funding of the health professions and all phases of the current health
professions disciplinary process, from report intake through final case
closure, and shall, at a minimum, examine and address the following
issues:
(a) The ability of the disciplining authorities identified in RCW
18.130.040 to effectively safeguard the public from potentially harmful
health care practitioners while also ensuring the due process rights of
credentialed health care practitioners;
(b) The feasibility of developing a uniform performance measurement
system for health professions discipline;
(c) Whether there are components to the current health professions
discipline system that serve as impediments to improving the quality of
health professions discipline, including consideration of:
(i) The value of boards and commissions in the health professions
disciplinary process; and
(ii) The respective roles of the secretary and boards and
commissions in health professions disciplinary functions;
(d) The feasibility of allowing law enforcement agencies to share
information from criminal investigations of credentialed health care
providers regardless of whether the provider was not ultimately
convicted;
(e) The extent to which investigation, charging, and sanctioning
decisions are consistently applied across and within each of the
disciplining authorities;
(f) The merits of limiting the public disclosure of certain
information related to the health professions disciplinary process
including complaint closure without investigation, complaint closure
after investigation, and findings after adjudication of no violation of
the uniform disciplinary act;
(g) The extent to which sanctions deviate from advisory guidelines
regarding sanctions and the circumstances behind those deviations; and
(h) Alternative fee structures for health care professionals to
simplify funding and the use of those funds across all health care
professions.
(3) The task force may establish technical advisory committees to
assist in its efforts, and shall provide opportunities for interested
parties to comment upon the task force's findings and recommendations
prior to being finalized.
(4) Staff support to the task force shall be provided by the
department of health and the office of financial management.
(5) The task force shall submit its report and recommendations for
improvement of health professions discipline to the relevant committees
of the legislature and the governor by October 1, 2005.
(6) Nothing in this act limits the secretary of health's authority
to modify the internal processes or organizational framework of the
department.
(7) Members of the task force shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.24.260 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, dentists licensed
under chapter 18.32 RCW, and pharmacists licensed under chapter 18.64
RCW)) Any member of a health profession listed under RCW 18.130.040
who, in good faith, makes a report, files charges, or presents evidence
against another member of ((their)) a health profession based on the
claimed ((incompetency or gross misconduct)) unprofessional conduct as
provided in RCW 18.130.180 or inability to practice with reasonable
skill and safety to consumers by reason of any physical or mental
condition as provided in RCW 18.130.170 of such person before the
((medical quality assurance commission established under chapter 18.71
RCW, in a proceeding under chapter 18.32 RCW, or to the board of
pharmacy under RCW 18.64.160)) agency, board, or commission responsible
for disciplinary activities for the person's profession under chapter
18.130 RCW, shall be immune from civil action for damages arising out
of such activities. A person prevailing upon the good faith defense
provided for in this section is entitled to recover expenses and
reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.71.0193 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 327 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A ((licensed health care professional)) physician licensed
under this chapter shall report to the commission when he or she has
personal knowledge that a practicing physician has either committed an
act or acts which may constitute statutorily defined unprofessional
conduct or that a practicing physician may be unable to practice
medicine with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of
illness, drunkenness, excessive use of drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or
any other type of material, or as a result of any mental or physical
conditions.
(2) Reporting under this section is not required by:
(a) An appropriately appointed peer review committee member of a
licensed hospital or by an appropriately designated professional review
committee member of a county or state medical society during the
investigative phase of their respective operations if these
investigations are completed in a timely manner; or
(b) A treating licensed health care professional of a physician
currently involved in a treatment program as long as the physician
patient actively participates in the treatment program and the
physician patient's impairment does not constitute a clear and present
danger to the public health, safety, or welfare.
(3) The commission may impose disciplinary sanctions, including
license suspension or revocation, on any ((health care professional
subject to the jurisdiction of the commission)) physician licensed
under this chapter who has failed to comply with this section.
(4) Every physician licensed under this chapter who reports to the
commission as required under subsection (1) of this section in good
faith is immune from civil liability for damages arising out of the
report, whether direct or derivative. A person prevailing upon the
defense provided for in this section is entitled to recover expenses
and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.130.010 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 601 are each amended
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to strengthen and consolidate
disciplinary and licensure procedures for the licensed health and
health-related professions and businesses by providing a uniform
disciplinary act with standardized procedures for the licensure of
health care professionals and the enforcement of laws the purpose of
which is to ((assure the public of the adequacy of professional
competence and conduct in the healing arts)) reduce unprofessional
conduct and unsafe practices in health care, protect the public health,
safety, and welfare, and promote patient safety.
It is also the intent of the legislature that all health and
health-related professions newly credentialed by the state come under
the Uniform Disciplinary Act.
Further, the legislature declares that the addition of public
members on all health care commissions and boards can give both the
state and the public, which it has a paramount statutory responsibility
to protect, assurances of accountability and confidence in the various
practices of health care.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.130.180 and 1995 c 336 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute
unprofessional conduct for any license holder or applicant under the
jurisdiction of this chapter:
(1) The commission of any act involving moral turpitude,
dishonesty, or corruption relating to the practice of the person's
profession, whether the act constitutes a crime or not. If the act
constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a
condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction,
however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the
ensuing disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder or
applicant of the crime described in the indictment or information, and
of the person's violation of the statute on which it is based. For the
purposes of this section, conviction includes all instances in which a
plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction and
all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended.
Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A
RCW;
(2) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in
obtaining a license or in reinstatement thereof;
(3) All advertising which is false, fraudulent, or misleading;
(4) Incompetence, negligence, or malpractice which results in
injury to a patient or which creates an unreasonable risk that a
patient may be harmed. The use of a nontraditional treatment by itself
shall not constitute unprofessional conduct, provided that it does not
result in injury to a patient or create an unreasonable risk that a
patient may be harmed;
(5) Suspension, revocation, or restriction of the individual's
license to practice any health care profession by competent authority
in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, a certified copy of the
order, stipulation, or agreement being conclusive evidence of the
revocation, suspension, or restriction. Full faith and credit will be
extended to the action by the competent authority, even if procedures
or standards of proof vary in the other jurisdiction;
(6) The possession, use, prescription for use, or distribution of
controlled substances or legend drugs in any way other than for
legitimate or therapeutic purposes, diversion of controlled substances
or legend drugs, the violation of any drug law, or prescribing
controlled substances for oneself;
(7) Violation of any state or federal statute or administrative
rule regulating the profession in question, including any statute or
rule defining or establishing standards of patient care or professional
conduct or practice;
(8) Failure to cooperate with the disciplining authority by:
(a) Not furnishing any papers or documents;
(b) Not furnishing in writing a full and complete explanation
covering the matter contained in the complaint filed with the
disciplining authority;
(c) Not responding to subpoenas issued by the disciplining
authority, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena is the accused
in the proceeding; or
(d) Not providing reasonable and timely access for authorized
representatives of the disciplining authority seeking to perform
practice reviews at facilities utilized by the license holder;
(9) Failure to comply with an order issued by the disciplining
authority or a stipulation for informal disposition entered into with
the disciplining authority;
(10) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice when a
license is required;
(11) Violations of rules established by any health agency;
(12) Practice beyond the scope of practice as defined by law or
rule;
(13) Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the
business or profession;
(14) Failure to adequately supervise auxiliary staff to the extent
that the consumer's health or safety is at risk;
(15) Engaging in a profession involving contact with the public
while suffering from a contagious or infectious disease involving
serious risk to public health;
(16) Promotion for personal gain of any unnecessary or
inefficacious drug, device, treatment, procedure, or service;
(17) Conviction of any gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the
practice of the person's profession. For the purposes of this
subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in
which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this
section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;
(18) The procuring, or aiding or abetting in procuring, a criminal
abortion;
(19) The offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat
disease by a secret method, procedure, treatment, or medicine, or the
treating, operating, or prescribing for any health condition by a
method, means, or procedure which the licensee refuses to divulge upon
demand of the disciplining authority;
(20) The willful betrayal of a practitioner-patient privilege as
recognized by law;
(21) Violation of chapter 19.68 RCW;
(22) Interference with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding
by willful misrepresentation of facts before the disciplining authority
or its authorized representative, or by the use of threats or
harassment against any patient or witness to prevent them from
providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal
action, or by the use of financial inducements to any patient or
witness to prevent or attempt to prevent him or her from providing
evidence in a disciplinary proceeding;
(23) Current misuse of:
(a) Alcohol;
(b) Controlled substances; or
(c) Legend drugs;
(24) Abuse of a client or patient or sexual contact with a client
or patient;
(25) Acceptance of more than a nominal gratuity, hospitality, or
subsidy offered by a representative or vendor of medical or health-related products or services intended for patients, in contemplation of
a sale or for use in research publishable in professional journals,
where a conflict of interest is presented, as defined by rules of the
disciplining authority, in consultation with the department, based on
recognized professional ethical standards.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.130.900 and 1986 c 259 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter shall be known and cited as the uniform
disciplinary act.
(2) This chapter applies to any conduct, acts, or conditions
occurring on or after June 11, 1986.
(3) This chapter does not apply to or govern the construction of
and disciplinary action for any conduct, acts, or conditions occurring
prior to June 11, 1986. Such conduct, acts, or conditions must be
construed and disciplinary action taken according to the provisions of
law existing at the time of the occurrence in the same manner as if
this chapter had not been enacted.
(4) The amendments to chapter 18.130 RCW in sections 5 and 6 of
this act are clarifying amendments and should not be construed as a
change in the construction and application of chapter 18.130 RCW.

--- END ---