BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a crisis
in the availability and affordability of professional health care
liability insurance coverage. The legislature finds that this
malpractice insurance crisis threatens the current and future
availability and affordability of health care services for the people
of the state of Washington by preventing and discouraging health care
providers from initiating or continuing their practice in this state.
The legislature further finds that an informed jury may consider that
a reasonable limitation on the amount of noneconomic damages that may
be awarded in actions against health care providers is necessary to
ensure the continued availability and affordability of health care by
containing the increasing costs of malpractice insurance for health
care providers.
Recognizing the authority of the trier of fact in a civil case to
determine the issue of damages, the legislature intends by this act to
establish an advisory limit on the amount of noneconomic damages that
should be awarded in actions against health care providers. The
legislature intends that the trier of fact be informed of the
limitation on noneconomic damages established in this act and the fact
that the limitation on noneconomic damages is advisory and not binding
on the trier of fact.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The limitation on noneconomic damages contained in subsection
(2) of this section is advisory and not binding on the trier of fact.
(2)(a) In an action for damages for injury or death occurring as a
result of the provision of health care, the amount of noneconomic
damages awarded to the claimant should not exceed four hundred thousand
dollars. July 1st of each year, beginning July 1, 2005, the
administrator for the courts shall adjust the amount specified in this
subsection for inflation in accordance with the method established in
RCW 2.12.037. The administrator for the courts shall publish the
adjusted figure in the Washington state register.
(b) The limitation on noneconomic damages in (a) of this subsection
should not apply in an action in which the acts or omissions of a
defendant were reckless, willful, or wanton.
(c) In an action involving more than one defendant where at least
one of the defendant's acts or omissions was reckless, willful, or
wanton and the noneconomic damage award exceeds four hundred thousand
dollars as provided under (b) of this subsection, the responsibility
for damages of a defendant whose acts or omissions were not reckless,
willful, or wanton should be determined as though that defendant was
responsible for his or her proportionate share of a noneconomic damage
award of four hundred thousand dollars.
(3) The supreme court shall adopt rules governing the process in
which the jury is informed of the advisory limitation on noneconomic
damages under this section.

--- END ---