BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "underwrite" means the
process of selecting, rejecting, or pricing a risk, and includes each
of these processes:
(a) Evaluation, selection, and classification of risk;
(b) Application of rates, rating rules, and classification plans to
risks that are accepted; and
(c) Determining eligibility for:
(i) Coverage provisions;
(ii) Providing or limiting the amount of coverage or policy limits;
or
(iii) Premium payment plans.
(2) Each medical malpractice insurer must file its underwriting
rules, guidelines, criteria, standards, or other information the
insurer uses to underwrite medical malpractice coverage. However, an
insurer is excluded from this requirement if the insurer is ordered
into rehabilitation under chapter 48.31 or 48.99 RCW.
(a) Every filing of underwriting information must identify and
explain:
(i) The class, type, and extent of coverage provided by the
insurer;
(ii) Any changes that have occurred to the underwriting standards;
and
(iii) How underwriting changes are expected to affect future
losses.
(b) The information under (a) of this subsection must be filed with
the commissioner at least thirty days before it becomes effective and
is subject to public disclosure upon receipt by the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Adverse action" includes, but is not limited to, the
following:
(i) Cancellation, denial, or nonrenewal of medical malpractice
insurance coverage;
(ii) Charging a higher insurance premium for medical malpractice
insurance than would have been charged, whether the charge is by any of
the following:
(A) Application of a rating rule;
(B) Assignment to a rating tier that does not have the lowest
available rates; or
(C) Placement with an affiliate company that does not offer the
lowest rates available to the insured within the affiliate group of
insurance companies; or
(iii) Any reduction or adverse or unfavorable change in the terms
of coverage or amount of any medical malpractice insurance, including,
but not limited to, the following: Coverage provided to the insured
physician is not as broad in scope as coverage requested by the insured
physician but is available to other insured physicians of the insurer
or any affiliate.
(b) "Affiliate" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.31B.005(1).
(c) "Claim" means a demand for payment by an allegedly injured
third party under the terms and conditions of an insurance contract.
(d) "Tier" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.18.545(1)(h).
(2) When an insurer takes adverse action against an insured, the
insurer may consider the following factors only in combination with
other substantive underwriting factors:
(a) An insured has inquired about the nature or scope of coverage
under a medical malpractice insurance policy;
(b) An insured has notified the insurer, pursuant to the provisions
of the insurance contract, about a potential claim, which did not
ultimately result in the filing of a claim; or
(c) A claim was closed without payment.

--- END ---