BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there has
been significant controversy regarding the most appropriate means to
resolve disputes related to injuries occurring as a result of health
care, and that an impartial examination of all of the issues
surrounding resolution of these disputes is needed. An impartial
examination is an important component of efforts to address concerns
raised regarding the handling and outcome of disputes related to
injuries occurring as a result of health care in the current civil
liability system.
(2) Through the establishment of a joint task force, the
legislature intends to provide for an impartial examination of issues
surrounding resolution of disputes related to injuries occurring as a
result of health care, with the goal of developing recommendations for
prompt resolution of these disputes that provides equitable results for
all of the individuals and entities involved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A joint task force is created to study
judicial and administrative alternatives for resolving disputes related
to injuries occurring as a result of health care. The task force is
organized and chaired by the office of the attorney general. In
addition to the office of the attorney general, members of the task
force shall include:
(a) Representatives of the legislature, including one member
appointed by each caucus;
(b) Representatives of the superior courts of Washington state
appointed by the president of the superior court judges association,
and shall include one judicial officer of the superior court from
eastern Washington and one judicial officer of the superior court from
western Washington;
(c) A representative of the Washington state court of appeals
appointed by the chief justice of the state supreme court;
(d) A retired judge who is actively involved in mediation or
arbitration of medical malpractice disputes;
(e) The secretary of the department of health;
(f) Two physician representatives of the Washington state medical
association, appointed by that organization, one of whom has a medical
practice and one of whom has a surgical practice. At least one of the
physician representatives must practice in a specialty that is
considered a high risk specialty for purposes of the availability and
cost of medical malpractice insurance coverage;
(g) A representative of the Washington state hospital association,
appointed by that organization;
(h) A representative of the Washington state bar association,
appointed by that organization;
(i) A representative of health care consumers, appointed by the
attorney general.
(2) The task force shall seek input from, and consult with, other
interested health professions and organizations in the course of its
deliberations.
(3) The objectives of the task force are to:
(a) Examine approaches used in other states and jurisdictions to
address resolution of disputes related to injuries occurring as a
result of health care, including but not limited to mediation and
arbitration, administrative compensation systems, the use of impartial
medical experts chosen by the court or agreed upon by the parties, and
the use of specialized courts or judges;
(b) Recommend one or more methods to resolve disputes related to
injuries occurring as a result of health care, including, but not
limited to, an administrative resolution process; a judicial resolution
process such as medical courts, or modifications of court rules that
will increase the medical knowledge of superior court judges; or any
combination thereof;
(c) Recommend an implementation plan that will address:
(i) A specific administrative structure for each method used to
resolve disputes related to injuries occurring as a result of health
care;
(ii) The cost to implement the plan; and
(iii) The changes to statutes and court rules necessary to
implement the plan.
(3) The office of the attorney general shall use staff of the
office of program research and senate committee services to research
and compile information relevant to the mission of the task force by
December 31, 2004, and to provide other staff support services needed
by the task force.
(4) The task force shall submit its report to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 1,
2005.

--- END ---