BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action against a health care provider under this chapter,
an expert may not provide testimony at trial, or execute a certificate
of merit if required under this chapter, unless the expert meets the
following criteria:
(a) Has recognized expertise in any area of practice or specialty
at issue in the action, as demonstrated by devotion of a significant
portion of his or her practice to the area of practice or specialty;
(b) Was licensed as a health care provider in Washington at the
time of the occurrence of the incident at issue in the action; and
(c) At the time of the occurrence of the incident at issue in the
action, was either:
(i) Engaged in active practice in the same area of practice or
specialty as the defendant; or
(ii) Teaching at an accredited medical school or an accredited or
affiliated academic or clinical training program in the same area of
practice or specialty as the defendant, including instruction regarding
the particular condition at issue.
(2) Upon motion of a party, the court may waive the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section and allow an expert who does not meet
those requirements to testify at trial or execute any certificate of
merit required under this chapter if the court finds that:
(a) Extensive efforts were made by the party to locate an expert
who meets the criteria under subsection (1) of this section, but none
was willing and available to testify; and
(b) The proposed expert is qualified to be an expert witness by
virtue of the person's training, experience, and knowledge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
An expert opinion provided in the course of an action against a
health care provider under this chapter must be corroborated by
objective evidence, such as, but not limited to, treatment or practice
protocols or guidelines developed by medical specialty organizations,
objective academic research, or clinical trials or studies.

--- END ---