BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that, over the
next decade, large numbers of Washington students will graduate from
high school and seek access to higher education. Washington's new
knowledge-based economy demands ever-increasing levels of education and
training from our work force. Yet Washington continues to lag
significantly behind other states in its production of students with
baccalaureate and graduate degrees.
(2) The legislature also finds that no new public four-year
institution of higher education has been created since 1967. There has
been no new comprehensive institution since before statehood in the
late 1890s when the state normal schools were established.
(3) The legislature affirms its continued strong support for
Washington's community and technical college system and the two plus
two model of education that provides access to baccalaureate degrees
throughout the state. The legislature further finds that creation of
an additional four-year institution would complement the existing
structure and provide additional options for students.
(4) The current branch campus of the University of Washington at
Bothell offers an opportunity to take advantage of the excellence and
reputation of a premier research university while also creating a four-year campus focused on providing access to baccalaureate and
professional graduate education in a heavily populated urban area of
the state.
(5) Therefore, the legislature intends to create the University of
Washington Bothell, a four-year campus with the mission of a
comprehensive university.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
There is hereby established the University of Washington Bothell as
a campus with a distinct mission to offer lower and upper-division
undergraduate and graduate education programs through the master's
degree, including programs of a practical and applied nature, directed
to the educational and professional needs of the residents in the
region; to act as a receiving institution for transferring community
college students; and to provide extended occupational and
complementary studies programs that continue or are otherwise
integrated with the educational services of the region's community
colleges.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.45.020 and 1994 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The University of Washington is responsible for ensuring the
expansion of upper-division and graduate educational programs in the
central Puget Sound area under rules or guidelines adopted by the
higher education coordinating board. The University of Washington
shall meet that responsibility through the operation of ((at least two
branch campuses. One)) a branch campus ((shall be)) located in the
Tacoma area. ((Another branch campus shall be collocated with Cascadia
Community College in the Bothell-Woodinville area.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The University of Washington shall
convene a transition work group to identify implementation issues and
recommend solutions associated with the new designation of the
University of Washington Bothell.
(2) The work group must include representatives from the university
main campus and Bothell campus, the higher education coordinating
board, and the office of financial management.
(3) The work group must address the following issues as well as
others identified by the work group:
(a) The phase-in of lower-division courses;
(b) An enrollment plan that provides adequate capacity for
community college transfer students;
(c) Appropriate levels of state general fund support and tuition
and fees for the campus, commensurate with its role and mission; and
(d) Identification of any start-up costs to implement the
transition.
(4) If the work group determines that the proposed transition for
the campus has a direct or indirect impact on the facilities, students,
faculty, or programs of Cascadia Community College, the University of
Washington shall involve representatives from the college in
discussions regarding the impact.
(5) The work group must submit a progress report to the higher
education and fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 15, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---