BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.27.110 and 1997 c 314 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No city, town or county shall issue a construction building
permit for work which is to be done by any contractor required to be
registered under this chapter without verification that such contractor
is currently registered as required by law. When such verification is
made, nothing contained in this section is intended to be, nor shall be
construed to create, or form the basis for any liability under this
chapter on the part of any city, town or county, or its officers,
employees or agents. However, a knowing and willful failure to verify
the contractor registration number results in liability to the city,
town, or county ((to)) for a penalty to be imposed according to RCW
18.27.100(7)(a).
(2) At the time of issuing the building permit, all cities, towns,
or counties are responsible for:
(a) Printing the contractor registration number on the building
permit; and
(b) Providing a written notice to the building permit applicant
informing them of contractor registration laws and the potential risk
and monetary liability to the homeowner for using an unregistered
contractor.
(3) If a building permit is obtained by an applicant or contractor
who falsifies information to obtain an exemption provided under RCW
18.27.090, the building permit shall be forfeited.

--- END ---