BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of the unlawful use of a hook if the person
intentionally utilizes, or attempts to use, a hook in such a way that
it could be reasonably foreseen to pierce the flesh or mouth of a bird
or mammal.
(2) Unlawful use of a hook is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---