BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the DNA
identification system is becoming increasingly useful in the accurate
investigation and prosecution of criminal offenses. The legislature
further finds that the use of DNA identification deters recidivist
acts, significantly aids in the exculpation of innocent persons, allows
for the accurate identification of prisoners for institutional
purposes, and helps in the identification of human remains or missing
persons. The legislature therefore determines that it is in the public
interest to expand the DNA identification system to include all persons
arrested on criminal charges.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.735 and 1991 c 3 s 297 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the sheriff or director of public
safety of every county, and the chief of police of every city or town,
and of every chief officer of other law enforcement agencies duly
operating within this state, to cause the photographing and
fingerprinting of all adults and juveniles lawfully arrested for the
commission of any criminal offense constituting a felony or gross
misdemeanor. (a) When such juveniles are brought directly to a
juvenile detention facility, the juvenile court administrator is also
authorized, but not required, to cause the photographing,
fingerprinting, and record transmittal to the appropriate law
enforcement agency; and (b) a further exception may be made when the
arrest is for a violation punishable as a gross misdemeanor and the
arrested person is not taken into custody.
(2)(a) It is the duty of the sheriff or director of public safety
of every county, and the chief of police of every city or town, and of
every chief officer of other law enforcement agencies duly operating
within the state, to cause the collection of biological samples for DNA
identification analysis from all adults and juveniles lawfully arrested
for the commission of any criminal offense constituting a felony or
gross misdemeanor.
(b) Biological samples collected under this subsection shall be:
(i) Collected using the same technique biological samples are
collected under RCW 43.43.754;
(ii) Forwarded to the state patrol for inclusion in the DNA
identification system established under RCW 43.43.752 through
43.43.759; and
(iii) Used solely for the purpose of inclusion in the DNA
identification system established under RCW 43.43.752 through
43.43.759.
(c) This subsection applies to all adults and juveniles who are
arrested on or after the effective date of this section.
(3) It shall be the right, but not the duty, of the sheriff or
director of public safety of every county, and the chief of police of
every city or town, and every chief officer of other law enforcement
agencies operating within this state to photograph and record the
fingerprints of all adults lawfully arrested, all persons who are the
subject of dependency record information, or all persons who are the
subject of protection proceeding record information.
(((3))) (4) Such sheriffs, directors of public safety, chiefs of
police, and other chief law enforcement officers, may record, in
addition to photographs and fingerprints, the palmprints, soleprints,
toeprints, or any other identification data of all persons whose
photograph and fingerprints are required or allowed to be taken under
this section, all persons who are the subject of dependency record
information, or all persons who are the subject of protection
proceeding record information, when in the discretion of such law
enforcement officers it is necessary for proper identification of the
arrested person or the investigation of the crime with which he is
charged.
(((4))) (5) It shall be the duty of the department of health or the
court having jurisdiction over the dependency action and protection
proceedings under chapter 74.34 RCW to cause the fingerprinting of all
persons who are the subject of a disciplinary board final decision,
dependency record information, protection proceeding record
information, or to obtain other necessary identifying information, as
specified by the section in rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW to
carry out the provisions of this subsection.
(((5))) (6) The court having jurisdiction over the dependency or
protection proceeding action may obtain and record, in addition to
fingerprints, the photographs, palmprints, soleprints, toeprints, or
any other identification data of all persons who are the subject of
dependency record information or protection proceeding record
information, when in the discretion of the court it is necessary for
proper identification of the person.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.43.754 and 2002 c 289 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every adult or juvenile individual convicted of a felony,
stalking under RCW 9A.46.110, harassment under RCW 9A.46.020,
communicating with a minor for immoral purposes under RCW 9.68A.090, or
adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense must have a
biological sample collected for purposes of DNA identification analysis
unless a biological sample has already been collected from the adult or
juvenile under RCW 43.43.735(2). The biological sample shall be
collected in the following manner:
(a) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement
in a department of corrections facility, and do serve a term of
confinement in a city or county jail facility, the city or county shall
be responsible for obtaining the biological samples either as part of
the intake process into the city or county jail or detention facility
for those persons convicted on or after July 1, 2002, or within a
reasonable time after July 1, 2002, for those persons incarcerated
before July 1, 2002, who have not yet had a biological sample
collected, beginning with those persons who will be released the
soonest.
(b) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement
in a department of corrections facility, and do not serve a term of
confinement in a city or county jail facility, the local police
department or sheriff's office is responsible for obtaining the
biological samples after sentencing on or after July 1, 2002.
(c) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense, who are serving or who are to serve a
term of confinement in a department of corrections facility or a
department of social and health services facility, the facility holding
the person shall be responsible for obtaining the biological samples
either as part of the intake process into such facility for those
persons convicted on or after July 1, 2002, or within a reasonable time
after July 1, 2002, for those persons incarcerated before July 1, 2002,
who have not yet had a biological sample collected, beginning with
those persons who will be released the soonest.
(2) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.735 or
43.43.752 through 43.43.758 may be retained by the forensic laboratory
services bureau, and shall be used solely for the purpose of providing
DNA or other tests for identification analysis and prosecution of a
criminal offense or for the identification of human remains or missing
persons. Nothing in this section prohibits the submission of results
derived from the biological samples to the federal bureau of
investigation combined DNA index system.
(3) The director of the forensic laboratory services bureau of the
Washington state patrol shall perform testing on all biological samples
collected under subsection (1) of this section, to the extent allowed
by funding available for this purpose. The director shall give
priority to testing on samples collected from those adults or juveniles
convicted of a felony or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense that is defined as a sex offense or a violent offense in RCW
9.94A.030.
(4) This section applies to all adults who are convicted of a sex
or violent offense after July 1, 1990; and to all adults who were
convicted of a sex or violent offense on or prior to July 1, 1990, and
who are still incarcerated on or after July 25, 1999. This section
applies to all juveniles who are adjudicated guilty of a sex or violent
offense after July 1, 1994; and to all juveniles who were adjudicated
guilty of a sex or violent offense on or prior to July 1, 1994, and who
are still incarcerated on or after July 25, 1999. This section applies
to all adults and juveniles who are convicted of a felony other than a
sex or violent offense, stalking under RCW 9A.46.110, harassment under
RCW 9A.46.020, or communicating with a minor for immoral purposes under
RCW 9.68A.090, or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense,
on or after July 1, 2002; and to all adults and juveniles who were
convicted or adjudicated guilty of such an offense before July 1, 2002,
and are still incarcerated on or after July 1, 2002.
(5) This section creates no rights in a third person. No cause of
action may be brought based upon the noncollection or nonanalysis or
the delayed collection or analysis of a biological sample authorized to
be taken under RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758.
(6) The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based upon a
data base match or data base information is not invalidated if it is
determined that the sample was obtained or placed in the data base by
mistake, or if the conviction or juvenile adjudication that resulted in
the collection of the biological sample was subsequently vacated or
otherwise altered in any future proceeding including but not limited to
posttrial or postfact-finding motions, appeals, or collateral attacks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---