BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.38.105 and 1996 c 50 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is authorized and directed to implement the
certificate of need program in this state pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter.
(2) There shall be a state certificate of need program which is
administered consistent with the requirements of federal law as
necessary to the receipt of federal funds by the state.
(3) No person shall engage in any undertaking which is subject to
certificate of need review under subsection (4) of this section without
first having received from the department either a certificate of need
or an exception granted in accordance with this chapter.
(4) The following shall be subject to certificate of need review
under this chapter:
(a) The construction, development, or other establishment of a new
health care facility;
(b) The sale, purchase, or lease of part or all of any existing
hospital as defined in RCW 70.38.025;
(c) Any capital expenditure for the construction, renovation, or
alteration of a nursing home which substantially changes the services
of the facility after January 1, 1981, provided that the substantial
changes in services are specified by the department in rule;
(d) Any capital expenditure for the construction, renovation, or
alteration of a nursing home which exceeds the expenditure minimum as
defined by RCW 70.38.025. However, a capital expenditure which is not
subject to certificate of need review under (a), (b), (c), or (e) of
this subsection and which is solely for any one or more of the
following is not subject to certificate of need review:
(i) Communications and parking facilities;
(ii) Mechanical, electrical, ventilation, heating, and air
conditioning systems;
(iii) Energy conservation systems;
(iv) Repairs to, or the correction of, deficiencies in existing
physical plant facilities which are necessary to maintain state
licensure, however, other additional repairs, remodeling, or
replacement projects that are not related to one or more deficiency
citations and are not necessary to maintain state licensure are not
exempt from certificate of need review except as otherwise permitted by
(d)(vi) of this subsection or RCW 70.38.115(13);
(v) Acquisition of equipment, including data processing equipment,
which is not or will not be used in the direct provision of health
services;
(vi) Construction or renovation at an existing nursing home which
involves physical plant facilities, including administrative, dining
areas, kitchen, laundry, therapy areas, and support facilities, by an
existing licensee who has operated the beds for at least one year;
(vii) Acquisition of land; and
(viii) Refinancing of existing debt;
(e) A change in bed capacity of a health care facility which
increases the total number of licensed beds or redistributes beds among
acute care, nursing home care, and boarding home care if the bed
redistribution is to be effective for a period in excess of six months,
or a change in bed capacity of a rural health care facility licensed
under RCW 70.175.100 that increases the total number of nursing home
beds or redistributes beds from acute care or boarding home care to
nursing home care if the bed redistribution is to be effective for a
period in excess of six months. A health care facility certified as a
critical access hospital under 42 U.S.C. 1395i-4 may increase its total
number of licensed beds to the total number of beds permitted under 42
U.S.C. 1395i-4 for acute care and may redistribute beds permitted under
42 U.S.C. 1395i-4 among acute care and nursing home care without being
subject to certificate of need review. If there is a nursing home
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW within twenty-seven miles of the
critical access hospital, the critical access hospital is subject to
certificate of need review except for:
(i) Critical access hospitals which had designated beds to provide
nursing home care, in excess of five swing beds, prior to December 31,
2003; or
(ii) Up to five swing beds.
Critical access hospital beds not subject to certificate of need
review under this subsection (4)(e) will not be counted as either acute
care or nursing home care for certificate of need review purposes. If
a health care facility ceases to be certified as a critical access
hospital under 42 U.S.C. 1395i-4, the hospital may revert back to the
type and number of licensed hospital beds as it had when it requested
critical access hospital designation;
(f) Any new tertiary health services which are offered in or
through a health care facility or rural health care facility licensed
under RCW 70.175.100, and which were not offered on a regular basis by,
in, or through such health care facility or rural health care facility
within the twelve-month period prior to the time such services would be
offered;
(g) Any expenditure for the construction, renovation, or alteration
of a nursing home or change in nursing home services in excess of the
expenditure minimum made in preparation for any undertaking under
subsection (4) of this section and any arrangement or commitment made
for financing such undertaking. Expenditures of preparation shall
include expenditures for architectural designs, plans, working
drawings, and specifications. The department may issue certificates of
need permitting predevelopment expenditures, only, without authorizing
any subsequent undertaking with respect to which such predevelopment
expenditures are made; and
(h) Any increase in the number of dialysis stations in a kidney
disease center.
(5) The department is authorized to charge fees for the review of
certificate of need applications and requests for exemptions from
certificate of need review. The fees shall be sufficient to cover the
full cost of review and exemption, which may include the development of
standards, criteria, and policies.
(6) No person may divide a project in order to avoid review
requirements under any of the thresholds specified in this section.

--- END ---