BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.76.170 and 2001 c 264 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person having been released by court order or admitted to
bail with knowledge of the requirement of a subsequent personal
appearance before any court of this state, or of the requirement to
report to a correctional facility for service of sentence, and who
fails to appear or who fails to surrender for service of sentence as
required is guilty of bail jumping.
(2) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this
section that uncontrollable circumstances prevented the person from
appearing or surrendering, and that the person did not contribute to
the creation of such circumstances in reckless disregard of the
requirement to appear or surrender, and that the person appeared or
surrendered as soon as such circumstances ceased to exist.
(3) Bail jumping is:
(a) A class A felony if the person was held for, charged with, or
convicted of murder in the first degree;
(b) A class B felony if the person was held for, charged with, or
convicted of a class A felony other than murder in the first degree;
(c) A class C felony if the person:
(i) Was held for, charged with, or convicted of a class B or class
C felony; and
(ii) Has one or more prior convictions for an offense under this
section;
(d) A misdemeanor if the person:
(i) Was held for, charged with, or convicted of a gross misdemeanor
or misdemeanor; and
(ii) Has one or more prior convictions for an offense under this
section;
(e) A class 1 civil infraction if the person:
(i) Was held for, charged with, or convicted of a class B or class
C felony;
(ii) Has no prior convictions for an offense under this section;
and
(iii) Has surrendered within forty-eight hours to the local
sheriff;
(f) A class 2 civil infraction if the person:
(i) Was held for, charged with, or convicted of a gross misdemeanor
or misdemeanor;
(ii) Has no prior convictions for an offense under this section;
and
(iii) Has surrendered within forty-eight hours to the local
sheriff.

--- END ---