BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.64.080 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 ss 403 and 420 and
1989 c 352 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department may license as a pharmacist any person who has
filed an application therefor, subscribed by the person under oath or
affirmation, containing such information as the board may by regulation
require, and who((--)):
(a) Is at least eighteen years of age;
(b) Has satisfied the board that he or she is of good moral and
professional character, that he or she will carry out the duties and
responsibilities required of a pharmacist, and that he or she is not
unfit or unable to practice pharmacy by reason of the extent or manner
of his or her proven use of alcoholic beverages, drugs, or controlled
substances, or by reason of a proven physical or mental disability;
(c) Holds a baccalaureate degree in pharmacy or a doctor of
pharmacy degree granted by a school or college of pharmacy which is
accredited by the board of pharmacy;
(d) Has completed or has otherwise met the internship requirements
as set forth in board rules;
(e) Has satisfactorily passed the necessary examinations approved
by the board and administered by the department.
(2) The department shall, at least once in every calendar year,
offer an examination to all applicants for a pharmacist license who
have completed their educational and internship requirements pursuant
to rules promulgated by the board. The examination shall be determined
by the board. In case of failure at a first examination, the applicant
shall have within three years the privilege of a second and third
examination. In case of failure in a third examination, the applicant
shall not be eligible for further examination until he or she has
satisfactorily completed additional preparation as directed and
approved by the board. The applicant must pay the examination fee
determined by the secretary for each examination taken. Upon passing
the required examinations and complying with all the rules and
regulations of the board and the provisions of this chapter, the
department shall grant the applicant a license as a pharmacist and
issue to him or her a certificate qualifying him or her to enter into
the practice of pharmacy.
(3)(a) Any person enrolled as a student of pharmacy in an
accredited college may file with the department an application for
registration as a pharmacy intern in which application he or she shall
be required to furnish such information as the board may, by
regulation, prescribe and, simultaneously with the filing of said
application, shall pay to the department a fee to be determined by the
secretary. All certificates issued to pharmacy interns shall be valid
for a period to be determined by the board, but in no instance shall
the certificate be valid if the individual is no longer making timely
progress toward graduation, provided however, the board may issue an
intern certificate to a person to complete an internship to be eligible
for initial licensure or for the reinstatement of a previously licensed
pharmacist.
(b) Any person enrolled as a student of pharmacy in an education
program approved by the board may serve as a pharmacy intern without
registering with the department as long as he or she is supervised by
a preceptor and does not practice for more than sixty consecutive days.
(4) To assure adequate practical instruction, pharmacy internship
experience as required under this chapter shall be obtained after
registration as a pharmacy intern by practice in any licensed pharmacy
or other program meeting the requirements promulgated by regulation of
the board, and shall include such instruction in the practice of
pharmacy as the board by regulation shall prescribe.
(5) The department may, without examination other than one in the
laws relating to the practice of pharmacy, license as a pharmacist any
person who, at the time of filing application therefor, is currently
licensed as a pharmacist in any other state, territory, or possession
of the United States. The person shall produce evidence satisfactory
to the department of having had the required secondary and professional
education and training and who was licensed as a pharmacist by
examination in another state prior to June 13, 1963, shall be required
to satisfy only the requirements which existed in this state at the
time he or she became licensed in such other state, and that the state
in which the person is licensed shall under similar conditions grant
reciprocal licenses as pharmacist without examination to pharmacists
duly licensed by examination in this state. Every application under
this subsection shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the
department.
(6) The department shall provide for, regulate, and require all
persons licensed as pharmacists to renew their license periodically,
and shall prescribe the form of such license and information required
to be submitted by all applicants.

--- END ---