BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.74.400 and 2002 c 370 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Explosives, improvised devices, and components of explosives
and improvised devices that are possessed, manufactured, delivered,
imported, exported, stored, sold, purchased, transported, abandoned,
detonated, or used, or intended to be used, in violation of a provision
of this chapter are subject to seizure and forfeiture by a law
enforcement agency and no property right exists in them.
(2) The law enforcement agency making the seizure shall notify the
Washington state department of labor and industries of the seizure.
(3) Seizure of explosives, improvised devices, and components of
explosives and improvised devices under subsection (1) of this section
may be made if:
(a) The seizure is incident to arrest or a search under a search
warrant;
(b) The explosives, improvised devices, or components have been the
subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in an injunction or
forfeiture proceeding based upon this chapter;
(c) A law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that
the explosives, improvised devices, or components are directly or
indirectly dangerous to health or safety; or
(d) The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that
the explosives, improvised devices, or components were used or were
intended to be used in violation of this chapter.
(4) A law enforcement agency shall destroy explosives, improvised
devices, or components seized under this chapter when it is necessary
to protect the public safety and welfare. ((When destruction is not
necessary to protect the public safety and welfare, and the explosives
are not being held for evidence, a seizure pursuant to this section
commences proceedings for forfeiture.)) A law enforcement agency may
destroy explosives, improvised devices, or components seized under this
chapter when the agency determines that it is impractical or unsafe to
store the explosives, improvised devices, or components. The law
enforcement agency must film, videotape, or make a similar record of
any destruction authorized by this section. The law enforcement agency
must photograph, videotape, or make a similar record of the explosives,
improvised devices, or components destroyed, and keep samples where
practicable. The law enforcement agency must make a report listing the
explosives, improvised devices, and components destroyed, and the time,
location, and reason for destruction. Any such reports, records, or
samples shall be admissible as evidence in lieu of the explosives,
improvised devices, or components destroyed. When destruction is not
appropriate, and the explosives, improvised devices, or components are
not being held for evidence, a seizure pursuant to this section
commences proceedings for forfeiture.
(5) The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure
was made shall issue a written notice of the seizure and commencement
of the forfeiture proceedings to the person from whom the explosives
were seized, to any known owner of the explosives, and to any person
who has a known interest in the explosives. The notice shall be issued
within fifteen days of the seizure. The notice of seizure and
commencement of the forfeiture proceedings shall be served in the same
manner as provided in RCW 4.28.080 for service of a summons. The law
enforcement agency shall provide a form by which the person or persons
may request a hearing before the law enforcement agency to contest the
seizure.
(6) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
the explosives, improvised devices, or components within thirty days of
the date the notice was issued, the seized explosives, devices, or
components shall be deemed forfeited.
(7) If, within thirty days of the issuance of the notice, any
person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the
person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items seized, the
person or persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be
heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall be before the chief
law enforcement or the officer's designee of the seizing agency, except
that the person asserting the claim or right may remove the matter to
a court of competent jurisdiction if the aggregate value of the items
seized is more than five hundred dollars. The hearing and any appeal
shall be conducted according to chapter 34.05 RCW. The seizing law
enforcement agency shall bear the burden of proving that the person (a)
has no lawful right of ownership or possession and (b) that the items
seized were possessed, manufactured, stored, sold, purchased,
transported, abandoned, detonated, or used in violation of a provision
of this chapter with the person's knowledge or consent.
(8) The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the
items seized to the claimant upon a determination that the claimant is
entitled to possession of the items seized.
(9) If the items seized are forfeited under this statute, the
seizing agency shall dispose of the explosives by summary destruction.
However, when explosives are destroyed ((either to protect public
safety or because the explosives were forfeited)), the person from whom
the explosives were seized loses all rights of action against the law
enforcement agency or its employees acting within the scope of their
employment, or other governmental entity or employee involved with the
seizure and destruction of explosives.
(10) This section is not intended to change the seizure and
forfeiture powers, enforcement, and penalties available to the
department of labor and industries pursuant to chapter 49.17 RCW as
provided in RCW 70.74.390.

--- END ---