BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.74 RCW
to read as follows:
A person is guilty of a class C felony if he or she manufactures,
possesses, stores, sells, purchases, transports, or uses an explosive
or a component of an explosive for an unlawful purpose under
circumstances not amounting to a violation of RCW 70.74.180.

--- END ---