BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Declaration of Independence makes it
clear "that all men are created equal and are endowed with certain
unalienable rights, that among these rights are Life, Liberty, and the
pursuit of Happiness. To secure these rights governments are
instituted among men, deriving their just powers from the consent of
the governed ...."
The Washington state Constitution echoes the Declaration of
Independence. The preamble states: "We the people of the state of
Washington grateful to the Supreme Ruler of the Universe for our
liberties, do ordain this constitution." Then Article 1, section 1
states: "All political power is inherent in the people, and
governments derive their just powers from the consent of the governed,
and are established to protect and maintain individual rights." The
schools have neglected to teach this principle.
It is the intent of the legislature to give children and their
children's children the blessings of liberty. Schools must teach the
relationship of the Declaration of Independence to the United States
and Washington state constitutions for this to happen. This is not a
religion or a separation of church and state issue. The issue is
teaching the substance and meanings of the liberties provided by the
United States and Washington state constitutions as outlined by the
Declaration of Independence.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.170 and 1985 c 341 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The study of)) Schools shall teach the relationship of the
Declaration of Independence to the Constitution of the United States
and the Constitution of the state of Washington ((shall be)) as a
condition prerequisite to graduation from the public and private high
schools of this state. The state board of education acting upon the
advice of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide by
rule ((or regulation)) for the implementation of this section into the
K-12 social studies curriculum. Local school boards are responsible
for providing books that explain the meaning and substance of the
Declaration of Independence and the constitutions of the United States
and the state of Washington. Local school boards shall ensure that
each school conspicuously display copies of the Declaration of
Independence, the Bill of Rights, the United States Constitution, and
the Washington state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
As used in RCW 28A.230.170 "teach" includes:
(1) Illustrating, by teacher instruction, how the Declaration of
Independence provided the outline for both the United States
Constitution and the Washington state Constitution;
(2) Relating sections of the Washington state Constitution to
statements made in the Declaration of Independence and the United
States Constitution;
(3) Teaching the heritage and meaning of this statement from the
Declaration of Independence: "We hold these truths to be self-evident,
that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their creator
with certain unalienable rights, that among these are Life, Liberty,
and the pursuit of Happiness. That to secure these rights, governments
are instituted among men, deriving their just powers from the consent
of the governed." Suggested sources are: The Magna Carta (1215), the
1628 Petition of Right to King Charles I, the writings of Sir Edward
Coke (1552-1634), John Locke (1632-1704), the Spirit of Laws (1748) by
Charles De Montesquieu, and Sir William Blackstone (1723-1780);
(4) Requiring teacher instruction on the Northwest Ordinance, which
sets the requirements for states to join the union. Emphasis shall be
placed on teaching the educational intent of the founding fathers as
presented in Article 3 of the Northwest Ordinance, which states:
"Religion, morality, and knowledge, being necessary to good government
and the happiness of mankind, schools and the means of education shall
forever be encouraged ...";
(5) Teaching the heritage and meaning of the religious freedom
statement of Article I, section 11 of the Washington state
Constitution. Suggested student readings include: Thomas Jefferson's
"Virginia Statute for Religious Freedom" (1786) and James Madison's
"Memorial and Remonstrance." The purpose of this instruction is to
illustrate the struggle for obtaining "absolute freedom of conscience
in all matters of religious sentiment ..." as stated in Article I,
section 11 of the Washington state Constitution;
(6) Requiring that students be encouraged to memorize the preamble
of the United States Constitution along with the preamble and Article
I, section 1 of the Washington state Constitution;
(7) Requiring that students read and be taught George Washington's
first inaugural address and his farewell address and Abraham Lincoln's
first inaugural address and his Gettysburg address for their advice in
supporting and defending the United States Constitution;
(8) Testing, including state standardized testing, on the meanings
of the constitutions and on the meaning of such words as: Tyrant,
despotism, providence, consanguinity, rectitude, endowed, unalienable,
created equal, tranquility, posterity, ordain, blessings,
licentiousness, and "law of nature" as defined in the 1828 edition of
Webster's Dictionary;
(9) Displaying the Declaration of Independence, the Bill of Rights,
preamble to the United States Constitution, and the preamble and the
first twelve sections of the Washington state Constitution with a note
stating: "For the complete text of the Washington state Constitution
go to the school library"; and
(10) Illustrating, with teacher instruction, the relationship of
the "Pledge of Allegiance to the United States" to the Declaration of
Independence and the Washington state Constitution (the preamble,
Article I, section 1, and Article I, section 11). This instruction
shall be taught at the time the "Pledge of Allegiance" is taught.

--- END ---