BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.43.110 and 2001 c 96 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or
itinerant vendor registered with, the department of health under
chapter 18.64 RCW, or an employee thereof, to knowingly ((to)) sell,
transfer, or to otherwise furnish, in a single transaction:
(a) More than ((three)) one package((s)) of ((one or more)) any
product((s)) that he or she knows to contain ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers; or
(b) A single package of any product that he or she knows to contain
more than three grams of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, or a
combination of any of these substances.
(2) It is unlawful for a person who is not a manufacturer,
wholesaler, pharmacy, practitioner, shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor
licensed by or registered with the department of health under chapter
18.64 RCW to purchase or acquire, in any twenty-four hour period, more
than the quantities of the substances specified in subsection (1) of
this section.
(3) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.43.160 and 2001 c 96 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To prevent violations of RCW 69.43.110, every licensee and
registrant under chapter 18.64 RCW, who sells at retail any products
containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their
salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, shall keep all such products
behind the counter. In addition, every licensee and registrant under
chapter 18.64 RCW shall do either or may do both of the following:
(a) Program scanners, cash registers, or other electronic devices
used to record sales in a manner that will alert persons handling
transactions to potential violations of RCW 69.43.110(1) and/or prevent
such violations; or
(b) Place one or more signs on the premises to notify customers of
the prohibitions of RCW 69.43.110. Any such sign may, but is not
required to, conform to the language and format prepared by the
department of health under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The department of health shall prepare language and format for
a sign summarizing the prohibitions in RCW 69.43.110 and 69.43.120 and
make the language and format available to licensees and registrants
under chapter 18.64 RCW, for voluntary use in their places of business
to inform customers and employees of the prohibitions. Nothing in this
section requires the department of health to provide licensees or
registrants with copies of signs, or any licensee or registrant to use
the specific language or format prepared by the department under this
subsection.

--- END ---