BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.310.200 and 2001 c 143 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, every
educational service district board shall:
(1) Approve the budgets of the educational service district in
accordance with the procedures provided for in this chapter.
(2) Meet regularly according to the schedule adopted at the
organization meeting and in special session upon the call of the chair
or a majority of the board.
(3) Approve the selection of educational service district personnel
and clerical staff as provided in RCW 28A.310.230.
(4) Fix the amount of and approve the bonds for those educational
service district employees designated by the board as being in need of
bonding.
(5) Keep in the educational service district office a full and
correct transcript of the boundaries of each school district within the
educational service district.
(6) Acquire by borrowing funds or by purchase, lease, devise,
bequest, and gift and otherwise contract for real and personal property
necessary for the operation of the educational service district and to
the execution of the duties of the board and superintendent thereof and
sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of that property not necessary for
district purposes. No real property shall be acquired or alienated
without the prior approval of the state board of education and the
acquisition or alienation of all such property shall be subject to such
provisions as the board may establish. When borrowing funds for the
purpose of acquiring property, the educational service district board
shall pledge as collateral the property to be acquired. Borrowing
shall be evidenced by a note or other instrument between the district
and the lender.
(7) Under RCW 28A.310.010, upon the written request of the board of
directors of a local school district or districts served by the
educational service district, the educational service district board of
directors may provide cooperative and informational services not in
conflict with other law that provide for the development and
implementation of programs, activities, services, or practices that
support the education of preschool through twelfth grade students in
the public schools or that support the effective, efficient, or safe
management and operation of the school district or districts served by
the educational service district.
(8) Adopt such bylaws and rules and regulations for its own
operation as it deems necessary or appropriate.
(9) Enter into contracts, including contracts with common and
educational service districts and the school for the deaf and the
school for the blind for the joint financing of cooperative service
programs conducted pursuant to RCW 28A.310.180(3), and employ
consultants and legal counsel relating to any of the duties, functions,
and powers of the educational service districts. A district may not
provide printing services to any agency or organization other than a
school district or the school for the deaf or school for the blind.

--- END ---