BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When selecting a location for a field office to be used by
community corrections officers, the department must perform an analysis
of the surrounding area. The analysis must identify the following
types of facilities located within a three-mile radius of each proposed
location:
(a) Local jails;
(b) State mental hospitals;
(c) Secure community transition facilities; and
(d) Any facility operated by the department or the department of
social and health services that is used to house five or more adult or
juvenile offenders who are in the custody of, or being supervised in
the community by, the state. Such a facility includes, but is not
limited to, a prison, a facility operated by the juvenile
rehabilitation administration of the department of social and health
services, a group home, a prerelease facility, and a work release
facility.
(2) The department shall refrain from locating a field office to be
used by community corrections officers within one mile of any facility
listed in subsection (1)(a) through (d) of this section unless to do so
is necessary to preserve public safety.
(3)(a) Once a final site for a field office has been selected under
this section, the department shall conduct a public hearing in the
community where the office will be located.
(b) To provide adequate notice of, and opportunity for interested
persons to comment on, a proposed location, the department shall
provide at least fourteen days' advance notice of the meeting to:
(i) All newspapers of general circulation in the community;
(ii) All radio and television stations generally available to
persons in the community;
(iii) Any school district in which the proposed field office would
be located or whose boundary is within two miles of the proposed field
office;
(iv) Any library district in which the proposed field office would
be located;
(v) Local business or fraternal organizations that request
notification from the department; and
(vi) Any resident or property owner within a one-half mile radius
of the proposed field office.
(4) This section does not apply to locations for field offices
selected before the effective date of this act.

--- END ---