BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In implementing any rules adopted pursuant to RCW 49.17.050(4)
that require agricultural employers to implement a monitoring program
for employees who handle category I or II organophosphate or N-methyl-carbamate pesticides, the department must collect and analyze data to
determine whether mandatory testing is warranted and, if so, what
thresholds of exposure to pesticides should trigger mandatory testing.
The data must include: (a) The number of employees that are tested;
(b) the number of baseline tests that are performed; (c) the number of
periodic tests that are performed for each of the employees; (d) the
number of investigations of employee work practices that are required;
(e) the number of medical removals from pesticide handling and other
work exposures to pesticides that are required; (f) the number of
investigations of employee work practices required for which depressed
cholinesterase levels are not positively correlated to pesticide
handling or other workplace exposures; (g) the number of medical
removals required for which depressed cholinesterase levels are not
positively correlated to pesticide handling or other workplace
exposures; and (h) for each employee with a substantially depressed
cholinesterase level, the relationship between his or her depressed
cholinesterase level and the number of hours he or she spent handling
category I or II organophosphate or N-methyl-carbamate pesticides. By
December 1st of each year, the department shall report the results of
this data collection and analysis to the house of representatives
committees on agriculture and natural resources, and commerce and
labor, or their successor committees, and the senate committees on
agriculture, and commerce and trade, or their successor committees.
(2) Within the appropriations from the medical aid fund provided
for administering this chapter, the department shall pay approved
health care facilities and licensed health care professionals directly
for all costs of services related to baseline and periodic
cholinesterase tests and interpretations of such tests. These health
care facilities and professionals include, but are not limited to,
approved laboratories and clinics, and licensed physicians. These
services include, but are not limited to, taking, shipping, and testing
blood samples, interpreting blood tests, and counseling employees who
handle category I or II organophosphate or N-methyl-carbamate
pesticides.
(3) Any rules adopted pursuant to RCW 49.17.050(4) that require
agricultural employers to implement a monitoring program for employees
who handle category I or II organophosphate or N-methyl-carbamate
pesticides shall allow agricultural employers to seek reimbursement
from the accident fund for the costs they incur in complying with such
rules. These costs are the probable central compliance costs specified
in the benefit-cost determination for such rules, which shall include
the costs of recordkeeping, training, paying wages and benefits to
employees for time traveling to approved laboratories or clinics, and
paying wages and benefits to employees receiving medical removal
protection benefits due to depressed cholinesterase levels.
Reimbursement rates for these costs shall be consistent with probable
compliance costs specified in the benefit-cost determination for such
rules. Requests for reimbursement for a calendar quarter must be
submitted to the department no later than the day immediately following
the last day of the first month following that calendar quarter.
Payments of reimbursements for a calendar quarter must be made no later
than the day immediately following the last day of the second month
following that calendar quarter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---