BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An operating agency may enter into contracts through
competitive negotiation under subsection (3) of this section for
materials, equipment, supplies, or work to be performed in support of
siting, constructing, developing, or deploying a renewable electrical
energy generation project, if the managing director or a designee
determines in writing and the executive board finds that execution of
a contract under this section will accomplish project completion or
operation more economically than sealed bids.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Renewable electrical generation project" means electrical
generation facilities that are fueled by: (i) Wind; (ii) solar energy;
(iii) geothermal energy; (iv) landfill gas; (v) wave or tidal action;
(vi) gas produced during the treatment of wastewater; (vii) qualified
hydropower; or (viii) biomass energy based on animal waste or solid
organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy
crops that do not include wood pieces that have been treated with
chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or
copper-chrome-arsenic.
(b) "Qualified hydropower" means the energy produced either: (i)
As a result of modernizations or upgrades made after June 1, 1998, to
hydropower facilities operating on May 8, 2001, that have been
demonstrated to reduce the mortality of anadromous fish; or (ii) by run
of the river or run of the canal hydropower facilities that are not
responsible for obstructing the passage of anadromous fish.
(3) The selection of a contractor shall be made in accordance with
the following procedures:
(a) Proposals shall be solicited through a request for proposals,
which shall state the requirements to be met. Responses shall describe
the professional competence of the offeror, the technical merits of the
offer, and the price.
(b) The request for proposals shall be given adequate public notice
in the same manner as for sealed bids.
(c) As provided in the request for proposals, the operating agency
shall specify at a preproposal conference the contract requirements in
the request for proposal, which may include but are not limited to:
Schedule, managerial, and staffing requirements, productivity and
production levels, technical expertise, approved project quality
assurance procedures, and time and place for submission of proposals.
Any inquiries and responses thereto shall be confirmed in writing and
shall be sent to all potential offerors.
(d) Proposals shall be opened so as to avoid disclosure of contents
to competing offerors during the process of negotiation. A register of
proposals shall be open for public inspection after contract award.
(e) As provided in the request for proposals, invitations shall be
sent to all responsible offerors who submit proposals to attend
discussions for the purpose of clarification to assure full
understanding of, and responsiveness to, the solicitation requirements.
Any inquiries and responses thereto shall be confirmed in writing and
shall be sent to all offerors. Offerors shall be accorded fair and
equal treatment with respect to any opportunity for discussion and
revision of proposals, and such revisions may be permitted after
submissions and prior to award for the purpose of obtaining best and
final offers. In conducting discussions, there shall be no disclosure
of any information derived from proposals submitted by competing
offerors.
(f) The operating agency shall execute a contract with the
responsible offeror whose proposal is determined in writing to be the
most advantageous to the operating agency and the state taking into
consideration the requirements set forth in the request for proposals.
The contract file shall contain the basis on which the successful
offeror is selected. The operating agency shall conduct a briefing
conference on the selection if requested by an offeror.
(g) The contract may be fixed price or cost-reimbursable, in whole
or in part, but not cost-plus-percentage-of-cost.
(h) The operating agency shall retain authority and responsibility
for inspection, testing, and compliance with applicable regulations or
standards of any state or federal governmental agency.

--- END ---