BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.85.010 and 2002 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to
test the results of actions taken so that the management and related
policy can be changed promptly and appropriately.
(2) "Critical pathways methodology" means a project scheduling and
management process for examining interactions between habitat projects
and salmonid species, prioritizing habitat projects, and assuring
positive benefits from habitat projects.
(3) "Habitat project list" is the list of projects resulting from
the critical pathways methodology under RCW 77.85.060(2). Each project
on the list must have a written agreement from the landowner on whose
land the project will be implemented. Projects include habitat
restoration projects, habitat protection projects, habitat projects
that improve water quality, habitat projects that protect water
quality, habitat-related mitigation projects, and habitat project
maintenance and monitoring activities. Projects may not include the
acquisition of land in any county in which public land, federal land,
and tribal land together constitute seventy-five percent or more of the
total area of the county.
(4) "Habitat work schedule" means those projects from the habitat
project list that will be implemented during the current funding cycle.
The schedule shall also include a list of the entities and individuals
implementing projects, the start date, duration, estimated date of
completion, estimated cost, and funding sources for the projects.
(5) "Limiting factors" means conditions that limit the ability of
habitat to fully sustain populations of salmon. These factors are
primarily fish passage barriers and degraded estuarine areas, riparian
corridors, stream channels, and wetlands.
(6) "Project sponsor" is a county, city, special district, tribal
government, state agency, a combination of such governments through
interlocal or interagency agreements, a nonprofit organization,
regional fisheries enhancement group, or one or more private citizens.
A project sponsored by a state agency may be funded by the board only
if it is included on the habitat project list submitted by the lead
entity for that area and the state agency has a local partner that
would otherwise qualify as a project sponsor.
(7) "Salmon" includes all species of the family Salmonidae which
are capable of self-sustaining, natural production.
(8) "Salmon recovery plan" means a state plan developed in response
to a proposed or actual listing under the federal endangered species
act that addresses limiting factors including, but not limited to
harvest, hatchery, hydropower, habitat, and other factors of decline.
(9) "Tribe" or "tribes" means federally recognized Indian tribes.
(10) "WRIA" means a water resource inventory area established in
chapter 173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 1997.
(11) "Owner" means the person holding title to the land or the
person under contract with the owner to lease or manage the legal
owner's property.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.85.060 and 2000 c 107 s 95 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Critical pathways methodology shall be used to develop a
habitat project list and a habitat work schedule that ensures salmon
habitat projects will be prioritized and implemented in a logical
sequential manner that produces habitat capable of sustaining healthy
populations of salmon.
(2) The critical pathways methodology shall:
(a) Include a limiting factors analysis for salmon in streams,
rivers, tributaries, estuaries, and subbasins in the region. The
technical advisory group shall have responsibility for the limiting
factors analysis;
(b) Identify local habitat projects, except land acquisition
projects in any county in which public land, federal land, and tribal
land together constitute seventy-five percent or more of the total area
of the county, that sponsors are willing to undertake. The projects
identified must have a written agreement from the landowner on which
the project is to be implemented. Project sponsors shall have the lead
responsibility for this task;
(c) Identify how projects will be monitored and evaluated. The
project sponsor, in consultation with the technical advisory group and
the appropriate landowner, shall have responsibility for this task;
(d) Include a review of monitoring data, evaluate project
performance, and make recommendations to the committee established
under RCW 77.85.050 and to the technical review team. The technical
advisory group has responsibility for this task; and
(e) Describe the adaptive management strategy that will be used.
The committee established under RCW 77.85.050 shall have responsibility
for this task. If a committee has not been formed, the technical
advisory group shall have the responsibility for this task.
(3) The habitat work schedule shall include all projects developed
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, and shall identify and
coordinate with any other salmon habitat project implemented in the
region, including habitat preservation projects funded through the
Washington wildlife and recreation program, the conservation reserve
enhancement program, and other conservancy programs. The habitat work
schedule shall also include the start date, duration, estimated date of
completion, estimated cost, and, if appropriate, the affected salmonid
species of each project. Each schedule shall be updated on an annual
basis to depict new activities.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.85.130 and 2000 c 107 s 102 and 2000 c 15 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The salmon recovery funding board shall develop procedures and
criteria for allocation of funds for salmon habitat projects and salmon
recovery activities on a statewide basis to address the highest
priorities for salmon habitat protection and restoration. To the
extent practicable the board shall adopt an annual allocation of
funding. The allocation should address both protection and restoration
of habitat, and should recognize the varying needs in each area of the
state on an equitable basis. The board has the discretion to partially
fund, or to fund in phases, salmon habitat projects. The board may
annually establish a maximum amount of funding available for any
individual project, subject to available funding. No projects required
solely as a mitigation or a condition of permitting are eligible for
funding.
(2)(a) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and
activities the board shall give preference to projects that:
(i) Are based upon the limiting factors analysis identified under
RCW 77.85.060;
(ii) Provide a greater benefit to salmon recovery based upon the
stock status information contained in the department of fish and
wildlife salmonid stock inventory (SASSI), the salmon and steelhead
habitat inventory and assessment project (SSHIAP), and any comparable
science-based assessment when available;
(iii) Will benefit listed species and other fish species; and
(iv) Will preserve high quality salmonid habitat.
(b) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and
activities the board shall also give consideration to projects that:
(i) Are the most cost-effective;
(ii) Have the greatest matched or in-kind funding; and
(iii) Will be implemented by a sponsor with a successful record of
project implementation.
(3) The board may reject, but not add, projects from a habitat
project list submitted by a lead entity for funding. The board may not
fund fee simple land acquisition projects in any county in which public
land, federal land, and tribal land together constitute seventy-five
percent or more of the total area of the county.
(4) For fiscal year 2000, the board may authorize the interagency
review team to evaluate, rank, and make funding decisions for
categories of projects or activities or from funding sources provided
for categories of projects or activities. In delegating such authority
the board shall consider the review team's staff resources, procedures,
and technical capacity to meet the purposes and objectives of this
chapter. The board shall maintain general oversight of the team's
exercise of such authority.
(5) The board shall seek the guidance of the technical review team
to ensure that scientific principles and information are incorporated
into the allocation standards and into proposed projects and
activities. If the technical review team determines that a habitat
project list complies with the critical pathways methodology under RCW
77.85.060, it shall provide substantial weight to the list's project
priorities when making determinations among applications for funding of
projects within the area covered by the list.
(6) The board shall establish criteria for determining when block
grants may be made to a lead entity or other recognized regional
recovery entity consistent with one or more habitat project lists
developed for that region. Where a lead entity has been established
pursuant to RCW 77.85.050, the board may provide grants to the lead
entity to assist in carrying out lead entity functions under this
chapter, subject to available funding. The board shall determine an
equitable minimum amount of funds for each region, and shall distribute
the remainder of funds on a competitive basis.
(7) The board may waive or modify portions of the allocation
procedures and standards adopted under this section in the award of
grants or loans to conform to legislative appropriations directing an
alternative award procedure or when the funds to be awarded are from
federal or other sources requiring other allocation procedures or
standards as a condition of the board's receipt of the funds. The
board shall develop an integrated process to manage the allocation of
funding from federal and state sources to minimize delays in the award
of funding while recognizing the differences in state and legislative
appropriation timing.
(8) The board may award a grant or loan for a salmon recovery
project on private or public land when the landowner has a legal
obligation under local, state, or federal law to perform the project,
when expedited action provides a clear benefit to salmon recovery, and
there will be harm to salmon recovery if the project is delayed. For
purposes of this subsection, a legal obligation does not include a
project required solely as a mitigation or a condition of permitting.
(9) The board may condition a grant or loan to include the
requirement that property may only be transferred to a federal agency
if the agency that will acquire the property agrees to comply with all
terms of the grant or loan to which the project sponsor was obligated.
Property acquired or improved by a project sponsor may be conveyed to
a federal agency, but only if the agency agrees to comply with all
terms of the grant or loan to which the project sponsor was obligated.

--- END ---