BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Members of the Washington national guard are
currently serving to protect the security and well-being of the United
States. However, as they are carrying out these duties, many of their
families are left without the adequate means to provide for their
security and well-being.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is established in the department a military family
assistance program. The legislature intends that, to the extent of
available funds, the program shall be available to provide temporary
financial assistance to families with members currently serving in the
Washington national guard whose gross family income at time of
application does not exceed one hundred fifty percent of the federal
poverty level as adjusted for household size and determined annually by
the federal department of health and human services.
(2) The department shall grant assistance to as many applicants as
will utilize available funds less appropriate administrative costs of
the department, not to exceed five percent of moneys appropriated to
the military assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from
public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of this chapter and
expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the
gifts, grants, or endowments.

--- END ---