BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
enhance and promote the educational opportunities for young people to
learn the rights and responsibilities of voting. Studies indicate that
voter participation decreases in populations that have not been exposed
to educational opportunities emphasizing the significance and impact of
voting.
The legislature recognizes and appreciates the ongoing efforts and
programs of the office of the secretary of state, the county auditors
of the state, and other organizations that promote voting education
programs for students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The secretary of state shall convene a
task force to explore opportunities for enhancing voter education
programs for persons under the age of eighteen.
(2) The task force shall be composed of sixteen members. Staff
support for the task force shall be provided by the office of the
secretary of state.
(a) Four members shall be members of the legislature, one from each
major caucus of the house of representatives, to be appointed by the
speaker of the house, and one from each major caucus of the senate, to
be appointed by the president of the senate;
(b) At least two members shall represent the office of the
secretary of state;
(c) At least two members shall represent county auditors' offices;
(d) At least two members shall represent the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, at least one of whom shall
represent the office of private education within the office of the
superintendent of public instruction;
(e) The remaining members shall be appointed by the office of the
secretary of state from organizations that participate in voting,
civics, or educational programs for youth.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Research existing opportunities in Washington for high school
students to learn the rights and responsibilities of voting;
(b) Share information regarding those programs and events in
Washington or elsewhere that have been successful or effective;
(c) Research opportunities for organizations to collaborate when
providing opportunities to expose high school students to the impacts
of voting;
(d) Develop realistic and effective strategies to expose all high
school students to voting education programs and events; and
(e) Research costs and explore possible funding opportunities.
(4) The task force shall make recommendations and report those
recommendations back to the legislature during the 2006 legislative
session. Written reports shall be in electronic form only, provided to
all county auditors of the state, and posted on the web site of the
office of the secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire July 1,
2006.

--- END ---