BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.130.090 and 1993 c 367 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the disciplining authority determines, upon investigation,
that there is reason to believe a violation of RCW 18.130.180 has
occurred, a statement of charge or charges ((shall)) may be prepared
and served upon the license holder or applicant at the earliest
practical time. The statement of charge or charges shall be
accompanied by a notice that the license holder or applicant may
request ((a hearing)) an adjudicative proceeding to contest the charge
or charges.
(a) The license holder or applicant must file a request for
((hearing)) an adjudicative proceeding with the disciplining authority
within twenty days after being served the statement of charges.
Nothing in this section precludes the license holder and the
disciplinary authority from engaging in settlement negotiations and
resolving the matter through a settlement. If the twenty-day limit
results in a hardship upon the license holder or applicant, he or she
may request for good cause an extension not to exceed sixty additional
days. If the disciplining authority finds that there is good cause, it
shall grant the extension.
(b) The failure to request ((a hearing)) an adjudicative proceeding
constitutes a default((, whereupon)). The disciplining authority may
then enter a decision on the basis of the facts available to it.
(2) As an alternative to filing a statement of charge or charges,
the disciplining authority may issue to a license holder or applicant
a written notice of action identifying the allegations and proposed
sanction, except revocation, authorized under RCW 18.130.160. The
notice shall state the reasons for the action. The notice shall be
sent to the license holder or applicant by certified mail, with return
receipt requested.
(a) The applicant or license holder has the right to an
adjudicative proceeding. If an adjudicative proceeding is requested,
the action will be of no effect, other than to identify the allegations
and proposed sanctions. The license holder or applicant must file a
request for an adjudicative proceeding with the disciplining authority
within thirty days after being served the action. If the thirty-day
limit results in a hardship upon the license holder or applicant, he or
she may request for good cause an extension not to exceed sixty
additional days. If the disciplining authority finds that there is
good cause, it shall grant the extension.
(b) In the event no request for an adjudicative proceeding is filed
within the time allowed by (a) of this subsection and the department
has received the return receipt from the certified mailing, the action
becomes effective.
(c) In the event that the license holder can show good cause for
failure to receive and reply to the written notice of action and
proposed sanction, the license holder may petition for reconsideration
of the disciplinary action and imposed sanction and may request an
adjudicative proceeding up to one year following the issuance of the
initial written notice of charge and proposed sanction.
(3) If ((a hearing)) an adjudicative proceeding is requested, the
time of the ((hearing)) adjudicative proceeding shall be fixed by the
disciplining authority as soon as convenient, but the ((hearing))
adjudicative proceeding shall not be held earlier than thirty days
after service of the charges or notice of action upon the license
holder or applicant.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.190 and 2003 c 53 s 141 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall investigate complaints concerning practice
by unlicensed persons of a profession or business for which a license
is required by the chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040. In the
investigation of the complaints, the secretary shall have the same
authority as provided the secretary under RCW 18.130.050 and
18.130.060.
(2) The secretary may issue a notice of intention to issue a cease
and desist order to any person whom the secretary has reason to believe
is engaged in the unlicensed practice of a profession or business for
which a license is required by the chapters specified in RCW
18.130.040. The person to whom such notice is issued may request an
adjudicative proceeding to contest the charges. The request for
hearing must be filed within twenty days after service of the notice of
intention to issue a cease and desist order. The failure to request a
hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the secretary may enter a
permanent cease and desist order, which may include a civil fine. All
proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) If the secretary makes a final determination that a person has
engaged or is engaging in unlicensed practice, the secretary may issue
a cease and desist order. In addition, the secretary may impose a
civil fine in an amount not exceeding one thousand dollars for each day
upon which the person engaged in unlicensed practice of a business or
profession for which a license is required by one or more of the
chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040. The proceeds of such fines shall
be deposited to the health professions account.
(4) If the secretary makes a written finding of fact that the
public interest will be irreparably harmed by delay in issuing an
order, the secretary may issue a temporary cease and desist order. The
person receiving a temporary cease and desist order shall be provided
an opportunity for a prompt hearing. The temporary cease and desist
order shall remain in effect until further order of the secretary. The
failure to request a prompt or regularly scheduled hearing constitutes
a default, whereupon the secretary may enter a permanent cease and
desist order, which may include a civil fine.
(5) Neither the issuance of a cease and desist order nor payment of
a civil fine shall relieve the person so practicing or operating a
business without a license from criminal prosecution therefor, but the
remedy of a cease and desist order or civil fine shall be in addition
to any criminal liability. The cease and desist order is conclusive
proof of unlicensed practice and may be enforced under RCW 7.21.060.
This method of enforcement of the cease and desist order or civil fine
may be used in addition to, or as an alternative to, any provisions for
enforcement of agency orders set out in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) The attorney general, a county prosecuting attorney, the
secretary, a board, or any person may in accordance with the laws of
this state governing injunctions, maintain an action in the name of
this state to enjoin any person practicing a profession or business for
which a license is required by the chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040
without a license from engaging in such practice or operating such
business until the required license is secured. However, the
injunction shall not relieve the person so practicing or operating a
business without a license from criminal prosecution therefor, but the
remedy by injunction shall be in addition to any criminal liability.
(7)(a) Unlicensed practice of a profession or operating a business
for which a license is required by the chapters specified in RCW
18.130.040, unless otherwise exempted by law, constitutes a gross
misdemeanor for a single violation.
(b) Each subsequent violation, whether alleged in the same or in
subsequent prosecutions, is a class C felony punishable according to
chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(8) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or
assessed by a court because of a violation of this section shall be
remitted to the health professions account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2005.

--- END ---