BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of labor and industries shall prepare financial
statements on the state fund in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles, including but not limited to the accident fund,
the medical aid fund, the pension reserve fund, the supplemental
pension fund and the second injury fund.
(2) Beginning in 2005, the state auditor shall conduct annual
audits of the state fund. As part of these audits, the auditor shall
contract with firms qualified to perform a financial audit and a
separate independent actuarial audit.
(a) The firm or firms conducting the reviews shall be familiar with
the accounting standards applicable to the accounts under review, shall
have experience in workers' compensation reserving and rate making, and
shall employ a staff that includes no fewer than three people who have
attained fellowship in the casualty actuarial society and shall
maintain limits of errors and omission insurance as prescribed by the
auditor.
(b) The auditor shall determine the scope of the financial audit
which shall include, but is not limited to, an opinion on whether the
financial statements were prepared in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles.
(c) The auditor shall determine the scope of the actuarial audit,
which shall include, but is not limited to:
(i) An independent estimate of the claim reserves;
(ii) An evaluation of the effect of discounting using various
investment yields on reported reserve levels;
(iii) A retrospective test of the accuracy of labor and industries
reserve estimates over at least a fifteen-year period;
(iv) An assessment of the actuarial calculations underlying the
break-even indicated rate level;
(v) A retrospective test of the accuracy of past rate level
indications over at least a ten-year period;
(vi) An assessment of the actuarial reserving calculations;
(vii) An assessment of the financial impact of the proposed rate
level on the actuarial soundness of the industrial insurance fund,
taking into consideration the risks inherent with insurance and the
fact that competition does not mitigate rate setting.
(d) The department of labor and industries shall cooperate with the
firms in all respects and shall permit the firms full access to all
information the firms deem necessary for a true and complete review.
(e) The cost of the audit shall be paid by the state fund.
(3) The auditor shall issue an annual report to the governor, the
leaders of the majority and minority caucuses in the senate and the
house of representatives, the director of the office of financial
management, and the director of the department of labor and industries
on the results of the financial audit and review, within six months of
the end of the fiscal year. The report may include recommendations.
(4) The auditor shall issue an annual report to the governor, the
leaders of the majority and minority caucuses in the senate and the
house of representatives, the director of the office of financial
management, and the director of the department of labor and industries
on the results of the actuarial audit and review, within four weeks of
the initial filing of annual changes to the rates, but no later than
two months before the effective date of the rates.
(5) The audit and the report of the review performed by the
independent accounting and actuarial firms shall be available for
public inspection.
(6) Not later than ninety days after the auditor completes and
delivers to the appropriate authority an audit under subsection (2) of
this section, the director of the department of labor and industries
shall notify the auditor in writing of the measures taken and proposed
to be taken, if any, to respond to the recommendations of the audit
report. The auditor may extend the ninety-day period for good cause.

--- END ---