BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any action or claim filed against a governmental entity for
damages arising out of its tortious conduct, or the intentional
tortious conduct of its past or present public officials, whether
acting in a governmental or proprietary capacity, no liability may be
imposed against the governmental entity or the past or present public
officials, unless the tortious conduct breached a duty owed to the
injured person as an individual, rather than to the public in general.
(2) In addition to the limitations set forth in subsection (1) of
this section, liability may only be imposed if:
(a) The terms of a legislative enactment specifically state a clear
intent to identify and protect a particular and circumscribed class of
persons, and the injured person is within this class;
(b) A public official responsible for enforcing statutory
requirements had actual knowledge of a statutory violation, failed to
take corrective action despite a mandatory statutory duty to do so, and
the injured person is within the class the statute is intended to
protect. In addition, if the plaintiff alleges a breach of a duty to
enforce a building code, the plaintiff must establish the public
official had actual knowledge that the violation created an inherently
dangerous condition;
(c) There was direct contact or privity between the public official
and the injured person which sets the latter apart from the general
public and the public official, in direct response to a specific
inquiry, provided express assurances upon which the injured person
justifiably relied to his or her detriment;
(d) A duty to warn or to come to the aid of a particular person
existed. A duty to warn or come to the aid of a particular person
exists only when: (i) In response to a report of an emergency, express
assurances of a successful warning or rescue are given by the
governmental entity to the person or one in privity with the person;
(ii) the particular person or the person in privity reasonably relies
upon the assurances to his or her detriment; and (iii) the person
incurs bodily injury or property damage as a result of the governmental
entity's negligence; or
(e) A statutory duty to control a third person's conduct existed.
A statutory duty is imposed upon a governmental entity to control a
third person's conduct if the governmental entity has a "special
relationship" with the third person. This duty is owed to a victim of
the acts of the third party only if: (i) There is a direct nexus
between the nature of the conduct of the third person for which the
governmental entity is supervising the third person and the nature of
the conduct causing injury to the victim; (ii) the injury to the victim
is the foreseeable consequence of the governmental entity's failure to
control the third person's conduct; (iii) the governmental entity had
the lawful authority to prevent the third person from engaging in the
injury-causing conduct; and (iv) the governmental entity's conduct
amounts to negligence.
A governmental entity has a "special relationship" with a third
person for the purposes of this subsection only if it has a definite,
established, and continuing relationship with the third person based
upon lawful authority to control and supervise that third person's
conduct.
(3) Nothing in this section diminishes any immunity or defense that
may otherwise be applicable to the governmental entity.
(4) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, for the purposes
of this section:
(a) "Governmental entity" means the state or a county, city, town,
special district, municipal corporation as defined in RCW 39.50.010,
quasi-municipal corporation, public hospital, or interlocal
organizations created by interlocal agreement between local
governmental entities.
(b) "Public official" means an officer, employee, or volunteer of
a governmental entity.
(c) "Volunteer" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 51.12.035.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.92.090 and 1963 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state of Washington, whether acting in its governmental or
proprietary capacity, shall be liable for damages arising out of its
tortious conduct to the same extent as if it were a private person or
corporation. The liability of the state under this section is subject
to the provisions of section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.96.010 and 2001 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All local governmental entities, whether acting in a
governmental or proprietary capacity, shall be liable for damages
arising out of their tortious conduct, or the tortious conduct of their
past or present officers, employees, or volunteers while performing or
in good faith purporting to perform their official duties, to the same
extent as if they were a private person or corporation. Filing a claim
for damages within the time allowed by law shall be a condition
precedent to the commencement of any action claiming damages. The laws
specifying the content for such claims shall be liberally construed so
that substantial compliance therewith will be deemed satisfactory.
(2) The liability of a local government under this section is
subject to the provisions of section 1 of this act.
(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, for the purposes
of this chapter, "local governmental entity" means a county, city,
town, special district, municipal corporation as defined in RCW
39.50.010, quasi-municipal corporation, or public hospital.
(((3))) (4) For the purposes of this chapter, "volunteer" is
defined according to RCW 51.12.035.

--- END ---