BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many people visit
Washington state to watch orca whales, the orca whale is a significant
symbol for the Native American culture, there are pods of orca whales
that migrate annually through Puget Sound, and the orca whale is easily
recognizable because of its distinct markings. The legislature intends
to promote orca whale awareness and to encourage protection of the
natural marine habitat by designating the orca whale as the official
marine mammal of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The orca whale, Orcinus orca, is hereby designated as the official
marine mammal of the state of Washington.

--- END ---