BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature acknowledges that student
disciplinary policies and behavioral intervention strategies must
include provisions to address circumstances when a student's behavior
presents a danger to himself or to others. The legislature recognizes
the need for schools to have the flexibility to respond to the
individual disciplinary needs of students with special needs and that
isolation of a student may at times be necessary to protect the student
or others. The legislature finds, however, that placement of a student
in isolation may present a potential hazard to a student if appropriate
safety measures are not in place. The legislature also finds that
parents and guardians should be notified when the behavior of their
students rises to a level requiring isolation for disciplinary
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "containment room" means a room,
space, or facility, other than a school principal's office, separate
and apart from the classroom where the student receives the majority of
daily instruction, in which the student is isolated from the rest of
the school population for the purpose of student discipline or
behavioral intervention.
(2) By September 1, 2004, within existing resources, the board of
directors of each school district, if a containment room is used in any
school facility in the district, shall adopt a policy regarding the use
of such rooms. The policy required under this section shall be
provided to parents annually and must include at least the following:
(a) An explanation of the purposes for which containment rooms are
or may be used in the district's schools, including what other
strategies will be employed before using a containment room;
(b) A requirement that a student may not be placed in a containment
room unless the placement is identified as an optional intervention
strategy in a student's individual education plan, behavioral
intervention plan, or other written intervention plan;
(c) A process for notifying the parent or guardian of a student
placed in a containment room for any portion of a school day, including
the events leading up to that placement, within twenty-four hours after
the placement;
(d) A requirement that each containment room be routinely assessed
by the school site administrator for minimum safety standards,
including but not limited to measures for visual observation of the
student, eliminating the danger of falling objects, ensuring emergency
access, assuring proper identification of the containment room, and
measures to address other conditions which may present a potential
safety hazard;
(e) A process for notice to parents with students enrolled at a
school in which containment rooms are or may be utilized. Notice under
this subsection must include:
(i) The location of the containment room or rooms; and
(ii) A description of the method of parental notification the
school will use if a student is placed in a containment room.
(3) School districts are encouraged to invite input from parents in
developing the policy required under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction may develop and
disseminate appropriate information and guidelines for school districts
to consider in developing their policies, and the superintendent is
encouraged to provide technical assistance at the request of a school
district.

--- END ---