BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall adopt rules prescribing standards and criteria
to assure that each Washington state ferry system contract entered into
with a private party or firm for vessel galley services must contain
specific clauses requiring the following:
(1) The contractor must provide for persons performing the services
under the contract health benefits that are similar to those provided
to Washington state ferry system employees, but in no case are such
health benefits required to be greater than the benefits provided for
basic health care services under chapter 70.47 RCW.
(2) The contractor must provide for persons performing the services
under the contract pension benefits that are similar to those provided
to Washington state ferry system employees, but in no case are pension
benefits required to be greater than the terms, benefits, and
allowances under chapter 41.40 RCW.

--- END ---