BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall reestablish, maintain, and operate or contract
to operate galley food service on vessels within the existing and
future fleet. In providing galley service, the department shall adhere
to the following:
(1) Vessels currently configured for full galley service must be
maintained to provide on-going future full galley service;
(2) On routes where galley service was operated during calendar
year 2003, the department shall restore galley staffing to the December
2003 actual levels, at a minimum; and
(3) Any seasonal adjustments to galley service must be based on
historical practices and service levels provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---