BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
All state-purchased health care that provides coverage for
prostheses must include coverage for hearing aids and cochlear implants
if the patient's physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner as
authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission under
chapter 18.79 RCW or physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW
recommends the hearing aid or cochlear implant.
This section does not prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as deductible or
copayment provisions or limit the authority of the state health care
authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for
the delivery of prostheses. This section does not apply to medicare
supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified
disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
An insurer that offers to any individual a health benefit plan that
provides coverage for prostheses must include coverage for hearing aids
and cochlear implants if the patient's physician or advanced registered
nurse practitioner as authorized by the nursing care quality assurance
commission under chapter 18.79 RCW or physician assistant under chapter
18.71A RCW recommends the hearing aid or cochlear implant.
This section does not prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as deductible or
copayment provisions or limit the authority of the state health care
authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for
the delivery of prostheses. This section does not apply to medicare
supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified
disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A group insurance contract or blanket disability insurance contract
that provides coverage for prostheses must include coverage for hearing
aids and cochlear implants if the patient's physician or advanced
registered nurse practitioner as authorized by the nursing care quality
assurance commission under chapter 18.79 RCW or physician assistant
under chapter 18.71A RCW recommends the hearing aid or cochlear
implant.
This section does not prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as deductible or
copayment provisions or limit the authority of the state health care
authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for
the delivery of prostheses. This section does not apply to medicare
supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified
disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
A health service contractor that provides coverage for prostheses
must include coverage for hearing aids and cochlear implants if the
patient's physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner as
authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission under
chapter 18.79 RCW or physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW
recommends the hearing aid or cochlear implant.
This section does not prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as deductible or
copayment provisions or limit the authority of the state health care
authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for
the delivery of prostheses. This section does not apply to medicare
supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified
disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
A health maintenance organization that provides coverage for
prostheses must include coverage for hearing aids and cochlear implants
if the patient's physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner as
authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission under
chapter 18.79 RCW or physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW
recommends the hearing aid or cochlear implants.
This section does not prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as deductible or
copayment provisions or limit the authority of the state health care
authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for
the delivery of prostheses. This section does not apply to medicare
supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified
disease or other limited benefits.

--- END ---