BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Although manufacturing has long been subject
to the ups and downs of regular market cycles, the increasing pace of
globalization and the ability of the world's new manufacturing floor to
export deflation has caused United States manufacturers to lose all
pricing power. Despite the development of good cost control practices
such as lean manufacturing, domestic manufacturers cannot compete on
price alone.
As our economy continues to evolve through changes to our existing
manufacturing base, our manufacturers need assistance to continue to
provide high quality products at a low cost. In order to make a
radical change to an innovation focus, there must be a public and
private partnership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Provided the conditions in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section are met, a center for advanced manufacturing may be created to
provide the necessary resources for the state's manufacturing industry.
(2) A feasibility study and economic analysis for the creation of
a center for advanced manufacturing must be conducted by a qualified
organization chosen by the department of community, trade, and economic
development and should include, but is not limited to, a center for
advanced manufacturing that offers:
(a) A research institution to transfer technology for commercial
applications in small and mid-market manufacturers;
(b) A clearinghouse and national research library that locates best
practices information, disseminates national research, and provides a
publicly accessible research library; and
(c) Ongoing training, and curriculum and courses to develop a
skilled work force, with a focus on quality efficiency practices.
(3) The feasibility study and economic analysis must be delivered
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2005.
(4) For the purposes of this section, a qualified organization must
be:
(a)(i) Designated as a nonprofit organization under section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, or (ii) a partnership between
a designated nonprofit organization under section 501(c)(3) of the
internal revenue code and a government or quasi-government agency;
(b) Focused on developing or supporting small, medium, and large
manufacturing businesses;
(c) Structured around a sound business plan;
(d) Able to demonstrate that it has the resources to complete the
feasibility study and economic analysis in a timely manner and the
state is not the sole source of funding for the feasibility study and
economic analysis; and
(e) Compliant with the standards developed by the department of
community, trade, and economic development and included in the
application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2004, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---