BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.194 and 1987 c 330 s 711 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state patrol may make rules and regulations relating to
authorized emergency vehicles and shall test and approve sirens and
emergency vehicle lamps to be used on such vehicles. The equipment and
standards review unit shall require a record check of all applicants
and drivers for an authorized emergency vehicle permit through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification section pursuant to RCW
10.97.050 and through the federal bureau of investigation before
issuing an authorized emergency vehicle permit. The record check shall
include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal
identification fingerprint card. When necessary, applicants and
drivers may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion of
the investigation. Pursuant to RCW 43.43.742, the applicant, driver,
or employer shall pay costs associated with the record check.

--- END ---