BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.06.010 and 1994 c 223 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to those prescribed by the Constitution, the governor
may exercise the powers and perform the duties prescribed in this and
the following sections:
(1) The governor shall supervise the conduct of all executive and
ministerial offices;
(2) The governor shall see that all offices are filled, including
as provided in RCW 42.12.070, and the duties thereof performed, or in
default thereof, apply such remedy as the law allows; and if the remedy
is imperfect, acquaint the legislature therewith at its next session;
(3) The governor shall make the appointments and supply the
vacancies mentioned in this title;
(4) The governor is the sole official organ of communication
between the government of this state and the government of any other
state or territory, or of the United States;
(5) Whenever any suit or legal proceeding is pending against this
state, or which may affect the title of this state to any property, or
which may result in any claim against the state, the governor may
direct the attorney general to appear on behalf of the state, and
report the same to the governor, or to any grand jury designated by the
governor, or to the legislature when next in session;
(6) The governor may require the attorney general or any
prosecuting attorney to inquire into the affairs or management of any
corporation existing under the laws of this state, or doing business in
this state, and report the same to the governor, or to any grand jury
designated by the governor, or to the legislature when next in session;
(7) The governor may require the attorney general to aid any
prosecuting attorney in the discharge of the prosecutor's duties;
(8) The governor may offer rewards, not exceeding one thousand
dollars in each case, payable out of the state treasury, for
information leading to the apprehension of any person convicted of a
felony who has escaped from a state correctional institution or for
information leading to the arrest of any person who has committed or is
charged with the commission of a felony;
(9) The governor shall perform such duties respecting fugitives
from justice as are prescribed by law;
(10) The governor shall issue and transmit election proclamations
as prescribed by law;
(11) The governor may require any officer or board to make, upon
demand, special reports to the governor, in writing;
(12) The governor may, after finding that a public disorder,
disaster, energy emergency, or riot exists within this state or any
part thereof which affects life, health, property, or the public peace,
proclaim a state of emergency in the area affected((, and)). The
powers granted the governor during a state of emergency ((shall be))
are effective only within the area described in the proclamation. In
addition to all other emergency powers, the governor may, at his or her
discretion, order any state executive agency or individual agency
office to cease operation until the governor declares that order has
been restored;
(13) The governor may, after finding that there exists within this
state an imminent danger of infestation of plant pests as defined in
RCW 17.24.007 or plant diseases which seriously endangers the
agricultural or horticultural industries of the state of Washington, or
which seriously threatens life, health, or economic well-being, order
emergency measures to prevent or abate the infestation or disease
situation, which measures, after thorough evaluation of all other
alternatives, may include the aerial application of pesticides;
(14) On all compacts forwarded to the governor pursuant to RCW
9.46.360(6), the governor is authorized and empowered to execute on
behalf of the state compacts with federally recognized Indian tribes in
the state of Washington pursuant to the federal Indian Gaming
Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq., for conducting class III
gaming, as defined in the Act, on Indian lands.

--- END ---