BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW
to read as follows:
In the event of adverse weather conditions, natural disaster, or
energy emergency, the governor may, at his or her discretion, and for
the protection of public health, safety, or welfare, order any state
executive agency or individual agency office to temporarily cease
operation. The governor may permit state agencies locally or
throughout the state to delay opening, close early, or suspend
operation entirely. The governor's order shall be in effect until the
governor declares that the conditions no longer pose a significant risk
to the health or safety of state agency employees.

--- END ---