BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 1.16.050 and 2003 c 68 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The following are legal holidays: Sunday; the first day of
January, commonly called New Year's Day; the third Monday of January,
((being)) celebrated as the anniversary of the birth of Martin Luther
King, Jr.; the third Monday of February ((to be)), known as Presidents'
Day and ((to be)) celebrated as the anniversary of the births of
Abraham Lincoln and George Washington; the last Monday of May, commonly
known as Memorial Day; the fourth day of July, ((being)) the
anniversary of the Declaration of Independence; the first Monday in
September, ((to be)) known as Labor Day; the eleventh day of November,
((to be)) known as Veterans' Day; the fourth Thursday in November, ((to
be)) known as Thanksgiving Day; the day immediately following
Thanksgiving Day; and the twenty-fifth day of December, commonly called
Christmas Day. When the twenty-fifth day of December falls on a
Tuesday, the twenty-fourth day of December is an additional legal
holiday. When the twenty-fifth day of December falls on a Thursday,
the twenty-sixth day of December is an additional legal holiday.
(2) Employees of the state and its political subdivisions, except
employees of school districts and ((except)) those nonclassified
employees of institutions of higher education who hold appointments or
are employed under contracts to perform services for periods of less
than twelve consecutive months, ((shall be)) are entitled to one paid
holiday per calendar year in addition to those specified in subsection
(1) of this section. Each employee of the state or its political
subdivisions may select the day on which the employee desires to take
the additional holiday ((provided for herein)) under this subsection
after consultation with the employer pursuant to guidelines to be
promulgated by rule of the appropriate personnel authority, or in the
case of local government by ordinance or resolution of the legislative
authority.
(3) If any of the ((above specified)) state legal holidays are also
federal legal holidays but observed on different dates, only the state
legal holidays ((shall be)) are recognized as ((a)) paid legal holidays
for employees of the state and its political subdivisions except that
for port districts and the law enforcement and public transit employees
of municipal corporations, either the federal or the state legal
holiday, but in no case both, may be recognized as a paid legal holiday
for employees.
(4) Whenever any legal holiday, other than Sunday, falls upon a
Sunday, the following Monday ((shall be)) is the legal holiday.
(5) Whenever any legal holiday falls upon a Saturday, the preceding
Friday ((shall be)) is the legal holiday.
(6) Nothing in this section ((shall be construed to have)) has the
effect of adding or deleting the number of paid holidays provided for
in an agreement between employees and employers of political
subdivisions of the state or as established by ordinance or resolution
of the local government legislative authority.
(7) The legislature declares that the ((twelfth day of October
shall be recognized as Columbus Day but shall not be considered a legal
holiday for any purposes.
The legislature declares that the ninth day of April shall be
recognized as former prisoner of war recognition day but shall not be
considered a legal holiday for any purposes.
The legislature declares that the twenty-sixth day of January shall
be recognized as Washington army and air national guard day but shall
not be considered a legal holiday for any purposes.
The legislature declares that the seventh day of August shall be
recognized as purple heart recipient recognition day but shall not be
considered a legal holiday for any purposes.
The legislature declares that the second Sunday in October be
recognized as Washington state children's day but shall not be
considered a legal holiday for any purposes.
The legislature declares that the sixteenth day of April shall be
recognized as Mother Joseph day and the fourth day of September as
Marcus Whitman day, but neither shall be considered legal holidays for
any purpose.
The legislature declares that the seventh day of December be
recognized as Pearl Harbor remembrance day but shall not be considered
a legal holiday for any purpose.
The legislature declares that the nineteenth day of February be
recognized as civil liberties day of remembrance but shall not be
considered a legal holiday for any purpose.)) following days are
recognized but are not legal holidays:
(a) January 26th, Washington army and air national guard day;
(b) February 19th, civil liberties day of remembrance;
(c) April 9th, former prisoner of war recognition day;
(d) April 16th, Mother Joseph day;
(e) August 7th, purple heart recipient recognition day;
(f) September 4th, Marcus Whitman day;
(g) The second Sunday in October, Washington state children's day;
and
(h) December 7th, Pearl Harbor remembrance day.

--- END ---