BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A local municipality may, at its discretion, permit a retired
participant to make application to the local board to resume volunteer
service as a fire fighter, under the following conditions:
(a) A retired participant who chooses to resume volunteer service
is not eligible for disability payments pursuant to RCW 41.24.150 in
the event that the retired participant becomes disabled as the result
of the performance of his or her duties.
(b) Prior to permitting a retired participant to resume volunteer
service, a local board shall require that a retired participant submit
to annual examinations by a physician or other medical staff. A
retired participant may resume volunteer service only if the examining
physician or other medical staff certifies each year that the retired
participant meets appropriate medical and health standards. Physicians
and medical staff that examine retired participants shall be reimbursed
by the local municipality, and report to the local and state boards,
consistent with RCW 41.24.110.
(c) A local municipality that elects to permit retired participants
to resume volunteer service shall be required to pay an additional
annual charge based on the increased cost of medical and relief
benefits for retired participants. The amount of the additional annual
charge shall be set by the state board, in consultation with the state
actuary.
(2) No period of volunteer service performed by a retired
participant may be used in calculating a retirement pension under RCW
41.24.170.
(3) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no participant, retired participant, or
beneficiary has a contractual right to resume volunteer service while
in receipt of a retirement pension.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.24.010 and 1999 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Municipal corporation" or "municipality" includes any county,
city, town or combination thereof, fire protection district, local law
enforcement agency, or any emergency medical service district or other
special district, authorized by law to protect life or property within
its boundaries through a fire department, emergency workers, or reserve
officers.
(2) "Fire department" means any regularly organized fire department
or emergency medical service district consisting wholly of volunteer
fire fighters, or any part-paid and part-volunteer fire department duly
organized and maintained by any municipality: PROVIDED, That any such
municipality wherein a part-paid fire department is maintained may by
appropriate legislation permit the full-paid members of its department
to come under the provisions of chapter 41.16 RCW.
(3) "Fire fighter" includes any fire fighter or emergency worker
who is a member of any fire department of any municipality but shall
not include full time, paid fire fighters who are members of the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system, with respect to periods of service rendered in such capacity.
(4) "Emergency worker" means any emergency medical service
personnel, regulated by chapters 18.71 and 18.73 RCW, who is a member
of an emergency medical service district but shall not include full-time, paid emergency medical service personnel who are members of the
Washington public employees' retirement system, with respect to periods
of service rendered in such capacity.
(5) "Performance of duty" or "performance of service" shall be
construed to mean and include any work in and about company quarters,
any fire station, any law enforcement office or precinct, or any other
place under the direction or general orders of the chief or other
officer having authority to order such member to perform such work;
responding to, working at, or returning from an alarm of fire,
emergency call, or law enforcement duties; drill or training; or any
work performed of an emergency nature in accordance with the rules and
regulations of the fire department or local law enforcement agency.
(6) "State board" means the state board for volunteer fire fighters
and reserve officers.
(7) "Board of trustees" or "local board" means: (a) For matters
affecting fire fighters, a fire fighter board of trustees created under
RCW 41.24.060; (b) for matters affecting an emergency worker, an
emergency medical service district board of trustees created under RCW
41.24.330; or (c) for matters affecting reserve officers, a reserve
officer board of trustees created under RCW 41.24.460.
(8) "Appropriate legislation" means an ordinance when an ordinance
is the means of legislating by any municipality, and resolution in all
other cases.
(9) "Reserve officer" means the same as defined by the Washington
state criminal justice training commission under chapter 43.101 RCW,
but shall not include full-time, paid law enforcement officers who are
members of the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system, with respect to periods of service rendered in such
capacity.
(10) "Participant" means: (a) For purposes of relief, any reserve
officer who is or may become eligible for relief under this chapter or
any fire fighter or emergency worker; and (b) for purposes of
retirement pension, any fire fighter, emergency worker, or reserve
officer who is or may become eligible to receive a benefit of any type
under the retirement provisions of this chapter, or whose beneficiary
may be eligible to receive any such benefit.
(11) "Retired participant" means any participant who is at least
sixty-five years of age and has been retired by the board of trustees
under RCW 41.24.170 and has been in receipt of a monthly pension for no
less than three months.
(12) "Relief" means all medical, death, and disability benefits
available under this chapter that are made necessary from death,
sickness, injury, or disability arising in the performance of duty,
including benefits provided under RCW 41.24.110, 41.24.150, 41.24.160,
41.24.175, 41.24.220, and 41.24.230, but does not include retirement
pensions provided under this chapter.
(((12))) (13) "Retirement pension" means retirement payments for
the performance of service, as provided under RCW 41.24.170, 41.24.172,
41.24.175, 41.24.180, and 41.24.185.
(((13))) (14) "Principal fund" means the volunteer fire fighters'
and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund created under
RCW 41.24.030.
(((14))) (15) "Administrative fund" means the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund created under RCW
41.24.030.

--- END ---