BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
"Residence for voting purposes" means either the place at which an
applicant for voter registration resides or the primary place of
business of an applicant, if that applicant's residence is within the
same county as the business. In order to provide the address of a
primary place of business as the address of a residence for voting
purposes, at least a majority of the business must be owned by the
applicant.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.08.010 and 2003 c 111 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter: "Information required for voter
registration" means the minimum information provided on a voter
registration application that is required by the county auditor in
order to place a voter registration applicant on the voter registration
rolls. This information includes the applicant's name, complete
residence address, complete business address if the business address is
being used as the residence for registration purposes, date of birth,
and a signature attesting to the truth of the information provided on
the application. All other information supplied is ancillary and not
to be used as grounds for not registering an applicant to vote.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.210 and 2003 c 111 s 216 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application
providing the following information concerning his or her
qualifications as a voter in this state:
(1) The address of the last former registration of the applicant as
a voter in the state;
(2) The applicant's full name;
(3) The applicant's date of birth;
(4) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes.
If the applicant is providing the address of a primary place of
business as the applicant's residence for voting purposes, the
applicant shall also provide the address of the applicant's home
residence;
(5) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the
same as the address in subsection (4) of this section;
(6) The sex of the applicant;
(7) A declaration that the applicant is a citizen of the United
States;
(8) The applicant's signature; and
(9) Any other information that the secretary of state determines is
necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and prevent
duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.
This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to
be prescribed by the secretary of state.
If the applicant fails to provide the information required for
voter registration, the auditor shall send the applicant a verification
notice. The auditor shall not register the applicant until the
required information is provided. If a verification notice is returned
as undeliverable or the applicant fails to respond to the notice within
forty-five days, the auditor shall not register the applicant to vote.
The following warning shall appear in a conspicuous place on the
voter registration form:

"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter
registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your
qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class
C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, or by
a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both imprisonment and fine."

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.08.230 and 2003 c 111 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
For all voter registrations, the registrant shall sign the
following oath:

"I declare that the facts on this voter registration form are true.
I am a citizen of the United States, I am not presently denied my civil
rights as a result of being convicted of a felony, I will have lived in
Washington at ((this)) the residence address provided for thirty days
immediately before the next election at which I vote, and maintained my
business at the primary business location indicated if I am registering
my business as my residence for voting purposes, and I will be at least
eighteen years old when I vote."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---