BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.06.022 and 2002 c 354 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, "manager" means any employee who:
(1) Formulates statewide policy or directs the work of an agency or
agency subdivision;
(2) Is responsible to administer one or more statewide policies or
programs of an agency ((or agency subdivision;
(3) Manages, administers, and controls a local branch office of an
agency or agency subdivision, including the physical, financial, or
personnel resources)); and
(((4) Has substantial responsibility in personnel administration,
legislative relations, public information, or the preparation and
administration of budgets; or
(5))) (3)(a) Functionally is above the first level of supervision
and exercises authority that is not merely routine or clerical in
nature and requires the consistent use of independent judgment; or
(b) Has substantial responsibility in personnel administration,
legislative relations, public information, or the preparation and
administration of budgets.
No employee who is a member of the Washington management service
may be included in a collective bargaining unit established under RCW
41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
No more than seven percent of an agency's work force may be in the
Washington management service. Employee positions separately funded by
nonstate funds shall be excluded from this calculation.

--- END ---