BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.030 and 2001 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The application for a certificate of ownership shall be upon a
form furnished or approved by the department and shall contain:
(((1))) (a) A full description of the vehicle, which shall contain
the proper vehicle identification number, the number of miles indicated
on the odometer at the time of delivery of the vehicle, and any
distinguishing marks of identification;
(((2))) (b) The name and address of the person who is to be the
registered owner of the vehicle and, if the vehicle is subject to a
security interest, the name and address of the secured party;
(((3))) (c) Such other information as the department may require.
(2) The department may in any instance, in addition to the
information required on the application, require additional information
and a physical examination of the vehicle or of any class of vehicles,
or either.
(3) A physical examination of the vehicle is mandatory if it has
been rebuilt after surrender of the certificate of ownership to the
department under RCW 46.12.070 due to the vehicle's destruction or
declaration as a total loss. The inspection must verify that the
vehicle identification number is genuine and agrees with the number
shown on the title and registration certificate. The inspection must
be made by a member of the Washington state patrol or other person
authorized by the department to make such inspections.
(b)(i) A physical examination of the vehicle is mandatory if the
vehicle was declared totaled or salvage under the laws of this state,
or the vehicle is presented with documents from another state showing
the vehicle was totaled or salvage and has not been reissued a valid
registration from that state after the declaration of total loss or
salvage.
(ii) The inspection must verify that the vehicle identification
number is genuine and agrees with the number shown on the original
documents supporting the vehicle purchase or ownership.
(iii) A Washington state patrol VIN specialist must ensure that all
major component parts used for the reconstruction of a salvage or
rebuildable vehicle were obtained legally. Original invoices must be
from a vendor that is registered with the department of revenue for the
collection of retail sales or use taxes or comparable agency in the
jurisdiction where the major component parts were purchased. The
invoices must include the name and address of the business, a
description of the part or parts sold, the date of sale, and the amount
of sale to include all taxes paid unless exempted by the department of
revenue or comparable agency in the jurisdiction where the major
component parts were purchased. If the parts or components were
purchased from a private individual, that bill of sale must be
notarized. The bills of sale must include the names and addresses of
the sellers and purchasers, a description of the vehicle, the part or
parts being sold, including the make, model, year, and identification
or serial number, that date of sale, and the purchase price of the
vehicle or part or parts. If the presenter is unable to provide an
acceptable release of interest or proof of ownership for a vehicle or
major component part as described above, an inspection must be
completed for ownership-in-doubt purposes as prescribed by WAC 308-56A-210.
(iv) A vehicle presented for inspection must have all damaged major
component parts replaced or repaired to meet RCW and WAC requirements
before inspection of the salvage vehicle by the Washington state
patrol.
(4) Rebuilt or salvage vehicles licensed in Washington must meet
the requirements found under chapter 46.37 RCW to be driven upon public
roadways.
(5) The application shall be subscribed by the person applying to
be the registered owner and be sworn to by that applicant in the manner
described by RCW 9A.72.085. The department shall retain the
application in either the original, computer, or photostatic form.

--- END ---