BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The United States National Highway Traffic Safety
Administration estimates that each year approximately 100,000 police-reported automobile accidents occur due to drivers who are fatigued;
(2) Every year an estimated 1,500 people are killed on United
States roads by fatigued drivers;
(3) Recent studies show that being awake for 24 hours has the same
impairment level as having a blood alcohol concentration of 0.1
percent, above Washington's legal limit of 0.08 percent;
(4) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor
vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in
the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the
driver has committed a violation of traffic laws or regulations
enumerated in RCW 10.31.100(3) including:
(a) Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
drug, as defined by RCW 46.61.502;
(b) Driving in a reckless manner; or
(c) Driving with disregard for the safety of others.
The legislature, therefore, intends to provide additional
protections to Washington drivers by making it unlawful to drive while
fatigued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Fatigued" means falling asleep while driving or driving after
having been without sleep for a period in excess of twenty-four
consecutive hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
It is unlawful for a person to operate a motor vehicle upon the
highways of this state when the person is fatigued. Operation of a
motor vehicle in violation of this section is prima facie evidence of
reckless driving.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---