BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall issue a special license plate displaying a
symbol, approved by the special license plate review board, for
professional fire fighters and paramedics who are members of the
Washington State Council of Fire Fighters. Upon initial application
and subsequent renewals, applicants must show proof of eligibility by
providing a certificate of current membership from the Washington State
Council of Fire Fighters. The special license plate may be used in
lieu of regular or personalized license plates for vehicles required to
display one or two vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles
registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon the terms and conditions
established by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Professional fire fighters and paramedics license plates" means
license plates issued under section 1 of this act that display a symbol
denoting professional fire fighters and paramedics.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee for each type of special
license plates issued under RCW 46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as
existing before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in
an amount calculated to offset the cost of production of the special
license plates and the administration of this program. ((Until
December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed thirty-five dollars, but
effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1,
1998,)) The department may adjust the fee to no more than forty
dollars. This fee is in addition to all other fees required to
register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been
requested. All such additional special license plate fees collected by
the department shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to
the motor vehicle fund.
(2) ((Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application, registration, and renewal
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license
plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder
of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(((4) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(((5))) (4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(((6) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a
professional fire fighters and paramedics license plate shall pay an
initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount
not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW
46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the professional fire fighters
and paramedics license plates. Upon the determination by the
department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the Washington State Council of Fire Fighters
benevolent fund established under section 4 of this act.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a professional fire
fighters and paramedics license plate shall, upon application, pay a
fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the professional fire fighters and paramedics
special license plate. Upon the determination by the department that
the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds
to the Washington State Council of Fire Fighters benevolent fund
established under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington State Council of Fire Fighters benevolent fund
is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Upon the
department's determination the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the professional fire fighters and paramedics special
license plate, all receipts, except as provided in RCW 46.16.313 (6)
and (7), from professional fire fighters and paramedics license plates
must be deposited into the account. Only the director of the
department of licensing or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.
(2) Funds in the account must be disbursed subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Under the requirements of RCW 46.16.765, the department must
contract with a qualified nonprofit organization to receive and
disseminate funds for charitable purposes on behalf of members of the
Washington State Council of Fire Fighters, their families, and others
deemed in need.
(b) For the purposes of this section, a "qualified nonprofit
organization" means a not-for-profit corporation incorporated and
operating exclusively in Washington that has received a determination
of tax exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code. The organization must have been established for the
express purposes of receiving and disseminating funds for charitable
purposes on behalf of members of the Washington State Council of Fire
Fighters, their families, and others deemed in need.
(c) The qualified nonprofit organization must meet all requirements
set out in RCW 46.16.765.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.316 and 1997 c 291 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.16.305:
(1) When a person who has been issued a special license plate or
plates under section 1 of this act or RCW 46.16.301 as it existed
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, sells,
trades, or otherwise transfers or releases ownership of the vehicle
upon which the special license plate or plates have been displayed, he
or she shall immediately report the transfer of such plate or plates to
an acquired vehicle or vehicle eligible for such plates pursuant to
departmental rule, or he or she shall surrender such plates to the
department immediately if such surrender is required by departmental
rule. If a person applies for a transfer of the plate or plates to
another eligible vehicle, a transfer fee of five dollars shall be
charged in addition to all other applicable fees. Such transfer fees
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Failure to surrender the
plates when required is a traffic infraction.
(2) If the special license plate or plates issued by the department
become lost, defaced, damaged, or destroyed, application for a
replacement special license plate or plates shall be made and fees paid
as provided by law for the replacement of regular license plates.

--- END ---