BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Instructional material" means textbooks and other textual and
nontextual material required or essential to a student's success in a
postsecondary course of study in which a student with a disability is
enrolled as determined by the instructor of the course in consultation
with the official making the request in accordance with guidelines
issued pursuant to subsection (9) of this section.
(b) "Print access disability" means a condition in which a person's
independent reading of, reading comprehension of, or visual access to
materials is limited or reduced due to a sensory, neurological,
cognitive, physical, psychiatric, or other disability recognized by
state or federal law. The term is applicable, but not limited to,
persons who are blind, have low vision, or have reading disorders or
physical disabilities.
(c) "Structural integrity" means all instructional material,
including but not limited to the text of the material, sidebars, the
table of contents, chapter headings and subheadings, footnotes,
indexes, glossaries, graphs, charts, illustrations, pictures,
equations, formulas, and bibliographies.
(d) "Specialized format" means Braille, audio, electronic, or
digital text that is exclusively for use by blind or other persons with
print access disabilities.
(2) An individual, firm, partnership, or corporation that publishes
or manufactures instructional material for students attending any
public or private institution of higher education in the state of
Washington must provide to the public or private institution of higher
education, for use by students attending the institution, instructional
material in an electronic or specialized format mutually agreed upon by
the publisher or manufacturer and the public or private institution of
higher education. Computer files or electronic versions of printed
instructional material shall be provided; video materials must be
captioned or accompanied by transcriptions of spoken text; and audio
materials must be accompanied by transcriptions. Structural integrity
of material must be maintained. Structural elements, such as headings,
lists, and tables must be identified using current markup and tools.
If good faith efforts fail to produce an agreement between the
publisher or manufacturer and the public or private institution of
higher education, as to a specialized format that will preserve the
structural integrity of instructional material, the publisher or
manufacturer must provide the instructional material in a verified and
valid HTML format and must preserve as much of the structural integrity
of the instructional material as possible. The instructional material
in a specialized format must be provided to the public or private
institution of higher education at no additional cost and in a timely
manner, upon receipt of a written request as provided in subsection (3)
of this section.
(3) A written request for instructional material in a specialized
format must:
(a) Certify that the public or private institution of higher
education has purchased the instructional material in its standard
format for use by a student with a print access disability or that the
student with a print access disability attending or registered to
attend the public or private institution of higher education has
purchased the instructional material in its standard format;
(b) Certify that the student has a print access disability that
substantially prevents him or her from using standard instructional
material;
(c) Certify that the instructional material is for use by the
student in connection with a course in which he or she is registered or
enrolled at the public or private institution of higher education; and
(d) Be signed by the coordinator of services for students with
disabilities at the public or private institution of higher education
or by the college or campus official responsible for monitoring
compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C.
12101 et seq.) at the public or private institution of higher
education.
(4) An individual, firm, partnership, or corporation specified in
subsection (2) of this section may require that, in addition to the
requirements in subsection (3) of this section, the request include a
statement signed by the student agreeing to both of the following:
(a) He or she will use the instructional material provided in
specialized format solely for his or her own educational purposes; and
(b) He or she will not copy or duplicate the instructional material
provided in specialized format for use by others.
(5) If a public or private institution of higher education provides
a student with the specialized format version of instructional
material, the media must be copy-protected or the public or private
institution of higher education shall take other reasonable precautions
to ensure that students do not copy or distribute specialized format
versions of instructional material in violation of the Copyright
Revisions Act of 1976, as amended (17 U.S.C. Sec. 101 et seq.).
(6) Nothing in this section prohibits a public or private
institution of higher education from assisting a student with a print
access disability through the use of a specialized format version of
instructional material obtained under this section or by transcribing
or translating or arranging for the transcription or translation of the
instructional material into specialized formats that provide persons
with print access disabilities the ability to have increased
independent access to instructional material. If such specialized
format is made, the public or private institution of higher education
may share the specialized format version of the instructional material
with other students with print access disabilities for whom the public
or private institution of higher education is authorized to request
instructional material in a specialized format. The addition of
captioning to video material by a Washington public or private
institution of higher education does not constitute an infringement of
copyright.
(7) A specialized format version of instructional material
developed at one public or private institution of higher education in
Washington state may be shared for use by a student at another public
or private institution of higher education in Washington state for whom
the latter public or private institution of higher education is
authorized to request instructional material in a specialized format.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to authorize any use of
instructional material that would constitute an infringement of
copyright under the Copyright Revision Act of 1976, as amended (17
U.S.C. Sec. 101 et seq.).
(9) The governing boards of public and participating private
institutions of higher education in Washington shall each adopt
guidelines consistent with this section for its implementation and
administration. At a minimum, the guidelines shall address all of the
following:
(a) The designation of instructional material deemed "required or
essential to student success";
(b) The determination of the availability of technology for the
conversion of instructional material and the conversion of mathematics
and science material;
(c) The procedures and standards relating to distribution and use
of instructional material pursuant to this section;
(d) The procedures for granting exceptions or waivers when it is
determined that an individual, firm, partnership, or corporation is not
technically able to comply with the requirements of this section; and
(e) Other matters as are deemed necessary or appropriate to carry
out the purposes of this section.
(10) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section is a
violation of chapter 49.60 RCW.

--- END ---