BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.61.010 and 2002 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A metropolitan park district may be created for the management,
control, improvement, maintenance, and acquisition of parks, parkways,
boulevards, and recreational facilities. A metropolitan park district
may include territory located in portions or all of one or more cities
or counties, or one or more cities and counties, when created or
enlarged as provided in this chapter. A county planning under RCW
36.70A.040 may propose creating a metropolitan park district consisting
of the unincorporated portions of an urban growth area even if the
portions are geographically isolated from each other, if there is a
joint provision of parks and recreation services by the city and
county, or an interlocal agreement with the city and the area is not
part of an existing metropolitan park district.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.61.020 and 2002 c 88 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When proposed by citizen petition or by local government
resolution as provided in this section, a ballot proposition
authorizing the creation of a metropolitan park district shall be
submitted by resolution to the voters of the area proposed to be
included in the district at any general election, or at any special
election which may be called for that purpose.
(2) The ballot proposition shall be submitted if the governing body
of each city in which all or a portion of the proposed district is
located, and the legislative authority of each county in which all or
a portion of the proposed district is located within the unincorporated
portion of the county, each adopts a resolution submitting the
proposition to create a metropolitan park district.
(3) As an alternative to the method provided under subsection (2)
of this section, the ballot proposition shall be submitted if a
petition proposing creation of a metropolitan park district is
submitted to the county auditor of each county in which all or a
portion of the proposed district is located that is signed by at least
fifteen percent of the registered voters residing in the area to be
included within the proposed district. Where the petition is for
creation of a district in more than one county, the petition shall be
filed with the county auditor of the county having the greater area of
the proposed district, and a copy filed with each other county auditor
of the other counties covering the proposed district.
Territory by virtue of its annexation to any city whose territory
lies entirely within a park district ((shall be)) is deemed to be
within the limits of the metropolitan park district. ((Such an)) That
extension of a park district's boundaries ((shall not be)) is not
subject to review by a boundary review board independent of the board's
review of the city annexation of territory. Territory entirely within
an unincorporated park district is automatically excluded from the
district upon annexation to a city through an interlocal agreement with
the city that disburses assets and debt in an orderly and equitable
manner.

--- END ---