BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
PRIORITIES OF GOVERNMENT. The department must continuously improve
in quality, efficiency, and effectiveness to increase public trust in
the way the department operates and delivers services so that employers
and workers receive maximum value for their premium dollars. Further,
the department must establish priorities for the delivery of its
services and annually assess whether the department's programs and
activities contribute to the department's priorities. The highest
priority programs must be evaluated to determine if they are operating
at maximum efficiency, and the lowest priority programs must be
assessed to determine their continued viability. The department shall
release its annual assessment to the citizens of the state, the
governor, and the appropriate legislative committees by January 1st of
each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 FUNDING PLAN. By September 1, 2004, the
department of labor and industries shall develop a plan for funding the
administration of department programs not related to the administration
of Title 51 RCW in the 2005-07 and subsequent biennial budgets. By
September 1, 2004, the department shall report on this plan to the
house of representatives committees on appropriations, and commerce and
labor, or their successor committees, and the senate committees on ways
and means, and commerce and trade, or their successor committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

--- END ---