BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that recreational
fishing generated approximately eight hundred thirty-five million
dollars in economic activity in 2001. The legislature further finds
that recreational fishing seasons provide significant economic benefits
to local economies. The legislature therefore finds that an advisory
group of affected stakeholders could assist the fish and wildlife
commission and the director by making recommendations regarding fishing
seasons and allocation of harvestable fish in a manner that
accomplishes fishery management objectives and maximizes benefits to
local communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Recreational and commercial fishing stakeholders may form a
special economic fishery advisory committee within an administrative
region of the department by notifying the director. A special economic
fishery advisory committee shall consist of a minimum of five and no
more than fifteen members representing a balance of local interests
including but not limited to recreational fishers, sport fishing
organizations, commercial fishing interests, and local business owners.
Commercial fishing interests may choose not to participate in a special
economic fishery advisory committee when the committee only addresses
fishery resources harvested by recreational fishers.
(2) A special economic fishery advisory committee may:
(a) Review and provide guidance on proposed recreational and
commercial fishing seasons within an administrative region of the
department;
(b) Advise the department of significant economic impacts to local
economies of proposed fishing seasons;
(c) Recommend to the department and commission the development of
alternative fishing seasons that accomplish fishery management
objectives and maximize economic benefits to local communities; and
(d) Not meet more than three times per calendar year unless
additional meetings are approved in writing by the director.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.04.012 and 2000 c 107 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Wildlife, fish, and shellfish are the property of the state. The
commission, director, and the department shall preserve, protect,
perpetuate, and manage the wildlife and food fish, game fish, and
shellfish in state waters and offshore waters.
The department shall conserve the wildlife and food fish, game
fish, and shellfish resources in a manner that does not impair the
resource. In a manner consistent with this goal, the department shall
seek to maintain the economic well-being and stability of the fishing
industry in the state. The department shall promote orderly fisheries
and shall enhance and improve recreational and commercial fishing in
this state. The department shall work with special economic fishery
advisory committees created in section 2 of this act to evaluate
alternative fishing seasons and consider the economic impacts to local
economies.
The commission may authorize the taking of wildlife, food fish,
game fish, and shellfish only at times or places, or in manners or
quantities, as in the judgment of the commission does not impair the
supply of these resources.
The commission shall attempt to maximize the public recreational
game fishing and hunting opportunities of all citizens, including
juvenile, disabled, and senior citizens.
Recognizing that the management of our state wildlife, food fish,
game fish, and shellfish resources depends heavily on the assistance of
volunteers, the department shall work cooperatively with volunteer
groups and individuals to achieve the goals of this title to the
greatest extent possible.
Nothing in this title shall be construed to infringe on the right
of a private property owner to control the owner's private property.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.04.055 and 2000 c 107 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In establishing policies to preserve, protect, and perpetuate
wildlife, fish, and wildlife and fish habitat, the commission shall
meet annually with the governor to:
(a) Review and prescribe basic goals and objectives related to
those policies; and
(b) Review the performance of the department in implementing fish
and wildlife policies.
The commission shall maximize fishing, hunting, and outdoor
recreational opportunities compatible with healthy and diverse fish and
wildlife populations. The commission shall work with special economic
fishery advisory committees created in section 2 of this act to
evaluate alternative fishing seasons and consider the economic impacts
to local economies.
(2) The commission shall establish hunting, trapping, and fishing
seasons and prescribe the time, place, manner, and methods that may be
used to harvest or enjoy game fish and wildlife.
(3) The commission shall establish provisions regulating food fish
and shellfish as provided in RCW 77.12.047.
(4) The commission shall have final approval authority for tribal,
interstate, international, and any other department agreements relating
to fish and wildlife.
(5) The commission shall adopt rules to implement the state's fish
and wildlife laws.
(6) The commission shall have final approval authority for the
department's budget proposals.
(7) The commission shall select its own staff and shall appoint the
director of the department. The director and commission staff shall
serve at the pleasure of the commission.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.12.760 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 78 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Non-Indian steelhead trout harvest allocations shall be managed
solely as a recreational fishery for non-Indian ((fishermen)) fishers
under the rule-setting authority of the fish and wildlife commission.
The commission shall work with special economic fishery advisory
committees created in section 2 of this act to evaluate alternative
fishing seasons and consider the economic impacts to local economies.
(2) Commercial non-Indian steelhead fisheries are not authorized.

--- END ---