BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory board" means the state advisory board of sprinkler
fitters.
(2) "Department" means the Washington state fire marshal's office.
(3) "Director" means the Washington state fire marshal.
(4) "Fire protection sprinkler fitting" means the installation,
maintenance, and repair of sprinkler, standpipe, hose, or other hazard
systems for fire protection purposes, that is an assembly of
underground and/or overhead piping or conduit beginning at the
connection to the primary water supply, whether public or private.
(5) "Journeyman sprinkler fitter" means any person who has been
issued a certificate of competency by the department as provided in
this chapter, to work under the supervision of a licensed fire
protection contractor under the provisions of chapter 18.160 RCW.
(6) "NFPA 13-D" means whatever standard is used by the national
fire protection association for the installation of fire protection
sprinkler systems in one or two-family residential dwellings or mobile
homes.
(7) "NFPA 13-R" means whatever standard is used by the national
fire protection association for the installation of fire protection
sprinkler systems in residential dwellings up to four stories in
height.
(8) "Residential sprinkler fitter" means anyone who has been issued
a residential certificate of competency limited to installation,
maintenance, and repair of the fire protection sprinkler system of
residential occupancies as defined by NFPA 13-D and NFPA 13-R.
(9) "Contractor" means any person or body of persons, corporate or
otherwise, engaged in any work covered by the provisions of this
chapter, who is a licensed fire protection contractor under the
provisions of chapter 18.160 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) No person may engage in or offer to
engage in the trade of sprinkler fitting without having a journeyman
certificate, residential certificate, temporary permit, or trainee
certificate. A trainee must be supervised by a person who has a
journeyman certificate, residential certificate, or temporary permit,
as specified in section 6 of this act. No contractor may employ a
person to engage in or offer to engage in the trade of sprinkler
fitting unless the person employed has a journeyman certificate,
residential certificate, temporary permit, or trainee certificate.
This section does not apply to a contractor who is contracting for work
on his or her own residence.
(2) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is an infraction.
Each day in which a person engages in the trade of sprinkler fitting in
violation of subsection (1) of this section or employs a person in
violation of subsection (1) of this section is a separate infraction.
Each worksite at which a person engages in the trade of sprinkler
fitting in violation of subsection (1) of this section or at which a
person is employed in violation of subsection (1) of this section is a
separate infraction.
(3) Notices of infractions for violations of subsection (1) of this
section may be issued to:
(a) The person engaging in or offering to engage in the trade of
sprinkler fitting in violation of subsection (1) of this section;
(b) The contractor in violation of subsection (1) of this section;
and
(c) The contractor's employee who authorized the work assignment of
the person employed in violation of subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Any person desiring to be issued a
certificate of competency as provided in this chapter shall deliver
evidence in a form prescribed by the department affirming that the
person has had sufficient experience, as well as demonstrated general
competency, in the trade of sprinkler fitting or residential sprinkler
fitting so as to qualify him or her to make an application for a
certificate of competency as a journeyman sprinkler fitter or
residential sprinkler fitter.
In addition to supplying the evidence as prescribed in this
section, each applicant for a certificate of competency shall submit an
application for a certificate on a form and in a manner as prescribed
by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Upon receipt of the application and evidence
set forth in section 3 of this act, the director shall review the same
and make a determination as to whether the applicant is eligible to
take an examination for the certificate of competency. To be eligible
to take the examination each applicant for a journeyman sprinkler
fitter's certificate of competency shall furnish written evidence that
he or she has either completed a course of study in the sprinkler
fitting trade in the armed services of the United States or at a school
accredited by the department; or that he or she has five or more years
of experience under the direct supervision of a licensed sprinkler
fitter contractor and a certified journeyman sprinkler fitter. Each
applicant for a residential sprinkler fitter's certificate of
competency shall furnish written evidence that he or she has either
completed a course of study in the sprinkler fitting trade in the armed
services of the United States or at a school accredited by the
department, or that he or she has had at least three years' practical
experience under the direct supervision of a certified journeyman
sprinkler fitter or certified residential sprinkler fitter in that
sprinkler fitter's speciality. No other requirement for eligibility
may be imposed. The director shall establish reasonable rules for the
examinations to be given applicants for certificates of competency. In
establishing the rules and criteria, the director shall consult with
the advisory board. Upon determination that the applicant is eligible
to take the examination, the director shall so notify him or her,
indicating the time and place for taking the examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The director, in consultation with the
advisory board, shall prepare a written examination to be administered
to applicants for certificates of competency for journeyman sprinkler
fitter and residential sprinkler fitter. The examination shall be
constructed to determine:
(1) Whether the applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the
technical information and practical procedures that are identified with
the trade of journeyman sprinkler fitter or residential sprinkler
fitter; and
(2) Whether the applicant is familiar with the applicable fire
protection codes and the administrative rules of the department
pertaining to sprinkler fitting and sprinkler fitters.
The department shall administer the examination to eligible
persons. Before taking the examination, all applicants must pay a fee
to the department.
The department shall certify the results of the examination, and
shall notify the applicant in writing whether he or she has passed or
failed. Any applicant who has failed the examination may retake the
examination, upon the terms and after a period of time that the
director shall set by rule. The director may limit the number of times
that a person may take the examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department shall issue certificates
of competency to all applicants who have passed the examination and
have paid the fee for the certificate. The certificate shall bear the
date of issuance, and shall expire on the birthdate of the holder two
years after the date of issuance. The certificate shall be renewable
every other year, upon application, on or before the birthdate of the
holder. A renewal fee shall be assessed for each certificate. If a
person fails to renew the certificate by the renewal date, he or she
must pay a doubled fee. If the person does not renew the certificate
within ninety days of the renewal date, he or she must retake the
examination and pay the examination fee.
The journeyman sprinkler fitter and residential sprinkler fitter
certificates of competency and the temporary permit provided for in
this chapter grant the holder the right to engage in the work of
sprinkler fitting as a journeyman sprinkler fitter or residential
sprinkler fitter in accordance with their provisions throughout the
state and within any of its political subdivisions on any job or any
employment without additional proof of competency or any other license
or permit or fee to engage in the work. This section does not preclude
employees from adhering to a union security clause in any employment
where such a requirement exists.
(2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the sprinkler fitting construction
trade or who is learning the sprinkler fitting construction trade may
work in the sprinkler fitting construction trade if supervised by a
certified journeyman sprinkler fitter or a certified residential
sprinkler fitter in that sprinkler fitter's specialty. All apprentices
and individuals learning the sprinkler fitting construction trade shall
obtain a sprinkler fitting training certificate from the department.
The certificate shall authorize the holder to learn the sprinkler
fitting construction trade while under the direct supervision of a
journeyman sprinkler fitter or a residential sprinkler fitter working
in his or her specialty. The holder of the sprinkler fitting training
certificate shall renew the certificate annually. At the time of
renewal, the holder shall provide the department with an accurate list
of the holder's employers in the sprinkler fitting construction
industry for the previous year and the number of hours worked for each
employer. An annual fee shall be charged for the issuance or renewal
of the certificate. The department shall set the fee by rule. The fee
shall cover but not exceed the cost of administering and enforcing the
trainee certification and supervision requirements of this chapter.
Apprentices and individuals learning the sprinkler fitting construction
trade shall have their sprinkler fitting training certificates in their
possession at all times that they are performing sprinkler fitting
work. They shall show their certificates to an authorized
representative of the department at the representative's request.
(3) Any person who has been issued a sprinkler fitting training
certificate under this chapter may work if that person is under
supervision. Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same
job site and under the control of either a journeyman sprinkler fitter
or an appropriate residential sprinkler fitter who has an applicable
certificate of competency issued under this chapter. Either a
journeyman sprinkler fitter or an appropriate residential sprinkler
fitter shall be on the same job site as the noncertified individual for
a minimum of seventy-five percent of each working day unless otherwise
provided in this chapter. The ratio of noncertified individuals to
certified journeymen or residential sprinkler fitters working on a job
site shall be not more than two noncertified individuals working on any
one job site for every one certified journeyman sprinkler fitter or one
certified residential sprinkler fitter.
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in a technical school program in the
sprinkler fitting construction trade in a school approved by the
department may work without direct on-site supervision during the last
six months of meeting the practical experience requirements of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) No examination is required of any
applicant for a certificate of competency who:
(a) For a period of five years prior to the effective date of this
act, was engaged in a bona fide business or trade of sprinkler fitting
and held a certificate of competency issued under chapter 18.160 RCW;
(b) For a period of five years prior to the effective date of this
act, was employed by someone certified under chapter 18.160 RCW; or
(c) On the effective date of this act, holds a valid journeyman
sprinkler fitter's license issued by a political subdivision of the
state of Washington and whose license is valid at the time of making
his or her application for the certificate.
(2) Applicants qualifying under this section shall be issued a
certificate by the department upon making an application as provided in
section 3 of this act and paying the fee required under section 6 of
this act. However, each applicant under this section is required to
furnish the evidence required by section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department is authorized to grant and
issue temporary permits in lieu of certificates of competency whenever
a sprinkler fitter coming into the state of Washington from another
state requests a temporary permit to engage in the trade of sprinkler
fitting as a journeyman sprinkler fitter or as a residential sprinkler
fitter during the period of time between filing of an application for
a certificate as provided in section 3 of this act and taking the
examination provided for in section 5 of this act. However, no
temporary permit shall be issued to:
(1) Any person who has failed to pass the examination for a
certificate of competency;
(2) Any applicant under this section who has not furnished the
department with the evidence required under section 3 of this act; or
(3) Any apprentice sprinkler fitter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The department may revoke or suspend a
certificate of competency for any of the following reasons:
(a) The certificate was obtained through error or fraud;
(b) The certificate holder is judged to be incompetent to carry on
the trade of sprinkler fitting as a journeyman sprinkler fitter or
residential sprinkler fitter;
(c) The certificate holder has violated any provision of this
chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter.
(2) Before a certificate of competency is revoked or suspended, the
department shall send written notice by registered mail with return
receipt requested to the certificate holder's last known address. The
notice must list the allegations against the certificate holder and
give him or her the opportunity to request a hearing before the
advisory board. At the hearing, the department and the certificate
holder have opportunity to produce witnesses and give testimony. The
hearing must be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The
advisory board shall render its decision based upon the testimony and
evidence presented and shall notify the parties immediately upon
reaching its decision. A majority of the advisory board is necessary
to render a decision.
(3) The department may deny renewal of a certificate of competency
issued under this chapter if the applicant owes outstanding penalties
for a final judgment under this chapter. The department shall notify
the applicant of the denial by registered mail, return receipt
requested, to the address on the application. The applicant may appeal
the denial within twenty days by filing a notice of appeal with the
department accompanied by a certified check for two hundred dollars
which shall be returned to the applicant if the decision of the
department is not upheld by the hearings officer. The office of
administrative hearings shall conduct the hearing under chapter 34.05
RCW. If the hearings officer sustains the decision of the department,
the two hundred dollars must be applied to the cost of the hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) There is created a state advisory board
of sprinkler fitters, to be composed of five members appointed by the
governor. Members shall be two journeyman sprinkler fitters, two
licensed fire protection contractors under chapter 18.160 RCW, and the
state fire marshal or his or her designee who is familiar with the
business and trade of sprinkler fitting.
(2) The term of one journeyman sprinkler fitter expires July 1,
2007; the term of the second journeyman sprinkler fitter expires July
1, 2008; the term of one licensed fire protection contractor expires
July 1, 2007; and the term of the second licensed fire protection
contractor expires July 1, 2008. Thereafter, upon the expiration of
the terms, the governor shall appoint a new member to serve for a
period of three years. However, to ensure that the advisory board can
continue to act, a member whose term expires shall continue to serve
until his or her replacement is appointed. In the case of any vacancy
on the advisory board for any reason, the governor shall appoint a new
member to serve out the term of the person whose position has become
vacant.
(3) The advisory board shall carry out all the functions and duties
enumerated in this chapter, as well as generally advise the department
on all matters relative to this chapter.
(4) Each member of the advisory board shall receive travel expenses
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for
each day in which the member is actually engaged in attendance of
meetings of the advisory board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The department shall charge fees for
issuance, renewal, and reinstatement of all certificates and permits
and for examinations required by this chapter. The department shall
set the fees by rule.
(2) The fees shall cover the full cost of issuing the certificates,
devising and administering the examinations, and administering and
enforcing this chapter. Costs include travel, per diem, and
administrative support costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 All moneys received from certificates,
permits, or other sources shall be paid to the state treasurer as ex
officio custodian thereof and placed by the treasurer in a special fund
designated as the "sprinkler fitting certificate fund." The treasurer
shall pay out upon vouchers duly and regularly issued therefor and
approved by the director. The treasurer shall keep an accurate record
of payments into the fund, and of all disbursement therefrom. The fund
shall be charged with its pro rata share of the cost of administering
the fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The director may adopt rules, make specific
decisions, orders, and rulings, including demands and findings, and
take other necessary action for the implementation and enforcement of
his or her duties under this chapter. However, in the administration
of this chapter the director shall not enter into any controversy
arising over work assignments with respect to the trades involved in
the construction industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Nothing in this chapter is intended to
derogate from or dispense with the requirements of any valid sprinkler
fitting code enacted by a political subdivision of the state, except
that no code shall require the holder of a certificate of competency to
demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain any other
license or pay any fee in order to engage in the trade of sprinkler
fitting. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict the
right of any householder to assist or receive assistance from a friend,
neighbor, relative, or other person when none of the individuals doing
sprinkler fitting hold themselves out as engaged in the trade or
business of sprinkler fitting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The director may, upon payment of the
appropriate fees, grant a certificate of competency without examination
to any applicant who is a registered journeyman sprinkler fitter or
residential sprinkler fitter in any other state whose requirements for
registration are at least substantially equivalent to the requirements
of this state, and which extends the same privileges of reciprocity to
journeymen sprinkler fitters or residential sprinkler fitters
registered in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 An authorized representative of the
department may investigate alleged or apparent violations of this
chapter. An authorized representative of the department upon
presentation of credentials may inspect sites at which a person is
doing sprinkler fitting work for the purpose of determining whether
that person has a certificate issued by the department in accordance
with this chapter or is supervised by a person who has such a
certificate or permit. Upon request of the authorized representative
of the department, a person doing sprinkler fitting work shall produce
evidence that the person has a certificate or permit issued by the
department in accordance with this chapter or is supervised by a person
who has such a certificate or permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 An authorized representative of the
department may issue a notice of infraction as specified in section
2(3) of this act if a person who is doing sprinkler fitting work or who
is offering to do sprinkler fitting work fails to produce evidence of
having a certificate or permit issued by the department in accordance
with this chapter or of being supervised by a person who has such a
certificate or permit. A notice of infraction issued under this
section shall be personally served on the person named in the notice by
an authorized representative of the department or sent by certified
mail to the last known address provided to the department of the person
named in the notice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The form of the notice of infraction issued
under this chapter must include the following:
(1) A statement that the notice represents a determination that the
infraction has been committed by the person named in the notice and
that the determination shall be final unless contested as provided in
this chapter;
(2) A statement that the infraction is a noncriminal offense for
which imprisonment shall not be imposed as a sanction;
(3) A statement of the specific infraction for which the notice was
issued;
(4) A statement of the monetary penalty that has been established
for the infraction;
(5) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for
responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options;
(6) A statement that at any hearing to contest the determination
the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the infraction was committed; and that the person may
subpoena witnesses, including the authorized representative of the
department who issued and served the notice of infraction;
(7) A statement, which the person shall sign, that the person
promises to respond to the notice of infraction in one of the ways
provided in this chapter;
(8) A statement that refusal to sign the infraction as directed in
subsection (7) of this section is a misdemeanor; and
(9) A statement that failure to respond to a notice of infraction
as promised is a misdemeanor and may be punished by either a fine, or
imprisonment in jail, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A violation designated as an infraction
under this chapter shall be heard and determined by an administrative
law judge of the office of administrative hearings. If a party desires
to contest the notice of infraction, the party shall file a notice of
appeal with the department within twenty days of issuance of the
infraction. The administrative law judge shall conduct hearings in
these cases at locations in the county where the infraction is alleged
to have occurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Unless contested in accordance with this
chapter, the notice of infraction represents a determination that the
person to whom the notice was issued committed the infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 (1) A person who receives a notice of
infraction shall respond to the notice as provided in this section
within fourteen days of the date the notice was served.
(2) If the person named in the notice of infraction does not wish
to contest the notice of infraction, the person shall pay to the
department, by check or money order, the amount of the penalty
prescribed for the infraction. When a response that does not contest
the determination is received by the department with the appropriate
payment, the department shall make the appropriate entry in its
records.
(3) If the person named in the notice of infraction wishes to
contest the notice of infraction, the person shall respond by filing an
answer of protest with the department specifying the grounds of
protest.
(4) If any person issued a notice of infraction (a) fails to
respond to the notice of infraction as provided in subsection (2) of
this section; or (b) fails to appear at a hearing requested under
subsection (3) of this section; then the administrative law judge shall
enter an appropriate order assessing the monetary penalty prescribed
for the infraction and shall notify the department of the failure to
respond to the notice of infraction or to appear at a requested
hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 It is a misdemeanor for any person who has
been personally served with a notice of infraction:
(1) To refuse to sign a written promise to respond to the notice;
or
(2) To willfully violate the written promise to respond to a notice
of infraction as provided in this chapter, regardless of the ultimate
disposition of the infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A person subject to proceedings under this
chapter may appear or be represented by counsel. The department shall
be represented by the attorney general in any proceeding under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 (1) The administrative law judge shall
conduct notice of infraction cases under this chapter pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The burden of proof is on the department to establish the
commission of the infraction by a preponderance of the evidence. The
notice of infraction shall be dismissed if the defendant establishes
that, at the time the notice was issued:
(a) The defendant who was issued a notice of infraction authorized
by section 2(3)(a) of this act had a certificate or permit issued by
the department in accordance with this chapter, was supervised by a
person who has such a certificate or permit, or was exempt from this
chapter under section 14 of this act; or
(b) For the defendant who was issued a notice of infraction
authorized by section 2(3) (b) or (c) of this act, the person employed
or supervised by the defendant has a certificate or permit issued by
the department in accordance with this chapter, was supervised by a
person who had such a certificate or permit, or was exempt from this
chapter under section 14 of this act.
(3) After consideration of the evidence and argument, the
administrative law judge shall determine whether the infraction was
committed. If it has not been established that the infraction was
committed, an order dismissing the notice shall be entered in the
record of the proceedings. If it has been established that the
infraction was committed, the administrative law judge shall issue
findings of fact and conclusions of law in its decision and order
determining whether the infraction was committed.
(4) An appeal from the administrative law judge's determination or
order shall be to the superior court. The decision of the superior
court is subject only to discretionary review pursuant to Rule 2.3 of
the Rules of Appellate Procedure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 (1) A person found to have committed an
infraction under section 2 of this act shall be assessed a monetary
penalty of two hundred fifty dollars for the first infraction, and not
more than one thousand dollars for a second or subsequent infraction.
The department shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for
infractions imposed under this chapter.
(2) The administrative law judge may waive, reduce, or suspend the
monetary penalty imposed for the infraction for good cause shown.
(3) Monetary penalties collected under this chapter shall be
deposited in the sprinkler fitting certificate fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 The director shall suspend the certificate
or permit of any person who has been certified by a lending agency and
reported to the director for nonpayment or default on a federally or
state-guaranteed educational loan or service-conditional scholarship.
Prior to the suspension, the agency must provide the person an
opportunity for a brief adjudicative proceeding under RCW 34.05.485
through 34.05.494 and issue a finding of nonpayment or default on a
federally or state-guaranteed educational loan or service-conditional
scholarship. The person's certificate or permit shall not be reissued
until the person provides the director a written release issued by the
lending agency stating that the person is making payments on the loan
in accordance with a repayment agreement approved by the lending
agency. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for
certification or permits during the suspension, reinstatement shall be
automatic upon receipt of the notice and payment of any reinstatement
fee the director may impose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 The department shall immediately suspend
any certificate of competency issued under this chapter if the holder
of the certificate has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the
department of social and health services as a person who is not in
compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet
all other requirements for certification during the suspension,
reissuance of the certificate of competency shall be automatic upon the
department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social
and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the
order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 Sections 1 through 28 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---