BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.104.015 and 1999 c 202 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "High-capacity transportation system" means a system of public
transportation services within an urbanized region operating
principally on exclusive rights of way, and the supporting services and
facilities necessary to implement such a system, including interim
express services and high occupancy vehicle lanes, which taken as a
whole, provides a substantially higher level of passenger capacity,
speed, and service frequency than traditional public transportation
systems operating principally in general purpose roadways. "High-capacity transportation system" also includes magnetic levitation and
personal rapid transit systems.
(2) "Rail fixed guideway system" means a light, heavy, or rapid
rail system, monorail, inclined plane, funicular, trolley, or other
fixed rail guideway component of a high-capacity transportation system
that is not regulated by the Federal Railroad Administration, or its
successor. "Rail fixed guideway system" does not mean elevators,
moving sidewalks or stairs, and vehicles suspended from aerial cables,
unless they are an integral component of a station served by a rail
fixed guideway system.
(3) "Regional transit system" means a high-capacity transportation
system under the jurisdiction of one or more transit agencies except
where a regional transit authority created under chapter 81.112 RCW
exists, in which case "regional transit system" means the high-capacity
transportation system under the jurisdiction of a regional transit
authority.
(4) "Transit agency" means city-owned transit systems, county
transportation authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, and
public transportation benefit areas.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.104.180 and 1992 c 101 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation
authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation
benefit areas, magnetic levitation technology and personal rapid
transit systems, and regional transit authorities are authorized to
pledge revenues from the employer tax authorized by RCW 81.104.150, the
special motor vehicle excise tax authorized by RCW 81.104.160, and the
sales and use tax authorized by RCW 81.104.170, to retire bonds issued
solely for the purpose of providing high capacity transportation
service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 81.104 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to design and implement
magnetic levitation technology transportation systems to move persons
and freight faster and more efficiently than the current transportation
systems. The need for reducing congestion and moving freight faster to
markets and shipping terminals along with new technology has made
available new innovated transportation systems. The design and
implementation of a new system will increase jobs, reduce congestion,
and improve the economy in the state of Washington. The legislature
authorizes the implementation of pilot projects for magnetic levitation
technology and personal rapid transportation systems.
There will be eight legislative members, two from each legislative
caucus, selected to approve and work with counties in the
implementation of pilot projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 81.104 RCW
to read as follows:
Counties authorized to implement magnetic levitation technology
transportation systems are hereby granted dedicated funding sources for
these systems as set forth in RCW 81.104.150, 81.104.160, and
81.104.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 81.104 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes the benefits of public-private
partnerships and authorizes counties implementing magnetic levitation
technology transportation systems to utilize public-private
partnerships.
(2) Counties implementing magnetic levitation technology
transportation system pilot projects are exempt from the population
requirements in RCW 81.104.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---