BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the need to
provide enhanced mobility within existing transportation corridors.
For highways, this can be achieved with new and innovative programs
that dynamically manage highway capacity through variable pricing. The
legislature intends to create a program allowing construction of new
highway toll lanes, or conversion of existing high-occupancy vehicle
lanes when the adjacent lane will also be operated as a highway toll
lane. Any revenues net of facility operations and maintenance derived
from toll charges should be reinvested within the same corridor to
increase transit and carpool service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 "High-occupancy toll lanes" means one or
more lanes of a highway that charge tolls as a means of regulating
access to, or the use of the facility, to maintain travel speed and
reliability. Supporting facilities include, but are not limited to,
approaches, enforcement areas, improvements, buildings, and equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department may provide for the
establishment, construction, and operation of new high-occupancy toll
lanes. The department has the same powers related to high-occupancy
toll lane facilities as it has for other transportation facilities
under chapters 47.01 and 47.28 RCW.
The department may convert existing high-occupancy vehicle lanes
into toll lanes only when an adjacent lane will also be operated as a
high-occupancy toll lane.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department shall establish a desirable
miles-per-hour operating standard for all lanes of the highway
facility. In no event may the operating speed for transit buses,
carpools, or single-occupant vehicles in a high-occupancy toll lane be
permitted to drop below forty-five miles per hour during less than
ninety percent of peak period. The toll charge for single-occupant
vehicle users of high-occupancy toll lanes must vary by level of
congestion within the highway facility to ensure that the miles per
hour operating standard in any high-occupancy vehicle lane, or in any
high-occupancy vehicle lane converted to high-occupancy toll lane
operations, is not degraded.
Tolls for high-occupancy toll lanes must be automatically adjusted
dynamically to ensure that this standard is met. The toll charge may
vary in amount by time of day, level of traffic congestion within the
highway facility, vehicle occupancy, or other criteria as deemed
appropriate by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department shall report annually to the
transportation commission and the legislature on the policies,
operations, and effectiveness of high-occupancy toll lanes. The report
must analyze and address the impacts on freeway efficiency,
effectiveness for transit, ability to finance transportation services
or improvements through tolls, and the impacts on all highway users.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Revenues generated from toll charges on
high-occupancy toll lanes may be used only for transportation services
within, or directly connecting to, that transportation corridor that
maximizes movement of people. All revenues derived from toll charges
must be deposited into a special account within the multimodal
transportation fund and used only for purposes authorized in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 47.56 RCW.

--- END ---