BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.04.010 and 2000 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated
oxide of ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the
fermentation or distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or
other substances including all dilutions and mixtures of this
substance. The term "alcohol" does not include alcohol in the
possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described
in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel
for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements
of husbandry.
(2) "Authorized representative" means a person who:
(a) Is required to have a federal basic permit issued pursuant to
the federal alcohol administration act, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 204;
(b) Has its business located in the United States outside of the
state of Washington;
(c) Acquires ownership of beer or wine for transportation into and
resale in the state of Washington; and which beer or wine is produced
anywhere outside Washington by a brewery or winery which does not hold
a certificate of approval issued by the board; and
(d) Is appointed by the brewery or winery referenced in (c) of this
subsection as its exclusive authorized representative for marketing and
selling its products within the United States in accordance with a
written agreement between the authorized representative and such
brewery or winery pursuant to this title.
(3) "Beer" means any malt beverage or malt liquor as these terms
are defined in this chapter.
(((3))) (4) "Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a
brewer or brewery located either within or beyond the boundaries of the
state, beer importers, or foreign produced beer from a source outside
the state of Washington, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant
to this title, or who represents such brewer or brewery as agent.
(((4))) (5) "Beer importer" means a person or business within
Washington who purchases beer from a United States brewery holding a
certificate of approval (B5) or foreign produced beer from a source
outside the state of Washington for the purpose of selling the same
pursuant to this title.
(((5))) (6) "Brewer" or "brewery" means any person engaged in the
business of manufacturing beer and malt liquor. Brewer includes a
brand owner of malt beverages who holds a brewer's notice with the
federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location outside
the state and whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed
in-state brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a
domestic brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to
licensed beer distributors, and exporting beer from the state.
(((6))) (7) "Board" means the liquor control board, constituted
under this title.
(((7))) (8) "Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated
or unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent,
educational, athletic or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.
(((8))) (9) "Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use,
whether by drinking or otherwise.
(((9))) (10) "Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and
regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within
the state pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.
(((10))) (11) "Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of
distilling spirits.
(((11))) (12) "Domestic brewery" means a place where beer and malt
liquor are manufactured or produced by a brewer within the state.
(((12))) (13) "Domestic winery" means a place where wines are
manufactured or produced within the state of Washington.
(((13))) (14) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid
certificate and is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly
engaged in carrying on the business of pharmaceutical chemistry
pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW.
(((14))) (15) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business
is, the sale of drugs, medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and
maintains a regular prescription department and employs a registered
pharmacist during all hours the drug store is open.
(((15))) (16) "Employee" means any person employed by the board,
including a vendor, as hereinafter in this section defined.
(((16))) (17) "Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'
(((17))) (18) "Hotel" means every building or other structure kept,
used, maintained, advertised or held out to the public to be a place
where food is served and sleeping accommodations are offered for pay to
transient guests, in which twenty or more rooms are used for the
sleeping accommodation of such transient guests and having one or more
dining rooms where meals are served to such transient guests, such
sleeping accommodations and dining rooms being conducted in the same
building and buildings, in connection therewith, and such structure or
structures being provided, in the judgment of the board, with adequate
and sanitary kitchen and dining room equipment and capacity, for
preparing, cooking and serving suitable food for its guests: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That in cities and towns of less than five thousand
population, the board shall have authority to waive the provisions
requiring twenty or more rooms.
(((18))) (19) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits
from a distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such
spirituous liquor into the state for sale to the board or for export.
(((19))) (20) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.
(((20))) (21) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein
defined (alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented,
spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed
liquor, a part of which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt
liquor, or otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or
semisolid or other substance, patented or not, containing alcohol,
spirits, wine or beer, and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all
preparations or mixtures capable of human consumption, and any liquid,
semisolid, solid, or other substance, which contains more than one
percent of alcohol by weight shall be conclusively deemed to be
intoxicating. Liquor does not include confections or food products
that contain one percent or less of alcohol by weight.
(((21))) (22) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the
preparation of liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.
(((22))) (23) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage
such as beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the
alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or
pure extract of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or
cereal in pure water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol
by weight, and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by
volume. For the purposes of this title, any such beverage containing
more than eight percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as
"strong beer."
(((23))) (24) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for
holding liquor.
(((24))) (25) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor
under this title.
(((25))) (26) "Person" means an individual, copartnership,
association, or corporation.
(((26))) (27) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and
regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within
the state pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.
(((27))) (28) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a
physician and given by him to a patient for the obtaining of liquor
pursuant to this title for medicinal purposes.
(((28))) (29) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of
incorporated cities and towns; state or county or township highways or
roads; buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance
halls and grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where
beer may be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public
buildings, public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of
hotels, restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations
which are open to and are generally used by the public and to which the
public is permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains,
stages, and other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and
the depots and waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are
open to unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned
bathing beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of
like or similar nature to which the general public has unrestricted
right of access, and which are generally used by the public.
(((29))) (30) "Regulations" means regulations made by the board
under the powers conferred by this title.
(((30))) (31) "Restaurant" means any establishment provided with
special space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment,
food, without lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not
including drug stores and soda fountains.
(((31))) (32) "Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and
traffic; and also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by
any means whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as
beer or by any name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed
liquor or of wine, by any person to any person; and also include a sale
or selling within the state to a foreign consignee or his agent in the
state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no charge,
of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the board
to a person not licensed by the board, for personal use only. "Sale"
and "sell" also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW
9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That the nonprofit organization conducting the
raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the board.
(((32))) (33) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped
with apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed
or otherwise.
(((33))) (34) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol
obtained by distillation, including wines exceeding twenty-four percent
of alcohol by volume.
(((34))) (35) "Store" means a state liquor store established under
this title.
(((35))) (36) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space
and accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the
premises, of beer, as herein defined.
(((36))) (37) "Vendor" means a person employed by the board as a
store manager under this title.
(((37))) (38) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for
the manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.
(((38))) (39) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by
fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other
agricultural product containing sugar, to which any saccharine
substances may have been added before, during or after fermentation,
and containing not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume,
including sweet wines fortified with wine spirits, such as port,
sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four percent of
alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol
by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more
than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by
the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage
containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume
when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as
"fortified wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (a)
Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years
or more; and (b) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol
by volume solely as a result of the natural fermentation process and
that have not been produced with the addition of wine spirits, brandy,
or alcohol.
This subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any wine
be labeled with the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."
(((39))) (40) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from
a vintner or winery located either within or beyond the boundaries of
the state for the purpose of selling the same not in violation of this
title, or who represents such vintner or winery as agent.
(((40))) (41) "Wine importer" means a person or business within
Washington who purchases wine from a United States winery holding a
certificate of approval (W7) or foreign produced wine from a source
outside the state of Washington for the purpose of selling the same
pursuant to this title.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.206 and 1997 c 321 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A United States winery or manufacturer of wine((,)) located
outside the state of Washington((,)) must hold a certificate of
approval (((W7))) to allow sales and shipment of the certificate of
approval holder's wine to licensed Washington wine distributors or
importers.
(b) Authorized representatives must hold a certificate of approval
to allow sales and shipment of United States produced wine to licensed
Washington wine distributors or importers.
(c) Authorized representatives must also hold a certificate of
approval to allow sales and shipments of foreign produced wine to
licensed Washington wine distributors or importers.
(2) The certificate of approval shall not be granted unless and
until such winery or manufacturer of wine or authorized representative
shall have made a written agreement with the board to furnish to the
board, on or before the twentieth day of each month, a report under
oath, on a form to be prescribed by the board, showing the quantity of
wine sold or delivered to each licensed wine distributor or importer,
during the preceding month, and shall further have agreed with the
board, that such wineries ((or)), manufacturers, or authorized
representatives, and all general sales corporations or agencies
maintained by them, and all of their trade representatives, shall and
will faithfully comply with all laws of the state of Washington
pertaining to the sale of intoxicating liquors and all rules and
regulations of the Washington state liquor control board. A violation
of the terms of this agreement will cause the board to take action to
suspend or revoke such certificate.
(3) The fee for the certificate of approval, issued pursuant to the
provisions of this title, shall be one hundred dollars per year, per
each privilege outlined in subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this
section, which sum shall accompany the application for such
certificate.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.24.270 and 2003 c 167 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person, firm or corporation, holding a license to
manufacture malt liquors or strong beer within the state of Washington,
shall, on or before the twentieth day of each month, furnish to the
Washington state liquor control board, on a form to be prescribed by
the board, a statement showing the quantity of malt liquors and strong
beer sold for resale during the preceding calendar month to each beer
distributor within the state of Washington.
(2)(a) A United States brewery or manufacturer of beer or strong
beer, located outside the state of Washington, must hold a certificate
of approval (((B5))) to allow sales and shipment of the certificate of
approval holder's beer or strong beer to licensed Washington beer
distributors or importers.
(b) Authorized representatives must hold a certificate of approval
to allow sales and shipment of United States produced beer or strong
beer to licensed Washington beer distributors or importers.
(c) Authorized representatives must also hold a certificate of
approval to allow sales and shipments of foreign produced beer or
strong beer to licensed Washington beer distributors or importers.
(3) The certificate of approval shall not be granted unless and
until such brewer or manufacturer of beer or strong beer or authorized
representative shall have made a written agreement with the board to
furnish to the board, on or before the twentieth day of each month, a
report under oath, on a form to be prescribed by the board, showing the
quantity of beer and strong beer sold or delivered to each licensed
beer distributor or importer during the preceding month, and shall
further have agreed with the board, that such brewer or manufacturer of
beer or strong beer or authorized representative and all general sales
corporations or agencies maintained by them, and all of their trade
representatives, corporations, and agencies, shall and will faithfully
comply with all laws of the state of Washington pertaining to the sale
of intoxicating liquors and all rules and regulations of the Washington
state liquor control board. A violation of the terms of this agreement
will cause the board to take action to suspend or revoke such
certificate.
(((3))) (4) The fee for the certificate of approval, issued
pursuant to the provisions of this title, shall be one hundred dollars
per year, per each privilege outlined in subsection (2)(a), (b), and
(c) of this section, which sum shall accompany the application for such
certificate.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.28.010 and 2002 c 109 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No manufacturer, importer, ((or)) distributor, or authorized
representative, or person financially interested, directly or
indirectly, in such business; whether resident or nonresident, shall
have any financial interest, direct or indirect, in any licensed retail
business, unless the retail business is owned by a corporation in which
a manufacturer or importer has no direct stock ownership and there are
no interlocking officers and directors, the retail license is held by
a corporation that is not owned directly or indirectly by a
manufacturer or importer, the sales of liquor are incidental to the
primary activity of operating the property as a hotel, alcoholic
beverages produced by the manufacturer or importer or their
subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed premises, and the board
reviews the ownership and proposed method of operation of all involved
entities and determines that there will not be an unacceptable level of
control or undue influence over the operation or the retail licensee;
nor shall any manufacturer, importer, ((or)) distributor, or authorized
representative own any of the property upon which such licensed persons
conduct their business; nor shall any such licensed person, under any
arrangement whatsoever, conduct his or her business upon property in
which any manufacturer, importer, ((or)) distributor, or authorized
representative has any interest unless title to that property is owned
by a corporation in which a manufacturer has no direct stock ownership
and there are no interlocking officers or directors, the retail license
is held by a corporation that is not owned directly or indirectly by
the manufacturer, the sales of liquor are incidental to the primary
activity of operating the property either as a hotel or as an
amphitheater offering live musical and similar live entertainment
activities to the public, alcoholic beverages produced by the
manufacturer or any of its subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed
premises, and the board reviews the ownership and proposed method of
operation of all involved entities and determines that there will not
be an unacceptable level of control or undue influence over the
operation of the retail licensee. Except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, no manufacturer, importer, ((or)) distributor, or
authorized representative shall advance moneys or moneys' worth to a
licensed person under an arrangement, nor shall such licensed person
receive, under an arrangement, an advance of moneys or moneys' worth.
"Person" as used in this section only shall not include those state or
federally chartered banks, state or federally chartered savings and
loan associations, state or federally chartered mutual savings banks,
or institutional investors which are not controlled directly or
indirectly by a manufacturer, importer, ((or)) distributor, or
authorized representative as long as the bank, savings and loan
association, or institutional investor does not influence or attempt to
influence the purchasing practices of the retailer with respect to
alcoholic beverages. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no
manufacturer, importer, ((or)) distributor, or authorized
representative shall be eligible to receive or hold a retail license
under this title, nor shall such manufacturer, importer, ((or))
distributor, or authorized representative sell at retail any liquor as
herein defined. A corporation granted an exemption under this
subsection may use debt instruments issued in connection with financing
construction or operations of its facilities.
(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed domestic
brewery or microbrewery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to
chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on
the brewery premises and nothing in this section shall prohibit a
domestic winery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to chapter
66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on the
winery premises. Such beer and wine so sold at retail shall be subject
to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210 and to reporting
and bonding requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted by the
board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, and beer and wine that is not
produced by the brewery or winery shall be purchased from a licensed
beer or wine distributor.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed distiller,
domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or a lessee of a
licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery, from being
licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant pursuant to chapter
66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling liquor at a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant premises on the property on which the primary
manufacturing facility of the licensed distiller, domestic brewer,
microbrewery, or domestic winery is located or on contiguous property
owned or leased by the licensed distiller, domestic brewer,
microbrewery, or domestic winery as prescribed by rules adopted by the
board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) Financial interest, direct or indirect, as used in this
section, shall include any interest, whether by stock ownership,
mortgage, lien, or through interlocking directors, or otherwise.
Pursuant to rules promulgated by the board in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW manufacturers, distributors, and importers may perform, and
retailers may accept the service of building, rotating and restocking
case displays and stock room inventories; rotating and rearranging can
and bottle displays of their own products; provide point of sale
material and brand signs; price case goods of their own brands; and
perform such similar normal business services as the board may by
regulation prescribe.
(3)(a) This section does not prohibit a manufacturer, importer, or
distributor from providing services to a special occasion licensee for:
(i) Installation of draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising,
(ii) advertising, pouring, or dispensing of beer or wine at a beer or
wine tasting exhibition or judging event, or (iii) a special occasion
licensee from receiving any such services as may be provided by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit a retail licensee, or any person financially interested,
directly or indirectly, in such a retail licensee from having a
financial interest, direct or indirect, in a business which provides,
for a compensation commensurate in value to the services provided,
bottling, canning or other services to a manufacturer, so long as the
retail licensee or person interested therein has no direct financial
interest in or control of said manufacturer.
(b) A person holding contractual rights to payment from selling a
liquor distributor's business and transferring the license shall not be
deemed to have a financial interest under this section if the person
(i) lacks any ownership in or control of the distributor, (ii) is not
employed by the distributor, and (iii) does not influence or attempt to
influence liquor purchases by retail liquor licensees from the
distributor.
(c) The board shall adopt such rules as are deemed necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of subsection (3)(a) of this
section in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW.
(4) A license issued under RCW 66.24.395 does not constitute a
retail license for the purposes of this section.
(5) A public house license issued under RCW 66.24.580 does not
violate the provisions of this section as to a retailer having an
interest directly or indirectly in a liquor-licensed manufacturer.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.28.030 and 1997 c 321 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every ((licensed brewer,)) domestic ((brewer)) brewery and
((microbrewer)) microbrewery, domestic winery, ((manufacturer holding
a)) certificate of approval holder, licensed wine importer, and
licensed beer importer shall be responsible for the conduct of any
licensed beer or wine distributor in selling, or contracting to sell,
to retail licensees, beer or wine manufactured by such ((brewer,))
domestic ((brewer and microbrewer)) brewery, microbrewery, domestic
winery, manufacturer holding a certificate of approval, sold by an
authorized representative holding a certificate of approval, or
imported by such beer or wine importer. Where the board finds that any
licensed beer or wine distributor has violated any of the provisions of
this title or of the regulations of the board in selling or contracting
to sell beer or wine to retail licensees, the board may, in addition to
any punishment inflicted or imposed upon such distributor, prohibit the
sale of the brand or brands of beer or wine involved in such violation
to any or all retail licensees within the trade territory usually
served by such distributor for such period of time as the board may
fix, irrespective of whether the brewer manufacturing such beer or the
beer importer importing such beer or the domestic winery manufacturing
such wine or the wine importer importing such wine or the certificate
of approval holder manufacturing such beer or wine or acting as
authorized representative actually participated in such violation.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.28.040 and 2000 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no domestic
brewery, microbrewery, distributor, distiller, domestic winery,
importer, rectifier, certificate of approval holder, or other
manufacturer of liquor shall, within the state, give to any person any
liquor; but nothing in this section nor in RCW 66.28.010 shall prevent
a domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, domestic winery,
distiller, certificate of approval holder, or importer from furnishing
samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to authorized licensees for
the purpose of negotiating a sale, in accordance with regulations
adopted by the liquor control board, provided that the samples are
subject to taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210, and in the
case of spirituous liquor, any product used for samples must be
purchased at retail from the board; nothing in this section shall
prevent the furnishing of samples of liquor to the board for the
purpose of negotiating the sale of liquor to the state liquor control
board; nothing in this section shall prevent a domestic brewery,
microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery, certificate of approval
holder, or distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor
for instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150 and 66.28.155; nothing
in this section shall prevent a domestic winery, certificate of
approval holder, or distributor from furnishing wine without charge,
subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit
group organized and operated solely for the purpose of enology or the
study of viticulture which has been in existence for at least six
months and that uses wine so furnished solely for such educational
purposes or a domestic winery, or an out-of-state certificate of
approval holder, from furnishing wine without charge or a domestic
brewery, or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from
furnishing beer without charge, subject to the taxes imposed by RCW
66.24.210 or 66.24.290, to a nonprofit charitable corporation or
association exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the
internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)) for use
consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling it to such exemption;
nothing in this section shall prevent a ((brewer)) domestic brewery or
microbrewery from serving beer without charge, on the brewery premises;
nothing in this section shall prevent donations of wine for the
purposes of RCW 66.12.180; and nothing in this section shall prevent a
domestic winery from serving wine without charge, on the winery
premises.

Sec. 7 RCW 66.28.042 and 1990 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A liquor manufacturer, importer, authorized representative holding
a certificate of approval, or ((wholesaler)) distributor may provide to
licensed retailers and their employees food and beverages for
consumption at a meeting at which the primary purpose is the discussion
of business, and may provide local ground transportation to and from
such meetings. The value of the food, beverage, or transportation
provided under this section shall not be considered the advancement of
moneys or moneys' worth within the meaning of RCW 66.28.010, nor shall
it be considered the giving away of liquor within the meaning of RCW
68.28.040. The board may adopt rules for the implementation of this
section.

Sec. 8 RCW 66.28.043 and 1990 c 125 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A liquor manufacturer, importer, authorized representative holding
a certificate of approval, or ((wholesaler)) distributor may provide to
licensed retailers and their employees tickets or admission fees for
athletic events or other forms of entertainment occurring within the
state of Washington, if the manufacturer, importer, ((wholesaler))
authorized representative holding a certificate of approval, or any of
their employees accompanies the licensed retailer or its employees to
the event. A liquor manufacturer, importer, authorized representative
holding a certificate of approval, or ((wholesaler)) distributor may
also provide to licensed retailers and their employees food and
beverages for consumption at such events, and local ground
transportation to and from activities allowed under this section. The
value of the food, beverage, transportation, or admission to events
provided under this section shall not be considered the advancement of
moneys or moneys' worth within the meaning of RCW 66.28.010, nor shall
it be considered the giving away of liquor within the meaning of RCW
68.28.040. The board may adopt rules for the implementation of this
section.

Sec. 9 RCW 66.28.150 and 1997 c 39 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery,
((wholesaler)) distributor, certificate of approval holder, or its
licensed agent may, without charge, instruct licensees and their
employees, or conduct courses of instruction for licensees and their
employees, on the subject of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor,
including but not limited to, the history, nature, values, and
characteristics of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor, the use of wine
lists, and the methods of presenting, serving, storing, and handling
beer, wine, or spirituous liquor. The domestic brewery, microbrewery,
domestic winery, distillery, ((wholesaler)) distributor, certificate of
approval holder, or its licensed agent may furnish beer, wine, or
spirituous liquor and such other equipment, materials, and utensils as
may be required for use in connection with the instruction or courses
of instruction. The instruction or courses of instruction may be given
at the premises of the domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery,
distillery, or ((wholesaler)) authorized representative holding a
certificate of approval, at the premises of a retail licensee, or
elsewhere.

Sec. 10 RCW 66.28.155 and 1997 c 39 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery,
((wholesaler)) distributor, authorized representative holding a
certificate of approval, or its licensed agent may conduct educational
activities or provide product information to the consumer on the
licensed premises of a retailer. Information on the subject of wine,
beer, or spirituous liquor, including but not limited to, the history,
nature, quality, and characteristics of a wine, beer, or spirituous
liquor, methods of harvest, production, storage, handling, and
distribution of a wine, beer, or spirituous liquor, and the general
development of the wine, beer, and spirituous liquor industry may be
provided by a domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery,
distillery, ((wholesaler)) distributor, authorized representative
holding a certificate of approval, or its licensed agent to the public
on the licensed premises of a retailer. The retailer requesting such
activity shall attempt to schedule a series of brewery, winery,
authorized representative, or distillery and ((wholesaler)) distributor
appearances in an effort to equitably represent the industries.
Nothing in this section permits a domestic brewery, microbrewery,
domestic winery, distillery, ((wholesaler)) distributor, authorized
representative holding a certificate of approval, or its licensed agent
to receive compensation or financial benefit from the educational
activities or product information presented on the licensed premises of
a retailer. The promotional value of such educational activities or
product information shall not be considered advancement of moneys or of
moneys' worth within the meaning of RCW 66.28.010.

Sec. 11 RCW 66.28.160 and 1985 c 352 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
No liquor manufacturer, importer, ((wholesaler)) distributor,
retailer, authorized representative holding a certificate of approval,
agent thereof, or campus representative of any of the foregoing, may
conduct promotional activities for any liquor product on the campus of
any college or university nor may any such entities engage in
activities that facilitate or promote the consumption of alcoholic
beverages by the students of the college or university at which the
activity takes place. This section does not prohibit the following:
(1) The sale of alcoholic beverages, by retail licensees on their
licensed premises, to persons of legal age and condition to consume
alcoholic beverages;
(2) Sponsorship of broadcasting services for events on a college or
university campus;
(3) Liquor advertising in campus publications; or
(4) Financial assistance to an activity and acknowledgment of the
source of the assistance, if the assistance, activity, and
acknowledgment are each approved by the college or university
administration.

Sec. 12 RCW 66.28.170 and 1997 c 321 s 50 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is unlawful for a manufacturer or authorized representative of
wine or malt beverages holding a certificate of approval issued under
RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a brewery license, or a domestic winery
license to discriminate in price in selling to any purchaser for resale
in the state.

Sec. 13 RCW 66.28.180 and 1997 c 321 s 51 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is unlawful for a person, firm, or corporation holding a
certificate of approval issued under RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a beer
distributor's license, a domestic ((brewer's)) brewery license, a
((microbrewer's)) microbrewery license, a beer importer's license, a
beer distributor's license, a domestic winery license, a wine
importer's license, or a wine distributor's license within the state of
Washington to modify any prices without prior notification to and
approval of the board.
(1) Intent. This section is enacted, pursuant to the authority of
this state under the twenty-first amendment to the United States
Constitution, to promote the public's interest in fostering the orderly
and responsible distribution of malt beverages and wine towards
effective control of consumption; to promote the fair and efficient
three-tier system of distribution of such beverages; and to confirm
existing board rules as the clear expression of state policy to
regulate the manner of selling and pricing of wine and malt beverages
by licensed suppliers and distributors.
(2) Beer and wine distributor price posting.
(a) Every beer or wine distributor shall file with the board at its
office in Olympia a price posting showing the wholesale prices at which
any and all brands of beer and wine sold by such beer and/or wine
distributor shall be sold to retailers within the state.
(b) Each price posting shall be made on a form prepared and
furnished by the board, or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and shall
set forth:
(i) All brands, types, packages, and containers of beer offered for
sale by such beer and/or wine distributor;
(ii) The wholesale prices thereof to retail licensees, including
allowances, if any, for returned empty containers.
(c) No beer and/or wine distributor may sell or offer to sell any
package or container of beer or wine to any retail licensee at a price
differing from the price for such package or container as shown in the
price posting filed by the beer and/or wine distributor and then in
effect, according to rules adopted by the board.
(d) Quantity discounts are prohibited. No price may be posted that
is below acquisition cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost.
However, the board is empowered to review periodically, as it may deem
appropriate, the amount of the percentage of acquisition cost as a
minimum mark-up over cost and to modify such percentage by rule of the
board, except such percentage shall be not less than ten percent.
(e) Distributor prices on a "close-out" item shall be accepted by
the board if the item to be discontinued has been listed on the state
market for a period of at least six months, and upon the further
condition that the distributor who posts such a close-out price shall
not restock the item for a period of one year following the first
effective date of such close-out price.
(f) The board may reject any price posting that it deems to be in
violation of this section or any rule, or portion thereof, or that
would tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer and
wine. Whenever the board rejects any posting, the licensee submitting
the posting may be heard by the board and shall have the burden of
showing that the posting is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer
and wine. If the posting is accepted, it shall become effective at the
time fixed by the board. If the posting is rejected, the last
effective posting shall remain in effect until such time as an amended
posting is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(g) All price postings filed as required by this section shall at
all times be open to inspection to all trade buyers within the state of
Washington and shall not in any sense be considered confidential.
(h) Any beer and/or wine distributor or employee authorized by the
distributor-employer may sell beer and/or wine at the distributor's
posted prices to any annual or special occasion retail licensee upon
presentation to the distributor or employee at the time of purchase of
a special permit issued by the board to such licensee.
(i) Every annual or special occasion retail licensee, upon
purchasing any beer and/or wine from a distributor, shall immediately
cause such beer or wine to be delivered to the licensed premises, and
the licensee shall not thereafter permit such beer to be disposed of in
any manner except as authorized by the license.
(ii) Beer and wine sold as provided in this section shall be
delivered by the distributor or an authorized employee either to the
retailer's licensed premises or directly to the retailer at the
distributor's licensed premises. A distributor's prices to retail
licensees shall be the same at both such places of delivery.
(3) Beer and wine suppliers' price filings, contracts, and
memoranda.
(a) Every domestic brewery, microbrewery, and domestic winery
offering beer and/or wine for sale within the state shall file with the
board at its office in Olympia a copy of every written contract and a
memorandum of every oral agreement which such brewery or winery may
have with any beer or wine distributor, which contracts or memoranda
shall contain a schedule of prices charged to distributors for all
items and all terms of sale, including all regular and special
discounts; all advertising, sales and trade allowances, and incentive
programs; and all commissions, bonuses or gifts, and any and all other
discounts or allowances. Whenever changed or modified, such revised
contracts or memoranda shall forthwith be filed with the board as
provided for by rule. The provisions of this section also apply to
certificate of approval holders, beer and/or wine importers, and beer
and/or wine distributors who sell to other beer and/or wine
distributors.
Each price schedule shall be made on a form prepared and furnished
by the board, or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and shall set forth
all brands, types, packages, and containers of beer or wine offered for
sale by such licensed brewery or winery; all additional information
required may be filed as a supplement to the price schedule forms.
(b) Prices filed by a domestic brewery ((or)), microbrewery,
domestic winery, or certificate of approval holder shall be uniform
prices to all distributors on a statewide basis less bona fide
allowances for freight differentials. Quantity discounts are
prohibited. No price shall be filed that is below
acquisition/production cost plus ten percent of that cost, except that
acquisition cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost does not apply to
sales of beer or wine between a beer or wine importer who sells beer or
wine to another beer or wine importer or to a beer or wine distributor,
or to a beer or wine distributor who sells beer or wine to another beer
or wine distributor. However, the board is empowered to review
periodically, as it may deem appropriate, the amount of the percentage
of acquisition/production cost as a minimum mark-up over cost and to
modify such percentage by rule of the board, except such percentage
shall be not less than ten percent.
(c) No domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, certificate
of approval holder, beer or wine importer, or beer or wine distributor
may sell or offer to sell any beer or wine to any persons whatsoever in
this state until copies of such written contracts or memoranda of such
oral agreements are on file with the board.
(d) No domestic brewery ((or)), microbrewery, domestic winery, or
certificate of approval holder may sell or offer to sell any package or
container of beer or wine to any distributor at a price differing from
the price for such package or container as shown in the schedule of
prices filed by the domestic brewery ((or)), microbrewery, domestic
winery, or certificate of approval holder and then in effect, according
to rules adopted by the board.
(e) The board may reject any supplier's price filing, contract, or
memorandum of oral agreement, or portion thereof that it deems to be in
violation of this section or any rule or that would tend to disrupt the
orderly sale and distribution of beer or wine. Whenever the board
rejects any such price filing, contract, or memorandum, the licensee
submitting the price filing, contract, or memorandum may be heard by
the board and shall have the burden of showing that the price filing,
contract, or memorandum is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer
or wine. If the price filing, contract, or memorandum is accepted, it
shall become effective at a time fixed by the board. If the price
filing, contract, or memorandum, or portion thereof, is rejected, the
last effective price filing, contract, or memorandum shall remain in
effect until such time as an amended price filing, contract, or
memorandum is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(f) All prices, contracts, and memoranda filed as required by this
section shall at all times be open to inspection to all trade buyers
within the state of Washington and shall not in any sense be considered
confidential.

Sec. 14 RCW 19.126.020 and 2003 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agreement of distributorship" means any contract, agreement,
commercial relationship, license, association, or any other
arrangement, for a definite or indefinite period, between a supplier
and distributor.
(2) "Distributor" means any person, including but not limited to a
component of a supplier's distribution system constituted as an
independent business, importing or causing to be imported into this
state, or purchasing or causing to be purchased within this state, any
malt beverage for sale or resale to retailers licensed under the laws
of this state, regardless of whether the business of such person is
conducted under the terms of any agreement with a malt beverage
manufacturer.
(3) "Supplier" means any malt beverage manufacturer or importer who
enters into or is a party to any agreement of distributorship with a
wholesale distributor. "Supplier" does not include: (a) Any domestic
((brewer)) brewery or ((microbrewer)) microbrewery licensed under RCW
66.24.240 and producing less than fifty thousand barrels of malt liquor
annually; ((or)) (b) any brewer or manufacturer of malt liquor
producing less than fifty thousand barrels of malt liquor annually and
holding a certificate of approval issued under RCW 66.24.270; or (c)
any authorized representative of malt liquor manufacturers who holds an
appointment from one or more malt liquor manufacturers which, in the
aggregate, produce less than fifty thousand barrels of malt liquor.
(4) "Malt beverage manufacturer" means every brewer, fermenter,
processor, bottler, or packager of malt beverages located within or
outside this state, or any other person, whether located within or
outside this state, who enters into an agreement of distributorship for
the resale of malt beverages in this state with any wholesale
distributor doing business in the state of Washington.
(5) "Importer" means any distributor importing beer into this state
for sale to retailer accounts or for sale to other ((wholesalers))
distributors designated as "subjobbers" for resale.
(6) "Authorized representative" has the same meaning as "authorized
representative" as defined in RCW 66.04.010.
(7) "Person" means any natural person, corporation, partnership,
trust, agency, or other entity, as well as any individual officers,
directors, or other persons in active control of the activities of such
entity.

--- END ---