BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"NASCAR license plate" means license plates issued under section 2
of this act that display a NASCAR symbol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall issue a special NASCAR license plate
displaying a symbol approved by the department. The NASCAR license
plate may be used in lieu of regular or personalized license plates for
motor vehicles required to display two motor vehicle license plates or
for motorcycles, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW,
upon the terms and conditions established by the department.
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 46.16.230, the NASCAR license
plate must be flat and digitally printed. The digitally printed
license plates may include bar codes to facilitate distribution and
inventory control.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee for each type of special
license plates issued under RCW 46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as
existing before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in
an amount calculated to offset the cost of production of the special
license plates and the administration of this program. ((Until
December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed thirty-five dollars, but
effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1,
1998, the department may adjust the fee to no more than forty
dollars.)) This fee is in addition to all other fees required to
register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been
requested. All such additional special license plate fees collected by
the department shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to
the motor vehicle fund.
(2) ((Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application, registration, and renewal
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license
plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder
of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(((4) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(((5))) (4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(((6) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
NASCAR license plate shall pay an initial fee of fifty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each
fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the
proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the department determines
that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the
NASCAR special license plate. Upon the determination by the department
that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the
proceeds to the NASCAR account established under section 4 of this act.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a NASCAR license
plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of fifty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the
proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the department determines
that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the
NASCAR special license plate. Upon the determination by the department
that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit fifteen
dollars of the proceeds from each original and renewal to the NASCAR
account established under section 4 of this act. All remaining
proceeds will be deposited to the motor vehicle account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The NASCAR account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. Upon the department's determination that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the NASCAR special license
plate, all receipts, except as provided in RCW 46.16.313 (6) and (7),
from NASCAR license plates must be deposited into the account. Only
the director of the department of licensing or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.
(2) Funds in the account must be disbursed subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Under the requirements of RCW 46.16.765, the department must
contract with a qualified nonprofit organization to provide assistance
to injured NASCAR drivers injured during a NASCAR sponsored race or to
the survivors of a NASCAR driver killed during a NASCAR sponsored race.
(b) For the purposes of this section, a "qualified nonprofit
organization" means a not-for-profit corporation incorporated and
operating exclusively in Washington that has received a determination
of tax exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code. The organization must have been established for the
express purposes of providing assistance to injured NASCAR drivers or
the survivors of a NASCAR driver killed in a NASCAR sponsored race.
The qualified nonprofit organization will elect a board and establish
the criteria for application and disbursement of funds from the NASCAR
account.
(c) The qualified nonprofit organization must meet all requirements
of RCW 46.16.765.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.290 and 1997 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In any case of a valid sale or transfer of the ownership of any
vehicle, the right to the certificates properly transferable therewith,
except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, and to the vehicle license plates,
except as provided in RCW 46.16.316, passes to the purchaser or
transferee. It is unlawful for the holder of such certificates, except
as provided in RCW 46.16.280, or vehicle license plates, except as
provided in RCW 46.16.316, to fail, neglect, or refuse to endorse the
certificates and deliver the vehicle license plates to the purchaser or
transferee. If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed by the
state or any county, city, town, school district, or other political
subdivision entitled to exemption as provided by law, or, if the
vehicle is licensed with personalized plates, amateur radio operator
plates, medal of honor plates, disabled person plates, disabled veteran
plates, prisoner of war plates, or other special license plates issued
under RCW 46.16.301 or 46.16.313 as now existing or as it existed
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, the vehicle
license plates therefor ((shall)) may be transferred as provided in RCW
46.16.316, in which case they may be retained and ((may be)) displayed
upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of the vehicle so sold or
transferred.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.16.316 and 1997 c 291 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.16.305:
(1) When a person who has been issued a special license plate or
plates under section 2 of this act or RCW 46.16.301 as now existing or
as it existed before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997,
sells, trades, or otherwise transfers or releases ownership of the
vehicle upon which the special license plate or plates have been
displayed, he or she shall immediately report the transfer of such
plate or plates to an acquired vehicle or vehicle eligible for such
plates pursuant to departmental rule, or he or she shall surrender such
plates to the department immediately if such surrender is required by
departmental rule. If a person applies for a transfer of the plate or
plates to another eligible vehicle, a transfer fee of five dollars
shall be charged in addition to all other applicable fees. Such
transfer fees shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Failure to
surrender the plates when required is a traffic infraction.
(2) If the special license plate or plates issued by the department
become lost, defaced, damaged, or destroyed, application for a
replacement special license plate or plates shall be made and fees paid
as provided by law for the replacement of regular license plates.

--- END ---