BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the recent
occurrence of bovine spongiform encephalopathy and the resulting bans
on beef imports from the United States have had a severe economic
impact on the state's beef processing industry. The legislature
intends to provide temporary business and occupation tax relief for
Washington's beef processors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
a portion of the following amounts received for:
(a) Slaughtering cattle, but only if the taxpayer sells the
resulting slaughtered cattle at wholesale and not at retail;
(b) Breaking or processing perishable beef products, but only if
the perishable beef products are derived from cattle slaughtered by the
taxpayer and sold at wholesale only and not at retail;
(c) Wholesale sales of perishable beef products derived from cattle
slaughtered by the taxpayer;
(d) Processing nonperishable beef products, but only if the
products are derived from cattle slaughtered by the taxpayer and sold
at wholesale only and not at retail; and
(e) Wholesale sales of nonperishable beef products derived from
cattle slaughtered by the taxpayer.
(2) The portion of the amounts under subsection (1) of this section
that are deductible is calculated by multiplying those amounts by a
fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the taxable proceeds
received by the taxpayer from the sale of beef products subject to tax
under RCW 82.04.260(4) that were exported from the United States during
the period December 1, 2002, through November 30, 2003. The
denominator of the fraction is the total taxable proceeds received by
the taxpayer from the sale of beef products subject to tax under RCW
82.04.260(4) during the same period.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "beef products" means the
carcass, parts of carcass, meat, and meat by-products, derived
exclusively from cattle and containing no other ingredients.
(4) The deduction allowed under this section is allowed only for
tax liability incurred after the effective date of this section and
until the first day of the month following the date on which the bans
on the importation of beef and beef products from the United States of
America by Japan, Mexico, and the Republic of South Korea have all been
lifted.
(5) The department must provide notice, on the department's web
site, of the date on which this deduction is no longer available. The
notice required by this section does not affect the availability of the
deduction under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---