BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are
currently millions of dollars in the health professions account that
could be used to improve the quality of health care offered by health
professionals, recruit and retain the most qualified health
professionals, and protect the public from health professionals that
pose a risk to the safety of patients in Washington state. These
funds, however, are not accessible to the health care practitioners who
paid this money to the account and they serve nobody when they remain
unused in an account. These funds must be used to provide the maximum
benefit to the professions that paid the fees and to protect the health
and safety of the patients that are served by these professions.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.320 and 1993 c 492 s 411 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created in the state treasury an account to be known
as the health professions account. All fees received by the department
for health professions licenses, registration, certifications,
renewals, or examinations and the civil penalties assessed and
collected by the department under RCW 18.130.190 shall be forwarded to
the state treasurer who shall credit such moneys to the health
professions account.
(2) All expenses incurred in carrying out the health professions
licensing activities of the department shall be paid from the account
as authorized by legislative appropriation. Any residue in the account
shall be accumulated and shall not revert to the general fund at the
end of the biennium.
(3) The secretary shall biennially prepare a budget request based
on the anticipated costs of administering the health professions
licensing activities of the department which shall include the
estimated income from health professions fees.
(4) The board or commission of any individual health profession
listed in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b), in consultation with the secretary, may
spend resources that exceed the cost of administering and maintaining
that profession's program. The secretary is responsible for
determining whether an individual profession meets this requirement.
Funds may be spent to support activities that promote efforts affecting
the profession and the patients that they serve including, expediting
the processing and investigation of complaints of unprofessional
conduct, hiring additional staff to investigate and adjudicate
complaints of unprofessional conduct, assuring compliance with orders
of the board or commission as necessary to protect the public,
upgrading systems and resources to accelerate the disciplinary process,
and recruiting and retaining quality health care providers. As part of
the department's biennial budget request, the secretary shall request
an appropriation for the purposes of implementing this subsection.

--- END ---