BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governing documents may not prohibit the outdoor display of
the flag of the United States by an owner or resident on the owner's or
resident's property if the flag is displayed in a manner consistent
with federal flag display law, 4 U.S.C. Sec. 1 et seq. The governing
documents may include reasonable rules and regulations, consistent with
4 U.S.C. Sec. 1 et seq., regarding the placement and manner of display
of the flag of the United States.
(2) The governing documents may not prohibit the installation of a
flagpole for the display of the flag of the United States. The
governing documents may include reasonable rules and regulations
regarding the location and the size of the flagpole.
(3) For purposes of this section, "flag of the United States" means
the flag of the United States as defined in federal flag display law,
4 U.S.C. Sec. 1 et seq., that is made of fabric, cloth, or paper and
that is displayed from a staff or flagpole or in a window. For
purposes of this section, "flag of the United States" does not mean a
flag depiction or emblem made of lights, paint, roofing, siding, paving
materials, flora, or balloons, or of any similar building, landscaping,
or decorative component.
(4) The provisions of this section shall be construed to apply
retroactively to any governing documents in effect on the effective
date of this section. Any provision in a governing document in effect
on the effective date of this section that is inconsistent with this
section shall be void and unenforceable.

--- END ---