BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.830 and 2003 c 105 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840, and
sections 2 and 5 of this act.
(1) "Applicant" means:
(a) Any prospective employee who will or may have unsupervised
access to children under sixteen years of age or developmentally
disabled persons or vulnerable adults during the course of his or her
employment or involvement with the business or organization;
(b) Any prospective volunteer who will have regularly scheduled
unsupervised access to children under sixteen years of age,
developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults during the
course of his or her employment or involvement with the business or
organization ((under circumstances where such access will or may
involve groups of (i) five or fewer children under twelve years of age,
(ii) three or fewer children between twelve and sixteen years of age,
(iii) developmentally disabled persons, or (iv) vulnerable adults));
(c) Any prospective adoptive parent, as defined in RCW 26.33.020;
or
(d) Any prospective custodian in a nonparental custody proceeding
under chapter 26.10 RCW.
(2) "Business or organization" means a business or organization
licensed in this state, any nonprofit entity, any agency of the state,
or other governmental entity, that educates, trains, treats,
supervises, houses, or provides recreation to developmentally disabled
persons, vulnerable adults, or children under sixteen years of age,
including but not limited to public housing authorities, school
districts, and educational service districts.
(3) "Civil adjudication" means a specific court finding of sexual
abuse or exploitation or physical abuse in a dependency action under
RCW 13.34.040 or in a domestic relations action under Title 26 RCW. In
the case of vulnerable adults, civil adjudication means a specific
court finding of abuse or financial exploitation in a protection
proceeding under chapter 74.34 RCW. It does not include administrative
proceedings. The term "civil adjudication" is further limited to court
findings that identify as the perpetrator of the abuse a named
individual, over the age of eighteen years, who was a party to the
dependency or dissolution proceeding or was a respondent in a
protection proceeding in which the finding was made and who contested
the allegation of abuse or exploitation.
(4) "Conviction record" means "conviction record" information as
defined in RCW 10.97.030(3) relating to a crime against children or
other persons committed by either an adult or a juvenile. It does not
include a conviction for an offense that has been the subject of an
expungement, pardon, annulment, certificate of rehabilitation, or other
equivalent procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the
person convicted, or a conviction that has been the subject of a
pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of
innocence. It does include convictions for offenses for which the
defendant received a deferred or suspended sentence, unless the record
has been expunged according to law.
(5) "Crime against children or other persons" means a conviction of
any of the following offenses: Aggravated murder; first or second
degree murder; first or second degree kidnaping; first, second, or
third degree assault; first, second, or third degree assault of a
child; first, second, or third degree rape; first, second, or third
degree rape of a child; first or second degree robbery; first degree
arson; first degree burglary; first or second degree manslaughter;
first or second degree extortion; indecent liberties; incest; vehicular
homicide; first degree promoting prostitution; communication with a
minor; unlawful imprisonment; simple assault; sexual exploitation of
minors; first or second degree criminal mistreatment; endangerment with
a controlled substance; child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020; first or second degree custodial interference; first or
second degree custodial sexual misconduct; malicious harassment; first,
second, or third degree child molestation; first or second degree
sexual misconduct with a minor; patronizing a juvenile prostitute;
child abandonment; promoting pornography; selling or distributing
erotic material to a minor; custodial assault; violation of child abuse
restraining order; child buying or selling; prostitution; felony
indecent exposure; criminal abandonment; or any of these crimes as they
may be renamed in the future.
(6) "Crimes relating to drugs" means a conviction of a crime to
manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture or
deliver a controlled substance.
(7) "Crimes relating to financial exploitation" means a conviction
for first, second, or third degree extortion; first, second, or third
degree theft; first or second degree robbery; forgery; or any of these
crimes as they may be renamed in the future.
(8) "Disciplinary board final decision" means any final decision
issued by a disciplining authority under chapter 18.130 RCW or the
secretary of the department of health for the following businesses or
professions:
(a) Chiropractic;
(b) Dentistry;
(c) Dental hygiene;
(d) Massage;
(e) Midwifery;
(f) Naturopathy;
(g) Osteopathic medicine and surgery;
(h) Physical therapy;
(i) Physicians;
(j) Practical nursing;
(k) Registered nursing; and
(l) Psychology.
"Disciplinary board final decision," for real estate brokers and
salespersons, means any final decision issued by the director of the
department of licensing for real estate brokers and salespersons.
(9) "Unsupervised" means not in the presence of:
(a) Another employee or volunteer from the same business or
organization as the applicant; or
(b) Any relative or guardian of any of the children or
developmentally disabled persons or vulnerable adults to which the
applicant has access during the course of his or her employment or
involvement with the business or organization.
(10) "Vulnerable adult" means "vulnerable adult" as defined in
chapter 74.34 RCW, except that for the purposes of requesting and
receiving background checks pursuant to RCW 43.43.832, it shall also
include adults of any age who lack the functional, mental, or physical
ability to care for themselves.
(11) "Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use of
a vulnerable adult or that adult's resources for another person's
profit or advantage.
(12) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility which receives, provides services to, houses
or otherwise cares for vulnerable adults.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A business or organization shall investigate the conviction
records of any person acting on behalf of, or serving, the business or
organization who will, or may have, supervised or unsupervised access
to a child, developmentally disabled person, or vulnerable adult.
(a) "Person acting on behalf of, or serving, the business or
organization" includes:
(i) Current employees of the business or organization;
(ii) Applicants seeking or being considered for any position with
the business or organization; and
(iii) Any service provider, contractor, student intern, volunteer,
or other individual acting on behalf of, or serving, the business or
organization.
(b) The investigation shall consist of a criminal background check
as allowed through the Washington state criminal records privacy act
under RCW 10.97.050, the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834, or the
federal bureau of investigation. The background check may include a
fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal
identification fingerprint card. If the applicant or service provider
has had a background check within the previous two years, the business
or organization may waive the requirement.
(c) When necessary, applicants may be employed or engaged on a
conditional basis pending completion of the background check.
(2) If the criminal background check indicates the employee or
applicant has been convicted of any crimes against children or other
persons, crimes relating to drugs, or crimes relating to financial
exploitation, and the business or organization elects to accept or
retain the employee or volunteer in a position in which that person
will have supervised or unsupervised access to a child, developmentally
disabled person, or vulnerable adult, the business or organization
shall notify the parent or guardian of each child, developmentally
disabled person, or vulnerable adult for whom it provides services.
All notifications shall be made in writing and shall be made on or
before the date the child, developmentally disabled person, or
vulnerable adult commences participation in services provided by the
organization or entity, or in the case of continuing employees or
volunteers, within two weeks of the date the business or organization
receives the conviction information.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.43.834 and 1999 c 21 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A business or organization shall not make an inquiry to the
Washington state patrol under RCW 43.43.832, section 2 of this act, or
an equivalent inquiry to a federal law enforcement agency unless the
business or organization has notified the current employee, person
acting on behalf of the business or organization, or applicant who has
been offered a position as an employee or volunteer((,)) that an
inquiry may be made.
(2) A business or organization shall require each current employee,
person acting on behalf of the business or organization, or applicant
to disclose to the business or organization whether the current
employee, person acting on behalf of the business or organization, or
applicant has been:
(a) Convicted of any crime against children or other persons;
(b) Convicted of crimes relating to financial exploitation if the
victim was a vulnerable adult;
(c) Convicted of crimes related to drugs as defined in RCW
43.43.830;
(d) Found in any dependency action under RCW 13.34.040 to have
sexually assaulted or exploited any minor or to have physically abused
any minor;
(e) Found by a court in a domestic relations proceeding under Title
26 RCW to have sexually abused or exploited any minor or to have
physically abused any minor;
(f) Found in any disciplinary board final decision to have sexually
or physically abused or exploited any minor or developmentally disabled
person or to have abused or financially exploited any vulnerable adult;
or
(g) Found by a court in a protection proceeding under chapter 74.34
RCW, to have abused or financially exploited a vulnerable adult.
The disclosure shall be made in writing and signed by the current
employee, person acting on behalf of the business or organization, or
applicant and sworn under penalty of perjury. The disclosure sheet
shall specify all crimes against children or other persons and all
crimes relating to financial exploitation as defined in RCW 43.43.830
in which the victim was a vulnerable adult.
(3) The business or organization shall pay such reasonable fee for
the records check as the state patrol may require under RCW 43.43.838.
(4) The business or organization shall notify the current employee,
person acting on behalf of the business or organization, or applicant
of the state patrol's response within ten days after receipt by the
business or organization. The employer shall provide a copy of the
response to the current employee, person acting on behalf of the
business or organization, or applicant and shall notify the current
employee, person acting on behalf of the business or organization, or
applicant of such availability.
(5) The business or organization shall use this record only in
making the initial employment ((or)), engagement, or retention
decision. Further dissemination or use of the record is prohibited,
except as provided in RCW 28A.320.155. A business or organization
violating this subsection is subject to a civil action for damages.
(6) An insurance company shall not require a business or
organization to request background information on any employee before
issuing a policy of insurance.
(7) The business and organization shall be immune from civil
liability for failure to request background information on an applicant
unless the failure to do so constitutes gross negligence.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.43.838 and 1995 c 29 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After January 1, 1988, and notwithstanding any provision of RCW
43.43.700 through 43.43.810 to the contrary, the state patrol shall
furnish a transcript of the conviction record, disciplinary board final
decision and any subsequent criminal charges associated with the
conduct that is the subject of the disciplinary board final decision,
or civil adjudication record pertaining to any person for whom the
state patrol or the federal bureau of investigation has a record upon
the written request of:
(a) The subject of the inquiry;
(b) Any business or organization for the purpose of conducting
evaluations under RCW 43.43.832 or section 2 of this act;
(c) The department of social and health services;
(d) Any law enforcement agency, prosecuting authority, or the
office of the attorney general; or
(e) The department of social and health services for the purpose of
meeting responsibilities set forth in chapter 74.15, 18.51, 18.20, or
72.23 RCW, or any later-enacted statute which purpose is to regulate or
license a facility which handles vulnerable adults. However, access to
conviction records pursuant to this subsection (1)(e) does not limit or
restrict the ability of the department to obtain additional information
regarding conviction records and pending charges as set forth in RCW
74.15.030(2)(b).
After processing the request, if the conviction record,
disciplinary board final decision and any subsequent criminal charges
associated with the conduct that is the subject of the disciplinary
board final decision, or adjudication record shows no evidence of a
crime against children or other persons or, in the case of vulnerable
adults, no evidence of crimes relating to financial exploitation in
which the victim was a vulnerable adult, an identification declaring
the showing of no evidence shall be issued to the business or
organization by the state patrol and shall be issued within fourteen
working days of the request. The business or organization shall
provide a copy of the identification declaring the showing of no
evidence to the applicant. Possession of such identification shall
satisfy future record check requirements for the applicant for a two-year period unless the prospective employee is any current school
district employee who has applied for a position in another school
district.
(2) The state patrol shall by rule establish fees for disseminating
records under this section to recipients identified in subsection
(1)(a) and (b) of this section. The state patrol shall also by rule
establish fees for disseminating records in the custody of the national
crime information center. The revenue from the fees shall cover, as
nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs to the state
patrol of disseminating the records: PROVIDED, That no fee shall be
charged to a nonprofit organization for the records check: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That in the case of record checks using fingerprints requested
by school districts and educational service districts, the state patrol
shall charge only for the incremental costs associated with checking
fingerprints in addition to name and date of birth. Record checks
requested by school districts and educational service districts using
only name and date of birth shall continue to be provided free of
charge.
(3) No employee of the state, employee of a business or
organization, or the business or organization is liable for defamation,
invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with
any lawful dissemination of information under RCW 43.43.830 through
43.43.840 or 43.43.760.
(4) Before July 26, 1987, the state patrol shall adopt rules and
forms to implement this section and to provide for security and privacy
of information disseminated under this section, giving first priority
to the criminal justice requirements of this chapter. The rules may
include requirements for users, audits of users, and other procedures
to prevent use of civil adjudication record information or criminal
history record information inconsistent with this chapter.
(5) Nothing in RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840 shall authorize an
employer to make an inquiry not specifically authorized by this
chapter, or be construed to affect the policy of the state declared in
chapter 9.96A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state commission on national and community service
shall adopt, and make available through its web site, recommended best
practices for businesses and organizations to follow when one or more
volunteers of the business or organization have unsupervised access to
one or more children, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable
adults. The recommended best practices shall focus on, but shall not
be limited to, ensuring the safety of children, developmentally
disabled persons, and vulnerable adults, best methods of screening and
supervising volunteers, how to obtain criminal records checks, and
recordkeeping regarding the reports. The recommended best practices
shall be adopted not later than six months after the effective date of
this act.

--- END ---