BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, to the extent
possible, citizens should take personal responsibility for themselves
as they prepare for their care needs as senior citizens. The
legislature intends to encourage citizens to plan ahead for long-term
care with financial planning tools designed to protect against this
financial risk. The legislature finds that the publically funded
safety net should be targeted to those individuals it is intended to
serve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The secretary of the department of social
and health services shall contract for a long-term care financing study
by an independent consulting firm. The study shall review the existing
financing mechanisms and incentives for utilizing and purchasing long-term care services in Washington and make recommendations to improve
access and quality in all long-term care settings. The department
shall present the study's findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives no
later than October 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
The department is directed to establish an information and referral
process, for people seeking medical assistance for long-term care
services who appear to have sufficient assets in the form of a home, to
financial institutions that can arrange a home equity conversion
mortgage designed by the United States department of housing and urban
development and insured by the federal housing administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---