BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71.015 and 1999 c 366 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state medical quality assurance commission is
established, consisting of thirteen individuals licensed to practice
medicine in the state of Washington under this chapter, two individuals
who are licensed as physician assistants under chapter 18.71A RCW, and
((four)) eight individuals who are members of the public. Each
congressional district now existing or hereafter created in the state
must be represented by at least one physician member of the commission.
The terms of office of members of the commission are not affected by
changes in congressional district boundaries. Public members of the
commission may not be a member of any other health care licensing board
or commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering
health services regulated by the commission, or have a material or
financial interest in the rendering of health services regulated by the
commission.
The members of the commission shall be appointed by the governor.
Members of the initial commission may be appointed to staggered terms
of one to four years, and thereafter all terms of appointment shall be
for four years. The governor shall consider such physician and
physician assistant members who are recommended for appointment by the
appropriate professional associations in the state. In appointing the
initial members of the commission, it is the intent of the legislature
that, to the extent possible, the existing members of the board of
medical examiners and medical disciplinary board repealed under section
336, chapter 9, Laws of 1994 sp. sess. be appointed to the commission.
No member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. Each member
shall hold office until a successor is appointed.
Each member of the commission must be a citizen of the United
States, must be an actual resident of this state, and, if a physician,
must have been licensed to practice medicine in this state for at least
five years.
The commission shall meet as soon as practicable after appointment
and elect officers each year. Meetings shall be held at least four
times a year and at such place as the commission determines and at such
other times and places as the commission deems necessary. A majority
of the commission members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum
for the transaction of commission business.
The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the commission is
required to carry any motion or resolution, to adopt any rule, or to
pass any measure. The commission may appoint panels consisting of at
least three members. A quorum for the transaction of any business by
a panel is a minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum of
the panel is required to transact business delegated to it by the
commission.
Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.265 and in addition thereto shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the commission
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Any such expenses
shall be paid from funds appropriated to the department of health.
Whenever the governor is satisfied that a member of a commission
has been guilty of neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or
misfeasance in office, the governor shall file with the secretary of
state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from
office, and the secretary shall forthwith send a certified copy of the
statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office
address of the member.
Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled for
the unexpired term by appointment by the governor.
The members of the commission are immune from suit in an action,
civil or criminal, based on its disciplinary proceedings or other
official acts performed in good faith as members of the commission.
Whenever the workload of the commission requires, the commission
may request that the secretary appoint pro tempore members of the
commission. When serving, pro tempore members of the commission have
all of the powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled to all of
the emoluments, including travel expenses, of regularly appointed
members of the commission.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.71.350 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 333 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every institution or organization providing professional
liability insurance to physicians shall send a complete report to the
commission of all malpractice settlements, awards, or payments in
excess of twenty thousand dollars as a result of a claim or action for
damages alleged to have been caused by an insured physician's
incompetency or negligence in the practice of medicine. Such
institution or organization shall also report the award, settlement, or
payment of three or more claims during a five-year time period as the
result of the alleged physician's incompetence or negligence in the
practice of medicine regardless of the dollar amount of the award or
payment.
(2)(a) The commission may initiate an investigation and
disciplinary proceedings under chapter 18.130 RCW against any physician
based upon any information contained in a report received under
subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The commission shall conduct a full investigation of the
circumstances underlying any case where reports received under
subsection (1) of this section demonstrate that a physician has three
or more claims within a five-year period and each claim equals at least
fifty thousand dollars.
(3) Reports required by this section shall be made within sixty
days of the date of the settlement or verdict. Failure to comply with
this section is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred
fifty dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and maintain an electronic
health care provider locator system to allow the public to use the
internet to locate and access data regarding credentialed health care
providers in Washington. The system shall, at a minimum, include the
following data about each health care provider:
(a) Year of birth;
(b) Credential number;
(c) Type of credential or credentials;
(d) Status of the license;
(e) Date that the health care provider first became credentialed;
(f) Expiration date of the credential;
(g) Last renewal date of the credential;
(h) History of restrictions or disciplinary actions taken against
the health care provider;
(i) Copies of legal documents issued after July 1998;
(j) Convictions of any felonies; and
(k) Any other information related to the competency of health care
providers.
(2) With respect to both the design of the web site and the
information provided on the web site, the system shall facilitate, to
the greatest extent practicable, the ability of health care consumers
and others to obtain information related to the qualifications or
competence of health care providers.

--- END ---