BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.78.010 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the demands of the workplace and of
families need to be balanced to promote family stability and economic
security. Changes in workplace leave policies are desirable to
accommodate changes in the work force such as rising numbers of dual-career couples and working single parents. In addition, given the
mobility of American society, many people no longer have available
community or family support networks and therefore need additional
flexibility in the workplace to meet their family responsibilities.
The legislature declares it to be in the public interest to provide
reasonable family leave for caring for a child upon the birth or
adoption of ((a)) the child ((and to care)), for caring for a child
under eighteen years old with a terminal health condition, and for
meeting other family responsibilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.78.005 and 1997 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall cease to administer and enforce this chapter beginning
on July 27, 1997, and until the earlier of the following dates:
(a) The effective date of the repeal of the federal family and
medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6);
or
(b) July 1st of the year following the year in which amendments to
the federal family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993,
P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6) take effect that provide less family leave
than is provided under RCW 49.78.030. In determining whether the
federal law provides the same or more leave, the department shall only
consider whether (i) the total period of leave allowed under the
amended federal law is twelve or more workweeks in a twenty-four month
period, and (ii) the types of leave authorized under the amended
federal law are similar to the types authorized ((in this chapter))
under RCW 49.78.030.
(2)(a) The following provisions of this chapter are in effect:
(i) An employee's right under RCW 49.78.070(1)(b) to be returned to
a workplace within twenty miles of the employee's workplace when leave
commenced ((shall remain in effect)); and
(ii) An employee's right to leave under section 4 of this act.
(b) The family leave required by 29 U.S.C. ((29.2612)) Sec.
2612(a)(1)(A) and (B) of the federal family and medical leave act of
1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6) shall be in addition
to any leave for sickness or temporary disability because of pregnancy
or childbirth.
(c) The department shall enforce this subsection under RCW
49.78.140 through 49.78.190, except that an initial notice of
infraction shall state that the employer has thirty days in which to
take corrective action. No infraction or penalty may be assessed if
the employer complies with the requirements of the initial notice of
infraction.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.78.020 and 1996 c 178 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Child" means a biological or adopted child, or a stepchild,
living with the employee.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Employee" means a person other than an independent contractor
employed by an employer on a continuous basis for the previous fifty-two weeks for at least thirty-five hours per week.
(4) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, "employer" means:
(a) Any person, firm, corporation, partnership, business trust, legal
representative, or other business entity which engages in any business,
industry, profession, or activity in this state and includes any unit
of local government including, but not limited to, a county, city,
town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or political
subdivision, which (i) employed a daily average of one hundred or more
employees during the last calendar quarter at the place where the
employee requesting leave reports for work, or (ii) employed a daily
average of one hundred or more employees during the last calendar
quarter within a twenty mile radius of the place where the employee
requesting leave reports for work, where the employer maintains a
central hiring location and customarily transfers employees among
workplaces; and (b) the state, state institutions, and state agencies.
(5) "Family leave" means leave from employment ((to care for a
newborn or newly adopted child under the age of six or a child under
eighteen years old with a terminal health condition,)) as provided in
RCW 49.78.030 and section 4 of this act.
(6) "Health care provider" means a person licensed as a physician
under chapter 18.71 RCW or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.57 RCW.
(7) "Parent" means a biological or adoptive parent, or a
stepparent.
(8) "Reduced leave schedule" means leave scheduled for fewer than
an employee's usual number of hours or days per workweek.
(9) "Terminal health condition" means a condition caused by injury,
disease, or illness, that, within reasonable medical judgment, is
incurable and will produce death within the period of leave to which
the employee is entitled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to other family leave to which the employee is
entitled under this chapter or federal law, an employee is entitled to
four hours of family leave during any calendar quarter to participate
in parent-teacher school conferences.
(2) An employer may require that the leave provided under this
section:
(a) Be unpaid; and
(b) Be taken after an employee first uses the employee's total
accumulated leave, not including leave under this chapter, to which the
employee is otherwise entitled. However, the employer is not required
to allow an employee to use the employee's other leave in place of the
leave provided under this section.
(3) An employer may require that a request for leave under this
section be supported by reasonable information or a certification for
verification purposes.
(4) An employee planning to take leave under this section must
provide the employer with written notice at least five days in advance
of the anticipated date or dates of leave, stating the dates during
which the employee intends to take the leave. If the employee fails to
give the required notice, the employer may deny that request for leave.
(5) As used in this section, "employer" means any person, firm,
corporation, partnership, business trust, legal representative, or
other business entity that engages in any business, industry,
profession, or activity in this state and employs eight or more
employees, the state, state institutions, state agencies, and any unit
of local government, including but not limited to, a county, city,
town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or political
subdivision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 With respect to employees covered by a
collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this
section or an employee benefit plan with a stated year ending on or
after the effective date of this section, this act does not apply until
the later of: (1) The first day following expiration of the collective
bargaining agreement; or (2) the first day of the next plan year, as
applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 49.78.005 is recodified as a section in
chapter 49.78 RCW, to be codified between RCW 49.78.010 and 49.78.020.

--- END ---