BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Residence address" means the street address of the primary
residence of a person within the state of Washington. It is strongly
presumed that the residence address will be the same address used in
drivers' license records and voter registration records.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.028 and 1997 c 59 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of vehicle license registration, a resident is
a person who manifests an intent to live or be located in this state on
more than a temporary or transient basis. Evidence of residency
includes but is not limited to:
(a) Becoming a registered voter in this state; or
(b) Receiving benefits under one of the Washington public
assistance programs; or
(c) Declaring that he or she is a resident for the purpose of
obtaining a state license or tuition fees at resident rates.
(2) The term "Washington public assistance programs" referred to in
subsection (1)(b) of this section includes only public assistance
programs for which more than fifty percent of the combined costs of
benefits and administration are paid from state funds. Programs which
are not included within the term "Washington public assistance
programs" pursuant to the above criteria include, but are not limited
to the food stamp program under the federal food stamp act of 1964;
programs under the child nutrition act of 1966, 42 U.S.C. Secs. 1771
through 1788; and temporary assistance for needy families.
(3) A resident of the state shall register under chapters 46.12 and
46.16 RCW a vehicle to be operated on the highways of the state. New
Washington residents shall be allowed thirty days from the date they
become residents as defined in this section to procure Washington
registration for their vehicles. This thirty-day period shall not be
combined with any other period of reciprocity provided for in this
chapter or chapter 46.85 RCW. The initial registration of a vehicle
previously licensed in another jurisdiction is considered a relicensing
of the vehicle.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.040 and 1987 c 244 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for original vehicle license shall be made on
(([a])) a form furnished for the purpose by the department. Such
application shall be made by the owner of the vehicle or duly
authorized agent over the signature of such owner or agent, and the
applicant shall certify, under penalty of perjury, that the statements
therein are true to the best of the applicant's knowledge. The
application must show:
(((1))) (a) Name and residence address of the owner of the vehicle
if the vehicle is owned by an individual and, if the vehicle is subject
to a security agreement, the name and address of the secured party;
(((2))) (b) The name and principal place of business in Washington
from which the business of the registered owner is directed, managed,
or conducted if the vehicle is owned by a business or sole
proprietorship;
(c) Trade name of the vehicle, model, year, type of body, the
identification number thereof;
(((3))) (d) The power to be used -- whether electric, steam, gas or
other power;
(((4))) (e) The purpose for which said vehicle is to be used and
the nature of the license required;
(((5))) (f) The licensed gross weight for such vehicle which in the
case of for hire vehicles and auto stages with seating capacity of more
than six shall be the adult seating capacity thereof, including the
operator, as provided for in RCW 46.16.111. In the case of motor
trucks, tractors, and truck tractors, the licensed gross weight shall
be the gross weight declared by the applicant pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 46.16.111;
(((6))) (g) The unladen weight of such vehicle, if it be a motor
truck or trailer, which shall be the shipping weight thereof as given
by the manufacturer thereof unless another weight is shown by weight
slip verified by a certified weighmaster, which slip shall be attached
to the original application;
(((7))) (h) Such other information as shall be required upon such
application by the department.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, an applicant
may provide an address other than a residence address as part of the
application or renewal only if the applicant: (a) Is a member of the
military with an overseas mailing address; (b) is a participant in the
address confidentiality program administered through the office of the
secretary of state; or (c) does not have United States postal service
mail delivery service available to the applicant's residence address.
In order to be exempt from the requirement to provide a residence
address, the applicant must certify, under penalty of perjury, that at
least one of the exceptions in (a) through (c) of this subsection is
met to the best of the applicant's knowledge.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.210 and 2001 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the application and proper fee for original
vehicle license, the director shall make a recheck of the application
and in the event that there is any error in the application it may be
returned to the county auditor or other agent to effectively secure the
correction of such error, who shall return the same corrected to the
director.
(2) Application for the renewal of a vehicle license shall be made
to the director or his agents, including county auditors, by the
registered owner on a form prescribed by the director and shall include
the applicant's residence address. The application must be accompanied
by the payment of such license fees and excise tax as may be required
by law including, but not limited to, all special motor vehicle excise
taxes with respect to any taxing district of which the applicant is a
resident. The applicant must provide a residence address or meet an
exception as provided in RCW 46.16.040. When a vehicle license is
renewed after the effective date of this act, the applicant must
certify under penalty of perjury that the address provided for the
vehicle registration is the residence address. Payment of applicable
fees is certification that the vehicle registration address is the
residence address or the applicant has submitted a change of address to
meet the address requirements of this act. Such application shall be
handled in the same manner and the fees transmitted to the state
treasurer in the same manner as in the case of an original application.
Any such application which upon validation becomes a renewal
certificate need not have entered upon it the name of the lien holder,
if any, of the vehicle concerned.
(3) Persons expecting to be out of the state during the normal
renewal period of a vehicle license may secure renewal of such vehicle
license and have license plates or tabs preissued by making application
to the director or his agents upon forms prescribed by the director.
The application must be accompanied by such license fees, and excise
tax as may be required by law.
(4) Application for the annual renewal of a vehicle license number
plate to the director or the director's agents shall not be required
for those vehicles owned, rented, or leased by the state of Washington,
or by any county, city, town, school district, or other political
subdivision of the state of Washington or a governing body of an Indian
tribe located within this state and recognized as a governmental entity
by the United States department of the interior.
(5) If the department becomes aware that there is or may be an
error in a residence address provided in an application or renewal or
that the applicant has failed to provide a residence address without
certifying the applicability of one of the exceptions listed in RCW
46.16.040, the department shall flag the record and the registered
owner will be required, before renewal of the vehicle license, to
provide information satisfactory to the department either to reconcile
the error or to demonstrate that there was no error.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.205 and 1999 c 6 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person after applying for or receiving a driver's
license or identicard moves from the residence address named in the
application or in the license or identicard issued to him or her, the
person shall within ten days thereafter notify the department of the
address change. The notification must be in writing on a form provided
by the department and must include the number of the person's driver's
license. The written notification, or other means as designated by
rule of the department, is the exclusive means by which the address of
record maintained by the department concerning the licensee or
identicard holder may be changed.
(a) The form must contain a place for the person to indicate that
the address change is not for voting purposes. The department of
licensing shall notify the secretary of state by the means described in
RCW ((29.07.270(3))) 29A.08.350 of all change of address information
received by means of this form except information on persons indicating
that the change is not for voting purposes. The form must also include
a certification, under penalty of perjury, that the statements in it
are true to the best of the person's knowledge.
(b) Any notice regarding the cancellation, suspension, revocation,
disqualification, probation, or nonrenewal of the driver's license,
commercial driver's license, driving privilege, or identicard mailed to
the address of record of the licensee or identicard holder is effective
notwithstanding the licensee's or identicard holder's failure to
receive the notice.
(2) When a licensee or holder of an identicard changes his or her
name of record, the person shall notify the department of the name
change. The person must make the notification within ten days of the
date that the name change is effective. The notification must be in
writing on a form provided by the department and must include the
number of the person's driver's license. The department of licensing
shall not change the name of record of a person under this section
unless the person has again satisfied the department regarding his or
her identity in the manner provided by RCW 46.20.035.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
All reasonable costs incurred by the department of licensing
associated with the administration of address certification provisions
for authorities receiving funds collected under chapter 35.95A RCW
shall be paid by those authorities.

--- END ---