BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state has a
compelling interest in making it possible for the courts to adequately
and fairly conduct cases involving dependent persons who are the
victims of crimes.
The legislature further finds that court proceedings involving
dependent persons may be hindered or precluded by circumstances related
to the dependent person's situation, such as, but not limited to,
memory problems associated with the length of time between the act or
crime and the related court proceedings, even though the dependent
person made a reliable statement about the crime or event shortly after
it occurred, and the unavailability of the dependent person as a
witness because of his or her physical or mental condition or
difficulties with verbal communication, or because participation in the
trial or proceeding has a substantial likelihood of resulting in
significant emotional, mental, or physical harm.
The legislature intends that this act make admissible as evidence
the reliable hearsay of dependent persons beyond what is currently
admissible, while respecting the constitutional rights of other
parties. When utilizing the hearsay exception pursuant to this act,
courts may find guidance in State v. Ryan, 103 Wn.2d 165 (1984), while
recognizing the different factors set forth in this act as well as
other factors that may apply to dependent persons. The legislature
intends this act to facilitate fair and just adjudication of criminal
and juvenile cases involving dependent persons in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 10.58 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply to section 3 of this act,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assault" means assault in the first degree, assault in the
second degree, assault in the third degree, or assault in the fourth
degree, as those crimes are defined in chapter 9A.36 RCW.
(2) "Coercion" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 9A.36.070.
(3) "Criminal mistreatment" means any of the crimes as defined in
chapter 9A.42 RCW.
(4) "Dependent person" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
9A.42.010.
(5) "Fraud" means any of the crimes as defined in chapter 9A.60
RCW.
(6) "Extortion" means extortion in the first degree and extortion
in the second degree, as those crimes are defined in chapter 9A.56 RCW.
(7) "Sex offense" means rape in the first degree, rape in the
second degree, rape in the third degree, and indecent liberties, as
those crimes are defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.
(8) "Unavailable" means the dependent person is unavailable under
ER 804 in the Washington state court rules of evidence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 10.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An out-of-court statement made by a dependent person describing
an assault, a sex offense, coercion, criminal mistreatment, extortion,
or fraud committed against the dependent person declarant is admissible
in evidence in a criminal trial or juvenile offense adjudication
proceeding if:
(a) The court finds in a hearing conducted outside the presence of
the jury, if any, that the time, content, and circumstances of the
statement provide sufficient indicia of reliability. In making its
determination, the court may consider: (i) The reliability of the
declarant; (ii) the timing of the declaration; (iii) whether the
declarant had an apparent motive to lie; (iv) the relationship of the
declarant to the witness; (v) the relationship of the declarant to the
actor; (vi) whether the declarant made the statement to more than one
person; (vii) the mental and physical condition and cognitive ability
of the dependent person; (viii) the nature and duration of the crime,
neglect, abuse, sexual abuse, or exploitation; and (ix) any other
factor deemed appropriate; and
(b) The dependent person either:
(i) Testifies; or
(ii) The court finds the dependent person is unavailable as a
witness, but when the dependent person is unavailable as a witness, the
statement may be admitted only if there is corroborative evidence of
the act.
(2) A statement may not be admitted under this section unless the
proponent of the statement gives notice to the adverse party of his or
her intention to offer the statement and the particulars of the
statement sufficiently in advance of the proceedings to provide the
adverse party with a fair opportunity to challenge the admissibility of
the statement at a hearing. The court shall state the basis for its
ruling by making specific findings of fact on the record.

--- END ---