BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to create a
system of clean elections for state office campaigns through public
financing, thereby focusing campaigns on issues and away from the
sources of campaign contributions, limit the influence of large
contributors and special interests, and require contribution limits for
all elective office campaigns.

PART I - VOLUNTARY SPENDING LIMITATIONS AND RELATED CONTRIBUTION
LIMITATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 VOLUNTARY LIMITATIONS ON CONTRIBUTIONS FOR
POLITICAL CAMPAIGNS. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a
participating candidate and a participating candidate's authorized
committee:
(1) Shall not accept individual contributions in excess of twenty-five dollars for each election cycle, except in the emergency situation
specified in section 111(4) of this act;
(2) Shall not accept contributions from a political committee, a
continuing political committee, a bona fide political party, or a
caucus political committee;
(3) Shall not expend more than a total of five hundred dollars of
the candidate's personal money;
(4) Shall collect one hundred qualifying contributions under
section 104 of this act; and
(5) Shall comply with this chapter, including section 105 of this
act regarding the authorized committee's account and section 110 of
this act regarding returning unused moneys to the citizens' clean
elections fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 CERTIFICATION AS A PARTICIPATING
CANDIDATE. (1) A candidate who wishes to be certified as a
participating candidate shall, before the end of the qualifying period,
file an application with the commission using a form specified by the
commission. The application must identify the candidate, the office
that the candidate plans to seek, and the candidate's party, if any,
and contain the candidate's signature, under oath, certifying that:
(a) The candidate has complied with the restrictions of section 101
of this act during the election cycle to date;
(b) The candidate's campaign committee has filed all campaign
finance reports required under this chapter during the election cycle
to date that are complete and accurate; and
(c) The candidate will comply with the requirements of section 101
of this act during the remainder of the election cycle and,
specifically, will not accept individual contributions in excess of the
limit established in section 101(1) of this act; and will not accept
contributions from a political committee, a continuing political
committee, a bona fide political party, or a caucus political
committee.
(2) The commission shall act on the application within seven days.
Unless, within that time, the commission denies an application and
provides written reasons that all or part of a certification in
subsection (1) of this section is incomplete or untrue, the commission
shall certify the candidate as a participating candidate. If the
commission denies an application for failure to file all complete and
accurate campaign finance reports or failure to make the certification
in subsection (1)(c) of this section, the candidate may reapply within
fourteen days of the commission's decision by filing complete and
accurate campaign finance reports and another sworn certification.
(3) A candidate who is certified as a participating candidate may
use this designation in campaign materials and will be so designated in
the state voters' pamphlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 LIMITS ON EARLY CONTRIBUTIONS. (1) A
participating candidate may accept early contributions only from
individuals and only during the exploratory period and the qualifying
period, subject to the following limitations: Notwithstanding any law
to the contrary, a contributor may not give contributions exceeding
twenty-five dollars during an election cycle and a participating
candidate may not accept contributions from a contributor exceeding
twenty-five dollars during an election cycle.
(2) Early contributions specified in subsection (1) of this section
and the candidate's personal moneys specified in section 101(3) of this
act may be spent only during the exploratory period and the qualifying
period. Any early contributions not spent by the end of the qualifying
period must be paid to the citizens' clean elections fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 QUALIFYING CONTRIBUTIONS. (1) During the
qualifying period, a participating candidate shall collect a minimum of
one hundred qualifying contributions, which must be paid to the
citizens' clean elections fund.
(2) To qualify as a "qualifying contribution," a contribution must
be:
(a) Made by a registered voter who at the time of the contribution
was registered in the electoral district of the office the candidate is
seeking and who has not given another qualifying contribution to that
candidate during that election cycle;
(b) Made by a person who is not given anything of value in exchange
for the qualifying contribution;
(c) In the sum of twenty-five dollars, exactly;
(d) Received during the qualifying period by the candidate or on
behalf of the candidate;
(e) If made by check or money order, made payable to the
candidate's authorized committee, or if in cash, deposited in the sole
account in the candidate's authorized committee; and
(f) Accompanied by a four-part reporting slip that includes the
printed name, registration address, and signature of the contributor,
the name of the candidate for whom the contribution is made, the date,
and the printed name and signature of the solicitor.
(3) A copy of the reporting slip must be given as a receipt to the
contributor, and another copy must be retained by the candidate's
campaign committee. The remaining copies must be forwarded to the
commission. Delivery of the reporting slips to the commission excuses
the candidate from disclosing the names of the contributors on campaign
finance reports filed under RCW 42.17.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 CONTROLS ON A PARTICIPATING CANDIDATE'S
AUTHORIZED COMMITTEE. (1) A participating candidate and the
participating candidate's authorized committee shall conduct all
financial activity through a single account. A participating candidate
may not make any deposits into this account other than those permitted
under sections 103, 104, and 107 of this act.
(2) A participating candidate and the treasurer of the
participating candidate's authorized committee must sign a joint
statement under oath promising to comply with the requirements of RCW
42.17.095 and sections 101 through 114 of this act.
(3) A participating candidate or the treasurer of the participating
candidate's authorized committee shall pay moneys from the authorized
committee's account directly to the person providing goods or services
to the campaign and shall identify, on reports filed under RCW
42.17.080, the full name and street address of the person and the
nature of the goods or services and compensation for which payment has
been made. However, an authorized committee may establish one or more
petty cash accounts, that in aggregate must not exceed one thousand
dollars at any time. A single expenditure may not be made from a petty
cash account exceeding one hundred dollars. Expenditures from any
petty cash accounts must also be included in reports filed under RCW
42.17.080.
(4) Moneys in the account of a participating candidate's authorized
committee may not be used to pay fines or civil penalties, for costs or
legal fees related to representation before the commission, or for
defense of an enforcement action under this chapter. Nothing in this
subsection prevents a participating candidate from having a legal
defense fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 QUALIFICATION FOR CLEAN CAMPAIGN FUNDING.
(1) A candidate who has applied for certification may also apply, in
accordance with subsection (2) of this section, to receive funds from
the citizens' clean elections fund.
(2) To receive funding from the citizens' clean elections fund, a
candidate must present to the commission no later than one week after
the end of the qualifying period a list of names of persons who have
made qualifying contributions under section 104 of this act on behalf
of the candidate. The list must be divided by county. At the same
time, the candidate must tender to the commission copies of the
reporting slips identified in section 104 of this act for persons on
the list and an amount equal to the sum of the qualifying contributions
collected. The commission shall deposit the amount into the citizens'
clean elections fund.
(3) The commission shall forward a copy of the reporting slips to
the county auditor of the counties of the addresses specified in the
selected slips. Within ten days, the county auditors shall provide a
report to the commission identifying as disqualified any slips that are
unsigned or undated or that the auditor is unable to verify as matching
a person who is registered to vote, on the date specified on the slip,
inside the electoral district of the office the candidate is seeking.
The commission shall approve the candidate for funds if one hundred
qualifying contributions are made.
(4) To qualify for clean campaign funding, a candidate must have
been certified as a participating candidate under section 102 of this
act and must have obtained a minimum of one hundred qualifying
contributions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 CLEAN CAMPAIGN FUNDING. (1) On the first
business day of each month during the primary election period up until
the first business day of the month immediately after the primary
election, a participating candidate shall transmit to the commission
the names and addresses of each contributor and the amount each person
contributed for the previous month. The candidate's committee
treasurer must certify that the list is true and accurate. The
commission shall check the list to verify that the candidate has not
received more than twenty-five dollars in aggregate from any one
individual and that no single contribution exceeds twenty-five dollars.
The commission shall arrange a payment by the state treasurer from the
citizens' clean elections fund to the account of the authorized
committee of each candidate who qualifies for clean campaign funding,
an amount that equals two hundred dollars in matching funds for every
twenty-five dollars received in contributions by the participating
candidate, up to an amount of forty thousand dollars, except under the
conditions identified in section 108 of this act.
(2) On the first business day of each month during the general
election period up until the first business day of the month
immediately after the general election, a participating candidate shall
transmit to the commission the names and addresses of each contributor
and the amount each person contributed for the previous month. The
candidate's committee treasurer must certify that the list is true and
accurate. The commission shall check the list to verify that the
candidate has not received more than twenty-five dollars in aggregate
from any one individual and that no single contribution exceeds twenty-five dollars. The commission shall arrange a payment by the state
treasurer from the citizens' clean elections fund to the account of the
authorized committee of each candidate who qualifies for clean campaign
funding an amount that equals two hundred dollars in matching funds for
every twenty-five dollars received in contributions by the
participating candidate, up to an amount of forty thousand dollars,
except under the conditions identified in section 108 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 EQUAL FUNDING OF CANDIDATES. (1) Whenever
during a primary or general election period a report is filed, or other
information comes to the attention of the commission, indicating that
a nonparticipating candidate for the same office as a participating
candidate has raised fifty percent more money then a participating
candidate, the commission shall authorize, so long as adequate funding
is available, additional funds from the citizens' clean elections fund
to the account of the authorized committee of any participating
candidate seeking the same office as the nonparticipating candidate,
the difference between the total amount raised by the nonparticipating
candidate and the total amount raised, including matching funds, by the
participating candidate.
(2) If the adjusted spending limit reaches twice the spending limit
for a particular election, then the commission shall not pay any
further amounts from the citizens' clean elections fund to the campaign
account of the participating candidate, and the spending limit will not
be adjusted further.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 LIMITATIONS ON SPENDING FROM THE CITIZENS'
CLEAN ELECTIONS FUND. (1) The commission shall not spend, on all costs
incurred under sections 101 through 114 of this act during a particular
calendar year, more than two dollars and fifty cents times the
population of the state during the previous year, as certified by the
office of financial management. This amount may be adjusted by the
commission as per the requirements of RCW 42.17.690. The commission
may exceed this limit during a calendar year, if it is offset by an
equal reduction of the limit during another calendar year during the
same four-year period beginning January 1st immediately after a
gubernatorial election.
(2) The commission may use up to five percent of the amount
specified in subsection (1) of this section for reasonable and
necessary expenses of administration and enforcement of RCW 42.17.095
and sections 101 through 114 of this act. Any portion of the five
percent not used for this purpose will remain in the fund.
(3) The commission shall apply five percent of the amount specified
in subsection (1) of this section for reasonable and necessary expenses
necessary to carry out sections 101 through 114 of this act.
(4) The state treasurer shall administer a citizens' clean
elections fund from which costs incurred under sections 101 through 114
of this act will be paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 RETURN OF MONEYS TO THE CITIZENS' CLEAN
ELECTIONS FUND. (1) At the end of the primary election period, a
participating candidate who has received moneys under section 107(1) of
this act shall return to the citizens' clean elections fund all moneys
in the account of the candidate's authorized committee above an amount
sufficient to pay any unpaid bills for expenditures made during the
primary election period and for goods or services directed to the
primary election.
(2) At the end of the general election period, a participating
candidate shall return to the citizens' clean elections fund all moneys
in the account of the candidate's authorized committee above an amount
sufficient to pay any unpaid bills for expenditures made before the
general election and for goods or services directed to the general
election.
(3) At the end of the general election period, a successful
participating candidate may hold in surplus up to five hundred dollars
for the following purposes:
(a) Nonreimbursed public office-related expenses held in a separate
account. Dispositions must be reported in accordance with RCW
42.17.090. The separate account required under this subsection may not
be used for deposits of campaign funds that are not surplus;
(b) A future election campaign for the same office last sought by
the candidate. Dispositions must be reported in accordance with RCW
42.17.090. If the candidate subsequently announces or publicly files
for office, information as appropriate must be reported to the
commission in accordance with RCW 42.17.040 through 42.17.090. If a
subsequent office is not sought the surplus held must be returned to
the citizens' clean elections fund.
(4) A participating candidate shall pay all uncontested and unpaid
bills referred to in this section no later than thirty days after the
primary or general election. A participating candidate shall make
monthly reports to the commission concerning the status of the dispute
over any contested bills. Any moneys in a candidate's campaign account
after payment of bills must be returned promptly to the citizens' clean
elections fund.
(5) If a participating candidate is replaced as the result of a
vacancy as provided under RCW 29A.24.210, and the replacement candidate
files an oath with the commission certifying to section 102(1)(c) of
this act, the campaign account of the participating candidate will be
transferred to the replacement candidate and the commission shall
certify the replacement candidate as a participating candidate without
requiring compliance with section 106 of this act or section 102(1) (a)
and (b) of this act. If the replacement candidate does not file such
an oath, the account of the authorized committee of the candidate whose
position is vacant will be liquidated and all remaining moneys returned
to the citizens' clean elections fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 CITIZENS' CLEAN ELECTIONS FUND. (1) The
citizens' clean elections fund is created in the custody of the state
treasurer as a fund separate from the state general fund. All receipts
from (a) beginning January 1, 2005, an additional tax on cigarettes per
section 118 of this act; (b) amounts returned under section 110 of this
act; and (c) amounts turned over under section 113 of this act must be
deposited into the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only
as provided by sections 107 through 109 of this act. Only the
commission or its designee may authorize expenditures from the fund.
The fund is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW. All interest earnings and other income obtained from investing
money in the fund will remain with the fund, and no portion of these
earnings may be returned to the state investment board expense account
as otherwise provided under RCW 43.33A.160. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures from the fund, including authorized transfers
that are made from the fund to the account of the authorized committee
of a participating candidate.
(2) At least once per year, the commission shall project the amount
of money that the fund will receive over each of the next four years,
when this money will become available, and the required expenditures
from the fund for each of the next four calendar years. Whenever the
commission determines that the fund contains more money than the
commission determines is required to meet current debts plus expected
expenses, under the assumption that expected expenses will be at the
expenditure limit in section 109(1) of this act and taking into account
the projections of anticipated revenues, the commission shall designate
this money as excess and so notify the state treasurer, who shall
transfer the excess money to the state general fund. Whenever the
commission determines that the citizens' clean elections fund will not
contain sufficient money to meet its current debts plus expected
expenses, under the assumption that expected expenses will be at the
expenditure limit in section 109(1) of this act and taking into account
the projections of anticipated revenues, the commission shall notify
the legislature of this projected deficiency. The legislature shall
appropriate sufficient money from the general fund into the citizens'
clean elections fund necessary to meet this deficiency.
(3) If the legislature fails to appropriate sufficient money to
eliminate the projected deficiency, then the commission shall announce
the deficiency. The announcement may include specifications for
decreases in the following parameters, based on the commission's
projections of collections and expenses for the citizens' clean
elections fund, made in the following order:
(a) First, the commission may announce a decrease in the amount of
matching funds from two hundred dollars for every twenty-five dollars
in private contributions to one hundred dollars for every twenty-five
dollars in private contributions.
(b) Next, the commission may announce that the fund will not
provide equalization money under section 108 (1) and (2) of this act.
(c) Finally, the commission may announce that the total amount of
matching funding will be decreased.
(4) If the commission cannot provide participating candidates with
all money specified under sections 107 and 108 of this act, as
decreased under any announcement under subsection (3) of this section,
then the commission shall allocate any reductions in payments
proportionately among candidates entitled to money and shall declare an
emergency. Upon declaration of an emergency, a participating candidate
may accept private contributions in excess of twenty-five dollars, but
not more than that allowed under RCW 42.17.640(1) to increase the total
money received by the candidate from the fund and from the private
contributions to adjust for the lack of funding, as determined by the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 ENFORCEMENT DUTIES. (1) The commission
shall:
(a) Prescribe forms for reports, statements, notices, and other
documents required by RCW 42.17.095 and sections 101 through 114 of
this act;
(b) Prepare and publish instructions setting forth methods of
bookkeeping and preservation of records to facilitate compliance with
RCW 42.17.095 and sections 101 through 114 of this act and explaining
the duties of persons and committees under RCW 42.17.095 and sections
101 through 114 of this act;
(c) Adopt rules to implement RCW 42.17.095 and sections 101 through
114 of this act, but the joint administrative rules review committee
may not make these rules subject to RCW 34.05.328;
(d) Enforce RCW 42.17.095 and sections 101 through 114 of this act,
ensure that money from the citizens' clean elections fund that is
transferred into the account of an authorized committee of a
participating candidate is spent as specified in RCW 42.17.095 and
sections 101 through 114 of this act and not otherwise, monitor reports
filed under RCW 42.17.095 and sections 101 through 114 of this act and
financial records of candidates as needed to ensure that equalization
moneys are paid promptly to opposing qualified candidates under section
108 of this act.
(2) Based on the results of the elections in the year 2004 or any
subsequent presidential election, and within six months after such an
election, the commission may adopt rules changing the number of
qualifying contributions required for any office from those listed in
section 106(4) of this act by no more than twenty percent of the number
applicable for the preceding presidential election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 CIVIL PENALTIES. (1) The civil penalty
for a violation of a contribution or expenditure limit established
under section 101 of this act by or on behalf of a participating
candidate is ten times the amount by which the expenditures or
contributions exceed the applicable limit.
(2) In addition to any other penalties imposed by law, the civil
penalty for a violation by or on behalf of a participating candidate of
a reporting requirement imposed by this chapter is one hundred dollars
per day. A civil penalty imposed under this subsection may not exceed
twice the amount of expenditures or contributions not reported in a
timely manner. The candidate and the candidate's authorized committee
are jointly and severally responsible for a civil penalty imposed under
this subsection.
(3) A participating candidate adjudged to have knowingly committed
a violation of section 101 of this act shall repay the amount from his
or her personal funds to the citizens' clean elections fund and shall
turn over all money in the candidate's authorized committee account to
the citizens' clean elections fund.
(4) All civil penalties collected under subsections (1) through (3)
of this section will be deposited into the citizens' clean elections
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 INFLATION AND OTHER ADJUSTMENTS OF DOLLAR
VALUES. (1) Every two years, the commission shall modify the dollar
values specified in the following sections, in the manner specified by
RCW 42.17.370 to account for inflation: (a) Section 101(1) of this
act; (b) section 103(1) of this act; (c) section 105(3) of this act;
(d) "primary election matching limits" and "general election matching
limits"; (e) section 109(1) of this act; (f) section 113(2) of this
act. Whenever a dollar value is so adjusted, these statutes will be
interpreted to apply to the inflation-adjusted value.
(2) Based on the results of the elections in the year 2004 or any
presidential election thereafter, and within six months after the
election, the commission may adopt rules reallocating funds available
to all candidates between the primary and general election by selecting
a fraction for primary matching limits that is between one-third and
one-half of the matching limits for the election cycle. For each
office, the primary election matching limit will be modified to be the
sum of the primary and general matching limits times the selected
fraction, and the general election matching limit will be modified to
be the same sum.

Sec. 115 RCW 42.17.095 and 1995 c 397 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
The surplus funds of a candidate, or of a political committee
supporting or opposing a candidate, may only be disposed of in any one
or more of the following ways:
(1) Return the surplus to a contributor in an amount not to exceed
that contributor's original contribution;
(2) Transfer the surplus to the candidate's personal account as
reimbursement for lost earnings incurred as a result of that
candidate's election campaign. Such lost earnings shall be verifiable
as unpaid salary or, when the candidate is not salaried, as an amount
not to exceed income received by the candidate for services rendered
during an appropriate, corresponding time period. All lost earnings
incurred shall be documented and a record thereof shall be maintained
by the candidate or the candidate's political committee. The committee
shall include a copy of such record when its expenditure for such
reimbursement is reported pursuant to RCW 42.17.090;
(3) Transfer the surplus without limit to a political party or to
a caucus political committee;
(4) Donate the surplus to a charitable organization registered in
accordance with chapter 19.09 RCW;
(5) Transmit the surplus to the state treasurer for deposit in the
general fund; ((or))
(6) Hold the surplus in the campaign depository or depositories
designated in accordance with RCW 42.17.050 for possible use in a
future election campaign for the same office last sought by the
candidate and report any such disposition in accordance with RCW
42.17.090: PROVIDED, That if the candidate subsequently announces or
publicly files for office, information as appropriate is reported to
the commission in accordance with RCW 42.17.040 through 42.17.090. If
a subsequent office is not sought the surplus held shall be disposed of
in accordance with the requirements of this section((.));
(7) Hold the surplus campaign funds in a separate account for
nonreimbursed public office-related expenses or as provided in this
section, and report any such disposition in accordance with RCW
42.17.090. The separate account required under this subsection shall
not be used for deposits of campaign funds that are not surplus((.));
(8) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (7) of this section,
for those candidates certified for clean election funding, all surplus
campaign funds must be transferred to the citizens' clean elections
fund;
(9) No candidate or authorized committee may transfer funds to any
other candidate or other political committee.
The disposal of surplus funds under this section shall not be
considered a contribution for purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 116 RCW 42.17.640 and 2001 c 208 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus
political committee, may make contributions to a candidate for ((a
state legislative)) public office that in the aggregate exceed ((five))
one hundred dollars ((or to a candidate for a state office other than
a state legislative office that in the aggregate exceed one thousand
dollars)) for each election in which the candidate is on the ballot or
appears as a write-in candidate. Contributions made with respect to a
primary may not be made after the date of the primary. However,
contributions to a candidate or a candidate's authorized committee may
be made with respect to a primary until thirty days after the primary,
subject to the following limitations: (a) The candidate lost the
primary; (b) the candidate's authorized committee has insufficient
funds to pay debts outstanding as of the date of the primary; and (c)
the contributions may only be raised and spent to satisfy the
outstanding debt. Contributions made with respect to a general
election may not be made after the final day of the applicable election
cycle.
(2) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus
political committee, may make contributions to a ((state)) public
official against whom recall charges have been filed, or to a political
committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of
the recall of the ((state)) public official, during a recall campaign
that in the aggregate exceed ((five)) one hundred dollars ((if)) for
((a state legislative office or one thousand dollars if for a state
office other than a state legislative)) an elected office.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, no bona fide
political party or caucus political committee may make contributions to
a candidate during an election cycle that in the aggregate exceed (i)
((fifty)) twenty-five cents multiplied by the number of eligible
registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is
elected if the contributor is a caucus political committee or the
governing body of a state organization, or (ii) ((twenty-five)) fifteen
cents multiplied by the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction
from which the candidate is elected if the contributor is a county
central committee or a legislative district committee.
(b) No candidate may accept contributions from a county central
committee or a legislative district committee during an election cycle
that when combined with contributions from other county central
committees or legislative district committees would in the aggregate
exceed ((twenty-five)) fifteen cents times the number of registered
voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, no bona fide
political party or caucus political committee may make contributions to
((a state)) an elected official against whom recall charges have been
filed, or to a political committee having the expectation of making
expenditures in support of the ((state)) elected official, during a
recall campaign that in the aggregate exceed (i) ((fifty)) twenty-five
cents multiplied by the number of eligible registered voters in the
jurisdiction entitled to recall the ((state)) elected official if the
contributor is a caucus political committee or the governing body of a
state organization, or (ii) ((twenty-five)) fifteen cents multiplied by
the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the
candidate is elected if the contributor is a county central committee
or a legislative district committee.
(b) No ((state)) elected official against whom recall charges have
been filed, no authorized committee of the official, and no political
committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of
the recall of ((a state)) an elected official may accept contributions
from a county central committee or a legislative district committee
during an election cycle that when combined with contributions from
other county central committees or legislative district committees
would in the aggregate exceed ((twenty-five)) fifteen cents multiplied
by the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the
candidate is elected.
(5) For purposes of determining contribution limits under
subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the number of eligible
registered voters in a jurisdiction is the number at the time of the
most recent general election in the jurisdiction.
(6) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, no
person other than an individual, bona fide political party, or caucus
political committee may make contributions reportable under this
chapter to a caucus political committee ((that in the aggregate exceed
five hundred dollars in a calendar year)) or to a bona fide political
party that in the aggregate exceed ((two thousand five)) one hundred
dollars in a calendar year. This subsection does not apply to loans
made in the ordinary course of business.
(7) For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, a
contribution to the authorized political committee of a candidate, or
of ((a state)) an elected official against whom recall charges have
been filed, is considered to be a contribution to the candidate or
state official.
(8) A contribution received within the twelve-month period after a
recall election concerning ((a state)) an elected office is considered
to be a contribution during that recall campaign if the contribution is
used to pay a debt or obligation incurred to influence the outcome of
that recall campaign.
(9) The contributions allowed by subsection (2) of this section are
in addition to those allowed by subsection (1) of this section, and the
contributions allowed by subsection (4) of this section are in addition
to those allowed by subsection (3) of this section.
(10) RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790 apply to a special election
conducted to fill a vacancy in ((a state)) an elected office. However,
the contributions made to a candidate or received by a candidate for a
primary or special election conducted to fill such a vacancy shall not
be counted toward any of the limitations that apply to the candidate or
to contributions made to the candidate for any other primary or
election.
(11) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this section, no
corporation or business entity not doing business in Washington state,
no labor union with fewer than ten members who reside in Washington
state, and no political committee that has not received contributions
of ten dollars or more from at least ten persons registered to vote in
Washington state during the preceding one hundred eighty days may make
contributions reportable under this chapter to a candidate, to ((a
state)) an elected official against whom recall charges have been
filed, or to a political committee having the expectation of making
expenditures in support of the recall of the official. This subsection
does not apply to loans made in the ordinary course of business.
(12) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this section, no
county central committee or legislative district committee may make
contributions reportable under this chapter to a candidate, ((state))
an elected official against whom recall charges have been filed, or a
political committee having the expectation of making expenditures in
support of the recall of ((a state)) an elected official if the county
central committee or legislative district committee is outside of the
jurisdiction entitled to elect the candidate or recall the ((state))
official.
(13) No person may accept contributions that exceed the
contribution limitations provided in this section.
(14) The following contributions are exempt from the contribution
limits of this section:
(a) An expenditure or contribution earmarked for voter
registration, for absentee ballot information, for precinct caucuses,
for get-out-the-vote campaigns, for precinct judges or inspectors, for
sample ballots, or for ballot counting, all without promotion of or
political advertising for individual candidates; or
(b) An expenditure by a political committee for its own internal
organization or fund raising without direct association with individual
candidates.

Sec. 117 RCW 42.17.020 and 2002 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Adjusted spending limit" means a spending limit as further
adjusted to account for reported overages under section 108 of this
act.
(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(((2))) (3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee
authorized by a candidate, or by the public official against whom
recall charges have been filed, to accept contributions or make
expenditures on behalf of the candidate or public official.
(((3))) (4) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by
RCW ((29.01.110)) 29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum
proposition proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any
municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other voting
constituency from and after the time when the proposition has been
initially filed with the appropriate election officer of that
constituency prior to its circulation for signatures.
(((4))) (5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial,
economic, or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial,
proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(((5))) (6) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has filed a valid certificate of
nomination with the secretary of state under chapter ((29.24)) 29A.20
RCW;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW ((29.01.090)) 29A.04.085, that is
the body authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise
authority on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(((6) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.
(7) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(8))) (7) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(((9))) (8) "Caucus political committee" means a political
committee organized and maintained by the members of a major political
party in the state senate or state house of representatives.
(((10))) (9) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the
service of communicating messages or producing printed material for
broadcast or distribution to the general public or segments of the
general public whether through the use of newspapers, magazines,
television and radio stations, billboard companies, direct mail
advertising companies, printing companies, or otherwise.
(((11))) (10) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW
42.17.350.
(((12))) (11) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower
meaning, includes payment in any form for real or personal property or
services of any kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance
with RCW 42.17.241, the term "compensation" shall not include per diem
allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse
a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged
in the official business of the governmental entity.
(((13))) (12) "Continuing political committee" means a political
committee that is an organization of continuing existence not
established in anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(((14))) (13)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising prepared by a candidate, a
political committee, or its authorized agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the
individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(14) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee under RCW 42.17.050.
(15) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or
special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill
a vacancy in any such office.
(16) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election
for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is
submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the
qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set
forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of
the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for
purposes of this chapter.
(17) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in
opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(18) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day
of December after the date of the last previous general election for
the office that the candidate seeks and ending on November 30th after
the next election for the office. In the case of a special election to
fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period
beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on November 30th
after the special election.
(19) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of
value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure"
also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of
value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or
anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring
any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or
opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter,
agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be
reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made. The
term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete repayment
by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a loan, the
receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(20) "Exploratory period" means the period beginning on the day
after the previous general election for the office being sought and
ending the day before the start of the qualifying period for that
office.
(21) "Final report" means the report described as a final report in
RCW 42.17.080(2).
(((21))) (22) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640
means the election that results in the election of a person to a state
office. It does not include a primary.
(((22))) (23) "General election period" means the period beginning
on the day after the primary election and ending on the day of the
general election. For a recall election, the "general election period"
extends from the day after the end of the qualifying period to the day
of the recall election.
(24) "General election matching limits" means forty thousand
dollars.
(25) "Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.
(((23))) (26) "Immediate family" includes the spouse, dependent
children, and other dependent relatives, if living in the household.
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, "immediate family"
means an individual's spouse, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister
of the individual and the spouse of any such person and a child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half
brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse and the
spouse of any such person.
(((24))) (27) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that
has each of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of five hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.
(((25))) (28)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits
a contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless
the contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family as
defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an
association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(((26))) (29) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions,
amendments, nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in
either house of the state legislature, and includes any other matter
that may be the subject of action by either house or any committee of
the legislature and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both
houses, are pending approval by the governor.
(((27))) (30) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature
of the state of Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule,
standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency
under the state Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes an association's or other
organization's act of communicating with the members of that
association or organization.
(((28))) (31) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in
his or her own or another's behalf.
(((29))) (32) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by
whom a lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is
compensated for acting as a lobbyist.
(((30))) (33) "Nonparticipating candidate" means a candidate who
does not become certified as a participating candidate under section
102 of this act and the authorized committee of the candidate.
(34) "Participating candidate" means a candidate who becomes
certified as a participating candidate under section 102 of this act
and the authorized committee of the candidate.
(35) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint venture,
public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or local
governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(((31))) (36) "Person in interest" means the person who is the
subject of a record or any representative designated by that person,
except that if that person is under a legal disability, the term
"person in interest" means and includes the parent or duly appointed
legal representative.
(((32))) (37) "Political advertising" includes any advertising
displays, newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles,
tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other
means of mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing,
directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support in
any election campaign.
(((33))) (38) "Political committee" means any person (except a
candidate or an individual dealing with his or her own funds or
property) having the expectation of receiving contributions or making
expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any
ballot proposition.
(((34))) (39) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
procedure for nominating a candidate to state office under chapter
((29.18 or 29.21)) 29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that
uses, in large measure, the procedures established in chapter ((29.18
or 29.21)) 29A.52 RCW.
(((35))) (40) "Primary election matching limits" means forty
thousand dollars.
(41) "Primary period" means the nine-week period ending on the day
of the primary election. There is no primary period for a recall
election.
(42) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial, county,
city, town, school district, port district, special district, or other
state political subdivision elective office.
(((36))) (43) "Public record" includes any writing containing
information relating to the conduct of government or the performance of
any governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or
retained by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(((37))) (44) "Qualifying period" means the period beginning on the
first day of August in the year before an election, for an election for
state office other than legislative, or on the first day of January of
an election year, for an election for state legislative office and
ending on the close of the regular filing period for the office. For
a recall election, the qualifying period begins when the election is
called and lasts for thirty days.
(45) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the
date of the filing of recall charges under RCW ((29.82.015)) 29A.56.120
and ending thirty days after the recall election.
(((38))) (46) "State legislative office" means the office of a
member of the state house of representatives or the office of a member
of the state senate.
(((39))) (47) "State office" means state legislative office or the
office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney
general, commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner,
superintendent of public instruction, state auditor, or state
treasurer.
(((40))) (48) "State official" means a person who holds a state
office.
(((41))) (49) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political
committee or candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the
possession or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the
election for which the contributions were received, and that are in
excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the
committee or candidate prior to that election. In the case of a
continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those
contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee
that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts
when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17.065.
(((42))) (50) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the
individuals appointed by a candidate or political committee, under RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(51) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.
As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any
gender, the other, as the context requires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 A new section is added to chapter 82.24
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the tax imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes set forth in RCW
82.24.020, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to the rate of
five mills per cigarette effective January 1, 2005. All revenues
collected during any month from this additional tax must be deposited
in the citizens' clean elections fund created under section 111 of this
act by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 RCW 42.17.128 (Use of public funds for
political purposes) and 1993 c 2 s 24 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 Sections 101 through 116 of this act may
be known as the Citizens' Clean Elections Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 Sections 101 through 114 of this act are
each added to chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 Captions and part headings used in this
act are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---