BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.79.075 and 2002 c 139 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of financial management, in consultation with the
secretary of state, the attorney general, the legislature, and any
other appropriate state or local agency, shall prepare a fiscal impact
statement for each of the following state ballot measures: (1) An
initiative to the people that is certified to the ballot; (2) an
initiative to the legislature that will appear on the ballot; (3) an
alternative measure appearing on the ballot that the legislature
proposes to an initiative to the legislature; (4) a referendum bill
referred to voters by the legislature; and (5) a referendum measure
appearing on the ballot. Fiscal impact statements must be written in
clear and concise language and avoid legal and technical terms when
possible, and may include easily understood graphics.
A fiscal impact statement must describe any projected increase or
decrease in revenues, costs, expenditures, or indebtedness that the
state or local governments will experience if the ballot measure were
approved by state voters. A fiscal impact statement may describe, to
the extent feasible, any direct fiscal impact private industry or
individuals will experience if the ballot measure were approved by
state voters. Where appropriate, a fiscal impact statement may include
both estimated dollar amounts and a description placing the estimated
dollar amounts into context. A fiscal impact statement must include
both a summary of not to exceed one hundred words and a more detailed
statement that includes the assumptions that were made to develop the
fiscal impacts.
Fiscal impact statements must be available online from the
secretary of state's web site and included in the state voters'
pamphlet.

--- END ---