BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.10.034 and 2003 c 105 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Every petition filed in proceedings under this chapter shall
contain a statement alleging whether the child is or may be an Indian
child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903. If the child is an Indian
child as defined under the Indian child welfare act, the provisions of
the act shall apply.
(b) Whenever the court or the petitioning party in a third party
custody proceeding knows or has reason to know that an Indian child is
involved, the petitioning party must promptly provide notice to the
child's parent or Indian custodian and to the agent designated by the
child's Indian tribe to receive such notices. Notice shall be by
registered mail with return receipt requested. If the identity or
location of the parent or Indian custodian and the tribe cannot be
determined, notice shall be given to the secretary of the interior by
registered mail with return receipt requested. If the child may be a
member of more than one tribe, the petitioning party shall notify the
tribe that has more significant contacts with the child, as determined
by the court based on the Indian child welfare act.
(c) The notice shall: (i) Contain a statement notifying the parent
or custodian and the tribe of the pending proceeding; and (ii) notify
the tribe of the tribe's right to intervene and/or request that the
case be transferred to tribal court.
(2) Every order or decree entered in any proceeding under this
chapter shall contain a finding that the Indian child welfare act does
or does not apply. Where there is a finding that the Indian child
welfare act does apply, the decree or order must also contain a finding
that all notice requirements and evidentiary requirements under the
Indian child welfare act have been satisfied.

--- END ---