BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A contract to provide inmates with access to telecommunications
services in a facility operated by the department may not include a
commission or other payment to the department based upon amounts billed
by the telecommunications provider for telephone calls made by inmates
in the facility.
(2) This section does not apply to any contract in effect on the
effective date of this act, but does apply to any renegotiation,
renewal, or extension of such a contract.

--- END ---