BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.30.040 and 1989 c 431 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a unit of local government is required to make
purchases from the lowest bidder or from the supplier offering the
lowest price for the items desired to be purchased, the unit of local
government may, at its option when awarding a purchase contract to a
supplier located within its boundaries, either take into consideration
tax revenue it would receive from such supplier, or allow a local
supplier purchase credit of up to five percent of the bid amount or
purchase price, when purchasing ((the)) supplies, materials, or
equipment from ((a)) such supplier ((located within its boundaries)).
The unit of local government must award the purchase contract to the
lowest bidder after such tax revenue or the local supplier purchase
credit has been considered. However, any local government may allow
for preferential purchase of products made from recycled materials or
products that may be recycled or reused.
(2) The tax revenues which units of local government may consider
include sales taxes that the unit of local government imposes upon the
sale of such supplies, materials, or equipment from the supplier to the
unit of local government, and business and occupation taxes that the
unit of local government imposes upon the supplier that are measured by
the gross receipts of the supplier from such sale. Any unit of local
government which considers tax revenues it would receive from the
imposition of taxes upon a supplier located within its boundaries,
shall also consider tax revenues it would receive from taxes it imposes
upon a supplier located outside its boundaries.
(((2))) (3) As used in this section((, the term)):
(a) "Local supplier purchase credit" means a credit applied for the
benefit of a supplier located within the boundaries of a local unit of
government and which allows such government, for purposes of comparison
to other bids or sale prices received from nonlocal suppliers, to treat
a bid or sale price as being of a lesser amount than the actual dollar
amount of the bid or sale price; and
(b) "Unit of local government" means any county, city, town,
metropolitan municipal corporation, public transit benefit area, county
transportation authority, or other municipal or quasi-municipal
corporation authorized to impose sales and use taxes or business and
occupation taxes.

--- END ---