BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is no
uniform way amongst police agencies across the state for taking reports
on missing persons. Federal and state statutes require local law
enforcement agencies to immediately take missing person reports for
children and then file and enter that information into the state
missing person computerized network after notification of a missing
child. However, there is no such consistent policy or requirement for
cases involving missing adults.
Some law enforcement agencies impose waiting periods of up to
seventy-two hours before accepting a missing adult report, others will
only take a report if it is filed by a relative, and still others will
simply decline to take a report if there are no signs that the missing
person is endangered or if the person happens to live or disappear from
outside of their jurisdiction.
The legislature believes that, at a minimum, a written or
electronic report should be initiated for all reports of missing
persons made to law enforcement agencies across the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs shall conduct a study on the practice of taking missing
person reports by law enforcement agencies in Washington. The study
shall:
(1) Determine the feasibility and costs to local law enforcement
agencies for taking telephonic recordings of missing person reports;
(2) Identify ways to eliminate waiting periods for law enforcement
officers to take a report;
(3) Identify a way to track and enter information from such reports
into a state data base;
(4) Identify ways to more rapidly identify human remains;
(5) Identify ways for more rapid prosecution of those convicted of
harming or kidnapping a missing person;
(6) Identify what is currently in state and federal statutes
regarding how to handle missing person reports;
(7) Identify whether local law enforcement agencies show any
consistency of compliance to current statutes; and
(8) Make recommendations on how to improve how missing persons are
reported, how missing reports are handled, how missing persons are
identified, and how human remains of missing persons are identified and
handled.
The study shall be submitted to the governor and legislature by
December 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---