BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, counties and cities shall include the best available science
in developing policies and development regulations to protect the
functions and values of critical areas. In addition, counties and
cities shall give special consideration to conservation or protection
measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous fisheries.
(2) ((If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas)) (a) The requirement to
include the best available science is procedural, rather than
substantive, and means consideration of scientific information, as
defined in (b) of this subsection, which most applies to the physical
and biological setting under consideration.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "scientific information"
means information derived from a process utilizing recognized methods
and principles to test hypotheses and reach greater understanding about
the workings of the physical world. The characteristics of a sound
scientific process include, as applicable: (i) Findings that have been
critically reviewed by qualified scientific experts in the field; (ii)
methods that are standard in the field or peer-reviewed; (iii)
conclusions that are logical and the inferences drawn from those
conclusions reasonable given the data and methods; (iv) data that has
been analyzed using standard or peer-reviewed quantitative or
statistical methods; (v) data and findings that are placed in their
proper context; and (vi) assumptions, analytical techniques, and
conclusions that are shown to be supported by reference to relevant,
credible scientific literature.
(3) Not all sources of sound scientific information incorporate all
of the generally accepted characteristics of science, as defined in
subsection (2)(b) of this section. However, the more characteristics
that are incorporated into the process, the more sound and reliable the
conclusions are likely to be.
(4) If scientific information that directly applies to a given
physical context is not available, a county or city need not conduct or
commission new scientific studies to fill gaps in the existing
scientific record in order to have complied with the requirements of
this section. Rather, a county or city may employ experimental
approaches to designate and protect critical areas: PROVIDED, That if
a county or city develops a policy or regulation regarding a critical
area on information that does not satisfy all of the characteristics of
science, or on conflicting scientific information, the county or city
shall employ monitoring and adaptive management techniques to learn
whether the approach used is adequately protecting the functions and
values of that critical area, and adjust the approach as necessary to
achieve adequate protection.
(5) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.

--- END ---