BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.40.060 and 2001 c 71 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every officer and employee of the state or of any county, city,
or other political subdivision thereof who is a member of the
Washington national guard or of the army, navy, air force, coast guard,
or marine corps reserve of the United States, or of any organized
reserve or armed forces of the United States shall be entitled to and
shall be granted military leave of absence from such employment for a
period not exceeding fifteen days during each year beginning October
1st and ending the following September 30th. Such leave shall be
granted in order that the person may report for active duty, when
called, or take part in active training duty in such manner and at such
time as he or she may be ordered to active duty or active training
duty. Such military leave of absence shall be in addition to any
vacation or sick leave to which the officer or employee might otherwise
be entitled, and shall not involve any loss of efficiency rating,
privileges, or pay. During the period of military leave, the officer
or employee shall receive from the state, or the county, city, or other
political subdivision, his or her normal pay.
(2) Every officer and employee of the state or of any county, city,
or other political subdivision thereof who is a member of the
Washington national guard or of the army, navy, air force, coast guard,
or marine corps reserve of the United States, or of any organized
reserve or armed forces of the United States is entitled to and shall
be granted military leave of absence from their employment for a period
not exceeding two years subject to a mobilization under Title 10 of the
United States Code. This leave shall be granted in order that the
person may report for active duty. This military leave of absence is
in addition to any vacation or sick leave to which the officer or
employee might otherwise be entitled, and shall not involve any loss of
efficiency rating, privileges, or pay. During the period of military
leave, the officer or employee shall receive his or her normal pay from
the state, or the county, city, or other political subdivision, after
deduction of military pay. The office of financial management shall
adopt rules necessary to implement this subsection.

--- END ---