BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.20A.710 and 2001 c 296 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall investigate the conviction records, pending
charges and disciplinary board final decisions of:
(a) Any current employee or applicant seeking or being considered
for any position with the department ((who will or may have
unsupervised access to children, vulnerable adults, or individuals with
mental illness or developmental disabilities. This includes, but is
not limited to, positions conducting comprehensive assessments,
financial eligibility determinations, licensing and certification
activities, investigations, surveys, or case management; or for state
positions otherwise required by federal law to meet employment
standards));
(b) ((Individual providers who are paid by the state and providers
who are paid by home care agencies to provide in-home services
involving unsupervised access to persons with physical, mental, or
developmental disabilities or mental illness, or to vulnerable adults
as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW, including but not limited to services
provided under chapter 74.39 or 74.39A RCW; and
(c))) Individuals or persons acting on behalf of businesses or
organizations for the care, supervision, case management, or treatment
of children, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults,
including but not limited to services contracted for under chapter
18.20, 18.48, 70.127, 70.128, 72.36, or 74.39A RCW or Title 71A RCW;
and
(c) Individuals or persons acting on behalf of businesses or
organizations who have access to information in the control of the
department or who have access to information prepared on behalf of, or
in preparation for use by, the department.
(2) The investigation may include an examination of state and
national criminal identification data. The secretary shall use the
information solely for the purpose of determining the character,
suitability, and competence of these applicants.
(3) An individual provider or home care agency provider who has
resided in the state less than three years before applying for
employment involving unsupervised access to a vulnerable adult as
defined in chapter 74.34 RCW must be fingerprinted for the purpose of
investigating conviction records both through the Washington state
patrol and the federal bureau of investigation. This subsection
applies only with respect to the provision of in-home services funded
by medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520, community options
program entry system waiver services under RCW 74.39A.030, or chore
services under RCW 74.39A.110. However, this subsection does not
supersede RCW 74.15.030(2)(b).
(4) An individual provider or home care agency provider hired to
provide in-home care for and having unsupervised access to a vulnerable
adult as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW must have no conviction for a
disqualifying crime under RCW 43.43.830 and 43.43.842. An individual
or home care agency provider must also have no conviction for a crime
relating to drugs as defined in RCW 43.43.830. This subsection applies
only with respect to the provision of in-home services funded by
medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520, community options program
entry system waiver services under RCW 74.39A.030, or chore services
under RCW 74.39A.110.
(5) The secretary shall provide the results of the background check
on individual providers to the persons hiring them or to their legal
guardians, if any, for their determination of the character,
suitability, and competence of the applicants. If the person elects to
hire or retain an individual provider after receiving notice from the
department that the applicant has a conviction for an offense that
would disqualify the applicant from having unsupervised access to
persons with physical, mental, or developmental disabilities or mental
illness, or to vulnerable adults as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW, then
the secretary shall deny payment for any subsequent services rendered
by the disqualified individual provider.
(6) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the secretary such
information as they may have and that the secretary may require for
such purpose.

--- END ---