BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts received by a nonprofit organization from the United States or
any instrumentality thereof or from the state of Washington or any
municipal corporation or political subdivision thereof as grants to
support salmon restoration purposes. For the purposes of this section,
"nonprofit organization" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.3651.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---