BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.754 and 2002 c 289 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every adult or juvenile individual ((convicted of a felony,
stalking under RCW 9A.46.110, harassment under RCW 9A.46.020,
communicating with a minor for immoral purposes under RCW 9.68A.090, or
adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense)) must have a
biological sample collected for purposes of DNA identification analysis
if he or she:
(a) Has been convicted, or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent
juvenile offense, of any of the following crimes:
(i) Any felony;
(ii) Stalking under RCW 9A.46.110;
(iii) Harassment under RCW 9A.46.020;
(iv) Communicating with a minor for immoral purposes under RCW
9.68A.090;
(v) Patronizing a prostitute under RCW 9A.88.110;
(b) Has been charged with any of the following crimes or equivalent
juvenile offenses, but pled guilty to another offense:
(i) Any felony;
(ii) Patronizing a prostitute under RCW 9A.88.110; or
(c) Has been found not guilty by reason of insanity for any crime
listed in (a) of this subsection.
(2) The biological sample shall be collected in the following
manner:
(a) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement
in a department of corrections facility, and do serve a term of
confinement in a city or county jail facility, the city or county shall
be responsible for obtaining the biological samples either as part of
the intake process into the city or county jail or detention facility
for those persons convicted on or after July 1, 2002, or within a
reasonable time after July 1, 2002, for those persons incarcerated
before July 1, 2002, who have not yet had a biological sample
collected, beginning with those persons who will be released the
soonest.
(b) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement
in a department of corrections facility, and do not serve a term of
confinement in a city or county jail facility, the local police
department or sheriff's office is responsible for obtaining the
biological samples after sentencing on or after July 1, 2002.
(c) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense, who are serving or who are to serve a
term of confinement in a department of corrections facility or a
department of social and health services facility, the facility holding
the person shall be responsible for obtaining the biological samples
either as part of the intake process into such facility for those
persons convicted on or after July 1, 2002, or within a reasonable time
after July 1, 2002, for those persons incarcerated before July 1, 2002,
who have not yet had a biological sample collected, beginning with
those persons who will be released the soonest.
(d) For persons found not guilty by reason of insanity for any
crime listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section, the local police
department or sheriff's office is responsible for obtaining the
biological samples before the person is civilly committed or released
on or after July 1, 2004.
(((2))) (3) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.752
through 43.43.758 may be retained by the forensic laboratory services
bureau, and shall be used solely for the purpose of providing DNA or
other tests for identification analysis and prosecution of a criminal
offense or for the identification of human remains or missing persons.
Nothing in this section prohibits the submission of results derived
from the biological samples to the federal bureau of investigation
combined DNA index system.
(((3))) (4) The director of the forensic laboratory services bureau
of the Washington state patrol shall perform testing on all biological
samples collected under subsection (1) of this section, to the extent
allowed by funding available for this purpose. The director shall give
priority to testing on samples collected from those adults or juveniles
convicted of a felony or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense that is defined as a sex offense or a violent offense in RCW
9.94A.030.
(((4))) (5) This section applies to all adults who are convicted of
a sex or violent offense after July 1, 1990; and to all adults who were
convicted of a sex or violent offense on or prior to July 1, 1990, and
who are still incarcerated on or after July 25, 1999. This section
applies to all juveniles who are adjudicated guilty of a sex or violent
offense after July 1, 1994; and to all juveniles who were adjudicated
guilty of a sex or violent offense on or prior to July 1, 1994, and who
are still incarcerated on or after July 25, 1999. This section applies
to all adults and juveniles who are convicted of a felony other than a
sex or violent offense, stalking under RCW 9A.46.110, harassment under
RCW 9A.46.020, or communicating with a minor for immoral purposes under
RCW 9.68A.090, or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense,
on or after July 1, 2002; and to all adults and juveniles who were
convicted or adjudicated guilty of such an offense before July 1, 2002,
and are still incarcerated on or after July 1, 2002. This section
applies to all adults and juveniles who are convicted of patronizing a
prostitute under RCW 9A.88.110, or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent
juvenile offense, on or after July 1, 2004; to all adults and juveniles
who were charged with any felony or patronizing a prostitute under RCW
9A.88.110, or an equivalent juvenile offense, but pled guilty to
another offense on or after July 1, 2004; to all adults and juveniles
who were found not guilty by reason of insanity for any crime listed in
subsection (1)(a) of this section on or after July 1, 2004; and to all
such adults and juveniles who were convicted, adjudicated guilty, pled
guilty, or found not guilty by reason of insanity before July 1, 2004,
and are still incarcerated or held on or after July 1, 2004.
(((5))) (6) This section creates no rights in a third person. No
cause of action may be brought based upon the noncollection or
nonanalysis or the delayed collection or analysis of a biological
sample authorized to be taken under RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758.
(((6))) (7) The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based
upon a data base match or data base information is not invalidated if
it is determined that the sample was obtained or placed in the data
base by mistake, or if the conviction or juvenile adjudication that
resulted in the collection of the biological sample was subsequently
vacated or otherwise altered in any future proceeding including but not
limited to posttrial or postfact-finding motions, appeals, or
collateral attacks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2004, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---