BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No law enforcement officer shall be required to do any of the
following:
(a) Issue a specific number of citations, notices of infraction, or
warning notices during any specified time period for violations of
traffic regulations;
(b) Stop a specific number of persons or vehicles during any
specified time period for the purpose of preventing or detecting
violations of traffic regulations;
(c) Make a specific number of arrests during any specified time
period for traffic laws under chapter 46.61 RCW.
(2) The number of citations, notices of infraction, or warning
notices issued by a law enforcement officer for violations of traffic
regulations and the number of traffic stops and arrests made by a law
enforcement officer for violations of traffic laws under chapter 46.61
RCW shall not be given greater consideration than any other factor that
is used in deciding the law enforcement officer's job assignment or
promotion or in evaluating the performance of the law enforcement
officer.
(3) This section shall not be construed as superseding the duty of
a law enforcement officer to maintain public order, keep and preserve
the peace, protect the public health, safety, and welfare, and enforce
the laws of the state of Washington.
(4) "Law enforcement officer" has the same meaning as "peace
officer" given in RCW 43.101.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---