BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.36.035 and 1998 c 176 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by this chapter shall be computed by
multiplying the tax rate per gallon provided in this chapter by the
number of gallons of motor vehicle fuel subject to the motor vehicle
fuel tax.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, tax
reports shall be accompanied by a remittance payable to the state
treasurer covering the tax amount determined to be due for the
reporting period.
(3) If the tax is paid by electronic funds transfer, the tax shall
be paid on or before the ((tenth)) twenty-sixth calendar day of the
month ((that is the second month)) immediately following the reporting
period. ((When the reporting period is May, the tax shall be paid on
the last business day of June)) If the payment date falls on a
Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday the next business day will be the
payment date.
(4) The tax shall be paid by electronic funds transfer whenever the
amount due is fifty thousand dollars or more.
(5) A motor vehicle fuel distributor shall remit tax on motor
vehicle fuel purchased from a motor vehicle fuel supplier, and due to
the state for that reporting period, to the motor vehicle fuel
supplier.
(((6) At the election of the distributor, the payment of the motor
vehicle fuel tax owed on motor vehicle fuel purchased from a supplier
shall be remitted to the supplier on terms agreed upon between the
distributor and supplier or no later than two business days before the
last business day of the following month. This election shall be
subject to a condition that the distributor's remittances of all
amounts of motor vehicle fuel tax due to the supplier shall be paid by
electronic funds transfer. The distributor's election may be
terminated by the supplier if the distributor does not make timely
payments to the supplier as required by this section. This section
shall not apply if the distributor is required by the supplier to pay
cash or cash equivalent for motor vehicle fuel purchases.))

Sec. 2 RCW 82.38.160 and 1998 c 176 s 68 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by this chapter shall be computed by
multiplying the tax rate per gallon provided in this chapter by the
number of gallons of special fuel subject to the special fuel tax.
(2) A special fuel distributor shall remit tax on special fuel
purchased from a special fuel supplier, and due to the state for that
reporting period, to the special fuel supplier.
(3) ((At the election of the distributor, the payment of the
special fuel tax owed on special fuel purchased from a supplier shall
be remitted to the supplier on terms agreed upon between the
distributor and the supplier or no later than two business days before
the last business day of the following month. This election shall be
subject to a condition that the distributor's remittances of all
amounts of special fuel tax due to the supplier shall be paid by
electronic funds transfer. The distributor's election may be
terminated by the supplier if the distributor does not make timely
payments to the supplier as required by this section. This section
shall not apply if the distributor is required by the supplier to pay
cash or cash equivalent for special fuel purchases.
(4))) Except as provided in subsection (((5))) (4) of this section,
the tax return shall be accompanied by a remittance payable to the
state treasurer covering the tax amount determined to be due for the
reporting period.
(((5))) (4) If the tax is paid by electronic funds transfer, the
tax shall be paid on or before the ((tenth)) twenty-sixth calendar day
of the month ((that is the second month)) immediately following the
reporting period. ((When the reporting period is May, the tax shall be
paid on the last state business day of June.)) If the tax is paid by
electronic funds transfer and the reporting period ends on a day other
than the last day of a calendar month as provided in RCW 82.38.150, the
tax shall be paid on or before the last ((state)) business day of the
thirty-day period following the end of the reporting period. If the
payment date falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday the next
business day will be the payment date.
(((6))) (5) The tax shall be paid by electronic funds transfer
whenever the amount due is fifty thousand dollars or more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.36.405 (Liability, payment, and report of taxes due
before March 2000 -- Inventory report -- Penalties, interest) and 1998 c
176 s 47; and
(2) RCW 82.38.289 (Liability, payment, and report of taxes due
before March 2000 -- Inventory report -- Penalties, interest) and 1998 c
176 s 82.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---