BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to all other license fees, passenger cars, travel
trailers, and motor homes shall pay an annual roadway improvement fee
of one and one-half cents per vehicle pound based on the vehicle curb
weight. In addition, vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 weighing
less than ten thousand pounds shall pay an annual roadway improvement
fee of one and one-half cents per pound based on the vehicle curb
weight.
(2) The department shall collect the fee annually at the time of
license renewal. The department shall rely on vehicle curb weights as
provided by vehicle manufacturers to determine the weight of each
vehicle type. The department shall adopt rules to handle vehicles
without manufacturer curb weights, such as home-built vehicles.
(3) The fee collected under this section must be deposited into the
motor vehicle account. Two-thirds of the revenue will be used by the
state exclusively for highway improvement projects. The remainder will
be divided equally between counties and cities and distributed monthly
to counties and cities by the state treasurer. A particular county's
distribution will be based on the number of vehicles registered in that
county as a percentage of the state's total registrations, and a
particular city's distribution will be based on its population as a
percentage of the state's total population living within incorporated
areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to license renewals
occurring on or after January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2005.

--- END ---