BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.68.080 and 1961 c 12 s 46.68.080 are each amended
to read as follows:
All motor vehicle license fees and all motor vehicle fuel tax
directly or indirectly paid by the residents of those counties composed
entirely of islands and which have neither a fixed physical connection
with the mainland nor any state highways on any of the islands of which
they are composed, shall be paid into the ((motor vehicle fund of the
state of Washington and shall monthly, as they accrue, and after
deducting therefrom the expenses of issuing such licenses and the cost
of collecting such motor vehicle fuel tax, be paid to the county
treasurer of each such county to be by him disbursed as hereinafter
provided)) Puget Sound capital construction account to be used for the
construction of new ferries.
One-half of all motor vehicle license fees and motor vehicle fuel
tax directly or indirectly paid by the residents of those counties
composed entirely of islands and which have either a fixed physical
connection with the mainland or state highways on any of the islands of
which they are composed, shall be paid into the ((motor vehicle fund of
the state of Washington and shall monthly, as they accrue, and after
deducting therefrom the expenses of issuing such licenses and the cost
of collecting such motor vehicle fuel tax, be paid to the county
treasurer of each such county to be by him disbursed as hereinafter
provided.
All funds paid to the county treasurer of the counties of either
class above referred to as in this section provided, shall be by such
county treasurer distributed and credited to the several road districts
of each such county and paid to the city treasurer of each incorporated
city and town within each such county, in the direct proportion that
the assessed valuation of each such road district and incorporated city
and town shall bear to the total assessed valuation of each such
county.
The amount of motor vehicle fuel tax paid by the residents of those
counties composed entirely of islands shall, for the purposes of this
section, be that percentage of the total amount of motor vehicle fuel
tax collected in the state that the motor vehicle license fees paid by
the residents of counties composed entirely of islands bears to the
total motor vehicle license fees paid by the residents of the state))
Puget Sound capital construction account to be used for the
construction of new ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---