BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that twenty-eight of
the state's thirty-nine currently operating county courthouses appear
to meet the state criteria as historic buildings. Washington's
historic county courthouses are an unsurpassed historical and
architectural collection reflecting civic pride, local heritage, and
master craftsmanship. These buildings are intensively used by the
public as the seats of county government and as judicial and criminal
justice centers. As anchors of the downtown commercial cores of their
communities, these courthouses strengthen local commerce, attract
tourism, and provide a sense of identity. Capital improvements to
these landmarks are needed to protect their safety and historic and
architectural integrity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 27.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The historic county courthouse grant program is established for
the protection and preservation of the state's historic county
courthouses.
(2) The historic county courthouse account is created in the state
treasury. Legislative appropriations for the purpose of the historic
county courthouse grant program shall be deposited to the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account shall be used exclusively to fund the
historic county courthouse grant program.
(3) The office of archaeology and historic preservation within the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall
administer the historic county courthouse grant program. No more than
one percent of the expenditures from the historic county courthouse
account may be used for the administrative purposes of the department.
All other expenditures from the account shall be for grants to be made
to counties for the protection and preservation of courthouses that
meet the eligibility requirements for listing on the Washington
heritage register established under RCW 27.34.220. Counties receiving
grants under this section shall provide an equal amount of matching
funds from public or private sources.
(4) By October 1, 2004, the department shall establish eligibility
criteria and a grant application process. Grants may be made for
courthouse protection and preservation, including character defining
architectural features, general repairs, system upgrades, and
improvements to access and accommodations for persons with
disabilities. All rehabilitation work shall comply with the federal
department of the interior's standards for rehabilitation. Grants
shall not be used for expenditures for courthouse maintenance. Only
counties with historic courthouses that continue to maintain county
functions are eligible for grants under this section.
(5) The office of archaeology and historic preservation shall
establish an historic courthouse advisory board that includes two
county elected officials appointed by the Washington state association
of counties, two county elected officials appointed by the Washington
association of county officials, a representative of a statewide
historic preservation organization, a representative from a county
heritage commission that is a certified local government, a member of
the senate appointed by the president of the senate, a member of the
house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, a member of the state advisory council on historic
preservation, and up to three at-large members with expertise in
architecture, architectural history, construction, construction
management, engineering, planning, or a related field.
(6) If available funds in the account exceed eligible courthouse
grant recipients, historic county-owned facilities such as libraries,
museums, and hospitals may apply for grants using the same criteria.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of ten million dollars is
appropriated from the state building construction account for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, to the historic county courthouse
account. The department of community, trade, and economic development
may expend up to ten million dollars from the account during the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2005, to carry out the purposes of section 2 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---