BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall at the request of the United States bureau of
reclamation and federal reclamation project irrigation districts
cooperatively conduct a use attainability analysis of water bodies
located within the boundaries of the federal reclamation project. The
department shall adopt rules designating uses for water bodies within
the federal reclamation project that reflect the intended use of
constructed storage and conveyance facilities and other water transport
systems for authorized project purposes and the unique site-specific
characteristics of the arid and semiarid regions of the state of
Washington where federal reclamation projects are located. The rules
shall be consistent with authorized project purposes and shall not
impair authorized project contracts or interfere with the construction,
operation, or maintenance of project facilities.

--- END ---