BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall conduct a
child fatality review in the event of an unexpected death of a minor in
the state who is in the care of or receiving services described in
chapter 74.13 RCW from the department or who has been in the care of or
received services described in chapter 74.13 RCW from the department
within one year preceding the minor's death.
(2) Upon conclusion of a child fatality review required pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, the department shall issue a report on
the results of the review to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and shall make copies of the report available to the public
upon request.
(3) The department shall develop and implement procedures to carry
out the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

--- END ---