BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
No department employee may retaliate against a foster parent or in
any other manner discriminate against any foster parent because:
(1) The foster parent made a complaint with the office of family
and children's ombudsman, the attorney general, law enforcement
agencies, or the department, provided information, or otherwise
cooperated with the investigation of such a complaint;
(2) The foster parent has caused to be instituted any proceedings
under or related to Title 13 RCW;
(3) The foster parent has testified or is about to testify in any
proceedings under or related to Title 13 RCW;
(4) The foster parent has advocated for services on behalf of the
foster child;
(5) The foster parent has sought to adopt a foster child in the
foster parent's care; or
(6) The foster parent has discussed or consulted with anyone
concerning the foster parent's rights under this chapter or chapter
74.15 or 13.34 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop procedures for the following:
(a) Reporting a violation of section 1 of this act;
(b) Disciplinary action in response to a violation of section 1 of
this act;
(c) Informing a foster parent who reports a violation of section 1
of this act and the regional foster parent liaison of the outcome of
the report; and
(d) Informing foster parents of the provisions of section 1 of this
act and the procedures developed in accordance with this subsection.
(2) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature on the procedures developed in accordance with
subsection 1 of this section by January 1, 2005.

--- END ---