BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Strong marital relationships result in
stronger children, families, and ultimately, stronger communities and
place less of a fiscal burden on the state. Relationship skills can be
learned, and once learned these skills can facilitate communication and
assist couples in avoiding conflict. In addition, effective
relationship skills are used in parenting, the workplace, schools,
neighborhoods, and other relationships. The state has a compelling
interest in encouraging its citizens in developing the relationship and
communication skills that are vital for a successful and fulfilling
marriage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
Each school district board of directors shall develop and adopt a
family preservation education program curriculum and offer a one credit
family preservation course in high school. If the board of directors
chooses not to adopt the model curriculum developed by the
superintendent of public instruction, the board shall submit to the
office of superintendent of public instruction a copy of its proposed
curriculum for approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a family preservation education program model curriculum that
is available to each of the school district boards of directors. The
model curriculum shall be posted on the superintendent of public
instruction's web site. The model curriculum shall include, but is not
limited to, instruction on developing conflict management skills,
communication skills, financial responsibility, and parenting
responsibility.

--- END ---