BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the best
interest of the people of the state of Washington to contain the
significantly increasing costs of malpractice insurance for licensed
health care professionals and institutions and noninstitutional care
providers in order to ensure the continued availability and
affordability of health care services in this state by enacting further
reforms to the health care tort liability system.
The legislature finds that, notwithstanding the tort reform
measures it has enacted in the past, the amounts being paid out in
judgments and settlements have continued to increase inordinately, and
that as a result there have been dramatic increases in the cost of
health care professional liability insurance coverage. The legislature
further finds that the upward pressures on already high malpractice
insurance premiums threaten the publics' health by discouraging
physicians and other health care professionals from initiating or
continuing their practice in this state.
The legislature further finds that the state of California, largely
as a result of its enactment of the "medical injury compensation reform
act" in 1975, has been able to successfully stabilize the health care
professional liability insurance market, maintain access to affordable
quality health care services, and avert the kind of crisis now facing
the residents of Washington.
The legislature finds that such reforms are rationally related to
the legitimate goals of reducing the costs associated with the health
care tort liability system while ensuring adequate and appropriate
compensation for persons injured as a result of health care, ensuring
the continued availability and affordability of health care services in
this state, preventing the curtailment of health care services in this
state, stabilizing insurance and health care costs, preventing stale
health care liability claims, and protecting and preserving the public
health, safety, and welfare as a whole.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.56.250 and 1986 c 305 s 301 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Economic damages" means objectively verifiable monetary
losses, including medical expenses, loss of earnings, burial costs,
loss of use of property, cost of replacement or repair, cost of
obtaining substitute domestic services, loss of employment, and loss of
business or employment opportunities.
(b) "Noneconomic damages" means subjective, nonmonetary losses,
including((,)) but not limited to pain, suffering, inconvenience,
mental anguish, disability or disfigurement incurred by the injured
party, loss of ability to enjoy life, emotional distress, loss of
society and companionship, loss of consortium, injury to reputation and
humiliation, ((and)) destruction of the parent-child relationship, and
other nonpecuniary damages of any type.
(c) "Bodily injury" means physical injury, sickness, or disease,
including death.
(d) "Average annual wage" means the average annual wage in the
state of Washington as determined under RCW 50.04.355.
(2) In no action seeking damages for personal injury or death may
a claimant recover a judgment for noneconomic damages exceeding an
amount determined by multiplying 0.43 by the average annual wage and by
the life expectancy of the person incurring noneconomic damages, as the
life expectancy is determined by the life expectancy tables adopted by
the insurance commissioner. For purposes of determining the maximum
amount allowable for noneconomic damages, a claimant's life expectancy
shall not be less than fifteen years. The limitation contained in this
subsection applies to all claims for noneconomic damages made by a
claimant who incurred bodily injury. Claims for loss of consortium,
loss of society and companionship, destruction of the parent-child
relationship, and all other derivative claims asserted by persons who
did not sustain bodily injury are to be included within the limitation
on claims for noneconomic damages arising from the same bodily injury.
(3) If a case is tried to a jury, the jury shall not be informed of
the limitation contained in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 4.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action or arbitration for damages for injury or death
occurring as a result of health care, or arranging for the provision of
health care, whether brought under chapter 7.70 RCW, or under RCW
4.20.010, 4.20.020, 4.20.046, 4.20.060, 4.24.010, or 48.43.545(1), or
any combination thereof, the total amount of noneconomic damages may
not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(2) The limitation on noneconomic damages contained in subsection
(1) of this section includes all noneconomic damages claimed by or on
behalf of the person whose injury or death occurred as a result of
health care or arranging for the provision of health care, as well as
all claims for loss of consortium, loss of society and companionship,
destruction of the parent-child relationship, and other derivative
claims asserted by or on behalf of others arising from the same injury
or death. If the jury's assessment of noneconomic damages exceeds the
limitation contained in subsection (1) of this section, nothing in RCW
4.44.450 precludes the court from entering a judgment that limits the
total amount of noneconomic damages to those limits provided in
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 7.70.070 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, the
court shall, in any action under this chapter, determine the
reasonableness of each party's attorneys' fees. The court shall take
into consideration the following:
(((1))) (a) The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty
of the questions involved, and the skill requisite to perform the legal
service properly;
(((2))) (b) The likelihood, if apparent to the client, that the
acceptance of the particular employment will preclude other employment
by the lawyer;
(((3))) (c) The fee customarily charged in the locality for similar
legal services;
(((4))) (d) The amount involved and the results obtained;
(((5))) (e) The time limitations imposed by the client or by the
circumstances;
(((6))) (f) The nature and length of the professional relationship
with the client;
(((7))) (g) The experience, reputation, and ability of the lawyer
or lawyers performing the services;
(((8))) (h) Whether the fee is fixed or contingent.
(2)(a) An attorney may not contract for or collect a contingency
fee for representing a person in connection with an action for damages
against a health care provider based upon professional negligence in
excess of the following limits:
(i) Forty percent of the first fifty thousand dollars recovered;
(ii) Thirty-three and one-third percent of the next fifty thousand
dollars recovered;
(iii) Twenty-five percent of the next five hundred thousand dollars
recovered;
(iv) Fifteen percent of any amount in which the recovery exceeds
six hundred thousand dollars.
(b) The limitations in this section apply regardless of whether the
recovery is by judgment, settlement, arbitration, mediation, or other
form of alternative dispute resolution.
(c) If periodic payments are awarded to the plaintiff, the court
shall place a total value on these payments and include this amount in
computing the total award from which attorneys' fees are calculated
under this subsection.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "recovered" means the net sum
recovered after deducting any disbursements or costs incurred in
connection with prosecution or settlement of the claim. Costs of
medical care incurred by the plaintiff and the attorneys' office
overhead costs or charges are not deductible disbursements or costs for
such purposes.
(3) This section applies to all agreements for attorneys' fees
entered into or modified after the effective date of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 7.70.100 and 1993 c 492 s 419 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No action based upon a health care provider's professional
negligence may be commenced unless the defendant has been given at
least ninety days' notice of the intention to commence the action. If
the notice is served within ninety days of the expiration of the
applicable statute of limitations, the time for the commencement of the
action must be extended ninety days from the service of the notice.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are not
applicable with respect to any defendant whose name is unknown to the
plaintiff at the time of filing the complaint and who is identified
therein by a fictitious name.
(3) After the filing of the ninety-day presuit notice, and before
a superior court trial, all causes of action, whether based in tort,
contract, or otherwise, for damages arising from injury occurring as a
result of health care provided after July 1, 1993, shall be subject to
mandatory mediation prior to trial.
(((2))) (4) The supreme court shall by rule adopt procedures to
implement mandatory mediation of actions under this chapter. The rules
shall require mandatory mediation without exception and address, at a
minimum:
(a) Procedures for the appointment of, and qualifications of,
mediators. A mediator shall have experience or expertise related to
actions arising from injury occurring as a result of health care, and
be a member of the state bar association who has been admitted to the
bar for a minimum of five years or who is a retired judge. The parties
may stipulate to a nonlawyer mediator. The court may prescribe
additional qualifications of mediators;
(b) Appropriate limits on the amount or manner of compensation of
mediators;
(c) The number of days following the filing of a claim under this
chapter within which a mediator must be selected;
(d) The method by which a mediator is selected. The rule shall
provide for designation of a mediator by the superior court if the
parties are unable to agree upon a mediator;
(e) The number of days following the selection of a mediator within
which a mediation conference must be held;
(f) A means by which mediation of an action under this chapter may
be waived by a mediator who has determined that the claim is not
appropriate for mediation; and
(g) Any other matters deemed necessary by the court.
(((3))) (5) Mediators shall not impose discovery schedules upon the
parties.
(6) The supreme court shall by rule also adopt procedures for the
parties to certify to the court the manner of mediation used by the
parties to comply with this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 4.16.350 and 1998 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil action for damages for injury or death occurring as
a result of health care which is provided after June 25, 1976, against:
(((1))) (a) A person licensed by this state to provide health care
or related services, including, but not limited to, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician
and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist,
pharmacist, optician, physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's
assistant, nurse practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive
care paramedic, including, in the event such person is deceased, his
estate or personal representative;
(((2))) (b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of
this subsection (((1) of this section)), acting in the course and scope
of his or her employment, including, in the event such employee or
agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative; or
(((3))) (c) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in (a) of this
subsection (((1) of this section)), including, but not limited to, a
hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, ((or)) nursing home,
or boarding home; or an officer, director, employee, or agent thereof
acting in the course and scope of his or her employment, including, in
the event such officer, director, employee, or agent is deceased, his
or her estate or personal representative;
based upon alleged professional negligence shall be commenced within
three years of the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition, or one year of the time the patient or his or her
representative or custodial parent or guardian discovered or reasonably
should have discovered that the injury or condition was caused by said
act or omission, whichever period ((expires later, except that in no
event shall an action be commenced more than eight years after said act
or omission: PROVIDED, That the time for commencement of an action is
tolled upon proof of fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence of
a foreign body not intended to have a therapeutic or diagnostic purpose
or effect, until the date the patient or the patient's representative
has actual knowledge of the act of fraud or concealment, or of the
presence of the foreign body; the patient or the patient's
representative has one year from the date of the actual knowledge in
which to commence a civil action for damages.
For purposes of this section, notwithstanding RCW 4.16.190, the
knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall be imputed to a
person under the age of eighteen years, and such imputed knowledge
shall operate to bar the claim of such minor to the same extent that
the claim of an adult would be barred under this section. Any action
not commenced in accordance with this section shall be barred.
For purposes of this section, with respect to care provided after
June 25, 1976, and before August 1, 1986, the knowledge of a custodial
parent or guardian shall be imputed as of April 29, 1987, to persons
under the age of eighteen years)) occurs first.
(2) In no event may an action be commenced more than three years
after the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition except:
(a) Upon proof of fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence
of a foreign body not intended to have a therapeutic or diagnostic
purpose or effect, in which case the patient or the patient's
representative has one year from the date the patient or the patient's
representative or custodial parent or guardian has actual knowledge of
the act of fraud or concealment or of the presence of the foreign body
in which to commence a civil action for damages.
(b) In the case of a minor, for any period during minority, but
only for such period during minority in which the minor's custodial
parent or guardian and the defendant or the defendant's insurer have
committed fraud or collusion in the failure to bring an action on
behalf of the minor.
(c) In the case of a minor under the full age of six years, in
which case the action on behalf of the minor must be commenced within
three years or prior to the minor's eighth birthday, whichever provides
a longer period.
(3) Any action not commenced in accordance with this section is
barred.
(4) For purposes of this section, the tolling provisions of RCW
4.16.190 do not apply.
(5) This section does not apply to a civil action based on
intentional conduct brought against those individuals or entities
specified in this section by a person for recovery of damages for
injury occurring as a result of childhood sexual abuse as defined in
RCW 4.16.340(5).

Sec. 7 RCW 7.70.080 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any party may present evidence to the trier of fact that the
((patient)) plaintiff has already been, or will be, compensated for the
injury complained of from ((any source except the assets of the
patient, his representative, or his immediate family, or insurance
purchased with such assets. In the event such evidence is admitted,
the plaintiff may present evidence of an obligation to repay such
compensation. Insurance bargained for or provided on behalf of an
employee shall be considered insurance purchased with the assets of the
employee)) a collateral source. In the event the evidence is admitted,
the other party may present evidence of any amount that was paid or
contributed to secure the right to any compensation. Compensation as
used in this section shall mean payment of money or other property to
or on behalf of the patient, rendering of services to the patient free
of charge to the patient, or indemnification of expenses incurred by or
on behalf of the patient. Notwithstanding this section, evidence of
compensation by a defendant health care provider may be offered only by
that provider.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by statute, there is no right of
subrogation or reimbursement from a plaintiff's tort recovery with
respect to compensation covered in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 7.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A contract for health care services that contains a provision
for arbitration of a dispute as to professional negligence of a health
care provider under chapter 7.70 RCW must have the provision as the
first article of the contract and must be expressed in the following
language:
"It is understood that any dispute as to medical malpractice that
is as to whether any medical services rendered under this contract were
unnecessary or unauthorized or were improperly, negligently, or
incompetently rendered, will be determined by submission to arbitration
as provided by Washington law, and not by a lawsuit or resort to court
process except as Washington law provides for judicial review of
arbitration proceedings. Both parties to this contract, by entering
into it, are giving up their constitutional right to have such a
dispute decided in a court of law before a jury, and instead are
accepting the use of arbitration."
(2) Immediately before the signature line provided for the
individual contracting for the medical services, there must appear the
following in at least ten-point bold red type:
"NOTICE: BY SIGNING THIS CONTRACT YOU ARE AGREEING TO HAVE ANY
ISSUE OF MEDICAL MALPRACTICE DECIDED BY NEUTRAL ARBITRATION AND YOU ARE
GIVING UP YOUR RIGHT TO A JURY OR COURT TRIAL. SEE ARTICLE ONE OF THIS
CONTRACT."
(3) Once signed, such a contract governs all subsequent open-book
account transactions for medical services for which the contract was
signed until or unless rescinded by written notice within thirty days
of signature. Written notice of such rescission may be given by a
guardian or other legal representative of the patient if the patient is
incapacitated or a minor.
(4) Where the contract is one for medical services to a minor, it
may not be disaffirmed if signed by the minor's parent or legal
guardian.
(5) Such a contract is not a contract of adhesion, nor
unconscionable, nor otherwise improper, where it complies with
subsections (1) through (3) of this section.
(6) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to any
health benefit plan contract offered by an organization regulated under
Title 48 RCW that has been negotiated to contain an arbitration
agreement with subscribers and enrollees under such a contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 7.70.100, 7.70.110, 7.70.120, and 7.70.130 do not apply if
there is a contract for binding arbitration under section 8 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Future damages" includes damages for future medical treatment,
care or custody, loss of future earnings, loss of bodily function, or
future pain and suffering of the judgment creditor.
(b) "Periodic payments" means the payment of money or delivery of
other property to the judgment creditor at regular intervals.
(2) In any action for damages for injury occurring as a result of
health care, the court shall, at the request of either party, enter a
judgment ordering that money damages or its equivalent for future
damages of the judgment creditor be paid in whole or in part by
periodic payments rather than by a lump-sum payment if the award equals
or exceeds fifty thousand dollars in future damages. In entering a
judgment ordering the payment of future damages by periodic payments,
the court shall make a specific finding as to the dollar amount of
periodic payments which will compensate the judgment creditor for such
future damages. As a condition to authorizing periodic payments of
future damages, the court shall require the judgment debtor who is not
adequately insured to post security adequate to ensure full payment of
such damages awarded by the judgment. Upon termination of periodic
payments of future damages, the court shall order the return of this
security, or so much as remains, to the judgment debtor.
(3)(a) The judgment ordering the payment of future damages by
periodic payments must specify the recipient or recipients of the
payments, the dollar amount of the payments, the interval between
payments, and the number of payments or the period of time over which
payments must be made. The payments are only subject to modification
in the event of the death of the judgment creditor.
(b) In the event that the court finds that the judgment debtor has
exhibited a continuing pattern of failing to make the payments, as
specified in (a) of this subsection, the court shall find the judgment
debtor in contempt of court and, in addition to the required periodic
payments, shall order the judgment debtor to pay the judgment creditor
all damages caused by the failure to make such periodic payments,
including court costs and attorneys' fees.
(4) However, money damages awarded for loss of future earnings may
not be reduced or payments terminated by reason of the death of the
judgment creditor, but must be paid to persons to whom the judgment
creditor owed a duty of support, as provided by law, immediately prior
to his or her death. In such cases the court that rendered the
original judgment, may, upon petition of any party in interest, modify
the judgment to award and apportion the unpaid future damages in
accordance with this subsection (4).
(5) Following the occurrence or expiration of all obligations
specified in the periodic payment judgment, any obligation of the
judgment debtor to make further payments ceases and any security given
under subsection (2) of this section reverts to the judgment debtor.
(6) For purposes of this section, the provisions of RCW 4.56.250 do
not apply.
(7) It is the intent of the legislature in enacting this section to
authorize, in actions for damages for injury occurring as a result of
health care, the entry of judgments that provide for the payment of
future damages through periodic payments rather than lump-sum payments.
By authorizing periodic payment judgments, it is the further intent of
the legislature that the courts will utilize such judgments to provide
compensation sufficient to meet the needs of an injured plaintiff and
those persons who are dependent on the plaintiff for whatever period is
necessary while eliminating the potential windfall from a lump-sum
recovery that was intended to provide for the care of an injured
plaintiff over an extended period who then dies shortly after the
judgment is paid, leaving the balance of the judgment award to persons
and purposes for which it was not intended. It is also the intent of
the legislature that all elements of the periodic payment program be
specified with certainty in the judgment ordering such payments and
that the judgment not be subject to modification at some future time
that might alter the specifications of the original judgment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 4.56 RCW
to read as follows:
In the event that the Washington state supreme court or other court
of competent jurisdiction rules or affirms that section 3 of this act
is unconstitutional, then the prescribed cap on noneconomic damages
takes effect upon the ratification of a state constitutional amendment
that empowers the legislature to place limits on the amount of
noneconomic damages recoverable in any or all civil causes of action.

Sec. 12 RCW 7.70.060 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
If a patient while legally competent, or his or her representative
if he or she is not competent, signs a consent form which sets forth
the following, the signed consent form shall constitute prima facie
evidence that the patient gave his or her informed consent to the
treatment administered and the patient has the burden of rebutting this
by ((a preponderance of the)) clear, cogent, and convincing evidence:
(1) A description, in language the patient could reasonably be
expected to understand, of:
(a) The nature and character of the proposed treatment;
(b) The anticipated results of the proposed treatment;
(c) The recognized possible alternative forms of treatment; and
(d) The recognized serious possible risks, complications, and
anticipated benefits involved in the treatment and in the recognized
possible alternative forms of treatment, including nontreatment;
(2) Or as an alternative, a statement that the patient elects not
to be informed of the elements set forth in subsection (1) of this
section.
Failure to use a form shall not be admissible as evidence of
failure to obtain informed consent.

Sec. 13 RCW 4.24.250 and 1981 c 181 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any health care provider as defined in RCW 7.70.020 (1) and (2)
as now existing or hereafter amended who, in good faith, files charges
or presents evidence against another member of their profession based
on the claimed incompetency or gross misconduct of such person before
a regularly constituted review committee or board of a professional
society or hospital whose duty it is to evaluate the competency and
qualifications of members of the profession, including limiting the
extent of practice of such person in a hospital or similar institution,
or before a regularly constituted committee or board of a hospital
whose duty it is to review and evaluate the quality of patient care,
shall be immune from civil action for damages arising out of such
activities. The proceedings, reports, and written records of such
committees or boards, or of a member, employee, staff person, or
investigator of such a committee or board, shall not be subject to
subpoena or discovery proceedings in any civil action, except actions
arising out of the recommendations of such committees or boards
involving the restriction or revocation of the clinical or staff
privileges of a health care provider as defined above.
(2) A coordinated quality improvement program maintained in
accordance with RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200 may share information and
documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by a coordinated quality
improvement committee or committees or boards under subsection (1) of
this section, with one or more other coordinated quality improvement
programs for the improvement of the quality of health care services
rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical
malpractice. Information and documents disclosed by one coordinated
quality improvement program to another coordinated quality improvement
program and any information and documents created or maintained as a
result of the sharing of information and documents shall not be subject
to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be respected as
required by subsection (1) of this section and by RCW 43.70.510(4) and
70.41.200(3).

Sec. 14 RCW 43.70.510 and 1995 c 267 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Health care institutions and medical facilities, other than
hospitals, that are licensed by the department, professional societies
or organizations, health care service contractors, health maintenance
organizations, health carriers approved pursuant to chapter 48.43 RCW,
and any other person or entity providing health care coverage under
chapter 48.42 RCW that is subject to the jurisdiction and regulation of
any state agency or any subdivision thereof may maintain a coordinated
quality improvement program for the improvement of the quality of
health care services rendered to patients and the identification and
prevention of medical malpractice as set forth in RCW 70.41.200.
(b) All such programs shall comply with the requirements of RCW
70.41.200(1)(a), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h) as modified to
reflect the structural organization of the institution, facility,
professional societies or organizations, health care service
contractors, health maintenance organizations, health carriers, or any
other person or entity providing health care coverage under chapter
48.42 RCW that is subject to the jurisdiction and regulation of any
state agency or any subdivision thereof, unless an alternative quality
improvement program substantially equivalent to RCW 70.41.200(1)(a) is
developed. All such programs, whether complying with the requirement
set forth in RCW 70.41.200(1)(a) or in the form of an alternative
program, must be approved by the department before the discovery
limitations provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section and the
exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and subsection (5) of this section
shall apply. In reviewing plans submitted by licensed entities that
are associated with physicians' offices, the department shall ensure
that the exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and the discovery
limitations of this section are applied only to information and
documents related specifically to quality improvement activities
undertaken by the licensed entity.
(2) Health care provider groups of ((ten)) five or more providers
may maintain a coordinated quality improvement program for the
improvement of the quality of health care services rendered to patients
and the identification and prevention of medical malpractice as set
forth in RCW 70.41.200. All such programs shall comply with the
requirements of RCW 70.41.200(1)(a), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h)
as modified to reflect the structural organization of the health care
provider group. All such programs must be approved by the department
before the discovery limitations provided in subsections (3) and (4) of
this section and the exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and
subsection (5) of this section shall apply.
(3) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such
activity.
(4) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected, and maintained by a
quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or
introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was
in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the
creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents
specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to
testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or
the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee.
This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the
discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that
is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of
any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the
testimony of any person concerning the facts that form the basis for
the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal
knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil
action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or
revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges,
introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by
quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d)
in any civil action challenging the termination of a contract by a
state agency with any entity maintaining a coordinated quality
improvement program under this section if the termination was on the
basis of quality of care concerns, introduction into evidence of
information created, collected, or maintained by the quality
improvement committees of the subject entity, which may be under terms
of a protective order as specified by the court; (e) in any civil
action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or
restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any and the
reasons for the restrictions; or (f) in any civil action, discovery and
introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by
rule of the department of health to be made regarding the care and
treatment received.
(5) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee are exempt
from disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.
(6) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by a quality improvement
committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 with one or
more other coordinated quality improvement programs maintained in
accordance with this section or with RCW 70.41.200, for the improvement
of the quality of health care services rendered to patients and the
identification and prevention of medical malpractice. Information and
documents disclosed by one coordinated quality improvement program to
another coordinated quality improvement program and any information and
documents created or maintained as a result of the sharing of
information and documents shall not be subject to the discovery process
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (4) of
this section and RCW 4.24.250.
(7) The department of health shall adopt rules as are necessary to
implement this section.

Sec. 15 RCW 70.41.200 and 2000 c 6 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every hospital shall maintain a coordinated quality improvement
program for the improvement of the quality of health care services
rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical
malpractice. The program shall include at least the following:
(a) The establishment of a quality improvement committee with the
responsibility to review the services rendered in the hospital, both
retrospectively and prospectively, in order to improve the quality of
medical care of patients and to prevent medical malpractice. The
committee shall oversee and coordinate the quality improvement and
medical malpractice prevention program and shall ensure that
information gathered pursuant to the program is used to review and to
revise hospital policies and procedures;
(b) A medical staff privileges sanction procedure through which
credentials, physical and mental capacity, and competence in delivering
health care services are periodically reviewed as part of an evaluation
of staff privileges;
(c) The periodic review of the credentials, physical and mental
capacity, and competence in delivering health care services of all
persons who are employed or associated with the hospital;
(d) A procedure for the prompt resolution of grievances by patients
or their representatives related to accidents, injuries, treatment, and
other events that may result in claims of medical malpractice;
(e) The maintenance and continuous collection of information
concerning the hospital's experience with negative health care outcomes
and incidents injurious to patients, patient grievances, professional
liability premiums, settlements, awards, costs incurred by the hospital
for patient injury prevention, and safety improvement activities;
(f) The maintenance of relevant and appropriate information
gathered pursuant to (a) through (e) of this subsection concerning
individual physicians within the physician's personnel or credential
file maintained by the hospital;
(g) Education programs dealing with quality improvement, patient
safety, medication errors, injury prevention, staff responsibility to
report professional misconduct, the legal aspects of patient care,
improved communication with patients, and causes of malpractice claims
for staff personnel engaged in patient care activities; and
(h) Policies to ensure compliance with the reporting requirements
of this section.
(2) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such
activity.
(3) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected, and maintained by a
quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or
introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was
in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the
creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents
specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to
testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or
the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee.
This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the
discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that
is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of
any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the
testimony of any person concerning the facts which form the basis for
the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal
knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil
action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or
revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges,
introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by
quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d)
in any civil action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were
terminated or restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed,
if any and the reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil
action, discovery and introduction into evidence of the patient's
medical records required by regulation of the department of health to
be made regarding the care and treatment received.
(4) Each quality improvement committee shall, on at least a
semiannual basis, report to the governing board of the hospital in
which the committee is located. The report shall review the quality
improvement activities conducted by the committee, and any actions
taken as a result of those activities.
(5) The department of health shall adopt such rules as are deemed
appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this section.
(6) The medical quality assurance commission or the board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery, as appropriate, may review and audit
the records of committee decisions in which a physician's privileges
are terminated or restricted. Each hospital shall produce and make
accessible to the commission or board the appropriate records and
otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall
not be subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be
respected as required by subsection (3) of this section. Failure of a
hospital to comply with this subsection is punishable by a civil
penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.
(7) The department, the joint commission on accreditation of health
care organizations, and any other accrediting organization may review
and audit the records of a quality improvement committee or peer review
committee in connection with their inspection and review of hospitals.
Information so obtained shall not be subject to the discovery process,
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section. Each hospital shall produce and make accessible to the
department the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review
and audit.
(8) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by a quality improvement
committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 with one or
more other coordinated quality improvement programs maintained in
accordance with this section or with RCW 43.70.510, for the improvement
of the quality of health care services rendered to patients and the
identification and prevention of medical malpractice. Information and
documents disclosed by one coordinated quality improvement program to
another coordinated quality improvement program and any information and
documents created or maintained as a result of the sharing of
information and documents shall not be subject to the discovery process
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section and RCW 4.24.250.
(9) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence
per se.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.70.110 and 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 918 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining
a license. After June 30, 1995, municipal corporations providing
emergency medical care and transportation services pursuant to chapter
18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees, provided that such other
emergency services shall only be charged for their pro rata share of
the cost of licensure and inspection, if appropriate. The secretary
may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the secretary, the fees
would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when
the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.
(2) Except as provided in section 18 of this act, fees charged
shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the department for
the licensure of the activity or class of activities and may include
costs of necessary inspection.
(3) Department of health advisory committees may review fees
established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the
appropriateness of the level of such fees.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.70.250 and 1996 c 191 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of
each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. The
secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all
application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees,
permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing
or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered
by the department. In fixing ((said)) such fees, the secretary shall
set the fees for each program at a sufficient level to defray the costs
of administering that program and the patient safety fee established in
section 18 of this act. All such fees shall be fixed by rule adopted
by the secretary in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall increase the licensing fee established
under RCW 43.70.110 by two dollars per year for the health care
professionals designated in subsection (2) of this section and by two
dollars per licensed bed per year for the health care facilities
designated in subsection (2) of this section. Proceeds of the patient
safety fee must be deposited into the patient safety account in section
22 of this act and dedicated to patient safety and medical error
reduction efforts that have been proven to improve, or have a
substantial likelihood of improving, the quality of care provided by
health care professionals and facilities.
(2) Health care professionals and facilities subject to the one
percent patient safety fee are:
(a) The following health care professionals licensed under Title 18
RCW:
(i) Advanced registered nurse practitioners, registered nurses, and
licensed practical nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;
(ii) Chiropractors licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) Dentists licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW;
(iv) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(v) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(vi) Nursing home administrators licensed under chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vii) Optometrists licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(viii) Osteopathic physicians licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW;
(ix) Osteopathic physicians' assistants licensed under chapter
18.57A RCW;
(x) Pharmacists and pharmacies licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW;
(xi) Physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;
(xii) Physician assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW;
(xiii) Podiatrists licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW; and
(xiv) Psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(b) Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW and psychiatric
hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) One percent of the present value of the settlement or verdict
in any action for damages based upon injuries resulting from health
care shall be deducted from the settlement or verdict as a patient
safety set aside. Proceeds of the patient safety set aside shall be
distributed by the department of health in the form of grants, loans,
or other appropriate arrangements to support strategies that have been
proven to reduce medical errors and enhance patient safety as provided
in section 18 of this act.
(2) Patient safety set asides shall be transmitted to the secretary
of the department of health for deposit into the patient safety account
established in section 22 of this act.
(3) The supreme court shall by rule adopt procedures to implement
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Patient safety fee and set aside proceeds shall be administered
by the department, after seeking input from health care providers
engaged in direct patient care activities, health care facilities, and
other interested parties. In developing criteria for the award of
grants, loans, or other appropriate arrangements under this section,
the department shall rely primarily upon evidence-based practices to
improve patient safety that have been identified and recommended by
governmental and private organizations, including, but not limited to:
(a) The federal agency for health care quality and research;
(b) The federal institute of medicine;
(c) The joint commission on accreditation of health care
organizations; and
(d) The national quality forum.
(2) Projects that have been proven to reduce medical errors and
enhance patient safety shall receive priority for funding over those
that are not proven, but have a substantial likelihood of reducing
medical errors and enhancing patient safety. All project proposals
must include specific performance and outcome measures by which to
evaluate the effectiveness of the project. Project proposals that do
not propose to use a proven patient safety strategy must include, in
addition to performance and outcome measures, a detailed description of
the anticipated outcomes of the project based upon any available
related research and the steps for achieving those outcomes.
(3) The department may use a portion of the patient safety fee
proceeds for the costs of administering the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary may solicit and accept grants or other funds from
public and private sources to support patient safety and medical error
reduction efforts under this act. Any grants or funds received may be
used to enhance these activities as long as program standards
established by the secretary are maintained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The patient safety account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from contributions authorized in sections 18
and 19 of this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the purposes of this act. Only
the secretary or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
By December 1, 2007, the department shall report the following
information to the governor and the health policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature:
(1) The amount of patient safety fees and set asides deposited to
date in the patient safety account;
(2) The criteria for distribution of grants, loans, or other
appropriate arrangements under this act; and
(3) A description of the medical error reduction and patient safety
grants and loans distributed to date, including the stated performance
measures, activities, timelines, and detailed information regarding
outcomes for each project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 It is the intent of the legislature by
enacting sections 25 and 26 of this act that health care providers
should remain personally liable for their own negligent or wrongful
acts or omissions in connection with the provision of health care
services, but that their vicarious liability for the negligent or
wrongful acts or omissions of others should be curtailed. To that end,
it is the intent of the legislature that Adamski v. Tacoma General
Hospital, 20 Wn. App. 98, 579 P.2d 970 (1978), and its holding that
hospitals may be held liable for a physician's acts or omissions under
so-called "apparent agency" or "ostensible agency" theories should be
reversed, so that hospitals will not be liable for the act or omission
of a health care provider granted hospital privileges unless the health
care provider is an actual agent or employee of the hospital. It is
further the intent of the legislature that, notwithstanding any
generally applicable principle of vicarious liability to the contrary,
individual health care professionals will not be liable for the
negligent or wrongful acts of others, except those who were acting
under their direct supervision and control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
A public or private hospital shall be liable for an act or omission
of a health care provider granted privileges to provide health care at
the hospital only if the health care provider is an actual agent or
employee of the hospital and the act or omission of the health care
provider occurred while the health care provider was acting within the
course and scope of the health care provider's agency or employment
with the hospital.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who is a health care provider under RCW 7.70.020 (1) or
(2) shall not be personally liable for any act or omission of any other
health care provider who was not the person's actual agent or employee
or who was not acting under the person's direct supervision and control
at the time of the act or omission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 Unless otherwise provided in sections 1
through 12 of this act, sections 1 through 12 of this act apply to all
causes of action filed on or after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---