BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.56.115 and 1983 c 147 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Judgments founded on the tortious conduct of the state of
Washington or of the political subdivisions, municipal corporations,
and quasi municipal corporations of the state, whether acting in their
governmental or proprietary capacities, shall bear interest from the
date of entry at two percentage points above the ((maximum rate
permitted under RCW 19.52.020 on)) equivalent coupon issue yield (as
published by the board of governors of the federal reserve system) of
the average bill rate for twenty-six week treasury bills as determined
at the first bill market auction conducted during the calendar month
immediately preceding the date of entry thereof((: PROVIDED, That)).
In any case where a court is directed on review to enter judgment on a
verdict or in any case where a judgment entered on a verdict is wholly
or partly affirmed on review, interest on the judgment or on that
portion of the judgment affirmed shall date back to and shall accrue
from the date the verdict was rendered. Interest does not accrue on
that portion of a judgment that is subject to appropriation by the
legislature under RCW 4.92.090 or by a local legislative authority
under RCW 4.96.010 until the appropriation has been made by the
legislature or local legislative authority.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.56.110 and 1989 c 360 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
Interest on judgments shall accrue as follows:
(1) Judgments founded on written contracts, providing for the
payment of interest until paid at a specified rate, shall bear interest
at the rate specified in the contracts: PROVIDED, That said interest
rate is set forth in the judgment.
(2) All judgments for unpaid child support that have accrued under
a superior court order or an order entered under the administrative
procedure act shall bear interest at the rate of twelve percent.
(3) Judgments founded on the tortious conduct of individuals or
other entities, whether acting in their personal or representative
capacities, shall bear interest from the date of entry at two
percentage points above the equivalent coupon issue yield, as published
by the board of governors of the federal reserve system, of the average
bill rate for twenty-six week treasury bills as determined at the first
bill market auction conducted during the calendar month immediately
preceding the date of entry. In any case where a court is directed on
review to enter judgment on a verdict or in any case where a judgment
entered on a verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on review, interest
on the judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed shall date
back to and shall accrue from the date the verdict was rendered.
(4) Except as provided under subsections (1) ((and)), (2), and (3)
of this section, judgments shall bear interest from the date of entry
at the maximum rate permitted under RCW 19.52.020 on the date of entry
thereof((: PROVIDED, That)). In any case where a court is directed on
review to enter judgment on a verdict or in any case where a judgment
entered on a verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on review, interest
on the judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed shall date
back to and shall accrue from the date the verdict was rendered. The
method for determining an interest rate prescribed by this subsection
is also the method for determining the "rate applicable to civil
judgments" for purposes of RCW 10.82.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The rate of interest required by sections 1
and 2(3), chapter . . ., Laws of 2004 (sections 1 and 2(3) of this act)
applies to the accrual of interest as of the date of entry of judgment
with respect to a judgment that is entered on or after the effective
date of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.52.025 and 1986 c 60 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each month the state treasurer shall compute the highest rate of
interest permissible under RCW 19.52.020(1), and the rate of interest
required by RCW 4.56.110(3) and 4.56.115, for the succeeding calendar
month. The treasurer shall file ((this rate)) these rates with the
state code reviser for publication in the next available issue of the
Washington State Register in compliance with RCW 34.08.020(8).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---