BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.72 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any manufacturer, distributor, or seller of a food or
nonalcoholic beverage intended for human consumption shall not be
subject to civil liability for personal injury or wrongful death based
on an individual's consumption of food or nonalcoholic beverages in
cases where liability is premised upon the individual's weight gain,
obesity, or a health condition related to weight gain or obesity and
resulting from the individual's long-term consumption of a food or
nonalcoholic beverage.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the term "long-term
consumption" means the cumulative effect of the consumption of food or
nonalcoholic beverages, and not the effect of a single instance of
consumption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---