BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that employers are
becoming increasingly discouraged from disclosing job reference
information by unclear laws and uncertain standards of liability. The
legislature further finds that full good faith disclosure of job
reference information will increase productivity, enhance the safety of
the workplace, and provide greater opportunities to disadvantaged
groups who may not have the educational background or resumes of other
workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer who discloses information about a former or current
employee's job performance, conduct, or other work-related information
to a prospective employer, or employment agency as defined by RCW
49.60.040, at the specific request of that individual employer or
employment agency, is immune from civil liability for such disclosure
or its consequences when such disclosure is made in good faith. For
purposes of this section, an employer's disclosure of work-related
information at the specific request of another employer or employment
agency is presumed to be made in good faith. However, the presumption
of good faith may be rebutted upon a showing of clear, cogent, and
convincing evidence that the information disclosed by the employer was
knowingly false or deliberately misleading.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "employer" means a
corporation, firm, organization, or any other entity with one or more
employees and the employees and agents of the corporation, firm,
organization, or other entity when acting within the scope of their
employment or agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---