BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A certificate of merit shall be filed by the claimant's
attorney as specified in subsection (2) of this section within ninety
days of filing or service, whichever occurs later, of any action
asserting a claim, cross-claim, counter-claim, or third party claim for
damages arising out of: The failure to comply with the standard of
care by a person licensed, registered, or certified under Title 18 RCW;
the negligence of a health care facility as defined in RCW 48.43.005;
or a product liability claim under chapter 7.72 RCW. The court may,
for good cause shown, extend the period of time within which filing of
the certificate is required. In no event shall the period of time for
filing the certificate of merit exceed one hundred twenty days from the
date of filing or service, whichever occurs later.
(2) The certificate filed by the claimant's attorney shall consist
of the declaration of a qualified expert. The declaration shall
include:
(a) The name, address, and credentials of claimant's expert;
(b) The expert's statement that the expert has reviewed the facts
of the case, is knowledgeable of the relevant issues involved, and who:
(i) Holds a license, certificate, or registration issued by this
state or another state in the same profession as that of the person
against whom the claim is filed, and who practices in the same
specialty or subspecialty as the person against whom the claim is
filed; or
(ii) Has expertise in those areas requiring expert testimony in a
product liability claim or in an action against a health care facility;
(c) The expert's statement of willingness and availability to
testify to admissible facts, standard of care, or opinions regarding
the case; and
(d) The expert's statement that on the basis of preliminary review
and consultation, that there is reasonable and meritorious cause for
the filing of the action.
(3) Where a certificate is required under this section, and where
there are claims against multiple persons or entities, separate
certificates must be filed for each party qualified under subsection
(1) of this section. As appropriate, the same expert may file multiple
declarations provided that each declaration meets the requirements of
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Persons identified in subsection (1) of this section against
whom a claim has been asserted are not required to file an answer to
that claim until thirty days after filing the certificate required in
subsection (2) of this section.
(5) The provisions of this section are not applicable to a pro se
claimant until such a time as an attorney appears on the claimant's
behalf.
(6) A violation of this section is grounds for dismissal of the
action; and a court of competent jurisdiction may sanction the claimant
or the claimant's attorney for violating this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act applies to all actions
for damages filed on or after July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---