BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 While the common law doctrine of sovereign
immunity declares that the state is immune from liability for the
tortious conduct of its employees and officers, Article II, section 26
of the state Constitution allows the legislature to waive its immunity
and specify by statute "in what manner, and in what courts, suit may be
brought against the state." In the granting or withholding of
sovereign immunity, there are limitations, gradations, and competing
interests to be balanced by the legislature, including fairness to the
citizens of the state, the preservation of proper and essential
functions of government, and the conservation of scarce public
resources.
In balancing these competing interests, the legislature must also
balance the traditional role of the jury in determining damages in
civil cases and the legislature's constitutional mandate under Article
VIII, section 4 of the state Constitution to protect the state treasury
through the appropriation process.
The legislature finds that these constitutional principles are not
adequately served by either complete sovereign immunity or the complete
waiver of sovereign immunity. Pursuant to the express authority of
Article II, section 26 of the state Constitution, the purpose of this
act is to recognize and implement these fundamental constitutional
principles while providing a fair and equitable means of recovery
against governmental entities for the negligent acts of their employees
and officers.
The legislature further finds that government agencies administer
programs, in the exercise of their constitutional, statutory, and moral
obligations, that inherently create a significant risk of tort
liability in the absence of sovereign immunity. This potential
liability is unique to the governmental function. As a result, state
and local governments are not similarly situated to individual and
private organizations, who are not under legal or moral obligations to
provide for the public health, safety, and welfare. For these reasons,
the legislature finds it necessary and appropriate to distinguish
between the civil liability of private entities and governmental
agencies.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.92.005 and 1985 c 217 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 4.92.060, 4.92.070, 4.92.090, 4.92.130,
((4.92.140,)) and 4.92.150, volunteer is defined in RCW 51.12.035.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.96.010 and 2001 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All local governmental entities, whether acting in a
governmental or proprietary capacity, shall be liable for damages
arising out of their tortious conduct, or the tortious conduct of their
past or present officers, employees, or volunteers while performing or
in good faith purporting to perform their official duties, to the same
extent as if they were a private person or corporation, subject to the
limitations provided in subsection (2) of this section. Filing a claim
for damages within the time allowed by law shall be a condition
precedent to the commencement of any action claiming damages. The laws
specifying the content for such claims shall be liberally construed so
that substantial compliance therewith will be deemed satisfactory.
(2)(a) Neither local government entities, nor their officers,
employees, or volunteers are liable to pay a claim or a judgment for
noneconomic damages as defined in RCW 4.56.250 by any one person that
exceeds the sum of one million dollars or any claim or judgment, or
portions thereof, that, when totaled with all other claims or judgments
paid by the local government entities, officers, employees, or
volunteers arising out of the same incident or occurrence, exceeds the
sum of two million dollars. However, a judgment or judgments may be
claimed and rendered in excess of these amounts and may be settled and
paid under this section up to one million dollars or two million
dollars, as the case may be, and that portion of the judgment that
exceeds these amounts may be reported to the local legislative
authority, but may be paid in part or in whole only by further act of
the local legislative authority. Notwithstanding the limited waiver of
sovereign immunity provided in this section, the local government
entities, officers, employees, or volunteers may agree, within the
limits of insurance coverage provided, to settle a claim made or a
judgment rendered against it without further action by the local
legislative authority, but the local government entities, officers,
employees, or volunteers have not waived any defense of sovereign
immunity or increased the limits of its liability as a result of its
obtaining insurance coverage for tortious acts in excess of the waiver
provided in this section.
(b) The liability of the local government entities, officers,
employees, or volunteers is several only and is not joint.
(c) No attorney may charge, demand, receive, or collect, for
services rendered, fees in excess of twenty-five percent of any
judgment or settlement under this section.
(d) Subsection (2)(a) of this section does not apply in cases in
which the local government entity or its officers, employees, or
volunteers are held liable for civil damages resulting from any
negligent act or omission in the rendering of community placement,
community supervision, community custody, parole supervision, probation
supervision, or supervision of suspended sentences if (i) the offender
under supervision has ever been convicted of the crime of first or
second degree rape, first or second degree rape of a child, or first or
second degree homicide, and (ii) the civil damages resulted from the
subsequent commission of one of these specified offenses.
(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, for the purposes
of this chapter, "local governmental entity" means a county, city,
town, special district, municipal corporation as defined in RCW
39.50.010, quasi- municipal corporation, or public hospital.
(((3))) (4) For the purposes of this chapter, "volunteer" is
defined according to RCW 51.12.035.

Sec. 4 RCW 4.92.040 and 2002 c 332 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No execution shall issue against the state on any judgment.
(2) Whenever a final judgment against the state is obtained in an
action on a claim arising out of tortious conduct, the claim shall be
paid from the liability account, subject to the limitations of RCW
4.92.090.
(3) Whenever a final judgment against the state shall have been
obtained in any other action, the clerk of the court shall make and
furnish to the risk management division a duly certified copy of such
judgment; the risk management division shall thereupon audit the amount
of damages and costs therein awarded, and the same shall be paid from
appropriations specifically provided for such purposes by law.
(4) Final judgments for which there are no provisions in state law
for payment shall be transmitted by the risk management division to the
senate and house of representatives committees on ways and means as
follows:
(a) On the first day of each session of the legislature, the risk
management division shall transmit judgments received and audited since
the adjournment of the previous session of the legislature.
(b) During each session of legislature, the risk management
division shall transmit judgments immediately upon completion of audit.
(5) All claims, other than judgments, made to the legislature
against the state of Washington for money or property, shall be
accompanied by a statement of the facts on which such claim is based
and such evidence as the claimant intends to offer in support of the
claim and shall be filed with the risk management division, which shall
retain the same as a record. All claims of two thousand dollars or
less shall be approved or rejected by the risk management division, and
if approved shall be paid from appropriations specifically provided for
such purpose by law. Such decision, if adverse to the claimant in
whole or part, shall not preclude the claimant from seeking relief from
the legislature. If the claimant accepts any part of his or her claim
which is approved for payment by the risk management division, such
acceptance shall constitute a waiver and release of the state from any
further claims relating to the damage or injury asserted in the claim
so accepted. The risk management division shall submit to the house
and senate committees on ways and means, at the beginning of each
regular session, a comprehensive list of all claims paid pursuant to
this subsection during the preceding year. For all claims not approved
by the risk management division, the risk management division shall
recommend to the legislature whether such claims should be approved or
rejected. Recommendations shall be submitted to the senate and house
of representatives committees on ways and means not later than the
thirtieth day of each regular session of the legislature. Claims which
cannot be processed for timely submission of recommendations shall be
held for submission during the following regular session of the
legislature. The recommendations shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) A summary of the facts alleged in the claim, and a statement as
to whether these facts can be verified by the risk management division;
(b) An estimate by the risk management division of the value of the
loss or damage which was alleged to have occurred;
(c) An analysis of the legal liability, if any, of the state for
the alleged loss or damage; and
(d) A summary of equitable or public policy arguments which might
be helpful in resolving the claim.
(6) The legislative committees to whom such claims are referred
shall make a transcript, recording, or statement of the substance of
the evidence given in support of such a claim. If the legislature
approves a claim the same shall be paid from appropriations
specifically provided for such purpose by law.
(7) Subsections (3) through (6) of this section do not apply to
judgments or claims against the state housing finance commission
created under chapter 43.180 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 4.92.090 and 1963 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state of Washington, whether acting in its governmental or
proprietary capacity, shall be liable for damages arising out of its
tortious conduct to the same extent as if it were a private person or
corporation, subject to the limitations provided in this section.
(1) Neither the state nor its agencies, institutions, officers,
employees, or volunteers are liable to pay a claim or a judgment for
noneconomic damages as defined in RCW 4.56.250 by any one person that
exceeds the sum of one million dollars or any claim or judgment, or
portions thereof, that, when totaled with all other claims or judgments
paid by the state or its agencies, institutions, officers, employees,
or volunteers arising out of the same incident or occurrence, exceeds
the sum of two million dollars. However, a judgment or judgments may
be claimed and rendered in excess of these amounts and may be settled
and paid under this section up to one million dollars or two million
dollars, as the case may be, and that portion of the judgment that
exceeds these amounts may be reported to the legislature, but may be
paid in part or in whole only by further act of the legislature.
Notwithstanding the limited waiver of sovereign immunity provided in
this section, the state or an agency, institution, or any officer,
employee, or volunteer may agree, within the limits of insurance
coverage provided, to settle a claim made or a judgment rendered
against it without further action by the legislature, but the state or
agency has not waived any defense of sovereign immunity or increased
the limits of its liability as a result of its obtaining insurance
coverage for tortious acts in excess of the waiver provided in this
section.
(2) The liability of the state, its agencies, and institutions is
several only and is not joint.
(3) No attorney may charge, demand, receive, or collect, for
services rendered, fees in excess of twenty-five percent of any
judgment or settlement under this section.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply in cases in which
the state or its agencies, institutions, officers, employees, or
volunteers are held liable for civil damages resulting from any
negligent act or omission in the rendering of community placement,
community supervision, community custody, parole supervision, probation
supervision, or supervision of suspended sentences if (a) the offender
under supervision has ever been convicted of the crime of first or
second degree rape, first or second degree rape of a child, or first or
second degree homicide, and (b) the civil damages resulted from the
subsequent commission of one of these specified offenses.

Sec. 6 RCW 4.92.130 and 2002 c 332 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
A liability account in the custody of the treasurer is hereby
created as a nonappropriated account to be used solely and exclusively
for the payment of liability settlements and judgments against the
state under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq. or for the tortious conduct of
its officers, employees, and volunteers and all related legal defense
costs. Legislative appropriation is required for expenditures from the
liability account to the extent specified in RCW 4.92.090.
(1) The purpose of the liability account is to: (a) Expeditiously
pay legal liabilities and defense costs of the state resulting from
tortious conduct; (b) promote risk control through a cost allocation
system which recognizes agency loss experience, levels of self-retention, and levels of risk exposure; and (c) establish an
actuarially sound system to pay incurred losses, within defined limits.
(2) The liability account shall be used to pay claims for injury
and property damages and legal defense costs exclusive of agency-retained expenses otherwise budgeted.
(3) No money shall be paid from the liability account, except for
defense costs, unless all proceeds available to the claimant from any
valid and collectible liability insurance shall have been exhausted and
unless:
(a) The claim shall have been reduced to final judgment in a court
of competent jurisdiction and legislative appropriation has been made
to the extent required by RCW 4.92.090; or
(b) The claim has been approved for payment.
(4) The liability account shall be financed through annual premiums
assessed to state agencies, based on sound actuarial principles, and
shall be for liability coverage in excess of agency-budgeted self-retention levels.
(5) Annual premium levels shall be determined by the risk manager,
with the consultation and advice of the risk management advisory
committee. An actuarial study shall be conducted to assist in
determining the appropriate level of funding.
(6) Disbursements for claims from the liability account shall be
made to the claimant, or to the clerk of the court for judgments, upon
written request to the state treasurer from the risk manager.
(7) The director may direct agencies to transfer moneys from other
funds and accounts to the liability account if premiums are delinquent.
(8) The liability account shall not exceed fifty percent of the
actuarial value of the outstanding liability as determined annually by
the risk management division. If the account exceeds the maximum
amount specified in this section, premiums may be adjusted by the risk
management division in order to maintain the account balance at the
maximum limits. If, after adjustment of premiums, the account balance
remains above the limits specified, the excess amount shall be prorated
back to the appropriate funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act applies to all claims that have not
been reduced to judgment on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---