BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.24.035 and 1987 c 212 s 1801 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding RCW 51.24.030(1), the injured worker or
beneficiary may not seek damages ((against a design professional who is
a third person and who has been retained to perform professional
services on a construction project, or any employee of a design
professional who is assisting or representing the design professional
in the performance of professional services on the site of the
construction project, unless responsibility for safety practices is
specifically assumed by contract, the provisions of which were mutually
negotiated, or the design professional actually exercised control over
the portion of the premises where the worker was injured)) for an
injury or occupational disease occurring in the course of employment at
the site of a construction project, whether accomplished by a single
contract or by multiple contracts, against the owner or developer of
the project or against any person or entity performing work, furnishing
materials, or providing services to or for the construction project
including, but not limited to, design professionals, construction
managers, general or prime contractors, suppliers, subcontractors of
any tier, and any employee of a design professional, construction
manager, general or prime contractor, supplier, or subcontractor of any
tier.
(2) The immunity provided by this section does not extend to any
person or entity who injures a worker by deliberate intention as
defined in RCW 51.24.020, and it is against public policy to seek
indemnification in construction contracts against such liability. Such
contractual clauses are void and unenforceable.
(3) The immunity provided by this section does not extend to
manufacturers and product sellers for product liability actions as
defined in chapter 7.72 RCW.
(4) The immunity provided by this section does not apply to the
negligent preparation of design plans and specifications by a design
professional.
(((3))) (5) For the purposes of this section, "design professional"
means an architect, professional engineer, land surveyor, or landscape
architect, who is licensed or authorized by law to practice such
profession, or any corporation organized under chapter 18.100 RCW or
authorized under RCW 18.08.420 or 18.43.130 to render design services
through the practice of one or more of such professions.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.16.300 and 1986 c 305 s 703 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 4.16.300 through 4.16.320 shall apply to all claims or causes
of action of any kind against any person, arising from such person
having constructed, altered or repaired any improvement upon real
property, or having performed or furnished any design, planning,
surveying, architectural or construction or engineering services, or
supervision or observation of construction, or administration of
construction contracts for any construction, alteration or repair of
any improvement upon real property. This section is specifically
intended to benefit ((only those persons referenced herein)) persons
having performed work for which the persons must be registered or
licensed under RCW 18.08.310, 18.27.020, 18.43.040, 18.96.020, or
19.28.041, and shall not apply to claims or causes of action against
((manufacturers)) persons not required to be so registered or licensed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---