BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.72 RCW
to read as follows:
A manufacturer of goods is not liable for harm caused by defects in
goods attributed to such a manufacturer where the goods have been
purchased through a chain of distribution that does not establish the
manufacturer as the lawful source of the defective product. This
section does not apply where the harm is caused by:
(1) Willful or wanton acts of negligence by the manufacturer;
(2) Conscious indifference or reckless disregard for the safety of
others by the manufacturer; or
(3) Intentional conduct on the part of the manufacturer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---