BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the intent of the legislature to
assist children in the care of kin to access appropriate medical
services. Children being raised by kin have faced barriers to medical
care because their kinship caregivers have not been able to verify that
they are the identified primary caregivers of these children. Such
barriers pose an especially significant challenge to kinship caregivers
in dealing with health professionals when children are left in their
care with no warning.
(2) To assist kinship caregivers in executing adequate and
appropriate decisions regarding the medical needs of a child in their
care, a mechanism is hereby created to authorize kinship caregivers to
consent to medical care for those children in their care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to such other persons as may be so authorized, any
person eighteen years of age or older standing in loco parentis to a
child under eighteen years of age is authorized to consent to any
medical or surgical treatment or procedure not prohibited by law,
including professional use of anesthetics and administration of
prescribed medications, provided that the treatment or procedure has
been suggested, recommended, prescribed, or directed by a licensed
health care practitioner performing services within that practitioner's
authorized scope of practice.
(2) No person who acts in good faith reliance on consent provided
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be subject to criminal
liability, civil liability, or professional disciplinary action as a
result of such reliance.
(3) Any person who falsely claims to be standing in loco parentis
or who, based on in loco parentis status, provides consent to a medical
or surgical treatment or procedure despite actual knowledge that the
parent of the child would object to such treatment or procedure shall
be subject to a civil penalty of one thousand dollars for each
violation and may also be subject to criminal liability.
(4) This section shall not apply to children who are in the custody
of the department of social and health services or other agency
contracted by the department of social and health services.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.70.065 and 2003 c 283 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Informed consent for health care for a patient who is not
competent, as defined in RCW 11.88.010(1)(e), to consent may be
obtained from a person authorized to consent on behalf of such patient.
Persons authorized to provide informed consent to health care on behalf
of a patient who is not competent to consent shall be a member of one
of the following classes of persons in the following order of priority:
(a) The appointed guardian of the patient, if any;
(b) The individual, if any, to whom the patient has given a durable
power of attorney that encompasses the authority to make health care
decisions;
(c) The patient's spouse;
(d) Children of the patient who are at least eighteen years of age;
(e) Parents of the patient; ((and))
(f) Adult brothers and sisters of the patient; and
(g) Persons identified in section 2 of this act.
(2) If the physician seeking informed consent for proposed health
care of the patient who is not competent to consent makes reasonable
efforts to locate and secure authorization from a competent person in
the first or succeeding class and finds no such person available,
authorization may be given by any person in the next class in the order
of descending priority. However, no person under this section may
provide informed consent to health care:
(a) If a person of higher priority under this section has refused
to give such authorization; or
(b) If there are two or more individuals in the same class and the
decision is not unanimous among all available members of that class.
(3) Before any person authorized to provide informed consent on
behalf of a patient not competent to consent exercises that authority,
the person must first determine in good faith that that patient, if
competent, would consent to the proposed health care. If such a
determination cannot be made, the decision to consent to the proposed
health care may be made only after determining that the proposed health
care is in the patient's best interests.

--- END ---