BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director of financial management shall devise a modern and
complete system for achieving accountability for the use of public
funds in all contracts made by any state agency. The director shall
consult with stakeholder groups when devising the system.
(2) The system must address, but not be limited to, contractor
selection; contract provisions, including performance measures that may
be required under RCW 43.88.090; contract management; contract
monitoring; auditing and postevaluation; timely resolution of
monitoring and audit findings and recommendations; and financial
accountability expectations. The financial accountability expectations
must include, but not be limited to, cost allocation principles,
allowability of costs, terms of reimbursement, compliance requirements,
and timely recovery of overpayments and unallowable program costs. The
system must also take into account the need to coordinate the
activities of multiple funding sources to preclude duplication of
effort and funding.
(3) The system must apply to contracts of any sort that a state
agency awards, including, but not limited to, contracts awarded for any
public work, maintenance, or other work or for the purchase of
materials, supplies, equipment, or any type of service including
personal services and client services as defined in chapter 39.29 RCW.
(4) The director shall update the system on a yearly basis. When
updating the system, the director shall examine proven and effective
systems for achieving contract accountability nationwide and adopt
those systems or parts thereof to meet the needs of the state.
(5) The director shall also provide resource materials and training
for state officials and contract officers and contractors on the
system.
(6) All branches of state government, or any division thereof, must
implement the system.
(7) In order to support state agencies with consolidated, readily
available information on contracts and the historical performance of
contractors, the director shall establish and maintain a data base
containing information regarding contractors and subcontractors who
have done business with the state government. The data base must
contain a list of businesses that have been debarred under subsection
(8) of this section.
(8)(a) As part of the system required by subsection (1) of this
section, the director shall establish standards and procedures under
which contractors or subcontractors may be debarred from contracting
with the state government for two years.
(b) The standards must clearly specify the conduct that may subject
a contractor or subcontractor to debarment.
(c) The procedures must provide for a hearing before debarment,
which must be held under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(9) The state auditor shall perform performance verifications and
performance audits of state government to evaluate the implementation
of the system required by subsection (1) of this section. For purposes
of this subsection:
(a) "Performance verification" has the same meaning as in RCW
43.88.020; and
(b) "Performance audit" has the same meaning as in RCW 44.28.005.
(10) For purposes of this section, "state government" includes the
executive, legislative, and judicial branches.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.10.029 and 1998 c 344 s 5 and 1998 c 111 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) An institution of higher education may exercise independently
those powers otherwise granted to the director of general
administration in chapter 43.19 RCW in connection with the purchase and
disposition of all material, supplies, services, and equipment needed
for the support, maintenance, and use of the respective institution of
higher education. Property disposition policies followed by
institutions of higher education shall be consistent with policies
followed by the department of general administration. Purchasing
policies and procedures followed by institutions of higher education
shall be in compliance with chapters 39.19, 39.29, and 43.03 RCW, and
RCW 43.19.1901, 43.19.1906, 43.19.1911, 43.19.1917, 43.19.1937,
43.19.534, 43.19.685, 43.19.700 through 43.19.704, and 43.19.560
through 43.19.637. The community and technical colleges shall comply
with RCW 43.19.450. Except for the University of Washington,
institutions of higher education shall comply with RCW ((43.19.1935,
43.19.19363, and 43.19.19368)) 43.41.310, 43.41.290, and 43.41.350. If
an institution of higher education can satisfactorily demonstrate to
the director of the office of financial management that the cost of
compliance is greater than the value of benefits from any of the
following statutes, then it shall be exempt from them: RCW 43.19.685;
43.19.534; and 43.19.637. Any institution of higher education that
chooses to exercise independent purchasing authority for a commodity or
group of commodities shall notify the director of general
administration. Thereafter the director of general administration
shall not be required to provide those services for that institution
for the duration of the general administration contract term for that
commodity or group of commodities.
(2) An institution of higher education may exercise independently
those powers otherwise granted to the public printer in chapter 43.78
RCW in connection with the production or purchase of any printing and
binding needed by the respective institution of higher education.
Purchasing policies and procedures followed by institutions of higher
education shall be in compliance with chapter 39.19 RCW. Any
institution of higher education that chooses to exercise independent
printing production or purchasing authority shall notify the public
printer. Thereafter the public printer shall not be required to
provide those services for that institution.
(3) Contracts awarded under this section are subject to the modern
and complete system for achieving accountability developed by the
office of financial management under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.10.350 and 2001 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the cost to The Evergreen State College, any regional
university, or state university, of any building, construction,
renovation, remodeling, or demolition other than maintenance or repairs
will equal or exceed the sum of thirty-five thousand dollars, complete
plans and specifications for such work shall be prepared and such work
shall be put out for public bids and the contract shall be awarded to
the lowest responsible bidder if in accordance with the bid
specifications: PROVIDED, That when the estimated cost of such
building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition equals or
exceeds the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars, such project shall be
deemed a public works and "the prevailing rate of wage," under chapter
39.12 RCW shall be applicable thereto: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when
such building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition
involves one trade or craft area and the estimated cost exceeds fifteen
thousand dollars, complete plans and specifications for such work shall
be prepared and such work shall be put out for public bids, and the
contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder if in
accordance with the bid specifications. This subsection shall not
apply when a contract is awarded by the small works roster procedure
authorized in RCW 39.04.155 or under any other procedure authorized for
an institution of higher education.
(2) The Evergreen State College, any regional university, or state
university may require a project to be put to public bid even when it
is not required to do so under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Where the estimated cost to The Evergreen State College, any
regional university, or state university of any building, construction,
renovation, remodeling, or demolition is less than twenty-five thousand
dollars or the contract is awarded by the small works roster procedure
authorized in RCW 39.04.155, the publication requirements of RCW
39.04.020 shall be inapplicable.
(4) In the event of any emergency when the public interest or
property of The Evergreen State College, regional university, or state
university would suffer material injury or damage by delay, the
president of such college or university may declare the existence of
such an emergency and reciting the facts constituting the same may
waive the requirements of this section with reference to any contract
in order to correct the condition causing the emergency: PROVIDED,
That an "emergency," for the purposes of this section, means a
condition likely to result in immediate physical injury to persons or
to property of such college or university in the absence of prompt
remedial action or a condition which immediately impairs the
institution's ability to perform its educational obligations.
(5) Contracts awarded under this section are subject to the modern
and complete system for achieving accountability developed by the
office of financial management under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.50.330 and 1993 c 379 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
The boards of trustees of college districts are empowered in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter to provide for the
construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, demolition, and
major alterations of buildings and other capital assets, and the
acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements, or
appurtenances for the use of the aforementioned colleges as authorized
by the college board in accordance with RCW 28B.50.140; to be financed
by bonds payable out of special funds from revenues hereafter derived
from income received from such facilities, gifts, bequests, or grants,
and such additional funds as the legislature may provide, and payable
out of a bond retirement fund to be established by the respective
district boards in accordance with rules and regulations of the state
board. With respect to building, improvements, or repairs, or other
work, where the estimated cost exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars,
complete plans and specifications for such work shall be prepared and
such work shall be put out for public bids and the contract shall be
awarded to the lowest responsible bidder if in accordance with the bid
specifications: PROVIDED, That when such building, construction,
renovation, remodeling, or demolition involves one trade or craft area
and the estimated cost exceeds ten thousand dollars, complete plans and
specifications for such work shall be prepared and such work shall be
put out for public bids, and the contract shall be awarded to the
lowest responsible bidder if in accordance with the bid specifications.
This subsection shall not apply when a contract is awarded by the small
works procedure authorized in RCW ((39.04.150)) 39.04.155: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That any project regardless of dollar amount may be put to
public bid.
Where the estimated cost to any college of any building,
improvements, or repairs, or other work, is less than twenty-five
thousand dollars, the publication requirements of RCW 39.04.020 shall
be inapplicable.
Contracts awarded under this section are subject to the modern and
complete system for achieving accountability developed by the office of
financial management under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.04.155 and 2001 c 284 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section provides uniform small works roster provisions to
award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling,
alteration, repair, or improvement of real property that may be used by
state agencies and by any local government that is expressly authorized
to use these provisions. These provisions may be used in lieu of other
procedures to award contracts for such work with an estimated cost of
two hundred thousand dollars or less. The small works roster process
includes the limited public works process authorized under subsection
(3) of this section and any local government authorized to award
contracts using the small works roster process under this section may
award contracts using the limited public works process under subsection
(3) of this section.
(2)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may create a
single general small works roster, or may create a small works roster
for different specialties or categories of anticipated work. Where
applicable, small works rosters may make distinctions between
contractors based upon different geographic areas served by the
contractor. The small works roster or rosters shall consist of all
responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list, and where
required by law are properly licensed or registered to perform such
work in this state. A state agency or local government establishing a
small works roster or rosters may require eligible contractors desiring
to be placed on a roster or rosters to keep current records of any
applicable licenses, certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance,
or other appropriate matters on file with the state agency or local
government as a condition of being placed on a roster or rosters. At
least once a year, the state agency or local government shall publish
in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction a notice
of the existence of the roster or rosters and solicit the names of
contractors for such roster or rosters. In addition, responsible
contractors shall be added to an appropriate roster or rosters at any
time they submit a written request and necessary records. Master
contracts may be required to be signed that become effective when a
specific award is made using a small works roster.
(b) A state agency establishing a small works roster or rosters
shall adopt rules implementing this subsection. A local government
establishing a small works roster or rosters shall adopt an ordinance
or resolution implementing this subsection. Procedures included in
rules adopted by the department of general administration in
implementing this subsection must be included in any rules providing
for a small works roster or rosters that is adopted by another state
agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage in these
activities has been delegated to it by the department of general
administration under chapter 43.19 RCW. An interlocal contract or
agreement between two or more state agencies or local governments
establishing a small works roster or rosters to be used by the parties
to the agreement or contract must clearly identify the lead entity that
is responsible for implementing the provisions of this subsection.
(c) Procedures shall be established for securing telephone,
written, or electronic quotations from contractors on the appropriate
small works roster to assure that a competitive price is established
and to award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, as defined in
RCW 43.19.1911. Invitations for quotations shall include an estimate
of the scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as
materials and equipment to be furnished. However, detailed plans and
specifications need not be included in the invitation. This subsection
does not eliminate other requirements for architectural or engineering
approvals as to quality and compliance with building codes. Quotations
may be invited from all appropriate contractors on the appropriate
small works roster. As an alternative, quotations may be invited from
at least five contractors on the appropriate small works roster who
have indicated the capability of performing the kind of work being
contracted, in a manner that will equitably distribute the opportunity
among the contractors on the appropriate roster. However, if the
estimated cost of the work is from one hundred thousand dollars to two
hundred thousand dollars, a state agency or local government, other
than a port district, that chooses to solicit bids from less than all
the appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster must
also notify the remaining contractors on the appropriate small works
roster that quotations on the work are being sought. The government
has the sole option of determining whether this notice to the remaining
contractors is made by: (i) Publishing notice in a legal newspaper in
general circulation in the area where the work is to be done; (ii)
mailing a notice to these contractors; or (iii) sending a notice to
these contractors by facsimile or other electronic means. For purposes
of this subsection (2)(c), "equitably distribute" means that a state
agency or local government soliciting bids may not favor certain
contractors on the appropriate small works roster over other
contractors on the appropriate small works roster who perform similar
services.
(d) A contract awarded from a small works roster under this section
need not be advertised.
(e) Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained
shall be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by
telephone inquiry.
(3) In lieu of awarding contracts under subsection (2) of this
section, a state agency or authorized local government may award a
contract for work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement
((project [projects])) projects estimated to cost less than thirty-five
thousand dollars using the limited public works process provided under
this subsection. Public works projects awarded under this subsection
are exempt from the other requirements of the small works roster
process provided under subsection (2) of this section and are exempt
from the requirement that contracts be awarded after advertisement as
provided under RCW 39.04.010.
For limited public works projects, a state agency or authorized
local government shall solicit electronic or written quotations from a
minimum of three contractors from the appropriate small works roster
and shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder as
defined under RCW 43.19.1911. After an award is made, the quotations
shall be open to public inspection and available by electronic request.
A state agency or authorized local government shall attempt to
distribute opportunities for limited public works projects equitably
among contractors willing to perform in the geographic area of the
work. A state agency or authorized local government shall maintain a
list of the contractors contacted and the contracts awarded during the
previous twenty-four months under the limited public works process,
including the name of the contractor, the contractor's registration
number, the amount of the contract, a brief description of the type of
work performed, and the date the contract was awarded. For limited
public works projects, a state agency or authorized local government
may waive the payment and performance bond requirements of chapter
39.08 RCW and the retainage requirements of chapter 60.28 RCW, thereby
assuming the liability for the contractor's nonpayment of laborers,
mechanics, subcontractors, materialmen, suppliers, and taxes imposed
under Title 82 RCW that may be due from the contractor for the limited
public works project, however the state agency or authorized local
government shall have the right of recovery against the contractor for
any payments made on the contractor's behalf.
(4) The breaking of any project into units or accomplishing any
projects by phases is prohibited if it is done for the purpose of
avoiding the maximum dollar amount of a contract that may be let using
the small works roster process or limited public works process.
(5) As used in this section, "state agency" means the department of
general administration, the state parks and recreation commission, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife,
the department of transportation, any institution of higher education
as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated
authority by the department of general administration to engage in
construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration,
improvement, or repair activities.
(6) Contracts awarded under this section are subject to the modern
and complete system for achieving accountability developed by the
office of financial management under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.80.050 and 1981 c 61 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The agency shall negotiate a contract with the most qualified
firm for architectural and engineering services at a price which the
agency determines is fair and reasonable to the agency. In making its
determination, the agency shall take into account the estimated value
of the services to be rendered as well as the scope, complexity, and
professional nature thereof.
(2) If the agency is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract
with the firm selected at a price the agency determines to be fair and
reasonable, negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated
and the agency shall select other firms in accordance with RCW
39.80.040 and continue in accordance with this section until an
agreement is reached or the process is terminated.
(3) Contracts awarded under this section are subject to the modern
and complete system for achieving accountability developed by the
office of financial management under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.19.1906 and 2002 c 332 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Insofar as practicable, all purchases and sales shall be based on
competitive bids, and a formal sealed bid procedure shall be used as
standard procedure for all purchases and contracts for purchases and
sales executed by the state purchasing and material control director
and under the powers granted by RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939.
Contracts awarded under this section are subject to the modern and
complete system for achieving accountability developed by the office of
financial management under section 1 of this act. This requirement
also applies to purchases and contracts for purchases and sales
executed by agencies, including educational institutions, under
delegated authority granted in accordance with provisions of RCW
43.19.190 or under RCW 28B.10.029. However, formal sealed bidding is
not necessary for:
(1) Emergency purchases made pursuant to RCW 43.19.200 if the
sealed bidding procedure would prevent or hinder the emergency from
being met appropriately;
(2) Purchases not exceeding thirty-five thousand dollars, or
subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial management:
PROVIDED, That the state director of general administration shall
establish procedures to assure that purchases made by or on behalf of
the various state agencies shall not be made so as to avoid the thirty-five thousand dollar bid limitation, or subsequent bid limitations as
calculated by the office of financial management: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That the state purchasing and material control director is authorized
to reduce the formal sealed bid limits of thirty-five thousand dollars,
or subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial
management, to a lower dollar amount for purchases by individual state
agencies if considered necessary to maintain full disclosure of
competitive procurement or otherwise to achieve overall state
efficiency and economy in purchasing and material control. Quotations
from three thousand dollars to thirty-five thousand dollars, or
subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial management,
shall be secured from at least three vendors to assure establishment of
a competitive price and may be obtained by telephone or written
quotations, or both. The agency shall invite at least one quotation
each from a certified minority and a certified women-owned vendor who
shall otherwise qualify to perform such work. Immediately after the
award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded and open
to public inspection and shall be available by telephone inquiry. A
record of competition for all such purchases from three thousand
dollars to thirty-five thousand dollars, or subsequent limits as
calculated by the office of financial management, shall be documented
for audit purposes. Purchases up to three thousand dollars may be made
without competitive bids based on buyer experience and knowledge of the
market in achieving maximum quality at minimum cost;
(3) Purchases which are clearly and legitimately limited to a
single source of supply and purchases involving special facilities,
services, or market conditions, in which instances the purchase price
may be best established by direct negotiation;
(4) Purchases of insurance and bonds by the risk management
division under RCW 43.41.310;
(5) Purchases and contracts for vocational rehabilitation clients
of the department of social and health services: PROVIDED, That this
exemption is effective only when the state purchasing and material
control director, after consultation with the director of the division
of vocational rehabilitation and appropriate department of social and
health services procurement personnel, declares that such purchases may
be best executed through direct negotiation with one or more suppliers
in order to expeditiously meet the special needs of the state's
vocational rehabilitation clients;
(6) Purchases by universities for hospital operation or biomedical
teaching or research purposes and by the state purchasing and material
control director, as the agent for state hospitals as defined in RCW
72.23.010, and for health care programs provided in state correctional
institutions as defined in RCW 72.65.010(3) and veterans' institutions
as defined in RCW 72.36.010 and 72.36.070, made by participating in
contracts for materials, supplies, and equipment entered into by
nonprofit cooperative hospital group purchasing organizations;
(7) Purchases for resale by institutions of higher education to
other than public agencies when such purchases are for the express
purpose of supporting instructional programs and may best be executed
through direct negotiation with one or more suppliers in order to meet
the special needs of the institution;
(8) Purchases by institutions of higher education not exceeding
thirty-five thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That for purchases between
three thousand dollars and thirty-five thousand dollars quotations
shall be secured from at least three vendors to assure establishment of
a competitive price and may be obtained by telephone or written
quotations, or both. For purchases between three thousand dollars and
thirty-five thousand dollars, each institution of higher education
shall invite at least one quotation each from a certified minority and
a certified women-owned vendor who shall otherwise qualify to perform
such work. A record of competition for all such purchases made from
three thousand to thirty-five thousand dollars shall be documented for
audit purposes; and
(9) Negotiation of a contract by the department of transportation,
valid until June 30, 2001, with registered tow truck operators to
provide roving service patrols in one or more Washington state patrol
tow zones whereby those registered tow truck operators wishing to
participate would cooperatively, with the department of transportation,
develop a demonstration project upon terms and conditions negotiated by
the parties.
Beginning on July 1, 1995, and on July 1 of each succeeding odd-numbered year, the dollar limits specified in this section shall be
adjusted as follows: The office of financial management shall
calculate such limits by adjusting the previous biennium's limits by
the appropriate federal inflationary index reflecting the rate of
inflation for the previous biennium. Such amounts shall be rounded to
the nearest one hundred dollars. However, the three thousand dollar
figure in subsections (2) and (8) of this section may not be adjusted
to exceed five thousand dollars.

Sec. 8 RCW 79.10.140 and 2003 c 334 s 122 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department is authorized:
(1) To construct, operate, and maintain primitive outdoor
recreation and conservation facilities on lands under its jurisdiction
which are of primitive character when deemed necessary by the
department to achieve maximum effective development of such lands and
resources consistent with the purposes for which the lands are held.
This authority shall be exercised only after review by the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation and determination by the committee
that the department is the most appropriate agency to undertake such
construction, operation, and maintenance. Such review is not required
for campgrounds designated and prepared or approved by the department;
(2) To acquire right of way and develop public access to lands
under the jurisdiction of the department and suitable for public
outdoor recreation and conservation purposes;
(3) To receive and expend funds from federal and state outdoor
recreation funding measures for the purposes of this section and RCW
79A.50.110.
Contracts awarded under this section are subject to the modern and
complete system for achieving accountability developed by the office of
financial management under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.78.110 and 1993 c 379 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever in the judgment of the public printer certain printing,
ruling, binding, or supplies can be secured from private sources more
economically than by doing the work or preparing the supplies in the
state printing plant, the public printer may obtain such work or
supplies from such private sources. Contracts awarded under this
section are subject to the modern and complete system for achieving
accountability developed by the office of financial management under
section 1 of this act.
In event any work or supplies are secured on behalf of the state
under this section the state printing plant shall be entitled to add up
to five percent to the cost thereof to cover the handling of the orders
which shall be added to the bills and charged to the respective
authorities ordering the work or supplies. The five percent handling
charge shall not apply to contracts with institutions of higher
education.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.105.041 and 2003 c 18 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall have the following powers and duties related to
information services:
(a) To develop standards and procedures governing the acquisition
and disposition of equipment, proprietary software and purchased
services, licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of state
agencies, and confidentiality of computerized data;
(b) To purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire, dispose of, and
maintain equipment, proprietary software, and purchased services, or to
delegate to other agencies and institutions of state government, under
appropriate standards, the authority to purchase, lease, rent, or
otherwise acquire, dispose of, and maintain equipment, proprietary
software, and purchased services: PROVIDED, That, agencies and
institutions of state government are expressly prohibited from
acquiring or disposing of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services without such delegation of authority. The
acquisition and disposition of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services is exempt from RCW 43.19.1919 and, as provided in
RCW 43.19.1901, from the provisions of RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.200.
Contracts awarded under this section are subject to the modern and
complete system for achieving accountability developed by the office of
financial management under section 1 of this act. This subsection
(1)(b) does not apply to the legislative branch;
(c) To develop statewide or interagency technical policies,
standards, and procedures;
(d) To review and approve standards and common specifications for
new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed by agencies,
public postsecondary education institutions, educational service
districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 information
technology services, and to assure the cost-effective development and
incremental implementation of a statewide video telecommunications
system to serve: Public schools; educational service districts;
vocational-technical institutes; community colleges; colleges and
universities; state and local government; and the general public
through public affairs programming;
(e) To provide direction concerning strategic planning goals and
objectives for the state. The board shall seek input from the
legislature and the judiciary;
(f) To develop and implement a process for the resolution of
appeals by:
(i) Vendors concerning the conduct of an acquisition process by an
agency or the department; or
(ii) A customer agency concerning the provision of services by the
department or by other state agency providers;
(g) To establish policies for the periodic review by the department
of agency performance which may include but are not limited to analysis
of:
(i) Planning, management, control, and use of information services;
(ii) Training and education; and
(iii) Project management;
(h) To set its meeting schedules and convene at scheduled times, or
meet at the request of a majority of its members, the chair, or the
director; and
(i) To review and approve that portion of the department's budget
requests that provides for support to the board.
(2) Statewide technical standards to promote and facilitate
electronic information sharing and access are an essential component of
acceptable and reliable public access service and complement content-related standards designed to meet those goals. The board shall:
(a) Establish technical standards to facilitate electronic access
to government information and interoperability of information systems,
including wireless communications systems. Local governments are
strongly encouraged to follow the standards established by the board;
and
(b) Require agencies to consider electronic public access needs
when planning new information systems or major upgrades of systems.
In developing these standards, the board is encouraged to include
the state library, state archives, and appropriate representatives of
state and local government.
(3)(a) The board, in consultation with the K-20 board, has the duty
to govern, operate, and oversee the technical design, implementation,
and operation of the K-20 network including, but not limited to, the
following duties: Establishment and implementation of K-20 network
technical policy, including technical standards and conditions of use;
review and approval of network design; procurement of shared network
services and equipment; and resolving user/provider disputes concerning
technical matters. The board shall delegate general operational and
technical oversight to the K-20 network technical steering committee as
appropriate.
(b) The board has the authority to adopt rules under chapter 34.05
RCW to implement the provisions regarding the technical operations and
conditions of use of the K-20 network.

Sec. 11 RCW 47.28.090 and 1985 c 242 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
At the time and place named in the call for bids the department of
transportation shall publicly open and read the final figure in each of
the bid proposals that have been properly filed and read only the unit
prices of the three lowest bids, and shall award the contract to the
lowest responsible bidder unless the department has, for good cause,
continued the date of opening bids to a day certain, or rejected that
bid. Any bid may be rejected if the bidder has previously defaulted in
the performance of and failed to complete a written public contract, or
has been convicted of a crime arising from a previous public contract.
If the lowest responsible bidder fails to meet the provisions or
specifications requiring compliance with chapter 39.19 RCW and the
rules adopted to implement that chapter, the department may award the
contract to the next lowest responsible bidder which does meet the
provisions or specifications or may reject all bids and readvertise.
All bids shall be under sealed cover and accompanied by deposit in
cash, certified check, cashier's check, or surety bond in an amount
equal to five percent of the amount of the bid, and a bid shall not be
considered unless the deposit is enclosed with it.
Contracts awarded under this section are subject to the modern and
complete system for achieving accountability developed by the office of
financial management under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 12 RCW 47.56.030 and 2002 c 114 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as permitted under chapter 47.46 RCW:
(a) The department of transportation shall have full charge of the
construction of all toll bridges and other toll facilities including
the Washington state ferries, and the operation and maintenance
thereof.
(b) The transportation commission shall determine and establish the
tolls and charges thereon, and shall perform all duties and exercise
all powers relating to the financing, refinancing, and fiscal
management of all toll bridges and other toll facilities including the
Washington state ferries, and bonded indebtedness in the manner
provided by law.
(c) The department shall have full charge of design of all toll
facilities.
(d) Except as provided in this section, the department shall
proceed with the construction of such toll bridges and other facilities
and the approaches thereto by contract in the manner of state highway
construction immediately upon there being made available funds for such
work and shall prosecute such work to completion as rapidly as
practicable. The department is authorized to negotiate contracts for
any amount without bid under (d)(i) and (ii) of this subsection:
(i) Emergency contracts, in order to make repairs to ferries or
ferry terminal facilities or removal of such facilities whenever
continued use of ferries or ferry terminal facilities constitutes a
real or immediate danger to the traveling public or precludes prudent
use of such ferries or facilities; and
(ii) Single source contracts for vessel dry dockings, when there is
clearly and legitimately only one available bidder to conduct dry dock-related work for a specific class or classes of vessels. The contracts
may be entered into for a single vessel dry docking or for multiple
vessel dry dockings for a period not to exceed two years.
(2) The department shall proceed with the procurement of materials,
supplies, services, and equipment needed for the support, maintenance,
and use of a ferry, ferry terminal, or other facility operated by
Washington state ferries, in accordance with chapter 43.19 RCW except
as follows:
(a) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, when the
secretary of the department of transportation determines in writing
that the use of invitation for bid is either not practicable or not
advantageous to the state and it may be necessary to make competitive
evaluations, including technical or performance evaluations among
acceptable proposals to complete the contract award, a contract may be
entered into by use of a competitive sealed proposals method, and a
formal request for proposals solicitation. Such formal request for
proposals solicitation shall include a functional description of the
needs and requirements of the state and the significant factors.
(b) When purchases are made through a formal request for proposals
solicitation the contract shall be awarded to the responsible proposer
whose competitive sealed proposal is determined in writing to be the
most advantageous to the state taking into consideration price and
other evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals. No
significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that are not
specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered
in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price;
maintainability; reliability; commonality; performance levels; life
cycle cost if applicable under this section; cost of transportation or
delivery; delivery schedule offered; installation cost; cost of spare
parts; availability of parts and service offered; and the following:
(i) The ability, capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the
contract or provide the service required;
(ii) The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience,
and efficiency of the proposer;
(iii) Whether the proposer can perform the contract within the time
specified;
(iv) The quality of performance of previous contracts or services;
(v) The previous and existing compliance by the proposer with laws
relating to the contract or services;
(vi) Objective, measurable criteria defined in the request for
proposal. These criteria may include but are not limited to items such
as discounts, delivery costs, maintenance services costs, installation
costs, and transportation costs; and
(vii) Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on
the decision to award the contract.
(c) When purchases are made through a request for proposal process,
proposals received shall be evaluated based on the evaluation factors
set forth in the request for proposal. When issuing a request for
proposal for the procurement of propulsion equipment or systems that
include an engine, the request for proposal must specify the use of a
life cycle cost analysis that includes an evaluation of fuel
efficiency. When a life cycle cost analysis is used, the life cycle
cost of a proposal shall be given at least the same relative importance
as the initial price element specified in the request of proposal
documents. The department may reject any and all proposals received.
If the proposals are not rejected, the award shall be made to the
proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to the department,
considering price and the other evaluation factors set forth in the
request for proposal.
(d) If the department is procuring large equipment or systems
(e.g., electrical, propulsion) needed for the support, maintenance, and
use of a ferry operated by Washington state ferries, the department
shall proceed with a formal request for proposal solicitation under
this subsection (2) without a determination of necessity by the
secretary.
(3) Contracts awarded under this section are subject to the modern
and complete system for achieving accountability developed by the
office of financial management under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 13 RCW 77.12.210 and 2000 c 107 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall maintain and manage real or personal property
owned, leased, or held by the department and shall control the
construction of buildings, structures, and improvements in or on the
property, and the contracts awarded under this section are subject to
the modern and complete system for achieving accountability developed
by the office of financial management under section 1 of this act. The
director may adopt rules for the operation and maintenance of the
property.
The commission may authorize the director to sell, lease, convey,
or grant concessions upon real or personal property under the control
of the department. This includes the authority to sell timber, gravel,
sand, and other materials or products from real property held by the
department, and to sell or lease the department's real or personal
property or grant concessions or rights of way for roads or utilities
in the property. Oil and gas resources owned by the state which lie
below lands owned, leased, or held by the department shall be offered
for lease by the commissioner of public lands pursuant to chapter 79.14
RCW with the proceeds being deposited in the state wildlife fund:
PROVIDED, That the commissioner of public lands shall condition such
leases at the request of the department to protect wildlife and its
habitat.
If the commission determines that real or personal property held by
the department cannot be used advantageously by the department, the
director may dispose of that property if it is in the public interest.
If the state acquired real property with use limited to specific
purposes, the director may negotiate terms for the return of the
property to the donor or grantor. Other real property shall be sold to
the highest bidder at public auction. After appraisal, notice of the
auction shall be published at least once a week for two successive
weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the county where the
property is located at least twenty days prior to sale.
Proceeds from the sales shall be deposited in the state wildlife
fund.

Sec. 14 RCW 79A.05.030 and 1999 c 249 s 302, 1999 c 155 s 1, and
1999 c 59 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Have the care, charge, control, and supervision of all parks
and parkways acquired or set aside by the state for park or parkway
purposes.
(2) Adopt policies, and adopt, issue, and enforce rules pertaining
to the use, care, and administration of state parks and parkways. The
commission shall cause a copy of the rules to be kept posted in a
conspicuous place in every state park to which they are applicable, but
failure to post or keep any rule posted shall be no defense to any
prosecution for the violation thereof.
(3) Permit the use of state parks and parkways by the public under
such rules as shall be adopted.
(4) Clear, drain, grade, seed, and otherwise improve or beautify
parks and parkways, and erect structures, buildings, fireplaces, and
comfort stations and build and maintain paths, trails, and roadways
through or on parks and parkways. Any contracts awarded for this work
are subject to the modern and complete system for achieving
accountability developed by the office of financial management under
section 1 of this act.
(5) Grant concessions or leases in state parks and parkways, upon
such rentals, fees, or percentage of income or profits and for such
terms, in no event longer than fifty years, and upon such conditions as
shall be approved by the commission: PROVIDED, That leases exceeding
a twenty-year term shall require a unanimous vote of the commission:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That if, during the term of any concession or lease,
it is the opinion of the commission that it would be in the best
interest of the state, the commission may, with the consent of the
concessionaire or lessee, alter and amend the terms and conditions of
such concession or lease: PROVIDED FURTHER, That television station
leases shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 79A.05.085, only:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the rates of such concessions or leases shall be
renegotiated at five-year intervals. No concession shall be granted
which will prevent the public from having free access to the scenic
attractions of any park or parkway.
(6) Employ such assistance as it deems necessary. Commission
expenses relating to its use of volunteer assistance shall be limited
to premiums or assessments for the insurance of volunteers by the
department of labor and industries, compensation of staff who assist
volunteers, materials and equipment used in authorized volunteer
projects, training, reimbursement of volunteer travel as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and other reasonable expenses relating to
volunteer recognition. The commission, at its discretion, may waive
commission fees otherwise applicable to volunteers. The commission
shall not use volunteers to replace or supplant classified positions.
The use of volunteers may not lead to the elimination of any employees
or permanent positions in the bargaining unit.
(7) By majority vote of its authorized membership select and
purchase or obtain options upon, lease, or otherwise acquire for and in
the name of the state such tracts of land, including shore and tide
lands, for park and parkway purposes as it deems proper. If the
commission cannot acquire any tract at a price it deems reasonable, it
may, by majority vote of its authorized membership, obtain title
thereto, or any part thereof, by condemnation proceedings conducted by
the attorney general as provided for the condemnation of rights of way
for state highways. Option agreements executed under authority of this
subsection shall be valid only if:
(a) The cost of the option agreement does not exceed one dollar;
and
(b) Moneys used for the purchase of the option agreement are from
(i) funds appropriated therefor, or (ii) funds appropriated for
undesignated land acquisitions, or (iii) funds deemed by the commission
to be in excess of the amount necessary for the purposes for which they
were appropriated; and
(c) The maximum amount payable for the property upon exercise of
the option does not exceed the appraised value of the property.
(8) Cooperate with the United States, or any county or city of this
state, in any matter pertaining to the acquisition, development,
redevelopment, renovation, care, control, or supervision of any park or
parkway, and enter into contracts in writing to that end. All parks or
parkways, to which the state contributed or in whose care, control, or
supervision the state participated pursuant to the provisions of this
section, shall be governed by the provisions hereof.

--- END ---