BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the central Puget
Sound region ranks among the most congested metropolitan areas of the
nation. The legislature further finds that the state department of
transportation has in service over two hundred miles of high-occupancy
vehicle lane miles in the region and it is imperative that those lanes
be used to improve mobility within the region. It is the policy of the
legislature to improve the effectiveness of the high-occupancy vehicle
lanes by using the excess capacity of those lanes during periods of
congestion caused by traffic emergencies.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state department of transportation and the local authorities
are authorized to reserve all or any portion of any highway under their
respective jurisdictions, including any designated lane or ramp, for
the exclusive or preferential use of public transportation vehicles or
private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified number of
passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient utilization
of the highway or will aid in the conservation of energy resources.
Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of a highway
facility may be declared to be effective at all times or at specified
times of day or on specified days except on state highways as provided
in section 4 of this act. Violation of a restriction of highway usage
prescribed by the appropriate authority under this section is a traffic
infraction.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.52.025 and 1974 ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Highway authorities of the state, counties, and incorporated cities
and towns, in addition to the specific powers granted in this chapter,
shall also have, and may exercise, relative to limited access
facilities, any and all additional authority, now or hereafter vested
in them relative to highways or streets within their respective
jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use of such
limited access facilities by various classes of vehicles or traffic.
Such highway authorities may reserve any limited access facility or
portions thereof, including designated lanes or ramps for the exclusive
or preferential use of public transportation vehicles, privately owned
buses, or private motor vehicles carrying not less than a specified
number of passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient
utilization of the highway facility or will aid in the conservation of
energy resources. Regulations authorizing such exclusive or
preferential use of a highway facility may be declared to be effective
at all time or at specified times of day or on specified days except on
state highways as provided in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.52 RCW
to read as follows:
For highways under its jurisdiction, the state department of
transportation shall permit all vehicles, except those vehicles
licensed for a weight in excess of ten thousand pounds gross vehicle
weight, to use those lanes which are otherwise reserved for vehicles
carrying a minimum number of occupants during periods of extreme
traffic emergencies. An extreme traffic emergency is a period of
traffic buildup caused by an unexpected situation. The department
shall determine criteria when such an emergency should be declared and
when it should end. The department shall use appropriate technology to
notify the public when an emergency is in effect, including but not
limited to public service radio announcements.

--- END ---