BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that passenger-only
ferry service is an important component in the overall state
transportation system. Conclusions drawn by the 2000 Joint Task Force
on Ferries include the recommendation that the state should continue to
provide and maintain both auto ferry and passenger-only ferry service
and that the Washington State Ferries is the most cost-effective
provider of passenger-only service provided at that time. The
legislature further finds that in order to allow options for the
traveling public, state-sponsored passenger-only service must continue
to be provided and expanded where practical.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall provide passenger-only ferry service
connecting Southworth directly with Seattle and connecting Kingston
directly with Seattle. This service at minimum must be provided during
work-day commuter hours.

--- END ---