BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.84.020 and 2003 c 373 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of an application the commission shall give
reasonable notice to the department, affected cities, counties, and
public transportation benefit areas and any common carrier which might
be adversely affected, of the time and place for hearing on such
application. The commission shall have power after hearing, to issue
the certificate as prayed for, or to refuse to issue it, or to issue it
for the partial exercise only of the privilege sought, and may attach
to the exercise of the rights granted by said certificate such terms
and conditions as in its judgment the public convenience and necessity
may require; but the commission shall not have power to grant a
certificate to operate between districts and/or into any territory
prohibited by RCW 47.60.120 or already served by an existing
certificate holder, unless such existing certificate holder has failed
or refused to furnish reasonable and adequate service or has failed to
provide the service described in its certificate or tariffs after the
time period allowed to initiate service has elapsed: PROVIDED, A
certificate shall be granted when it shall appear to the satisfaction
of the commission that the commercial ferry was actually operating in
good faith over the route for which such certificate shall be sought,
on January 15, 1927: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That in case two or more
commercial ferries shall upon said date have been operating vessels
upon the same route, or between the same districts the commission shall
determine after public hearing whether one or more certificates shall
issue, and in determining to whom a certificate or certificates shall
be issued, the commission shall consider all material facts and
circumstances including the prior operation, schedules, and services
rendered by either of the ferries, and in case more than one
certificate shall issue, the commission shall fix and determine the
schedules and services of the ferries to which the certificates are
issued to the end that duplication of service be eliminated and public
convenience be furthered.
(2) Before issuing a certificate, the commission shall determine
that the applicant has the financial resources to operate the proposed
service for at least twelve months, based upon the submission by the
applicant of a pro forma financial statement of operations. Issuance
of a certificate shall be determined upon, but not limited to, the
following factors: Ridership and revenue forecasts; the cost of
service for the proposed operation; an estimate of the cost of the
assets to be used in providing the service; a statement of the total
assets on hand of the applicant that will be expended on the proposed
operation; and a statement of prior experience, if any, in such field
by the applicant. The documentation required of the applicant under
this section shall comply with the provisions of RCW 9A.72.085.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to an application
for a certificate that is pending as of July 25, 1993.
(4) In granting a certificate for passenger-only ferries and
determining what conditions to place on the certificate, the commission
shall consider and give substantial weight to the effect of its
decisions on public agencies operating, or eligible to operate,
passenger-only ferry service.
(((5) Until March 1, 2005, the commission shall not consider an
application for passenger-only ferry service serving any county in
Puget Sound, unless the public transportation benefit area authority or
ferry district serving that county, by resolution, agrees to the
application.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---