BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.13.120 and 2002 c 120 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the state should acquire easements
along riparian and other sensitive aquatic areas from small forest
landowners willing to sell or donate such easements to the state
provided that the state will not be required to acquire such easements
if they are subject to unacceptable liabilities. The legislature
therefore establishes a forestry riparian easement program.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and RCW 76.13.100 and 76.13.110 unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(a) "Forestry riparian easement" means an easement covering
qualifying timber granted voluntarily to the state by a small forest
landowner.
(b) "Qualifying timber" means those trees covered by a forest
practices application that the small forest landowner is required to
leave unharvested under the rules adopted under RCW 76.09.055 and
76.09.370 or that is made uneconomic to harvest by those rules, and for
which the small landowner is willing to grant the state a forestry
riparian easement. "Qualifying timber" is timber within or bordering
a commercially reasonable harvest unit as determined under rules
adopted by the forest practices board, or timber for which an approved
forest practices application for timber harvest cannot be obtained
because of restrictions under the forest practices rules.
(c) "Small forest landowner" means a landowner meeting all of the
following characteristics: (i) A forest landowner as defined in RCW
76.09.020 whose interest in the land and timber is in fee or who has
rights to the timber to be included in the forestry riparian easement
that extend at least fifty years from the date the forest practices
application associated with the easement is submitted; (ii) an entity
that has harvested from its own lands in this state during the three
years prior to the year of application an average timber volume that
would qualify the owner as a small harvester under RCW 84.33.035; and
(iii) an entity that certifies at the time of application that it does
not expect to harvest from its own lands more than the volume allowed
by RCW 84.33.035 during the ten years following application. If a
landowner's prior three-year average harvest exceeds the limit of RCW
84.33.035, or the landowner expects to exceed this limit during the ten
years following application, and that landowner establishes to the
department's ((of natural resources')) reasonable satisfaction that the
harvest limits were or will be exceeded to raise funds to pay estate
taxes or equally compelling and unexpected obligations such as court-ordered judgments or extraordinary medical expenses, the landowner
shall be deemed to be a small forest landowner.
For purposes of determining whether a person qualifies as a small
forest landowner, the small forest landowner office, created in RCW
76.13.110, shall evaluate the landowner under this definition as of the
date that the forest practices application is submitted or the date the
landowner notifies the department that the harvest is to begin with
which the forestry riparian easement is associated. A small forest
landowner can include an individual, partnership, corporate, or other
nongovernmental legal entity. If a landowner grants timber rights to
another entity for less than five years, the landowner may still
qualify as a small forest landowner under this section. If a landowner
is unable to obtain an approved forest practices application for timber
harvest for any of his or her land because of restrictions under the
forest practices rules, the landowner may still qualify as a small
forest landowner under this section.
(d) "Completion of harvest" means that the trees have been
harvested from an area and that further entry into that area by
mechanized logging or slash treating equipment is not expected.
(3) The department ((of natural resources)) is authorized and
directed to accept and hold in the name of the state of Washington
forestry riparian easements granted by small forest landowners covering
qualifying timber and to pay compensation to such landowners in
accordance with subsections (6) and (7) of this section. The
department ((of natural resources)) may not transfer the easements to
any entity other than another state agency.
(4) Forestry riparian easements shall be effective for fifty years
from the date the forest practices application associated with the
qualifying timber is submitted to the department ((of natural
resources)), unless the easement is terminated earlier by the
department ((of natural resources)) voluntarily, based on a
determination that termination is in the best interest of the state, or
under the terms of a termination clause in the easement.
(5) Forestry riparian easements shall be restrictive only, and
shall preserve all lawful uses of the easement premises by the
landowner that are consistent with the terms of the easement and the
requirement to protect riparian functions during the term of the
easement, subject to the restriction that the leave trees required by
the rules to be left on the easement premises may not be cut during the
term of the easement. No right of public access to or across, or any
public use of the easement premises is created by this statute or by
the easement. Forestry riparian easements shall not be deemed to
trigger the compensating tax of or otherwise disqualify land from being
taxed under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW.
(6) Upon application of a small forest landowner for a riparian
easement that is associated with a forest practices application and the
landowner's marking of the qualifying timber on the qualifying lands,
the small forest landowner office shall determine the compensation to
be offered to the small forest landowner as provided for in this
section. The small forest landowner office shall also determine the
compensation to be offered to a small forest landowner for qualifying
timber for which an approved forest practices application for timber
harvest cannot be obtained because of restrictions under the forest
practices rules. The legislature recognizes that there is not readily
available market transaction evidence of value for easements of this
nature, and thus establishes the following methodology to ascertain the
value for forestry riparian easements. Values so determined shall not
be considered competent evidence of value for any other purpose.
The small forest landowner office shall establish the volume of the
qualifying timber. Based on that volume and using data obtained or
maintained by the department of revenue under RCW 84.33.074 and
84.33.091, the small forest landowner office shall attempt to determine
the fair market value of the qualifying timber as of the date the
forest practices application associated with the qualifying timber was
submitted or the date the landowner notifies the department that the
harvest is to begin. Removal of any qualifying timber before the
expiration of the easement must be in accordance with the forest
practices rules and the terms of the easement. There shall be no
reduction in compensation for reentry.
(7)(a) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the
small forest landowner office shall, subject to available funding,
offer compensation to the small forest landowner in the amount of fifty
percent of the value determined in subsection (6) of this section, plus
the compliance and reimbursement costs as determined in accordance with
RCW 76.13.140.
(b) If the landowner accepts the offer for qualifying timber that
will be harvested pursuant to an approved forest practices application,
the department ((of natural resources)) shall pay the compensation
((promptly upon (a))) within thirty days of:
(i) Completion of harvest in the area covered by the forestry
riparian easement; (((b)))
(ii) Verification that there has been compliance with the rules
requiring leave trees in the easement area; and (((c)))
(iii) Execution and delivery of the easement to the department ((of
natural resources)).
(c) If the landowner accepts the offer for qualifying timber for
which an approved forest practices application for timber harvest
cannot be obtained because of restrictions under the forest practices
rules, the department ((of natural resources)) shall pay the
compensation ((promptly upon)) within thirty days of:
(i) Verification that there has been compliance with the rules
requiring leave trees in the easement area; and
(ii) Execution and delivery of the easement to the department ((of
natural resources)).
(d) If the department fails to pay the agreed to compensation
within the thirty days required by this section, the department is
responsible for reimbursing the landowner all interest that accrues on
the amount owed each day after the thirtieth day until final payment is
delivered. Interest must be calculated according to the rules adopted
by the department of revenue under RCW 84.69.100.
(e) Upon donation or payment of compensation, the department of
natural resources may record the easement.
(8) For approved forest practices applications where the regulatory
impact is greater than the average percentage impact for all small
landowners as determined by the department ((of natural resources))
analysis under the regulatory fairness act, chapter 19.85 RCW, the
compensation offered will be increased to one hundred percent for that
portion of the regulatory impact that is in excess of the average.
Regulatory impact includes trees left in buffers, special management
zones, and those rendered uneconomic to harvest by these rules. A
separate average or high impact regulatory threshold shall be
established for western and eastern Washington. Criteria for these
measurements and payments shall be established by the small forest
landowner office.
(9) The forest practices board shall adopt rules under the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement the
forestry riparian easement program, including the following:
(a) A standard version or versions of all documents necessary or
advisable to create the forestry riparian easements as provided for in
this section;
(b) Standards for descriptions of the easement premises with a
degree of precision that is reasonable in relation to the values
involved;
(c) Methods and standards for cruises and valuation of forestry
riparian easements for purposes of establishing the compensation. The
department ((of natural resources)) shall perform the timber cruises of
forestry riparian easements required under this chapter and chapter
76.09 RCW. Any rules concerning the methods and standards for
valuations of forestry riparian easements shall apply only to the
department ((of natural resources)), small forest landowners, and the
small forest landowner office;
(d) A method to determine that a forest practices application
involves a commercially reasonable harvest, and adopt criteria for
entering into a forest riparian easement where a commercially
reasonable harvest is not possible or a forest practices application
that has been submitted cannot be approved because of restrictions
under the forest practices rules;
(e) A method to address blowdown of qualified timber falling
outside the easement premises;
(f) A formula for sharing of proceeds in relation to the
acquisition of qualified timber covered by an easement through the
exercise or threats of eminent domain by a federal or state agency with
eminent domain authority, based on the present value of the
department's ((of natural resources')) and the landowner's relative
interests in the qualified timber;
(g) High impact regulatory thresholds;
(h) A method to determine timber that is qualifying timber because
it is rendered uneconomic to harvest by the rules adopted under RCW
76.09.055 and 76.09.370; and
(i) A method for internal department ((of natural resources))
review of small forest landowner office compensation decisions under
subsection (7) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of natural resources must
provide payment, no more than thirty days after the effective date of
this section, to any applicant to the forest riparian easement program
who has satisfied, by the effective date of this section, the
requirements for payment in RCW 76.13.120. If the department of
natural resources fails to provide payment to the applicant within the
required timelines, then interest will be payable to the applicant as
specified in RCW 76.13.120.

--- END ---