BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
A taxpayer may elect to file returns based on cash receipts or
accrual basis, regardless of which method is used for the taxpayer's
regular books of account.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.090 and 2001 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Value proceeding or accruing" means the consideration, whether
money, credits, rights, or other property expressed in terms of money,
actually received or accrued. The term shall be applied, in each case,
on a cash receipts or accrual basis according to which method of
accounting ((is regularly employed in keeping the books of the
taxpayer. However, persons operating grain warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW may elect to report the value proceeding or accruing
from grain warehouse operations on either a cash receipts or accrual
basis)) the taxpayer has elected under section 1 of this act. The
department of revenue may provide by regulation that the value
proceeding or accruing from sales on the installment plan under
conditional contracts of sale may be reported as of the dates when the
payments become due.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.100 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 37 are each
amended to read as follows:
((The department of revenue, by general regulation, shall provide
that a taxpayer whose regular books of account are kept on a cash
receipts basis may file returns based upon his cash receipts for each
reporting period and)) A taxpayer who has elected to file returns on a
cash basis under section 1 of this act may pay the tax herein provided
upon such basis in lieu of reporting and paying the tax on all sales
made during such period. A taxpayer filing returns on a cash receipts
basis is not required to pay such tax on debts which are deductible as
worthless for federal income tax purposes.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.070 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 38 are each
amended to read as follows:
((The department of revenue, by general regulation, shall provide
that a taxpayer whose regular books of account are kept on a cash
receipts basis may file returns based upon his cash receipts for each
reporting period and)) A taxpayer who has elected to file returns on a
cash basis under section 1 of this act may pay the tax herein provided
upon such basis in lieu of reporting and paying the tax on all sales
made during such period. A taxpayer filing returns on a cash receipts
basis is not required to pay such tax on debts which are deductible as
worthless for federal income tax purposes.

--- END ---