BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The Washington economy of the future can provide unparalleled
opportunity while maintaining Washington's traditional values if this
state pursues the future with clarity of purpose and perseverance.
(2) A priorities of government board is needed to (a) encourage the
discussion and understanding of critical global, national, and state
economic trends that will affect the Washington economy in the coming
decades; (b) formulate and submit to Washingtonians a strategy that
describes and explains a vision for Washington's economic progress over
the next twenty to thirty years; and (c) submit to the legislature, for
enactment, goals for Washington's progress, including measurable
indicators of the achievement of those goals, as provided for in
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The priorities of government board is created, consisting of
the governor, nine members appointed by the governor, and the director
of financial management, who shall be a nonvoting ex officio member.
(2)(a) Of the initial appointed members, four shall serve for terms
ending January 31, 2006, and five shall serve for terms ending January
31, 2008. Except for initial appointments, the terms of appointed
members shall be four years. Members may be reappointed.
(b)(i) Members of the board shall be representative of the ethnic,
cultural, social, and economic diversity of the people of Washington.
(ii) Five of the appointed members of the board shall be residents
of different congressional districts in the state.
(3) The governor shall serve as chair of the board and may appoint
an executive officer for the board for a term and with such duties and
powers as the board determines to be necessary or appropriate.
(4) A majority of the members of the board constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business.
(5) The board shall meet as the board determines necessary at times
and places specified by call of the chair or a majority of the members
of the board.
(6) The office of financial management shall provide lead staff
support to the board. Additional staff support shall be provided by
the other public members of the board.
(7) The members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Members of
the board who are not otherwise employed by the state shall be
compensated under RCW 43.03.220.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The priorities of government board shall develop a strategy
that addresses the economic, social, cultural, environmental, and other
needs and aspirations of the people of Washington. The strategy shall
address priorities that the board determines are necessary and
appropriate to Washington's future. Such priorities shall include:
(a) Improve student achievement in elementary, middle, and high
schools;
(b) Improve the quality and productivity of the state's work force;
(c) Improve the value of a state college or university education;
(d) Improve the health of the state's citizens;
(e) Improve the security of the state's vulnerable children and
adults;
(f) Improve the economic vitality of businesses and individuals;
(g) Improve statewide mobility of people, goods, information, and
energy;
(h) Improve the safety of people and property;
(i) Improve the quality of the state's natural resources;
(j) Improve cultural and recreational opportunities throughout the
state; and
(k) Improve the ability of state government to achieve its results
efficiently and effectively.
(2) When developing the strategy, the board shall hold public
hearings, public meetings, and workshops as needed to ensure the
participation of a broad cross-section of Washington's population. The
board shall publicize the public hearings, public meetings, and
workshops in each city in which they are held and shall allow
interested residents and other individuals to appear and be heard by
the board.
(3) After considering any written comments and public testimony
relating to the proposed strategy, the board shall revise the strategy
as it considers necessary or appropriate. The board, by a vote of a
majority of its members, shall approve and adopt a final strategy. The
board shall submit, in addition to its adopted strategy, a summary and
digest of comments and public testimony and its response, if any, to
those comments. The adopted strategy shall be submitted to the
legislature not later than December 1, 2009, and every six years
thereafter.
(4) As a part of the strategy adopted under subsection (3) of this
section, the board shall also adopt a recommended implementation plan.
The plan shall include recommendations for statutory or other changes
the board considers appropriate, modifications in public fiscal and
spending policies, including the allocation of lottery revenues, and
also recommendations for implementing actions to be carried out by
local governments, businesses, private citizens, and other
organizations.
(5)(a) The board must, in its adopted strategy, include a series of
goals for Washington's progress over the next two to three decades.
(b) Goals shall include such measurable indicators of attainment,
as the board shall determine, that show the extent to which each goal
is being achieved.
(c) Goals shall be reviewed by the legislature, which may propose
legislation that enacts the goals as recommended or that modifies,
deletes, or adds to the goals. Any goals enacted by the legislature
shall become the goals used by the board in its subsequent activities.
(d) After enactment, the board may recommend to the legislature
such modifications to the goals as it considers appropriate.
(6) The board shall prepare, at least once each biennium, a report
that describes progress toward achievement of the board's strategy,
based on the specific indicators the board adopts for measuring the
attainment of strategic goals. The report shall include an analysis of
issues and trends of strategic significance and shall propose an agenda
that identifies key steps that Washington should take over the
following two years to build for Washington's future. In developing
the report required by this section, the board shall consider the
criteria in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Each major caucus in the senate and each major caucus in the house
of representatives is encouraged to establish its priorities of
government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 2.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The supreme court is encouraged to establish its priorities of
government.

--- END ---