BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that veterans
have placed themselves in harm's way so that we may live free. It is
the intent of the legislature to honor veterans who have served their
country honorably in times of both war and peace for the public service
they have provided to their country.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Veterans' special license plates" means license plates issued
under section 3 of this act that display a symbol denoting veteran
status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) After seeking input from veterans and veterans' groups from
around the state, and in cooperation with the Washington state patrol
and the department of veterans affairs, the department of licensing
shall create and design, and the department issue, veterans' special
license plates. The veterans' special license plate must display a
symbol denoting veteran status. The veterans' special license plate
may be used in lieu of regular or personalized license plates for motor
vehicles required to display one or two motor vehicle license plates,
excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and
conditions established by the department. The special plates will
commemorate the brave men and women who have served to protect the
freedom of our nation.
(2) The special veterans' license plate may be purchased by
veterans who served on active duty for at least one hundred eighty days
and were discharged under honorable conditions.
(3) Veterans requesting a veterans' special license plate must:
(a) Pay the appropriate fee prescribed in RCW 46.16.313; and
(b) Show proof of eligibility through:
(i) Providing a DD-214 or discharge papers; or
(ii) Attesting in a certified affidavit of their eligibility as
required under this section.
(4) A surviving spouse of a person who qualified under subsection
(2) of this section may continue the privilege of displaying the
veterans' special license plate on a vehicle registered in the name of
the spouse until the surviving spouse remarries, is no longer a
registered owner of the vehicle displaying the plates, or fails to pay
for the renewal of the veterans' special license plates.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.290 and 1997 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In any case of a valid sale or transfer of the ownership of any
vehicle, the right to the certificates properly transferable therewith,
except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, and to the vehicle license plates
passes to the purchaser or transferee. It is unlawful for the holder
of such certificates, except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, or vehicle
license plates to fail, neglect, or refuse to endorse the certificates
and deliver the vehicle license plates to the purchaser or transferee.
If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed by the state or any
county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision
entitled to exemption as provided by law, or, if the vehicle is
licensed with personalized plates, amateur radio operator plates,
Congressional Medal of Honor plates, disabled person plates, disabled
veteran plates, prisoner of war plates, veterans' special license
plates, or other special license plates issued under RCW 46.16.301 as
it existed before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997,
the vehicle license plates therefor shall be retained and may be
displayed upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of the vehicle so sold
or transferred.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee for each type of special
license plates issued under RCW 46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as
existing before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, ((in
an amount calculated)) to offset the cost of production of the special
license plates and the administration of this program. ((Until
December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed thirty-five dollars, but
effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1,
1998, the department may adjust the fee to no more than forty
dollars.)) This fee is in addition to all other fees required to
register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been
requested. All such additional special license plate fees collected by
the department shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to
the motor vehicle fund.
(2) ((Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application, registration, and renewal
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license
plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder
of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(((4) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(((5))) (4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(((6) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
veterans' special license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses. The remaining proceeds will be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying report.
The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle
account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the veterans' special license
plates. Upon the department's determination, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the veterans' license plate account established
under section 7 of this act.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a veteran's
special license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses. The remaining proceeds will be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying report.
The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle
account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the veterans' special license
plates. Upon the department's determination, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the veterans' license plate account established
under section 7 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.16.316 and 1997 c 291 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.16.305:
(1) When a person who has been issued a special license plate or
plates under section 3 of this act or RCW 46.16.301 as it existed
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, sells,
trades, or otherwise transfers or releases ownership of the vehicle
upon which the special license plate or plates have been displayed, he
or she shall immediately report the transfer of such plate or plates to
an acquired vehicle or vehicle eligible for such plates pursuant to
departmental rule, or he or she shall surrender such plates to the
department immediately if such surrender is required by departmental
rule. If a person applies for a transfer of the plate or plates to
another eligible vehicle, a transfer fee of five dollars shall be
charged in addition to all other applicable fees. Such transfer fees
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Failure to surrender the
plates when required is a traffic infraction.
(2) If the special license plate or plates issued by the department
become lost, defaced, damaged, or destroyed, application for a
replacement special license plate or plates shall be made and fees paid
as provided by law for the replacement of regular license plates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The veterans' license plate account is established in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts, except as provided in RCW
46.16.313 (6) and (7), from the veterans' special license plates must
be deposited into the account. The director of the department of
veterans affairs may authorize expenditures from the account. The
funds in the account are to be used solely to support veterans'
services outreach. The account is not subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, and no appropriation is required for
expenditures.

--- END ---