BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.12.050 and 2001 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a public entity engages in any work, or lets a
contract therefor, in which workers are employed for wages, this title
shall be applicable thereto. The employer's payments into the accident
fund shall be made from the treasury of the public entity. If the work
is being done by contract, the payroll of the contractor and the
subcontractor shall be the basis of computation and, in the case of
contract work consuming less than one year in performance, the required
payment into the accident fund shall be based upon the total payroll.
The contractor and any subcontractor shall be subject to the provisions
of this title, and the state for its general fund, the county,
municipal corporation, or other taxing district shall be entitled to
collect from the contractor the full amount payable to the accident
fund and the contractor, in turn, shall be entitled to collect from the
subcontractor his or her proportionate amount of the payment.
(2)(a) A public entity may seek partnerships with volunteer groups
and businesses to engage in community improvement projects to benefit
the public entity. In administering a project, the public entity must:
(i) Provide prospective donors and participants written notice of
the risks and responsibilities to be assumed by the public entity and
the donors or participants. A volunteer donating labor on the project
must, before beginning work, document in writing that he or she has
received the notice and that he or she is donating labor as a result of
his or her own free choice; and
(ii) Pay premiums and assessments required under this title to
secure medical aid benefits under chapter 51.36 RCW for volunteers
donating labor on the project.
(b) A contractor or employer donating equipment or materials for
use on a community improvement project shall not, for the purposes of
this title, be considered the employer of an individual donating labor
unless the contractor or employer pays the individual wages for working
on the project or makes working on the project a condition of
employment. This subsection applies regardless of whether:
(i) The contractor or employer informs the individual about the
community improvement project or encourages the individual to donate
labor on the project;
(ii) The individual uses equipment or materials on the project that
are donated by the contractor or the individual's employer; or
(iii) The individual is granted maintenance or reimbursement for
actual expenses necessarily incurred in performing labor for the
project.
(3) Whenever and so long as, by state law, city charter, or
municipal ordinance, provision is made for employees or peace officers
injured in the course of employment, such employees shall not be
entitled to the benefits of this title and shall not be included in the
payroll of the municipality under this title: PROVIDED, That whenever
any state law, city charter, or municipal ordinance only provides for
payment to the employee of the difference between his or her actual
wages and that received under this title such employees shall be
entitled to the benefits of this title and may be included in the
payroll of the municipality.
(4) For the purposes of this section, a public entity is not
responsible for any premiums upon the work of any subcontractor if the
subcontractor has an industrial insurance account in good standing with
the department when the contract is let.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Community improvement project" means a project sponsored by a
public entity that uses donated labor, materials, or equipment and
includes, but is not limited to, projects to repair, restore, or
preserve historic property.
(b) "Historic property" means real property owned by a public
entity including, but not limited to, barns, schools, military
structures, and cemeteries.
(c) "Public entity" means the state, county, any municipal
corporation, or other taxing district.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.12.070 and 1981 c 128 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this title shall apply to all work done by
contract; the person, firm, or corporation who lets a contract for such
work shall be responsible primarily and directly for all premiums upon
the work. The contractor and any subcontractor shall be subject to the
provisions of this title and the person, firm, or corporation letting
the contract shall be entitled to collect from the contractor the full
amount payable in premiums and the contractor in turn shall be entitled
to collect from the subcontractor his proportionate amount of the
payment.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a contractor registered under
chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW shall not be
responsible for any premiums upon the work of any subcontractor if:
(((1))) (a) The subcontractor is currently engaging in a business
which is registered under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter
19.28 RCW;
(((2))) (b) The subcontractor has a principal place of business
which would be eligible for a business deduction for internal revenue
service tax purposes other than that furnished by the contractor for
which the business has contracted to furnish services;
(((3))) (c) The subcontractor maintains a separate set of books or
records that reflect all items of income and expenses of the business;
and
(((4))) (d) The subcontractor has contracted to perform:
(((a))) (i) The work of a contractor as defined in RCW 18.27.010;
or
(((b))) (ii) The work of installing wires or equipment to convey
electric current or installing apparatus to be operated by such current
as it pertains to the electrical industry as described in chapter 19.28
RCW.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a contractor is not
responsible for any premiums upon the work of any subcontractor if the
subcontractor has an industrial insurance account in good standing with
the department when the contract is let.
(4) It shall be unlawful for any county, city or town to issue a
construction building permit to any person who has not submitted to the
department an estimate of payroll and paid premium thereon as provided
by chapter 51.16 RCW of this title or proof that such person has
qualified as a self-insurer.

--- END ---