BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.56.005 and 1991 c 200 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature declares that the increasing reliance on water
borne transportation as a source of supply for oil and hazardous
substances poses special concern for the state of Washington. Each
year billions of gallons of crude oil and refined petroleum products
are transported by vessel on the navigable waters of the state. These
shipments are expected to increase in the coming years. Vessels
transporting oil into Washington travel on some of the most unique and
special marine environments in the United States. These marine
environments are a source of natural beauty, recreation, and economic
livelihood for many residents of this state. As a result, the state
has an obligation to ((assure)) ensure the citizens of the state that
the waters of the state will be protected from oil spills.
(2) The legislature finds that prevention is the best method to
protect the unique and special marine environments in this state. The
technology for containing and cleaning up a spill of oil or hazardous
substances is in the early stages of development. Preventing spills is
more protective of the environment and more cost-effective when all the
costs associated with responding to a spill are considered. Therefore,
the legislature finds that the primary objective of the state is to
adopt a zero spills strategy to prevent any oil or hazardous substances
from entering waters of the state.
(3) The legislature also finds that:
(a) Recent accidents in Washington, Alaska, southern California,
Texas, and other parts of the nation have shown that the
transportation, transfer, and storage of oil have caused significant
damage to the marine environment;
(b) Even with the best efforts, it is nearly impossible to remove
all oil that is spilled into the water;
(c) Washington's navigable waters are treasured environmental and
economic resources that the state cannot afford to place at undue risk
from an oil spill; and
(d) The state has a fundamental responsibility, as the trustee of
the state's natural resources and the protector of public health and
the environment to prevent the spill of oil.
(4) In order to establish a comprehensive prevention and response
program to protect Washington's waters and natural resources from
spills of oil, it is the purpose of this chapter:
(a) To establish state agency expertise in marine safety and to
centralize state activities in spill prevention and response
activities;
(b) To prevent spills of oil and to promote programs that reduce
the risk of both catastrophic and small chronic spills;
(c) To ensure that responsible parties are liable, and have the
resources and ability, to respond to spills and provide compensation
for all costs and damages;
(d) To provide for state spill response and wildlife rescue
planning and implementation;
(e) To support and complement the federal oil pollution act of 1990
and other federal law, especially those provisions relating to the
national contingency plan for cleanup of oil spills and discharges,
including provisions relating to the responsibilities of state agencies
designated as natural resource trustees. The legislature intends this
chapter to be interpreted and implemented in a manner consistent with
federal law;
(f) To provide broad powers of regulation to the department of
ecology relating to spill prevention and response;
(g) To provide for an independent oversight board to review the
adequacy of spill prevention and response activities in this state; and
(h) To provide an adequate funding source for state response and
prevention programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 88.46.160 and 2000 c 69 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person or facility conducting ship refueling and bunkering
operations, or the lightering of petroleum products, and any person or
facility transferring oil between an onshore or offshore facility and
a tank vessel shall have containment and recovery equipment readily
available for deployment in the event of the discharge of oil into the
waters of the state and shall deploy the containment and recovery
equipment in accordance with standards adopted by the department. All
persons conducting refueling, bunkering, or lightering operations, or
oil transfer operations shall be trained in the use and deployment of
oil spill containment and recovery equipment. The department shall
adopt rules as necessary to carry out the provisions of this section by
June 30, 2006. The rules shall include standards for the circumstances
under which containment equipment should be deployed including
standards requiring deployment of containment equipment prior to the
transfer of oil when determined to be safe and effective by the
department. The department may require a person or facility to employ
alternative measures including but not limited to automatic shutoff
devices and alarms, extra personnel to monitor the transfer, or
containment equipment that is deployed quickly and effectively. An
onshore or offshore facility shall include the procedures used to
contain and recover discharges in the facility's contingency plan. It
is the responsibility of the person providing bunkering, refueling, or
lightering services to provide any containment or recovery equipment
required under this section. This section does not apply to a person
operating a ship for personal pleasure or for recreational purposes.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.56.060 and 2000 c 69 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall prepare and annually update a statewide
master oil and hazardous substance spill prevention and contingency
plan. In preparing the plan, the department shall consult with an
advisory committee representing diverse interests concerned with oil
and hazardous substance spills, including the United States coast
guard, the federal environmental protection agency, state agencies,
local governments, port districts, private facilities, environmental
organizations, oil companies, shipping companies, containment and
cleanup contractors, tow companies, and hazardous substance
manufacturers.
(2) The state master plan prepared under this section shall at a
minimum:
(a) Take into consideration the elements of oil spill prevention
and contingency plans approved or submitted for approval pursuant to
this chapter and chapter 88.46 RCW and oil and hazardous substance
spill contingency plans prepared pursuant to other state or federal law
or prepared by federal agencies and regional entities;
(b) State the respective responsibilities as established by
relevant statutes and rules of each of the following in the prevention
of and the assessment, containment, and cleanup of a worst case spill
of oil or hazardous substances into the environment of the state: (i)
State agencies; (ii) local governments; (iii) appropriate federal
agencies; (iv) facility operators; (v) property owners whose land or
other property may be affected by the oil or hazardous substance spill;
and (vi) other parties identified by the department as having an
interest in or the resources to assist in the containment and cleanup
of an oil or hazardous substance spill;
(c) State the respective responsibilities of the parties identified
in (b) of this subsection in an emergency response;
(d) Identify actions necessary to reduce the likelihood of spills
of oil and hazardous substances;
(e) Identify and obtain mapping of environmentally sensitive areas
at particular risk to oil and hazardous substance spills; ((and))
(f) Establish an incident command system for responding to oil and
hazardous substances spills; and
(g) Establish a process for immediately notifying affected tribes
of any oil spill.
(3) In preparing and updating the state master plan, the department
shall:
(a) Consult with federal, provincial, municipal, and community
officials, other state agencies, the state of Oregon, and with
representatives of affected regional organizations;
(b) Submit the draft plan to the public for review and comment;
(c) Submit to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature for review, not later than November 1st of each year, the
plan and any annual revision of the plan; and
(d) Require or schedule unannounced oil spill drills as required by
RCW 90.56.260 to test the sufficiency of oil spill contingency plans
approved under RCW 90.56.210.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.56.210 and 2000 c 69 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each onshore and offshore facility shall have a contingency
plan for the containment and cleanup of oil spills from the facility
into the waters of the state and for the protection of fisheries and
wildlife, shellfish beds, natural resources, and public and private
property from such spills. The department shall by rule adopt and
periodically revise standards for the preparation of contingency plans.
The department shall require contingency plans, at a minimum, to meet
the following standards:
(a) Include full details of the method of response to spills of
various sizes from any facility which is covered by the plan;
(b) Be designed to be capable in terms of personnel, materials, and
equipment, of promptly and properly, to the maximum extent practicable,
as defined by the department removing oil and minimizing any damage to
the environment resulting from a worst case spill;
(c) Provide a clear, precise, and detailed description of how the
plan relates to and is integrated into relevant contingency plans which
have been prepared by cooperatives, ports, regional entities, the
state, and the federal government;
(d) Provide procedures for early detection of oil spills and timely
notification of such spills to appropriate federal, state, and local
authorities under applicable state and federal law;
(e) State the number, training preparedness, and fitness of all
dedicated, prepositioned personnel assigned to direct and implement the
plan;
(f) Incorporate periodic training and drill programs to evaluate
whether personnel and equipment provided under the plan are in a state
of operational readiness at all times;
(g) Describe important features of the surrounding environment,
including fish and wildlife habitat, shellfish beds, environmentally
and archaeologically sensitive areas, and public facilities. The
departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and
the office of archaeology and historic preservation, upon request,
shall provide information that they have available to assist in
preparing this description. The description of archaeologically
sensitive areas shall not be required to be included in a contingency
plan until it is reviewed and updated pursuant to subsection (9) of
this section;
(h) State the means of protecting and mitigating effects on the
environment, including fish, shellfish, marine mammals, and other
wildlife, and ensure that implementation of the plan does not pose
unacceptable risks to the public or the environment;
(i) Provide arrangements for the prepositioning of oil spill
containment and cleanup equipment and trained personnel at strategic
locations from which they can be deployed to the spill site to promptly
and properly remove the spilled oil;
(j) Provide arrangements for enlisting the use of qualified and
trained cleanup personnel to implement the plan;
(k) Provide for disposal of recovered spilled oil in accordance
with local, state, and federal laws;
(l) Until a spill prevention plan has been submitted pursuant to
RCW 90.56.200, state the measures that have been taken to reduce the
likelihood that a spill will occur, including but not limited to,
design and operation of a facility, training of personnel, number of
personnel, and backup systems designed to prevent a spill;
(m) State the amount and type of equipment available to respond to
a spill, where the equipment is located, and the extent to which other
contingency plans rely on the same equipment; and
(n) If the department has adopted rules permitting the use of
dispersants, the circumstances, if any, and the manner for the
application of the dispersants in conformance with the department's
rules.
(2)(a) The following shall submit contingency plans to the
department within six months after the department adopts rules
establishing standards for contingency plans under subsection (1) of
this section:
(i) Onshore facilities capable of storing one million gallons or
more of oil; and
(ii) Offshore facilities.
(b) Contingency plans for all other onshore and offshore facilities
shall be submitted to the department within eighteen months after the
department has adopted rules under subsection (1) of this section. The
department may adopt a schedule for submission of plans within the
eighteen-month period.
(3)(a) The owner or operator of a facility shall submit the
contingency plan for the facility.
(b) A person who has contracted with a facility to provide
containment and cleanup services and who meets the standards
established pursuant to RCW 90.56.240, may submit the plan for any
facility for which the person is contractually obligated to provide
services. Subject to conditions imposed by the department, the person
may submit a single plan for more than one facility.
(4) A contingency plan prepared for an agency of the federal
government or another state that satisfies the requirements of this
section and rules adopted by the department may be accepted by the
department as a contingency plan under this section. The department
shall ((assure)) ensure that to the greatest extent possible,
requirements for contingency plans under this section are consistent
with the requirements for contingency plans under federal law.
(5) In reviewing the contingency plans required by this section,
the department shall consider at least the following factors:
(a) The adequacy of containment and cleanup equipment, personnel,
communications equipment, notification procedures and call down lists,
response time, and logistical arrangements for coordination and
implementation of response efforts to remove oil spills promptly and
properly and to protect the environment;
(b) The nature and amount of vessel traffic within the area covered
by the plan;
(c) The volume and type of oil being transported within the area
covered by the plan;
(d) The existence of navigational hazards within the area covered
by the plan;
(e) The history and circumstances surrounding prior spills of oil
within the area covered by the plan;
(f) The sensitivity of fisheries, shellfish beds, and wildlife and
other natural resources within the area covered by the plan;
(g) Relevant information on previous spills contained in on-scene
coordinator reports prepared by the department; and
(h) The extent to which reasonable, cost-effective measures to
prevent a likelihood that a spill will occur have been incorporated
into the plan.
(6) The department shall approve a contingency plan only if it
determines that the plan meets the requirements of this section and
that, if implemented, the plan is capable, in terms of personnel,
materials, and equipment, of removing oil promptly and properly and
minimizing any damage to the environment.
(7) The approval of the contingency plan shall be valid for five
years. Upon approval of a contingency plan, the department shall
provide to the person submitting the plan a statement indicating that
the plan has been approved, the facilities or vessels covered by the
plan, and other information the department determines should be
included.
(8) An owner or operator of a facility shall notify the department
in writing immediately of any significant change of which it is aware
affecting its contingency plan, including changes in any factor set
forth in this section or in rules adopted by the department. The
department may require the owner or operator to update a contingency
plan as a result of these changes.
(9) The department by rule shall require contingency plans to be
reviewed, updated, if necessary, and resubmitted to the department at
least once every five years.
(10) Approval of a contingency plan by the department does not
constitute an express assurance regarding the adequacy of the plan nor
constitute a defense to liability imposed under this chapter or other
state law.

--- END ---