BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.56.005 and 1991 c 200 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature declares that the increasing reliance on water
borne transportation as a source of supply for oil and hazardous
substances poses special concern for the state of Washington. Each
year billions of gallons of crude oil and refined petroleum products
are transported by vessel on the navigable waters of the state. These
shipments are expected to increase in the coming years. Vessels
transporting oil into Washington travel on some of the most unique and
special marine environments in the United States. These marine
environments are a source of natural beauty, recreation, and economic
livelihood for many residents of this state. As a result, the state
has an obligation to assure the citizens of the state that the waters
of the state will be protected from oil spills.
(2) The legislature finds that prevention is the best method to
protect the unique and special marine environments in this state. The
technology for containing and cleaning up a spill of oil or hazardous
substances is in the early stages of development. Preventing spills is
more protective of the environment and more cost-effective when all the
costs associated with responding to a spill are considered. Therefore,
the legislature finds that the primary objective of the state is to
adopt a zero spills strategy to prevent any oil or hazardous substances
from entering marine waters.
(3) The legislature also finds that:
(a) Recent accidents in Washington, Alaska, southern California,
Texas, and other parts of the nation have shown that the
transportation, transfer, and storage of oil have caused significant
damage to the marine environment;
(b) Even with the best efforts, it is nearly impossible to remove
all oil that is spilled into the water;
(c) Washington's navigable waters are treasured environmental and
economic resources that the state cannot afford to place at undue risk
from an oil spill; and
(d) The state has a fundamental responsibility, as the trustee of
the state's natural resources and the protector of public health and
the environment to prevent the spill of oil.
(4) In order to establish a comprehensive prevention and response
program to protect Washington's waters and natural resources from
spills of oil, it is the purpose of this chapter:
(a) To establish state agency expertise in marine safety and to
centralize state activities in spill prevention and response
activities;
(b) To prevent spills of oil and to promote programs that reduce
the risk of both catastrophic and small chronic spills;
(c) To ensure that responsible parties are liable, and have the
resources and ability, to respond to spills and provide compensation
for all costs and damages;
(d) To provide for state spill response and wildlife rescue
planning and implementation;
(e) To support and complement the federal oil pollution act of 1990
and other federal law, especially those provisions relating to the
national contingency plan for cleanup of oil spills and discharges,
including provisions relating to the responsibilities of state agencies
designated as natural resource trustees. The legislature intends this
chapter to be interpreted and implemented in a manner consistent with
federal law;
(f) To provide broad powers of regulation to the department of
ecology relating to spill prevention and response;
(g) To provide for an independent oversight board to review the
adequacy of spill prevention and response activities in this state; and
(h) To provide an adequate funding source for state response and
prevention programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature recognizes that while
the prevention of oil and hazardous substances spills and the goal of
zero spills are the primary objectives of the oil spill program, the
best available technologies for contingency planning and response must
also be in place in the event that a spill does occur. To ensure that
the state oil spill program is utilizing the most effective and up-to-date methods and technologies, the department of ecology shall initiate
a review of current oil spill prevention and contingency plan
requirements to determine their effectiveness in preventing and
responding to oil and other hazardous substances spills.
(2) The department of ecology shall create an oil spill review
committee to implement this section. The committee shall include, but
is not limited to, representatives from the following entities: The
United States coast guard; treaty Indian tribes; regulated facilities;
regulated vessels; marine fueling facilities; the Puget Sound harbor
safety committee; the Puget Sound action team; the department of fish
and wildlife; environmental stakeholders; labor organizations; local
government; and ports.
(3) The oil spill review committee shall research and recommend:
(a) Methods to best achieve a zero spill strategy;
(b) Best management practices and regulations on oil spill
prevention during oil transfers including the use of automatic shutoff
devices, the number and training requirements of personnel, daylight-only fuel transfers, illumination standards, and other oil transfer
prevention strategies; and
(c) Methods and data requirements for monitoring the effectiveness
of oil spill prevention strategies.
(4) The oil spill review committee shall report recommendations to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2004.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.71.050 and 1998 c 246 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each biennium, the action team shall prepare a Puget Sound
work plan and budget for inclusion in the governor's biennial budget.
The work plan shall prescribe the necessary federal, state, and local
actions to maintain and enhance Puget Sound water quality, including
but not limited to, enhancement of recreational opportunities, and
restoration of a balanced population of indigenous shellfish, fish, and
wildlife. The work plan and budget shall include specific actions and
projects pertaining to salmon recovery plans and the effectiveness of
strategies for preventing and responding to oil and other hazardous
substances spills.
(b) In developing a work plan, the action team shall meet the
following objectives:
(i) Use the plan elements of the Puget Sound management plan to
prioritize local and state actions necessary to restore and protect the
biological health and diversity of Puget Sound;
(ii) Consider the problems and priorities identified in local
plans; and
(iii) Coordinate the work plan activities with other relevant
activities, including but not limited to, agencies' activities that
have not been funded through the plan, local plans, and governmental
and nongovernmental watershed restoration activities.
(c) In developing a budget, the action team shall identify:
(i) The total funds to implement local projects originating from
the planning process developed for nonpoint pollution; and
(ii) The total funds to implement any other projects designed
primarily to restore salmon habitat.
(2) In addition to the requirements identified under RCW
90.71.020(2)(a), the work plan and budget shall:
(a) Identify and prioritize the local and state actions necessary
to address the water quality problems in the following locations:
(i) Area 1: Island and San Juan counties;
(ii) Area 2: Skagit and Whatcom counties;
(iii) Area 3: Clallam and Jefferson counties;
(iv) Area 4: Snohomish, King, and Pierce counties; and
(v) Area 5: Kitsap, Mason, and Thurston counties;
(b) Provide sufficient funding to characterize local watersheds,
provide technical assistance, and implement state responsibilities
identified in the work plan. The number and qualifications of staff
assigned to each region shall be determined by the types of problems
identified pursuant to (a) of this subsection;
(c) Provide sufficient funding to implement and coordinate the
Puget Sound ambient monitoring plan pursuant to RCW 90.71.060;
(d) Provide funds to assist local jurisdictions to implement
elements of the work plan assigned to local governments and to develop
and implement local plans;
(e) Provide sufficient funding to provide support staff for the
action team; and
(f) Describe any proposed amendments to the Puget Sound management
plan.
(3) The work plan shall be submitted to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by December 20th of each even-numbered year.
(4) The work plan shall be implemented consistent with the
legislative provisos of the biennial appropriation acts.

--- END ---