BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following property is exempt from property taxes:
(a) Motor fuel owned by a farmer; and
(b) Personal property owned by a farmer used for the maintenance of
farm machinery and equipment.
(2)(a) "Farmer" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.213.
(b) "Farm machinery and equipment" means machinery and equipment
used exclusively in growing and producing agricultural products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2005 and thereafter.

--- END ---