BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 89.12.090 and 1943 c 275 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a district to which this chapter applies is organized or
in process of organization, the state of Washington, by and through its
proper officials, is authorized and directed to have any state lands
within the exterior boundaries of such district included as a part of
the lands of such district. The state hereby consents to the
assessment by the district of such state lands so included in any such
irrigation district, and to the enforcement of the payment of such
assessments in like manner and to the same extent as applicable to
private lands in such districts, except that the payment of such
assessment against such state lands shall not be enforced by transfer
of title, by tax sale, tax foreclosure or otherwise, until the state
has sold or transferred such lands to a private party. State lands
within a district that have been segregated into farm units or are
otherwise receiving water by means of project works shall not exceed
the acreage held as of January 1, 2004.

--- END ---