BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.070 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 535 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created a correctional industries board of directors
which shall have the composition provided in RCW 72.09.080.
(2) Consistent with general department of corrections policies and
procedures pertaining to the general administration of correctional
facilities, the board shall establish and implement policy for
correctional industries programs designed to:
(a) Offer inmates meaningful employment, work experience, and
training in vocations that are specifically designed to reduce
recidivism and thereby enhance public safety by providing opportunities
for legitimate means of livelihood upon their release from custody;
(b) Provide industries which will reduce the tax burden of
corrections and save taxpayers money through production of goods and
services for sale and use;
(c) Operate correctional work programs in an effective and
efficient manner which are as similar as possible to those provided by
the private sector;
(d) Encourage the development of and provide for selection of,
contracting for, and supervision of work programs with participating
private enterprise firms;
(e) Develop and ((design)) select correctional industries work
programs that do not unfairly compete with Washington businesses;
(f) Invest available funds in correctional industries enterprises
and meaningful work programs that minimize the impact on in-state jobs
and businesses.
(3) The board of directors shall at least annually review the work
performance of the director of correctional industries division with
the secretary.
(4) The director of correctional industries division shall review
and evaluate the productivity, funding, and appropriateness of all
correctional work programs and report on their effectiveness to the
board and to the secretary.
(5) The board of directors shall have the authority to identify and
establish trade advisory or apprenticeship committees to advise them on
correctional industries work programs. The secretary shall appoint the
members of the committees.
Where a labor management trade advisory and apprenticeship
committee has already been established by the department pursuant to
RCW 72.62.050 the existing committee shall also advise the board of
directors.
(6) The board shall develop a strategic yearly marketing plan that
shall be consistent with and work towards achieving the goals
established in the six-year phased expansion of class I and class II
correctional industries established in RCW 72.09.111. This marketing
plan shall be presented to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by January 17 of each calendar year until the goals set
forth in RCW 72.09.111 are achieved.

Sec. 2 RCW 72.09.100 and 2002 c 175 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the
power to provide for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove
statutory and other restrictions which have limited work programs in
the past. It is also the intent of the legislature to ensure that the
correctional industries board of directors, in developing and selecting
correctional industries work programs, does not encourage the
development of, or provide for selection of or contracting for, the
significant expansion of any new or existing class I correctional
industries work programs that unfairly compete with Washington
businesses. The legislature intends that the requirements relating to
fair competition in the correctional industries work programs be
liberally construed to protect Washington businesses from unfair
competition.
For purposes of establishing such a comprehensive program, the
legislature recommends that the department consider adopting any or
all, or any variation of, the following classes of work programs:
(1) CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES.
(a) The employer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit organization
pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the department.
The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both the
public and private sector.
(b) The customer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed by the department to provide Washington state manufacturers
or businesses with products or services currently produced or provided
by out-of-state or foreign suppliers.
(c) The correctional industries board of directors shall review
these proposed industries, including any potential new class I
industries work program or the significant expansion of an existing
class I industries work program, before the department contracts to
provide such products or services. The review shall include ((an)) the
analysis ((of the potential impact of the proposed products and
services on the Washington state business community and labor market))
required under section 4 of this act to determine if the proposed
correctional industries work program will compete with any Washington
business. An agreement for a new class I correctional industries work
program, or an agreement for a significant expansion of an existing
class I correctional industries work program, that unfairly competes
with any Washington business is prohibited.
(d) The department of corrections shall supply appropriate security
and custody services without charge to the participating firms.
(e) Inmates who work in free venture industries shall do so at
their own choice. They shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry
is located, as determined by the director of correctional industries.
If the director cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then
the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.
(f) An inmate who is employed in the class I program of
correctional industries shall not be eligible for unemployment
compensation benefits pursuant to any of the provisions of Title 50 RCW
until released on parole or discharged.
(2) CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be state-owned and operated
enterprises designed to reduce the costs for goods and services for
tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations.
(b) The industries selected for development within this class
shall, as much as possible, match the available pool of inmate work
skills and aptitudes with the work opportunities in the free community.
The industries shall be closely patterned after private sector
industries but with the objective of reducing public support costs
rather than making a profit. The products and services of this
industry, including purchased products and services necessary for a
complete product line, may be sold to public agencies, to nonprofit
organizations, and to private contractors when the goods purchased will
be ultimately used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization.
Clothing manufactured by an industry in this class may be donated to
nonprofit organizations that provide clothing free of charge to low-income persons.
(c)(i) Class II correctional industries products and services shall
be reviewed by the correctional industries board of directors before
offering such products and services for sale to private contractors.
(ii) The board of directors shall conduct a yearly marketing review
of the products and services offered under this subsection. Such
review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business
community. To avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to the
state((,)) when there is no public sector market for such goods,
byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural, and animal husbandry
enterprises may be sold to private persons, at private sale. Surplus
byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural and animal husbandry
enterprises that cannot be sold to public agencies or to private
persons may be donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of
surplus products shall be carried out in accordance with rules
prescribed by the secretary.
(d) Security and custody services shall be provided without charge
by the department of corrections.
(e) Inmates working in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall be paid for their work on a gratuity scale
which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in
the locality in which the industry is located and which is approved by
the director of correctional industries.
(f) Subject to approval of the correctional industries board,
provisions of RCW 41.06.380 prohibiting contracting out work performed
by classified employees shall not apply to contracts with Washington
state businesses entered into by the department of corrections through
class II industries.
(3) CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department of
corrections. They shall be designed and managed to accomplish the
following objectives:
(((a))) (i) Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and
experience so that the inmate will be able to qualify for better work
both within correctional industries and the free community. It is not
intended that an inmate's work within this class of industries should
be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.
(((b))) (ii) Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or
work training per week.
(((c))) (iii) Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public
support costs.
(b) Class III correctional industries shall be reviewed by the
correctional industries board of directors to set policy for capital
programs or community work crews. The department shall present
quarterly detail statements showing where the crews worked, what
correctional industry class, and the hours worked, to the correctional
industries board of directors.
(c) Supervising, management, and custody staff shall be employees
of the department.
(d) All able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are
not working in other classes of industries shall work in this class.
(e) Except for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates
in this class shall be paid for their work in accordance with an inmate
gratuity scale. The scale shall be adopted by the secretary of
corrections.
(4) CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department of
corrections. They shall be designed and managed to provide services in
the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The services shall
be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or infirm, or
to nonprofit organizations.
(b) Class IV correctional industries shall be reviewed by the
correctional industries board of directors to set policy for work
crews. The department shall present quarterly detail statements
showing where the crews worked, what correctional industry class, and
the hours worked, to the correctional industries board of directors.
Class IV correctional industries operated in work camps established
pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 are exempt from the requirements and
prohibitions of this subsection (4)(b).
(c) Inmates in this program shall reside in facilities owned by,
contracted for, or licensed by the department of corrections. A unit
of local government shall provide work supervision services without
charge to the state and shall pay the inmate's wage.
(d) The department of corrections shall reimburse participating
units of local government for liability and workers compensation
insurance costs.
(e) Inmates who work in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall receive a gratuity which shall not exceed
the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the
industry is located.
(5) CLASS V: COMMUNITY RESTITUTION PROGRAMS.
(a) Programs in this class shall be subject to supervision by the
department of corrections. The purpose of this class of industries is
to enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off all
or part of a community restitution order as ordered by the sentencing
court.
(b) Employment shall be in a community restitution program operated
by the state, local units of government, or a nonprofit agency.
(c) To the extent that funds are specifically made available for
such purposes, the department of corrections shall reimburse nonprofit
agencies for workers compensation insurance costs.

Sec. 3 RCW 72.09.100 and 2002 c 354 s 238 and 2002 c 175 s 49 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the
power to provide for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove
statutory and other restrictions which have limited work programs in
the past. It is also the intent of the legislature to ensure that the
correctional industries board of directors, in developing and selecting
correctional industries work programs, does not encourage the
development of, or provide for selection of or contracting for, the
significant expansion of any new or existing class I correctional
industries work programs that unfairly compete with Washington
businesses. The legislature intends that the requirements relating to
fair competition in the correctional industries work programs be
liberally construed to protect Washington businesses from unfair
competition. For purposes of establishing such a comprehensive
program, the legislature recommends that the department consider
adopting any or all, or any variation of, the following classes of work
programs:
(1) CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES.
(a) The employer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit organization
pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the department.
The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both the
public and private sector.
(b) The customer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed by the department to provide Washington state manufacturers
or businesses with products or services currently produced or provided
by out-of-state or foreign suppliers.
(c) The correctional industries board of directors shall review
these proposed industries, including any potential new class I
industries work program or the significant expansion of an existing
class I industries work program, before the department contracts to
provide such products or services. The review shall include ((an)) the
analysis ((of the potential impact of the proposed products and
services on the Washington state business community and labor market))
required under section 4 of this act to determine if the proposed
correctional industries work program will compete with any Washington
business. An agreement for a new class I correctional industries work
program, or an agreement for a significant expansion of an existing
class I correctional industries work program, that unfairly competes
with any Washington business is prohibited.
(d) The department of corrections shall supply appropriate security
and custody services without charge to the participating firms.
(e) Inmates who work in free venture industries shall do so at
their own choice. They shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry
is located, as determined by the director of correctional industries.
If the director cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then
the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.
(f) An inmate who is employed in the class I program of
correctional industries shall not be eligible for unemployment
compensation benefits pursuant to any of the provisions of Title 50 RCW
until released on parole or discharged.
(2) CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be state-owned and operated
enterprises designed to reduce the costs for goods and services for
tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations.
(b) The industries selected for development within this class
shall, as much as possible, match the available pool of inmate work
skills and aptitudes with the work opportunities in the free community.
The industries shall be closely patterned after private sector
industries but with the objective of reducing public support costs
rather than making a profit. The products and services of this
industry, including purchased products and services necessary for a
complete product line, may be sold to public agencies, to nonprofit
organizations, and to private contractors when the goods purchased will
be ultimately used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization.
Clothing manufactured by an industry in this class may be donated to
nonprofit organizations that provide clothing free of charge to low-income persons.
(c)(i) Class II correctional industries products and services shall
be reviewed by the correctional industries board of directors before
offering such products and services for sale to private contractors.
(ii) The board of directors shall conduct a yearly marketing review
of the products and services offered under this subsection. Such
review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business
community. To avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to the
state, when there is no public sector market for such goods, byproducts
and surpluses of timber, agricultural, and animal husbandry enterprises
may be sold to private persons, at private sale. Surplus byproducts
and surpluses of timber, agricultural and animal husbandry enterprises
that cannot be sold to public agencies or to private persons may be
donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of surplus products
shall be carried out in accordance with rules prescribed by the
secretary.
(d) Security and custody services shall be provided without charge
by the department of corrections.
(e) Inmates working in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall be paid for their work on a gratuity scale
which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in
the locality in which the industry is located and which is approved by
the director of correctional industries.
(f) Subject to approval of the correctional industries board,
provisions of RCW 41.06.142 shall not apply to contracts with
Washington state businesses entered into by the department of
corrections through class II industries.
(3) CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department of
corrections. They shall be designed and managed to accomplish the
following objectives:
(((a))) (i) Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and
experience so that the inmate will be able to qualify for better work
both within correctional industries and the free community. It is not
intended that an inmate's work within this class of industries should
be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.
(((b))) (ii) Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or
work training per week.
(((c))) (iii) Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public
support costs.
(b) Class III correctional industries shall be reviewed by the
correctional industries board of directors to set policy for capital
programs or community work crews. The department shall present
quarterly detail statements showing where the crews worked, what
correctional industry class, and the hours worked, to the correctional
industries board of directors.
(c) Supervising, management, and custody staff shall be employees
of the department.
(d) All able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are
not working in other classes of industries shall work in this class.
(e) Except for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates
in this class shall be paid for their work in accordance with an inmate
gratuity scale. The scale shall be adopted by the secretary of
corrections.
(4) CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department of
corrections. They shall be designed and managed to provide services in
the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The services shall
be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or infirm, or
to nonprofit organizations.
(b) Class IV correctional industries shall be reviewed by the
correctional industries board of directors to set policy for work
crews. The department shall present quarterly detail statements
showing where the crews worked, what correctional industry class, and
the hours worked, to the correctional industries board of directors.
Class IV correctional industries operated in work camps established
pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 are exempt from the requirements and
prohibitions of this subsection (4)(b).
(c) Inmates in this program shall reside in facilities owned by,
contracted for, or licensed by the department of corrections. A unit
of local government shall provide work supervision services without
charge to the state and shall pay the inmate's wage.
(d) The department of corrections shall reimburse participating
units of local government for liability and workers compensation
insurance costs.
(e) Inmates who work in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall receive a gratuity which shall not exceed
the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the
industry is located.
(5) CLASS V: COMMUNITY RESTITUTION PROGRAMS.
(a) Programs in this class shall be subject to supervision by the
department of corrections. The purpose of this class of industries is
to enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off all
or part of a community restitution order as ordered by the sentencing
court.
(b) Employment shall be in a community restitution program operated
by the state, local units of government, or a nonprofit agency.
(c) To the extent that funds are specifically made available for
such purposes, the department of corrections shall reimburse nonprofit
agencies for workers compensation insurance costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must prepare a threshold analysis for any
proposed new class I correctional industries work program or the
significant expansion of an existing class I correctional industries
work program before the department enters into an agreement to provide
such products or services. The analysis must state whether the
proposed new or expanded program will impact any Washington business
and must be based on information sufficient to evaluate the impact on
Washington business.
(2) If the threshold analysis determines that a proposed new or
expanded class I correctional industries work program will impact a
Washington business, the department must complete a business impact
analysis before the department enters into an agreement to provide such
products or services. The business impact analysis must include:
(a) A detailed statement identifying the scope and types of impacts
caused by the proposed new or expanded correctional industries work
program on Washington businesses; and
(b) A detailed statement of the business costs of the proposed
correctional industries work program compared to the business costs of
the impacted Washington businesses. Business costs of the proposed
correctional industries work program to include rent, utility rates
(for water, sewer, electricity, and disposal), labor costs, and any
other quantifiable expense unique to operating in a prison. Business
costs of the impacted Washington business include rent, utility rates
(for water, sewer, electricity, and disposal), property taxes, and
labor costs including employee taxes, unemployment insurance, and
workers' compensation.
(3) The completed threshold analysis and any completed business
impact analysis with all supporting documents must be shared in a
meaningful and timely manner with affected chambers of commerce, trade
or business associations, local and state labor union organizations,
and government entities before a finding required under subsection (4)
of this section is made on the proposed new or expanded class I
correctional industries work program.
(4) If a business impact analysis is completed, the department must
conduct a public hearing to take public testimony on the business
impact analysis. The department must, at a minimum, establish a
publicly accessible web site containing information reasonably
calculated to provide notice to each Washington business assigned the
same three-digit standard industrial classification code, or the
corresponding North American industry classification system code, as
the organization seeking the class I correctional industries work
program agreement of the date, time, and place of the hearing. Notice
of the hearing shall be posted at least thirty days prior to the
hearing. Following the public hearing, the department shall adopt a
finding that the proposed new or expanded class I correctional
industries work program: (a) Will not compete with any Washington
business; (b) will not compete unfairly with any Washington business;
or (c) will compete unfairly with any Washington business and is
therefore prohibited under this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 72.09.460 and 1998 c 244 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature intends that all inmates be required to
participate in department-approved education programs, work programs,
or both, unless exempted under subsection (4) of this section.
Eligible inmates who refuse to participate in available education or
work programs available at no charge to the inmates shall lose
privileges according to the system established under RCW 72.09.130.
Eligible inmates who are required to contribute financially to an
education or work program and refuse to contribute shall be placed in
another work program. Refusal to contribute shall not result in a loss
of privileges. The legislature recognizes more inmates may agree to
participate in education and work programs than are available. The
department must make every effort to achieve maximum public benefit by
placing inmates in available and appropriate education and work
programs.
(2) The department shall provide access to a program of education
to all offenders who are under the age of eighteen and who have not met
high school graduation or general equivalency diploma requirements in
accordance with chapter 28A.193 RCW. The program of education
established by the department and education provider under RCW
28A.193.020 for offenders under the age of eighteen must provide each
offender a choice of curriculum that will assist the inmate in
achieving a high school diploma or general equivalency diploma. The
program of education may include but not be limited to basic education,
prevocational training, work ethic skills, conflict resolution
counseling, substance abuse intervention, and anger management
counseling. The curriculum may balance these and other rehabilitation,
work, and training components.
(3) The department shall, to the extent possible and considering
all available funds, prioritize its resources to meet the following
goals for inmates in the order listed:
(a) Achievement of basic academic skills through obtaining a high
school diploma or its equivalent and achievement of vocational skills
necessary for purposes of work programs and for an inmate to qualify
for work upon release;
(b) Additional work and education programs based on assessments and
placements under subsection (5) of this section; and
(c) Other work and education programs as appropriate.
(4) The department shall establish, by rule, objective medical
standards to determine when an inmate is physically or mentally unable
to participate in available education or work programs. When the
department determines an inmate is permanently unable to participate in
any available education or work program due to a medical condition, the
inmate is exempt from the requirement under subsection (1) of this
section. When the department determines an inmate is temporarily
unable to participate in an education or work program due to a medical
condition, the inmate is exempt from the requirement of subsection (1)
of this section for the period of time he or she is temporarily
disabled. The department shall periodically review the medical
condition of all temporarily disabled inmates to ensure the earliest
possible entry or reentry by inmates into available programming.
(5) The department shall establish, by rule, standards for
participation in department-approved education and work programs. The
standards shall address the following areas:
(a) Assessment. The department shall assess all inmates for their
basic academic skill levels using a professionally accepted method of
scoring reading, math, and language skills as grade level equivalents.
The department shall determine an inmate's education history, work
history, and vocational or work skills. The initial assessment shall
be conducted, whenever possible, within the first thirty days of an
inmate's entry into the correctional system, except that initial
assessments are not required for inmates who are sentenced to life
without the possibility of release, assigned to an intensive management
unit within the first thirty days after entry into the correctional
system, are returning to the correctional system within one year of a
prior release, or whose physical or mental condition renders them
unable to complete the assessment process. The department shall track
and record changes in the basic academic skill levels of all inmates
reflected in any testing or assessment performed as part of their
education programming;
(b) Placement. The department shall follow the policies set forth
in subsection (1) of this section in establishing criteria for placing
inmates in education and work programs. The department shall, to the
extent possible, place all inmates whose composite grade level score
for basic academic skills is below the eighth grade level in a combined
education and work program. The placement criteria shall include at
least the following factors:
(i) An inmate's release date and custody level((, except)). An
inmate shall not be precluded from participating in an education or
work program solely on the basis of his or her release date, except
that an inmate with a release date that is more than ten years in the
future, and who is not participating in a class I correctional industry
on the effective date of this section, is precluded from participating
in a class I correctional industry;
(ii) An inmate's education history and basic academic skills;
(iii) An inmate's work history and vocational or work skills;
(iv) An inmate's economic circumstances, including but not limited
to an inmate's family support obligations; and
(v) Where applicable, an inmate's prior performance in department-approved education or work programs;
(c) Performance and goals. The department shall establish, and
periodically review, inmate behavior standards and program goals for
all education and work programs. Inmates shall be notified of
applicable behavior standards and program goals prior to placement in
an education or work program and shall be removed from the education or
work program if they consistently fail to meet the standards or goals;
(d) Financial responsibility. (i) The department shall establish
a formula by which inmates, based on their ability to pay, shall pay
all or a portion of the costs or tuition of certain programs. Inmates
shall, based on the formula, pay a portion of the costs or tuition of
participation in:
(A) Second and subsequent vocational programs associated with an
inmate's work programs; and
(B) An associate of arts or baccalaureate degree program when
placement in a degree program is the result of a placement made under
this subsection;
(ii) Inmates shall pay all costs and tuition for participation in:
(A) Any postsecondary academic degree program which is entered
independently of a placement decision made under this subsection; and
(B) Second and subsequent vocational programs not associated with
an inmate's work program.
Enrollment in any program specified in (d)(ii) of this subsection
shall only be allowed by correspondence or if there is an opening in an
education or work program at the institution where an inmate is
incarcerated and no other inmate who is placed in a program under this
subsection will be displaced; and
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, an inmate
sentenced to life without the possibility of release:
(i) Shall not be required to participate in education programming;
and
(ii) May receive not more than one postsecondary academic degree in
a program offered by the department or its contracted providers.
If an inmate sentenced to life without the possibility of release
requires prevocational or vocational training for a work program, he or
she may participate in the training subject to this section.
(6) The department shall coordinate education and work programs
among its institutions, to the greatest extent possible, to facilitate
continuity of programming among inmates transferred between
institutions. Before transferring an inmate enrolled in a program, the
department shall consider the effect the transfer will have on the
inmate's ability to continue or complete a program. This subsection
shall not be used to delay or prohibit a transfer necessary for
legitimate safety or security concerns.
(7) Before construction of a new correctional institution or
expansion of an existing correctional institution, the department shall
adopt a plan demonstrating how cable, closed-circuit, and satellite
television will be used for education and training purposes in the
institution. The plan shall specify how the use of television in the
education and training programs will improve inmates' preparedness for
available work programs and job opportunities for which inmates may
qualify upon release.
(8) The department shall adopt a plan to reduce the per-pupil cost
of instruction by, among other methods, increasing the use of volunteer
instructors and implementing technological efficiencies. The plan
shall be adopted by December 1996 and shall be transmitted to the
legislature upon adoption. The department shall, in adoption of the
plan, consider distance learning, satellite instruction, video tape
usage, computer-aided instruction, and flexible scheduling of offender
instruction.
(9) Following completion of the review required by section 27(3),
chapter 19, Laws of 1995 1st sp. sess. the department shall take all
necessary steps to assure the vocation and education programs are
relevant to work programs and skills necessary to enhance the
employability of inmates upon release.

Sec. 6 RCW 72.09.015 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Base level of correctional services" means the minimum level
of field services the department of corrections is required by statute
to provide for the supervision and monitoring of offenders.
(2) "Contraband" means any object or communication the secretary
determines shall not be allowed to be: (a) Brought into; (b) possessed
while on the grounds of; or (c) sent from any institution under the
control of the secretary.
(3) "County" means a county or combination of counties.
(4) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(5) "Earned early release" means earned ((early)) release as
authorized by RCW 9.94A.728.
(6) "Extended family visit" means an authorized visit between an
inmate and a member of his or her immediate family that occurs in a
private visiting unit located at the correctional facility where the
inmate is confined.
(7) "Good conduct" means compliance with department rules and
policies.
(8) "Good performance" means successful completion of a program
required by the department, including an education, work, or other
program.
(9) "Immediate family" means the inmate's children, stepchildren,
grandchildren, great grandchildren, parents, stepparents, grandparents,
great grandparents, siblings, and a person legally married to an
inmate. "Immediate family" does not include an inmate adopted by
another inmate or the immediate family of the adopted or adopting
inmate.
(10) "Indigent inmate," "indigent," and "indigency" mean an inmate
who has less than a ten-dollar balance of disposable income in his or
her institutional account on the day a request is made to utilize funds
and during the thirty days previous to the request.
(11) "Inmate" means a person committed to the custody of the
department, including but not limited to persons residing in a
correctional institution or facility and persons released on furlough,
work release, or community custody, and persons received from another
state, state agency, county, or federal jurisdiction.
(12) "Privilege" means any goods or services, education or work
programs, or earned early release days, the receipt of which are
directly linked to an inmate's (a) good conduct; and (b) good
performance. Privileges do not include any goods or services the
department is required to provide under the state or federal
Constitution or under state or federal law.
(13) "Secretary" means the secretary of corrections or his or her
designee.
(14) "Significant expansion" includes any expansion into a new
product line or service to the class I business that results from an
increase in benefits provided by the department, including a decrease
in labor costs, rent, or utility rates (for water, sewer, electricity,
and disposal), an increase in work program space, tax advantages, or
other overhead costs.
(15) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of a correctional
facility under the jurisdiction of the Washington state department of
corrections, or his or her designee.
(((15))) (16) "Unfair competition" means any net competitive
advantage that a business may acquire as a result of a correctional
industries contract, labor costs, utility rates (for water, sewer,
electricity, and disposal), tax advantages, and other overhead costs.
To determine net competitive advantage, the correctional industries
board shall review and quantify any expenses unique to operating a for-profit business inside a prison.
(17) "Washington business" means an existing in-state manufacturer
or service provider subject to chapter 82.04 RCW.
(18) "Work programs" means all classes of correctional industries
jobs authorized under RCW 72.09.100.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.10.029 and 1998 c 344 s 5 and 1998 c 111 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) An institution of higher education may exercise independently
those powers otherwise granted to the director of general
administration in chapter 43.19 RCW in connection with the purchase and
disposition of all material, supplies, services, and equipment needed
for the support, maintenance, and use of the respective institution of
higher education. Property disposition policies followed by
institutions of higher education shall be consistent with policies
followed by the department of general administration. Purchasing
policies and procedures followed by institutions of higher education
shall be in compliance with chapters 39.19, 39.29, and 43.03 RCW, and
RCW 43.19.1901, 43.19.1906, 43.19.1911, 43.19.1917, 43.19.1937,
43.19.534, 43.19.685, 43.19.700 through 43.19.704, and 43.19.560
through 43.19.637. The community and technical colleges shall comply
with RCW 43.19.450. Except for the University of Washington,
institutions of higher education shall comply with RCW ((43.19.1935,
43.19.19363, and 43.19.19368)) 43.41.310, 43.41.290, and 43.41.350.
All institutions of higher education must purchase up to one percent of
the total goods and services required by the institutions each year
which are produced or provided in whole or in part from class II inmate
work programs operated by the department of corrections through state
contract. For all other purchases, if an institution of higher
education can satisfactorily demonstrate to the director of the office
of financial management that the cost of compliance is greater than the
value of benefits from any of the following statutes, then it shall be
exempt from them: RCW 43.19.685; 43.19.534; and 43.19.637. Any
institution of higher education that chooses to exercise independent
purchasing authority for a commodity or group of commodities shall
notify the director of general administration. Thereafter the director
of general administration shall not be required to provide those
services for that institution for the duration of the general
administration contract term for that commodity or group of
commodities.
(2) An institution of higher education may exercise independently
those powers otherwise granted to the public printer in chapter 43.78
RCW in connection with the production or purchase of any printing and
binding needed by the respective institution of higher education.
Purchasing policies and procedures followed by institutions of higher
education shall be in compliance with chapter 39.19 RCW. Any
institution of higher education that chooses to exercise independent
printing production or purchasing authority shall notify the public
printer. Thereafter the public printer shall not be required to
provide those services for that institution.

Sec. 8 RCW 72.09.111 and 2003 c 379 s 25 and 2003 c 271 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall deduct taxes and legal financial
obligations from the gross wages, gratuities, or workers' compensation
benefits payable directly to the inmate under chapter 51.32 RCW, of
each inmate working in correctional industries work programs, or
otherwise receiving such wages, gratuities, or benefits. The secretary
shall also deduct child support payments from the gratuities of each
inmate working in class II through class IV correctional industries
work programs. The secretary shall develop a formula for the
distribution of offender wages, gratuities, and benefits. The formula
shall not reduce the inmate account below the indigency level, as
defined in RCW 72.09.015.
(a) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class I gross wages and from all others earning at least minimum wage:
(i) Five percent to the public safety and education account for the
purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court.
(b) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class II gross gratuities:
(i) Five percent to the public safety and education account for the
purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Fifteen percent to the department to contribute to the cost
of incarceration;
(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court; and
(v) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
(c) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
any workers' compensation benefits paid pursuant to RCW 51.32.080:
(i) Five percent to the public safety and education account for the
purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(iv) An amount equal to any legal financial obligations owed by the
inmate established by an order of any Washington state superior court
up to the total amount of the award.
(d) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class III gratuities:
(i) Five percent for the purpose of crime victims' compensation;
and
(ii) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
(e) The formula shall include the following minimum deduction from
class IV gross gratuities:
(i) Five percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(ii) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
(2) Any person sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility
of release or parole under chapter 10.95 RCW or sentenced to death
shall be exempt from the requirement under subsection (1)(a)(ii),
(b)(ii), or (c)(ii).
(3) The department personal inmate savings account, together with
any accrued interest, shall only be available to an inmate at the time
of his or her release from confinement, unless the secretary determines
that an emergency exists for the inmate, at which time the funds can be
made available to the inmate in an amount determined by the secretary.
The management of classes I, II, and IV correctional industries may
establish an incentive payment for offender workers based on
productivity criteria. This incentive shall be paid separately from
the hourly wage/gratuity rate and shall not be subject to the specified
deduction for cost of incarceration.
(4) Within available resources, inmate employment in class I and
class II correctional industries may have a target expansion according
to the following guidance:
(a) Not later than June 30, 2005, the secretary may achieve a net
increase of at least two hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(b) Not later than June 30, 2006, the secretary may achieve a net
increase of at least four hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(c) Not later than June 30, 2007, the secretary may achieve a net
increase of at least six hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(d) Not later than June 30, 2008, the secretary may achieve a net
increase of at least nine hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(e) Not later than June 30, 2009, the secretary may achieve a net
increase of at least one thousand two hundred in the number of inmates
employed in class I or class II correctional industries work programs
above the number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(f) Not later than June 30, 2010, the secretary may achieve a net
increase of at least one thousand five hundred in the number of inmates
employed in class I or class II correctional industries work programs
above the number so employed on June 30, 2003.
(5) In the event that the offender worker's wages, gratuity, or
workers' compensation benefit is subject to garnishment for support
enforcement, the crime victims' compensation, savings, and cost of
incarceration deductions shall be calculated on the net wages after
taxes, legal financial obligations, and garnishment.
(((5))) (6) The department shall explore other methods of
recovering a portion of the cost of the inmate's incarceration and for
encouraging participation in work programs, including development of
incentive programs that offer inmates benefits and amenities paid for
only from wages earned while working in a correctional industries work
program.
(((6))) (7) The department shall develop the necessary
administrative structure to recover inmates' wages and keep records of
the amount inmates pay for the costs of incarceration and amenities.
All funds deducted from inmate wages under subsection (1) of this
section for the purpose of contributions to the cost of incarceration
shall be deposited in a dedicated fund with the department and shall be
used only for the purpose of enhancing and maintaining correctional
industries work programs.
(((7))) (8) The expansion of inmate employment in class I and class
II correctional industries shall be implemented according to the
following schedule:
(a) Not later than June 30, 1995, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least two hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(b) Not later than June 30, 1996, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least four hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(c) Not later than June 30, 1997, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least six hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(d) Not later than June 30, 1998, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least nine hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(e) Not later than June 30, 1999, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least one thousand two hundred in the number of inmates
employed in class I or class II correctional industries work programs
above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(f) Not later than June 30, 2000, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least one thousand five hundred in the number of inmates
employed in class I or class II correctional industries work programs
above the number so employed on June 30, 1994.
(((8))) (9) It shall be in the discretion of the secretary to
apportion the inmates between class I and class II depending on
available contracts and resources.
(((9))) (10) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of
the department of social and health services division of child support
from taking collection action against an inmate's moneys, assets, or
property pursuant to chapter 26.23, 74.20, or 74.20A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1,
2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2005.

--- END ---