BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On January 1st of each year, the department shall publish lists
of employers with the best and the worst records of repetitive motion
injuries.
(a) The list of employers with the best records shall include: (i)
The twelve percent of employers with the lowest numbers of repetitive
motion injuries; (ii) the twelve percent of employers with the lowest
rates per employee of repetitive motion injuries; and (iii) the twelve
percent of employers with the lowest repetitive motion injury costs.
(b) The list of employers with the worst records shall include:
(i) The twelve percent of employers with the highest numbers of
repetitive motion injuries; (ii) the twelve percent of employers with
the highest rates per employee of repetitive motion injuries; and (iii)
the twelve percent of employers with the highest repetitive motion
injury costs.
(2) Each employer that appears on the list described in subsection
(1)(b) of this section shall post and keep posted a current copy of the
list in a form provided by the department. The list shall be
positioned in a readily accessible location and within plain view in
each work site where an employee or employees are employed. In
addition, the employer shall post specific health and safety standards,
if any, recommended by the employer or the department to avoid
prospective repetitive motion injuries.

--- END ---