BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.63A.215 and 1993 c 478 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall, in consultation with the affordable
housing advisory board created in RCW 43.185B.020, report to the
legislature on the development and placement of accessory apartments.
The department shall produce a written report by December 15, 1993,
which:
(a) Identifies local governments that allow the siting of accessory
apartments in areas zoned for single-family residential use; and
(b) Makes recommendations to the legislature designed to encourage
the development and placement of accessory apartments in areas zoned
for single-family residential use.
(2) The recommendations made under subsection (1) of this section
shall not take effect before ninety days following adjournment of the
1994 regular legislative session.
(3) Unless provided otherwise by the legislature, by December 31,
1994, local governments shall incorporate in their development
regulations, zoning regulations, or official controls the
recommendations contained in subsection (1) of this section. The
accessory apartment provisions shall be part of the local government's
development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control. To
allow local flexibility, the recommendations shall be subject to such
regulations, conditions, procedures, and limitations as determined by
the local legislative authority.
(4)(a) Any local government in a rural county may authorize the
construction and use of one single-family residence and one accessory
dwelling unit for each parcel in designated rural and resource lands.
(b) A local government authorizing the construction and use of
accessory dwelling units as provided by this section shall adopt
additional regulations, conditions, procedures, and other limitations
it deems necessary to protect rural character, environmentally
sensitive areas, and open space, and to conserve the capacity of
resource lands for commercial resource production.
(c) An accessory dwelling unit shall not be considered a separate
dwelling unit for density calculation purposes.
(5) As used in this section((,)):
(a) "Local government" means:
(((a))) (i) A city or code city with a population that exceeds
twenty thousand;
(((b))) (ii) A county that is required to or has elected to plan
under the state growth management act; and
(((c))) (iii) A county with a population that exceeds one hundred
twenty-five thousand.
(b) "Accessory dwelling unit" means a structure or living unit that
is accessory to the principal single-family residence and provides the
basic requirements of sleeping quarters, kitchen facilities, and
sanitation. The accessory dwelling unit can be internal to, attached
to, or detached from the principal single-family residence.
(c) "Rural county" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
43.168.020(7).

--- END ---