BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the quality of
education for children who are deaf or hard of hearing and the
expectations for those children's achievement should be equivalent to
those for children throughout the state. The legislature also finds
that deaf and hard of hearing children can benefit greatly if they are
taught by an educator who is trained to understand the learning and
communication issues the children face. Educators who received teacher
training in a program for the deaf and hard of hearing are sensitive to
the needs of deaf and hard of hearing students and are able to provide
appropriate strategies to assist students in reacting to and
interacting with their environment. The legislature intends to assist
school districts in their efforts to attract teachers who are
especially trained to work with deaf and hard of hearing students by
directing the state board of education to establish certification for
teachers of the deaf and hard of hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
The state board of education, with advice from the professional
educator standards board, shall develop certification requirements for
teachers of deaf and hard of hearing students. The certification shall
be focused on the specific skills and knowledge necessary to serve the
education and communication needs of deaf and hard of hearing students,
and the certification may be limited to work with such students. In
establishing rules for certification of teachers who will be working
almost exclusively with students who are deaf or hard of hearing, the
state board of education shall consider applicants to have met state
endorsement requirements if they possess a baccalaureate or master's
degree in deaf education from a teacher training program approved by
the council on education of the deaf.

--- END ---