BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the quality of
education and achievement expectations for children who are deaf or
hard of hearing should be equivalent to those for children throughout
the state. The legislature also finds that no single educational
approach or form of education can meet the needs of all children in the
state who are deaf or hard of hearing. The legislature further finds
that children who are deaf or hard of hearing must have their education
provided in the least restrictive environment. In addition, services
provided to children who are deaf or hard of hearing should be
continuously guided by current research and should span the spectrum of
options available to families, respecting those families' choices and
recognizing that changes may occur. Finally, the legislature finds
that unbiased and comprehensive information about the spectrum of
communication and educational options available to children who are
deaf or hard of hearing should be provided to families upon enrollment
in the prekindergarten through twelfth grade education system and upon
the start of the individualized education plan transition services
provided at age fourteen, to support informed choices at each of these
critical decision-making points.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2006, each school district shall be prepared to
offer a spectrum of services, including sign language-based and oral-based programming, for students who are deaf or hard of hearing. The
services shall correspond to the educational approach selected for each
child by the child's parents or guardian. The school district may
contract with outside entities to provide the services.
(2) A professional with expertise in hearing impairment must be
included in any team that helps prepare an individualized education
plan for a child who is deaf or hard of hearing.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide to
school districts information on advances in research, technology, and
educational approaches for children who are deaf or hard of hearing.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide
professional development to educational professionals throughout the
state on the educational needs of children who are deaf or hard of
hearing.

--- END ---