BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.44.010 and 1999 c 292 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The words and phrases defined in this section shall have the
following meanings when used in this chapter unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise.
(1) "Authorized contractor" means a person who decontaminates,
demolishes, or disposes of contaminated property as required by this
chapter who is certified by the department as provided for in RCW
64.44.060.
(2) "Contaminated" or "contamination" means polluted by hazardous
chemicals so that the property is unfit for human habitation or use due
to immediate or long-term hazards. Property that at one time was
contaminated but has been satisfactorily decontaminated according to
procedures established by the state board of health is not
"contaminated."
(3) "Hazardous chemicals" means the following substances used in
the manufacture of illegal drugs: (a) Hazardous substances as defined
in RCW 70.105D.020, and (b) precursor substances as defined in RCW
69.43.010 which the state board of health, in consultation with the
state board of pharmacy, has determined present an immediate or long-term health hazard to humans.
(4) "Officer" means a local health officer authorized under
chapters 70.05, 70.08, and 70.46 RCW.
(5) "Property" means any property, site, structure, or part of a
structure which is involved in the unauthorized manufacture or storage
of hazardous chemicals. This includes but is not limited to single-family residences, units of multiplexes, condominiums, apartment
buildings, storage units, vessels, boats, motor vehicles including
recreational vehicles and motor homes, trailers, manufactured housing,
or any shop, booth, or garden.
(6) "Prospective owner" means a person, other than the current
owner of contaminated property, who has provided a local health officer
with a cash bond or other security acceptable to the local health
officer as guarantee that a decontamination plan will be completed as
approved, and either (a) has reached an agreement with the property's
current owner to purchase property that is currently deemed unfit for
use under RCW 64.44.030, which purchase agreement is contingent upon
completion of the decontamination plan that has been approved by a
local health official under RCW 64.44.050; (b) had a valid, documented
security, insurable, or other financial interest in the property on the
day the local health officer found, under RCW 64.44.030, the property
to be contaminated; or (c) is a registered tow truck operator in
possession of an abandoned and unredeemed vehicle that the operator
would otherwise be eligible to sell at public auction under RCW
46.55.120.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.44.030 and 1999 c 292 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If after the inspection of the property, the local health
officer finds that it, or any part of it, is contaminated, then all of,
or that part of, the property determined by the local health official
to pose a health hazard due to contamination shall be found unfit for
use. The local health officer shall cause to be served an order
prohibiting use either personally or by certified mail, with return
receipt requested, upon all occupants and persons having any interest
therein as shown upon the records of (a) the auditor's office of the
county in which such property is located, if the property is real
property; or (b) the department of licensing, if the property is a
motor vehicle or other personal property that may be subject to chapter
46.12 RCW. The local health officer shall also post the order
prohibiting use in a conspicuous place on the property.
(2) If the whereabouts of such persons is unknown and the same
cannot be ascertained by the local health officer in the exercise of
reasonable diligence, and the health officer makes an affidavit to that
effect, then the serving of the order upon such persons may be made
either by personal service or by mailing a copy of the order by
certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to each
person at the address appearing on (a) the last equalized tax
assessment roll of the county where the real property is located or at
the address known to the county assessor, and the order shall be posted
conspicuously at the residence; or (b) the most recent record, if any,
maintained by the department of licensing if the property is a motor
vehicle or other personal property that may be subject to chapter 46.12
RCW. A copy of the order shall also be mailed, addressed to each
person or party having a recorded right, title, estate, lien, or
interest in the property. The order shall contain a notice that a
hearing before the local health board or officer shall be held upon the
request of a person required to be notified of the order under this
section. The request for a hearing must be made within ten days of
serving the order. The hearing shall then be held within not less than
twenty days nor more than thirty days after the serving of the order.
The officer shall prohibit use as long as the property is found to be
contaminated.
(3) If the property found by the local health official to be unfit
for use is real property, a copy of the order shall also be filed by
the local health official with the auditor of the county in which the
property is located, and such filing of the complaint or order shall
have the same force and effect as other lis pendens notices provided by
law.
(4) In any hearing concerning whether property is fit for use, the
property owner has the burden of showing, by clear and convincing
evidence, that the property is decontaminated or fit for use. The
owner or any person having an interest in the property may file an
appeal on any order issued by the local health board or officer within
thirty days from the date of service of the order with the appeals
commission established pursuant to RCW 35.80.030. All proceedings
before the appeals commission, including any subsequent appeals to
superior court, shall be governed by the procedures established in
chapter 35.80 RCW.
(5)(a) An ownership interest in property that has been found unfit
for use under this section is not transferable, unless (i) the finding
has been reversed or nullified under subsection (4) of this section; or
(ii) the property has been released for reuse in accordance with RCW
64.44.050.
(b) Any transfer of ownership in violation of this section is
voidable at the option of the transferee, and the transferor is (i)
guilty of making a false representation concerning title in violation
of RCW 9.38.020; and (ii) liable to the transferee for any damages,
direct or consequential, as the transferee may show by a preponderance
of the evidence to be or have been associated with the transfer.

Sec. 3 RCW 64.44.050 and 1999 c 292 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An owner or prospective owner of contaminated property who
desires to have the property decontaminated shall use the services of
an authorized contractor unless otherwise authorized by the local
health officer. The contractor shall prepare and submit a written work
plan for decontamination to the local health officer. The local health
officer may charge a reasonable fee for review of the work plan. If
the work plan is approved and the decontamination is completed and the
property is retested according to the plan and properly documented,
then the health officer shall allow reuse of the property((. A)), and
shall issue to the owner or prospective owner a release for reuse
document, describing the property being released and indicating the
property was once deemed unfit for use under RCW 64.44.030 due to
contamination by hazardous chemicals, but has been decontaminated in
accordance with rules of the state department of health. The local
health official may charge a reasonable fee for making certified copies
of release for reuse documents.
(2)(a) The seller or lessor of the property that has been released
for reuse under this section shall provide to the purchaser or lessee
of the property the original or certified copy of the release for reuse
document issued under subsection (1) of this section, if the agreement
to sell or lease the decontaminated property occurs within the
applicable period described in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Subsection (2)(a) of this section applies to any sale or lease
of property by any owner if the owner was provided the original or
certified copy of the release for reuse document issued under
subsection (1) of this section and the sale or lease occurs before (i)
the property has been occupied or otherwise used for its intended
purposes for one hundred eighty days, consecutively or otherwise, after
the date the release for reuse document was issued; or (ii) one year
from the date of the release for reuse document was issued, whichever
occurs sooner.
(3) The seller or lessor of any decontaminated property that is
real property may record the release for reuse document ((shall be
recorded)) in the real property records ((indicating the property has
been decontaminated in accordance with rules of the state department of
health)) of the county in which the property is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 64.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a person receives an original or copy of a release for reuse
document identifying tangible personal property and sells or leases any
tangible personal property described in the document but fails to make
the disclosure required by RCW 64.44.050(2): (a) The purchaser or
lessee has the right to rescind the transaction; (b) the person is
liable for the amount paid for the property by any subsequent
purchasers or lessees who purchased or leased the property within two
years of the date of the release for reuse document, unless the person
shows, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the failure to make the
disclosure was due to mistake or inadvertence and was not willful; and
(c) any purchaser or lessee who prevails in any action initiated under
this section shall also be awarded reasonable attorneys' fees and
costs.
(2) Except as provided under subsection (3) of this section, if a
person receives an original or copy of a release for reuse document
identifying real property under RCW 64.44.050 and sells or leases any
tangible personal property described in the document but fails to make
the disclosure required by RCW 64.44.050(2), the purchaser or lessee
has the right to:
(a) Immediately terminate the purchase or lease agreement without
penalty;
(b) A refund of any deposit or fee associated with the transaction
paid by the purchaser or lessee to the seller or lessor, including
interest at a rate of one percent per month from the date of deposit to
the date of refund;
(c) Reimbursement of the purchaser's or lessee's actual costs of
relocating, including but not limited to costs for terminating and
initiating utilities, and packing and transporting belongings,
including interest at a rate of one percent per month from the date the
purchaser or lessor makes written demand for the reimbursement;
(d) A cash payment equal to two times the greater of (i) the
monthly rental rate under the applicable lease agreement; or (ii) the
fair market monthly rental rate of an equivalent property that has
never been contaminated;
(e) Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs in any action initiated by
a purchaser or lessee to enforce this section; and
(f) If the property is a residence leased to a person who occupies
or intended to occupy the property, any additional remedies the court
may find appropriate under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW.
(3) An owner of real property that sells or leases real property
that has been decontaminated under RCW 64.44.050 and fails to make the
disclosure required by RCW 64.44.050(2) is not liable to the purchaser
or lessee for amounts allowed under subsection (2)(d) and (e) of this
section if the owner shows, by a preponderance of the evidence, that
the failure to make the disclosure was due to mistake or inadvertence
and was not willful.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.55.120 and 2003 c 177 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Vehicles or other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department that are impounded by registered tow truck
operators pursuant to RCW 46.55.080, 46.55.085, 46.55.113, or 9A.88.140
may be redeemed only under the following circumstances:
(a) Only the legal owner, the registered owner, a person authorized
in writing by the registered owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person
who is determined and verified by the operator to have the permission
of the registered owner of the vehicle or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, or one who has
purchased a vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled
with the department from the registered owner who produces proof of
ownership or written authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may
redeem an impounded vehicle or items of personal property registered or
titled with the department. In addition, a vehicle impounded because
the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c) shall not be
released until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection
(1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (e) of this subsection, including
paying all towing, removal, and storage fees, notwithstanding the fact
that the hold was ordered by a government agency. If the department's
records show that the operator has been convicted of a violation of RCW
46.20.342 or a similar local ordinance within the past five years, the
vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written direction of
the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. A vehicle impounded because
the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342 may be
released only pursuant to a written order from the agency that ordered
the vehicle impounded or from the court having jurisdiction. An agency
may issue a written order to release pursuant to a provision of an
applicable state agency rule or local ordinance authorizing release on
the basis of the following:
(i) Economic or personal hardship to the spouse of the operator,
taking into consideration public safety factors, including the
operator's criminal history and driving record; or
(ii) The owner of the vehicle was not the driver, the owner did not
know that the driver's license was suspended or revoked, and the owner
has not received a prior release under this subsection or RCW
46.55.113(3).
In order to avoid discriminatory application, other than for the
reasons for release set forth in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, an
agency shall, under a provision of an applicable state agency rule or
local ordinance, deny release in all other circumstances without
discretion.
If a vehicle is impounded because the operator is in violation of
RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b), the vehicle may be held for up to thirty
days at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded. However, if the department's records show that the operator
has been convicted of a violation of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b) or a
similar local ordinance within the past five years, the vehicle may be
held at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded for up to sixty days, and for up to ninety days if the
operator has two or more such prior offenses. If a vehicle is
impounded because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW
46.20.342, the vehicle may not be released until a person eligible to
redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements of
(e) of this subsection, including paying all towing, removal, and
storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a
government agency.
(b) If the vehicle is directed to be held for a suspended license
impound, a person who desires to redeem the vehicle at the end of the
period of impound shall within five days of the impound at the request
of the tow truck operator pay a security deposit to the tow truck
operator of not more than one-half of the applicable impound storage
rate for each day of the proposed suspended license impound. The tow
truck operator shall credit this amount against the final bill for
removal, towing, and storage upon redemption. The tow truck operator
may accept other sufficient security in lieu of the security deposit.
If the person desiring to redeem the vehicle does not pay the security
deposit or provide other security acceptable to the tow truck operator,
the tow truck operator may process and sell at auction the vehicle as
an abandoned vehicle within the normal time limits set out in RCW
46.55.130(1). The security deposit required by this section may be
paid and must be accepted at any time up to twenty-four hours before
the beginning of the auction to sell the vehicle as abandoned. The
registered owner is not eligible to purchase the vehicle at the
auction, and the tow truck operator shall sell the vehicle to the
highest bidder who is not the registered owner.
(c) Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a rental car business
may immediately redeem a rental vehicle it owns by payment of the costs
of removal, towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held
for a suspended license impound.
(d) Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer
or lender with a perfected security interest in the vehicle may redeem
or lawfully repossess a vehicle immediately by payment of the costs of
removal, towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held
for a suspended license impound. A motor vehicle dealer or lender with
a perfected security interest in the vehicle may not knowingly and
intentionally engage in collusion with a registered owner to repossess
and then return or resell a vehicle to the registered owner in an
attempt to avoid a suspended license impound. However, this provision
does not preclude a vehicle dealer or a lender with a perfected
security interest in the vehicle from repossessing the vehicle and then
selling, leasing, or otherwise disposing of it in accordance with
chapter 62A.9A RCW, including providing redemption rights to the debtor
under RCW 62A.9A-623. If the debtor is the registered owner of the
vehicle, the debtor's right to redeem the vehicle under chapter 62A.9A
RCW is conditioned upon the debtor obtaining and providing proof from
the impounding authority or court having jurisdiction that any fines,
penalties, and forfeitures owed by the registered owner, as a result of
the suspended license impound, have been paid, and proof of the payment
must be tendered to the vehicle dealer or lender at the time the debtor
tenders all other obligations required to redeem the vehicle. Vehicle
dealers or lenders are not liable for damages if they rely in good
faith on an order from the impounding agency or a court in releasing a
vehicle held under a suspended license impound.
(e) The vehicle or other item of personal property registered or
titled with the department shall be released upon the presentation to
any person having custody of the vehicle of commercially reasonable
tender sufficient to cover the costs of towing, storage, or other
services rendered during the course of towing, removing, impounding, or
storing any such vehicle, with credit being given for the amount of any
security deposit paid under (b) of this subsection. In addition, if a
vehicle is impounded because the operator was arrested for a violation
of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.20.345 and was being operated by the registered
owner when it was impounded under local ordinance or agency rule, it
must not be released to any person until the registered owner
establishes with the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded or the
court having jurisdiction that any penalties, fines, or forfeitures
owed by him or her have been satisfied. Registered tow truck operators
are not liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an order from
the impounding agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a
suspended license impound. Commercially reasonable tender shall
include, without limitation, cash, major bank credit cards issued by
financial institutions, or personal checks drawn on Washington state
branches of financial institutions if accompanied by two pieces of
valid identification, one of which may be required by the operator to
have a photograph. If the towing firm cannot determine through the
customer's bank or a check verification service that the presented
check would be paid by the bank or guaranteed by the service, the
towing firm may refuse to accept the check. Any person who stops
payment on a personal check or credit card, or does not make
restitution within ten days from the date a check becomes insufficient
due to lack of funds, to a towing firm that has provided a service
pursuant to this section or in any other manner defrauds the towing
firm in connection with services rendered pursuant to this section
shall be liable for damages in the amount of twice the towing and
storage fees, plus costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(2)(a) The registered tow truck operator shall give to each person
who seeks to redeem an impounded vehicle, or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department, written notice of the right
of redemption and opportunity for a hearing, which notice shall be
accompanied by a form to be used for requesting a hearing, the name of
the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy of the towing
and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall maintain
a record evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such
notification was provided.
(b) Any person seeking to redeem an impounded vehicle under this
section has a right to a hearing in the district or municipal court for
the jurisdiction in which the vehicle was impounded to contest the
validity of the impoundment or the amount of towing and storage
charges. The district court has jurisdiction to determine the issues
involving all impoundments including those authorized by the state or
its agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine the
issues involving impoundments authorized by agents of the municipality.
Any request for a hearing shall be made in writing on the form provided
for that purpose and must be received by the appropriate court within
ten days of the date the opportunity was provided for in subsection
(2)(a) of this section and more than five days before the date of the
auction. At the time of the filing of the hearing request, the
petitioner shall pay to the court clerk a filing fee in the same amount
required for the filing of a suit in district court. If the hearing
request is not received by the court within the ten-day period, the
right to a hearing is waived and the registered owner is liable for any
towing, storage, or other impoundment charges permitted under this
chapter. Upon receipt of a timely hearing request, the court shall
proceed to hear and determine the validity of the impoundment.
(3)(a) The court, within five days after the request for a hearing,
shall notify the registered tow truck operator, the person requesting
the hearing if not the owner, the registered and legal owners of the
vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, and the person or agency authorizing the impound in
writing of the hearing date and time.
(b) At the hearing, the person or persons requesting the hearing
may produce any relevant evidence to show that the impoundment, towing,
or storage fees charged were not proper. The court may consider a
written report made under oath by the officer who authorized the
impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal appearance at the
hearing.
(c) At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine
whether the impoundment was proper, whether the towing or storage fees
charged were in compliance with the posted rates, and who is
responsible for payment of the fees. The court may not adjust fees or
charges that are in compliance with the posted or contracted rates.
(d) If the impoundment is found proper, the impoundment, towing,
and storage fees as permitted under this chapter together with court
costs shall be assessed against the person or persons requesting the
hearing, unless the operator did not have a signed and valid
impoundment authorization from a private property owner or an
authorized agent.
(e) If the impoundment is determined to be in violation of this
chapter, then the registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other
item of personal property registered or titled with the department
shall bear no impoundment, towing, or storage fees, and any security
shall be returned or discharged as appropriate, and the person or
agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any towing,
storage, or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The
court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered tow truck
operator against the person or agency authorizing the impound for the
impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid. In addition, the court
shall enter judgment in favor of the registered and legal owners of the
vehicle, or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, for the amount of the filing fee required by law for
the impound hearing petition as well as reasonable damages for loss of
the use of the vehicle during the time the same was impounded, for not
less than fifty dollars per day, against the person or agency
authorizing the impound. However, if an impoundment arising from an
alleged violation of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.20.345 is determined to be in
violation of this chapter, then the law enforcement officer directing
the impoundment and the government employing the officer are not liable
for damages if the officer relied in good faith and without gross
negligence on the records of the department in ascertaining that the
operator of the vehicle had a suspended or revoked driver's license.
If any judgment entered is not paid within fifteen days of notice in
writing of its entry, the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees
and costs against the defendant in any action to enforce the judgment.
Notice of entry of judgment may be made by registered or certified
mail, and proof of mailing may be made by affidavit of the party
mailing the notice. Notice of the entry of the judgment shall read
essentially as follows:

TO: . . . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you in the
. . . . . . Court located at . . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled . . . . . ., Case No.
. . . . YOU ARE FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs
will be awarded against you under RCW . . . if the judgment is
not paid within 15 days of the date of this notice.

DATED this . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . .

Signature . . . . . . . . . .
Typed name and address
of party mailing notice

(4) Except as provided by subsection (5) of this section, any
impounded abandoned vehicle or item of personal property registered or
titled with the department that is not redeemed within fifteen days of
mailing of the notice of custody and sale as required by RCW
46.55.110(3) shall be sold at public auction in accordance with all the
provisions and subject to all the conditions of RCW 46.55.130. Except
as provided by subsection (6) of this section, a vehicle or item of
personal property registered or titled with the department may be
redeemed at any time before the start of the auction upon payment of
the applicable towing and storage fees.
(5)(a) Regardless of any other provision of law, any impounded
abandoned vehicle that has been found unfit for use by a local health
official under RCW 64.44.030, and that has not been released for reuse
under RCW 64.44.050, shall not be sold at public auction, as authorized
or otherwise required under this title.
(b) A registered tow truck operator possessing a vehicle identified
in (a) of this subsection shall either (i) decontaminate the property
as provided by RCW 64.44.050 and acquire and title the property, or
(ii) demolish, destroy, or otherwise dispose of the vehicle through a
licensed vehicle wrecker, hulk hauler, or scrap processor by use of the
abandoned vehicle report-affidavit of sale.
(c) If a registered tow truck operator disposes of a vehicle under
(b)(ii) of this subsection, and the amount received by the tow truck
operator from a licensed vehicle wrecker, hulk hauler, or scrap
processor for the vehicle or its salvageable parts is less than the
amount paid to a licensed vehicle wrecker, hulk hauler, or scrap
processor to dispose of the vehicle, including the cost of transporting
the vehicle to the disposition site, the law enforcement agency that
authorized the impound of the vehicle shall reimburse the tow truck
operator for the difference between the costs paid by and amounts
received by the tow truck operator.
(6) In addition to subsection (4) of this section, an impounded
abandoned property that has been found unfit for use by a local health
official under RCW 64.44.030 shall not be redeemed unless (a) the
finding of unfit for use has been reversed or nullified under RCW
64.44.030(4), or (b) the property has been released for reuse in
accordance with RCW 64.44.050(1).

Sec. 6 RCW 46.55.130 and 2002 c 279 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If, after the expiration of fifteen days from the date of
mailing of notice of custody and sale required in RCW 46.55.110(3) to
the registered and legal owners, the vehicle remains unclaimed and (a)
has not been listed as a stolen vehicle or as a vehicle that has been
found unfit for use under RCW 64.44.030, or (b) a suspended license
impound has been directed, but no security paid under RCW 46.55.120,
then the registered tow truck operator having custody of the vehicle
shall conduct a sale of the vehicle at public auction after having
first published a notice of the date, place, and time of the auction in
a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the vehicle
is located not less than three days and no more than ten days before
the date of the auction. The notice shall contain a description of the
vehicle including the make, model, year, and license number and a
notification that a three-hour public viewing period will be available
before the auction. The auction shall be held during daylight hours of
a normal business day.
(2) The following procedures are required in any public auction of
such abandoned vehicles:
(a) The auction shall be held in such a manner that all persons
present are given an equal time and opportunity to bid;
(b) All bidders must be present at the time of auction unless they
have submitted to the registered tow truck operator, who may or may not
choose to use the preauction bid method, a written bid on a specific
vehicle. Written bids may be submitted up to five days before the
auction and shall clearly state which vehicle is being bid upon, the
amount of the bid, and who is submitting the bid;
(c) The open bid process, including all written bids, shall be used
so that everyone knows the dollar value that must be exceeded;
(d) The highest two bids received shall be recorded in written form
and shall include the name, address, and telephone number of each such
bidder;
(e) In case the high bidder defaults, the next bidder has the right
to purchase the vehicle for the amount of his or her bid;
(f) The successful bidder shall apply for title within fifteen
days;
(g) The registered tow truck operator shall post a copy of the
auction procedure at the bidding site. If the bidding site is
different from the licensed office location, the operator shall post a
clearly visible sign at the office location that describes in detail
where the auction will be held. At the bidding site a copy of the
newspaper advertisement that lists the vehicles for sale shall be
posted;
(h) All surplus moneys derived from the auction after satisfaction
of the registered tow truck operator's lien shall be remitted within
thirty days to the department for deposit in the state motor vehicle
fund. A report identifying the vehicles resulting in any surplus shall
accompany the remitted funds. If the director subsequently receives a
valid claim from the registered vehicle owner of record as determined
by the department within one year from the date of the auction, the
surplus moneys shall be remitted to such owner;
(i) If an operator receives no bid, or if the operator is the
successful bidder at auction, the operator shall, within forty-five
days, sell or otherwise dispose of the vehicle to a licensed vehicle
wrecker, hulk hauler, or scrap processor by use of the abandoned
vehicle report-affidavit of sale, or the operator shall apply for title
to the vehicle.
(3) A tow truck operator may refuse to accept a bid at an abandoned
vehicle auction under this section for any reason in the operator's
posted operating procedures and for any of the following reasons: (a)
The bidder is currently indebted to the operator; (b) the operator has
knowledge that the bidder has previously abandoned vehicles purchased
at auction; or (c) the bidder has purchased, at auction, more than four
vehicles in the last calendar year without obtaining title to any or
all of the vehicles. In no case may an operator hold a vehicle for
longer than ninety days without holding an auction on the vehicle,
except for vehicles that are under a police or judicial hold.
(4)(a) In no case may the accumulation of storage charges exceed
fifteen days from the date of receipt of the information by the
operator from the department as provided by RCW 46.55.110(3).
(b) The failure of the registered tow truck operator to comply with
the time limits provided in this chapter limits the accumulation of
storage charges to five days except where delay is unavoidable.
Providing incorrect or incomplete identifying information to the
department in the abandoned vehicle report shall be considered a
failure to comply with these time limits if correct information is
available. However, storage charges begin to accrue again on the date
the correct and complete information is provided to the department by
the registered tow truck operator.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 933 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; and
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the top two hazardous waste
management priorities of RCW 70.105.150.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority: (i) Remedial
actions; (ii) hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105
RCW; (iii) solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW; (iv) funds for a program to assist in the
assessment and cleanup of sites of methamphetamine production, but not
to be used for the initial containment of such sites, consistent with
the responsibilities and intent of RCW 69.50.511; ((and)) (v) cleanup
and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or derelict vessels
that pose a threat to human health or the environment; and (vi) to
reimburse law enforcement agencies for costs incurred by any agency or
on behalf of any agency to destroy, demolish, and dispose of vehicles
found unfit for use under RCW 64.44.030 due to contamination of
chemicals used in the manufacture of illegal drugs. For purposes of
this subsection (3)(a)(v), "abandoned or derelict vessels" means
vessels that have little or no value and either have no identified
owner or have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean
up and dispose of the vessel. Funds for plans and programs shall be
allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements
established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW. During
the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be used
for the following activities: Conducting a study of whether dioxins
occur in fertilizers, soil amendments, and soils; reviewing
applications for registration of fertilizers; and conducting a study of
plant uptake of metals. During the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to the
state toxics control account such amounts as specified in the omnibus
operating budget bill for methamphetamine lab cleanup.
(b) Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to
implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal
safe drinking water act for public water systems. The department of
health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed under RCW
70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local
toxics control accounts shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. However, during the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, funding may not be granted to entities engaged in
lobbying activities, and applicants may not be awarded grants if their
cumulative grant awards under this section exceed two hundred thousand
dollars. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be
renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium
shall revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.

--- END ---