BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.40.060 and 2001 c 71 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every officer and employee of the state or of any county, city,
or other political subdivision thereof who is a member of the
Washington national guard or of the army, navy, air force, coast guard,
or marine corps reserve of the United States, or of any organized
reserve or armed forces of the United States ((shall be)) is entitled
to and shall be granted military leave of absence from such employment
for a period not exceeding fifteen days during each year beginning
October 1st and ending the following September 30th. Such leave shall
be granted ((in order)) so that the person may report for active duty,
when called, or take part in active training duty in such manner and at
such time as he or she may be ordered to active duty or active training
duty. Such military leave of absence ((shall be)) is in addition to
any vacation or sick leave to which the officer or employee might
otherwise be entitled, and shall not involve any loss of efficiency
rating, privileges, or pay. During the period of military leave, the
officer or employee shall receive from the state, or the county, city,
or other political subdivision, his or her normal pay.
(2) If, on or after November 1, 2003, an officer or employee of the
state is called into the federal service of the United States for a
period exceeding thirty days, the officer or employee shall receive
from the state the difference between his or her normal pay while
employed by the state and his or her pay and allowances while in the
service of the United States if the pay and allowances while in the
service of the United States is less than his or her pay while employed
by the state. The officer or employee shall also continue to receive
from the state any pension and retirement benefits he or she was
receiving prior to being called to federal service as long as he or she
continues to make any necessary employee contributions to those
benefits that he or she would be making if still regularly employed by
the state. Payment and benefits provided for a mobilization under this
subsection shall not exceed four years.

--- END ---