BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.14A.050 and 2003 c 207 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall:
(1)(a) Consult with relevant qualified professionals to develop a
set of minimum guidelines to be used for identifying all children who
are in a state-assisted support system, whether at-home or out-of-home,
who are likely to need long-term care or assistance, because they face
physical, emotional, medical, mental, or other long-term challenges;
(b) The guidelines must, at a minimum, consider the following
criteria for identifying children in need of long-term care or
assistance:
(i) Placement within the foster care system for two years or more;
(ii) Multiple foster care placements;
(iii) Repeated unsuccessful efforts to be placed with a permanent
adoptive family;
(iv) Chronic behavioral or educational problems;
(v) Repetitive criminal acts or offenses;
(vi) Failure to comply with court-ordered disciplinary actions and
other imposed guidelines of behavior, including drug and alcohol
rehabilitation; and
(vii) Chronic physical, emotional, medical, mental, or other
similar conditions necessitating long-term care or assistance;
(2) Develop programs that are necessary for the long-term care of
children and youth that are identified for the purposes of this
section. Programs must: (a) Effectively address the educational,
physical, emotional, mental, and medical needs of children and youth;
and (b) incorporate an array of family support options, to individual
needs and choices of the child and family. The programs must be ready
for implementation by January 1, 1995;
(3) Conduct an evaluation of all children currently within the
foster care agency caseload to identify those children who meet the
criteria set forth in this section. All children entering the foster
care system must be evaluated for identification of long-term needs
within thirty days of placement, with the exception of evaluation of
medical and educational needs, which must be conducted within forty-five days of placement;
(4) As a result of the passage of chapter 232, Laws of 2000, the
department is conducting a pilot project to do a comparative analysis
of a variety of assessment instruments to determine the most effective
tools and methods for evaluation of children. The pilot project may
extend through August 31, 2001. The department shall report to the
appropriate committees in the senate and house of representatives by
September 30, 2001, on the results of the pilot project. The
department shall select an assessment instrument that can be
implemented within available resources. The department shall complete
statewide implementation by December 31, 2001. The department shall
report to the appropriate committees in the senate and house of
representatives on how the use of the selected assessment instrument
has affected department policies, by no later than December 31, 2002,
December 31, 2004, and December 31, 2006;
(5) Use the assessment tool developed pursuant to subsection (4) of
this section in making out-of-home placement decisions for children;
(6) Each region of the department shall make the appropriate number
of referrals to the foster care assessment program to ensure that the
services offered by the program are used to the extent funded pursuant
to the department's contract with the program. The department shall
report to the legislature by November 30, 2000, on the number of
referrals, by region, to the foster care assessment program. If the
regions are not referring an adequate number of cases to the program,
the department shall include in its report an explanation of what
action it is or has taken to ensure that the referrals are adequate;
(7) The department shall report to the legislature by December 15,
2000, on how it will use the foster care assessment program model to
assess children as they enter out-of-home care;
(8) The department is to accomplish the tasks listed in subsections
(4) through (7) of this section within existing resources;
(9) Study and develop a comprehensive plan for the evaluation and
identification of all children and youth in need of long-term care or
assistance, including, but not limited to, the mentally ill,
developmentally disabled, medically fragile, seriously emotionally or
behaviorally disabled, and physically impaired;
(10) Study and develop a plan for the children and youth in need of
long-term care or assistance to ensure the coordination of services
between the department's divisions and between other state agencies who
are involved with the child or youth;
(11) Study and develop guidelines for transitional services,
between long-term care programs, based on the person's age or mental,
physical, emotional, or medical condition; and
(12) Study and develop a statutory proposal for the emancipation of
minors.

--- END ---