BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
An air pollution control authority or the department may not
regulate or prohibit carbon dioxide emissions from fossil-fueled
thermal power plants or require mitigation of carbon dioxide emission
from fossil-fueled thermal power plants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 80.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The council may not regulate or prohibit carbon dioxide emissions
from fossil-fueled thermal power plants or require mitigation of carbon
dioxide emission from fossil-fueled thermal power plants.

--- END ---