BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
If the water right for the use of water for agricultural purposes
on real property that is zoned or designated for agricultural use by a
local government is found to be relinquished under chapter 90.14,
90.03, or 90.44 RCW, or is judicially found to be abandoned, the real
property is exempt from taxation as long as it is zoned or designated
for agricultural use by a local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2005 and thereafter.

--- END ---