BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter is intended to provide the
exclusive source of authority to an adult family home to individually
or jointly self-insure risks, jointly purchase insurance or
reinsurance, and to contract for risk management, claims, and
administrative services. However, adult family homes may not
participate in any activity or program authorized under this chapter in
violation of Article VIII, section 5 or 7 of the state Constitution.
This chapter shall be liberally construed to grant adult family homes
maximum flexibility in self-insuring to the extent the self-insurance
programs are operated in a safe and sound manner. This chapter is
intended to require prior approval for the establishment of every
individual adult family home self-insured employee health and welfare
benefit program and every adult family home self-insurance program.
This chapter is not intended to authorize or regulate self-insurance of
unemployment compensation under chapter 50.44 RCW, or industrial
insurance under chapter 51.14 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Risk assumption" means a decision to absorb the entity's
financial exposure to a risk of loss without the creation of a formal
program of advance funding of anticipated losses.
(2) "Self-insurance" means a formal program of advance funding and
management of entity financial exposure to a risk of loss that is not
transferred through the purchase of an insurance policy or contract.
(3) "Health and welfare benefits" means a plan or program
established by an adult family home for the purpose of providing its
employees and their dependents with health care, accident, disability,
death, and salary protection benefits.
(4) "Property and liability risks" includes the risk of property
damage or loss sustained by an adult family home and the risk of claims
arising from the tortious or negligent conduct or any error or omission
of the adult family home, its officers, employees, agents, or
volunteers as a result of which a claim may be made against the adult
family home.
(5) "Adult family home" has the same meaning as in RCW
70.128.010(1), which is licensed pursuant to RCW 70.128.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The governing body of an adult family
home may individually self-insure, may join or form a self-insurance
program together with other adult family homes, and may jointly
purchase insurance or reinsurance with other entities or adult family
homes for property and liability risks, and health and welfare benefits
only as permitted under this chapter. In addition, the entity or
entities may contract for or hire personnel to provide risk management,
claims, and administrative services in accordance with this chapter.
(2) Every individual and joint self-insurance program is subject to
audit by the state auditor.
(3) If provided for in the agreement or contract, a joint self-insurance program may, in conformance with this chapter:
(a) Contract or otherwise provide for risk management and loss
control services;
(b) Contract or otherwise provide legal counsel for the defense of
claims and other legal services;
(c) Consult with the state insurance commissioner;
(d) Jointly purchase insurance and reinsurance coverage in such
form and amount as the program's participants agree by contract; and
(e) Possess any other powers and perform all other functions
reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(4) An adult family home that has decided to assume a risk of loss
must have available for inspection by the state auditor a written
report indicating the class of risk or risks the governing body of the
adult family home has decided to assume.
(5) Every joint self-insurance program governed by this chapter
shall appoint the commissioner as its attorney to receive service of,
and upon whom shall be served, all legal process issued against it in
this state upon causes of action arising in this state.
(a) Service upon the commissioner as attorney shall constitute
service upon the program. Service upon joint insurance programs can be
had only by service upon the commissioner. At the time of service, the
plaintiff shall pay to the commissioner a fee to be set by the
commissioner, taxable as costs in the action.
(b) With the initial filing for approval with the commissioner,
each joint self-insurance program shall designate by name and address
the person to whom the commissioner shall forward legal process so
served upon him or her. The joint self-insurance program may change
such person by filing a new designation.
(c) The appointment of the commissioner as attorney shall be
irrevocable, shall bind any successor in interest or to the assets or
liabilities of the joint self-insurance program, and shall remain in
effect as long as there is in force in this state any contract made by
the joint self-insurance program or liabilities or duties arising
therefrom.
(d) The commissioner shall keep a record of the day and hour of
service upon him or her of all legal process. A copy of the process,
by registered mail with return receipt requested, shall be sent by the
commissioner, to the person designated for the purpose by the joint
self-insurance program in its most recent such designation filed with
the commissioner. No proceedings may be had against the joint self-insurance program, and the program may not be required to appear,
plead, or answer, until the expiration of forty days after the date of
service upon the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The commissioner, in consultation with the
property and liability advisory board, shall adopt rules governing the
management and operation of both individual and joint adult family home
self-insurance programs covering property or liability risks. The
commissioner shall also adopt rules governing the management and
operation of both individual and joint adult family home self-insured
health and welfare benefits programs in consultation with the health
and welfare benefits advisory board. All rules shall be appropriate
for the type of program and class of risk covered. The commissioner's
rules shall include:
(1) Standards for the management, operation, and solvency of self-insurance programs, including the necessity and frequency of actuarial
analyses and claims audits;
(2) Standards for claims management procedures; and
(3) Standards for contracts between self-insurance programs and
private businesses including standards for contracts between third-party administrators and programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Before the establishment of a joint self-insurance program covering property or liability risks by adult family
homes, or an individual or joint adult family home self-insured health
and welfare benefits program, the adult family home or adult family
homes must obtain the approval of the commissioner. The commissioner's
approval is not required for the establishment of an individual adult
family home self-insurance program covering property or liability
risks. The adult family home or adult family homes proposing creation
of a self-insurance program requiring prior approval shall submit a
plan of management and operation to the commissioner and the state
auditor that provides at least the following information:
(1) The risk or risks to be covered, including any coverage
definitions, terms, conditions, and limitations or in the case of
health and welfare benefits programs, the benefits to be provided,
including any benefit definitions, terms, conditions, and limitations;
(2) The amount and method of financing the benefits or covered
risks, including the initial capital and proposed rates and projected
premiums;
(3) The proposed claim reserving practices;
(4) The proposed purchase and maintenance of insurance or
reinsurance in excess of the amounts retained by the self-insurance
program;
(5) In the case of a joint program, the legal form of the program,
including but not limited to any bylaws, charter, or trust agreement;
(6) In the case of a joint program, the agreements with members of
the program defining the responsibilities and benefits of each member
and management;
(7) The proposed accounting, depositing, and investment practices
of the program;
(8) The proposed time when actuarial analysis will be first
conducted and the frequency of future actuarial analysis;
(9) A designation of the individual upon whom service of process
shall be executed on behalf of the program. In the case of a joint
program, a designation of the individual to whom service of process
shall be forwarded by the commissioner on behalf of the program;
(10) All contracts between the program and private persons
providing risk management, claims, or other administrative services;
(11) A professional analysis of the feasibility of creation and
maintenance of the program; and
(12) Any other information required by rule of the commissioner
that is necessary to determine the probable financial and management
success of the program or that is necessary to determine compliance
with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 An adult family home may participate in a
joint self-insurance program covering property or liability risks with
similar adult family homes from other states if the program satisfies
the following requirements:
(1) Only those adult family homes of this state and similar adult
family homes of other states that are provided insurance by the program
may have ownership interest in the program;
(2) The participating adult family homes of this state and other
states shall elect a board of directors to manage the program, a
majority of whom shall be affiliated with one or more of the
participating adult family homes;
(3) The program must provide coverage through the delivery to each
participating adult family home of one or more written policies
effecting insurance of covered risks;
(4) The program shall be financed, including the payment of
premiums and the contribution of initial capital, in accordance with
the plan of management and operation submitted to the commissioner in
accordance with this chapter;
(5) The financial statements of the program shall be audited
annually by the certified public accountants for the program, and such
audited financial statements shall be delivered to the Washington state
auditor and the commissioner not more than one hundred twenty days
after the end of each fiscal year of the program;
(6) The investments of the program shall be initiated only with
financial institutions and/or broker-dealers doing business in those
states in which participating adult family homes are located, and such
investments shall be audited annually by the certified public
accountants for the program, and a list of such investments shall be
delivered to the Washington state auditor not more than one hundred
twenty days after the end of each fiscal year of the program;
(7) The treasurer of a multistate joint self-insurance program
shall be designated by resolution of the program and such treasurer
shall be located in the state of one of the participating adult family
homes;
(8) The participating adult family homes may have no contingent
liabilities for covered claims, other than liabilities for unpaid
premiums, retrospective premiums, or assessments, if assets of the
program are insufficient to cover the program's liabilities; and
(9) The program shall obtain approval from the commissioner in
accordance with this chapter and shall remain in compliance with the
provisions of this chapter, except to the extent that such provisions
are modified by or inconsistent with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Within one hundred twenty days of
receipt of a plan of management and operation, the commissioner shall
either approve or disapprove the formation of the self-insurance
program after reviewing the plan to determine whether the proposed
program complies with this chapter and all rules adopted in accordance
with this chapter.
(2) If the commissioner denies a request for approval, the
commissioner shall specify in detail the reasons for denial and the
manner in which the program fails to meet the requirements of this
chapter or any rules adopted in accordance with this chapter.
(3) Whenever the commissioner determines that a joint self-insurance program covering property or liability risks or an individual
or joint self-insured health and welfare benefits program is in
violation of this chapter or is operating in an unsafe financial
condition, the commissioner may issue and serve upon the program an
order to cease and desist from the violation or practice.
(a) The commissioner shall deliver the order to the appropriate
adult family home or adult family homes directly or mail it to the
appropriate adult family home or adult family homes by registered mail
with return receipt requested.
(b) If the program violates the order or has not taken steps to
comply with the order after the expiration of twenty days after the
cease and desist order has been received by the program, the program is
deemed to be operating in violation of this chapter, and the
commissioner shall notify the state auditor and the attorney general of
the violation.
(c) After hearing or with the consent of a program governed by this
chapter and in addition to or in lieu of a continuation of the cease
and desist order, the commissioner may levy a fine upon the program in
an amount not less than three hundred dollars and not more than ten
thousand dollars. The order levying such fine shall specify the period
within which the fine shall be fully paid. The period within which
such fines shall be paid shall not be less than fifteen nor more than
thirty days from the date of such order. Upon failure to pay any such
fine when due the commissioner shall request the attorney general to
bring a civil action on the commissioner's behalf to collect the fine.
The commissioner shall pay any fine so collected to the state treasurer
for the account of the general fund.
(4) Each self-insurance program approved by the commissioner shall
annually file a report with the commissioner and state auditor
providing:
(a) Details of any changes in the articles of incorporation,
bylaws, or interlocal agreement;
(b) Copies of all the insurance coverage documents;
(c) A description of the program structure, including participants'
retention, program retention, and excess insurance limits and
attachment point;
(d) An actuarial analysis, if required;
(e) A list of contractors and service providers;
(f) The financial and loss experience of the program; and
(g) Such other information as required by rule of the commissioner.
(5) No self-insurance program requiring the commissioner's approval
may engage in an act or practice that in any respect significantly
differs from the management and operation plan that formed the basis
for the commissioner's approval of the program unless the program first
notifies the commissioner in writing and obtains the commissioner's
approval. The commissioner shall approve or disapprove the proposed
change within sixty days of receipt of the notice. If the commissioner
denies a requested change, the commissioner shall specify in detail the
reasons for denial and the manner in which the program would fail to
meet the requirements of this chapter or any rules adopted in
accordance with this chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.01.050 and 2003 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Insurer" as used in this code includes every person engaged in the
business of making contracts of insurance, other than a fraternal
benefit society. A reciprocal or interinsurance exchange is an
"insurer" as used in this code. Two or more hospitals that join and
organize as a mutual corporation pursuant to chapter 24.06 RCW for the
purpose of insuring or self-insuring against liability claims,
including medical liability, through a contributing trust fund are not
an "insurer" under this code. Two or more local governmental
entities((, under any provision of law)) or two or more adult family
homes as defined in RCW 70.128.010(1), which are licensed pursuant to
RCW 70.128.050, that join together and organize to form an organization
for the purpose of jointly self-insuring or self-funding are not an
"insurer" under this code. Two or more persons engaged in the business
of commercial fishing who enter into an arrangement with other such
persons for the pooling of funds to pay claims or losses arising out of
loss or damage to a vessel or machinery used in the business of
commercial fishing and owned by a member of the pool are not an
"insurer" under this code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The commissioner may adopt rules as
necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 7 and 9 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---