BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the number of
overweight children has more than doubled in the past twenty years and
that childhood obesity creates risks for significant health problems
including type-two diabetes, sleep apnea, orthopedic problems, liver
disease, and asthma. The legislature acknowledges that many young
people are not physically active on a regular basis and that physical
activity declines dramatically during adolescence. The legislature
also finds that overweight adolescents have a seventy percent chance of
becoming overweight or obese adults creating additional risks of high
blood pressure, heart disease, and stroke.
The legislature recognizes that exercise is an essential component
of good health and that teaching children the importance of physical
fitness and proper nutrition is vital to improving the health of
today's youth. The legislature also recognizes that in addition to
health benefits, students can experience greater self-esteem,
confidence, and discipline, often leading to greater academic
achievement as well. The legislature intends to establish within the
common school curriculum a requirement for physical education and
fitness instruction and policies most likely to be effective in helping
today's youth adopt and maintain a physically active lifestyle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this section apply throughout this section
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Elementary school" means a school serving three or more of the
grades kindergarten through six.
(b) "High school" means a school serving two or more of the grades
nine through twelve and from which a student may graduate and earn a
high school diploma.
(c) "Middle school" means a school other than a high school or an
elementary school and serving two or more of the grades five through
nine.
(d) "Physical education and fitness curriculum" means a daily
period of physical activity, a minimum of twenty minutes of which is
aerobic activity in the student's target heart rate zone, and which
includes instruction and practice in basic movement and fine motor
skills, progressive physical fitness, athletic conditioning, and
nutrition and wellness instruction through age-appropriate activities
designed to:
(i) Expose students to a wide variety of physical activities;
(ii) Teach skills to help maintain lifetime health and fitness;
(iii) Encourage self-monitoring so students can see how active they
are and set their own goals;
(iv) Allow students to individualize the intensity of activities;
(v) Teach students to focus on their own best efforts; and
(vi) Foster social development and positive peer interaction.
(2) By September 1, 2006, within existing resources, each school
district board of directors must adopt or amend as necessary a physical
education and fitness curriculum for all middle school students. If
there is no middle school within a district's schools, this requirement
applies to students in grades six through eight. The curriculum
required under this section must provide for students to be excused on
account of physical disability or religious belief. In order to
accommodate a schedule of rotating classes or other scheduling needs,
a school district's curriculum may provide for a limited degree of
flexibility in meeting the daily requirements for physical activity and
aerobic activity, so long as the total number of minutes of aerobic
activity each week is equal to or greater than twenty minutes per day.
School districts are encouraged to develop a physical education and
fitness curriculum for students at the elementary and high school
level, and to articulate the instruction across the grades.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction is encouraged to
facilitate the sharing of best practices between districts and to
facilitate the dissemination of information and resources that may
assist districts in developing their curricula.

--- END ---