BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall exchange common school trust land, commonly known
as the "Hats and Boots" parcel, adjoining the Duwamish training center
branch of South Seattle Community College for land of equal value
granted to the state for the support of charitable, educational, penal,
and reformatory purposes. The state board for community and technical
colleges shall pay one dollar per year to lease the exchanged property
at the site commonly known as the "Hats and Boots" parcel once the
exchange is completed by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---