BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of this section only, "small employer" means any
person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, political
subdivision, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged in
business that, during the preceding calendar quarter, employed no more
than fifty employees who worked an average of thirty or more hours per
week.
For purposes of this section only, "large employer" means any
person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, political
subdivision, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged in
business that, during the preceding calendar quarter, employed more
than fifty employees who worked an average of thirty or more hours per
week.
The administrator shall identify the employers of any person
receiving benefits through the basic health plan for themselves or
their dependents. On or before February 1st of each year, the
administrator shall provide the appropriate committees of the senate
and house of representatives a report of employers whose employees are
receiving benefits through the basic health plan for themselves or
their dependents. The report must include whether the employer is a
large employer or a small employer, and for each employer: (1) The
name and address of the employer; (2) the number of employees who are
receiving benefits through the basic health plan; (3) the number of
enrollees who are spouses or dependents of their employees; (4) whether
the employer offers health benefits to their employees; and (5) the
cost to the state of providing basic health plan benefits for their
employees and enrolled dependents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of this section only, "small employer" means any
person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, political
subdivision, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged in
business that, during the preceding calendar quarter, employed no more
than fifty employees who worked an average of thirty or more hours per
week.
For purposes of this section only, "large employer" means any
person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, political
subdivision, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged in
business that, during the preceding calendar quarter, employed more
than fifty employees who worked an average of thirty or more hours per
week.
The department shall identify the employers of any person receiving
benefits through medical assistance for themselves or their dependents.
On or before February 1st of each year, the department shall provide
the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives
a report of employers whose employees are receiving benefits through
medical assistance for themselves or their dependents. The report must
include whether the employer is a large employer or a small employer,
and for each employer: (1) The name and address of the employer; (2)
the number of employees who are receiving benefits through medical
assistance; (3) the number of enrollees who are spouses or dependents
of their employees; (4) whether the employer offers health benefits to
their employees; and (5) the cost to the state of providing medical
assistance for their employees and enrolled dependents.

--- END ---