BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.710 and 2003 c 353 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall operate a moped or motorized foot scooter upon
the highways of this state unless the moped or motorized foot scooter
has been assigned a moped or motorized foot scooter registration number
and displays a moped or motorized foot scooter permit in accordance
with the provisions of RCW 46.16.630.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a moped may not be
operated on a bicycle path or trail, bikeway, equestrian trail, or
hiking or recreational trail.
(3) Operation of a moped, electric personal assistive mobility
device, motorized foot scooter, or an electric-assisted bicycle on a
fully controlled limited access highway is unlawful. Operation of a
moped, motorized foot scooter, or an electric-assisted bicycle on a
sidewalk is unlawful.
(4) Removal of any muffling device or pollution control device from
a moped or motorized foot scooter is unlawful.
(5) Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section do not apply to
electric-assisted bicycles. Electric-assisted bicycles and motorized
foot scooters may have access to highways of the state to the same
extent as bicycles. Subject to subsection (6) of this section,
electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot scooters may be operated
on a multipurpose trail or bicycle lane, but local jurisdictions may
restrict or otherwise limit the access of electric-assisted bicycles
and motorized foot scooters, and state agencies may regulate the use of
motorized foot scooters on facilities and properties under their
jurisdiction and control.
(6) ((Subsections (1) and (4) of this section do not apply to
motorized foot scooters.)) Subsection (2) of this section applies to
motorized foot scooters when the bicycle path, trail, bikeway,
equestrian trail, or hiking or recreational trail was built or is
maintained with federal highway transportation funds. Additionally,
any new trail or bicycle path or readily identifiable existing trail or
bicycle path not built or maintained with federal highway
transportation funds may be used by persons operating electric-powered
motorized foot scooters only when appropriately signed.
(7) A person operating an electric personal assistive mobility
device (EPAMD) shall obey all speed limits and shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians and human-powered devices at all times. An
operator must also give an audible signal before overtaking and passing
a pedestrian. Except for the limitations of this subsection, persons
operating an EPAMD have all the rights and duties of a pedestrian.
(8) The use of an EPAMD or motorized foot scooter may be regulated
in the following circumstances:
(a) A municipality and the department of transportation may
prohibit the operation of an EPAMD on public highways within their
respective jurisdictions where the speed limit is greater than twenty-five miles per hour;
(b) A municipality may restrict the speed of an EPAMD in locations
with congested pedestrian or nonmotorized traffic and where there is
significant speed differential between pedestrians or nonmotorized
traffic and EPAMD operators. The areas in this subsection must be
designated by the city engineer or designee of the municipality.
Municipalities shall not restrict the speed of an EPAMD in the entire
community or in areas in which there is infrequent pedestrian traffic;
(c) A state agency or local government may regulate the operation
of an EPAMD within the boundaries of any area used for recreation, open
space, habitat, trails, or conservation purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.630 and 2002 c 352 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Application for registration of a moped or motorized foot scooter
shall be made to the department of licensing in such manner and upon
such forms as the department shall prescribe, and shall state the name
and address of each owner of the moped or motorized foot scooter to be
registered, the vehicle identification number, and such other
information as the department may require, and shall be accompanied by
a registration fee of thirty dollars. Upon receipt of the application
and the application fee, the moped or motorized foot scooter shall be
registered and a registration number assigned, which shall be affixed
to the moped or motorized foot scooter in the manner as provided by
rules adopted by the department. The registration provided in this
section shall be valid for a period of twelve months.
Every owner of a moped or motorized foot scooter in this state
shall renew the registration, in such manner as the department shall
prescribe, for an additional period of twelve months, upon payment of
a renewal fee of thirty dollars.
Any person acquiring a moped or motorized foot scooter already
validly registered must, within fifteen days of the acquisition or
purchase of the moped or motorized foot scooter, make application to
the department for transfer of the registration, and the application
shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of five dollars.
The registration fees provided in this section shall be in lieu of
any personal property tax or the vehicle excise tax imposed by chapter
82.44 RCW.
The department shall, at the time the registration number is
assigned, make available a decal or other identifying device to be
displayed on the moped or motorized foot scooter. A fee of one dollar
and fifty cents shall be charged for the decal or other identifying
device.
The provisions of RCW 46.01.130 and 46.01.140 shall apply to
applications for the issuance of registration numbers or renewals or
transfers thereof for mopeds or motorized foot scooters as they do to
the issuance of vehicle licenses, the appointment of agents, and the
collection of application fees. Except for the fee collected pursuant
to RCW 46.01.140, all fees collected under this section shall be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The operator of a motorized foot scooter shall not do any of
the following:
(a) Operate a motorized foot scooter on a highway with a speed
limit in excess of twenty-five miles per hour unless the motorized foot
scooter is operated within a bicycle lane;
(b) Operate a motorized foot scooter without wearing a properly
fitted and fastened bicycle helmet;
(c) Operate a motorized foot scooter when the operator is under the
age of sixteen years old;
(d) Operate a motorized foot scooter with a passenger in addition
to the operator;
(e) Operate a motorized foot scooter carrying a package, bundle, or
article that prevents the operator from keeping at least one hand upon
the handlebars;
(f) Operate a motorized foot scooter upon a sidewalk, except as may
be necessary to enter or leave adjacent property;
(g) Operate a motorized foot scooter at a speed in excess of
fifteen miles per hour;
(h) Operate a motorized foot scooter upon the highways of this
state unless the driver holds a valid driver's license issued in
compliance with chapter 46.20 RCW;
(i) Operate a motorized foot scooter that creates continuous sound
associated with a gasoline-powered engine so as to unreasonably disturb
or interfere with the peace and comfort of owners or occupants of real
property.
(2) It is unlawful for any person to operate a motorized foot
scooter upon a highway, multipurpose trail, or bicycle lane while under
the influence of an alcoholic beverage or any drug, or under the
combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug. Violations
of this section are governed by RCW 46.61.502.

--- END ---