BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the right to vote
is a fundamental liberty and that this liberty should not be
confiscated without due process. When the state chooses to use
guardianship proceedings as the basis for the denial of a fundamental
liberty, an individual is entitled to basic procedural protections that
will ensure fundamental fairness. These basic procedural protections
should include clear notice and a meaningful opportunity to be heard.
The legislature further finds that the state has a compelling interest
in ensuring that those who cast a ballot understand the nature and
effect of voting is an individual decision, and that any restriction of
voting rights imposed through guardianship proceedings should be
narrowly tailored to meet this compelling interest.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.88.010 and 1991 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The superior court of each county shall have power to appoint
guardians for the persons and/or estates of incapacitated persons, and
guardians for the estates of nonresidents of the state who have
property in the county needing care and attention.
(a) For purposes of this chapter, a person may be deemed
incapacitated as to person when the superior court determines the
individual has a significant risk of personal harm based upon a
demonstrated inability to adequately provide for nutrition, health,
housing, or physical safety.
(b) For purposes of this chapter, a person may be deemed
incapacitated as to the person's estate when the superior court
determines the individual is at significant risk of financial harm
based upon a demonstrated inability to adequately manage property or
financial affairs.
(c) A determination of incapacity is a legal not a medical
decision, based upon a demonstration of management insufficiencies over
time in the area of person or estate. Age, eccentricity, poverty, or
medical diagnosis alone shall not be sufficient to justify a finding of
incapacity.
(d) A person may also be determined incapacitated if he or she is
under the age of majority as defined in RCW 26.28.010.
(e) For purposes of giving informed consent for health care
pursuant to RCW 7.70.050 and 7.70.065, an "incompetent" person is any
person who is (i) incompetent by reason of mental illness,
developmental disability, senility, habitual drunkenness, excessive use
of drugs, or other mental incapacity, of either managing his or her
property or caring for himself or herself, or both, or (ii)
incapacitated as defined in (a), (b), or (d) of this subsection.
(f) For purposes of the terms "incompetent," "disabled," or "not
legally competent," as those terms are used in the Revised Code of
Washington to apply to persons incapacitated under this chapter, those
terms shall be interpreted to mean "incapacitated" persons for purposes
of this chapter.
(2) The superior court for each county shall have power to appoint
limited guardians for the persons and estates, or either thereof, of
incapacitated persons, who by reason of their incapacity have need for
protection and assistance, but who are capable of managing some of
their personal and financial affairs. After considering all evidence
presented as a result of such investigation, the court shall impose, by
order, only such specific limitations and restrictions on an
incapacitated person to be placed under a limited guardianship as the
court finds necessary for such person's protection and assistance. A
person shall not be presumed to be incapacitated nor shall a person
lose any legal rights or suffer any legal disabilities as the result of
being placed under a limited guardianship, except as to those rights
and disabilities specifically set forth in the court order establishing
such a limited guardianship. In addition, the court order shall state
the period of time for which it shall be applicable.
(3) Venue for petitions for guardianship or limited guardianship
shall lie in the county wherein the alleged incapacitated person is
domiciled, or if such person resides in a facility supported in whole
or in part by local, state, or federal funding sources, in either the
county where the facility is located, the county of domicile prior to
residence in the supported facility, or the county where a parent or
spouse of the alleged incapacitated person is domiciled.
If the alleged incapacitated person's residency has changed within
one year of the filing of the petition, any interested person may move
for a change of venue for any proceedings seeking the appointment of a
guardian or a limited guardian under this chapter to the county of the
alleged incapacitated person's last place of residence of one year or
more. The motion shall be granted when it appears to the court that
such venue would be in the best interests of the alleged incapacitated
person and would promote more complete consideration of all relevant
matters.
(4) Under RCW 11.94.010, a principal may nominate, by a durable
power of attorney, the guardian or limited guardian of his or her
estate or person for consideration by the court if guardianship
proceedings for the principal's person or estate are thereafter
commenced. The court shall make its appointment in accordance with the
principal's most recent nomination in a durable power of attorney
except for good cause or disqualification.
(5) ((When a court imposes a full guardianship for an incapacitated
person, the person shall be considered incompetent for purposes of
rationally exercising the right to vote and shall lose the right to
vote, unless the court specifically finds that the person is rationally
capable of exercising the franchise.)) Imposition of a ((limited))
guardianship for an incapacitated person shall not result in the loss
of the right to vote unless the court determines that the person is
incompetent for purposes of rationally exercising the franchise in that
the individual lacks the capacity to understand the nature and effect
of voting such that she or he cannot make an individual choice.

--- END ---