BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state and local
regulation of the use of land used by state and federal military
organizations for training grounds can jeopardize the military's
primary mission of defending our homeland. State regulation can
interfere with military training and can reduce the efficiency of such
training. The legislature intends to create a task force that would
examine how state and local land use regulation affects military
training, and to recommend solutions when such regulation is found to
interfere with such training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The military training land use task
force is hereby created. The task force shall consist of thirteen
members. Seven members shall be appointed by the commanding officers
of the following United States military bases, with each commander
appointing one member: (a) Whidbey Island naval air station; (b)
McChord air force base; (c) Fairchild air force base; (d) Fort Lewis;
(e) Bremerton naval station; (f) Everett naval station; and (g) Bangor
naval submarine base. Two members shall be appointed by the adjutant
general of the Washington national guard, with the advice of the
commander of the Washington army national guard and the commander of
the Washington air national guard. One member shall be appointed by
the director of the department of ecology. One member shall be
appointed by the director of the department of fish and wildlife. One
member shall be appointed by the association of Washington cities. One
member shall be appointed by the Washington state association of
counties.
(2) Members of the military training land use task force will not
be compensated but will receive reimbursement for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Members of the task force
shall be considered members of a committee for purposes of RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(3) The staff of the adjutant general of the Washington national
guard shall provide administrative and clerical assistance to the
committee within existing resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The military training land use task force
shall meet at times and locations determined by the task force. At the
first meeting, the task force shall select a chair, who will preside
over meetings. The task force shall examine state and local land use
and environmental regulation of land used for training purposes by
federal and state military organizations in Washington state. The
committee shall determine whether such regulations are impeding
military training, or increasing the expense of military training, or
increasing the expense of maintaining military training facilities.
The committee shall report to the legislature by December 31, 2004, on
the committee's findings and on suggested legislative solutions.
Committee findings and recommendations shall be made by majority vote,
although a minority report may be included in the report to the
legislature. The report to the legislature may be submitted in
electronic form by e-mailing the report to the appropriate house of
representatives and senate committees, which shall post the report on
the house of representatives and senate committee web pages. The house
of representatives and senate committees shall distribute copies to
members of the public either electronically or in print upon request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires January 1, 2005.

--- END ---