BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.08.177 and 1986 c 9 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
"Successor" means any person to whom a taxpayer quitting, selling
out, exchanging, or disposing of a business sells or otherwise conveys,
directly or indirectly, in bulk and not in the ordinary course of the
taxpayer's business, a major part of the ((materials, supplies,
merchandise, inventory, fixtures, or equipment)) taxpayer's property,
whether real or personal, tangible or intangible, of the taxpayer.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.12.070 and 1981 c 128 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this title ((shall)) apply to all work done by
contract; the person, firm, or corporation who lets a contract for such
work ((shall be)) is responsible primarily and directly for all
premiums upon the work. The contractor and any subcontractor ((shall
be)) are subject to the provisions of this title and the person, firm,
or corporation letting the contract ((shall be)) is entitled to collect
from the contractor the full amount payable in premiums and the
contractor in turn ((shall be)) is entitled to collect from the
subcontractor his or her proportionate amount of the payment.
For the purposes of this section, a contractor registered under
chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW ((shall not be))
is not responsible for any premiums upon the work of any subcontractor
if:
(1) The subcontractor is currently engaging in a business which is
registered under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW;
(2) The subcontractor has a principal place of business which would
be eligible for a business deduction for internal revenue service tax
purposes other than that furnished by the contractor for which the
business has contracted to furnish services;
(3) The subcontractor maintains a separate set of books or records
that reflect all items of income and expenses of the business; ((and))
(4) The subcontractor has contracted to perform:
(a) The work of a contractor as defined in RCW 18.27.010; or
(b) The work of installing wires or equipment to convey electric
current or installing apparatus to be operated by such current as it
pertains to the electrical industry as described in chapter 19.28 RCW;
and
(5) The subcontractor, if an employer, has an industrial insurance
account in good standing with the department when the contract is let.
It ((shall be)) is unlawful for any county, city, or town to issue
a construction building permit to any person who has not submitted to
the department an estimate of payroll and paid premium thereon as
provided by chapter 51.16 RCW of this title or proof ((that such person
has qualified)) of qualification as a self-insurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 51.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon termination, dissolution, or abandonment of a corporate or
limited liability company business, any officer, member, manager, or
other person having control or supervision of payment and/or reporting
of industrial insurance, or who is charged with the responsibility for
the filing of returns, is personally liable for any unpaid premiums and
interest and penalties on those premiums if such officer or other
person willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid any premiums due
the department under chapter 51.16 RCW.
For purposes of this subsection "willfully fails to pay or to cause
to be paid" means that the failure was the result of an intentional,
conscious, and voluntary course of action.
(2) The officer, member, manager, or other person is liable only
for premiums that became due during the period he or she had the
control, supervision, responsibility, or duty to act for the
corporation described in subsection (1) of this section, plus interest
and penalties on those premiums.
(3) Any person having been issued a notice of assessment under this
section is entitled to the appeal procedures under RCW 51.48.131.
(4) This section does not relieve the corporation or limited
liability company of other tax liabilities or otherwise impair other
tax collection remedies afforded by law.
(5) Collection authority and procedures prescribed in this chapter
apply to collections under this section.

--- END ---