BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.36.110 and 1994 c 154 s 312 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of the department of labor and industries or the
director's authorized representative shall have the authority to:
(1) Conduct audits and investigations of providers of medical,
chiropractic, dental, vocational, and other health services furnished
to industrially injured workers pursuant to Title 51 RCW. In the
conduct of such audits or investigations, the director or the
director's authorized representatives may examine all records, or
portions thereof, including patient records, for which services were
rendered by a health services provider and reimbursed by the
department, notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute which
may make or purport to make such records privileged or confidential:
PROVIDED, That no original patient records shall be removed from the
premises of the health services provider, and that the disclosure of
any records or information obtained under authority of this section by
the department of labor and industries is prohibited and constitutes a
violation of RCW 42.52.050, unless such disclosure is directly
connected to the official duties of the department: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the disclosure of patient information as required under
this section shall not subject any physician or other health services
provider to any liability for breach of any confidential relationships
between the provider and the patient: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
director or the director's authorized representative shall destroy all
copies of patient medical records in their possession upon completion
of the audit, investigation, or proceedings;
(2) Approve or deny applications to participate as a provider of
services furnished to industrially injured workers pursuant to Title 51
RCW; ((and))
(3) Terminate or suspend eligibility to participate as a provider
of services furnished to industrially injured workers pursuant to Title
51 RCW; and
(4) Pursue collection of unpaid overpayments and/or penalties plus
interest accrued from health care providers pursuant to RCW
51.32.240(6).

--- END ---