BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Teacher experience and education information is gathered and
maintained on a district-by-district basis. This information is
important for many reasons, particularly for funding and compensation
determinations and certification and recertification. However,
gathering and maintaining this information in the district in which the
teacher is currently located results in duplication of records,
additional administrative expenses, redundancy in audit efforts, and
errors from teachers changing districts or limited staff resources.
The office of superintendent of public instruction has studied means of
gaining greater administrative efficiency and cost savings through a
central repository of certified educator education and experience
information.
(b) Washington lacks adequate and reliable data on crucial elements
related to educator quality, such as teaching assignment by either
subject or student demographics, access to and effectiveness of current
professional development opportunities, impact and effectiveness of
teacher mentoring, and causal factors related to turnover and
retention.
(c) A central repository of teacher education and experience
information alone would yield administrative efficiencies, but not
adequate data on crucial elements related to educator quality to inform
policymaking.
(d) A comprehensive, integrated educator information system would
help policymakers determine the effectiveness of educator quality-related policy initiatives and investments and inform future policy
development.
(2) The office of superintendent of public instruction and
professional educator standards board shall convene a work group to
study, and make recommendations for implementation of, a state educator
information system. The study shall include, but not be limited to,
the following:
(a) Summary of the literature, research, and exemplary practice in
other states reflecting the need for, and development of, an educator
information system;
(b) Long and short-term questions about the educator work force,
teaching quality, and support for teachers' work that should drive the
key data elements included in this system;
(c) Whether teachers and students will benefit;
(d) Whether a new system allows for innovative use of the internet
and other information technology;
(e) Considerations of ease of access and privacy;
(f) Intended use of data;
(g) System management and reporting;
(h) Review of studies conducted on the feasibility, cost, and
benefits of a central repository of educator certification data. This
review shall include, but not be limited to, consideration of:
(i) Whether increased accuracy is likely;
(ii) Whether school districts can save administrative and training
costs;
(iii) Whether improved methods could be used to better ensure data
reliability and integrity; and
(iv) Whether audits can be done more efficiently;
(i) Costs, benefits, and feasibility of an electronic certification
system; and
(j) An estimate of the cost of an educator information system and
any savings that would be generated compared to the current methods of
gathering and maintaining this information.
(3) The work group shall include a broadly representative
stakeholder group, including the state board of education, and other
organizations and associations representing educators and higher
education educator preparation programs at the discretion of the office
of the superintendent of public instruction and professional educator
standards board.
(4) Staffing for the work group shall be provided by the office of
the superintendent of public instruction and professional educator
standards board.
(5) The office of superintendent of public instruction shall gather
related data as necessary to inform this study.
(6) The study and recommendations for a comprehensive educator
quality data system shall be provided to the education and fiscal
committees of the legislature by November 1, 2004.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---