BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.82.130 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 4 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Upon completing its proposed watershed plan, the planning
unit may approve the proposal by consensus of all of the members of the
planning unit or by consensus among the members of the planning unit
appointed to represent units of government and a majority vote of the
nongovernmental members of the planning unit.
(b) If the proposal is approved by the planning unit, the unit
shall submit the proposal to the counties with territory within the
management area. If the planning unit has received funding beyond the
initial organizing grant under RCW 90.82.040, such a proposal approved
by the planning unit shall be submitted to the counties within four
years of the date that funds beyond the initial funding are first drawn
upon by the planning unit.
(c) If the watershed plan is not approved by the planning unit, the
planning unit may submit the components of the plan for which agreement
is achieved using the procedure under (a) of this subsection, or the
planning unit may terminate the planning process.
(2)(a) With the exception of a county legislative authority that
chooses to opt out of watershed planning as provided in (c) of this
subsection, the legislative authority of each of the counties with
territory in the management area shall provide public notice of and
conduct at least one public hearing on the proposed watershed plan
submitted under this section. After the public hearings, the
legislative authorities of these counties shall convene in joint
session to consider the proposal. The counties may approve or reject
the proposed watershed plan for the management area, but may not amend
it. Approval of such a proposal shall be made by a majority vote of
the members of each of the counties with territory in the management
area.
(b) If a proposed watershed plan is not approved, it shall be
returned to the planning unit with recommendations for revisions.
Approval of such a revised proposal by the planning unit and the
counties shall be made in the same manner provided for the original
watershed plan. If approval of the revised plan is not achieved, the
process shall terminate.
(c) A county legislative authority may choose to opt out of
watershed planning under this chapter and the public hearing processes
under (a) and (b) of this subsection if the county's affected territory
within a particular management area is: (i) Less than five percent of
the total territory within the management area; or (ii) five percent or
more of the total territory within the management area and all other
initiating governments within the management area consent. A county
meeting these conditions and choosing to opt out shall notify the
department and the other initiating governments of that choice prior to
commencement of plan adoption under the provisions of (a) of this
subsection. A county choosing to opt out under the provisions of this
section shall not be bound by obligations contained in the watershed
plan adopted for that management area under this chapter. Even if a
county chooses to opt out under the provisions of this section, the
other counties within a management area may adopt a proposed watershed
plan as provided in this chapter.
(3) The planning unit shall not add an element to its watershed
plan that creates an obligation unless each of the governments to be
obligated has at least one representative on the planning unit and the
respective members appointed to represent those governments agree to
adding the element that creates the obligation. A member's agreeing to
add an element shall be evidenced by a recorded vote of all members of
the planning unit in which the members record support for adding the
element. If the watershed plan is approved under subsections (1) and
(2) of this section and the plan creates obligations: (a) For agencies
of state government, the agencies shall adopt by rule the obligations
of both state and county governments and rules implementing the state
obligations, or, with the consent of the planning unit, may adopt
policies, procedures, or agreements related to the obligations or
implementation of the obligations in addition to or in lieu of rules.
The obligations on state agencies are binding upon adoption of the
obligations, and the agencies shall take other actions to fulfill their
obligations as soon as possible, and should annually review
implementation needs with respect to budget and staffing; (b) for
counties, the obligations are binding on the counties and the counties
shall adopt any necessary implementing ordinances and take other
actions to fulfill their obligations as soon as possible, and should
annually review implementation needs with respect to budget and
staffing; or (c) for an organization voluntarily accepting an
obligation, the organization must adopt policies, procedures,
agreements, rules, or ordinances to implement the plan, and should
annually review implementation needs with respect to budget and
staffing.
(4) After a plan is adopted in accordance with subsection (3) of
this section, and if the department participated in the planning
process, the plan shall be deemed to satisfy the watershed planning
authority of the department with respect to the components included
under the provisions of RCW 90.82.070 through 90.82.100 for the
watershed or watersheds included in the plan. The department shall use
the plan as the framework for making future water resource decisions
for the planned watershed or watersheds. Additionally, the department
shall rely upon the plan as a primary consideration in determining the
public interest related to such decisions.
(5) Once a WRIA plan has been approved under subsection (2) of this
section for a watershed, the department may develop and adopt
modifications to the plan ((or obligations)) imposed by the plan only
through a form of negotiated rule making that uses the same processes
that applied in that watershed for developing and approving the plan
except that, if instream flows were established under the process
provided by RCW 90.82.080, any modification to those flows must be made
using the process in RCW 90.82.080.
(6) As used in this section, "obligation" means any action required
as a result of this chapter that imposes upon a tribal government,
county government, or state government, either: A fiscal impact; a
redeployment of resources; or a change of existing policy.

--- END ---