BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.533 and 2003 c 53 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence
ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.
(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the
standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid
sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the
seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by
seventy-five percent.
(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is
subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is
being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to
commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to
the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class
C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both,
and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements
under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has
previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July
23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection
(4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the
enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all
felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed
felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to
the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which
underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section
based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c)
of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender
has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after
July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or
subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly
weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of
the enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to
all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense
while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender
is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If
the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in
this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility,
and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under
chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(a) or (b) or 69.50.410;
(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(c), (d), or (e);
(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.
For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a
state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part
of that facility or county jail.
(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter
69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or
9.94A.605.
(7) An additional ((two)) four years shall be added to the standard
sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, and an additional four years for each prior offense as
defined in RCW 46.61.5055. All enhancements under this subsection (7)
are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions for all offenses
sentenced under this chapter. The total enhancement under this
subsection (7) shall not exceed twelve years.
(8) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence
range for vehicular assault committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502. All
enhancements under this subsection (8) are mandatory, shall be served
in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other
sentencing provisions for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.
The total enhancement under this subsection (8) shall not exceed six
years.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.520 and 1998 c 211 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the death of any person ensues within three years as a
proximate result of injury proximately caused by the driving of any
vehicle by any person, the driver is guilty of vehicular homicide if
the driver was operating a motor vehicle:
(a) While under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug,
as defined by RCW 46.61.502; or
(b) In a reckless manner; or
(c) With disregard for the safety of others.
(2) Vehicular homicide is a class A felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW, except that, for a conviction under subsection (1)(a) of
this section, there is a mandatory enhancement of four years for the
first offense and an additional ((two)) four years shall be added to
the sentence for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055. The
total enhancement shall not exceed twelve years.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.61.522 and 2001 c 300 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of vehicular assault if he or she operates
or drives any vehicle:
(a) In a reckless manner and causes substantial bodily harm to
another; or
(b) While under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug,
as defined by RCW 46.61.502, and causes substantial bodily harm to
another; or
(c) With disregard for the safety of others and causes substantial
bodily harm to another.
(2) Vehicular assault is a class B felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW, except that, for a conviction under subsection (1)(b) of
this section, there is a mandatory enhancement of two years for the
first offense and an additional two years shall be added to the
sentence for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055. The
total enhancement shall not exceed six years.
(3) As used in this section, "substantial bodily harm" has the same
meaning as in RCW 9A.04.110.

Sec. 4 RCW 13.04.030 and 2000 c 135 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this section, the juvenile courts in this
state shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over all proceedings:
(a) Under the interstate compact on placement of children as
provided in chapter 26.34 RCW;
(b) Relating to children alleged or found to be dependent as
provided in chapter 26.44 RCW and in RCW 13.34.030 through
((13.34.170)) 13.34.161;
(c) Relating to the termination of a parent and child relationship
as provided in RCW 13.34.180 through 13.34.210;
(d) To approve or disapprove out-of-home placement as provided in
RCW 13.32A.170;
(e) Relating to juveniles alleged or found to have committed
offenses, traffic or civil infractions, or violations as provided in
RCW 13.40.020 through 13.40.230, unless:
(i) The juvenile court transfers jurisdiction of a particular
juvenile to adult criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110;
(ii) The statute of limitations applicable to adult prosecution for
the offense, traffic or civil infraction, or violation has expired;
(iii) The alleged offense or infraction is a traffic, fish,
boating, or game offense, or traffic or civil infraction committed by
a juvenile sixteen years of age or older and would, if committed by an
adult, be tried or heard in a court of limited jurisdiction, in which
instance the appropriate court of limited jurisdiction shall have
jurisdiction over the alleged offense or infraction, and no guardian ad
litem is required in any such proceeding due to the juvenile's age:
PROVIDED, That if such an alleged offense or infraction and an alleged
offense or infraction subject to juvenile court jurisdiction arise out
of the same event or incident, the juvenile court may have jurisdiction
of both matters: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the jurisdiction under this
subsection does not constitute "transfer" or a "decline" for purposes
of RCW 13.40.110(1) or (e)(i) of this subsection: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That courts of limited jurisdiction which confine juveniles for an
alleged offense or infraction may place juveniles in juvenile detention
facilities under an agreement with the officials responsible for the
administration of the juvenile detention facility in RCW 13.04.035 and
13.20.060;
(iv) The alleged offense is a traffic or civil infraction, a
violation of compulsory school attendance provisions under chapter
28A.225 RCW, or a misdemeanor, and a court of limited jurisdiction has
assumed concurrent jurisdiction over those offenses as provided in RCW
13.04.0301; ((or))
(v) The juvenile is sixteen or seventeen years old and the alleged
offense is:
(A) A serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(B) A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 and the juvenile
has a criminal history consisting of: (I) One or more prior serious
violent offenses; (II) two or more prior violent offenses; or (III)
three or more of any combination of the following offenses: Any class
A felony, any class B felony, vehicular assault, or manslaughter in the
second degree, all of which must have been committed after the
juvenile's thirteenth birthday and prosecuted separately;
(C) Robbery in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, or drive-by shooting, committed on or after July 1, 1997;
(D) Burglary in the first degree committed on or after July 1,
1997, and the juvenile has a criminal history consisting of one or more
prior felony or misdemeanor offenses; or
(E) Any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 committed on or
after July 1, 1997, and the juvenile is alleged to have been armed with
a firearm; or
(vi) The alleged offense is vehicular assault under RCW
46.61.522(1)(b) or vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520.
In such a case the adult criminal court shall have exclusive
original jurisdiction.
If the juvenile challenges the state's determination of the
juvenile's criminal history under (e)(v) of this subsection, the state
may establish the offender's criminal history by a preponderance of the
evidence. If the criminal history consists of adjudications entered
upon a plea of guilty, the state shall not bear a burden of
establishing the knowing and voluntariness of the plea;
(f) Under the interstate compact on juveniles as provided in
chapter 13.24 RCW;
(g) Relating to termination of a diversion agreement under RCW
13.40.080, including a proceeding in which the divertee has attained
eighteen years of age;
(h) Relating to court validation of a voluntary consent to an out-of-home placement under chapter 13.34 RCW, by the parent or Indian
custodian of an Indian child, except if the parent or Indian custodian
and child are residents of or domiciled within the boundaries of a
federally recognized Indian reservation over which the tribe exercises
exclusive jurisdiction;
(i) Relating to petitions to compel disclosure of information filed
by the department of social and health services pursuant to RCW
74.13.042; and
(j) Relating to judicial determinations and permanency planning
hearings involving developmentally disabled children who have been
placed in out-of-home care pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement
between the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian and the
department of social and health services.
(2) The family court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction
with the juvenile court over all proceedings under this section if the
superior court judges of a county authorize concurrent jurisdiction as
provided in RCW 26.12.010.
(3) The juvenile court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction
with the family court over child custody proceedings under chapter
26.10 RCW as provided for in RCW 13.34.155.
(4) A juvenile subject to adult superior court jurisdiction under
subsection (1)(e)(i) through (v) of this section, who is detained
pending trial, may be detained in a detention facility as defined in
RCW 13.40.020 pending sentencing or a dismissal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---