BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Numerous Washington citizens are unable to acquire adequate
housing and other basic necessities because they are poor or infirm;
(2) Nonprofit corporations are attempting to build or repair low-cost housing for these persons, but are finding it difficult to fund
the increasing demand for such assistance; and
(3) State agencies and those who contract with them to demolish,
repair, or construct structures owned by the state generate surplus
building materials that have little monetary value and are not useful
to state institutions, but that would assist nonprofit organizations in
their attempts to provide habitable environments for these persons.
The legislature therefore finds that it is in the best interest of the
state to provide for the donation of surplus state-owned construction
property and property produced from demolition of existing structures
to qualifying nonprofit corporations to assist them in housing the poor
and infirm citizens of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Surplus construction property" includes personal property,
building materials, or previously used infrastructure or building
remnants:
(i) That the state agency conducting or supervising the
construction, repair, or demolition project has determined will be
discarded; and
(ii) That has minimal value or for which the cost of transport and
redistribution among state agencies would exceed the value of the
property.
(b) "Director" means the director of general administration.
(2) A state agency that contracts for or is the lead agency
responsible for supervising demolition, repair, or construction
services or projects on behalf of the state, or that conducts
demolition, repair, or construction projects, shall identify surplus
construction property and shall inform the director of the existence of
the property. The director shall establish a procedure for identifying
and distributing surplus construction property to qualified nonprofit
corporations that hold current tax exempt status under 26 U.S.C.
501(c)(3) and that are actively engaged and have the primary purpose of
providing low-cost housing to the poor or infirm. In establishing a
procedure to identify and distribute surplus property, the director
shall consult with interested parties, including but not limited to
nonprofit corporations identified in this section, the building
construction trades council, low-income housing groups, representatives
of the used building material industry, the associated general
contractors, the department of labor and industries, the higher
education coordinating board, the state board for community and
technical colleges, and representatives from construction programs at
institutions of higher education and at the department of
transportation. The director shall confirm that the property
identified as surplus construction property by a state agency falls
within that definition and shall donate the surplus construction
property under the established distribution procedure. The agency that
identifies the surplus construction property shall make the property
available to the appropriate nonprofit corporation for curbside or
dockside pickup. The nonprofit corporation shall not engage in
demolition activities on state property in order to collect or receive
the surplus property. This donation of surplus property may occur only
on condition:
(a) That the donated materials be used solely for construction or
repair of housing used by the poor or infirm; or
(b) That the donated materials be sold and the proceeds of sale be
used solely for construction or repair of housing used by the poor or
infirm. The department of general administration shall maintain a
written record of the type of surplus property donated to each
nonprofit corporation and the approximate value of that property.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.19.1919 and 2000 c 183 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The division of purchasing shall sell or exchange personal property
belonging to the state for which the agency, office, department, or
educational institution having custody thereof has no further use, at
public or private sale, and cause the moneys realized from the sale of
any such property to be paid into the fund from which such property was
purchased or, if such fund no longer exists, into the state general
fund. This requirement is subject to the following exceptions and
limitations:
(1) This section does not apply to property under RCW 27.53.045,
28A.335.180, ((or)) 43.19.1920, or section 2 of this act;
(2) Sales of capital assets may be made by the division of
purchasing and a credit established in central stores for future
purchases of capital items as provided for in RCW 43.19.190 through
43.19.1939;
(3) Personal property, excess to a state agency, including
educational institutions, shall not be sold or disposed of prior to
reasonable efforts by the division of purchasing to determine if other
state agencies have a requirement for such personal property. Such
determination shall follow sufficient notice to all state agencies to
allow adequate time for them to make their needs known. Surplus items
may be disposed of without prior notification to state agencies if it
is determined by the director of general administration to be in the
best interest of the state. The division of purchasing shall maintain
a record of disposed surplus property, including date and method of
disposal, identity of any recipient, and approximate value of the
property;
(4) This section does not apply to personal property acquired by a
state organization under federal grants and contracts if in conflict
with special title provisions contained in such grants or contracts;
(5) A state agency having a surplus personal property asset with a
fair market value of less than five hundred dollars may transfer the
asset to another state agency without charging fair market value. A
state agency conducting this action must maintain adequate records to
comply with agency inventory procedures and state audit requirements.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.12.020 and 1989 c 12 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics,
upon all public works and under all public building service maintenance
contracts of the state or any county, municipality or political
subdivision created by its laws, shall be not less than the prevailing
rate of wage for an hour's work in the same trade or occupation in the
locality within the state where such labor is performed. For a
contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor required to
pay the prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily
visible to workers at the job site: PROVIDED, That on road
construction, sewer line, pipeline, transmission line, street, or alley
improvement projects for which no field office is needed or
established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of wage
statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing, concrete,
or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a copy of the
wage statement to any employee on request:
(1) A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries under RCW 39.12.040; and
(2) The address and telephone number of the industrial statistician
of the department of labor and industries where a complaint or inquiry
concerning prevailing wages may be made.
This chapter shall not apply to workers or other persons regularly
employed on monthly or per diem salary by the state, or any county,
municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws.
This chapter does not apply to persons acting on behalf of a
qualified nonprofit corporation holding tax exempt status under 26
U.S.C. 501(c)(3) who are collecting or removing disassembled donated
surplus construction property as defined in section 2 of this act, so
long as they are not engaged in construction or demolition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---