BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.04.336 and 2003 c 353 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Motorized foot scooter" means a device with no more than two ten-inch or smaller diameter wheels that has handlebars, is designed to be
stood or sat upon by the operator, and is powered by an ((internal
combustion engine or)) electric motor that is capable of propelling the
device with or without human propulsion.
For purposes of this section, a motor-driven cycle, a moped, an
electric-assisted bicycle, or a motorcycle is not a motorized foot
scooter.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.010 and 2003 c 353 s 8 and 2003 c 53 s 238 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to operate any vehicle over and
along a public highway of this state without first having obtained and
having in full force and effect a current and proper vehicle license
and display vehicle license number plates therefor as by this chapter
provided.
(2) Failure to make initial registration before operation on the
highways of this state is a misdemeanor, and any person convicted
thereof must be punished by a fine of no less than three hundred thirty
dollars, no part of which may be suspended or deferred.
(3) Failure to renew an expired registration before operation on
the highways of this state is a traffic infraction.
(4) The licensing of a vehicle in another state by a resident of
this state, as defined in RCW 46.16.028, evading the payment of any tax
or license fee imposed in connection with registration, is a gross
misdemeanor punishable as follows:
(a) For a first offense, up to one year in the county jail and a
fine equal to twice the amount of delinquent taxes and fees, no part of
which may be suspended or deferred;
(b) For a second or subsequent offense, up to one year in the
county jail and a fine equal to four times the amount of delinquent
taxes and fees, no part of which may be suspended or deferred;
(c) For fines levied under (b) of this subsection, an amount equal
to the avoided taxes and fees owed will be deposited in the vehicle
licensing fraud account created in the state treasury;
(d) The avoided taxes and fees shall be deposited and distributed
in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly paid in a
timely fashion.
(5) These provisions shall not apply to the following vehicles:
(a) Electric powered motorized foot scooters;
(b) Electric-assisted bicycles;
(c) Farm vehicles if operated within a radius of fifteen miles of
the farm where principally used or garaged, farm tractors and farm
implements including trailers designed as cook or bunk houses used
exclusively for animal herding temporarily operating or drawn upon the
public highways, and trailers used exclusively to transport farm
implements from one farm to another during the daylight hours or at
night when such equipment has lights that comply with the law;
(d) Spray or fertilizer applicator rigs designed and used
exclusively for spraying or fertilization in the conduct of
agricultural operations and not primarily for the purpose of
transportation, and nurse rigs or equipment auxiliary to the use of and
designed or modified for the fueling, repairing, or loading of spray
and fertilizer applicator rigs and not used, designed, or modified
primarily for the purpose of transportation;
(e) Fork lifts operated during daylight hours on public highways
adjacent to and within five hundred feet of the warehouses which they
serve: PROVIDED FURTHER, That these provisions shall not apply to
vehicles used by the state parks and recreation commission exclusively
for park maintenance and operations upon public highways within state
parks;
(f) "Special highway construction equipment" defined as follows:
Any vehicle which is designed and used primarily for grading of
highways, paving of highways, earth moving, and other construction work
on highways and which is not designed or used primarily for the
transportation of persons or property on a public highway and which is
only incidentally operated or moved over the highway. It includes, but
is not limited to, road construction and maintenance machinery so
designed and used such as portable air compressors, air drills, asphalt
spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders, track laying tractors,
ditchers, leveling graders, finishing machines, motor graders, paving
mixers, road rollers, scarifiers, earth moving scrapers and carryalls,
lighting plants, welders, pumps, power shovels and draglines, self-propelled and tractor-drawn earth moving equipment and machinery,
including dump trucks and tractor-dump trailer combinations which
either (i) are in excess of the legal width, or (ii) which, because of
their length, height, or unladen weight, may not be moved on a public
highway without the permit specified in RCW 46.44.090 and which are not
operated laden except within the boundaries of the project limits as
defined by the contract, and other similar types of construction
equipment, or (iii) which are driven or moved upon a public highway
only for the purpose of crossing such highway from one property to
another, provided such movement does not exceed five hundred feet and
the vehicle is equipped with wheels or pads which will not damage the
roadway surface.
Exclusions:
"Special highway construction equipment" does not include any of
the following:
Dump trucks originally designed to comply with the legal size and
weight provisions of this code notwithstanding any subsequent
modification which would require a permit, as specified in RCW
46.44.090, to operate such vehicles on a public highway, including
trailers, truck-mounted transit mixers, cranes and shovels, or other
vehicles designed for the transportation of persons or property to
which machinery has been attached.
(6) The following vehicles, whether operated solo or in
combination, are exempt from license registration and displaying
license plates as required by this chapter:
(a) A converter gear used to convert a semitrailer into a trailer
or a two-axle truck or tractor into a three or more axle truck or
tractor or used in any other manner to increase the number of axles of
a vehicle. Converter gear includes an auxiliary axle, booster axle,
dolly, and jeep axle.
(b) A tow dolly that is used for towing a motor vehicle behind
another motor vehicle. The front or rear wheels of the towed vehicle
are secured to and rest on the tow dolly that is attached to the towing
vehicle by a tow bar.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.500 and 2003 c 353 s 9, 2003 c 141 s 7, and 2003
c 41 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) No person may drive either a two-wheeled or a three-wheeled
motorcycle, or a motor-driven cycle unless such person has a valid
driver's license specially endorsed by the director to enable the
holder to drive such vehicles.
(2) However, a person sixteen years of age or older, holding a
valid driver's license of any class issued by the state of the person's
residence, may operate a moped without taking any special examination
for the operation of a moped.
(3) No driver's license is required for operation of an electric-assisted bicycle if the operator is at least sixteen years of age.
Persons under sixteen years of age may not operate an electric-assisted
bicycle.
(4) No driver's license is required to operate an electric personal
assistive mobility device or a power wheelchair.
(5) No driver's license is required to operate ((a)) an electric
powered motorized foot scooter. Electric powered motorized foot
scooters may not be operated at any time from a half hour after sunset
to a half hour before sunrise without reflectors of a type approved by
the state patrol.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.61.710 and 2003 c 353 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall operate a moped upon the highways of this state
unless the moped has been assigned a moped registration number and
displays a moped permit in accordance with the provisions of RCW
46.16.630.
(2) No person may operate a motorized foot scooter powered by an
internal combustion engine upon the highways of this state, a bicycle
path or trail, bikeway, equestrian trail, or hiking or recreational
trail.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a moped may not be
operated on a bicycle path or trail, bikeway, equestrian trail, or
hiking or recreational trail.
(((3))) (4) Operation of a moped, electric personal assistive
mobility device, or an electric-assisted bicycle on a fully controlled
limited access highway is unlawful. Operation of a moped or an
electric-assisted bicycle on a sidewalk is unlawful.
(((4))) (5) Removal of any muffling device or pollution control
device from a moped is unlawful.
(((5))) (6) Subsections (1), (((2))) (3), and (((4))) (5) of this
section do not apply to electric-assisted bicycles. Electric-assisted
bicycles and electric powered motorized foot scooters may have access
to highways of the state to the same extent as bicycles. Subject to
subsection (((6))) (7) of this section, electric-assisted bicycles and
electric powered motorized foot scooters may be operated on a
multipurpose trail or bicycle lane, but local jurisdictions may
restrict or otherwise limit the access of electric-assisted bicycles
and electric powered motorized foot scooters, and state agencies may
regulate the use of electric powered motorized foot scooters on
facilities and properties under their jurisdiction and control.
(((6))) (7) Subsections (1) and (((4))) (5) of this section do not
apply to electric powered motorized foot scooters. Subsection (((2)))
(3) of this section applies to electric powered motorized foot scooters
when the bicycle path, trail, bikeway, equestrian trail, or hiking or
recreational trail was built or is maintained with federal highway
transportation funds. Additionally, any new trail or bicycle path or
readily identifiable existing trail or bicycle path not built or
maintained with federal highway transportation funds may be used by
persons operating electric powered motorized foot scooters only when
appropriately signed.
(((7))) (8) A person operating an electric personal assistive
mobility device (EPAMD) shall obey all speed limits and shall yield the
right-of-way to pedestrians and human-powered devices at all times. An
operator must also give an audible signal before overtaking and passing
a pedestrian. Except for the limitations of this subsection, persons
operating an EPAMD have all the rights and duties of a pedestrian.
(((8))) (9) The use of an EPAMD may be regulated in the following
circumstances:
(a) A municipality and the department of transportation may
prohibit the operation of an EPAMD on public highways within their
respective jurisdictions where the speed limit is greater than twenty-five miles per hour;
(b) A municipality may restrict the speed of an EPAMD in locations
with congested pedestrian or nonmotorized traffic and where there is
significant speed differential between pedestrians or nonmotorized
traffic and EPAMD operators. The areas in this subsection must be
designated by the city engineer or designee of the municipality.
Municipalities shall not restrict the speed of an EPAMD in the entire
community or in areas in which there is infrequent pedestrian traffic;
(c) A state agency or local government may regulate the operation
of an EPAMD within the boundaries of any area used for recreation, open
space, habitat, trails, or conservation purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---