BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state's growth management act recognizes
counties are the logical provider of regional services and cities are
the preferred provider of local services within the urban growth area.
This delineation of service roles is meant to ensure that government
services are provided in an efficient and effective manner and is
reflective of the fact that cities have more revenue tools available to
them to provide urban services than do counties. Pursuant to the
growth management act planning requirements set forth in RCW
36.70A.110, counties are required to establish urban growth areas in
collaboration with cities.
In order for urban growth areas to become part of an existing city,
counties, cities, and residents are highly reliant on one tool:
Annexation. Though state law provides for various methods of
annexation, there are many factors which prevent or delay annexation
from occurring.
The transition of urban growth areas to incorporated status is
fundamental to achieving the land use and service vision contemplated
by the growth management act, and enabling counties to focus on their
long-term role as regional service provider and rural service provider.
Therefore, it is in the best interest of the state, counties, cities,
and their residents to study the progress of annexation in the key
urban counties of the state and to identify both barriers and
incentives to achieving full annexation or incorporation of the urban
areas in these counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Subject to legislative funding, the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall conduct
a study to:
(1) Detail the progress in each of the buildable land counties to
date in achieving annexation or incorporation of its urban growth area
since adoption of the county's county-wide planning policies to the
present time by documenting:
(a) The number of acres annexed;
(b) The number of acres incorporated;
(c) The number of residents annexed, incorporated, and remaining in
urban unincorporated areas; and
(d) The characteristic of urban land remaining unincorporated in
terms of assessed value, infrastructure deficits, service needs, land
use, commercial development, and residential development;
(2) Determine the characteristics of remaining urban unincorporated
areas and current statutes, and estimate when all urban unincorporated
areas in each county will be annexed or incorporated, based on the rate
of progress to date;
(3) Survey the counties to identify those obstacles which, in their
experience, slow or prohibit annexation;
(4) Survey the cities in each of the subject counties to identify
obstacles, which in their experience, slow or prohibit annexation;
(5) Survey residents of urban unincorporated areas in each of the
subject counties to identify their attitudes towards annexation or
incorporation;
(6) Propose possible changes to city and county taxing authority
which will serve to aid the transfer of annexation of remaining urban
growth areas in a timely manner;
(7) Identify and discuss the need for funding of capital
improvement projects needed to provide urban levels of service;
(8) Assess the role and statutory authority of the boundary review
board and how altering their role and authority might facilitate
annexation;
(9) Propose possible changes to growth management or annexation
processes which will facilitate annexation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The study in section 2 of this act is not
intended to replicate the requirements to review and evaluate growth as
set forth in RCW 36.70A.215.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall report the findings and results of its study
to the Washington state senate and house of representatives committees
on economic development by November 30, 2004. The department of
community, trade, and economic development may report electronically,
and shall post its report on its web site.

--- END ---