BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state intends to improve the response of
state, local, and private entities to incidents of trafficking in
humans in order to provide better investigations and prosecutions of
such acts and to establish a coordinated and humane system of
identifying the needs of persons who are victimized by these actions in
order to deliver appropriate services in a way that promotes safety and
dignity. The legislature recognizes there are many state agencies and
private organizations that might be called on to provide services to
victims of trafficking of persons and that such victims would be better
served if protocols are developed for training of service delivery
agencies staff and the delivery of services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2004, the director of the office of community
development, or the director's designee, shall within existing
resources convene and chair a work group to develop written protocols
for delivery of services to victims of trafficking of persons. In
addition to the director of the office of community development, the
following shall be members of the work group: The secretary of the
department of health, the secretary of the department of social and
health services, the attorney general, the director of the department
of labor and industries, the commissioner of the employment security
department, a representative of the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys, and three members, selected by the director of
the office of community development from a list submitted by public and
private sector organizations that provide assistance to persons who are
victims of trafficking. The attorney general and the secretaries or
directors may designate a person to serve in their place.
Members of the work group shall serve without compensation.
(2) The protocols must meet all of the following minimum standards:
(a) The protocols must apply to the following state agencies: The
department of health, the department of social and health services, the
attorney general's office, the department of labor and industries, and
the employment security department;
(b) The protocols must provide policies and procedures for
interagency coordinated operations and cooperation with government
agencies and nongovernmental organizations, agencies, and
jurisdictions, including law enforcement agencies and prosecuting
attorneys;
(c) The protocols must include the establishment of a data base
electronically available to all affected agencies which contains the
name, address, and telephone numbers of agencies that provide services
to victims of human trafficking; and
(d) The protocols must provide guidelines for providing for the
social service needs of victims of trafficking of persons, including
housing, health care, and employment.
(3) The protocols shall be reviewed on a biennial basis by the
director of the office of community development to determine whether
revisions are appropriate.
(4) By January 1, 2005, the work group shall finalize the written
protocols and submit them with a report to the legislature and the
governor.

--- END ---