BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.55.020 and 2003 c 404 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A joint legislative oversight committee on trade policy is created,
to consist of four senators and four representatives from the
legislature and three ex officio members. The president of the senate
shall appoint the senate members of the committee, and the speaker of
the house shall appoint the house members of the committee. No more
than two members from each house may be from the same political party.
A list of appointees must be submitted by July 1, 2003, and before the
close of each regular session during an even-numbered year. Vacancies
on the committee will be filled by appointment and must be filled from
the same political party and from the same house as the member whose
seat was vacated. The ex officio members shall be appointed by the
((speaker of the house and the president of the senate)) governor, and
include a representative from the department of agriculture, the state
trade representative, and a representative from the office of the
attorney general.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
April 1, 2004.

--- END ---