BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The fastest growing component of Washington's population is
residents whose primary language is not English. For example,
Washington's Hispanic population is expected to grow by one hundred
fifty percent by the year 2030;
(2) Hispanics and other English as a second language residents have
the lowest high school and college participation and completion rates
in Washington's population;
(3) A considerable body of research indicates that contextual
learning directly related to jobs is the most effective way to reach
students who are not successful in traditional classrooms; and
(4) Research also indicates that combining English as a second
language programs with vocational education programs such as automotive
or information technology is the most effective way to improve
employment and earnings outcomes for English as a second language
students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The college board shall administer a vocational English as a second
language program. Under the program, the college board shall:
(1) Target a portion of funds available from high demand enrollment
appropriations to community and technical college programs that combine
basic skills, English as a second language, and high demand vocational
training programs. The college board shall distribute funds for this
purpose through a competitive grant process;
(2) Provide training to community and technical colleges on best
practices resulting from successful programs;
(3) Work with colleges to develop outreach to English as a second
language residents regarding opportunities in high demand fields.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The board, working with the advisory council on adult education,
shall evaluate the employment and earnings outcomes from the vocational
English as a second language program established in section 2 of this
act and compare the program outcomes to outcomes from other basic
skills, English as a second language, and vocational programs impacting
a similar demographic and economic population.

--- END ---