BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.150 and 1990 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On motion of the prosecuting attorney in a criminal proceeding,
the court may order that a child under the age of ten may testify in a
room outside the presence of the defendant and the jury while one-way
closed-circuit television equipment simultaneously projects the child's
testimony into another room so the defendant and the jury can watch and
hear the child testify if:
(a) The testimony will:
(i) Describe an act or attempted act of sexual contact performed
with or on the child witness by another ((or)) person or with or on a
child other than the child witness by another person;
(ii) Describe an act or attempted act of physical abuse against the
child witness by another person or against a child other than the child
witness by another person; or
(iii) Describe a violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030
committed against a person known by or familiar to the child witness or
by a person known by or familiar to the child witness;
(b) The testimony is taken during the criminal proceeding;
(c) The court finds by substantial evidence, in a hearing conducted
outside the presence of the jury, that requiring the child witness to
testify in the presence of the defendant will cause the child to suffer
serious emotional or mental distress that will prevent the child from
reasonably communicating at the trial. If the defendant is excluded
from the presence of the child, the jury must also be excluded;
(d) As provided in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section, the
court may allow a child witness to testify in the presence of the
defendant but outside the presence of the jury, via closed-circuit
television, if the court finds, upon motion and hearing outside the
presence of the jury, that the child will suffer serious emotional
distress that will prevent the child from reasonably communicating at
the trial in front of the jury, or, that although the child may be able
to reasonably communicate at trial in front of the jury, the child will
suffer serious emotional or mental distress from testifying in front of
the jury. If the child is able to communicate in front of the
defendant but not the jury the defendant will remain in the room with
the child while the jury is excluded from the room;
(e) The court finds that the prosecutor has made all reasonable
efforts to prepare the child witness for testifying, including
informing the child or the child's parent or guardian about community
counseling services, giving court tours, and explaining the trial
process. If the prosecutor fails to demonstrate that preparations were
implemented or the prosecutor in good faith attempted to implement
them, the court shall deny the motion;
(f) The court balances the strength of the state's case without the
testimony of the child witness against the defendant's constitutional
rights and the degree of infringement of the closed-circuit television
procedure on those rights;
(g) The court finds that no less restrictive method of obtaining
the testimony exists that can adequately protect the child witness from
the serious emotional or mental distress;
(h) When the court allows the child witness to testify outside the
presence of the defendant, the defendant can communicate constantly
with the defense attorney by electronic transmission and be granted
reasonable court recesses during the child's testimony for person-to-person consultation with the defense attorney;
(i) The court can communicate with the attorneys by an audio system
so that the court can rule on objections and otherwise control the
proceedings;
(j) All parties in the room with the child witness are on camera
and can be viewed by all other parties. If viewing all participants is
not possible, the court shall describe for the viewers the location of
the prosecutor, defense attorney, and other participants in relation to
the child;
(k) The court finds that the television equipment is capable of
making an accurate reproduction and the operator of the equipment is
competent to operate the equipment; and
(l) The court imposes reasonable guidelines upon the parties for
conducting the filming to avoid trauma to the child witness or abuse of
the procedure for tactical advantage.
The prosecutor, defense attorney, and a neutral and trained
victim's advocate, if any, shall always be in the room where the child
witness is testifying. The court in the court's discretion depending
on the circumstances and whether the jury or defendant or both are
excluded from the room where the child is testifying, may remain or may
not remain in the room with the child.
(2) During the hearing conducted under subsection (1) of this
section to determine whether the child witness may testify outside the
presence of the defendant and/or the jury, the court may conduct the
observation and examination of the child outside the presence of the
defendant if:
(a) The prosecutor alleges and the court concurs that the child
witness will be unable to testify in front of the defendant or will
suffer severe emotional or mental distress if forced to testify in
front of the defendant;
(b) The defendant can observe and hear the child witness by closed-circuit television;
(c) The defendant can communicate constantly with the defense
attorney during the examination of the child witness by electronic
transmission and be granted reasonable court recesses during the
child's examination for person-to-person consultation with the defense
attorney; and
(d) The court finds the closed-circuit television is capable of
making an accurate reproduction and the operator of the equipment is
competent to operate the equipment. Whenever possible, all the parties
in the room with the child witness shall be on camera so that the
viewers can see all the parties. If viewing all participants is not
possible, then the court shall describe for the viewers the location of
the prosecutor, defense attorney, and other participants in relation to
the child.
(3) The court shall make particularized findings on the record
articulating the factors upon which the court based its decision to
allow the child witness to testify via closed-circuit television
pursuant to this section. The factors the court may consider include,
but are not limited to, a consideration of the child's age, physical
health, emotional stability, expressions by the child of fear of
testifying in open court or in front of the defendant, the relationship
of the defendant to the child, and the court's observations of the
child's inability to reasonably communicate in front of the defendant
or in open court. The court's findings shall identify the impact the
factors have upon the child's ability to testify in front of the jury
or the defendant or both and the specific nature of the emotional or
mental trauma the child would suffer. The court shall determine
whether the source of the trauma is the presence of the defendant, the
jury, or both, and shall limit the use of the closed-circuit television
accordingly.
(4) This section does not apply if the defendant is an attorney pro
se unless the defendant has a court-appointed attorney assisting the
defendant in the defense.
(5) This section may not preclude the presence of both the
((victim)) child witness and the defendant in the courtroom together
for purposes of establishing or challenging the identification of the
defendant when identification is a legitimate issue in the proceeding.
(6) The Washington supreme court may adopt rules of procedure
regarding closed-circuit television procedures.
(7) All recorded tapes of testimony produced by closed-circuit
television equipment shall be subject to any protective order of the
court for the purpose of protecting the privacy of the child witness.
(8) Nothing in this section creates a right of the child witness to
a closed-circuit television procedure in lieu of testifying in open
court.
(9) The state shall bear the costs of the closed-circuit television
procedure.
(10) A child witness may or may not be a victim in the proceeding.
(11) Nothing in this section precludes the court from allowing a
child to testify outside the presence of the defendant and the jury,
via closed-circuit television, under other circumstances the court
deems appropriate.

--- END ---