BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.040 and 1999 c 348 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the
powers and duties of the superintendent of public instruction shall be:
(1) To have supervision over all matters pertaining to the public
schools of the state;
(2) To report to the governor and the legislature such information
and data as may be required for the management and improvement of the
schools;
(3) To prepare and have printed such forms, registers, courses of
study, rules for the government of the common schools, and such other
material and books as may be necessary for the discharge of the duties
of teachers and officials charged with the administration of the laws
relating to the common schools, and to distribute the same to
educational service district superintendents;
(4) To travel, without neglecting his or her other official duties
as superintendent of public instruction, for the purpose of attending
educational meetings or conventions, of visiting schools, of consulting
educational service district superintendents or other school officials;
(5) To prepare and from time to time to revise a manual of the
Washington state common school code, copies of which shall be provided
in such numbers as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction at no cost to those public agencies within the common
school system and which shall be sold at approximate actual cost of
publication and distribution per volume to all other public and
nonpublic agencies or individuals, said manual to contain Titles 28A
and 28C RCW, rules related to the common schools, and such other matter
as the state superintendent or the state board of education shall
determine. Proceeds of the sale of such code shall be transmitted to
the public printer who shall credit the state superintendent's account
within the state printing plant revolving fund by a like amount;
(6) To act as ex officio member and the chief executive officer of
the state board of education;
(7) To file all papers, reports and public documents transmitted to
the superintendent by the school officials of the several counties or
districts of the state, each year separately. Copies of all papers
filed in the superintendent's office, and the superintendent's official
acts, may, or upon request, shall be certified by the superintendent
and attested by the superintendent's official seal, and when so
certified shall be evidence of the papers or acts so certified to;
(8) To require annually, on or before the 15th day of August, of
the president, manager, or principal of every educational institution
in this state, a report as required by the superintendent of public
instruction; and it is the duty of every president, manager or
principal, to complete and return such forms within such time as the
superintendent of public instruction shall direct;
(9) To keep in the superintendent's office a record of all teachers
receiving certificates to teach in the common schools of this state;
(10) To issue certificates as provided by law;
(11) To keep in the superintendent's office at the capital of the
state, all books and papers pertaining to the business of the
superintendent's office, and to keep and preserve in the
superintendent's office a complete record of statistics, as well as a
record of the meetings of the state board of education;
(12) With the assistance of the office of the attorney general, to
decide all points of law which may be submitted to the superintendent
in writing by any educational service district superintendent, or that
may be submitted to the superintendent by any other person, upon appeal
from the decision of any educational service district superintendent;
and the superintendent shall publish his or her rulings and decisions
from time to time for the information of school officials and teachers;
and the superintendent's decision shall be final unless set aside by a
court of competent jurisdiction;
(13) To administer oaths and affirmations in the discharge of the
superintendent's official duties;
(14) To deliver to his or her successor, at the expiration of the
superintendent's term of office, all records, books, maps, documents
and papers of whatever kind belonging to the superintendent's office or
which may have been received by the superintendent's for the use of the
superintendent's office;
(15) To administer family services and programs to promote the
state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025;
(16)(a) To intervene at the request of the academic achievement and
accountability commission in school districts that meet the following
criteria:
(i) School districts that are served under Title I of the federal
elementary and secondary education act of 1965, as amended, and in
which a significant proportion of students persistently do not meet
state academic standards; or
(ii) School districts that did not carry out their responsibilities
under subsection (b) of section 1116 of P.L. 107-110, the no child left
behind act of 2001.
(b) The superintendent shall determine, in consultation with
affected school districts, the interventions that are appropriate and
that are in compliance with state law to assist the school district in
removing obstacles and providing support to make the necessary changes
to achieve improvement in student academic performance. Intensity of
interventions shall represent graduated levels of interventions as
identified in RCW 28A.655.010(5);
(17) To perform such other duties as may be required by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.030 and 2002 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The powers and duties of the academic achievement and
accountability commission shall include, but are not limited to the
following:
(1) For purposes of statewide accountability, the commission shall:
(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
writing, science, and mathematics by subject and grade level as the
commission deems appropriate to improve student learning, once
assessments in these subjects are required statewide. The goals shall
be consistent with student privacy protection provisions of RCW
28A.655.090(7) and shall not conflict with requirements contained in
Title I of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965,
as amended. The goals may be established for all students,
economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient
students, students with disabilities, and students from
disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic
backgrounds. The commission may establish school and school district
goals addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction
goals for students in grades seven through twelve. The goals shall be
in addition to any goals adopted in RCW 28A.655.050. The commission
may also revise any goal adopted in RCW 28A.655.050. The commission
shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before each goal is
implemented, the commission shall present the goal to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the
committees' review and comment in a time frame that will permit the
legislature to take statutory action on the goal if such action is
deemed warranted by the legislature;
(b) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the
standard on the Washington assessment of student learning and determine
student scores that identify levels of student performance below and
beyond the standard. The commission shall set such performance
standards and levels in consultation with the superintendent of public
instruction and after consideration of any recommendations that may be
developed by any advisory committees that may be established for this
purpose;
(c) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify successful
schools and school districts and recommend to the superintendent of
public instruction schools and districts to be recognized for two types
of accomplishments, student achievement and improvements in student
achievement. Recognition for improvements in student achievement shall
include consideration of one or more of the following accomplishments:
(i) An increase in the percent of students meeting standards. The
level of achievement required for recognition may be based on the
achievement goals established by the legislature under RCW 28A.655.050
and the commission under (a) of this subsection;
(ii) Positive progress on an improvement index that measures
improvement in all levels of the assessment; and
(iii) Improvements despite challenges such as high levels of
mobility, poverty, English as a second language learners, and large
numbers of students in special populations as measured by either the
percent of students meeting the standard, or the improvement index.
When determining the baseline year or years for recognizing
individual schools, the commission may use the assessment results from
the initial years the assessments were administered, if doing so with
individual schools would be appropriate;
(d) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify schools and
school districts in need of assistance and those in which significant
numbers of students persistently fail to meet state standards. In its
deliberations, the commission shall consider the use of all statewide
mandated criterion-referenced and norm-referenced standardized tests;
(e) Identify schools and school districts in which state
intervention measures will be needed ((and a range of appropriate
intervention strategies, beginning no earlier than June 30, 2001, and
after the legislature has authorized a set of intervention strategies.
Beginning no earlier than June 30, 2001, and after the legislature has
authorized a set of intervention strategies, at the request of the
commission, the superintendent shall intervene in the school or school
district and take corrective actions. This chapter does not provide
additional authority for the commission or the superintendent of public
instruction to intervene in a school or school district));
(f) Identify performance incentive systems that have improved or
have the potential to improve student achievement;
(g) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure
fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially
with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of
public instruction of any improvements needed to the system;
(h) Annually report by December 1st to the legislature, the
governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and the state board
of education on the progress, findings, and recommendations of the
commission. The report may include recommendations of actions to help
improve student achievement;
(i) By December 1, 2000, and by December 1st annually thereafter,
report to the education committees of the house of representatives and
the senate on the progress that has been made in achieving the reading
goal under RCW 28A.655.050 and any additional goals adopted by the
commission;
(j) Coordinate its activities with the state board of education and
the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(k) Seek advice from the public and all interested educational
organizations in the conduct of its work; and
(l) Establish advisory committees, which may include persons who
are not members of the commission;
(2) Holding meetings and public hearings, which may include
regional meetings and hearings;
(3) Hiring necessary staff and determining the staff's duties and
compensation. However, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide staff support to the commission until the
commission has hired its own staff, and shall provide most of the
technical assistance and logistical support needed by the commission
thereafter. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall be the fiscal agent for the commission. The commission may
direct the office of the superintendent of public instruction to enter
into subcontracts, within the commission's resources, with school
districts, teachers, higher education faculty, state agencies, business
organizations, and other individuals and organizations to assist the
commission in its deliberations; and
(4) Receiving per diem and travel allowances as permitted under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.010 and 1993 c 336 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW ((28A.630.885)) 28A.655.030,
28A.655.060, 28A.300.040, and 28A.300.130.
(1) (("Commission" means the commission on student learning created
in RCW 28A.630.885.
(2))) "Student learning goals" ((mean[s])) means the goals
established in RCW 28A.150.210.
(((3))) (2) "Essential academic learning requirements" means more
specific academic and technical skills and knowledge, based on the
student learning goals, as determined under RCW ((28A.630.885))
28A.655.060(3)(a). Essential academic learning requirements shall not
limit the instructional strategies used by schools or school districts
or require the use of specific curriculum.
(((4))) (3) "Performance standards" or "standards" means the
criteria used to determine if a student has successfully learned the
specific knowledge or skill being assessed as determined under RCW
((28A.630.885)) 28A.655.060(3)(b). The standards should be set at
internationally competitive levels.
(((5))) (4) "Assessment system" or "student assessment system"
means a series of assessments used to determine if students have
successfully learned the essential academic learning requirements. The
assessment system shall be developed under RCW ((28A.630.885))
28A.655.060(3)(b).
(5) "Intervene" or "state intervention measures" means any of the
actions listed in (a) through (g) of this subsection taken by the
superintendent of public instruction in a school district or in a
school in consultation with the school district in which a significant
proportion of students persistently do not meet state academic
standards. Interventions described in (a) through (c) of this
subsection are deemed initial interventions and include the
interventions designed to assist the school district in removing
obstacles that are preventing improvements. Initial interventions
shall be implemented when interventions are required. If a significant
proportion of students continue to fail to meet standards,
interventions in (d) through (g) of this subsection shall be
implemented as appropriate.
(a) Jointly develop a school district or specific school
performance agreement after completing an educational audit that
targets improvements needed to support an increase in students meeting
state academic standards;
(b) Instituting and fully implementing a new curriculum in a
specific content area that is based on state and local academic content
and achievement standards;
(c) Providing appropriate professional development based on
scientifically based research for all relevant staff, that offers
substantial promise of improving educational achievement for low-achieving students;
(d) Deferring programmatic funds or reducing administrative funds;
(e) Working in consultation with the local school board, replacing
the school district personnel who are relevant to the failure to make
adequate yearly progress;
(f) Working in consultation with the local school board, removing
particular schools from the jurisdiction of the school district and
establishing alternative arrangements for public governance and
supervision of such schools;
(g) Working in consultation with the local school board,
restructuring the school district.
(6) "Performance-based education system" means an education system
in which a significantly greater emphasis is placed on how well
students are learning, and significantly less emphasis is placed on
state-level laws and rules that dictate how instruction is to be
provided. The performance-based education system does not require that
schools use an outcome-based instructional model. Decisions regarding
how instruction is provided are to be made, to the greatest extent
possible, by schools and school districts, not by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---