BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, the higher education
coordinating board, and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly compile and disseminate to students, parents,
and families information about college pathways, including, but not
limited to, information about minimum entrance eligibility requirements
at each public institution of higher education; general education
course requirements and major program course prerequisites; college
application processes and procedures; links to additional sources of
information about institution-specific admissions deadlines,
requirements, and criteria; and links to information regarding federal
and state financial aid programs. The information shall be provided at
least once annually to students, parents, and families beginning when
the student enters seventh grade and continuing through the twelfth
grade, and shall identify the common school course sequences that
fulfill the minimum college eligibility prerequisites. The information
shall be made available in both paper and electronic formats, and
developed so it can be easily updated.
(2) School districts and schools shall be the primary conduits of
information, and each school district board of directors shall make
provisions to ensure students, parents, and families are provided the
information developed under subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---