BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the operator
of a motorcycle approaching an intersection that is controlled by a
traffic control signal using a vehicle detection device that is
inoperative due to the size of the motorcycle shall come to a full and
complete stop at the intersection and, after exercising due care as
provided by law, may proceed with due caution when it is safe to do so.
It is not a defense to a violation of RCW 46.61.050 that the driver of
a motorcycle proceeded under the belief that a traffic control signal
used a vehicle detection device or was inoperative due to the size of
the motorcycle when the signal did not use a vehicle detection device
or that any such device was not in fact inoperative due to the size of
the motorcycle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---