BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A fee is imposed for the privilege of taking off or landing jet
aircraft at an airport serving more than twenty scheduled jet aircraft
flights per day at an airport operated by a port district in a county
with a population greater than one million. The amount of the excise
tax is equal to two dollars for each take off and two dollars for each
landing.
(2) Moneys collected under this section shall be deposited in the
airport impact mitigation account created in RCW 43.63A.760.
(3) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the fee imposed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---