BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature intends to establish a policy with the goal of
ensuring that the health and well-being of both infants in foster care
and the families providing for their care are protected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of health shall develop recommendations
concerning evidence-based practices for testing for blood-borne
pathogens of children under one year of age who have been placed in
out-of-home care.
(2) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature on the recommendations developed in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section by January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon any placement, the department of social and health
services shall inform each out-of-home care provider if the child to be
placed in that provider's care is infected with a blood-borne pathogen,
if known by the department.
(2) All out-of-home care providers licensed by the department shall
receive training related to blood-borne pathogens, including
prevention, transmission, infection control, treatment, testing, and
confidentiality.
(3) Any disclosure of information related to HIV must be in
accordance with RCW 70.24.105.

--- END ---