BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.44.060 and 1997 c 386 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any person
participating in good faith in the making of a report or cooperating in
an investigation arising as a result of such report pursuant to this
chapter or testifying as to alleged child abuse or neglect in a
judicial proceeding shall in so doing be immune from any liability
arising out of such reporting, cooperating, or testifying under any law
of this state or its political subdivisions, unless the person caused
or allowed the child abuse or neglect to occur.
(b) A person convicted of a violation of subsection (4) of this
section shall not be immune from liability under (a) of this
subsection.
(2) An administrator of a hospital or similar institution or any
physician licensed pursuant to chapters 18.71 or 18.57 RCW taking a
child into custody pursuant to RCW 26.44.056 shall not be subject to
criminal or civil liability for such taking into custody.
(3) Conduct conforming with the reporting requirements of this
chapter shall not be deemed a violation of the confidential
communication privilege of RCW 5.60.060 (3) and (4), 18.53.200 and
18.83.110. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as to supersede
or abridge remedies provided in chapter 4.92 RCW.
(4) A person who, intentionally and in bad faith or maliciously,
knowingly makes a false report of alleged abuse or neglect shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable in accordance with RCW 9A.20.021.

--- END ---