BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many families of
Washington national guard are now, due to a parent being activated and
deployed, forced to manage hardships with fewer financial resources.
Many families affected by activation and deployment need help meeting
their basic family needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is established in the department a military family
assistance program. To the extent of available funds, the department
shall contract with an existing military family assistance program in
Washington state that provides emergency grants to families with
financial hardship due to national guard activation.
(2) The director shall include provisions in its contracts
indicating that any military family assistance program that receives
funds from the department must not engage in discrimination that denies
assistance to a family on the basis of age, gender, race, sexual
orientation, national origin, creed, religion, or presence of a
disability.

--- END ---