BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that engaging
families in decision making when their children are involved in the
child welfare system generally improves the outcomes for children. By
involving families in the decision-making process, it is anticipated
that the number of out-of-home placements can be reduced, as well as
the incidence of behavioral, physical, and mental health problems for
individual children. For those children in out-of-home placements, the
number of placements for individual children, the likelihood of placing
individual children with siblings, and successful reunifications are
expected to improve as a result of family engagement. Based on the
experience in the state where families have been engaged in decision
making, these improved outcomes will result in cost savings to the
state as fewer and less costly services and supports for children and
families are needed.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to encourage and support
meaningful family involvement in the decision making related to
planning for children involved in the child welfare system, in those
instances where family is available and family involvement is in the
best interest of the child.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2005, the department shall:
(a) Consider options for the use of family decision meetings in
cases in which a child is involved in the child welfare system;
(b) Develop strategies for implementing a policy of meaningful
family involvement throughout the state within existing resources; and
(c) Present implementation recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature regarding (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "family decision meeting"
means a family-focused intervention facilitated by dedicated
professional staff that is designed to build and strengthen the natural
caregiving system for the child. Family decision meetings may include,
but are not limited to, family group conferences, family mediation,
family support meetings, or other professionally recognized
interventions that include extended family and rely upon the family to
make shared decisions about planning for its children. The purpose of
the family decision meeting is to establish a plan that provides for
the safety and permanency needs of the child.

--- END ---