BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 An industry cluster is a geographical
grouping of companies, their suppliers, and the institutions that
support them. Industry clusters form around specific features of the
natural or built environment. Industry cluster development allows
Washington's diverse regions to leverage their assets to create greater
prosperity.
Washington's maritime industry cluster is a complex network that
includes ocean carriers, shippers, port facilities and operations,
regional and continental road and rail networks, barge operators,
trucking operators, boat and ship building and repair, cargo
trafficking and traffic management, internal and third-party freight
forwarding services, emerging inland distribution centers and the final
customers. Washington has a number of ports of all sizes and degrees
of utilization, including some of the busiest cargo ports in the United
States. Washington ports handle well in excess of one hundred billion
dollars in trade.
However, there is a great deal of competition from other ports for
much of the off-loading. The pressures on our maritime industry are
growing every day due to stiff market competition, new and emerging
ports, highway and rail infrastructure improvements in other areas, and
waterway and port security.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If appropriated by the legislature, the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall use funding available
for qualified maritime industry consulting services, in consultation
with maritime industry representatives, to study and make
recommendations to establish and implement a Washington maritime
industry function at the department.
(2) Following the receipt of the report in subsection (1) of this
section, the department of community, trade, and economic development
shall develop the Washington maritime industry function, with a focus
on strengthening the maritime cluster in Washington.
(3) Following the development of the Washington maritime industry
function, the department of community, trade, and economic development
shall provide the maritime industry with enhanced knowledge, resources,
and advocacy, by working with federal and state agencies, local
governments, maritime businesses, and maritime organizations to:
(a) Bring potential trading and business partners together;
(b) Identify strategic infrastructure priorities and needs;
(c) Attract key freight services;
(d) Measure performance;
(e) Attract, develop, and retain maritime industry businesses;
(f) Identify and address state and local barriers to maritime
competitiveness utilizing risk-based, cost-beneficial, level playing
field principles; and
(g) Identify work force needs.
(4) The Washington maritime office shall collect and distribute
data regarding the maritime trade and industry. A report summarizing
the data shall be made available annually.

--- END ---