BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.54.010 and 1990 c 295 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Proper utilization of the water resources of this state is
necessary to the promotion of public health and the economic well-being
of the state and the preservation of its natural resources and
aesthetic values. Although water is a renewable resource, its supply
and availability are becoming increasingly limited, particularly during
summer and fall months and dry years when demand is greatest. Growth
and prosperity have significantly increased the competition for this
limited resource. Adequate water supplies are essential to meet the
needs of the state's growing population and economy. At the same time
instream resources and values must be preserved and protected so that
future generations can continue to enjoy them((.));
(b) All citizens of Washington share an interest in the proper
stewardship of our invaluable water resources. To ensure that
available water supplies are managed to best meet both instream and
offstream needs, a comprehensive planning process is essential. The
people of the state have the unique opportunity to work together to
plan and manage our water. Through a comprehensive planning process
that includes the state, Indian tribes, local governments, and
interested parties, it is possible to make better use of available
water supplies and achieve better management of water resources.
Through comprehensive planning, conflicts among water users and
interests can be reduced or resolved. It is in the best interests of
the state that comprehensive water resource planning be given a high
priority so that water resources and associated values can be utilized
and enjoyed today and protected for tomorrow((.));
(c) Diverse hydrologic, climatic, cultural, and socioeconomic
conditions exist throughout the regions of the state. Water resource
issues vary significantly across regions. Comprehensive water resource
planning is best accomplished through a regional planning process
sensitive to the unique characteristics and issues of each region((.));
(d) Comprehensive water resource planning must provide interested
parties adequate opportunity to participate. Water resource issues are
best addressed through cooperation and coordination among the state,
Indian tribes, local governments, and interested parties((.));
(e) The long-term needs of the state require ongoing assessment of
water availability, use, and demand. A thorough inventory of available
resources is essential to water resource management. Current state
water resource data and data management is inadequate to meet changing
needs and respond to competing water demands. Therefore, a state water
resource data program is needed to support an effective water resource
management program. Efforts should be made to coordinate and
consolidate into one resource data system all relevant information
developed by the department of ecology and other agencies relating to
the use, protection, and management of the state's water resources; and
(f) The state must promote the use of reclaimed water where
feasible according to the standards specified in section 7 of this act.
(2) It is the purpose of this chapter to set forth fundamentals of
water resource policy for the state to ((insure)) ensure that waters of
the state are protected and fully utilized for the greatest benefit to
the people of the state of Washington and, in relation thereto, to
provide direction to the department of ecology, other state agencies
and officials, and local government in carrying out water and related
resources programs.
((It is the intent of)) (3) The legislature intends to work closely
with the executive branch, Indian tribes, local government, and
interested parties to ensure that water resources of the state are
wisely managed.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.54.020 and 1997 c 442 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
Utilization and management of the waters of the state shall be
guided by the following general declaration of fundamentals:
(1) Uses of water for domestic, stock watering, industrial,
commercial, agricultural, irrigation, hydroelectric power production,
mining, fish and wildlife maintenance and enhancement, recreational,
and thermal power production purposes, and preservation of
environmental and aesthetic values, and all other uses compatible with
the enjoyment of the public waters of the state, are declared to be
beneficial.
(2) Allocation of waters among potential uses and users shall be
based generally on the securing of the maximum net benefits for the
people of the state. Maximum net benefits shall constitute total
benefits less costs including opportunities lost.
(3) The quality of the natural environment shall be protected and,
where possible, enhanced as follows:
(a) Perennial rivers and streams of the state shall be retained
with base flows necessary to provide for preservation of wildlife,
fish, scenic, aesthetic and other environmental values, and
navigational values. Lakes and ponds shall be retained substantially
in their natural condition. Withdrawals of water which would conflict
therewith shall be authorized only in those situations where it is
clear that overriding considerations of the public interest will be
served.
(b) Waters of the state shall be of high quality. Regardless of
the quality of the waters of the state, all wastes and other materials
and substances proposed for entry into said waters shall be provided
with all known, available, and reasonable methods of treatment prior to
entry. Notwithstanding that standards of quality established for the
waters of the state would not be violated, wastes and other materials
and substances shall not be allowed to enter such waters which will
reduce the existing quality thereof, except in those situations where
it is clear that overriding considerations of the public interest will
be served. Technology-based effluent limitations or standards for
discharges for municipal water treatment plants located on the
Chehalis, Columbia, Cowlitz, Lewis, or Skagit river shall be adjusted
to reflect credit for substances removed from the plant intake water
if:
(i) The municipality demonstrates that the intake water is drawn
from the same body of water into which the discharge is made; and
(ii) The municipality demonstrates that no violation of receiving
water quality standards or appreciable environmental degradation will
result.
(4) The development of multipurpose water storage facilities shall
be a high priority for programs of water allocation, planning,
management, and efficiency. The department, other state agencies,
local governments, and planning units formed under ((section 107 or 108
of this act)) chapter 90.82 RCW shall evaluate the potential for the
development of new storage projects and the benefits and effects of
storage in reducing damage to stream banks and property, increasing the
use of land, providing water for municipal, industrial, agricultural,
power generation, and other beneficial uses, and improving stream flow
regimes for fisheries and other instream uses.
(5) Adequate and safe supplies of water shall be preserved and
protected in potable condition to satisfy human domestic needs.
(6) Multiple-purpose impoundment structures are to be preferred
over single-purpose structures. Due regard shall be given to means and
methods for protection of fishery resources in the planning for and
construction of water impoundment structures and other artificial
obstructions.
(7) Federal, state, and local governments, individuals,
corporations, groups and other entities shall ((be encouraged to))
carry out practices of conservation as they relate to the use of the
waters of the state. In addition to traditional development
approaches, improved water use efficiency and conservation, including
reclaiming and reusing municipal and industrial effluent, shall be
emphasized in the management of the state's water resources and ((in
some cases)) will be a potential new source of water with which to meet
future needs throughout the state.
(8) Development of water supply systems, whether publicly or
privately owned, which provide water to the public generally in
regional areas within the state shall be encouraged. Development of
water supply systems for multiple domestic use which will not serve the
public generally shall be discouraged where water supplies are
available from water systems serving the public.
(9) Full recognition shall be given in the administration of water
allocation and use programs to the natural interrelationships of
surface and ground waters.
(10) Expressions of the public interest will be sought at all
stages of water planning and allocation discussions.
(11) Water management programs, including but not limited to, water
quality, flood control, drainage, erosion control and storm runoff are
deemed to be in the public interest.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.54.180 and 1989 c 348 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Consistent with the fundamentals of water resource policy set forth
in this chapter, state and local governments, individuals,
corporations, groups and other entities shall ((be encouraged to))
carry out water use efficiency and conservation programs and practices
consistent with the following:
(1) Water efficiency and conservation programs ((should)) shall
utilize an appropriate mix of economic incentives, cost share programs,
regulatory programs, and technical and public information efforts.
Programs which encourage voluntary participation are preferred.
(2) Increased water use efficiency ((should receive consideration
as)) and conservation, including reclamation and reuse of municipal and
industrial effluent, shall be considered a potential source of water in
state and local water resource planning processes. In determining the
cost-effectiveness of alternative water sources, consideration
((should)) shall be given to the benefits of conservation, ((waste
water recycling)) including reclamation and reuse of municipal and
industrial effluent, and impoundment of waters.
(3) In determining the cost-effectiveness of alternative water
sources, full consideration should be given to the benefits of storage
which can reduce the damage to stream banks and property, increase the
utilization of land, provide water for municipal, industrial,
agricultural, and other beneficial uses, provide for the generation of
electric power from renewable resources, and improve stream flow
regimes for fishery and other instream uses.
(4) Entities receiving state financial assistance for construction
of water source expansion or acquisition of new sources shall develop,
and implement if cost-effective, a water use efficiency and
conservation element of a water supply plan pursuant to RCW
43.20.230(1).
(5) State programs to improve water use efficiency ((should)) shall
focus on those areas of the state in which water is overappropriated;
areas that experience diminished streamflows or aquifer levels,
including areas with declining fish stocks because of lack of stream
flow; and areas where projected water needs, including those for
instream flows, exceed available supplies.
(6) Existing and future generations of citizens of the state of
Washington ((should)) shall be made aware of the importance of the
state's water resources and the need for wise and efficient use and
development of this vital resource. In order to increase this
awareness, state agencies ((should)) shall integrate public education
on increasing water use efficiency into existing public information
efforts. This effort shall be coordinated with other levels of
government, including local governments and Indian tribes.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.46.005 and 2001 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that, by encouraging the use of reclaimed
water while assuring the health and safety of all Washington citizens
and the protection of its environment, the state of Washington will
continue to use water in the best interests of present and future
generations.
(2) To facilitate the use of reclaimed water as soon as is
practicable, the legislature encourages the cooperative efforts of the
public and private sectors and the use of pilot projects to effectuate
the goals of this chapter. The legislature ((further)) also directs
the department of health and the department of ecology to coordinate
efforts towards developing an efficient and streamlined process for
creating and implementing processes for the use of reclaimed water and
to promote the use of reclaimed water in nonpotable applications as an
alternative to using potable water supplies for these applications.
((It is hereby declared)) (3) The legislature declares that the
people of the state of Washington have a primary interest in the
development of facilities to provide reclaimed water to replace potable
water in nonpotable applications, to supplement existing surface and
ground water supplies, and to assist in meeting the future water
requirements of the state.
(4) The legislature further finds and declares that the utilization
of reclaimed water by local communities for domestic, agricultural,
industrial, recreational, and fish and wildlife habitat creation and
enhancement purposes, including wetland enhancement, will contribute to
the peace, health, safety, and welfare of the people of the state of
Washington. To the extent reclaimed water is appropriate for
beneficial uses, the legislature declares that it should be so used to
preserve potable water for drinking purposes. The legislature also
recognizes that the use of reclaimed water constitutes the development
of new basic water supplies needed for future generations.
(5) The legislature further finds and declares that the use of
reclaimed water is not inconsistent with the policy of antidegradation
of state waters announced in other state statutes, including the water
pollution control act, chapter 90.48 RCW and the water resources act,
chapter 90.54 RCW.
(6) The legislature finds that other states, including California,
Florida, and Arizona, have successfully used reclaimed water to
supplement existing water supplies without threatening existing
resources or public health. The legislature also recognizes that local
governments in this state have developed or are developing programs to
use reclaimed water to supplement their water supplies.
((It is the intent of)) (7) The legislature intends that the
department of ecology and the department of health undertake the
necessary steps to encourage the development of water reclamation
facilities so that reclaimed water may be made available to help meet
the growing water requirements of the state.
(8) The legislature further finds and declares that reclaimed water
facilities are water pollution control facilities as defined in chapter
70.146 RCW and are eligible for financial assistance as provided in
chapter 70.146 RCW. The legislature finds that funding demonstration
projects will ensure the future use of reclaimed water. The
legislature recognizes that demonstration projects in RCW 90.46.110 are
varied in nature and will provide the experience necessary to test
different facets of the standards and refine a variety of technologies
so that water purveyors can begin to use reclaimed water technology in
a more cost-effective manner. The legislature declares that this is
especially critical in smaller cities and communities where the
feasibility for such projects is great, but there are scarce resources
to develop the necessary facilities.
(9) The legislature further finds that the agricultural processing
industry can play a critical and beneficial role in promoting the
efficient use of water by having the opportunity to develop and reuse
agricultural industrial process water from food processing.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.46.040 and 1992 c 204 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of ecology shall, in coordination with the
department of health, adopt a single set of standards, procedures, and
guidelines((, on or before August 1, 1993,)) for land applications of
reclaimed water.
(2) A permit is required for any land application of reclaimed
water. The department of ecology may issue a reclaimed water permit
under chapter 90.48 RCW to the generator of reclaimed water who may
then distribute the water, subject to provisions in the permit
governing the location, rate, water quality, and purpose of use. The
department of ecology shall not issue more than one permit for any
individual land application of reclaimed water to a single generator.
(3) In cases where the department of ecology determines, in land
applications of reclaimed water, that a ((significant)) risk to the
public health exists, the department shall refer the application to the
department of health for review and consultation, and the department of
health may require fees appropriate for review and consultation from
the applicant pursuant to RCW 43.70.250.
(4) A permit under this section for use of reclaimed water may be
issued only to a municipal, quasi-municipal, or other governmental
entity or to the holder of a waste discharge permit issued under
chapter 90.48 RCW.
(5) The authority and duties created in this section are in
addition to any authority and duties already provided in law. Nothing
in this section limits the powers of the state or any political
subdivision to exercise such authority.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.46.120 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 5 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The owner of a wastewater treatment facility that is reclaiming
water with a permit issued under this chapter has the exclusive right
to any reclaimed water generated by the wastewater treatment facility.
Use and distribution of the reclaimed water by the owner of the
wastewater treatment facility is exempt from the permit requirements of
RCW 90.03.250 and 90.44.060. Revenues derived from the reclaimed water
facility shall be used only to offset the cost of operation of the
wastewater utility fund or other applicable source of system-wide
funding.
(2) If the proposed use or uses of reclaimed water are intended to
augment or replace potable water supplies or will create the potential
for the development of additional potable water supplies, such use or
uses shall be considered in the development of the regional water
supply plan or plans addressing potable water supply service by
multiple water purveyors, including water system plans and coordinated
water system plans under chapters 43.20 and 70.116 RCW. The owner of
a wastewater treatment facility that proposes to reclaim water shall be
included as a participant in the development of such regional water
supply plan or plans and water system plans. The water supply planning
activities shall be developed and coordinated to ensure that
opportunities to use reclaimed water are evaluated and that proposals
for construction in public rights of way delineated within the plan
consider infrastructure needed to distribute reclaimed water where
feasible.
(3) Where opportunities for the use of reclaimed water exist within
the period of time addressed by a water supply plan or coordinated
water system plan developed under chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW, these
plans must be developed and coordinated to ensure that opportunities
for reclaimed water are evaluated. The requirements of this subsection
(3) do not apply to water system plans developed under chapter 43.20
RCW for utilities serving less than one thousand service connections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 90.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The state and local governments shall consider replacement of
potable domestic water use with reclaimed water to be feasible when the
potable domestic water is being used in mining, manufacturing, or
industrial processing or for the irrigation of highway rights of way,
parks, golf courses, cemeteries, or other grounds and when the
reclaimed water:
(1) Is available or can be made available at a quality sufficient
to meet the requirements of the intended use;
(2) Is available or can be made available in quantities and at a
rate and pressure sufficient to meet the requirements of the intended
use;
(3) Is available or can be made available at a reasonable cost to
the user;
(4) Can be substituted for potable, domestic quality water in the
intended use without significant adverse environmental impact; and
(5) Can be substituted for potable domestic water quality in the
intended use without impairment of downstream water rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The department of health and the
department of ecology shall review the following issues and make
recommendations to the legislature regarding any statutory or
regulatory changes needed to promote the development of reclaimed water
supplies and the use of reclaimed water in the state. Specifically,
the department of health and the department of ecology shall consider
whether:
(a) Reclaimed water should be declared an alternative water source
for purposes of considering new applications for water rights under
chapter 90.03 RCW when the use of reclaimed water is considered
feasible according to section 7 of this act;
(b) Use of reclaimed water when deemed feasible according to
section 7 of this act should be required as a condition of subdivision
or short subdivision approval under chapter 58.17 RCW;
(c) Reclaimed water should replace use of potable water for
nonpotable water uses when necessary to protect or restore stream
flows, especially in areas with listings of species as threatened or
endangered according to the federal endangered species act, 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 1531 et seq., or in areas in which salmonid stocks are categorized
as critical or depressed under the state salmon and steelhead stock
inventory;
(d) The delegation of responsibilities between the department of
ecology and the department of health are appropriate, or whether such
delegation should be revised;
(e) Any additional incentives, such as tax exemptions or financing,
should be implemented to promote the use of reclaimed water; and
(f) Additional opportunities for using reclaimed water according to
the standards specified in section 7 of this act exist.
(2) The department of health and the department of ecology may form
an advisory committee to assist them in reviewing and making
recommendations regarding the issues identified in subsection (1) of
this section.
(3) The department of health and the department of ecology shall
submit a joint report to the legislature describing the results of this
review and identifying any recommendations for statutory or regulatory
changes. This report shall be submitted to the legislature no later
than December 31, 2004.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2005.

--- END ---