BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 15.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that, to better attain the interdependent
goals of continued existence of farmland and the economic viability of
farms for the future of Washington, state government needs to
affirmatively position itself to take maximum advantage of all
available federal, regional, state, local, and private sources of
funding and programs consistent with achieving these goals.
The legislature finds that there are many other societal,
environmental, and economic goals affecting farmland and on farming
operations as demonstrated by the significant and permanent loss of
agricultural lands and farm operations in many regions of the state.
The legislature finds that a reasonable degree of accommodation can
often be found between agriculture and these other societal,
environmental, and economic pressures but such an accommodation
requires a thorough understanding of the effects and opportunities to
achieve an accommodation without further jeopardizing continued
existence and viability of farms in the process.
Because of this growing understanding, funding for several programs
are being offered by the federal, regional, state, local, and private
sources to enhance the opportunity of farms to exist, farmers to be
economically viable, and farms to provide enhanced fish and wildlife
habitat on private lands while retaining continued agricultural use.
The legislature finds that the competitive marketplace for
agricultural products is becoming more international and that the
continued existence of a viable agricultural sector in Washington state
depends on the feasibility of farms to compete successfully with its
competitors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 15.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The farms for the future of Washington account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Revenues to the account shall consist
of appropriations made by the legislature or other federal, regional,
local, or private funds that are suitable to further the purposes of
section 1 of this act. Only the director or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. Up to five percent of the
funds placed into the account may be used for administrative costs.
State funds appropriated into the account are subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2003 c 403 s 9, 2003 c 313 s 10, 2003
c 191 s 7, 2003 c 148 s 15, 2003 c 92 s 8, and 2003 c 19 s 12 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the farms for the future of Washington account, the
fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game farm alternative
account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion
account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic
facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, and the children's trust fund((, and the investing
in innovation account)). However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---