BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The sum of one million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2005, from the general fund to the state noxious weed control
board for a grant program for controlling Japanese knotweed (Polygonum
cuspidatum). The grants shall be made to local noxious weed control
boards and weed boards.

--- END ---