BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.14C.010 and 1996 c 240 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(2) "Community support systems" means the support that may be
organized through extended family members, friends, neighbors,
religious organizations, community programs, cultural and ethnic
organizations, or other support groups or organizations.
(3) "Family preservation services" means in-home or community-based
services drawing on the strengths of the family and its individual
members while addressing family needs to strengthen and keep the family
together where possible and may include:
(a) Respite care of children to provide temporary relief for
parents and other caregivers;
(b) Services designed to improve parenting skills with respect to
such matters as child development, family budgeting, coping with
stress, health, safety, and nutrition; and
(c) Services designed to promote the well-being of children and
families, increase the strength and stability of families, increase
parents' confidence and competence in their parenting abilities,
promote a safe, stable, and supportive family environment for children,
and otherwise enhance children's development.
Family preservation services shall have the characteristics
delineated in RCW 74.14C.020 (2) and (3).
(4) "Imminent" means a decision has been made by the department
that, without intensive family preservation services, a petition
requesting the removal of a child from the family home will be
immediately filed under chapter 13.32A or 13.34 RCW, or that a
voluntary placement agreement will be immediately initiated.
(5) "Intensive family preservation services" means community-based
services that are delivered primarily in the home, that follow
intensive service models with demonstrated effectiveness in reducing or
avoiding the need for unnecessary imminent out-of-home placement, and
that have all of the characteristics delineated in RCW 74.14C.020 (1)
and (3).
(6) "Out-of-home placement" means a placement in a foster family
home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW ((or
placement in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian,
or legal custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter
74.15 RCW)).
(7) "Paraprofessional worker" means any individual who is trained
and qualified to provide assistance and community support systems
development to families and who acts under the supervision of a
preservation services therapist. The paraprofessional worker is not
intended to replace the role and responsibilities of the preservation
services therapist.
(8) "Preservation services" means family preservation services and
intensive family preservation services that consider the individual
family's cultural values and needs.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.14C.030 and 1996 c 240 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall be the lead administrative agency for
preservation services and may receive funding from any source for the
implementation or expansion of such services. The department shall:
(a) Provide coordination and planning with the advice of the
community networks for the implementation and expansion of preservation
services; and
(b) Monitor and evaluate such services to determine whether the
programs meet measurable standards specified by this chapter and the
department.
(2) The department may: (a) Allow its contractors for preservation
services to use paraprofessional workers when the department and
provider determine the use appropriate. The department may also use
paraprofessional workers, as appropriate, when the department provides
preservation services; and (b) allow follow-up to be provided, on an
individual case basis, when the department and provider determine the
use appropriate.
(3) In carrying out the requirements of this section, the
department shall consult with qualified agencies that have demonstrated
expertise and experience in preservation services.
(4) The department may provide preservation services directly and
shall, within available funds, enter into outcome-based, competitive
contracts with social service agencies to provide preservation
services, provided that such agencies meet measurable standards
specified by this chapter and by the department. The standards shall
include, but not be limited to, satisfactory performance in the
following areas:
(a) The number of families appropriately connected to community
resources;
(b) Avoidance of new referrals accepted by the department for child
protective services or family reconciliation services within one year
of the most recent case closure by the department;
(c) Consumer satisfaction;
(d) For reunification cases, reduction in the length of stay in
out-of-home placement; and
(e) Reduction in the level of risk factors specified by the
department.
(5)(a) The department shall not provide intensive family
preservation services unless it is demonstrated that provision of such
services prevent out-of-home placement in at least seventy percent of
the cases served for a period of at least six months following
termination of services. The department's caseworkers may only provide
preservation services if there is no other qualified entity willing or
able to do so.
(b) Contractors shall demonstrate that provision of intensive
family preservation services prevent out-of-home placement in at least
seventy percent of the cases served for a period of no less than six
months following termination of services. The department may increase
the period of time based on additional research and data. If the
contractor fails to meet the seventy percent requirement the department
may: (i) Review the conditions that may have contributed to the
failure to meet the standard and renew the contract if the department
determines: (A) The contractor is making progress to meet the
standard; or (B) conditions unrelated to the provision of services,
including case mix and severity of cases, contributed to the failure;
or (ii) reopen the contract for other bids.
(c) The department shall cooperate with any person who has a
contract under this section in providing data necessary to determine
the amount of reduction in foster care. For the purposes of this
subsection "prevent out-of-home placement" means that a child who has
been a recipient of intensive family preservation services has not been
placed outside of the home in a foster family home or group care
facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW, other than for a
single, temporary period of time not exceeding fourteen days.
(6) The department shall adopt rules to implement this chapter.

--- END ---