BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent of available funding within the biennial
appropriations act, the department shall make supplemental payments to
nursing facilities. The payments shall be supplemental to the
component rate allocations calculated in accordance with part E of this
chapter, and neither the provisions of part C of this chapter nor the
provisions of part E of this chapter shall apply to these supplemental
payments, except that RCW 74.46.421(4) (a) and (b) shall apply.
(a) The department shall, effective July 1, 2003, and through June
30, 2004, make a retroactive supplemental payment to nursing facilities
to reimburse the full difference between the medicaid proportionate
share of the reported property and liability insurance costs for cost
reports filed for 1999, and the medicaid proportionate share of the
reported property and liability insurance costs for cost reports filed
for 2002.
(b) For the time period beginning January 1, 2004, through June 30,
2005, the department shall make supplemental payments to nursing
facilities that reimburse the full difference between the medicaid
proportionate share of the workers' compensation insurance premiums as
reported in the 1999 cost reports, and the medicaid proportionate share
of the workers' compensation insurance premiums for the 2004 year. The
medicaid proportionate share of the 2004 workers' compensation
insurance premiums, assessed by the department of labor and industries
under chapter 51.16 RCW, shall be determined by using the most current
medicaid occupancy data available to the department of social and
health services and multiplying the composite base rate premium cost
for 2004 for nursing homes as a risk class by employee hours data
available from the department of labor and industries.
(c) By May 1, 2004, after determining the supplemental payment
amounts under (a) and (b) of this subsection, the department shall make
a reasonable estimate as to what appropriated funds would go unspent
toward the weighted average nursing facility payment rates authorized
under the biennial appropriations act for fiscal year 2004, and
distribute, through a rate adjustment effective July 1, 2003, those
remaining funds as an economic trends and conditions factor for the
direct care, therapy care, support services, and operations component
rates.
(d) Beginning on July 1, 2004, the department shall make
supplemental payments to nursing facilities that reimburse the full
difference between the medicaid proportionate share of costs for
property and liability insurance for cost reports filed as of 1999 and
the medicaid proportionate share of costs for property and liability
insurance for cost reports filed for 2003.
(e) By November 1, 2004, after payments under (b) and (d) of this
subsection, the department shall make a reasonable estimate as to what
appropriated funds would go unspent toward the weighted average nursing
facility payment rates authorized under the biennial appropriations act
for fiscal year 2005, and distribute, through a rate adjustment
effective July 1, 2004, those remaining funds as an economic trends and
conditions factor for the direct care, therapy care, support services,
and operations component rates.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---