BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.26.330 and 2002 c 302 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
A signatory may rescind an acknowledgment or denial of paternity by
commencing a court proceeding to rescind before the earlier of:
(1) Sixty days after the effective date ((of the filing)) of the
acknowledgment or denial, as provided in RCW 26.26.315; or
(2) The date of the first hearing in a proceeding to which the
signatory is a party before a court to adjudicate an issue relating to
the child, including a proceeding that establishes support.

--- END ---