BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.59.120 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Either an employer or an exclusive bargaining representative
may declare that an impasse has been reached between them in collective
bargaining and may request the commission to appoint a mediator for the
purpose of assisting them in reconciling their differences and
resolving the controversy on terms which are mutually acceptable. If
the commission determines that its assistance is needed, not later than
five days after the receipt of a request therefor, it shall appoint a
mediator in accordance with rules and regulations for such appointment
prescribed by the commission. The mediator shall meet with the parties
or their representatives, or both, forthwith, either jointly or
separately, and shall take such other steps as he may deem appropriate
in order to persuade the parties to resolve their differences and
effect a mutually acceptable agreement. The mediator, without the
consent of both parties, shall not make findings of fact or recommend
terms of settlement. The services of the mediator, including, if any,
per diem expenses, shall be provided by the commission without cost to
the parties.
(b) Nothing in this subsection (1) shall be construed to prevent
the parties from mutually agreeing upon their own mediation procedure,
and in the event of such agreement, the commission shall not appoint
its own mediator unless failure to do so would be inconsistent with the
effectuation of the purposes and policy of this chapter.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, if the
mediator is unable to effect settlement of the controversy within ten
days after his or her appointment, either party, by written
notification to the other, may request that their differences be
submitted to fact-finding with recommendations, except that the time
for mediation may be extended by mutual agreement between the parties.
(b) Within five days after receipt of the aforesaid written request
for fact-finding, the parties shall select a person to serve as fact-finder and obtain a commitment from that person to serve. If they are
unable to agree upon a fact-finder or to obtain such a commitment
within that time, either party may request the commission to designate
a fact-finder. The commission, within five days after receipt of such
request, shall designate a fact-finder in accordance with rules and
regulations for such designation prescribed by the commission. The
fact-finder so designated shall not be the same person who was
appointed mediator pursuant to subsection (1) of this section without
the consent of both parties.
(c) The fact-finder, within five days after his or her appointment,
shall meet with the parties or their representatives, or both, either
jointly or separately, and make inquiries and investigations, hold
hearings, and take such other steps as he or she may deem appropriate.
For the purpose of such hearings, investigations and inquiries, the
fact-finder shall have the power to issue subpoenas requiring the
attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence.
If the dispute is not settled within ten days after his or her
appointment, the fact-finder shall make findings of fact and recommend
terms of settlement within thirty days after his or her appointment,
which recommendations shall be advisory only.
(((3))) (d) Such recommendations, together with the findings of
fact, shall be submitted in writing to the parties and the commission
privately before they are made public. Either the commission, the
fact-finder, the employer, or the exclusive bargaining representative
may make such findings and recommendations public if the dispute is not
settled within five days after their receipt from the fact-finder.
(((4))) (e) The costs for the services of the fact-finder,
including, if any, per diem expenses and actual and necessary travel
and subsistence expenses, and any other incurred costs, shall be borne
by the commission without cost to the parties.
(((5))) (3) If the parties have not reached agreement by the date
on which the employer must adopt its annual budget in the year in which
the collective bargaining agreement has expired or will expire, the
procedures in this subsection shall apply:
(a) On the day following the required budget adoption date, the
employer must request that the parties' differences be submitted to
fact-finding. Within five days after receipt of the request, the
commission shall designate a fact-finder in accordance with rules
adopted under this section. The fact-finder may not be the same person
who was appointed mediator under subsection (1) of this section or
appointed fact-finder under subsection (2) of this section. Fact-finding shall proceed as provided in subsection (2)(c) and (d) of this
section, except that the fact-finder must make findings of fact and
recommend terms of settlement within fifteen days after his or her
appointment unless the dispute is settled within ten days of the
appointment, and if the dispute is not settled within five days after
the parties' receipt of the fact-finder's report:
(i) The commission must make the parties' final offers and the
fact-finder's recommendations and findings of fact public within five
days after receiving the report; and
(ii) The commission must hold a public hearing to take public
comment on the report within five days after making the report public.
(b) The costs of fact-finding under this subsection, including, if
any, per diem expenses, actual and necessary travel and subsistence
expenses, and any other incurred costs, and the costs of the hearing
conducted by the commission under (a)(ii) of this subsection shall be
borne by the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative in
equal shares.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an
employer and an exclusive bargaining representative from agreeing to
substitute, at their own expense, their own procedure for resolving
impasses in collective bargaining for that provided in this section or
from agreeing to utilize for the purposes of this section any other
governmental or other agency or person in lieu of the commission,
except that an agreement entered into under this subsection must:
(a) Be filed with the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and the office must post the agreement on the office's web
site; and
(b) Provide for settlement of the dispute by the date on which the
employer must adopt its annual budget. If, for any reason, the dispute
is not settled on that date as required, the procedures in subsection
(3) of this section apply.
(((6))) (5) Any fact-finder designated by an employer and an
exclusive representative or the commission for the purposes of this
section shall be deemed an agent of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for an employee or an employee organization,
directly or indirectly, to induce, instigate, encourage, authorize,
ratify, or participate in a strike, including a work slowdown or work
stoppage.
(2) The attorney general must petition the superior court for the
county in which the labor dispute exists to enjoin a strike that occurs
or threatens to occur on any days of the school calendar. The court
shall grant a temporary injunction under this section without requiring
the plaintiff to show that the strike or threatened strike would
irreparably harm the plaintiff, and the plaintiff shall not be required
to post a bond. Failure of an employee or employee organization to
comply with any court order issued under this section shall be punished
as contempt of court.

--- END ---