BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that local skills
centers provide excellent opportunities for high school students to
receive job training as part of the public educational system at no
cost to the student. The legislature further finds that students learn
the technical knowledge and skills to either gain advanced placement in
apprenticeships, technical schools, two-year and four-year colleges and
universities, or go directly to entry-level employment in a vocation.
The legislature recognizes that these centers are extremely valuable
tools for preparing students for future careers and supporting local
businesses and economic development. The legislature finds that
expansion of skills centers will benefit students, businesses, and
local communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct a study of the vocational skills centers in
Washington's public K-12 educational system. The review shall include:
(a) An update on the success of skills centers in assisting high
school students prepare for future jobs, including the utilization of
centers, the types of progress offered in the centers, and the
placement of students;
(b) An analysis of the annual fiscal resources available for these
skills centers, including a breakdown of federal, state, local, and
private funding;
(c) A description and analysis of any conflicts between the
resource requirements of these skills centers and those of the school
districts that are part of the consortium supporting the skills
centers; and
(d) A description and analysis of those factors that both encourage
and discourage student enrollments in the skills centers from
participating school districts.
(2) At a minimum, the committee shall consult with local high
school skills center consortia, the superintendent of public
instruction, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
work force training and education coordinating board, the state
apprenticeship and training council, and the center for career and
technical education.
(3) In conducting this study, the committee may select a sample of
skills centers that reflect regional differences within the state. A
report shall be submitted to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature by March 15, 2005.

--- END ---