BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section provides uniform small works roster provisions to
award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling,
alteration, repair, or improvement of real property that may be used by
state agencies. These provisions may be used in lieu of other
procedures to award contracts for work with an estimated cost of two
hundred thousand dollars or less. The small works roster process may
award contracts using the limited public works process under subsection
(3) of this section.
(2)(a) A state agency may create a single general small works
roster, or may create a small works roster for different specialties or
categories of anticipated work. Where applicable, small works rosters
may make distinctions between contractors based upon different
geographic areas served by the contractor. The small works roster or
rosters shall consist of all responsible contractors who have requested
to be on the list, and where required by law are properly licensed and
registered to perform the work in this state. A state agency
establishing a small works roster or rosters may require eligible
contractors desiring to be placed on a roster or rosters to keep
current records of any applicable licenses, certifications,
registrations, bonding, insurance, or other appropriate matters on file
with the state agency as a condition of being placed on a roster or
rosters. At least once a year, the state agency shall publish in a
newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction a notice of
the existence of the roster or rosters and solicit the names of
contractors for the roster or rosters. In addition, responsible
contractors shall be added to an appropriate roster or rosters at any
time they submit a written request and necessary records. Master
contracts may be required to be signed that become effective when a
specific award is made using a small works roster.
(b) A state agency establishing a small works roster or rosters
shall adopt rules implementing this subsection. Procedures included in
rules adopted by the department of general administration in
implementing this subsection must be included in any rules providing
for a small works roster or rosters that is adopted by another state
agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage in these
activities has been delegated to it by the department of general
administration under chapter 43.19 RCW. An interlocal contract or
agreement between two or more state agencies establishing a small works
roster or rosters to be used by the parties to the agreement or
contract must clearly identify the lead entity that is responsible for
implementing the provisions of this subsection.
(c) Procedures shall be established for securing telephone,
written, or electronic quotations from contractors on the appropriate
small works roster to assure that a competitive price is established
and to award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, as defined in
RCW 43.19.1911. Invitations for quotations shall include an estimate
of the scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as
materials and equipment to be furnished. However, detailed plans and
specifications need not be included in the invitation. This subsection
does not eliminate other requirements for architectural or engineering
approvals as to quality and compliance with building codes. Quotations
may be invited from all appropriate contractors on the appropriate
small works roster. As an alternative, quotations may be invited from
at least five contractors on the appropriate small works roster who
have indicated the capability of performing the kind of work being
contracted, in a manner that will equitably distribute the opportunity
among the contractors on the appropriate roster. However, if the
estimated cost of the work is from one hundred thousand dollars to two
hundred thousand dollars, a state agency that chooses to solicit bids
from less than all the appropriate contractors on the appropriate small
works roster must also notify the remaining contractors on the
appropriate small works roster that quotations on the work are being
sought. The government has the sole option of determining whether this
notice to the remaining contractors is made by: (i) Publishing notice
in a legal newspaper in general circulation in the area where the work
is to be done; (ii) mailing a notice to these contractors; or (iii)
sending a notice to these contractors by facsimile or other electronic
means. For purposes of this subsection (2)(c), "equitably distribute"
means that a state agency soliciting bids may not favor certain
contractors on the appropriate small works roster over other
contractors on the appropriate small works roster who perform similar
services.
(d) A contract awarded from a small works roster under this section
need not be advertised.
(e) Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained
shall be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by
telephone inquiry.
(3) In lieu of awarding contracts under subsection (2) of this
section, a state agency may award a contract for work, construction,
alteration, repair, or improvement projects estimated to cost less than
two hundred thousand dollars using the limited public works process
provided under this subsection. Public works projects awarded under
this subsection are exempt from the other requirements of the small
works roster process provided under subsection (2) of this section and
are exempt from the requirement that contracts be awarded after
advertisement as provided under RCW 39.04.010.
For limited public works projects, a state agency shall solicit
electronic or written quotations from a minimum of three contractors
from the appropriate small works roster and shall award the contract to
the lowest responsible bidder as defined under RCW 43.19.1911. After
an award is made, the quotations shall be open to public inspection and
available by electronic request. A state agency shall attempt to
distribute opportunities for limited public works projects equitably
among contractors willing to perform in the geographic area of the
work. A state agency shall maintain a list of the contractors
contacted and the contracts awarded during the previous twenty-four
months under the limited public works process, including the name of
the contractor, the contractor's registration number, the amount of the
contract, a brief description of the type of work performed, and the
date the contract was awarded. For limited public works projects, a
state agency may waive the payment and performance bond requirements of
chapter 39.08 RCW and the retainage requirements of chapter 60.28 RCW,
thereby assuming the liability for the contractor's nonpayment of
laborers, mechanics, subcontractors, materialmen, suppliers, and taxes
imposed under Title 82 RCW that may be due from the contractor for the
limited public works project, however the state agency shall have the
right of recovery against the contractor for any payments made on the
contractor's behalf.
(4) The breaking of any project into units or accomplishing any
projects by phases is prohibited if it is done for the purpose of
avoiding the maximum dollar amount of a contract that may be let using
the small works roster process or limited public works process.
(5) As used in this section, "state agency" means the department of
general administration, the state parks and recreation commission, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife,
the department of transportation, any institution of higher education
as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated
authority by the department of general administration to engage in
construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration,
improvement, or repair activities.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.04.155 and 2001 c 284 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section provides uniform small works roster provisions to
award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling,
alteration, repair, or improvement of real property that may be used
((by state agencies and)) by any local government that is expressly
authorized to use these provisions. These provisions may be used in
lieu of other procedures to award contracts for such work with an
estimated cost of two hundred thousand dollars or less. The small
works roster process includes the limited public works process
authorized under subsection (3) of this section and any local
government authorized to award contracts using the small works roster
process under this section may award contracts using the limited public
works process under subsection (3) of this section.
(2)(a) ((A state agency or)) An authorized local government may
create a single general small works roster, or may create a small works
roster for different specialties or categories of anticipated work.
Where applicable, small works rosters may make distinctions between
contractors based upon different geographic areas served by the
contractor. The small works roster or rosters shall consist of all
responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list, and where
required by law are properly licensed or registered to perform such
work in this state. A ((state agency or)) local government
establishing a small works roster or rosters may require eligible
contractors desiring to be placed on a roster or rosters to keep
current records of any applicable licenses, certifications,
registrations, bonding, insurance, or other appropriate matters on file
with the ((state agency or)) local government as a condition of being
placed on a roster or rosters. At least once a year, the ((state
agency or)) local government shall publish in a newspaper of general
circulation within the jurisdiction a notice of the existence of the
roster or rosters and solicit the names of contractors for such roster
or rosters. In addition, responsible contractors shall be added to an
appropriate roster or rosters at any time they submit a written request
and necessary records. Master contracts may be required to be signed
that become effective when a specific award is made using a small works
roster.
(b) ((A state agency establishing a small works roster or rosters
shall adopt rules implementing this subsection.)) A local government
establishing a small works roster or rosters shall adopt an ordinance
or resolution implementing this subsection. ((Procedures included in
rules adopted by the department of general administration in
implementing this subsection must be included in any rules providing
for a small works roster or rosters that is adopted by another state
agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage in these
activities has been delegated to it by the department of general
administration under chapter 43.19 RCW.)) An interlocal contract or
agreement between two or more ((state agencies or)) local governments
establishing a small works roster or rosters to be used by the parties
to the agreement or contract must clearly identify the lead entity that
is responsible for implementing the provisions of this subsection.
(c) Procedures shall be established for securing telephone,
written, or electronic quotations from contractors on the appropriate
small works roster to assure that a competitive price is established
and to award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, as defined in
RCW 43.19.1911. Invitations for quotations shall include an estimate
of the scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as
materials and equipment to be furnished. However, detailed plans and
specifications need not be included in the invitation. This subsection
does not eliminate other requirements for architectural or engineering
approvals as to quality and compliance with building codes. Quotations
may be invited from all appropriate contractors on the appropriate
small works roster. As an alternative, quotations may be invited from
at least five contractors on the appropriate small works roster who
have indicated the capability of performing the kind of work being
contracted, in a manner that will equitably distribute the opportunity
among the contractors on the appropriate roster. However, if the
estimated cost of the work is from one hundred thousand dollars to two
hundred thousand dollars, a ((state agency or)) local government, other
than a port district, that chooses to solicit bids from less than all
the appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster must
also notify the remaining contractors on the appropriate small works
roster that quotations on the work are being sought. The government
has the sole option of determining whether this notice to the remaining
contractors is made by: (i) Publishing notice in a legal newspaper in
general circulation in the area where the work is to be done; (ii)
mailing a notice to these contractors; or (iii) sending a notice to
these contractors by facsimile or other electronic means. For purposes
of this subsection (2)(c), "equitably distribute" means that a ((state
agency or)) local government soliciting bids may not favor certain
contractors on the appropriate small works roster over other
contractors on the appropriate small works roster who perform similar
services.
(d) A contract awarded from a small works roster under this section
need not be advertised.
(e) Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained
shall be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by
telephone inquiry.
(3) In lieu of awarding contracts under subsection (2) of this
section, ((a state agency or)) an authorized local government may award
a contract for work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement
projects (([projects])) estimated to cost less than thirty-five
thousand dollars using the limited public works process provided under
this subsection. Public works projects awarded under this subsection
are exempt from the other requirements of the small works roster
process provided under subsection (2) of this section and are exempt
from the requirement that contracts be awarded after advertisement as
provided under RCW 39.04.010.
For limited public works projects, ((a state agency or)) an
authorized local government shall solicit electronic or written
quotations from a minimum of three contractors from the appropriate
small works roster and shall award the contract to the lowest
responsible bidder as defined under RCW 43.19.1911. After an award is
made, the quotations shall be open to public inspection and available
by electronic request. ((A state agency or)) An authorized local
government shall attempt to distribute opportunities for limited public
works projects equitably among contractors willing to perform in the
geographic area of the work. ((A state agency or)) An authorized local
government shall maintain a list of the contractors contacted and the
contracts awarded during the previous twenty-four months under the
limited public works process, including the name of the contractor, the
contractor's registration number, the amount of the contract, a brief
description of the type of work performed, and the date the contract
was awarded. For limited public works projects, ((a state agency or))
an authorized local government may waive the payment and performance
bond requirements of chapter 39.08 RCW and the retainage requirements
of chapter 60.28 RCW, thereby assuming the liability for the
contractor's nonpayment of laborers, mechanics, subcontractors,
materialmen, suppliers, and taxes imposed under Title 82 RCW that may
be due from the contractor for the limited public works project,
however the ((state agency or)) authorized local government shall have
the right of recovery against the contractor for any payments made on
the contractor's behalf.
(4) The breaking of any project into units or accomplishing any
projects by phases is prohibited if it is done for the purpose of
avoiding the maximum dollar amount of a contract that may be let using
the small works roster process or limited public works process.
(((5) As used in this section, "state agency" means the department
of general administration, the state parks and recreation commission,
the department of natural resources, the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of transportation, any institution of higher
education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency
delegated authority by the department of general administration to
engage in construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration,
improvement, or repair activities.))

--- END ---