BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.12 RCW
to read as follows:
For consumer protection purposes, vehicle ownership documents
should disclose whether motor vehicles have been previously used under
circumstances that allowed the vehicle to be operated by multiple
drivers or damaged in a collision.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.12.050 and 1996 c 26 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department, if satisfied from the statements upon the
application that the applicant is the legal owner of the vehicle or
otherwise entitled to have a certificate of ownership thereof in the
applicant's name, shall issue an appropriate electronic record of
ownership or a written certificate of ownership, over the director's
signature, authenticated by seal, and if required, a new written
certificate of license registration if certificate of license
registration is required.
The certificates of ownership and the certificates of license
registration shall contain upon the face thereof, the date of
application, the registration number assigned to the registered owner
and to the vehicle, the name and address of the registered owner and
legal owner, the vehicle identification number, and such other
description of the vehicle and facts as the department shall require((,
and)). In addition ((thereto)), facts relating to prior condition,
ownership, or use must be clearly shown on the certificates if the
vehicle described in such certificates ((shall have)) has ever been:
(1) Licensed ((and)) or operated as any of the following: (a) An
exempt vehicle ((or)) under RCW 46.16.020; (b) a for hire vehicle as
defined in RCW 46.72.010 or a taxicab((,)); (c) a rental vehicle; (d)
a leased vehicle; (e) a fleet vehicle; (f) a dealership demonstration
vehicle; (g) a service loaner vehicle; or (h) a repossessed vehicle; or
(2) If it has been rebuilt after becoming a salvage vehicle((, such
fact shall be clearly shown thereon)) or has been repaired after being
damaged in a collision.
All certificates of ownership of motor vehicles issued after April
30, 1990, shall reflect the odometer reading as provided by the
odometer disclosure statement submitted with the title application
involving a transfer of ownership.
A blank space shall be provided on the face of the certificate of
license registration for the signature of the registered owner.
Upon issuance of the certificate of license registration and
certificate of ownership and upon any reissue thereof, the department
shall deliver the certificate of license registration to the registered
owner and the certificate of ownership to the legal owner, or both to
the person who is both the registered owner and legal owner.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.12.005 and 2002 c 245 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) The words "delivery," "notice," "send," and "security interest"
have the same meaning as these terms are defined in RCW 62A.1-201; the
word "secured party" has the same meaning as this term is defined in
RCW 62A.9A-102.
(2) "Dealership demonstration vehicle" means a vehicle offered by
a motor vehicle dealer to prospective customers to operate for
demonstration purposes or vehicles provided by motor vehicle dealers to
their sales staff, without charge, for any personal or business reason
other than, or in addition to, the mere display of the vehicles to
prospective purchasers.
(3) "Fleet vehicle" means a vehicle that has been operated in mass
by a corporation or institution.
(4) "Leased vehicle" means a vehicle owned by a person, firm, or
corporation that, under the terms of a lease, grants the legal right of
possession, control of, and responsibility for the operation of the
vehicle to another person, firm, or corporation.
(5) "Rental vehicle" means a vehicle that is owned and used solely
by a vehicle rental business for rental to others, without a driver
provided by the vehicle rental business, for periods of not more than
thirty consecutive days.
(6) "Repossessed vehicle" means a vehicle in which the interest of
the owner was lawfully terminated or sold under the terms of a security
agreement.
(7) "Salvage vehicle" means a vehicle whose certificate of
ownership has been surrendered to the department under RCW 46.12.070
due to the vehicle's destruction or declaration as a total loss or for
which there is documentation indicating that the vehicle has been
declared salvage or has been damaged to the extent that the owner, an
insurer, or other person acting on behalf of the owner, has determined
that the cost of parts and labor plus the salvage value has made it
uneconomical to repair the vehicle. The term does not include a motor
vehicle having a model year designation of a calendar year that is at
least six years before the calendar year in which the vehicle was
wrecked, destroyed, or damaged, unless, after June 13, 2002, and
immediately before the vehicle was wrecked, destroyed, or damaged, the
vehicle had a retail fair market value of at least the then market
value threshold amount and has a model year designation of a calendar
year not more than twenty years before the calendar year in which the
vehicle was wrecked, destroyed, or damaged. "Market value threshold
amount" means six thousand five hundred dollars or such greater amount
as is then in effect by rule of the department in accordance with this
section. If, for any year beginning with 2002, the Consumer Price
Index for All Urban Consumers, compiled by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics, United States Department of Labor, or its successor, for
the West Region, in the expenditure category "used cars and trucks,"
shows an increase in the annual average for that year compared to that
of the year immediately prior, the department shall, by rule, increase
the then market value threshold amount by the same percentage as the
percentage increase of the annual average, with the increase of the
market value threshold amount to be effective on July 1st of the year
immediately after the year with the increase of the annual average.
However, the market value threshold amount may not be increased if the
amount of the increase would be less than fifty dollars, and each
increase of the market value threshold amount will be rounded to the
nearest ten dollars. If an increase in the market value threshold
amount is not made because the increase would be less than fifty
dollars, the unmade increase will be carried forward and added to later
year calculations of increase until the unmade increase is included in
an increase made to the market value threshold amount.
(8) "Service loaner vehicle" means a vehicle rented or loaned to
customers by an automotive repair business while the customer's vehicle
is under repair.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2005.

--- END ---