BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that
important safety projects take higher priority over relocating the
Keystone ferry terminal. The ferry system is currently operating
vessels that can access the current terminal location and any new boats
planned for construction can be constructed so that they can access the
current location, making relocation of the terminal unnecessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to Title 47 RCW to
read as follows:
Any funding that is identified for the relocation of the Keystone
ferry terminal is to be used to construct an interchange at state route
number 16 and Burley-Olalla road. This includes funding identified in
the current biennium as well as funding identified in future biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires on completion of an
interchange at state route number 16 and Burley-Olalla road as
certified by the department of transportation to the legislative
transportation committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---