BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.309 and 1971 ex.s. c 308 s 69.50.309 are each
amended to read as follows:
A person to whom or for whose use any controlled substance has been
prescribed, sold, or dispensed by a practitioner, and the owner of any
animal for which such controlled substance has been prescribed, sold,
or dispensed may lawfully possess it only in the container in which it
was delivered to him or her by the person selling or dispensing the
same, except that a person may store controlled substances that he or
she uses regularly in a different container for purposes of scheduling
uses or ease of storage while traveling.

--- END ---