BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state laws and
rules have burdened schools and school districts and absorbed too much
time and funding that should have been devoted to student learning.
The legislature intends to give districts the greatest possible
flexibility so the districts may focus their efforts on helping
children reach the state's academic standards and become well-educated
citizens who can make positive contributions to their families and
communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Subject to the conditions set forth in this
section, if approved by the board of school directors, a school
district is exempt from all state statutes and rules applicable to
school districts and school district boards of directors. Any board of
school directors exercising this authority shall:
(1) Implement a quality management system and conduct annual self-assessments;
(2) Comply with state and federal health, safety, parents' rights,
civil rights, and nondiscrimination laws, including, but not limited
to, the family educational rights and privacy act (20 U.S.C. 1232g),
chapter 28A.640 RCW (sexual equality), and Title IX of the education
amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) applicable to school
districts, and to the same extent as school districts;
(3) Participate in free and reduced priced meal programs to the
same extent as is required for other public schools;
(4) Participate in nationally normed standardized achievement tests
required in RCW 28A.230.190, 28A.230.193, and 28A.230.230 and the
elementary, middle school, and high school standards, requirements, and
assessment examinations required in chapter 28A.655 RCW;
(5) Employ certificated instructional staff as required in RCW
28A.410.010, however schools may hire noncertificated instructional
staff of unusual competence and in exceptional cases as specified in
RCW 28A.150.260;
(6) Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW
28A.400.303;
(7) Be subject to financial examinations and audits as determined
by the state auditor, including annual audits for legal and fiscal
compliance;
(8) Be subject to independent performance audits by a qualified
contractor selected jointly by the state auditor and the joint
legislative audit and review committee beginning at the conclusion of
the third year of the school's operation, and at least once every three
years thereafter; however, a school is not required to bear the expense
of the audits;
(9) Comply with the annual performance report under RCW
28A.655.110;
(10) Follow the performance improvement goals and requirements
adopted by the academic achievement and accountability commission by
rule under RCW 28A.655.030;
(11) Be subject to the accountability requirements of the federal
no child left behind act of 2001, including Title I requirements;
(12) Comply with and be subject to the requirements under the
individuals with disabilities education act, as amended in 1997;
(13) Comply with and be subject to the requirements under the
federal educational rights and privacy act;
(14) Comply with the open public meetings act in chapter 42.30 RCW
and open public records requirements in RCW 42.17.250;
(15) Be subject to and comply with legislation enacted after the
effective date of this section governing the operation and management
of schools;
(16) Conduct annual self assessments of its quality management
program;
(17) Comply with public disclosure requirements and with the
reporting requirements in RCW 42.17.240; and
(18) Comply with the requirements of chapter 28A.200 RCW, the high
school options program under chapter 28A.600 RCW, and student choice
options under RCW 28A.225.220 through 28A.225.230.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The legislative ad hoc committee on
educational flexibility and local determination is created. The
committee shall be composed of four members of the legislature, four
principals selected by a statewide organization representing
principals, four superintendents selected by a statewide organization
representing superintendents, one member of the state board of
education, and the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee. Of the legislative members, two members,
one from each major caucus, shall be selected by the speaker of the
house of representatives and two members, one from each major caucus,
shall be selected by the president of the senate.
(2) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by senate
committee services and the office of program research. Technical and
logistical support may be provided by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction and the organizations selecting committee
members.
(3) Legislative members of the ad hoc committee shall receive per
diem and travel under RCW 44.04.120.
(4) Travel and other expenses of nonlegislative members of the ad
hoc committee shall be provided by the agency, association, or
organization that appointed the member.
(5) The ad hoc committee shall review state laws and rules referred
to in section 2 of this act with the goal of simplifying and
streamlining the remaining requirements so that public schools:
(a) Have the flexibility to operate effectively;
(b) Can spend as much of their funding as possible in the
classroom;
(c) Improve student learning; and
(d) Are returned to community control. The ad hoc committee shall
report to the legislature with its findings and recommendations by
November 1, 2005.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 2 and 3 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect September
1, 2004.

--- END ---