BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A deed of trust may not be foreclosed during, or within ninety
days after, a service member's period of deployment.
(2) A trustee's sale, foreclosure, or seizure of property under
this chapter is not valid if made during, or within ninety days after,
the period of the service member's deployment.
(3) This section applies only to a service member's obligation on
real property purchased before the period of the service member's
deployment and for which the service member is still obligated.
(4) For purposes of this section, "service member" includes a
member of each of the armed forces, including the national guard and
armed forces reserves.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.56.020 and 1996 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county treasurer shall be the receiver and collector of all
taxes extended upon the tax rolls of the county, whether levied for
state, county, school, bridge, road, municipal or other purposes, and
also of all fines, forfeitures or penalties received by any person or
officer for the use of his or her county. All taxes upon real and
personal property made payable by the provisions of this title shall be
due and payable to the treasurer on or before the thirtieth day of
April and, except as provided in this section, shall be delinquent
after that date.
(2) Each tax statement shall include a notice that checks for
payment of taxes may be made payable to "Treasurer of . . . . . .
County" or other appropriate office, but tax statements shall not
include any suggestion that checks may be made payable to the name of
the individual holding the office of treasurer nor any other
individual.
(3) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on personal
property or on any lot, block or tract of real property payable by one
person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax be paid on
or before the thirtieth day of April, the remainder of such tax shall
be due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October
following and shall be delinquent after that date.
(4) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on any lot,
block or tract of real property or on any mobile home payable by one
person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax be paid
after the thirtieth day of April but before the thirty-first day of
October, together with the applicable interest and penalty on the full
amount of tax payable for that year, the remainder of such tax shall be
due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October following
and shall be delinquent after that date.
(5) Delinquent taxes under this section are subject to interest at
the rate of twelve percent per annum computed on a monthly basis on the
full year amount of tax unpaid from the date of delinquency until paid.
Interest shall be calculated at the rate in effect at the time of
payment of the tax, regardless of when the taxes were first delinquent.
In addition, delinquent taxes under this section are subject to
penalties as follows:
(a) A penalty of three percent of the full year amount of tax
unpaid shall be assessed on the tax delinquent on June 1st of the year
in which the tax is due.
(b) An additional penalty of eight percent shall be assessed on the
amount of tax delinquent on December 1st of the year in which the tax
is due.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section notwithstanding, no interest or
penalties may be assessed for the period April 30, ((1996)) 2003,
through ((December 31, 1996)) April 30, 2005, on delinquent taxes
imposed ((in 1995)) for collection in ((1996)) 2003 or 2004 which are
imposed on the personal residences owned by military personnel who
participated in the situation known as "((Joint Endeavor)) Operation
Enduring Freedom."
(7) For purposes of this chapter, "interest" means both interest
and penalties.
(8) All collections of interest on delinquent taxes shall be
credited to the county current expense fund; but the cost of
foreclosure and sale of real property, and the fees and costs of
distraint and sale of personal property, for delinquent taxes, shall,
when collected, be credited to the operation and maintenance fund of
the county treasurer prosecuting the foreclosure or distraint or sale;
and shall be used by the county treasurer as a revolving fund to defray
the cost of further foreclosure, distraint and sale for delinquent
taxes without regard to budget limitations.

--- END ---