BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of the board is to:
(1) Develop a statewide strategic master plan for higher education
and continually monitor state and institution progress in meeting the
vision, goals, priorities, and strategies articulated in the plan;
(2) Based on objective data analysis, develop and recommend
statewide policies to enhance the availability, quality, efficiency,
and accountability of public higher education in Washington state;
(3) Administer state and federal financial aid and other education
services programs in a cost-effective manner;
(4) Serve as an advocate on behalf of students and the overall
system of higher education to the governor, the legislature, and the
public;
(5) Represent the broad public interest above the interests of the
individual colleges and universities; and
(6) Coordinate with the governing boards of the two and four-year
institutions of higher education, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the work force training and education coordinating
board, and the superintendent of public instruction to create a
seamless system of public education for the citizens of Washington
state geared toward student success.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.80.380 and 1985 c 370 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The board shall establish advisory committees composed of members
representing faculty, administrators, students, regents and trustees,
and staff of the public institutions, the superintendent of public
instruction, and the independent institutions.)) The board shall
establish an advisory council consisting of the executive director of
the state board for community and technical colleges, the executive
director of the work force training and education coordinating board,
the chair of the council of presidents, and the superintendent of
public instruction. The advisory council shall also include the
following members who shall serve a two-year term: One faculty member
of a four-year institution appointed by the council of faculty
representatives, one faculty member of a community or technical college
appointed by the state board for community and technical colleges, and
one president of a four-year independent institution appointed by the
board chair based on recommendations from the independent institutions.
The board shall meet with the advisory council at least quarterly and
shall seek advice from the council regarding the board's discharge of
its statutory responsibilities.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.80.400 and 2002 c 129 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The members of the board, except the chair serving on June 13,
2002, and the student member, shall serve for terms of four years, the
terms expiring on June 30th of the fourth year of the term except that
in the case of initial members, two shall be appointed to two-year
terms, three shall be appointed to three-year terms, and three shall be
appointed to four-year terms. The student member shall hold his or her
office for a term of one year from the first day of July. The chair
serving on June 13, 2002, shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.80.430 and 1987 c 330 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall employ a director and may delegate agency
management to the director. The director shall serve at the pleasure
of the board, shall be the executive officer of the board, and shall,
under the board's supervision, administer the provisions of this
chapter. The executive director shall, with the approval of the board:
(1) Employ necessary deputy and assistant directors and other exempt
staff under chapter ((28B.16)) 41.06 RCW who shall serve at his or her
pleasure on such terms and conditions as he or she determines and (2)
subject to the provisions of chapter ((28B.16)) 41.06 RCW, appoint and
employ such other employees as may be required for the proper discharge
of the functions of the board. The executive director shall exercise
such additional powers, other than rule making, as may be delegated by
the board by resolution. In fulfilling the duties under this chapter,
the board shall make extensive use of those state agencies with
responsibility for implementing and supporting postsecondary education
plans and policies including but not limited to appropriate legislative
groups, the postsecondary education institutions, the office of
financial management, the ((commission for vocational education)) work
force training and education coordinating board, and the state board
for community ((college education)) and technical colleges. Outside
consulting and service agencies may also be employed. The board may
compensate these groups and consultants in appropriate ways.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.80.200 and 1985 c 370 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board is designated as the state
commission as provided for in Section 1202 of the education amendments
of 1972 (Public Law 92-318), as now or hereafter amended; and shall
perform such functions as is necessary to comply with federal
directives pertaining to the provisions of such law((: PROVIDED, That
notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28B.80.050, all members of the
board shall have full voting powers in taking actions related to
federal postsecondary educational planning functions as provided for in
this section and RCW 28B.80.210 through 28B.80.240)).

PART II
POLICY AND PLANNING
Sec. 6 RCW 28B.80.345 and 2003 c 130 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall develop a statewide strategic master plan for
higher education that proposes a vision and identifies goals and
priorities for the system of higher education in Washington state. The
plan shall encompass all sectors of higher education, including the
two-year system, work force training, the four-year institutions, and
financial aid. The board shall also specify strategies for maintaining
and expanding access, affordability, quality, efficiency, and
accountability among the various institutions of higher education.
(2) In developing the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education, the board shall collaborate with the four-year institutions
of higher education including the council of presidents, the community
and technical college system, and, when appropriate, the work force
training and education coordinating board, the superintendent of public
instruction, and the independent higher education institutions. The
board shall identify and utilize models of regional planning and
decision making before initiating a statewide planning process. The
board shall also seek input from students, faculty organizations,
community and business leaders in the state, members of the
legislature, and the governor.
(3) As a foundation for the statewide strategic master plan for
higher education, the board shall ((develop and establish)) review role
and mission statements for each of the four-year institutions of higher
education and the community and technical college system. ((The board
shall determine whether certain major lines of study or types of
degrees, including applied degrees or research-oriented degrees, shall
be assigned uniquely to some institutions or institutional sectors in
order to create centers of excellence that focus resources and
expertise)) The purpose of the review is to ensure institutional roles
and missions are aligned with the overall state vision and priorities
for higher education.
(4) In assessing needs of the state's higher education system, the
board may consider and analyze the following information:
(a) Demographic, social, economic, and technological trends and
their impact on service delivery;
(b) The changing ethnic composition of the population and the
special needs arising from those trends;
(c) Business and industrial needs for a skilled work force;
(d) College attendance, retention, transfer, and dropout rates;
(e) Needs and demands for basic and continuing education and
opportunities for lifelong learning by individuals of all age groups;
and
(f) Needs and demands for access to higher education by placebound
students and individuals in heavily populated areas underserved by
public institutions.
(5) The statewide strategic master plan for higher education shall
include, but not be limited to, the following:
(a) Recommendations based on enrollment forecasts and analysis of
data about demand for higher education, and policies and actions to
meet those needs;
(b) State or regional priorities for new or expanded degree
programs or off-campus programs, including what models of service
delivery may be most cost-effective;
(c) Recommended policies or actions to improve the efficiency of
student transfer and graduation or completion;
(d) State or regional priorities for addressing needs in high-demand fields where enrollment access is limited and employers are
experiencing difficulty finding enough qualified graduates to fill job
openings;
(e) Recommended tuition and fees policies and levels; and
(f) Priorities and recommendations on financial aid.
(6) The board shall present the vision, goals, priorities, and
strategies in the statewide strategic master plan for higher education
in a way that provides guidance for institutions, the governor, and the
legislature to make further decisions regarding institution-level
plans, policies, legislation, and operating and capital funding for
higher education. In the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education, the board shall recommend specific actions to be taken and
identify measurable performance indicators and benchmarks for gauging
progress toward achieving the goals and priorities.
(7) Every four years by December 15th, beginning December 15, 2003,
the board shall submit an interim statewide strategic master plan for
higher education to the governor and the legislature. The interim plan
shall reflect the expectations and policy directions of the legislative
higher education and fiscal committees, and shall provide a timely and
relevant framework for the development of future budgets and policy
proposals. The legislature shall, by concurrent resolution, approve or
recommend changes to the interim plan, following public hearings. The
board shall submit the final plan, incorporating legislative changes,
to the governor and the legislature by June of the year in which the
legislature approves the concurrent resolution. The plan shall then
become state higher education policy unless legislation is enacted to
alter the policies set forth in the plan. The board shall report
annually to the governor and the legislature on the progress being made
by the institutions of higher education and the state to implement the
strategic master plan.
(8) Each four-year institution shall develop an institution-level
strategic plan that implements the vision, goals, priorities, and
strategies within the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education based on the institution's role and mission. Institutional
strategic plans shall also contain measurable performance indicators
and benchmarks for gauging progress toward achieving the goals and
priorities. The board shall review the institution-level plans to
ensure the plans are aligned with and implement the statewide strategic
master plan for higher education and shall periodically monitor
institutions' progress toward achieving the goals and priorities within
their plans.
(9) The board shall also review the comprehensive master plan
prepared by the state board for community and technical colleges for
the community and technical college system under RCW 28B.50.090 to
ensure the plan is aligned with and implements the statewide strategic
master plan for higher education.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.80.330 and 2003 c 130 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall ((perform the following planning duties in
consultation)) collaborate with the four-year institutions including
the council of presidents, the community and technical college system,
and when appropriate the work force training and education coordinating
board, the superintendent of public instruction, and the independent
higher educational institutions((:
(1) Review, evaluate, and make recommendations on operating and
capital budget requests from four-year institutions and the community
and technical college system, based on how the budget requests align
with and implement the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education under RCW 28B.80.345;
(a))) to identify budget priorities and levels of funding for
higher education, including the two and four-year institutions of
higher education and state financial aid programs. It is the intent of
the legislature that recommendations from the board reflect not merely
the sum of budget requests from multiple institutions, but prioritized
funding needs for the overall system of higher education.
(2) By December of each odd-numbered year, the board shall
distribute guidelines which outline the board's ((fiscal)) budget
priorities to the institutions and the state board for community and
technical colleges. The institutions and the state board for community
and technical colleges shall submit ((an outline of)) their proposed
budgets, identifying major components, to the board no later than
August 1st of each even-numbered year.
(3) The board shall review and evaluate the operating and capital
budget requests from four-year institutions and the community and
technical college system based on how the requests align with the
board's budget priorities, the missions of the institutions, and the
statewide strategic master plan for higher education under RCW
28B.80.345 (as recodified by this act).
(4) The board shall submit recommendations on the proposed budgets
and on the board's budget priorities to the office of financial
management before November 1st of each even-numbered year, and to the
legislature by January 1st of each odd-numbered year((;
(b))).
(5) Institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall submit any supplemental budget requests and revisions to
the board ((at the same time they are submitted to the office of
financial management)) no later than August 1st of each odd-numbered
year. The board shall submit recommendations on the proposed
supplemental budget requests to the office of financial management by
November 1st and to the legislature by January 1st((;
(2) Recommend legislation affecting higher education;
(3) Prepare recommendations on merging or closing institutions; and
(4) Develop criteria for identifying the need for new baccalaureate
institutions)).

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.80.335 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 8 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2005-2007 biennial capital budget submittal,
the public four-year institutions, in consultation with the council of
presidents and the higher education coordinating board, shall prepare
a single prioritized individual ranking of the individual projects
proposed by the four-year institutions as provided in subsection (2) of
this section. The public four-year institutions may aggregate minor
works project requests into priority categories without separately
ranking each minor project, provided that these aggregated minor works
requests are ranked within the overall list. For repairs and
improvements to existing facilities and systems, the rating and ranking
of individual projects must be based on criteria or factors that
include, but are not limited to, the age and condition of buildings or
systems, the programmatic suitability of the building or system, and
the activity/occupancy level supported by the building or system. For
projects creating new space or capacity, the ratings and rankings of
projects must be based upon criteria or factors that include, but are
not limited to, measuring existing capacity and progress toward meeting
increased space utilization levels as determined by the higher
education coordinating board.
(2) The single prioritized four-year project list shall be approved
by the governing boards of each public four-year institution and shall
be submitted to the office of financial management and the higher
education coordinating board concurrent with the institution's
submittal of their biennial capital budget requests.
(3)(a) The higher education coordinating board, in consultation
with the office of financial management and the joint legislative audit
and review committee, shall develop common definitions that public
four-year institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall use in developing their project lists under this
section.
(b) As part of its duties under RCW 28B.80.330(((4))) (as
recodified by this act), the higher education coordinating board shall,
as part of its biennial budget guidelines, disseminate, by December 1st
of each odd-numbered year, the criteria framework, including general
definitions, categories, and rating system, to be used by the public
four-year institutions in the development of the prioritized four-year
project list. The criteria framework shall specify the general
priority order of project types based on criteria determined by the
board, in consultation with the public four-year institutions.
(c) Under RCW 28B.80.330(((4))) (as recodified by this act), the
public four-year institutions shall submit a preliminary prioritized
four-year project list to the higher education coordinating board by
August 1st of each even-numbered year.
(d) The state board for community and technical colleges shall, as
part of its biennial capital budget request, submit a single
prioritized ranking of the individual projects proposed for the
community and technical colleges. The state board for community and
technical colleges shall submit an outline of the prioritized community
and technical college project list to the higher education coordinating
board under RCW 28B.80.330(((4))) (as recodified by this act) by August
1st of each even-numbered year.
(4) The higher education coordinating board, in consultation with
the public four-year institutions, shall resolve any disputes or
disagreements arising among the four-year institutions concerning the
ranking of particular projects. Further, should one or more governing
boards of the public four-year institutions fail to approve the
prioritized four-year project list as required in this section, or
should a prioritized project list not be submitted by the public four-year institutions concurrent with the submittal of their respective
biennial capital budget requests as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, the higher education coordinating board shall prepare the
prioritized four-year institution project list itself.
(5) In developing any rating and ranking of capital projects
proposed by the two-year and four-year public universities and
colleges, the board:
(a) Shall be provided with available information by the public two-year and four-year institutions as deemed necessary by the board;
(b) May utilize independent services to verify, sample, or evaluate
information provided to the board by the two-year and four-year
institutions; and
(c) Shall have full access to all data maintained by the office of
financial management and the joint legislative audit and review
committee concerning the condition of higher education facilities.
(6) Beginning with the 2005-2007 biennial capital budget submittal,
the higher education coordinating board shall, in consultation with the
state board for community and technical colleges and four-year colleges
and universities, submit its capital budget recommendations and the
separate two-year and four-year prioritized project lists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The board shall develop a comprehensive
and ongoing assessment process to analyze the need for additional
degrees and programs, additional off-campus centers and locations for
degree programs, and consolidation or elimination of programs by the
four-year institutions.
(2) As part of the needs assessment process, the board shall
examine:
(a) Projections of student, employer, and community demand for
education and degrees, including liberal arts degrees, on a regional
and statewide basis;
(b) Current and projected degree programs and enrollment at public
and private institutions of higher education, by location and mode of
service delivery; and
(c) Data from the work force training and education coordinating
board and the state board for community and technical colleges on the
supply and demand for work force education and certificates and
associate degrees.
(3) Every two years the board shall produce, jointly with the state
board for community and technical colleges and the work force training
and education coordinating board, an assessment of the number and type
of higher education and training credentials required to match employer
demand for a skilled and educated work force. The assessment shall
include the number of forecasted net job openings at each level of
higher education and training and the number of credentials needed to
match the forecast of net job openings.
(4) The board shall determine whether certain major lines of study
or types of degrees, including applied degrees or research-oriented
degrees, shall be assigned uniquely to some institutions or
institutional sectors in order to create centers of excellence that
focus resources and expertise.
(5) The following activities are subject to approval by the board:
(a) New degree programs by a four-year institution;
(b) Creation of any off-campus program by a four-year institution;
(c) Purchase or lease of major off-campus facilities by a four-year
institution or a community or technical college;
(d) Creation of higher education centers and consortia; and
(e) New degree programs and creation of off-campus programs by an
independent college or university in collaboration with a community or
technical college.
(6) Institutions seeking board approval under this section must
demonstrate that the proposal is justified by the needs assessment
developed under this section. Institutions must also demonstrate how
the proposals align with or implement the statewide strategic master
plan for higher education under RCW 28B.80.345 (as recodified by this
act).
(7) The board shall develop clear guidelines and objective
decision-making criteria regarding approval of proposals under this
section, which must include review and consultation with the
institution and other interested agencies and individuals.
(8) The board shall periodically recommend consolidation or
elimination of programs at the four-year institutions, based on the
needs assessment analysis.

Sec. 10 RCW 28B.80.280 and 1998 c 245 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall((, in cooperation with the state institutions of
higher education and the state board for community and technical
colleges, establish and maintain a statewide transfer of credit policy
and agreement. The policy and agreement shall, where feasible, include
course and program descriptions consistent with statewide
interinstitutional guidelines)) adopt statewide transfer and
articulation policies that ensure efficient transfer of credits and
courses across public two and four-year institutions of higher
education. The intent of the policies is to create a statewide system
of articulation and alignment between two and four-year institutions.
Policies may address but are not limited to creation of a statewide
system of course equivalency, creation of transfer associate degrees,
statewide articulation agreements, applicability of technical courses
toward baccalaureate degrees, and other issues. The institutions of
higher education and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall cooperate with the board in developing the statewide
policies and shall provide support and staff resources as necessary to
assist in ((developing and)) maintaining ((this policy and agreement.
The statewide transfer of credit policy and agreement shall be
effective beginning with the 1985-86 academic year)) the policies. The
board shall submit a progress report to the higher education committees
of the senate and house of representatives by December 1, 2006, by
which time the legislature expects measurable improvement in alignment
and transfer efficiency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The board shall establish an
accountability monitoring and reporting system as part of a continuing
effort to make meaningful and substantial progress towards the
achievement of long-term performance goals in higher education.
(2) Based on guidelines prepared by the board, each four-year
institution and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall submit a biennial plan to achieve measurable and specific
improvements each academic year on statewide and institution-specific
performance measures. Plans shall be submitted to the board along with
the biennial budget requests from the institutions and the state board
for community and technical colleges. Performance measures established
for the community and technical colleges shall reflect the role and
mission of the colleges.
(3) The board shall approve biennial performance targets for each
four-year institution and for the community and technical college
system and shall review actual achievements annually. The state board
for community and technical colleges shall set biennial performance
targets for each college or district, where appropriate.
(4) The board shall submit a report on progress towards the
statewide goals, with recommendations for the ensuing biennium, to the
fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature along with
the board's biennial budget recommendations.
(5) The board, in collaboration with the four-year institutions and
the state board for community and technical colleges, shall
periodically review and update the accountability monitoring and
reporting system.
(6) The board shall develop measurable indicators and benchmarks
for its own performance regarding cost, quantity, quality, and
timeliness and including the performance of committees and advisory
groups convened under this chapter to accomplish such tasks as
improving transfer and articulation, improving articulation with the K-12 education system, measuring educational costs, or developing data
protocols. The board shall submit its accountability plan to the
legislature concurrently with the biennial report on institution
progress.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) In consultation with the institutions
of higher education and state education agencies, the board shall
identify the data needed to carry out its responsibilities for policy
analysis, accountability, program improvements, and public information.
The primary goals of the board's data collection and research are to
describe how students and other beneficiaries of higher education are
being served; to support higher education accountability; and to assist
state policymakers and institutions in making policy decisions.
(2) The board shall convene a research advisory group and shall
collaborate with the group to identify the most cost-effective manner
for the board to collect data or access existing data. The board shall
work with the advisory group to develop research priorities, policies,
and common definitions to maximize the reliability and consistency of
data across institutions. The advisory group shall include
representatives of public and independent higher education institutions
and other state agencies, including the state board for community and
technical colleges, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the office of financial management, the employment
security department, the work force training and education coordinating
board, and other agencies as appropriate.
(3) Specific protocols shall be developed by the board and the
advisory group to protect the privacy of individual student records
while ensuring the availability of student data for legitimate research
purposes.

Sec. 13 RCW 28B.80.350 and 1993 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall ((coordinate educational activities among all
segments of higher education taking into account the educational
programs, facilities, and other resources of both public and
independent two and four-year colleges and universities. The four-year
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall coordinate information and activities with the board. The board
shall)) have the following additional policy responsibilities:
(1) ((Promote interinstitutional cooperation)) Perform periodic
analyses of tuition, financial aid, faculty compensation, institution
funding levels, enrollment, and other policy issues and provide reports
to the governor and the legislature;
(2) Establish minimum admission standards for four-year
institutions, including a requirement that coursework in American sign
language or an American Indian language shall satisfy any requirement
for instruction in a language other than English that the board or the
institutions may establish as a general undergraduate admissions
requirement;
(3) ((Establish transfer policies;
(4))) Adopt rules implementing statutory residency requirements;
(((5) Develop and administer reciprocity agreements with bordering
states and the province of British Columbia;
(6) Review and recommend compensation practices and levels for
administrative employees, exempt under chapter 28B.16 RCW, and faculty
using comparative data from peer institutions;
(7) Monitor higher education activities for compliance with all
relevant state policies for higher education;
(8) Arbitrate disputes between and among four-year institutions or
between and among four-year institutions and community colleges at the
request of one or more of the institutions involved, or at the request
of the governor, or from a resolution adopted by the legislature. The
decision of the board shall be binding on the participants in the
dispute;
(9) Establish and implement a state system for collecting,
analyzing, and distributing information;
(10) Recommend to the governor and the legislature ways to remove
any economic incentives to use off-campus program funds for on-campus
activities; and
(11))) (4) Make recommendations to increase minority participation,
and monitor and report on the progress of minority participation in
higher education;
(5) In cooperation with the institutions of higher education,
highlight and promote innovative programs to improve the quality of
instruction, promote local and regional economic development, and
enhance efficiency in higher education; and
(6) Recommend legislation affecting higher education.

Sec. 14 RCW 28B.10.044 and 1997 c 48 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((higher education coordinating)) board shall annually
develop information on the approximate amount of state support that
students receive. For students at state-supported colleges and
universities, the information shall include the approximate level of
support received by students in each tuition category. That
information may include consideration of the following: Expenditures
included in the educational cost formula, revenue forgiven from waived
tuition and fees, state-funded financial aid awarded to students at
public institutions, and all or a portion of appropriated amounts not
reflected in the educational cost formula for institutional programs
and services that may affect or enhance the educational experience of
students at a particular institution. For students attending a private
college, university, or proprietary school, the information shall
include the amount of state-funded financial aid awarded to students
attending the institution.
(2) Beginning July 30, 1993, the board shall annually provide
information appropriate to each institution's student body to each
state-supported four-year institution of higher education and to the
state board for community and technical colleges for distribution to
community colleges and technical colleges.
(3) Beginning July 30, 1993, the board shall annually provide
information on the level of financial aid received by students at that
institution to each private university, college, or proprietary school,
that enrolls students receiving state-funded financial aid.
(4) Beginning with the 1997 fall academic term, each institution of
higher education described in subsection (2) or (3) of this section
shall provide to students at the institution information on the
approximate amount that the state is contributing to the support of
their education. Information provided to students at each state-supported college and university shall include the approximate amount
of state support received by students in each tuition category at that
institution. The amount of state support shall be based on the
information provided by the ((higher education coordinating)) board
under subsections (1) through (3) of this section. The information
shall be provided to students at the beginning of each academic term
through one or more of the following: Registration materials, class
schedules, tuition and fee billing packets, student newspapers, or via
e-mail or kiosk.

Sec. 15 RCW 28B.15.070 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The ((higher education coordinating)) board, in consultation
with the house of representatives and senate committees responsible for
higher education, the respective fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and senate, the office of financial management, the
state board for community and technical colleges, and the state
institutions of higher education, shall develop ((by December of every
fourth year beginning in 1989, definitions, criteria, and procedures
for determining)) standardized methods and protocols for measuring the
undergraduate and graduate educational costs for the state
universities, regional universities, and community colleges, including
but not limited to the costs of instruction, costs to provide degrees
in specific fields, and costs for precollege remediation.
(2) ((Every four years, the state institutions of higher education
in cooperation with the higher education coordinating board shall
perform an educational cost study pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section. The study shall be conducted based on every fourth academic
year beginning with 1989-90. Institutions shall complete the studies
within one year of the end of the study year and report the results to
the higher education coordinating board for consolidation, review, and
distribution.)) By December 1, 2004, the board must propose a schedule
of regular cost study reports intended to meet the information needs of
the governor's office and the legislature and the requirements of RCW
28B.10.044 and submit the proposed schedule to the higher education and
fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate for
their review.
(3) ((In order to conduct the study required by subsection (2) of
this section, the higher education coordinating board, in cooperation
with)) The institutions of higher education((, shall develop a
methodology that requires the collection of comparable educational cost
data, which utilizes a faculty activity analysis or similar
instrument)) shall participate in the development of cost study methods
and shall provide all necessary data in a timely fashion consistent
with the protocols developed.

Sec. 16 RCW 28B.15.076 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((higher education coordinating)) board shall determine and
transmit amounts constituting approved undergraduate and graduate
educational costs to the several boards of regents and trustees of the
state institutions of higher education by November 10 of each even-numbered year ((except the year 1990 for which the transmittal shall be
made by December 17)).

Sec. 17 RCW 28B.80.175 and 1994 c 222 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall work with the state
board of education ((to establish the task force under RCW
28A.305.285)), the superintendent of public instruction, the state
board for community and technical colleges, the work force training and
education coordinating board, two and four-year institutions of higher
education, and school districts to improve coordination, articulation,
and transitions among the state's systems of education. The goal of
improved coordination is increased student success. Topics to address
include: Expansion of dual enrollment options for students;
articulation agreements between institutions of higher education and
high schools; improved alignment of high school preparatory curriculum
and college readiness. The board, in conjunction with the other
education agencies, shall submit a biennial update on the work
accomplished and planned under this section to the education and higher
education committees of the legislature, beginning January 15, 2005.

PART III
EDUCATION SERVICES ADMINISTRATION
Sec. 18 RCW 28B.80.360 and 1998 c 245 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The board shall perform the following administrative
responsibilities:
(1))) In addition to administrative responsibilities assigned in
this chapter, the board shall administer the programs set forth in the
following statutes: RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 (Washington
scholars); ((chapter 28B.04 RCW (displaced homemakers);)) chapter
28B.85 RCW (degree-granting institutions); ((RCW 28B.10.210 through
28B.10.220 (blind students subsidy); RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824
(student financial aid program))) chapter 28B.-- RCW (as created in
section 78 of this act) (state need grant); chapter 28B.12 RCW (work
study); ((RCW 28B.15.067 (establishing tuition and fees);)) RCW
28B.15.543 (tuition waivers for Washington scholars); RCW 28B.15.760
through 28B.15.766 (math and science loans); ((RCW 28B.80.150 through
28B.80.170 (student exchange compact); RCW 28B.80.240 (student aid
programs); and RCW 28B.80.210 (federal programs).
(2) Study the delegation of the administration of the following:
RCW 28B.65.040 through 28B.65.060 (high-technology board); chapter
28B.85 RCW (degree-granting institutions); RCW 28B.80.150 through
28B.80.170 (student exchange compact programs); RCW 28B.80.200 (state
commission for federal law purposes); RCW 28B.80.210 (enumerated
federal programs); RCW 28B.80.230 (receipt of federal funds); RCW
28B.80.240 (student financial aid programs); RCW 28A.600.120 through
28A.600.150 (Washington scholars); RCW 28B.15.543 (Washington
scholars); RCW 28B.04.020 through 28B.04.110 (displaced homemakers);
RCW 28B.10.215 and 28B.10.220 (blind students); RCW 28B.10.790,
28B.10.792, and 28B.10.802 through 28B.10.844 (student financial aid);
RCW 28B.12.040 through 28B.12.070 (student work study);)) RCW
28B.15.100 (reciprocity agreement); RCW 28B.15.730 through 28B.15.736
(Oregon reciprocity); RCW 28B.15.750 through 28B.15.754 (Idaho
reciprocity); RCW 28B.15.756 and 28B.15.758 (British Columbia
reciprocity); ((and RCW 28B.15.760 through 28B.15.764 (math/science
loans))) chapter 28B.101 RCW (educational opportunity grant); chapter
28B.102 RCW (future teachers conditional scholarship); chapter 28B.108
RCW (American Indian endowed scholarship); chapter 28B.109 RCW
(Washington international exchange scholarship); chapter 28B.115 RCW
(health professional conditional scholarship); chapter 28B.119 RCW
(Washington promise scholarship); and chapter 28B.133 RCW (gaining
independence for students with dependents).

Sec. 19 RCW 28B.10.859 and 1989 c 187 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 28B.10.866 through 28B.10.873 (as
recodified by this act), "private donation" includes assessments by
commodity commissions authorized to conduct research activities
including but not limited to research studies authorized under RCW
15.66.030 and 15.65.040.

Sec. 20 RCW 28B.10.868 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 99 are each amended
to read as follows:
Funds appropriated by the legislature for the distinguished
professorship program shall be deposited in the distinguished
professorship trust fund. At the request of the higher education
coordinating board under RCW 28B.10.870 (as recodified by this act),
the treasurer shall release the state matching funds to the designated
institution's local endowment fund. No appropriation is required for
expenditures from the fund.

Sec. 21 RCW 28B.10.873 and 1987 c 8 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A distinguished professorship program established under chapter
343, Laws of 1985 shall continue to operate under RCW 28B.10.866
through 28B.10.872 (as recodified by this act) and the requirements of
RCW 28B.10.866 through 28B.10.872 (as recodified by this act) shall
apply.

Sec. 22 RCW 28B.10.882 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 88 are each amended
to read as follows:
Funds appropriated by the legislature for the graduate fellowship
program shall be deposited in the graduate fellowship trust fund. At
the request of the higher education coordinating board under RCW
28B.10.884 (as recodified by this act), the treasurer shall release the
state matching funds to the designated institution's local endowment
fund. No appropriation is required for expenditures from the fund.

Sec. 23 RCW 28B.80.160 and 1995 c 217 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the development of any such plans as called for within RCW
28B.80.150 (as recodified by this act), the board shall use at least
the following criteria:
(1) Students who are eligible to attend compact-authorized programs
in other states shall meet the Washington residency requirements of
chapter 28B.15 RCW prior to being awarded tuition assistance.
(2) For recipients named after January 1, 1995, the tuition
assistance shall be in the form of loans that may be completely
forgiven in exchange for the student's service within the state of
Washington after graduation. The requirements for such service and
provisions for loan forgiveness shall be determined in rules adopted by
the board.
(3) If appropriations are insufficient to fund all students
qualifying under subsection (1) of this section, then the plans shall
include criteria for student selection that would be in the best
interest in meeting the state's educational needs, as well as
recognizing the financial needs of students.
(4) Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or any other
subsidies to which the board as administrator is entitled, that are
paid by or on behalf of participants under this section, shall be
deposited with the board and placed in an account created in this
section and shall be used to cover the costs of granting the
scholarships, maintaining necessary records, and making collections.
The board shall maintain accurate records of these costs, and all
receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs shall be used to
grant conditional loans to eligible students.
(5) The Washington interstate commission on higher education
professional student exchange program trust fund is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from loan repayment shall
be deposited into the fund. Only the higher education coordinating
board, or its designee, may authorize expenditures from the fund. No
appropriation is required for expenditures from this fund.

Sec. 24 RCW 28B.80.245 and 1999 c 159 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Recipients of the Washington scholars award or the Washington
scholars-alternate award under RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 who
choose to attend an independent college or university in this state, as
defined in subsection (4) of this section, and recipients of the award
named after June 30, 1994, who choose to attend a public college or
university in the state may receive grants under this section if moneys
are available. The higher education coordinating board shall
distribute grants to eligible students under this section from moneys
appropriated for this purpose. The individual grants shall not exceed,
on a yearly basis, the yearly, full-time, resident, undergraduate
tuition and service and activities fees in effect at the state-funded
research universities. Grants to recipients attending an independent
institution shall be contingent upon the institution matching on at
least a dollar-for-dollar basis, either with actual money or by a
waiver of fees, the amount of the grant received by the student from
the state. The higher education coordinating board shall establish
procedures, by rule, to disburse the awards as direct grants to the
students.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall establish rules
that provide for the annual awarding of grants, if moneys are
available, to three Washington scholars per legislative district; and,
if not used by an original recipient, to the Washington scholars-alternate from the same legislative district.
Beginning with scholars selected in the year 2000, if the
recipients of grants fail to demonstrate in a timely manner that they
will enroll in a Washington institution of higher education in the fall
term of the academic year following the award of the grant or are
deemed by the higher education coordinating board to have withdrawn
from college during the first academic year following the award, then
the grant shall be considered relinquished. The higher education
coordinating board may then award any remaining grant amounts to the
Washington scholars-alternate from the same legislative district if the
grants are awarded within one calendar year of the recipient being
named a Washington scholars-alternate. Washington scholars-alternates
named as recipients of the grant must also demonstrate in a timely
manner that they will enroll in a Washington institution of higher
education during the next available term, as determined by the higher
education coordinating board. The board may accept appeals and grant
waivers to the enrollment requirements of this section based on
exceptional mitigating circumstances of individual grant recipients.
To maintain eligibility for the grants, recipients must maintain a
minimum grade point average at the college or university equivalent to
3.30. Students shall be eligible to receive a maximum of twelve
quarters or eight semesters of grants for undergraduate study and may
transfer among in-state public and independent colleges and
universities during that period and continue to receive the grant as
provided under RCW 28B.80.246 (as recodified by this act). If the
student's cumulative grade point average falls below 3.30 during the
first three quarters or two semesters, that student may petition the
higher education coordinating board which shall have the authority to
establish a probationary period until such time as the student's grade
point average meets required standards.
(3) No grant shall be awarded to any student who is pursuing a
degree in theology.
(4) As used in this section, "independent college or university"
means a private, nonprofit educational institution, the main campus of
which is permanently situated in the state, open to residents of the
state, providing programs of education beyond the high school level
leading at least to the baccalaureate degree, and accredited by the
northwest association of schools and colleges as of June 9, 1988, and
other institutions as may be developed that are approved by the higher
education coordinating board as meeting equivalent standards as those
institutions accredited under this section.
(5) As used in this section, "public college or university" means
an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

Sec. 25 RCW 28B.80.246 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 5 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
Students receiving grants under RCW 28B.80.245 (as recodified by
this act) or waivers under RCW 28B.15.543 are entitled to transfer
among in-state public and independent colleges or universities and to
continue to receive award benefits, as provided in this section, in the
form of a grant or waiver of tuition and services and activities fees
while enrolled at such institutions during the period of eligibility.
The total grants or waivers for any one student shall not exceed twelve
quarters or eight semesters of undergraduate study.
(1) Scholars named to the award on or before June 30, 1994, may
transfer between in-state public institutions, or from an eligible
independent college or university to an in-state public institution of
higher education, and are entitled to receive the waiver of tuition and
services and activities fees.
(2) Scholars named to the award on or before June 30, 1994, may
transfer from an in-state public institution to an eligible independent
college or university, or between eligible independent colleges or
universities, and continue to receive a grant contingent upon available
funding.
(3) Scholars named to the award after June 30, 1994, may transfer
among in-state public or private colleges and universities and continue
to receive the grant contingent upon available funding.
(4) In addition, scholars who transfer to an eligible independent
institution may receive the grant contingent upon the agreement of the
school to match on at least a dollar-for-dollar basis, either with
actual money or by a waiver of fees, the amount of the grant received
by the student from the state.

Sec. 26 RCW 28B.80.620 and 1999 c 177 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board, in consultation with
the state board of education has the following powers and duties in
administering the pilot program established in RCW 28B.80.622 (as
recodified by this act):
(a) To adopt rules necessary to carry out the program;
(b) To establish one or more review committees to assist in the
evaluation of proposals for funding. The review committee shall
include individuals with significant experience in higher education in
areas relevant to one or more of the funding period priorities and
shall include representatives from elementary, two-year, and four-year
sectors of education;
(c) To award grants no later than September 1st in those years when
funding is available by June 30th;
(d) To establish each biennium specific guidelines for submitting
grant proposals consistent with the overall goals of the program.
During the 1999-2001 biennium, the guidelines shall be consistent with
the following desired outcomes of:
(i) Designing a college-level course for enrollment of selected
high school seniors interested in teaching careers and students
enrolled in a school-based future teachers academy;
(ii) Designing discipline-based lower division courses that are
thematically linked to state student learning goals, essential academic
learning requirements, and upper division courses in the
interdisciplinary arts and science curriculum and supportive of
teaching areas appropriate for prospective teachers;
(iii) Designing a preprofessional educational studies minor that
would be pursued by prospective kindergarten through eighth grade
teachers in conjunction with an interdisciplinary arts and science
major;
(iv) Designing mentoring and service learning activities at the
community college level that would provide prospective teachers with an
orientation to professional education; and
(v) Designing a process for satisfying certification requirements
that encompasses pedagogical coursework and school-based internships
cognizant of the financial constraints of working students.
(2) The pilot project in this section shall conclude no later than
January 1, 2005.
(3) Beginning on December 31, 2001, the higher education
coordinating board shall submit an annual written report to the
education and higher education committees of the legislature, the state
board of education, and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction on the status of the pilot project.

Sec. 27 RCW 28B.80.626 and 1999 c 177 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board teacher training pilot
account is established in the custody of the state treasurer. The
higher education coordinating board shall deposit in the account all
moneys received under RCW 28B.80.624 (as recodified by this act).
Moneys in the account may be spent only for the purposes of RCW
28B.80.622 (as recodified by this act). Disbursements from the account
shall be on the authorization of the higher education coordinating
board. The account is subject to the allotment procedure provided
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
disbursements.

PART IV
TRANSFER DISPLACED HOMEMAKER PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 (1) The powers, duties, and functions of
administering the displaced homemaker program under chapter 28B.04 RCW
are hereby transferred from the higher education coordinating board to
the state board for community and technical colleges.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the higher education
coordinating board related to the displaced homemaker program shall be
delivered to the custody of the state board for community and technical
colleges. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed by the higher education
coordinating board for the displaced homemaker program shall be made
available to the state board for community and technical colleges. All
funds, credits, or other assets held by the higher education
coordinating board for the displaced homemaker program shall be
assigned to the state board for community and technical colleges.
(b) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(c) Any appropriations made in connection with the powers, duties,
and functions transferred by this act shall, on the effective date of
this section, be transferred and credited to the state board for
community and technical colleges.
(3) All employees of the higher education coordinating board
related to the displaced homemaker program are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the state board for community and technical colleges.
All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil
service law, are assigned to the state board for community and
technical colleges to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as
formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be
appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing
state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the higher education
coordinating board related to the displaced homemaker program shall be
continued and acted upon by the state board for community and technical
colleges. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full
force and shall be performed by the state board for community and
technical colleges.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the higher education coordinating board related to the displaced
homemaker program shall not affect the validity of any act performed
before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

Sec. 29 RCW 28B.04.020 and 1985 c 370 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that homemakers are an unrecognized part of
the work force who make an invaluable contribution to the strength,
durability, and purpose of our state.
The legislature further finds that there is an increasing number of
persons in this state who, having fulfilled a role as homemaker, find
themselves "displaced" in their middle years through divorce, death of
spouse, disability of spouse, or other loss of family income of a
spouse. As a consequence, displaced homemakers are very often left
with little or no income; they are ineligible for categorical welfare
assistance; they are subject to the highest rate of unemployment of any
sector of the work force; they face continuing discrimination in
employment because of their age and lack of recent paid work
experience; they are ineligible for unemployment insurance because they
have been engaged in unpaid labor in the home; they are ineligible for
social security benefits because they are too young, and many never
qualify because they have been divorced from the family wage earner;
they may have lost beneficiaries' rights under employer's pension and
health plans through divorce or death of spouse; and they are often
unacceptable to private health insurance plans because of their age.
It is the purpose of this chapter to establish guidelines under
which the ((higher education coordinating board)) state board for
community and technical colleges shall contract to establish
multipurpose service centers and programs to provide necessary training
opportunities, counseling, and services for displaced homemakers so
that they may enjoy the independence and economic security vital to a
productive life.

Sec. 30 RCW 28B.04.030 and 1985 c 370 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the ((higher education coordinating board)) state
board for community and technical colleges.
(2) "Center" means a multipurpose service center for displaced
homemakers as described in RCW 28B.04.040.
(3) "Program" means those programs described in RCW 28B.04.050
which provide direct, outreach, and information and training services
which serve the needs of displaced homemakers.
(4) "Displaced homemaker" means an individual who:
(a) Has worked in the home for ten or more years providing
unsalaried household services for family members on a full-time basis;
and
(b) Is not gainfully employed;
(c) Needs assistance in securing employment; and
(d) Has been dependent on the income of another family member but
is no longer supported by that income, or has been dependent on federal
assistance but is no longer eligible for that assistance, or is
supported as the parent of minor children by public assistance or
spousal support but whose children are within two years of reaching
their majority.

Sec. 31 RCW 28B.04.080 and 1985 c 370 s 42 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall consult and cooperate with the department of
social and health services; the ((state board for community college
education)) higher education coordinating board; the superintendent of
public instruction; the ((commission for vocational education)) work
force training and education coordinating board; the employment
security department; the department of labor and industries; sponsoring
agencies under the federal comprehensive employment and training act
(87 Stat. 839; 29 U.S.C. Sec. 801 et seq.), and any other persons or
agencies as the board deems appropriate to facilitate the coordination
of centers established under this chapter with existing programs of a
similar nature.
(2) Annually on July 1st, each agency listed in subsection (1) of
this section shall submit a description of each service or program
under its jurisdiction which would support the programs and centers
established by this chapter and the funds available for such support.
(3) The board shall serve as a clearinghouse for displaced
homemaker information and resources and shall compile and disseminate
statewide information to the centers, related agencies, and interested
persons upon request.

Sec. 32 RCW 28B.04.085 and 1987 c 230 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The executive coordinator of the ((higher education
coordinating)) board shall establish an advisory committee, to be known
as the displaced homemaker program advisory committee.
(2) The advisory committee shall be advisory to the executive
coordinator and staff of the board.
(3) Committee membership shall not exceed twenty-two persons and
shall be geographically and generally representative of the state. At
least one member of the advisory committee shall either be or recently
have been a displaced homemaker.
(4) Functions of the advisory committee shall be:
(a) To provide advice on all aspects of administration of the
displaced homemaker program, including content of program rules,
guidelines, and application procedures;
(b) To assist in coordination of activities under the displaced
homemaker program with related activities of other state and federal
agencies, with particular emphasis on facilitation of coordinated
funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 Sections 28 through 32 of this act take
effect July 1, 2005.

PART V
STATE NEED GRANT
Sec. 34 RCW 28B.10.800 and 1999 c 345 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purposes of ((RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824)) this chapter
are to establish the principles upon which the state financial aid
programs will be based and to establish the state of Washington state
need grant program, thus assisting financially needy or disadvantaged
students domiciled in Washington to obtain the opportunity of attending
an accredited institution of higher education((, as defined in RCW
28B.10.802(1))). State need grants under ((RCW 28B.10.800 through
28B.10.824)) this chapter are available only to students who are
resident students as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d).

Sec. 35 RCW 28B.10.802 and 2002 c 187 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in ((RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824)) this chapter:
(1) "Institution or institutions of higher education" ((shall mean
(1) [(a)])) means:
(a) Any public university, college, community college, or
((vocational-technical institute)) technical college operated by the
state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof; or
(((2) [(b)])) (b) Any other university, college, school, or
institute in the state of Washington offering instruction beyond the
high school level which is a member institution of an accrediting
association recognized by rule of the board for the purposes of this
section: PROVIDED, That any institution, branch, extension or facility
operating within the state of Washington which is affiliated with an
institution operating in another state must be a separately accredited
member institution of any such accrediting association, or a branch of
a member institution of an accrediting association recognized by rule
of the board for purposes of this section, that is eligible for federal
student financial aid assistance and has operated as a nonprofit
college or university delivering on-site classroom instruction for a
minimum of twenty consecutive years within the state of Washington, and
has an annual enrollment of at least seven hundred full-time equivalent
students: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no institution of higher education
shall be eligible to participate in a student financial aid program
unless it agrees to and complies with program rules and regulations
adopted pursuant to RCW 28B.10.822 (as recodified by this act).
(2) ((The term)) "Financial aid" ((shall mean)) means loans and/or
grants to needy students enrolled or accepted for enrollment as a
student at institutions of higher education.
(3) ((The term)) "Needy student" ((shall mean)) means a post high
school student of an institution of higher ((learning as defined in
subsection (1) of this section)) education who demonstrates to the
board the financial inability, either through the student's parents,
family and/or personally, to meet the total cost of board, room, books,
and tuition and incidental fees for any semester or quarter.
(4) ((The term)) "Disadvantaged student" ((shall mean)) means a
post high school student who by reason of adverse cultural,
educational, environmental, experiential, familial or other
circumstances is unable to qualify for enrollment as a full time
student in an institution of higher ((learning)) education, who would
otherwise qualify as a needy student, and who is attending an
institution of higher ((learning)) education under an established
program designed to qualify the student for enrollment as a full time
student.
(5) (("Commission" or)) "Board" ((shall mean)) means the higher
education coordinating board.

Sec. 36 RCW 28B.10.804 and 1999 c 345 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall be cognizant of the following guidelines in the
performance of its duties:
(1) The board shall be research oriented, not only at its inception
but continually through its existence.
(2) The board shall coordinate all existing programs of financial
aid except those specifically dedicated to a particular institution by
the donor.
(3) The board shall take the initiative and responsibility for
coordinating all federal student financial aid programs to ensure that
the state recognizes the maximum potential effect of these programs,
and shall design state programs that complement existing federal,
state, and institutional programs. The board shall ensure that state
programs continue to follow the principle that state financial aid
funding follows the student to the student's choice of institution of
higher education.
(4) Counseling is a paramount function of the state need grant and
other state student financial aid programs, and in most cases could
only be properly implemented at the institutional levels; therefore,
state student financial aid programs shall be concerned with the
attainment of those goals which, in the judgment of the board, are the
reasons for the existence of a student financial aid program, and not
solely with administration of the program on an individual basis.
(5) The "package" approach of combining loans, grants and
employment for student financial aid shall be the conceptual element of
the state's involvement.
(6) The board shall ensure that allocations of state appropriations
for financial aid are made to individuals and institutions in a timely
manner and shall closely monitor expenditures to avoid under or
overexpenditure of appropriated funds.

Sec. 37 RCW 28B.10.808 and 1999 c 345 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
In awarding need grants, the board shall proceed substantially as
follows: PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall be construed to
prevent the board, in the exercise of its sound discretion, from
following another procedure when the best interest of the program so
dictates:
(1) The board shall annually select the financial aid award
recipients from among Washington residents applying for student
financial aid who have been ranked according to financial need as
determined by the amount of the family contribution and other
considerations brought to the board's attention.
(2) The financial need of the highest ranked students shall be met
by grants depending upon the evaluation of financial need until the
total allocation has been disbursed. Funds from grants which are
declined, forfeited or otherwise unused shall be reawarded until
dispersed.
(3) A student shall be eligible to receive a state need grant for
up to five years, or the credit or clock hour equivalent of five years,
or up to one hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of
time of the student's program. A student may not start a new associate
degree program as a state need grant recipient until at least five
years have elapsed since earning an associate degree as a need grant
recipient, except that a student may earn two associate degrees
concurrently. Qualifications for renewal will include maintaining
satisfactory academic progress toward completion of an eligible program
as determined by the board. Should the recipient terminate his or her
enrollment for any reason during the academic year, the unused portion
of the grant shall be returned to the state educational grant fund by
the institution according to the institution's own policy for issuing
refunds, except as provided in RCW 28B.10.8081 (as recodified by this
act).
(4) In computing financial need, the board shall determine a
maximum student expense budget allowance, not to exceed an amount equal
to the total maximum student expense budget at the public institutions
plus the current average state appropriation per student for operating
expense in the public institutions.

Sec. 38 RCW 28B.10.8081 and 1991 c 164 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Under rules adopted by the board, the provisions of RCW
28B.10.808(3) (as recodified by this act) shall not apply to eligible
students, as defined in RCW 28B.10.017, and eligible students shall not
be required to repay the unused portions of grants received under the
state student financial aid program.

Sec. 39 RCW 28B.10.810 and 1999 c 345 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
For a student to be eligible for a state need grant a student must:
(1) Be a "needy student" or "disadvantaged student" as determined
by the board in accordance with RCW 28B.10.802 (3) and (4) (as
recodified by this act).
(2) Have been domiciled within the state of Washington for at least
one year.
(3) Be enrolled or accepted for enrollment on at least a half-time
basis at an institution of higher education in Washington as defined in
RCW 28B.10.802(1) (as recodified by this act).
(4) Have complied with all the rules and regulations adopted by the
board for the administration of ((RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824))
this chapter.

Sec. 40 RCW 28B.10.816 and 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
A state financial aid recipient under ((RCW 28B.10.800 through
28B.10.824)) this chapter shall apply the award toward the cost of
tuition, room, board, books and fees at the institution of higher
education attended.

Sec. 41 RCW 28B.10.818 and 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 17 are each amended
to read as follows:
Funds appropriated for student financial assistance to be granted
pursuant to ((RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824)) this chapter shall be
disbursed as determined by the ((commission)) board.

Sec. 42 RCW 28B.10.820 and 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 18 are each amended
to read as follows:
The ((commission)) board shall be authorized to accept grants,
gifts, bequests, and devises of real and personal property from any
source for the purpose of granting financial aid in addition to that
funded by the state.

Sec. 43 RCW 28B.10.822 and 1999 c 345 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall adopt rules as may be necessary or appropriate for
effecting the provisions of ((RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824 and
28B.10.801, and not in conflict with RCW 28B.10.800 through
28B.10.824)) this chapter, in accordance with the provisions of chapter
34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

Sec. 44 RCW 28B.10.790 and 1985 c 370 s 54 are each amended to
read as follows:
Washington residents attending any nonprofit college or university
in another state which has a reciprocity agreement with the state of
Washington shall be eligible for the student financial aid program
outlined in ((RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824)) chapter 28B.-- RCW
(as created in section 78 of this act) if (1) they qualify as a "needy
student" under RCW 28B.10.802(3) (as recodified by this act), and (2)
the institution attended is a member institution of an accrediting
association recognized by rule of the higher education coordinating
board for the purposes of this section and is specifically encompassed
within or directly affected by such reciprocity agreement and agrees to
and complies with program rules and regulations pertaining to such
students and institutions adopted pursuant to RCW 28B.10.822 (as
recodified by this act).

PART VI
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 45 RCW 28B.10.650 and 1985 c 370 s 53 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that when the state and
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and community
colleges grant professional leaves to faculty and exempt staff, such
leaves be for the purpose of providing opportunities for study,
research, and creative activities for the enhancement of the
institution's instructional and research programs.
The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State
College and the board of trustees of each community college district
may grant remunerated professional leaves to faculty members and exempt
staff, as defined in RCW ((28B.16.040)) 41.06.070, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the respective governing boards for periods not
to exceed twelve consecutive months in accordance with the following
provisions:
(1) The remuneration from state general funds and general local
funds for any such leave granted for any academic year shall not exceed
the average of the highest quartile of a rank order of salaries of all
full time teaching faculty holding academic year contracts or
appointments at the institution or in the district.
(2) Remunerated professional leaves for a period of more or less
than an academic year shall be compensated at rates not to exceed a
proportional amount of the average salary as otherwise calculated for
the purposes of subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The grant of any such professional leave shall be contingent
upon a signed contractual agreement between the respective governing
board and the recipient providing that the recipient shall return to
the granting institution or district following his or her completion of
such leave and serve in a professional status for a period commensurate
with the amount of leave so granted. Failure to comply with the
provisions of such signed agreement shall constitute an obligation of
the recipient to repay to the institution any remuneration received
from the institution during the leave.
(4) The aggregate cost of remunerated professional leaves awarded
at the institution or district during any year, including the cost of
replacement personnel, shall not exceed the cost of salaries which
otherwise would have been paid to personnel on leaves: PROVIDED, That
for community college districts the aggregate cost shall not exceed one
hundred fifty percent of the cost of salaries which would have
otherwise been paid to personnel on leaves: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
this subsection shall not apply to any community college district with
fewer than seventy-five full time faculty members and granting fewer
than three individuals such leaves in any given year.
(5) The average number of annual remunerated professional leaves
awarded at any such institution or district shall not exceed four
percent of the total number of full time equivalent faculty, as defined
by the office of financial management, who are engaged in instruction,
and exempt staff as defined in RCW ((28B.16.040)) 41.06.070.
(6) Negotiated agreements made in accordance with chapter 28B.52
RCW and entered into after July 1, 1977, shall be in conformance with
the provisions of this section.
(7) The respective institutions and districts shall maintain such
information which will ensure compliance with the provisions of this
section. ((The higher education coordinating board shall periodically
request such information as to ensure institutions are in compliance.))

Sec. 46 RCW 28A.600.110 and 1994 c 234 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is established by the legislature of the state of Washington
the Washington state scholars program. The purposes of this program
annually are to:
(1) Provide for the selection of three seniors residing in each
legislative district in the state graduating from high schools who have
distinguished themselves academically among their peers.
(2) Maximize public awareness of the academic achievement,
leadership ability, and community contribution of Washington state
public and private high school seniors through appropriate recognition
ceremonies and events at both the local and state level.
(3) Provide a listing of the Washington scholars to all Washington
state public and private colleges and universities to facilitate
communication regarding academic programs and scholarship availability.
(4) Make available a state level mechanism for utilization of
private funds for scholarship awards to outstanding high school
seniors.
(5) Provide, on written request and with student permission, a
listing of the Washington scholars to private scholarship selection
committees for notification of scholarship availability.
(6) Permit a waiver of tuition and services and activities fees as
provided for in RCW 28B.15.543 and grants under RCW 28B.80.245 (as
recodified by this act).

Sec. 47 RCW 28B.10.020 and 1985 c 370 s 50 are each amended to
read as follows:
The boards of regents of the University of Washington and
Washington State University, respectively, and the boards of trustees
of Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University,
Western Washington University, and The Evergreen State College,
respectively, shall have the power and authority to acquire by
exchange, gift, purchase, lease, or condemnation in the manner provided
by chapter 8.04 RCW for condemnation of property for public use, such
lands, real estate and other property, and interests therein as they
may deem necessary for the use of said institutions respectively.
However, the purchase or lease of major off-campus facilities is
subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating board
under ((RCW 28B.80.340)) section 9 of this act.

Sec. 48 RCW 28B.10.050 and 1985 c 370 s 91 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as the legislature shall otherwise specifically direct, the
boards of regents and the boards of trustees for the state
universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State
College may establish entrance requirements for their respective
institutions of higher education which meet or exceed the minimum
entrance requirements established under RCW 28B.80.350(2) (as
recodified by this act).

Sec. 49 RCW 28B.15.543 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 5 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges shall waive tuition
and service and activities fees for students named by the higher
education coordinating board on or before June 30, 1994, as recipients
of the Washington scholars award under RCW 28A.600.100 through
28A.600.150. The waivers shall be used only for undergraduate studies.
To qualify for the waiver, recipients shall enter the college or
university within three years of high school graduation and maintain a
minimum grade point average at the college or university equivalent to
3.30. Students shall be eligible to receive a maximum of twelve
quarters or eight semesters of waivers and may transfer among state-supported institutions of higher education during that period and
continue to have the tuition and services and activities fees waived by
the state-supported institution of higher education that the student
attends. Should the student's cumulative grade point average fall
below 3.30 during the first three quarters or two semesters, that
student may petition the higher education coordinating board which
shall have the authority to establish a probationary period until such
time as the student's grade point average meets required standards.
(2) Students named by the higher education coordinating board after
June 30, 1994, as recipients of the Washington scholars award under RCW
28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 shall be eligible to receive a grant
for undergraduate course work as authorized under RCW 28B.80.245 (as
recodified by this act).

Sec. 50 RCW 28B.15.545 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 7 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges shall waive tuition
and services and activities fees for a maximum of two years for those
recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence
established under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.540 who received their
awards before June 30, 1994. Each recipient shall not receive a
waiver for more than six quarters or four semesters. To qualify for
the waiver, recipients shall enter the college or university within
three years of receiving the award. A minimum grade point average at
the college or university equivalent to 3.00, or an above-average
rating at a technical college, shall be required in the first year to
qualify for the second-year waiver. The tuition waiver shall be
granted for undergraduate studies only.
(2) Students named by the work force training and education
coordinating board after June 30, 1994, as recipients of the Washington
award for vocational excellence under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.550
shall be eligible to receive a grant for undergraduate course work as
authorized under RCW 28B.80.272 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 51 RCW 28B.15.910 and 2000 c 152 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to
public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived
under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and
unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations
act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen
State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial
management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to
all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.
(a) University of Washington 21 percent
(b) Washington State University 20 percent
(c) Eastern Washington University 11 percent
(d) Central Washington University 8 percent
(e) Western Washington University 10 percent
(f) The Evergreen State College 6 percent
(g) Community colleges as a whole 35 percent
(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to
waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the
following:
(a) RCW 28B.10.265;
(b) RCW 28B.15.014;
(c) RCW 28B.15.100;
(d) RCW 28B.15.225;
(e) RCW 28B.15.380;
(f) RCW 28B.15.520;
(g) RCW 28B.15.526;
(h) RCW 28B.15.527;
(i) RCW 28B.15.543;
(j) RCW 28B.15.545;
(k) RCW 28B.15.555;
(l) RCW 28B.15.556;
(m) RCW 28B.15.615;
(n) RCW 28B.15.620;
(o) RCW 28B.15.628;
(p) RCW 28B.15.730;
(q) RCW 28B.15.740;
(r) RCW 28B.15.750;
(s) RCW 28B.15.756;
(t) RCW 28B.50.259;
(u) RCW 28B.70.050; and
(v) ((RCW 28B.80.580; and
(w))) During the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the western interstate
commission for higher education undergraduate exchange program for
students attending Eastern Washington University.
(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees
contained in the following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.522;
(b) RCW 28B.15.540; and
(c) RCW 28B.15.558.
(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the
western interstate commission for higher education western
undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.
(a) Washington State University 1 percent
(b) Eastern Washington University 3 percent
(c) Central Washington University 3 percent

Sec. 52 RCW 28B.20.130 and 1998 c 245 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
General powers and duties of the board of regents are as follows:
(1) To have full control of the university and its property of
various kinds, except as otherwise provided by law.
(2) To employ the president of the university, his or her
assistants, members of the faculty, and employees of the institution,
who except as otherwise provided by law, shall hold their positions
during the pleasure of said board of regents.
(3) Establish entrance requirements for students seeking admission
to the university which meet or exceed the standards specified under
RCW 28B.80.350(2) (as recodified by this act). Completion of
examinations satisfactory to the university may be a prerequisite for
entrance by any applicant at the university's discretion. Evidence of
completion of public high schools and other educational institutions
whose courses of study meet the approval of the university may be
acceptable for entrance.
(4) Establish such colleges, schools, or departments necessary to
carry out the purpose of the university and not otherwise proscribed by
law.
(5) With the assistance of the faculty of the university, prescribe
the course of study in the various colleges, schools, and departments
of the institution and publish the necessary catalogues thereof.
(6) Grant to students such certificates or degrees as recommended
for such students by the faculty. The board, upon recommendation of
the faculty, may also confer honorary degrees upon persons other than
graduates of this university in recognition of their learning or
devotion to literature, art, or science: PROVIDED, That no degree
shall ever be conferred in consideration of the payment of money or the
giving of property of whatsoever kind.
(7) Accept such gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises,
whether real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, for
the use or benefit of the university, its colleges, schools,
departments, or agencies; and sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend
the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof except as
limited by the terms of said gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and
devises. The board shall adopt proper rules to govern and protect the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds of all fees, and the proceeds,
rents, profits, and income of all gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests,
and devises above-mentioned.
(8) Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such
contracts as the regents deem essential to university purposes.
(9) To submit upon request such reports as will be helpful to the
governor and to the legislature in providing for the institution.
(10) Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating
board pursuant to ((RCW 28B.80.340)) section 9 of this act, offer new
degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia or
centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or
lease major off-campus facilities.

Sec. 53 RCW 28B.30.150 and 1998 c 245 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
The regents of Washington State University, in addition to other
duties prescribed by law, shall:
(1) Have full control of the university and its property of various
kinds, except as otherwise provided by law.
(2) Employ the president of the university, his or her assistants,
members of the faculty, and employees of the university, who, except as
otherwise provided by law, shall hold their positions during the
pleasure of said board of regents.
(3) Establish entrance requirements for students seeking admission
to the university which meet or exceed the standards specified under
RCW 28B.80.350(2) (as recodified by this act). Completion of
examinations satisfactory to the university may be a prerequisite for
entrance by any applicant, at the university's discretion. Evidence of
completion of public high schools and other educational institutions
whose courses of study meet the approval of the university may be
acceptable for entrance.
(4) Establish such colleges, schools, or departments necessary to
carry out the purpose of the university and not otherwise proscribed by
law.
(5) Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating
board pursuant to ((RCW 28B.80.340)) section 9 of this act, offer new
degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia or
centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or
lease major off-campus facilities.
(6) With the assistance of the faculty of the university, prescribe
the courses of instruction in the various colleges, schools, and
departments of the institution and publish the necessary catalogues
thereof.
(7) Collect such information as the board deems desirable as to the
schemes of technical instruction adopted in other parts of the United
States and foreign countries.
(8) Provide for holding agricultural institutes including farm
marketing forums.
(9) Provide that instruction given in the university, as far as
practicable, be conveyed by means of laboratory work and provide in
connection with the university one or more physical, chemical, and
biological laboratories, and suitably furnish and equip the same.
(10) Provide training in military tactics for those students
electing to participate therein.
(11) Establish a department of elementary science and in connection
therewith provide instruction in elementary mathematics, including
elementary trigonometry, elementary mechanics, elementary and
mechanical drawing, and land surveying.
(12) Establish a department of agriculture and in connection
therewith provide instruction in physics with special application of
its principles to agriculture, chemistry with special application of
its principles to agriculture, morphology and physiology of plants with
special reference to common grown crops and fungus enemies, morphology
and physiology of the lower forms of animal life, with special
reference to insect pests, morphology and physiology of the higher
forms of animal life and in particular of the horse, cow, sheep, and
swine, agriculture with special reference to the breeding and feeding
of livestock and the best mode of cultivation of farm produce, and
mining and metallurgy, appointing demonstrators in each of these
subjects to superintend the equipment of a laboratory and to give
practical instruction therein.
(13) Establish agricultural experiment stations in connection with
the department of agriculture, including at least one in the western
portion of the state, and appoint the officers and prescribe
regulations for their management.
(14) Grant to students such certificates or degrees, as recommended
for such students by the faculty.
(15) Confer honorary degrees upon persons other than graduates of
the university in recognition of their learning or devotion to
literature, art, or science when recommended thereto by the faculty:
PROVIDED, That no degree shall ever be conferred in consideration of
the payment of money or the giving of property of whatsoever kind.
(16) Adopt plans and specifications for university buildings and
facilities or improvements thereto and employ skilled architects and
engineers to prepare such plans and specifications and supervise the
construction of buildings or facilities which the board is authorized
to erect, and fix the compensation for such services. The board shall
enter into contracts with one or more contractors for such suitable
buildings, facilities, or improvements as the available funds will
warrant, upon the most advantageous terms offered at a public
competitive letting, pursuant to public notice under rules established
by the board. The board shall require of all persons with whom they
contract for construction and improvements a good and sufficient bond
for the faithful performance of the work and full protection against
all liens.
(17) Except as otherwise provided by law, direct the disposition of
all money appropriated to or belonging to the state university.
(18) Receive and expend the money appropriated under the act of
congress approved May 8, 1914, entitled "An Act to provide for
cooperative agricultural extension work between the agricultural
colleges in the several States receiving the benefits of the Act of
Congress approved July 2, 1862, and Acts supplemental thereto and the
United States Department of Agriculture" and organize and conduct
agricultural extension work in connection with the state university in
accordance with the terms and conditions expressed in the acts of
congress.
(19) Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such
contracts as the regents deem essential to university purposes.
(20) Acquire by lease, gift, or otherwise, lands necessary to
further the work of the university or for experimental or
demonstrational purposes.
(21) Establish and maintain at least one agricultural experiment
station in an irrigation district to conduct investigational work upon
the principles and practices of irrigational agriculture including the
utilization of water and its relation to soil types, crops, climatic
conditions, ditch and drain construction, fertility investigations,
plant disease, insect pests, marketing, farm management, utilization of
fruit byproducts, and general development of agriculture under
irrigation conditions.
(22) Supervise and control the agricultural experiment station at
Puyallup.
(23) Establish and maintain at Wenatchee an agricultural experiment
substation for the purpose of conducting investigational work upon the
principles and practices of orchard culture, spraying, fertilization,
pollenization, new fruit varieties, fruit diseases and pests,
byproducts, marketing, management, and general horticultural problems.
(24) Accept such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests,
whether real or personal property, in trust or otherwise, for the use
or benefit of the university, its colleges, schools, or departments;
and sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the proceeds,
rents, profits, and income thereof except as limited by the terms of
said gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises; and adopt
proper rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the
proceeds of all fees, and the proceeds, rents, profits, and income of
all gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises.
(25) Construct when the board so determines a new foundry and a
mining, physical, technological building, and fabrication shop at the
university, or add to the present foundry and other buildings, in order
that both instruction and research be expanded to include permanent
molding and die casting with a section for new fabricating techniques,
especially for light metals, including magnesium and aluminum; purchase
equipment for the shops and laboratories in mechanical, electrical, and
civil engineering; establish a pilot plant for the extraction of
alumina from native clays and other possible light metal research;
purchase equipment for a research laboratory for technological research
generally; and purchase equipment for research in electronics,
instrumentation, energy sources, plastics, food technology, mechanics
of materials, hydraulics, and similar fields.
(26) Make and transmit to the governor and members of the
legislature upon request such reports as will be helpful in providing
for the institution.

Sec. 54 RCW 28B.35.120 and 1985 c 370 s 94 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties prescribed by law, each
board of trustees of the respective regional universities:
(1) Shall have full control of the regional university and its
property of various kinds, except as otherwise provided by law.
(2) Shall employ the president of the regional university, his
assistants, members of the faculty, and other employees of the
institution, who, except as otherwise provided by law, shall hold their
positions, until discharged therefrom by the board for good and lawful
reason.
(3) With the assistance of the faculty of the regional university,
shall prescribe the course of study in the various schools and
departments thereof and publish such catalogues thereof as the board
deems necessary: PROVIDED, That the state board of education shall
determine the requisites for and give program approval of all courses
leading to teacher certification by such board.
(4) Establish such divisions, schools or departments necessary to
carry out the purposes of the regional university and not otherwise
proscribed by law.
(5) Except as otherwise provided by law, may establish and erect
such new facilities as determined by the board to be necessary for the
regional university.
(6) May acquire real and other property as provided in RCW
28B.10.020, as now or hereafter amended.
(7) Except as otherwise provided by law, may purchase all supplies
and purchase or lease equipment and other personal property needed for
the operation or maintenance of the regional university.
(8) May establish, lease, operate, equip and maintain self-supporting facilities in the manner provided in RCW 28B.10.300 through
28B.10.330, as now or hereafter amended.
(9) Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such
contracts as the trustees deem essential to regional university
purposes.
(10) May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and
bequests of real or personal property from whatsoever source, as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the regional university
programs; sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the
proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof except as limited by the
terms and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income
thereof.
(11) Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating
board pursuant to ((RCW 28B.80.340)) section 9 of this act, offer new
degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia or
centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or
lease major off-campus facilities.
(12) May promulgate such rules and regulations, and perform all
other acts not forbidden by law, as the board of trustees may in its
discretion deem necessary or appropriate to the administration of the
regional university.

Sec. 55 RCW 28B.38.010 and 1998 c 344 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute
is created.
(2) The institute shall be operated and administered as a multi-institutional education and research center, housing appropriate
programs conducted in Spokane under the authority of institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016. Washington independent
and private institutions of higher education may participate as full
partners in any academic and research activities of the institute.
(3) The institute shall house education and research programs
specifically designed to meet the needs of eastern Washington.
(4) The establishment of any education program at the institute and
the lease, purchase, or construction of any site or facility for the
institute is subject to the approval of the higher education
coordinating board under ((RCW 28B.80.340)) section 9 of this act.
(5) The institute shall be headquartered in Spokane.
(6) The mission of the institute is to perform and commercialize
research that benefits the intermediate and long-term economic vitality
of eastern Washington and to develop and strengthen university-industry
relationships through the conduct of research that is primarily of
interest to eastern Washington-based companies or state economic
development programs. The institute shall:
(a) Perform and facilitate research supportive of state science and
technology objectives, particularly as they relate to eastern
Washington industries;
(b) Provide leading edge collaborative research and technology
transfer opportunities primarily to eastern Washington industries;
(c) Provide substantial opportunities for training undergraduate
and graduate students through direct involvement in research and
industry interactions;
(d) Emphasize and develop nonstate support of the institute's
research activities; and
(e) Provide a forum for effective interaction between the state's
technology-based industries and its academic institutions through
promotion of faculty collaboration with industry, particularly within
eastern Washington.

Sec. 56 RCW 28B.40.120 and 1985 c 370 s 95 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties prescribed by law, the
board of trustees of The Evergreen State College:
(1) Shall have full control of the state college and its property
of various kinds, except as otherwise provided by law.
(2) Shall employ the president of the state college, his
assistants, members of the faculty, and other employees of the
institution, who, except as otherwise provided by law, shall hold their
positions, until discharged therefrom by the board for good and lawful
reason.
(3) With the assistance of the faculty of the state college, shall
prescribe the course of study in the various schools and departments
thereof and publish such catalogues thereof as the board deems
necessary: PROVIDED, That the state board of education shall determine
the requisites for and give program approval of all courses leading to
teacher certification by such board.
(4) Establish such divisions, schools or departments necessary to
carry out the purposes of the college and not otherwise proscribed by
law.
(5) Except as otherwise provided by law, may establish and erect
such new facilities as determined by the board to be necessary for the
college.
(6) May acquire real and other property as provided in RCW
28B.10.020, as now or hereafter amended.
(7) Except as otherwise provided by law, may purchase all supplies
and purchase or lease equipment and other personal property needed for
the operation or maintenance of the college.
(8) May establish, lease, operate, equip and maintain self-supporting facilities in the manner provided in RCW 28B.10.300 through
28B.10.330, as now or hereafter amended.
(9) Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such
contracts as the trustees deem essential to college purposes.
(10) May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and
bequests of real or personal property from whatsoever source, as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the college programs; sell,
lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents,
profits and income thereof except as limited by the terms and
conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern the receipt and
expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof.
(11) Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating
board pursuant to ((RCW 28B.80.340)) section 9 of this act, offer new
degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia or
centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or
lease major off-campus facilities.
(12) May promulgate such rules and regulations, and perform all
other acts not forbidden by law, as the board of trustees may in its
discretion deem necessary or appropriate to the administration of the
college.

Sec. 57 RCW 28B.50.090 and 2003 c 130 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The college board shall have general supervision and control over
the state system of community and technical colleges. In addition to
the other powers and duties imposed upon the college board by this
chapter, the college board shall be charged with the following powers,
duties and responsibilities:
(1) Review the budgets prepared by the boards of trustees, prepare
a single budget for the support of the state system of community and
technical colleges and adult education, and submit this budget to the
governor as provided in RCW 43.88.090;
(2) Establish guidelines for the disbursement of funds; and receive
and disburse such funds for adult education and maintenance and
operation and capital support of the college districts in conformance
with the state and district budgets, and in conformance with chapter
43.88 RCW;
(3) Ensure, through the full use of its authority:
(a) That each college district shall offer thoroughly comprehensive
educational, training and service programs to meet the needs of both
the communities and students served by combining high standards of
excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and practical
courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded; and
community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational
nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general,
family, and work force literacy programs and services. However,
technical colleges, and college districts containing only technical
colleges, shall maintain programs solely for occupational education,
basic skills, and literacy purposes. For as long as a need exists,
technical colleges may continue those programs, activities, and
services they offered during the twelve-month period preceding May 17,
1991;
(b) That each college district shall maintain an open-door policy,
to the end that no student will be denied admission because of the
location of the student's residence or because of the student's
educational background or ability; that, insofar as is practical in the
judgment of the college board, curriculum offerings will be provided to
meet the educational and training needs of the community generally and
the students thereof; and that all students, regardless of their
differing courses of study, will be considered, known and recognized
equally as members of the student body: PROVIDED, That the
administrative officers of a community or technical college may deny
admission to a prospective student or attendance to an enrolled student
if, in their judgment, the student would not be competent to profit
from the curriculum offerings of the college, or would, by his or her
presence or conduct, create a disruptive atmosphere within the college
not consistent with the purposes of the institution. This subsection
(3)(b) shall not apply to competency, conduct, or presence associated
with a disability in a person twenty-one years of age or younger
attending a technical college;
(4) Prepare a comprehensive master plan for the development of
community and technical college education and training in the state;
and assist the office of financial management in the preparation of
enrollment projections to support plans for providing adequate college
facilities in all areas of the state. The master plan shall include
implementation of the vision, goals, priorities, and strategies in the
statewide strategic master plan for higher education under RCW
28B.80.345 (as recodified by this act) based on the community and
technical college system's role and mission. The master plan shall
also contain measurable performance indicators and benchmarks for
gauging progress toward achieving the goals and priorities;
(5) Define and administer criteria and guidelines for the
establishment of new community and technical colleges or campuses
within the existing districts;
(6) Establish criteria and procedures for modifying district
boundary lines consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020
as now or hereafter amended and in accordance therewith make such
changes as it deems advisable;
(7) Establish minimum standards to govern the operation of the
community and technical colleges with respect to:
(a) Qualifications and credentials of instructional and key
administrative personnel, except as otherwise provided in the state
plan for vocational education,
(b) Internal budgeting, accounting, auditing, and financial
procedures as necessary to supplement the general requirements
prescribed pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW,
(c) The content of the curriculums and other educational and
training programs, and the requirement for degrees and certificates
awarded by the colleges,
(d) Standard admission policies,
(e) Eligibility of courses to receive state fund support;
(8) Establish and administer criteria and procedures for all
capital construction including the establishment, installation, and
expansion of facilities within the various college districts;
(9) Encourage innovation in the development of new educational and
training programs and instructional methods; coordinate research
efforts to this end; and disseminate the findings thereof;
(10) Exercise any other powers, duties and responsibilities
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;
(11) Authorize the various community and technical colleges to
offer programs and courses in other districts when it determines that
such action is consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020
as now or hereafter amended;
(12) Notwithstanding any other law or statute regarding the sale of
state property, sell or exchange and convey any or all interest in any
community and technical college real and personal property, except such
property as is received by a college district in accordance with RCW
28B.50.140(8), when it determines that such property is surplus or that
such a sale or exchange is in the best interests of the community and
technical college system;
(13) In order that the treasurer for the state board for community
and technical colleges appointed in accordance with RCW 28B.50.085 may
make vendor payments, the state treasurer will honor warrants drawn by
the state board providing for an initial advance on July 1, 1982, of
the current biennium and on July 1 of each succeeding biennium from the
state general fund in an amount equal to twenty-four percent of the
average monthly allotment for such budgeted biennium expenditures for
the state board for community and technical colleges as certified by
the office of financial management; and at the conclusion of such
initial month and for each succeeding month of any biennium, the state
treasurer will reimburse expenditures incurred and reported monthly by
the state board treasurer in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW:
PROVIDED, That the reimbursement to the state board for actual
expenditures incurred in the final month of each biennium shall be less
the initial advance made in such biennium;
(14) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (12) of this
section, may receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical
college programs and may sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the
same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to
the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income
thereof;
(15) The college board shall have the power of eminent domain;
(16) Provide general supervision over the state's technical
colleges. The president of each technical college shall report
directly to the director of the state board for community and technical
colleges, or the director's designee, until local control is assumed by
a new or existing board of trustees as appropriate, except that a
college president shall have authority over program decisions of his or
her college until the establishment of a board of trustees for that
college. The directors of the vocational-technical institutes on March
1, 1991, shall be designated as the presidents of the new technical
colleges.

Sec. 58 RCW 28B.50.140 and 1997 c 281 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each board of trustees:
(1) Shall operate all existing community and technical colleges in
its district;
(2) Shall create comprehensive programs of community and technical
college education and training and maintain an open-door policy in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 28B.50.090(3). However,
technical colleges, and college districts containing only technical
colleges, shall maintain programs solely for occupational education,
basic skills, and literacy purposes. For as long as a need exists,
technical colleges may continue those programs, activities, and
services they offered during the twelve-month period preceding
September 1, 1991;
(3) Shall employ for a period to be fixed by the board a college
president for each community and technical college and, may appoint a
president for the district, and fix their duties and compensation,
which may include elements other than salary. Compensation under this
subsection shall not affect but may supplement retirement, health care,
and other benefits that are otherwise applicable to the presidents as
state employees. The board shall also employ for a period to be fixed
by the board members of the faculty and such other administrative
officers and other employees as may be necessary or appropriate and fix
their salaries and duties. Compensation and salary increases under
this subsection shall not exceed the amount or percentage established
for those purposes in the state appropriations act by the legislature
as allocated to the board of trustees by the state board for community
and technical colleges. The state board for community and technical
colleges shall adopt rules defining the permissible elements of
compensation under this subsection;
(4) May establish, under the approval and direction of the college
board, new facilities as community needs and interests demand.
However, the authority of boards of trustees to purchase or lease major
off-campus facilities shall be subject to the approval of the higher
education coordinating board pursuant to ((RCW 28B.80.340(5))) section
9 of this act;
(5) May establish or lease, operate, equip and maintain
dormitories, food service facilities, bookstores and other self-supporting facilities connected with the operation of the community and
technical college;
(6) May, with the approval of the college board, borrow money and
issue and sell revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness for the
construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping with permanent
fixtures, demolition and major alteration of buildings or other capital
assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements,
improvements or appurtenances, for dormitories, food service
facilities, and other self-supporting facilities connected with the
operation of the community and technical college in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 28B.10.300 through 28B.10.330 where applicable;
(7) May establish fees and charges for the facilities authorized
hereunder, including reasonable rules and regulations for the
government thereof, not inconsistent with the rules and regulations of
the college board; each board of trustees operating a community and
technical college may enter into agreements, subject to rules and
regulations of the college board, with owners of facilities to be used
for housing regarding the management, operation, and government of such
facilities, and any board entering into such an agreement may:
(a) Make rules and regulations for the government, management and
operation of such housing facilities deemed necessary or advisable; and
(b) Employ necessary employees to govern, manage and operate the
same;
(8) May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources, as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical
college programs as specified by law and the regulations of the state
college board; sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or
the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to the terms
and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern the receipt and
expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof;
(9) May establish and maintain night schools whenever in the
discretion of the board of trustees it is deemed advisable, and
authorize classrooms and other facilities to be used for summer or
night schools, or for public meetings and for any other uses consistent
with the use of such classrooms or facilities for community and
technical college purposes;
(10) May make rules and regulations for pedestrian and vehicular
traffic on property owned, operated, or maintained by the district;
(11) Shall prescribe, with the assistance of the faculty, the
course of study in the various departments of the community and
technical college or colleges under its control, and publish such
catalogues and bulletins as may become necessary;
(12) May grant to every student, upon graduation or completion of
a course of study, a suitable diploma, nonbaccalaureate degree or
certificate. Technical colleges shall offer only nonbaccalaureate
technical degrees under the rules of the state board for community and
technical colleges that are appropriate to their work force education
and training mission. The primary purpose of this degree is to lead
the individual directly to employment in a specific occupation.
Technical colleges may not offer transfer degrees. The board, upon
recommendation of the faculty, may also confer honorary associate of
arts degrees upon persons other than graduates of the community
college, in recognition of their learning or devotion to education,
literature, art, or science. No degree may be conferred in
consideration of the payment of money or the donation of any kind of
property;
(13) Shall enforce the rules and regulations prescribed by the
state board for community and technical colleges for the government of
community and technical colleges, students and teachers, and promulgate
such rules and regulations and perform all other acts not inconsistent
with law or rules and regulations of the state board for community and
technical colleges as the board of trustees may in its discretion deem
necessary or appropriate to the administration of college districts:
PROVIDED, That such rules and regulations shall include, but not be
limited to, rules and regulations relating to housing, scholarships,
conduct at the various community and technical college facilities, and
discipline: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the board of trustees may suspend
or expel from community and technical colleges students who refuse to
obey any of the duly promulgated rules and regulations;
(14) May, by written order filed in its office, delegate to the
president or district president any of the powers and duties vested in
or imposed upon it by this chapter. Such delegated powers and duties
may be exercised in the name of the district board;
(15) May perform such other activities consistent with this chapter
and not in conflict with the directives of the college board;
(16) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer
educational services on a contractual basis other than the tuition and
fee basis set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW for a special fee to private
or governmental entities, consistent with rules and regulations adopted
by the state board for community and technical colleges: PROVIDED,
That the whole of such special fee shall go to the college district and
be not less than the full instructional costs of such services
including any salary increases authorized by the legislature for
community and technical college employees during the term of the
agreement: PROVIDED FURTHER, That enrollments generated hereunder
shall not be counted toward the official enrollment level of the
college district for state funding purposes;
(17) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer
educational services on a contractual basis, charging tuition and fees
as set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW, counting such enrollments for state
funding purposes, and may additionally charge a special supplemental
fee when necessary to cover the full instructional costs of such
services: PROVIDED, That such contracts shall be subject to review by
the state board for community and technical colleges and to such rules
as the state board may adopt for that purpose in order to assure that
the sum of the supplemental fee and the normal state funding shall not
exceed the projected total cost of offering the educational service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That enrollments generated by courses offered on the
basis of contracts requiring payment of a share of the normal costs of
the course will be discounted to the percentage provided by the
college;
(18) Shall be authorized to pay dues to any association of trustees
that may be formed by the various boards of trustees; such association
may expend any or all of such funds to submit biennially, or more often
if necessary, to the governor and to the legislature, the
recommendations of the association regarding changes which would affect
the efficiency of such association;
(19) ((Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating
board pursuant to RCW 28B.80.340(4),)) May participate in higher
education centers and consortia that involve any four-year public or
independent college or university: PROVIDED, That new degree programs
or off-campus programs offered by a four-year public or independent
college or university in collaboration with a community or technical
college are subject to approval by the higher education coordinating
board under section 9 of this act; and
(20) Shall perform any other duties and responsibilities imposed by
law or rule and regulation of the state board.

Sec. 59 RCW 28B.95.020 and 2001 c 184 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Academic year" means the regular nine-month, three-quarter, or
two-semester period annually occurring between July 1st and June 30th.
(2) "Account" means the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program account established for the deposit of all money received by
the board from eligible purchasers and interest earnings on investments
of funds in the account, as well as for all expenditures on behalf of
eligible beneficiaries for the redemption of tuition units and for the
development of any authorized college savings program pursuant to RCW
28B.95.150.
(3) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board as
defined in chapter ((28B.80)) 28B.-- RCW (as created in section 76 of
this act).
(4) "Committee on advanced tuition payment" or "committee" means a
committee of the following members: The state treasurer, the director
of the office of financial management, the executive director of the
higher education coordinating board, or their designees, and two
members to be appointed by the governor, one representing program
participants and one private business representative with marketing,
public relations, or financial expertise.
(5) "Governing body" means the committee empowered by the
legislature to administer the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program.
(6) "Contractual obligation" means a legally binding contract of
the state with the purchaser and the beneficiary establishing that
purchases of tuition units will be worth the same number of tuition
units at the time of redemption as they were worth at the time of the
purchase.
(7) "Eligible beneficiary" means the person for whom the tuition
unit will be redeemed for attendance at an institution of higher
education. The beneficiary is that person named by the purchaser at
the time that a tuition unit contract is accepted by the governing
body. With the exception of tuition unit contracts purchased by
qualified organizations as future scholarships, the beneficiary must
reside in the state of Washington or otherwise be a resident of the
state of Washington at the time the tuition unit contract is accepted
by the governing body.
(8) "Eligible purchaser" means an individual or organization that
has entered into a tuition unit contract with the governing body for
the purchase of tuition units for an eligible beneficiary.
(9) "Full-time tuition charges" means resident tuition charges at
a state institution of higher education for enrollments between ten
credits and eighteen credit hours per academic term.
(10) "Institution of higher education" means an institution that
offers education beyond the secondary level and is recognized by the
internal revenue service under chapter 529 of the internal revenue
code.
(11) "Investment board" means the state investment board as defined
in chapter 43.33A RCW.
(12) "State institution of higher education" means institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(13) "Tuition and fees" means undergraduate tuition and services
and activities fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041 rounded
to the nearest whole dollar. The maximum tuition and fees charges
recognized for beneficiaries enrolled in a state technical college
shall be equal to the tuition and fees for the community college
system.
(14) "Tuition unit contract" means a contract between an eligible
purchaser and the governing body, or a successor agency appointed for
administration of this chapter, for the purchase of tuition units for
a specified beneficiary that may be redeemed at a later date for an
equal number of tuition units.
(15) "Unit purchase price" means the minimum cost to purchase one
tuition unit for an eligible beneficiary. Generally, the minimum
purchase price is one percent of the undergraduate weighted average
tuition and fees for the current year, rounded to the nearest whole
dollar, adjusted for the costs of administration and adjusted to ensure
the actuarial soundness of the account. The analysis for price setting
shall also include, but not be limited to consideration of past and
projected patterns of tuition increases, program liability, past and
projected investment returns, and the need for a prudent stabilization
reserve.
(16) "Weighted average tuition" shall be calculated as the sum of
the undergraduate tuition and services and activities fees for each
four-year state institution of higher education, multiplied by the
respective full-time equivalent student enrollment at each institution
divided by the sum total of undergraduate full-time equivalent student
enrollments of all four-year state institutions of higher education,
rounded to the nearest whole dollar.
(17) "Weighted average tuition unit" is the value of the weighted
average tuition and fees divided by one hundred. The weighted average
is the basis upon which tuition benefits may be calculated as the basis
for any refunds provided from the program.

Sec. 60 RCW 28B.119.010 and 2003 c 233 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall design the Washington
promise scholarship program based on the following parameters:
(1) Scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating from
public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW,
students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter
28A.200 RCW, and persons twenty-one years of age or younger receiving
a GED certificate, who meet both an academic and a financial
eligibility criteria.
(a) Academic eligibility criteria shall be defined as follows:
(i) Beginning with the graduating class of 2002, students
graduating from public and approved private high schools under chapter
28A.195 RCW must be in the top fifteen percent of their graduating
class, as identified by each respective high school at the completion
of the first term of the student's senior year; or
(ii) Students graduating from public high schools, approved private
high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW, and persons
twenty-one years of age or younger receiving a GED certificate, must
equal or exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment test I score of
twelve hundred on their first attempt or must equal or exceed a
composite American college test score of twenty-seven on their first
attempt.
(b) To meet the financial eligibility criteria, a student's family
income shall not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent of the state
median family income adjusted for family size, as determined by the
higher education coordinating board for each graduating class.
Students not meeting the eligibility requirements for the first year of
scholarship benefits may reapply for the second year of benefits, but
must still meet the income standard set by the board for the student's
graduating class.
(2) Promise scholarships are not intended to supplant any grant,
scholarship, or tax program related to postsecondary education. If the
board finds that promise scholarships supplant or reduce any grant,
scholarship, or tax program for categories of students, then the board
shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of
scholarship to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.
(3) Within available funds, each qualifying student shall receive
two consecutive annual awards, the value of each not to exceed the
full-time annual resident tuition rates charged by Washington's
community colleges. The higher education coordinating board shall
award scholarships to as many students as possible from among those
qualifying under this section.
(4) By October 15th of each year, the board shall determine the
award amount of the scholarships, after taking into consideration the
availability of funds.
(5) The scholarships may only be used for undergraduate coursework
at accredited institutions of higher education in the state of
Washington.
(6) The scholarships may be used for undergraduate coursework at
Oregon institutions of higher education that are part of the border
county higher education opportunity project in RCW 28B.80.806 (as
recodified by this act) when those institutions offer programs not
available at accredited institutions of higher education in Washington
state.
(7) The scholarships may be used for college-related expenses,
including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books, and
materials.
(8) The scholarships may not be awarded to any student who is
pursuing a degree in theology.
(9) The higher education coordinating board may establish
satisfactory progress standards for the continued receipt of the
promise scholarship.
(10) The higher education coordinating board shall establish the
time frame within which the student must use the scholarship.

Sec. 61 RCW 28C.04.545 and 1999 c 28 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The respective governing boards of the public technical
colleges shall provide fee waivers for a maximum of two years for those
recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence
established under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.540 who received the
award before June 30, 1994. To qualify for the waiver, recipients
shall enter the public technical college within three years of
receiving the award. An above average rating at the technical college
in the first year shall be required to qualify for the second-year
waiver.
(2) Students named by the work force training and education
coordinating board after June 30, 1994, as recipients of the Washington
award for vocational excellence under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.550
shall be eligible to receive a grant for undergraduate course work as
authorized under RCW 28B.80.272 (as recodified by this act).
(3)(a) Beginning with awards made during the 1998-99 academic year,
recipients must complete using the award before the fall term in the
sixth year following the date of the award. For these recipients,
eligibility for the award is forfeited after this period.
(b) All persons awarded a Washington award for vocational
excellence before the 1995-96 academic year and who have remaining
eligibility on April 19, 1999, must complete using the award before
September 2002. For these recipients, eligibility for the award is
forfeited after this period.
(c) All persons awarded a Washington award for vocational
excellence during the 1995-96, 1996-97, and 1997-98 academic years must
complete using the award before September 2005. For these recipients,
eligibility for the award is forfeited after this period.

Sec. 62 RCW 43.105.825 and 1999 c 285 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In overseeing the technical aspects of the K-20 network, the
information services board is not intended to duplicate the statutory
responsibilities of the higher education coordinating board, the
superintendent of public instruction, the information services board,
the state librarian, or the governing boards of the institutions of
higher education.
(2) The board may not interfere in any curriculum or legally
offered programming offered over the network.
(3) ((The coordination of telecommunications planning for
institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 remains
the responsibility of the higher education coordinating board under RCW
28B.80.600. The board may recommend, but not require, revisions to the
higher education coordinating board's telecommunications plan.
(4))) The responsibility to review and approve standards and common
specifications for the network remains the responsibility of the
information services board under RCW 43.105.041.
(((5))) (4) The coordination of telecommunications planning for the
common schools remains the responsibility of the superintendent of
public instruction. Except as set forth in RCW 43.105.041(1)(d), the
board may recommend, but not require, revisions to the superintendent's
telecommunications plans.

Sec. 63 RCW 43.157.010 and 2003 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter and RCW 28A.525.166, 28B.80.330
(as recodified by this act), 28C.18.080, 43.21A.350, 47.06.030, and
90.58.100 and an industrial project of statewide significance is a
border crossing project that involves both private and public
investments carried out in conjunction with adjacent states or
provinces or a private industrial development with private capital
investment in manufacturing or research and development. To qualify as
an industrial project of statewide significance: (a) The project must
be completed after January 1, 1997; (b) the applicant must submit an
application for designation as an industrial project of statewide
significance to the department of community, trade, and economic
development; and (c) the project must have:
(i) In counties with a population of less than or equal to twenty
thousand, a capital investment of twenty million dollars;
(ii) In counties with a population of greater than twenty thousand
but no more than fifty thousand, a capital investment of fifty million
dollars;
(iii) In counties with a population of greater than fifty thousand
but no more than one hundred thousand, a capital investment of one
hundred million dollars;
(iv) In counties with a population of greater than one hundred
thousand but no more than two hundred thousand, a capital investment of
two hundred million dollars;
(v) In counties with a population of greater than two hundred
thousand but no more than four hundred thousand, a capital investment
of four hundred million dollars;
(vi) In counties with a population of greater than four hundred
thousand but no more than one million, a capital investment of six
hundred million dollars;
(vii) In counties with a population of greater than one million, a
capital investment of one billion dollars;
(viii) In counties with fewer than one hundred persons per square
mile as determined annually by the office of financial management and
published by the department of revenue effective for the period July
1st through June 30th, projected full-time employment positions after
completion of construction of fifty or greater;
(ix) In counties with one hundred or more persons per square mile
as determined annually by the office of financial management and
published by the department of revenue effective for the period July
1st through June 30th, projected full-time employment positions after
completion of construction of one hundred or greater; or
(x) Been designated by the director of community, trade, and
economic development as an industrial project of statewide significance
either: (A) Because the county in which the project is to be located
is a distressed county and the economic circumstances of the county
merit the additional assistance such designation will bring; or (B)
because the impact on a region due to the size and complexity of the
project merits such designation.
(2) The term manufacturing shall have the meaning assigned it in
RCW 82.61.010.
(3) The term research and development shall have the meaning
assigned it in RCW 82.61.010.
(4) The term applicant means a person applying to the department of
community, trade, and economic development for designation of a
development project as an industrial project of statewide significance.

Sec. 64 RCW 43.79.465 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 917 are each
amended to read as follows:
The education savings account is created in the state treasury.
The account shall consist of all moneys appropriated to the account by
the legislature.
(1) Ten percent of legislative appropriations to the education
savings account shall be distributed as follows: (a) Fifty percent to
the distinguished professorship trust fund under RCW 28B.10.868 (as
recodified by this act); (b) seventeen percent to the graduate
fellowship trust fund under RCW 28B.10.882 (as recodified by this act);
and (c) thirty-three percent to the college faculty awards trust fund
under RCW 28B.50.837.
(2) The remaining moneys in the education savings account may be
appropriated solely for (a) common school construction projects that
are eligible for funding from the common school construction account,
(b) technology improvements in the common schools, and (c) during the
2001-03 fiscal biennium, technology improvements in public higher
education institutions.

Sec. 65 RCW 28B.15.760 and 1985 c 370 s 79 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 28B.15.762 and 28B.15.764.
(1) "Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a
college or university in the state of Washington which is a member
institution of an accrediting association recognized as such by rule of
the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(3) "Eligible student" means a student registered for at least ten
credit hours or the equivalent and demonstrates achievement of a 3.00
grade point average for each academic year, who is a resident student
as defined by RCW 28B.15.012 through 28B.15.015, who is a "needy
student" as defined in RCW 28B.10.802 (as recodified by this act), and
who has a declared major in a program leading to a degree in teacher
education in a field of science or mathematics, or a certificated
teacher who meets the same credit hour and "needy student" requirements
and is seeking an additional degree in science or mathematics.
(4) "Public school" means a middle school, junior high school, or
high school within the public school system referred to in Article IX
of the state Constitution.
(5) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" means to collect service as a
teacher in a field of science or mathematics at a public school in the
state of Washington in lieu of monetary payment.
(6) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.
(7) "Borrower" means an eligible student who has received a loan
under RCW 28B.15.762.

Sec. 66 RCW 28B.15.820 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Each institution of higher education, including technical
colleges, shall deposit a minimum of three and one-half percent of
revenues collected from tuition and services and activities fees in an
institutional financial aid fund that is hereby created and which shall
be held locally. Moneys in the fund shall be used only for the
following purposes: (a) To make guaranteed long-term loans to eligible
students as provided in subsections (3) through (8) of this section;
(b) to make short-term loans as provided in subsection (9) of this
section; or (c) to provide financial aid to needy students as provided
in subsection (10) of this section.
(2) An "eligible student" for the purposes of subsections (3)
through (8) and (10) of this section is a student registered for at
least six credit hours or the equivalent, who is eligible for resident
tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 ((through [and]))
and 28B.15.013, and who is a "needy student" as defined in RCW
28B.10.802 (as recodified by this act).
(3) The amount of the guaranteed long-term loans made under this
section shall not exceed the demonstrated financial need of the
student. Each institution shall establish loan terms and conditions
which shall be consistent with the terms of the guaranteed loan program
established by 20 U.S. Code Section 1071 et seq., as now or hereafter
amended. All loans made shall be guaranteed by the Washington student
loan guaranty association or its successor agency. Institutions are
hereby granted full authority to operate as an eligible lender under
the guaranteed loan program.
(4) Before approving a guaranteed long-term loan, each institution
shall analyze the ability of the student to repay the loan based on
factors which include, but are not limited to, the student's
accumulated total education loan burdens and the employment
opportunities and average starting salary characteristics of the
student's chosen fields of study. The institution shall counsel the
student on the advisability of acquiring additional debt, and on the
availability of other forms of financial aid.
(5) Each institution is responsible for collection of guaranteed
long-term loans made under this section and shall exercise due
diligence in such collection, maintaining all necessary records to
insure that maximum repayments are made. Institutions shall cooperate
with other lenders and the Washington student loan guaranty
association, or its successor agency, in the coordinated collection of
guaranteed loans, and shall assure that the guarantability of the loans
is not violated. Collection and servicing of guaranteed long-term
loans under this section shall be performed by entities approved for
such servicing by the Washington student loan guaranty association or
its successor agency: PROVIDED, That institutions be permitted to
perform such servicing if specifically recognized to do so by the
Washington student loan guaranty association or its successor agency.
Collection and servicing of guaranteed long-term loans made by
community colleges under subsection (1) of this section shall be
coordinated by the state board for community and technical colleges and
shall be conducted under procedures adopted by the state board.
(6) Receipts from payment of interest or principal or any other
subsidies to which institutions as lenders are entitled, that are paid
by or on behalf of borrowers of funds under subsections (3) through (8)
of this section, shall be deposited in each institution's financial aid
fund and shall be used to cover the costs of making the guaranteed
long-term loans under this section and maintaining necessary records
and making collections under subsection (5) of this section: PROVIDED,
That such costs shall not exceed five percent of aggregate outstanding
loan principal. Institutions shall maintain accurate records of such
costs, and all receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs, shall
be deposited in the institution's financial aid fund.
(7) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College, and the state board for
community and technical colleges, on behalf of the community colleges
and technical colleges, shall each adopt necessary rules and
regulations to implement this section.
(8) First priority for any guaranteed long-term loans made under
this section shall be directed toward students who would not normally
have access to educational loans from private financial institutions in
Washington state, and maximum use shall be made of secondary markets in
the support of loan consolidation.
(9) Short-term loans, not to exceed one year, may be made from the
institutional financial aid fund to students enrolled in the
institution. No such loan shall be made to any student who is known by
the institution to be in default or delinquent in the payment of any
outstanding student loan. A short-term loan may be made only if the
institution has ample evidence that the student has the capability of
repaying the loan within the time frame specified by the institution
for repayment.
(10) Any moneys deposited in the institutional financial aid fund
that are not used in making long-term or short-term loans may be used
by the institution for locally-administered financial aid programs for
needy students, such as need-based institutional employment programs or
need-based tuition and fee scholarship or grant programs. These funds
shall be used in addition to and not to replace institutional funds
that would otherwise support these locally-administered financial aid
programs. First priority in the use of these funds shall be given to
needy students who have accumulated excessive educational loan burdens.
An excessive educational loan burden is a burden that will be difficult
to repay given employment opportunities and average starting salaries
in the student's chosen fields of study. Second priority in the use of
these funds shall be given to needy single parents, to assist these
students with their educational expenses, including expenses associated
with child care and transportation.

Sec. 67 RCW 28B.101.020 and 2003 c 233 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this chapter, "placebound" means unable to
complete a college program because of family or employment commitments,
health concerns, monetary inability, or other similar factors.
(2) To be eligible for an educational opportunity grant, applicants
must be placebound residents of the state of Washington as defined in
RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d), who: (a) Are needy students as
defined in RCW 28B.10.802(3) (as recodified by this act); and (b) have
completed the associate of arts or associate of science degree or the
equivalent. A placebound resident is one who may be influenced by the
receipt of an enhanced student financial aid award to complete a
baccalaureate degree at an eligible institution. An eligible
placebound applicant is further defined as a person who would be unable
to complete a baccalaureate course of study but for receipt of an
educational opportunity grant.

Sec. 68 RCW 28B.102.040 and 1987 c 437 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall establish a planning
committee to develop criteria for the screening and selection of
recipients of the conditional scholarships. These criteria shall
emphasize factors demonstrating excellence including but not limited to
superior scholastic achievement, leadership ability, community
contributions, and an ability to act as a role model for targeted
ethnic minority students. These criteria also may include, for
approximately half of the recipients, requirements that those
recipients meet the definition of "needy student" under RCW 28B.10.802
(as recodified by this act).

Sec. 69 RCW 28B.108.010 and 1991 c 228 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a
college or university in the state of Washington which is accredited by
an accrediting association recognized as such by rule of the higher
education coordinating board.
(2) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(3) "Eligible student" or "student" means an American Indian who is
a financially needy student, as defined in RCW 28B.10.802 (as
recodified by this act), who is a resident student, as defined by RCW
28B.15.012(2), who is a full-time student at an institution of higher
education, and who promises to use his or her education to benefit
other American Indians.

Sec. 70 RCW 28B.115.050 and 1991 c 332 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall establish a planning committee to assist it in
developing criteria for the selection of participants. The board shall
include on the planning committee representatives of the department,
the department of social and health services, appropriate
representatives from health care facilities, provider groups,
consumers, the state board ((of community college education)) for
community and technical colleges, the superintendent of public
instruction, and other appropriate public and private agencies and
organizations. The criteria may require that some of the participants
meet the definition of "needy student" under RCW 28B.10.802 (as
recodified by this act).

Sec. 71 RCW 28B.119.030 and 2002 c 204 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington promise scholarship program shall not be funded at
the expense of the state need grant program as defined in ((RCW
28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824)) chapter 28B.-- RCW (as created in
section 78 of this act). In administering the state need grant and
promise scholarship programs, the higher education coordinating board
shall first ensure that eligibility for state need grant recipients is
at least fifty-five percent of state median family income.

Sec. 72 RCW 28B.133.010 and 2003 c 19 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The educational assistance grant program for students with
dependents is hereby created, subject to the availability of receipts
of gifts, grants, or endowments from private sources. The program is
created to serve financially needy students with dependents eighteen
years of age or younger, by assisting them directly through a grant
program to pursue a degree or certificate at public or private
institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.802 (as
recodified by this act), that participate in the state need grant
program.

Sec. 73 RCW 28B.133.020 and 2003 c 19 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
To be eligible for the educational assistance grant program for
students with dependents, applicants shall: (1) Be residents of the
state of Washington; (2) be needy students as defined in RCW
28B.10.802(3) (as recodified by this act); (3) be eligible to
participate in the state need grant program as set forth under RCW
28B.10.810 (as recodified by this act); and (4) have dependents
eighteen years of age or younger who are under their care.

Sec. 74 RCW 28B.133.050 and 2003 c 19 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The educational assistance grant program for students with
dependents grants may be used by eligible participants to attend any
public or private college or university in the state of Washington as
defined in RCW 28B.10.802 (as recodified by this act). Each
participating student may receive an amount to be determined by the
higher education coordinating board, with a minimum amount of one
thousand dollars per academic year, not to exceed the student's
documented financial need for the course of study as determined by the
institution.
Educational assistance grants for students with dependents are not
intended to supplant any grant scholarship or tax program related to
postsecondary education. If the higher education coordinating board
finds that the educational assistance grants for students with
dependents supplant or reduce any grant, scholarship, or tax program
for categories of students, then the higher education coordinating
board shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of
the grant to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 75 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.10.210 (Blind students, assistance to -- "Blind student"
defined) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.210;
(2) RCW 28B.10.215 (Blind students, assistance to -- Allocation of
funds) and 1985 c 370 s 51, 1982 1st ex.s. c 37 s 6, 1974 ex.s. c 68 s
1, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.215;
(3) RCW 28B.10.220 (Blind students, assistance to -- Administration
of funds) and 1985 c 370 s 52, 1982 1st ex.s. c 37 s 7, 1974 ex.s. c 68
s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.220;
(4) RCW 28B.10.824 (State student financial aid program--Commission, executive director, employees -- Appointment -- Salaries) and
1973 c 62 s 5 & 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 20;
(5) RCW 28B.10.874 (Distinguished professorship trust fund
program -- Transfer of administration -- Recommendations to governor and
legislature) and 1987 c 8 s 9;
(6) RCW 28B.10.887 (Graduate fellowship trust fund program--Transfer of administration) and 1998 c 245 s 14 & 1987 c 147 s 8;
(7) RCW 28B.80.255 (Washington award for excellence -- Use of
academic grant) and 1992 c 83 s 3, 1992 c 50 s 2, & 1991 c 255 s 6;
(8) RCW 28B.80.265 (Washington award for excellence -- Rules) and
1992 c 83 s 4 & 1991 c 255 s 7;
(9) RCW 28B.80.290 (Statewide transfer of credit policy and
agreement -- Requirements) and 1983 c 304 s 2;
(10) RCW 28B.80.320 (Purpose) and 1985 c 370 s 3;
(11) RCW 28B.80.340 (Program responsibilities) and 2003 c 130 s 4
& 1985 c 370 s 5;
(12) RCW 28B.80.440 (Interstate discussions and agreements about
standards and programs for teachers, administrators, and educational
staff associates) and 1987 c 40 s 1;
(13) RCW 28B.80.442 (Interstate discussions -- Support and services
of western interstate commission on higher education) and 1987 c 40 s
2;
(14) RCW 28B.80.450 (Placebound students -- Study of needs) and 1990
c 288 s 1;
(15) RCW 28B.80.500 (Branch campuses -- Adjustment of enrollment
lids) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 2;
(16) RCW 28B.80.520 (Branch campuses -- Facilities acquisition) and
1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 9;
(17) RCW 28B.80.600 (Coordination of telecommunications planning)
and 1996 c 137 s 9 & 1990 c 208 s 9;
(18) RCW 28B.80.610 (Higher education institutional
responsibilities) and 2003 c 130 s 5 & 1993 c 363 s 2;
(19) RCW 28B.80.612 (Identification of methods to reduce
administrative barriers) and 1998 c 245 s 25 & 1993 c 363 s 3;
(20) RCW 28B.80.614 (Study of higher education system operations)
and 1993 c 363 s 4;
(21) RCW 28B.80.616 (Reports to legislature and citizens on
postsecondary educational system -- Reports to board from state board for
community and technical colleges and state institutions of higher
education -- Cooperation with independent colleges and universities) and
1993 c 363 s 5;
(22) RCW 28B.80.910 (Severability -- 1969 ex.s. c 277) and 1969 ex.s.
c 277 s 15;
(23) RCW 28B.80.911 (Severability -- 1985 c 370) and 1985 c 370 s
107; and
(24) RCW 28B.80.912 (Effective dates -- 1985 c 370) and 1985 c 370 s
108.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 76 Sections 1, 9, 11, and 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 77 (1) The following sections are codified or
recodified in the order shown in Part I, General Provisions, of the
chapter created in section 76 of this act:
(a) RCW 28B.80.300;
(b) RCW 28B.80.310;
(c) Section 1 of this act;
(d) RCW 28B.80.390;
(e) RCW 28B.80.400;
(f) RCW 28B.80.410;
(g) RCW 28B.80.420;
(h) RCW 28B.80.110;
(i) RCW 28B.80.430;
(j) RCW 28B.80.380;
(k) RCW 28B.80.200; and
(l) RCW 28B.80.370.
(2) The following sections are codified or recodified in the order
shown in Part II, Policy and Planning, of the chapter created in
section 76 of this act:
(a) RCW 28B.80.345;
(b) RCW 28B.80.330;
(c) RCW 28B.80.335;
(d) Section 9 of this act;
(e) RCW 28B.80.280;
(f) Section 11 of this act;
(g) Section 12 of this act;
(h) RCW 28B.80.350;
(i) RCW 28B.10.044;
(j) RCW 28B.15.070;
(k) RCW 28B.15.076; and
(l) RCW 28B.80.175.
(3) The following sections are recodified in the order shown in
Part III, Education Services Administration, of the chapter created in
section 76 of this act:
(a) RCW 28B.80.240;
(b) RCW 28B.80.210;
(c) RCW 28B.80.230;
(d) RCW 28B.80.180;
(e) RCW 28B.80.360;
(f) RCW 28B.10.859;
(g) RCW 28B.10.866;
(h) RCW 28B.10.867;
(i) RCW 28B.10.868;
(j) RCW 28B.10.869;
(k) RCW 28B.10.870;
(l) RCW 28B.10.871;
(m) RCW 28B.10.872;
(n) RCW 28B.10.873;
(o) RCW 28B.10.880;
(p) RCW 28B.10.881;
(q) RCW 28B.10.882;
(r) RCW 28B.10.883;
(s) RCW 28B.10.884;
(t) RCW 28B.10.885;
(u) RCW 28B.10.886;
(v) RCW 28B.80.150;
(w) RCW 28B.80.160;
(x) RCW 28B.80.170;
(y) RCW 28B.80.245;
(z) RCW 28B.80.246;
(aa) RCW 28B.80.272;
(bb) RCW 28B.80.805;
(cc) RCW 28B.80.806;
(dd) RCW 28B.80.807;
(ee) RCW 28B.80.620;
(ff) RCW 28B.80.622;
(gg) RCW 28B.80.624;
(hh) RCW 28B.80.626; and
(ii) RCW 28B.80.810.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 78 The following sections are recodified in a
new chapter in Title 28B RCW:
(1) RCW 28B.10.800;
(2) RCW 28B.10.801;
(3) RCW 28B.10.802;
(4) RCW 28B.10.804;
(5) RCW 28B.10.806;
(6) RCW 28B.10.808;
(7) RCW 28B.10.8081;
(8) RCW 28B.10.810;
(9) RCW 28B.10.812;
(10) RCW 28B.10.814;
(11) RCW 28B.10.816;
(12) RCW 28B.10.818;
(13) RCW 28B.10.820;
(14) RCW 28B.10.821; and
(15) RCW 28B.10.822.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 79 RCW 28B.80.510 is recodified as a new
section in chapter 28B.45 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 80 Part headings used in this act are not part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 81 Sections 26 and 27 of this act expire
January 30, 2005.

--- END ---