BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.380 and 2003 c 329 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For
purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the
water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows,
averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right. Such
an annual consumptive quantity is only a consumptive use portion of the
amount of water available under the right that may be spread to provide
water for both existing and new or expanded uses of the water; it does
not define the extent of the right. Before any transfer of such right
to use water or change of the point of diversion of water or change of
purpose of use can be made, any person having an interest in the
transfer or change, shall file a written application therefor with the
department, and the application shall not be granted until notice of
the application is published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. If the
application involves only a change in the point of diversion of the
right, a change in the place of use of the right, or both such changes,
and the purpose of use of the right was and remains under the
application the irrigation of one or more crops, the quantity of water
authorized to be used under such a change is the same as the quantity
of water authorized for use under the right before the change. If it
shall appear that such transfer or such change may be made without
injury or detriment to existing rights, the department shall issue to
the applicant a certificate in duplicate granting the right for such
transfer or for such change of point of diversion or of use. The
certificate so issued shall be filed and be made a record with the
department and the duplicate certificate issued to the applicant may be
filed with the county auditor in like manner and with the same effect
as provided in the original certificate or permit to divert water.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by
the state through the funding of water conservation projects under
chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(8) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring a change or
transfer of any existing water right to enable the holder of the right
to store water governed by the right.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.44.100 and 2003 c 329 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
ground water right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
ground waters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public ground water as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not, except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, enlarge the right conveyed by the
original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing rights shall not
be impaired. The department may specify an approved manner of
construction and shall require a showing of compliance with the terms
of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of an
original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public ground water as the original
well or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not, except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, enlarge the right conveyed by the
original water use permit or certificate; (d) the construction and use
of the well shall not interfere with or impair water rights with an
earlier date of priority than the water right or rights for the
original well or wells; (e) the replacement or additional well shall be
located no closer than the original well to a well it might interfere
with; (f) the department may specify an approved manner of construction
of the well; and (g) the department shall require a showing of
compliance with the conditions of this subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original
public notice published for the application for the water right for the
well.
(5) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring an amendment of any
existing water right to enable the holder of the right to store water
governed by the right.
(6) If an application filed or action taken under this section
involves only a change in the point of withdrawal of the right, a
change in the place of use of the right, or both such changes, and the
purpose of use of the right was and remains the irrigation of one or
more crops, the quantity of water authorized to be used under such a
change is the same as the quantity of water authorized for use under
the right before the change.

--- END ---