BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
This section applies to an existing surface or ground water right.
At the request of the holder or holders of the right, the department
shall divide the water right into two or more water rights. If the
water right is held by more than one person, such a division of the
right may include dividing the right among the various holders of the
right. Such a division of the right does not constitute a change,
transfer, or amendment of the water right and a calculation of an
annual consumptive quantity of water under RCW 90.03.380(1) does not
apply to such a division. If the holder or holders of the water right
agree to the division proposed by the department, the water right is
divided and the department shall issue and record superseding
certificates or other appropriate documents to the holder or holders of
the divided right to reflect its division.
The division of a water right under the authority of this section
does not constitute an adjudication of the right to use water as
between the water right holder or holders and the state or as between
the water right holder or holders and persons with other water rights.

--- END ---