BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the need to
address listings that are made under the federal endangered species act
(16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) in a way that will make the most
efficient uses of existing regional efforts. The legislature finds
that the southwest Washington pilot program created by the legislature
in 1998 for regional fish recovery in Clark, Cowlitz, Lewis, Skamania,
and Wahkiakum counties is a successful model that should be used for
other regional fish recovery programs. It is the intent of the
legislature to address statewide fish listings in a manner that takes
advantage of all state and local efforts, and in a manner consistent
with the lessons learned in the southwest Washington pilot program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A program for local or regional fish
recovery is established for Asotin, Columbia, Garfield, Walla Walla,
and Whitman counties. The management board created under section 3 of
this act is responsible for the operation, funding, support, and
jurisdiction for the development of: (1) Salmon and steelhead recovery
plans; (2) implementation of the recovery plan; and (3) other programs
and projects as deemed necessary for the recovery of fish.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The management board is created. The
management board shall consist of representatives of the local or
regional interests. The number of members, qualifications, terms, and
responsibilities of the management board shall be specified in an
interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW or resolution of a local
government. The interlocal agreement or resolution may be changed from
time to time to reflect changing circumstances.
(2) The management board shall, at a minimum, have the following
powers and duties:
(a) The management board is responsible for the development of a
salmon and steelhead recovery plan and the implementation of any
projects or efforts conceived under the recovery plan. While
developing the recovery plan, the management board shall work in
cooperation with the state and national marine fisheries service or the
United States fish and wildlife service to address habitat for aquatic
species that may be listed, or subsequently listed, under the federal
endangered species act.
(b) The management board may not exercise authority over land or
water within the individual counties or otherwise preempt the authority
of other units of local government.
(c) The management board must prioritize and approve projects and
programs as it deems appropriate and related to salmon and steelhead
recovery within the region, including the funding of those projects and
programs, and must coordinate local government efforts as prescribed in
the recovery plan.
(d) The management board must establish criteria for funding
projects and programs based on the project's or program's likely value
in salmon and steelhead recovery. The management board may consider
local economic impact among the criteria, but jurisdictional boundaries
and factors related to jurisdictional population may not be considered
as part of the criteria.
(e) The management board shall assess the factors for decline along
each prioritized stream as identified in the recovery plan. The
management board is encouraged to take a stream-by-stream approach in
conducting the assessment that utilizes state and local expertise,
including volunteer groups, interest groups, and affected units of
local government.
(f) The management board shall ensure that watershed management and
fish recovery plans are consistent and compatible with each other.
(g) The management board shall work with state and local
governments to develop and implement coordinated regional public
education and involvement efforts. These efforts shall help inform the
public of fish recovery efforts, solicit public participation in the
development of recovery plans, projects, and programs, and promote
volunteer participation in recovery and restoration activities.
(h) The management board has authority to: Hire and fire staff,
including an executive director; enter into contracts; accept grants
and other moneys; disburse funds; and make recommendations to cities
and counties regarding potential code changes and the development of
programs and incentives. The management board must pay all necessary
expenses, and choose a fiduciary agent.
(i) The management board shall report on its progress on a
quarterly basis to the legislative bodies that are signatories to the
interlocal agreement or resolution of a local government.
(j) Any additional authorities and responsibilities of the
management board must be described in an interlocal agreement or
resolution of a local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The management board shall appoint and
consult with a technical advisory committee. The technical advisory
committee includes four representatives of the following state
agencies: The commissioner of public lands; and the directors of the
departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and transportation. The
agencies may recommend one member each to the technical advisory
committee. The management board may appoint the representatives from
the state agencies and any additional members to the technical advisory
committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 No action may be brought or maintained
against any management board member, the management board, or any of
its agents, officers, or employees for any noncontractual acts or
omissions in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

--- END ---