BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.16.035 and 1999 c 7 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The department shall classify all occupations or industries in
accordance with their degree of hazard and fix therefor basic rates of
premium which shall be:
(a) The lowest necessary to maintain actuarial solvency of the
accident and medical aid funds in accordance with recognized insurance
principles; and
(b) Designed to attempt to limit fluctuations in premium rates.
(2) The department shall formulate and adopt rules ((and
regulations)):
(a) Governing the method of premium calculation and collection and
providing for a rating system consistent with recognized principles of
workers' compensation insurance which shall be designed to stimulate
and encourage accident prevention and to facilitate collection. The
department may annually, or at such other times as it deems necessary
to ((maintain solvency of the funds)) achieve the objectives under this
section, readjust rates in accordance with the rating system to become
effective on such dates as the department may designate; and
(b) In consultation with the workers' compensation advisory
committee:
(i) Regarding the level of the contingency reserve needed to
maintain actuarial solvency of the accident and medical aid funds and
limit premium rate fluctuations. This may include more than one level,
with the level in effect to be determined by economic factors or other
conditions specified in the rules; and
(ii) When the level of the contingency reserve exceeds the amount
required under the rules:
(A) Prohibiting dividends or other similar measures that give
refunds, or account credits, to employers of premiums paid or of
surplus funds; and
(B) Establishing a process under which the department may
temporarily reduce rates below the rates fixed under subsection (1) of
this section, but only if: (I) Employers are notified of the fixed
rate, the temporary rate, the period over which the temporary rate
applies, and the reason for adopting a reduced rate; and (II) the
appropriate committees of the legislature are notified of any proposed
action under this subsection (2)(b)(ii)(B) at least sixty days before
taking the action.
(((2))) (3) In providing a retrospective rating plan under RCW
51.18.010, the department may consider each individual retrospective
rating group as a single employing entity for purposes of dividends or
premium discounts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within ten working days after the department files proposed
rules adopting industrial insurance rates, the department shall, at the
request of either the labor members or the business members of the
workers' compensation advisory committee, or both, contract for an
independent actuarial audit of the rate-setting process. The scope of
the audit may include, but is not limited to, a review of whether the
assumptions used by the department in setting rates are appropriate to
ensure actuarial solvency of the accident and medical aid funds as
required in RCW 51.16.035, and whether the department's rate-setting
process is appropriately designed to limit premium rate fluctuations.
(2) The results of the actuarial audit, and any auditor
recommendations, must be reported to the workers' compensation advisory
committee, the governor, and the appropriate committees of the
legislature.
(3) The cost of the audit shall be paid from the accident and
medical aid funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act applies to industrial
insurance rates adopted by the department of labor and industries that
take effect on or after January 1, 2005.

--- END ---