BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.515
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The Washington emergency school repair and renovation grant
program is created to help class two school districts pay for
nonrecurring costs associated with urgent facilities repairs and
renovations necessary to address one or more of the following:
(a) Health and safety risks;
(b) Fire and building code deficiencies;
(c) Access for disabled students; and
(d) Asbestos abatement or removal.
(2) The types of urgent facilities repairs and renovations that may
be funded in a given year may be determined by any legislation
providing funds for the program.
(3) Through the program, the superintendent of public instruction
may provide grants to eligible school districts for the purposes in
subsection (1) of this section. The grants may address facility
components that include but need not be limited to:
(a) Fire alarm and fire sprinkler systems;
(b) Heating and ventilation or cooling systems;
(c) Roof membranes and structures;
(d) Window systems;
(e) Plumbing, sewage, or septic systems;
(f) Elevators and wheelchair lifts;
(g) Door and exiting systems;
(h) Foundations and floor finishes; and
(i) Electrical wiring.
(4) Funds for the program may not be used for ongoing costs or any
of the following purposes:
(a) Construction of new facilities;
(b) Stadiums or facilities used for athletics or exhibitions or
where admission is charged to the general public;
(c) Facility maintenance; or
(d) The cost of the grant application.
(5) The state board of education shall adopt rules and may adopt
guidelines for the program. The rules or guidelines, which shall be
adopted in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction:
(a) Shall provide first priority for small and rural school
districts that have attempted but not passed a school maintenance and
operation or school bond levy that included the purpose of the
requested grant;
(b) May include additional priorities that provide a determined
percentage of funds for high poverty school districts and small and
rural school districts not included in the first priority category;
(c) Shall include a definition of "small and rural school district"
and "high poverty school district";
(d) Shall include guidance on grant applications and awards,
participant selection, permissible use of grant funds, and project
accountability; and
(e) Shall permit a simple and streamlined application and reporting
process for program participants.
(6) The program shall be administered by the superintendent of
public instruction.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.515.320 and 1996 c 186 s 503 are each amended to
read as follows:
The common school construction fund is to be used exclusively for
the purpose of financing the construction of facilities for the common
schools and for the purposes of section 1 of this act. The sources of
said fund shall be: (1) Those proceeds derived from sale or
appropriation of timber and other crops from school and state land
other than those granted for specific purposes; (2) the interest
accruing on the permanent common school fund less the allocations to
the state treasurer's service ((account [fund])) fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190 and the state investment board expense account pursuant to
RCW 43.33A.160 together with all rentals and other revenue derived
therefrom and from land and other property devoted to the permanent
common school fund; (3) all moneys received by the state from the
United States under the provisions of section 191, Title 30, United
States Code, Annotated, and under section 810, chapter 12, Title 16,
(Conservation), United States Code, Annotated, except moneys received
before June 30, 2001, and when thirty megawatts of geothermal power is
certified as commercially available by the receiving utilities and the
department of community, trade, and economic development, eighty
percent of such moneys, under the Geothermal Steam Act of 1970 pursuant
to RCW 43.140.030; and (4) such other sources as the legislature may
direct. That portion of the common school construction fund derived
from interest on the permanent common school fund may be used to retire
such bonds as may be authorized by law for the purpose of financing the
construction of facilities for the common schools.
The interest accruing on the permanent common school fund less the
allocations to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190 and the state investment board expense account pursuant to
RCW 43.33A.160 together with all rentals and other revenues accruing
thereto pursuant to subsection (2) of this section prior to July 1,
1967, shall be exclusively applied to the current use of the common
schools.
To the extent that the moneys in the common school construction
fund are in excess of the amount necessary to allow fulfillment of the
purpose of said fund, the excess shall be available for deposit to the
credit of the permanent common school fund or available for the current
use of the common schools, as the legislature may direct. Any money
from the common school construction fund ((which)) that is made
available for the current use of the common schools shall be restored
to the fund by appropriation, including interest income ((foregone
[forgone])) forgone, before the end of the next fiscal biennium
following such use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---