BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.130 and 1990 c 132 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of health shall:
(1) Exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed
by law with respect to public health and vital statistics;
(2) Investigate and study factors relating to the preservation,
promotion, and improvement of the health of the people, the causes of
morbidity and mortality, and the effects of the environment and other
conditions upon the public health, and report the findings to the state
board of health for such action as the board determines is necessary;
(3) Strictly enforce all laws for the protection of the public
health and the improvement of sanitary conditions in the state, and all
rules, regulations, and orders of the state board of health;
(4) Enforce the public health laws of the state and the rules and
regulations promulgated by the department or the board of health in
local matters, when in its opinion an emergency exists and the local
board of health has failed to act with sufficient promptness or
efficiency, or is unable for reasons beyond its control to act, or when
no local board has been established, and all expenses so incurred shall
be paid upon demand of the secretary of the department of health by the
local health department for which such services are rendered, out of
moneys accruing to the credit of the municipality or the local health
department in the current expense fund of the county;
(5) Investigate outbreaks and epidemics of disease that may occur
and advise local health officers as to measures to be taken to prevent
and control the same;
(6) Exercise general supervision over the work of all local health
departments and establish uniform reporting systems by local health
officers to the state department of health;
(7) Have the same authority as local health officers, except that
the secretary shall not exercise such authority unless the local health
officer fails or is unable to do so, or when in an emergency the safety
of the public health demands it, or by agreement with the local health
officer or local board of health;
(8) Cause to be made from time to time, personal health and
sanitation inspections at state owned or contracted institutions and
facilities to determine compliance with sanitary and health care
standards as adopted by the department, and require the governing
authorities thereof to take such action as will conserve the health of
all persons connected therewith, and report the findings to the
governor;
(9) Review and approve plans for public water system design,
engineering, operation, maintenance, financing, and emergency response,
as required under state board of health rules;
(10) Take such measures as the secretary deems necessary in order
to promote the public health, to establish or participate in the
establishment of health educational or training activities, and to
provide funds for and to authorize the attendance and participation in
such activities of employees of the state or local health departments
and other individuals engaged in programs related to or part of the
public health programs of the local health departments or the state
department of health. The secretary is also authorized to accept any
funds from the federal government or any public or private agency made
available for health education training purposes and to conform with
such requirements as are necessary in order to receive such funds;
((and))
(11) Establish and maintain laboratory facilities and services as
are necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the department; and
(12) Develop and distribute a pamphlet or other educational
material that emphasizes the benefits and importance of couples
limiting themselves to two or fewer children to promote population
sustainability.

--- END ---