BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes the
importance of prevention in obtaining the goal of zero oil spills to
waters of the state. The legislature also recognizes that the
regulation of oil and fuel transfers on or near waters of the state
vary depending on many factors including the type of facility or
equipment that is used, the type of products being transferred, where
the transfer takes place, and the type of vessels involved in the
transfer. The legislature therefore finds that the department of
ecology shall initiate a review of the current statewide marine fueling
practices for covered vessels and ships as those terms are defined in
RCW 88.46.010.
(2) The department of ecology shall work with stakeholders to
develop a report describing:
(a) The types of fueling practices being employed by covered
vessels and ships;
(b) The current spill prevention planning requirements that are
applicable under state and federal law for covered vessels and ships;
and
(c) The current spill response requirements under state and federal
law for covered vessels and ships.
(3) The department of ecology shall report recommendations for
regulatory improvements for covered vessel and ship fueling. These
recommendations must include any new authorities that the department of
ecology believes are necessary to establish a protective regulatory
system for the fueling of covered vessels and ships. The department of
ecology shall consider any applicable federal requirements and the
state's desire to not duplicate federal vessel fueling laws. The
department of ecology shall also provide recommendations for funding to
implement recommendations.
(4) The department of ecology shall deliver the report with its
recommendations and findings to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 15, 2004.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.56.200 and 2000 c 69 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner or operator for each onshore and offshore facility
and any state agency conducting ship refueling or bunkering of more
than one million gallons of oil on the waters of the state during any
calendar year shall prepare and submit to the department an oil spill
prevention plan in conformance with the requirements of this chapter.
The plans shall be submitted to the department in the time and manner
directed by the department. The spill prevention plan may be
consolidated with a spill contingency plan submitted pursuant to RCW
90.56.210. The department may accept plans prepared to comply with
other state or federal law as spill prevention plans to the extent
those plans comply with the requirements of this chapter. The
department, by rule, shall establish standards for spill prevention
plans.
(2) The spill prevention plan for an onshore or offshore facility
and state agencies identified under subsection (1) of this section
shall:
(a) Establish compliance with the federal oil pollution act of
1990, if applicable, and financial responsibility requirements under
federal and state law;
(b) Certify that supervisory and other key personnel in charge of
transfer, storage, and handling of oil have received certification
pursuant to RCW 90.56.220;
(c) Certify that the facility has an operations manual required by
RCW 90.56.230;
(d) Certify the implementation of alcohol and drug use awareness
programs;
(e) Describe the facility's maintenance and inspection program and
contain a current maintenance and inspection record of the storage and
transfer facilities and related equipment;
(f) Describe the facility's alcohol and drug treatment programs;
(g) Describe spill prevention technology that has been installed,
including overflow alarms, automatic overflow cut-off switches,
secondary containment facilities, and storm water retention, treatment,
and discharge systems;
(h) Describe any discharges of oil to the land or the water of more
than twenty-five barrels in the prior five years and the measures taken
to prevent a reoccurrence;
(i) Describe the procedures followed by the facility to contain and
recover any oil that spills during the transfer of oil to or from the
facility;
(j) Provide for the incorporation into the facility during the
period covered by the plan of those measures that will provide the best
achievable protection for the public health and the environment; and
(k) Include any other information reasonably necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter required by rules adopted by the
department.
(3) The department shall only approve a prevention plan if it
provides the best achievable protection from damages caused by the
discharge of oil into the waters of the state and if it determines that
the plan meets the requirements of this section and rules adopted by
the department.
(4) Upon approval of a prevention plan, the department shall
provide to the person submitting the plan a statement indicating that
the plan has been approved, the facilities covered by the plan, and
other information the department determines should be included.
(5) The approval of a prevention plan shall be valid for five
years. An owner or operator of a facility shall notify the department
in writing immediately of any significant change of which it is aware
affecting its prevention plan, including changes in any factor set
forth in this section or in rules adopted by the department. The
department may require the owner or operator to update a prevention
plan as a result of these changes.
(6) The department by rule shall require prevention plans to be
reviewed, updated, if necessary, and resubmitted to the department at
least once every five years.
(7) Approval of a prevention plan by the department does not
constitute an express assurance regarding the adequacy of the plan nor
constitute a defense to liability imposed under this chapter or other
state law.
(8) This section does not authorize the department to modify the
terms of a collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.56.210 and 2000 c 69 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each onshore and offshore facility and any state agency
conducting ship refueling or bunkering of more than one million gallons
of oil on the waters of the state during any calendar year shall have
a contingency plan for the containment and cleanup of oil spills from
the facility into the waters of the state and for the protection of
fisheries and wildlife, natural resources, and public and private
property from such spills. The department shall by rule adopt and
periodically revise standards for the preparation of contingency plans.
The department shall require contingency plans, at a minimum, to meet
the following standards:
(a) Include full details of the method of response to spills of
various sizes from any facility which is covered by the plan;
(b) Be designed to be capable in terms of personnel, materials, and
equipment, of promptly and properly, to the maximum extent practicable,
as defined by the department removing oil and minimizing any damage to
the environment resulting from a worst case spill;
(c) Provide a clear, precise, and detailed description of how the
plan relates to and is integrated into relevant contingency plans which
have been prepared by cooperatives, ports, regional entities, the
state, and the federal government;
(d) Provide procedures for early detection of oil spills and timely
notification of such spills to appropriate federal, state, and local
authorities under applicable state and federal law;
(e) State the number, training preparedness, and fitness of all
dedicated, prepositioned personnel assigned to direct and implement the
plan;
(f) Incorporate periodic training and drill programs to evaluate
whether personnel and equipment provided under the plan are in a state
of operational readiness at all times;
(g) Describe important features of the surrounding environment,
including fish and wildlife habitat, environmentally and
archaeologically sensitive areas, and public facilities. The
departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and
the office of archaeology and historic preservation, upon request,
shall provide information that they have available to assist in
preparing this description. The description of archaeologically
sensitive areas shall not be required to be included in a contingency
plan until it is reviewed and updated pursuant to subsection (9) of
this section;
(h) State the means of protecting and mitigating effects on the
environment, including fish, marine mammals, and other wildlife, and
ensure that implementation of the plan does not pose unacceptable risks
to the public or the environment;
(i) Provide arrangements for the prepositioning of oil spill
containment and cleanup equipment and trained personnel at strategic
locations from which they can be deployed to the spill site to promptly
and properly remove the spilled oil;
(j) Provide arrangements for enlisting the use of qualified and
trained cleanup personnel to implement the plan;
(k) Provide for disposal of recovered spilled oil in accordance
with local, state, and federal laws;
(l) Until a spill prevention plan has been submitted pursuant to
RCW 90.56.200, state the measures that have been taken to reduce the
likelihood that a spill will occur, including but not limited to,
design and operation of a facility, training of personnel, number of
personnel, and backup systems designed to prevent a spill;
(m) State the amount and type of equipment available to respond to
a spill, where the equipment is located, and the extent to which other
contingency plans rely on the same equipment; and
(n) If the department has adopted rules permitting the use of
dispersants, the circumstances, if any, and the manner for the
application of the dispersants in conformance with the department's
rules.
(2)(a) The following shall submit contingency plans to the
department within six months after the department adopts rules
establishing standards for contingency plans under subsection (1) of
this section:
(i) Onshore facilities capable of storing one million gallons or
more of oil; and
(ii) Offshore facilities.
(b) Contingency plans for all other onshore and offshore facilities
shall be submitted to the department within eighteen months after the
department has adopted rules under subsection (1) of this section. The
department may adopt a schedule for submission of plans within the
eighteen-month period.
(3)(a) The owner or operator of a facility shall submit the
contingency plan for the facility.
(b) A person who has contracted with a facility to provide
containment and cleanup services and who meets the standards
established pursuant to RCW 90.56.240, may submit the plan for any
facility for which the person is contractually obligated to provide
services. Subject to conditions imposed by the department, the person
may submit a single plan for more than one facility.
(4) A contingency plan prepared for an agency of the federal
government or another state that satisfies the requirements of this
section and rules adopted by the department may be accepted by the
department as a contingency plan under this section. The department
shall ((assure)) ensure that to the greatest extent possible,
requirements for contingency plans under this section are consistent
with the requirements for contingency plans under federal law.
(5) In reviewing the contingency plans required by this section,
the department shall consider at least the following factors:
(a) The adequacy of containment and cleanup equipment, personnel,
communications equipment, notification procedures and call down lists,
response time, and logistical arrangements for coordination and
implementation of response efforts to remove oil spills promptly and
properly and to protect the environment;
(b) The nature and amount of vessel traffic within the area covered
by the plan;
(c) The volume and type of oil being transported within the area
covered by the plan;
(d) The existence of navigational hazards within the area covered
by the plan;
(e) The history and circumstances surrounding prior spills of oil
within the area covered by the plan;
(f) The sensitivity of fisheries and wildlife and other natural
resources within the area covered by the plan;
(g) Relevant information on previous spills contained in on-scene
coordinator reports prepared by the department; and
(h) The extent to which reasonable, cost-effective measures to
prevent a likelihood that a spill will occur have been incorporated
into the plan.
(6) The department shall approve a contingency plan only if it
determines that the plan meets the requirements of this section and
that, if implemented, the plan is capable, in terms of personnel,
materials, and equipment, of removing oil promptly and properly and
minimizing any damage to the environment.
(7) The approval of the contingency plan shall be valid for five
years. Upon approval of a contingency plan, the department shall
provide to the person submitting the plan a statement indicating that
the plan has been approved, the facilities or vessels covered by the
plan, and other information the department determines should be
included.
(8) An owner or operator of a facility shall notify the department
in writing immediately of any significant change of which it is aware
affecting its contingency plan, including changes in any factor set
forth in this section or in rules adopted by the department. The
department may require the owner or operator to update a contingency
plan as a result of these changes.
(9) The department by rule shall require contingency plans to be
reviewed, updated, if necessary, and resubmitted to the department at
least once every five years.
(10) Approval of a contingency plan by the department does not
constitute an express assurance regarding the adequacy of the plan nor
constitute a defense to liability imposed under this chapter or other
state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 2 and section 3 of this act, referencing these sections of this
act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2004, in the
2003-2005 Transportation Budget, section 2 and section 3 of this act
are null and void.

--- END ---