BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
To fulfill their responsibilities under RCW 47.64.120, the ferry
system management and the ferry system employees shall negotiate as
required under this chapter regarding the practice of including
specific clauses in Washington state ferry system requests for
proposals for contracts to operate vessel galley services that would
require the contractor to:
(1) Give preference in hiring employees to perform services under
the contract to those galley employees that were providing vessel
galley services under the contract with the previous food service
operator; and
(2) Apply to its employees performing services under the contract
the same terms and conditions that were applicable to employees
providing vessel galley services under the contract with the previous
food service operator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that the jurisdiction
of the marine employees' commission is a matter of continuing and
substantial public interest. This act is not intended to affect or
impair the power of any court or judge having jurisdiction to review
any decision of the marine employees' commission upon appeal as
provided by chapter 47.64 RCW.

--- END ---