BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.090 and 2000 c 122 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any party has a right to be represented by an attorney in all
proceedings under this chapter, to introduce evidence, to be heard in
his or her own behalf, to examine witnesses, to receive a decision
based solely on the evidence adduced at the hearing, and to an unbiased
fact-finder.
(2) At all stages of a proceeding in which a child is alleged to be
dependent, the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian has the
right to be represented by counsel, and if indigent, to have counsel
appointed for him or her by the court. Unless waived in court, counsel
shall be provided to the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian,
if such person (a) has appeared in the proceeding or requested the
court to appoint counsel and (b) is financially unable to obtain
counsel because of indigency.
(3) If a party to an action under this chapter is represented by
counsel, no order shall be provided to that party for his or her
signature without prior notice and provision of the order to counsel.
(4) The fact-finder may order expert evaluations of parties.
Expert evaluations shall be performed by appointed evaluators who are
mutually agreed upon by the court, the state, and parents' counsel,
and, if the child is to be evaluated, by counsel for the child. If no
agreement can be reached, the court shall select the expert evaluator.
(5) Copies of department of social and health services or
supervising agency records to which parents have legal access pursuant
to chapter 13.50 RCW shall be given to the child's parent, guardian,
legal custodian, or his or her legal counsel, prior to any shelter care
hearing and within fifteen days after the department or supervising
agency receives a written request for such records from the parent,
guardian, legal custodian, or his or her legal counsel. These records
shall be provided to the child's parents, guardian, legal custodian, or
legal counsel a reasonable period of time prior to the shelter care
hearing in order to allow an opportunity to review the records prior to
the hearing. These records shall be legible and shall be provided at
no expense to the parents, guardian, legal custodian, or his or her
counsel. When the records are served on legal counsel, legal counsel
shall have the opportunity to review the records with the parents and
shall review the records with the parents prior to the shelter care
hearing.

--- END ---