BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature provided tax relief to
blood, bone, and tissue banks in chapter 9, Laws of 1995 2nd sp. sess.
The legislature finds that the availability of this tax relief for bone
and tissue banks has been called into doubt as a result of litigation.
The legislature intends to confirm its intent that bone and tissue
banks are entitled to the tax relief provided by chapter 9, Laws of
1995 2nd sp. sess. Therefore, this act applies retroactively.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.324 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) ((As used in this section:
(a) "Blood" includes human whole blood, plasma, blood derivatives,
and related products.
(b) "Bone" includes human bone, bone marrow, and related products.
(c) "Tissue" includes human musculoskeletal tissue, musculoskeletal
tissue derivatives, and related products.
(d) "Blood, bone, or tissue bank" means an organization exempt from
federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code, organized solely for the purpose of performing research
on, procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging, distributing,
or using blood, bone, or tissue.
(e) "Medical supplies" means any item of tangible personal
property, including any repair and replacement parts for such tangible
personal property, used by a blood, tissue, or bone bank for the
purpose of performing research on, procuring, testing, processing,
storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue. The
term includes tangible personal property used to:
(i) Provide preparatory treatment of blood, bone, or tissue;
(ii) Control, guide, measure, tune, verify, align, regulate, test,
or physically support blood, bone, or tissue; and
(iii) Protect the health and safety of employees or others present
during research on, procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging,
distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.
(f) "Chemical" means any catalyst, solvent, water, acid, oil, or
other additive that physically or chemically interacts with blood,
bone, or tissue.
(g) "Materials" means any item of tangible personal property,
including, but not limited to, bags, packs, collecting sets, filtering
materials, testing reagents, antisera, and refrigerants used or
consumed in performing research on, procuring, testing, processing,
storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.
(h) "Research" means basic and applied research that has as its
objective the design, development, refinement, testing, marketing, or
commercialization of a product, service, or process.
(2))) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a
qualifying blood((, bone, or)) bank, a qualifying tissue ((banks))
bank, or a qualifying blood and tissue bank to the extent the amounts
are exempt from federal income tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Qualifying blood bank" means a blood bank that qualifies as an
exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) as existing on the
effective date of this section, is registered pursuant to 21 C.F.R.,
part 607 as existing on the effective date of this section, and whose
primary business purpose is the collection, preparation, and processing
of blood. "Qualifying blood bank" does not include a comprehensive
cancer center that is recognized as such by the national cancer
institute.
(b) "Qualifying tissue bank" means a tissue bank that qualifies as
an exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) as existing on the
effective date of this section, is registered pursuant to 21 C.F.R.,
part 1271 as existing on the effective date of this section, and whose
primary business purpose is the recovery, processing, storage,
labeling, packaging, or distribution of human eye tissue. "Qualifying
tissue bank" does not include a comprehensive cancer center that is
recognized as such by the national cancer institute.
(c) "Qualifying blood and tissue bank" is a bank that qualifies as
an exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) as existing on the
effective date of this section, is registered pursuant to 21 C.F.R.,
part 607 and part 1271 as existing on the effective date of this
section, and whose primary business purpose is the collection,
preparation, and processing of blood, and the recovery, processing,
storage, labeling, packaging, or distribution of human bone tissue,
ligament tissue and similar musculoskeletal tissues, skin tissue, and
heart valve tissue. "Qualifying blood and tissue bank" does not
include a comprehensive cancer center that is recognized as such by the
national cancer institute.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.02805 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
medical supplies, chemicals, or materials to a qualifying blood((,
bone, or)) bank, a qualifying tissue bank, or a qualifying blood and
tissue bank. ((The definitions in RCW 82.04.324 apply to this
section.)) The exemption in this section does not apply to the sale of
construction materials, office equipment, building equipment,
administrative supplies, or vehicles.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Medical supplies" means any item of tangible personal
property, including any repair and replacement parts for such tangible
personal property, used by a qualifying blood bank, a qualifying tissue
bank, or a qualifying blood and tissue bank for the purpose of
performing research on, procuring, testing, processing, storing,
packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue. The term
includes tangible personal property used to:
(i) Provide preparatory treatment of blood, bone, or tissue;
(ii) Control, guide, measure, tune, verify, align, regulate, test,
or physically support blood, bone, or tissue; and
(iii) Protect the health and safety of employees or others present
during research on, procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging,
distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.
(b) "Chemical" means any catalyst, solvent, water, acid, oil, or
other additive that physically or chemically interacts with blood,
bone, or tissue.
(c) "Materials" means any item of tangible personal property,
including, but not limited to, bags, packs, collecting sets, filtering
materials, testing reagents, antisera, and refrigerants used or
consumed in performing research on, procuring, testing, processing,
storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.
(d) "Research" means basic and applied research that has as its
objective the design, development, refinement, testing, marketing, or
commercialization of a product, service, or process.
(e) The definitions in RCW 82.04.324 apply to this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.02747 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of medical supplies, chemicals, or materials by a qualifying
blood((, bone, or)) bank, a qualifying tissue bank, or a qualifying
blood and tissue bank. ((The definitions in RCW 82.04.324 apply to
this section.)) The exemption in this section does not apply to the
use of construction materials, office equipment, building equipment,
administrative supplies, or vehicles.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.324 and 82.08.02805 apply to this
section.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.36.035 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The following property shall be exempt from taxation:
All property, whether real or personal, belonging to or leased by
any nonprofit corporation or association and used exclusively in the
business of a qualifying blood((, bone, or)) bank, a qualifying tissue
bank ((as defined in RCW 82.04.324)), or a qualifying blood and tissue
bank, or in the administration of ((such business)) these businesses.
If the real or personal property is leased, the benefit of the
exemption shall inure to the nonprofit corporation or association.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.324 apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act applies retroactively to July 1,
1995.

--- END ---