BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.88A.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 25 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature hereby recognizes the necessity of developing a
uniform and coordinated procedure for determining the expected fiscal
impact of bills and resolutions on state government and for determining
the expected tax incidence of bills and resolutions on individuals and
businesses. The legislature also recognizes that developing ((such))
these statements ((of fiscal impact, which shall be known as fiscal
notes,)) requires the designation of a state agency to be principally
responsible ((therefor)) for the statements. The statements shall be
known as fiscal notes and tax incidence notes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.88A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall, in cooperation with
appropriate legislative committees and legislative staff, establish a
procedure for the provision of a tax incidence note for any bill or
resolution that increases, decreases, or redistributes state government
revenues for any state tax or local tax administered by the state by
more than ten million dollars per fiscal year. Tax incidence notes
shall be calculated using the procedures contained in instructions
issued by the office of financial management. The office of financial
management shall coordinate the development of tax incidence notes with
all affected state agencies.
(2) A tax incidence note shall be a written report describing who
would experience the fiscal burden or benefit imposed by a proposed
change. The note shall indicate the tax incidence for the first full
year in which the bill or resolution will be effective. To the extent
data is available, the note shall report on the tax incidence effects
that would result if the bill or resolution were enacted. The note may
contain fiscal burden or benefit information by income classes,
taxpayer characteristics, or other relevant categories that use system-wide measures, and may include analysis of the effect of the bill or
resolution on representative taxpayers.
(3) The note shall describe the tax incidence using two points:
(a) The legal tax incidence, meaning who bears the legal liability
of a tax. This point shall be expressed in terms of the change in
legal fiscal liability for households, businesses, governments, and
out-of-state taxpayers; and
(b) The final tax incidence, meaning who experiences the fiscal
burden or benefit of a tax change once the legal liability of a tax has
been absorbed by the taxpayer or passed onto households within the
state or out-of-state taxpayers. This point shall be expressed in
terms of final fiscal burden or benefit by household income, excluding
fiscal burdens or benefits shifted to out-of-state taxpayers.
(4) The methodology developed for determining the final tax
incidence shall detail the assumptions used for shifting the legal tax
incidence of taxes on businesses and other nonhousehold taxpayers to
the final tax incidence on resident households. These assumptions
shall be expressed in a single static mechanistic model that can be
used to analyze all taxes for all taxpayers, including businesses by
industry and households by income group.
(5) The note must contain a statement of the assumptions that were
used in computing the tax incidence.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.88A.030 and 1986 c 158 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
When a fiscal or tax incidence note is prepared and approved as to
form, accuracy, and completeness by the office of financial management,
which depicts the expected ((fiscal)) impact of a bill or resolution,
copies shall be filed immediately with:
(1) The chairperson of the committee to which the bill or
resolution was referred upon introduction in the house of origin;
(2) The senate committee on ways and means, or its successor; and
(3) The house committees on ((revenue)) finance and appropriations,
or their successors.
Whenever possible, ((such fiscal)) the note shall be provided prior
to or at the time the bill or resolution is first heard by the
committee of reference in the house of origin.
When a fiscal or tax incidence note has been prepared for a bill or
resolution, a copy of the ((fiscal)) note shall be placed in the bill
books or otherwise attached to the bill or resolution and shall remain
with the bill or resolution throughout the legislative process insofar
as possible.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.88A.040 and 1979 c 151 s 148 are each amended to
read as follows:
The office of financial management shall also provide a fiscal or
tax incidence note on any legislative proposal at the request of any
legislator. ((Such)) The fiscal or tax incidence note shall be
returned to the requesting legislator, and copies shall be filed with
the appropriate legislative committees pursuant to RCW 43.88A.030 at
the time such proposed legislation is introduced in either house.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.88A.900 and 1977 ex.s. c 25 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall prevent either house of the
legislature from acting on any bill or resolution before it as
otherwise provided by the state Constitution, by law, and by the rules
and joint rules of the senate and house of representatives, nor shall
the lack of any fiscal or tax incidence note as provided in this
chapter or any error in the accuracy thereof affect the validity of any
measure otherwise duly passed by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.88A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A tax incidence note advisory committee is hereby established.
The advisory committee's sole responsibility is the biennial
development of a methodology to be used for tax incidence notes.
(2) The advisory committee shall consist of:
(a) Staff from the house of representatives and senate fiscal
committees, to be designated by the chairs of the committees;
(b) Academic economists representing the state colleges and
universities, to be appointed by the director of the department of
revenue; and
(c) Staff from the department of revenue research division, to be
designated by the director of the department of revenue.
(3) The methodology developed by the committee shall detail the
assumptions used for shifting the legal tax incidence of taxes on
businesses and other nonhousehold taxpayers to the final tax incidence
on resident households. These assumptions shall be expressed in a
single static mechanistic model that can be used to analyze all taxes
for all taxpayers, including businesses by industry and households by
income group.
(4) The methodology developed by the committee shall be submitted
in writing to the forecast council for approval. The submittal shall
be such that there is adequate time for the forecast council to review
the methodology and communicate any concerns to the committee. The
forecast council shall notify the committee and the office of financial
management in writing if the methodology is approved. If it is not
approved, the forecast council shall notify the advisory committee in
writing of the areas of concern. If approved, the methodology shall be
used for the following two-year legislation session. The advisory
committee shall review the methodology every two years. If no changes
are recommended, the committee shall notify the forecast council.
(5) The advisory committee shall be formed and convene its first
meeting by August 1, 2004. The committee shall develop the proposed
methodology for submittal to the forecast council by October 1, 2005,
for use in tax incidence notes for the 2005 legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In January of every odd-numbered year, beginning January 2007,
the department shall submit to the legislature before the regular
session a report on the tax incidence of state and local taxes
administered by the department.
(2) The report shall present information on the distribution of the
tax burden (a) by overall income distribution, using a system-wide tax
incidence measure with appropriate measures of equality and inequality,
(b) by income classes, including at a minimum deciles of the income
distribution, and (c) by other appropriate taxpayer characteristics.

--- END ---