BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.010 and 1996 c 101 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The public policy of the state of Washington on gambling is to keep
the criminal element out of gambling and to promote the social welfare
of the people by limiting the nature and scope of gambling activities
and by strict regulation and control.
It is hereby declared to be the policy of the legislature,
recognizing the close relationship between professional gambling and
organized crime, to restrain all persons from seeking profit from
professional gambling activities in this state; to restrain all persons
from patronizing such professional gambling activities; to safeguard
the public against the evils induced by common gamblers and common
gambling houses engaged in professional gambling; and at the same time,
both to preserve the freedom of the press and to avoid restricting
participation by individuals in activities and social pastimes, which
activities and social pastimes are more for amusement rather than for
profit, do not maliciously affect the public, and do not breach the
peace.
The legislature further declares that the raising of funds for the
promotion of bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations is in the
public interest as is participation in such activities and social
pastimes as are hereinafter in this chapter authorized.
The legislature further declares that the conducting of bingo,
raffles, and amusement games and the operation of punch boards, pull-tabs, card games and other social pastimes, when conducted pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted
pursuant thereto, are hereby authorized, as are only such lotteries for
which no valuable consideration has been paid or agreed to be paid as
hereinafter in this chapter provided.
The legislature further declares that in establishing a maximum
wager, money, or other thing of value that may be wagered or
contributed by a player in any gambling activities subject to this
chapter, it is the intent of the legislature that any such lottery or
gambling activity involving a wager or contribution in excess of the
maximum authorized amount is prohibited. Any increase in the maximum
authorized wager amount after the effective date of this act thus
constitutes the elimination of that prohibition and, under Article II,
section 24 of the state Constitution, requires an affirmative vote of
sixty percent of the members of each house of the legislature.
The legislature further declares that fishing derbies shall not
constitute any form of gambling and shall not be considered as a
lottery, a raffle, or an amusement game and shall not be subject to the
provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted
hereunder.
The legislature further declares that raffles authorized by the
fish and wildlife commission involving hunting big game animals or wild
turkeys shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter or any
rules and regulations adopted hereunder, with the exception of this
section and RCW 9.46.400.
All factors incident to the activities authorized in this chapter
shall be closely controlled, and the provisions of this chapter shall
be liberally construed to achieve such end.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.46.070 and 2002 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one
year to bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations approved by the
commission meeting the requirements of this chapter and any rules and
regulations adopted pursuant thereto permitting said organizations to
conduct bingo games, raffles, amusement games, and social card games,
to utilize punch boards and pull-tabs in accordance with the provisions
of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto
and to revoke or suspend said licenses for violation of any provisions
of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto:
PROVIDED, That the commission shall not deny a license to an otherwise
qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to be
issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission or director shall not
issue, deny, suspend, or revoke any license because of considerations
of race, sex, creed, color, or national origin: AND PROVIDED FURTHER,
That the commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or
suspend licenses subject to final action by the commission;
(2) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one
year to any person, association, or organization operating a business
primarily engaged in the selling of items of food or drink for
consumption on the premises, approved by the commission meeting the
requirements of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted
pursuant thereto permitting said person, association, or organization
to utilize punch boards and pull-tabs and to conduct social card games
as a commercial stimulant in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto and to
revoke or suspend said licenses for violation of any provisions of this
chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto:
PROVIDED, That the commission shall not deny a license to an otherwise
qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to be
issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may authorize the
director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final
action by the commission;
(3) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one
year to any person, association, or organization approved by the
commission meeting the requirements of this chapter and meeting the
requirements of any rules and regulations adopted by the commission
pursuant to this chapter as now or hereafter amended, permitting said
person, association, or organization to conduct or operate amusement
games in such manner and at such locations as the commission may
determine;
(4) To authorize, require, and issue, for a period not to exceed
one year, such licenses as the commission may by rule provide, to any
person, association, or organization to engage in the selling,
distributing, or otherwise supplying or in the manufacturing of devices
for use within this state for those activities authorized by this
chapter;
(5) To establish a schedule of annual license fees for carrying on
specific gambling activities upon the premises, and for such other
activities as may be licensed by the commission, which fees shall
provide to the commission not less than an amount of money adequate to
cover all costs incurred by the commission relative to licensing under
this chapter and the enforcement by the commission of the provisions of
this chapter and rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto:
PROVIDED, That all licensing fees shall be submitted with an
application therefor and such portion of said fee as the commission may
determine, based upon its cost of processing and investigation, shall
be retained by the commission upon the withdrawal or denial of any such
license application as its reasonable expense for processing the
application and investigation into the granting thereof: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That if in a particular case the basic license fee established
by the commission for a particular class of license is less than the
commission's actual expenses to investigate that particular
application, the commission may at any time charge to that applicant
such additional fees as are necessary to pay the commission for those
costs. The commission may decline to proceed with its investigation
and no license shall be issued until the commission has been fully paid
therefor by the applicant: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission
may establish fees for the furnishing by it to licensees of
identification stamps to be affixed to such devices and equipment as
required by the commission and for such other special services or
programs required or offered by the commission, the amount of each of
these fees to be not less than is adequate to offset the cost to the
commission of the stamps and of administering their dispersal to
licensees or the cost of administering such other special services,
requirements or programs;
(6) To prescribe the manner and method of payment of taxes, fees
and penalties to be paid to or collected by the commission;
(7) To require that applications for all licenses contain such
information as may be required by the commission: PROVIDED, That all
persons (a) having a managerial or ownership interest in any gambling
activity, or the building in which any gambling activity occurs, or the
equipment to be used for any gambling activity, or (b) participating as
an employee in the operation of any gambling activity, shall be listed
on the application for the license and the applicant shall certify on
the application, under oath, that the persons named on the application
are all of the persons known to have an interest in any gambling
activity, building, or equipment by the person making such application:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission shall require fingerprinting and
national criminal history background checks on any persons seeking
licenses, certifications, or permits under this chapter or of any
person holding an interest in any gambling activity, building, or
equipment to be used therefor, or of any person participating as an
employee in the operation of any gambling activity. All national
criminal history background checks shall be conducted using
fingerprints submitted to the United States department of justice-federal bureau of investigation. The commission must establish rules
to delineate which persons named on the application are subject to
national criminal history background checks. In identifying these
persons, the commission must take into consideration the nature,
character, size, and scope of the gambling activities requested by the
persons making such applications;
(8) To require that any license holder maintain records as directed
by the commission and submit such reports as the commission may deem
necessary;
(9) To require that all income from bingo games, raffles, and
amusement games be recorded and reported as established by rule or
regulation of the commission to the extent deemed necessary by
considering the scope and character of the gambling activity in such a
manner that will disclose gross income from any gambling activity,
amounts received from each player, the nature and value of prizes, and
the fact of distributions of such prizes to the winners thereof;
(10) To regulate and establish maximum limitations on income
derived from bingo. In establishing limitations pursuant to this
subsection the commission shall take into account (i) the nature,
character, and scope of the activities of the licensee; (ii) the source
of all other income of the licensee; and (iii) the percentage or extent
to which income derived from bingo is used for charitable, as
distinguished from nonprofit, purposes. However, the commission's
powers and duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not
mandatory;
(11) To regulate and establish the type and scope of and manner of
conducting the gambling activities authorized by this chapter,
((including but not limited to,)) except that, after the effective date
of this act, any increase in the extent of wager, money, or other thing
of value which may be wagered or contributed ((or won)) by a player in
any such activities is within the exclusive authority of the
legislature;
(12) To regulate the collection of and the accounting for the fee
which may be imposed by an organization, corporation, or person
licensed to conduct a social card game on a person desiring to become
a player in a social card game in accordance with RCW 9.46.0282;
(13) To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of county, city,
and other local or state agencies in investigating any matter within
the scope of its duties and responsibilities;
(14) In accordance with RCW 9.46.080, to adopt such rules and
regulations as are deemed necessary to carry out the purposes and
provisions of this chapter. All rules and regulations shall be adopted
pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW;
(15) To set forth for the perusal of counties, city-counties,
cities and towns, model ordinances by which any legislative authority
thereof may enter into the taxing of any gambling activity authorized
by this chapter;
(16) To establish and regulate a maximum limit on salaries or wages
which may be paid to persons employed in connection with activities
conducted by bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations and
authorized by this chapter, where payment of such persons is allowed,
and to regulate and establish maximum limits for other expenses in
connection with such authorized activities, including but not limited
to rent or lease payments. However, the commissioner's powers and
duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not mandatory.
In establishing these maximum limits the commission shall take into
account the amount of income received, or expected to be received, from
the class of activities to which the limits will apply and the amount
of money the games could generate for authorized charitable or
nonprofit purposes absent such expenses. The commission may also take
into account, in its discretion, other factors, including but not
limited to, the local prevailing wage scale and whether charitable
purposes are benefited by the activities;
(17) To authorize, require, and issue for a period not to exceed
one year such licenses or permits, for which the commission may by rule
provide, to any person to work for any operator of any gambling
activity authorized by this chapter in connection with that activity,
or any manufacturer, supplier, or distributor of devices for those
activities in connection with such business. The commission shall not
require that persons working solely as volunteers in an authorized
activity conducted by a bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit
organization, who receive no compensation of any kind for any purpose
from that organization, and who have no managerial or supervisory
responsibility in connection with that activity, be licensed to do such
work. The commission may require that licensees employing such
unlicensed volunteers submit to the commission periodically a list of
the names, addresses, and dates of birth of the volunteers. If any
volunteer is not approved by the commission, the commission may require
that the licensee not allow that person to work in connection with the
licensed activity;
(18) To publish and make available at the office of the commission
or elsewhere to anyone requesting it a list of the commission
licensees, including the name, address, type of license, and license
number of each licensee;
(19) To establish guidelines for determining what constitutes
active membership in bona fide nonprofit or charitable organizations
for the purposes of this chapter; and
(20) To perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out
the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---