BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.280 and 2003 c 332 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 36.70A.295 and 36.70A.310, a growth
management hearings board shall hear and determine only those petitions
alleging either:
(a) That a state agency, county, or city planning under this
chapter is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter,
chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption of shoreline master
programs or amendments thereto, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to
plans, development regulations, or amendments, adopted under RCW
36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; or
(b) That the twenty-year growth management planning population
projections adopted by the office of financial management pursuant to
RCW 43.62.035 should be adjusted.
(2) A petition may be filed only by: (a) The state, or a county or
city that plans under this chapter; (b) a person who has participated
orally or in writing before the county or city regarding the matter on
which a review is being requested; (c) a person who is certified by the
governor within sixty days of filing the request with the board; or (d)
a person qualified pursuant to RCW 34.05.530.
(3) For purposes of this section "person" means any individual,
partnership, corporation, association, state agency, governmental
subdivision or unit thereof, or public or private organization or
entity of any character.
(4) To establish participation standing under subsection (2)(b) of
this section, a person must show that his or her participation before
the county or city was reasonably related to the person's issue as
presented to the board.
(5) When considering a possible adjustment to a growth management
planning population projection prepared by the office of financial
management, a board shall consider the implications of any such
adjustment to the population forecast for the entire state.
The rationale for any adjustment that is adopted by a board must be
documented and filed with the office of financial management within ten
working days after adoption.
If adjusted by a board, a county growth management planning
population projection shall only be used for the planning purposes set
forth in this chapter and shall be known as a "board adjusted
population projection". None of these changes shall affect the
official state and county population forecasts prepared by the office
of financial management, which shall continue to be used for state
budget and planning purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.290 and 1997 c 429 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All requests for review to a growth management hearings board
shall be initiated by filing a petition for review that includes a
detailed statement of issues presented for resolution by the board.
The board shall render written decisions articulating the basis for its
holdings. The board shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not
presented to the board in the statement of issues, as modified by any
prehearing order.
(2) All petitions relating to whether or not an adopted
comprehensive plan, development regulation, or permanent amendment
thereto, is in compliance with the goals and requirements of this
chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be filed within sixty days
after publication by the legislative ((bodies)) authority of the county
or city.
(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the date of
publication for a city shall be the date the city publishes the
ordinance, or summary of the ordinance, adopting the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto, as is required to be
published.
(b) Promptly after adoption, a county shall publish a notice that
it has adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or
amendment thereto.
Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, for purposes of this
section the date of publication for a county shall be the date the
county publishes the notice that it has adopted the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto.
(c) For local governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly
after approval or disapproval of a local government's shoreline master
program or amendment thereto by the department of ecology as provided
in RCW 90.58.090, the local government shall publish a notice that the
shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been approved or
disapproved by the department of ecology. For purposes of this
section, the date of publication for the adoption or amendment of a
shoreline master program is the date the local government publishes
notice that the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been
approved or disapproved by the department of ecology.
(3) Unless the board dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds
that the person filing the petition lacks standing, or the parties have
filed an agreement to have the case heard in superior court as provided
in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall, within ten days of receipt of the
petition, set a time for hearing the matter.
(4) The board shall base its decision on the record developed by
the city, county, or the state and supplemented with additional
evidence if the board determines that such additional evidence would be
necessary or of substantial assistance to the board in reaching its
decision.
(5) The board, shall consolidate, when appropriate, all petitions
involving the review of the same comprehensive plan or the same
development regulation or regulations.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.295 and 1997 c 429 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The superior court may directly review a petition for review
filed under RCW 36.70A.290 if all parties to the proceeding before the
board have agreed to direct review in the superior court. The
agreement of the parties shall be in writing and signed by all of the
parties to the proceeding or their designated representatives. The
agreement shall include the parties' agreement to proper venue as
provided in RCW 36.70A.300(5). The parties shall file their agreement
with the board within ten days after the date the petition is filed, or
if multiple petitions have been filed and the board has consolidated
the petitions pursuant to RCW 36.70A.300, within ten days after the
board serves its order of consolidation.
(((2))) (b) Within ten days of receiving the timely and complete
agreement of the parties, the board shall file a certificate of
agreement with the designated superior court and shall serve the
parties with copies of the certificate. The superior court shall
obtain exclusive jurisdiction over a petition when it receives the
certificate of agreement. With the certificate of agreement the board
shall also file the petition for review, any orders entered by the
board, all other documents in the board's files regarding the action,
and the written agreement of the parties.
(2)(a) The superior court shall directly review a petition for
review filed according to RCW 36.70A.310. Any petition for review
filed according to RCW 36.70A.310 shall be filed in superior court
within sixty days after publication by the legislative body of the
county or city. A copy of the petition for review shall be filed with
the board within sixty days after publication by the legislative body
of the county or city. For the purposes of this section, the date of
publication shall be determined as provided in RCW 36.70A.290(2).
(b) The board shall file with the superior court a certificate of
removal to superior court for any petition or petitions filed with the
board according to RCW 36.70A.280 that involve the review of the same
comprehensive plan or the same development regulation or regulations as
the petition for review filed in superior court according to RCW
36.70A.310 and this subsection. The board shall file the certificate
of removal within ten days after receiving the copy of the petition for
review filed with the superior court according to RCW 36.70A.310 and
this subsection. The board shall file with the certificate of removal
all petitions for review identified in the certificate as well as any
orders entered by the board and other documents in the board's files
regarding the action or actions. The superior court shall obtain
exclusive jurisdiction over the petition or petitions when it receives
the certificate of removal.
(3) For purposes of a petition that is subject to direct review,
the superior court's subject matter jurisdiction shall be equivalent to
that of the board. Consistent with the requirements of the superior
court civil rules, the superior court may consolidate a petition
subject to direct review under this section with a separate action
filed in the superior court.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) and (c) of this
subsection, the provisions of RCW 36.70A.280 through 36.70A.330, which
specify the nature and extent of board review, shall apply to the
superior court's review.
(b) The superior court:
(i) Shall not have jurisdiction to directly review or modify an
office of financial management population projection;
(ii) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 36.70A.300(2)(b), shall
render its decision on the petition within one hundred eighty days of
receiving the certification of agreement; and
(iii) Shall give a compliance hearing under RCW 36.70A.330(2) the
highest priority of all civil matters before the court.
(c) An aggrieved party may secure appellate review of a final
judgment of the superior court under this section by the supreme court
or the court of appeals. The review shall be secured in the manner
provided by law for review of superior court decisions in other civil
cases.
(5) If, following a compliance hearing, the court finds that the
state agency, county, or city is not in compliance with the court's
prior order, the court may use its remedial and contempt powers to
enforce compliance.
(6) The superior court shall transmit a copy of its decision and
order on direct review to the board, the department, and the governor.
If the court has determined that a county or city is not in compliance
with the provisions of this chapter, the governor may impose sanctions
against the county or city in the same manner as if a board had
recommended the imposition of sanctions as provided in RCW 36.70A.330.
(7) After the court has assumed jurisdiction over a petition for
review under this section, the superior court civil rules shall govern
a request for intervention and all other procedural matters not
specifically provided for in this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.310 and 1994 c 249 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A ((request)) petition for review by the state ((to a growth
management hearings board)) according to this chapter may be ((made))
filed only by the governor, or with the governor's consent the head of
an agency, or by the commissioner of public lands as relating to state
trust lands, for the review of whether:
(((1))) (a) A county or city that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 has failed to adopt a comprehensive plan ((or)),
development regulations, or county-wide planning policies within the
time limits established by this chapter; or
(((2))) (b) A county or city that is required or chooses to plan
under this chapter has adopted a comprehensive plan, development
regulations, or county-wide planning policies, that are not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
(2) All petitions for review by the state under this section shall
be filed in the superior court according to RCW 36.70A.295.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2004, and
applies to all petitions for review filed according to chapter 36.70A
RCW on or after July 1, 2004.

--- END ---