BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.36.410 and 2003 c 134 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that universal telephone service is an
important policy goal of the state. The legislature further finds
that: (a) Recent changes in the telecommunications industry((, such as
federal access charges,)) raise concerns about the ability of low-income persons to continue to afford access to ((local exchange
telephone)) basic telecommunications service; and (b) many low-income
persons making the transition to independence from receiving supportive
services through community agencies do not qualify for economic
assistance from the department of social and health services.
(2) Therefore, the legislature finds that: (a) It is in the public
interest to take steps to mitigate the effects of these changes on low-income persons; and (b) advances in telecommunications technologies,
such as community service voice mail provide new and economically
efficient ways to secure many of the benefits of universal service to
low-income persons who are not customers of ((local exchange
telephone)) basic telecommunications service.
(3) The legislature also finds that in providing assistance with
telecommunications needs to low-income persons, the means employed
should be competitively and technologically neutral; that is, the law
should neither favor any carrier or technology nor disfavor any carrier
or technology.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.36.420 and 2003 c 134 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington telephone assistance program shall be available to
participants of programs set forth in RCW 80.36.470 who receive basic
telecommunications service from a telecommunications carrier designated
pursuant to section 3 of this act. Assistance shall consist of the
following components:
(1) A discount on service connection fees ((of fifty percent or
more)) as set forth in RCW 80.36.460.
(2) A waiver of deposit requirements on ((local exchange)) basic
telecommunications service, as set forth in RCW 80.36.460.
(3) A ((discounted flat rate service)) discount on the monthly
charges for ((local exchange)) basic telecommunications service, which
shall be subject to the following conditions:
(a) The commission shall by order or rule establish ((a single
telephone assistance rate for all local exchange companies operating in
the state of Washington. The telephone assistance rate shall include
any federal end user charges and any other charges necessary to obtain
local exchange service)) the amount of the monthly discount. The
commission may establish different discounts for different geographic
areas or service types if the resulting schedule of discounts is
competitively and technologically neutral.
(b) The commission shall, in establishing the ((telephone
assistance rate)) monthly discount, consider all ((charges for local
exchange service, including federal end user charges, mileage charges,
extended area service, and any other)) charges necessary to obtain
((local exchange)) basic telecommunications service.
(((c) The telephone assistance rate shall only be available to
eligible customers subscribing to the lowest priced local exchange flat
rate service, where the lowest priced local exchange flat rate service,
including any federal end user charges and any other charges necessary
to obtain local exchange service, is greater than the telephone
assistance rate.
(d) The cost of providing the service shall be paid, to the maximum
extent possible, by a waiver of all or part of federal end user charges
and, to the extent necessary, from the telephone assistance fund
created by RCW 80.36.430.))
(4) A discount on a community service voice mailbox that provides
recipients with (a) an individually assigned telephone number; (b) the
ability to record a personal greeting; and (c) a secure private
security code to retrieve messages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission must on request or may on its own motion
designate a telecommunications carrier that meets the requirements of
this section as an eligible telecommunications carrier for a service
area designated by the commission. The commission may designate more
than one telecommunications carrier as eligible telecommunications
carriers for a service area. Before designating an additional eligible
telecommunications carrier for an area served by a rural telephone
company, as defined by 47 U.S.C. 153(37), the commission must find that
the designation is in the public interest.
(2) An eligible telecommunications carrier must: (a) Offer basic
telecommunications service and the discounts and waivers established
under RCW 80.36.420 throughout the service area for which it is
designated by the commission; and (b) advertise the availability and
charges of such services using media of general distribution.
(3) An eligible telecommunications carrier may relinquish its
designation upon reasonable notice to the commission and its program
participants. The commission may after notice and for good cause
revoke the designation of an eligible telecommunications carrier.
(4) The commission must, to the extent reasonably feasible,
coordinate the designation of eligible telecommunications carriers
under this section with its designation of eligible telecommunications
carriers, pursuant to 47 U.S.C. 214(e), for the federal universal
service program.

Sec. 4 RCW 80.36.430 and 2003 c 134 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The Washington telephone assistance program shall be funded
by a telephone assistance excise tax on all switched access lines and
by funds from any federal government or other programs for this
purpose. Switched access lines are defined in RCW 82.14B.020. The
telephone assistance excise tax shall be applied equally to all
residential and business access lines not to exceed fourteen cents per
month. The telephone assistance excise tax shall be separately
identified on each ratepayer's bill as the "Washington telephone
assistance program." All money collected from the telephone assistance
excise tax shall be transferred to a telephone assistance fund
administered by the ((department)) commission.
(((2) Local exchange companies shall bill the fund for their
expenses incurred in offering the telephone assistance program,
including administrative and program expenses. The department shall
disburse the money to the local exchange companies. The department is
exempted from having to conclude a contract with local exchange
companies in order to effect this reimbursement. The department shall
recover its administrative costs from the fund. The department may
specify by rule the range and extent of administrative and program
expenses that will be reimbursed to local exchange companies.
(3) The department shall enter into an agreement with the
department of community, trade, and economic development for an amount
not to exceed eight percent of the prior fiscal year's total revenue
for the administrative and program expenses of providing community
service voice mail services. The community service voice mail service
may include toll-free lines in community action agencies through which
recipients can access their community service voice mailboxes at no
charge.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each eligible telecommunications carrier may recover from the
telephone assistance program fund its cost of providing the program
benefits as described in RCW 80.36.420 and administering the program.
Each carrier must account separately for costs associated with the
deposit waiver, the discount on connection charges, the discount on
monthly charges, and program administration. The commission shall
disburse the money to an eligible telecommunications carrier upon
adequate evidence submitted by the eligible telecommunications carrier
that it has provided qualifying service.
(2) Each eligible telecommunications carrier must make reasonable
efforts to obtain available funds for the provision of basic
telecommunications service to low-income households through the federal
universal service program. An eligible telecommunications carrier
shall not seek to recover from the telephone assistance program fund
any costs that are eligible for recovery through the federal universal
service program.
(3) The commission is exempted from having to conclude a contract
with eligible telecommunications carriers to effect the reimbursement
provided for in this section. The commission shall recover its costs
to administer the Washington telephone assistance program from the
fund. The commission may specify by rule the range and extent of
program expenses that will be reimbursed to eligible telecommunications
carriers.
(4) The commission shall enter into an agreement with the
department of community, trade, and economic development for an amount
not to exceed eight percent of the prior fiscal year's total revenue
for the administrative and program expenses of providing community
service voice mail services. The community service voice mail service
may include toll-free lines in community action agencies through which
recipients can access their community service voice mailboxes at no
charge.

Sec. 6 RCW 80.36.450 and 2003 c 134 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington telephone assistance program shall limit
reimbursement to one residential ((switched access line)) basic
telecommunications service from one eligible telecommunications carrier
per eligible household((,)) or one discounted community service voice
mailbox per eligible person. Program participants may subscribe to
other services such as long distance service or bundled services,
however, only they are responsible for all additional charges for such
services.

Sec. 7 RCW 80.36.460 and 2003 c 134 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Local exchange companies shall waive deposits on local exchange
service for eligible subscribers and)) (1) Eligible telecommunications
carriers must waive for Washington telephone assistance program
participants any requirement for a customer deposit that would
otherwise be necessary to obtain basic telecommunications service.
Eligible telecommunications carriers may apply customary deposit
requirements for any service other than basic telecommunications
service provided to the program participant.
(2) Eligible telecommunications carriers must provide a ((fifty
percent)) discount on the company's customary charge for commencing
telecommunications service for ((eligible subscribers. Part or all of
the remaining fifty percent of service connection fees may be paid by
funds from federal government or other programs for this purpose. The
commission or other appropriate agency shall make timely application
for any available federal funds. The remaining portion of the
connection fee to be paid by the subscriber shall be expressly payable
by installment fees spread over a period of months. A subscriber may,
however, choose to pay the connection fee in a lump sum. Costs
associated with the waiver and discount shall be accounted for
separately and recovered from the telephone assistance fund))
Washington telephone assistance program participants. The commission
must establish by order or rule the amount of the discount. The
eligible telecommunications carrier must provide the program
participant with the option to pay the discounted connection fee in
installments over a period of months.

Sec. 8 RCW 80.36.470 and 2003 c 134 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Adult recipients of ((department-administered)) programs
administered by the department of social and health services for the
financially needy which provide continuing financial or medical
assistance, food stamps, or supportive services to persons in their own
homes are eligible for participation in the telephone assistance
program. The department of social and health services shall notify the
participants of their eligibility.
(2) Participants in community service voice mail programs are
eligible for participation in services available under RCW 80.36.420
(1), (2), and (3) after completing use of community service voice mail
services. Eligibility shall be for a period including the remainder of
the current service year and the following service year. Community
agencies shall notify the department of social and health services of
participants eligible under this subsection.
(3) The department of social and health services must maintain a
list of eligible participants and must make the list readily available
to the commission. Eligible telecommunications carriers and the
commission shall use the information only to operate and administer the
Washington telephone assistance program. The commission may enter into
an agreement with the department of social and health services to
reimburse the department from the telephone assistance fund for
reasonable costs incurred in providing the eligibility information
required by this subsection.

Sec. 9 RCW 80.36.475 and 2003 c 134 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((department)) commission shall report to the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December
1 of each year on the status of the Washington telephone assistance
program. The report shall include the number of participants by
qualifying social service programs receiving benefits from the
telephone assistance program and the type of benefits participants
receive. The report shall also include a description of the eligible
telecommunications carriers designated to offer the program, the
geographical distribution of participants, the program's annual revenue
and expenditures, and any recommendations for legislative action.

Sec. 10 RCW 80.36.005 and 2003 c 134 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 80.36.410
through 80.36.475, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Community agency" means local community agencies that
administer community service voice mail programs.
(2) "Community service voice mail" means a computerized voice mail
system that provides low-income recipients with: (a) An individually
assigned telephone number; (b) the ability to record a personal
greeting; and (c) a private security code to retrieve messages.
(3) (("Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(4))) "Service year" means the period between July 1st and June
30th.
(((5))) (4) "Community action agency" means local community action
agencies or local community service agencies designated by the
department of community, trade, and economic development under chapter
43.63A RCW.
(5) "Telecommunications carrier" has the same meaning as defined in
47 U.S.C. Sec. 153(44).
(6) "Basic telecommunications services" means the following
services:
(a) Single-party service;
(b) Voice grade access to the public switched network;
(c) Support for local usage;
(d) Dual tone multifrequency signaling (touch-tone);
(e) Access to emergency services (911);
(f) Access to operator services;
(g) Access to interexchange services;
(h) Access to directory assistance; and
(i) Toll limitation services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 80.36.440 (Washington telephone
assistance program -- Rules) and 2003 c 134 s 5, 1990 c 170 s 4, & 1987
c 229 s 6 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---