BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.250 and 1994 c 249 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There are hereby created three growth management hearings
boards for the state of Washington. The boards shall be established as
follows:
(a) An Eastern Washington board with jurisdictional boundaries
including all counties that are ((required to or choose to plan under
RCW 36.70A.040 and are)) located east of the crest of the Cascade
mountains;
(b) A Central Puget Sound board with jurisdictional boundaries
including King, Pierce, Snohomish, and Kitsap counties; and
(c) A Western Washington board with jurisdictional boundaries
including all counties that are ((required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 and are)) located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains
and are not included in the Central Puget Sound board jurisdictional
boundaries. Skamania ((county, should it be required or choose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, may)) county's legislative body shall, by a
resolution adopted within one hundred eighty days of the effective date
of this section, elect to be included within the jurisdictional
boundaries of either the Western or Eastern board.
(2) Each board shall only hear matters pertaining to the cities and
counties located within its jurisdictional boundaries.

--- END ---