BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.300 and 1997 c 429 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall issue a final order that shall be based
exclusively on whether or not a state agency, county, or city is in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as
it relates to adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs, or
chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development
regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter
90.58 RCW.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the final
order shall be issued within one hundred eighty days of receipt of the
petition for review, or, if multiple petitions are filed, within one
hundred eighty days of receipt of the last petition that is
consolidated.
(b) The board may extend the period of time for issuing a decision
to enable the parties to settle the dispute if additional time is
necessary to achieve a settlement, and (i) an extension is requested by
all parties, or (ii) an extension is requested by the petitioner and
respondent and the board determines that a negotiated settlement
between the remaining parties could resolve significant issues in
dispute. The request must be filed with the board not later than seven
days before the date scheduled for the hearing on the merits of the
petition. The board may authorize one or more extensions for up to
ninety days each, subject to the requirements of this section.
(3) In the final order, the board shall either:
(a) Find that the state agency, county, or city is in compliance
with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates
to the adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter
43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development regulations,
and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; or
(b) Find that the state agency, county, or city is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as
it relates to the adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs,
or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development
regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter
90.58 RCW, in which case the board shall remand the matter to the
affected state agency, county, or city. The board shall specify a
reasonable time not in excess of one hundred eighty days, or such
longer period as determined by the board in cases of unusual scope or
complexity, within which the state agency, county, or city shall comply
with the requirements of this chapter. The board may require periodic
reports to the board on the progress the jurisdiction is making towards
compliance.
(4) Unless the board makes a determination of invalidity as
provided in RCW 36.70A.302, a finding of noncompliance and an order of
remand shall not affect the validity of comprehensive plans ((and)),
development regulations, and shoreline master programs, during the
period of remand or until a compliant comprehensive plan, development
regulation, or shoreline master program is adopted, whichever is later.
(5) Any party aggrieved by a final decision of the hearings board
may appeal the decision to superior court as provided in RCW 34.05.514
or 36.01.050 within thirty days of the final order of the board.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.302 and 1997 c 429 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A board may determine that part or all of a comprehensive plan
or development regulations are invalid if the board:
(a) Makes a finding of noncompliance and issues an order of remand
under RCW 36.70A.300;
(b) Includes in the final order a determination, supported by
findings of fact and conclusions of law, that the continued validity of
part or parts of the plan or regulation would substantially interfere
with the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter; and
(c) Specifies in the final order the particular part or parts of
the plan or regulation that are determined to be invalid, and the
reasons for their invalidity.
(2) A determination of invalidity is prospective in effect and does
not extinguish rights that vested under state or local law before
receipt of the board's order by the city or county. The determination
of invalidity does not apply to a completed development permit
application for a project that vested under state or local law before
receipt of the board's order by the county or city or to related
construction permits for that project.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section and (b) of this subsection, a development permit application
not vested under state or local law before receipt of the board's order
by the county or city vests to and must comply with the local ordinance
or resolution that is adopted or readopted after the determination of
invalidity is made and is determined by the board not to substantially
interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter.
(b) Even though the application is not vested under state or local
law before receipt by the county or city of the board's order, a
determination of invalidity does not apply to a development permit
application for:
(i) A permit for construction by any owner, lessee, or contract
purchaser of a single-family residence for his or her own use or for
the use of his or her family on a lot existing before receipt by the
county or city of the board's order, except as otherwise specifically
provided in the board's order to protect the public health and safety;
(ii) A building permit and related construction permits for
remodeling, tenant improvements, or expansion of an existing structure
on a lot existing before receipt of the board's order by the county or
city; and
(iii) A boundary line adjustment or a division of land that does
not increase the number of buildable lots existing before receipt of
the board's order by the county or city.
(4) If the ordinance that adopts a plan or development regulation
under this chapter includes a savings clause intended to revive prior
policies or regulations in the event the new plan or regulations are
determined to be invalid, the board shall determine under subsection
(1) of this section whether the prior policies or regulations are valid
during the period of remand.
(5) A county or city subject to a determination of invalidity may
adopt interim controls and other measures to be in effect until it
adopts a comprehensive plan and development regulations that comply
with the requirements of this chapter. A development permit
application may vest under an interim control or measure upon
determination by the board that the interim controls and other measures
do not substantially interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of
this chapter.
(6) A county or city subject to a determination of invalidity may
file a motion requesting that the board clarify, modify, or rescind the
order. The board shall expeditiously schedule a hearing on the motion.
At the hearing on the motion, the parties may present information to
the board to clarify the part or parts of the comprehensive plan or
development regulations to which the final order applies. The board
shall issue any supplemental order based on the information provided at
the hearing not later than thirty days after the date of the hearing.
(7)(a) If a determination of invalidity has been made and the
county or city has enacted an ordinance or resolution amending the
invalidated part or parts of the plan or regulation or establishing
interim controls on development affected by the order of invalidity,
after a compliance hearing, the board shall modify or rescind the
determination of invalidity if it determines under the standard in
subsection (1) of this section that the plan or regulation, as amended
or made subject to such interim controls, will no longer substantially
interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter.
(b) If the board determines that part or parts of the plan or
regulation are no longer invalid as provided in this subsection, but
does not find that the plan or regulation is in compliance with all of
the requirements of this chapter, the board, in its order, may require
periodic reports to the board on the progress the jurisdiction is
making towards compliance.

--- END ---