BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.17.040 and 1991 c 363 s 53 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The salaries of county officers and employees of counties other
than counties with a population of less than five thousand may be paid
twice monthly out of the county treasury, and the county auditor, for
services rendered from the first to the fifteenth day, inclusive, may,
not later than the last day of the month, draw a warrant upon the
county treasurer in favor of each of such officers and employees for
the amount of salary due him or her, and such auditor, for services
rendered from the sixteenth to the last day, inclusive, may similarly
draw a warrant, not later than the fifteenth day of the following
month, and the county legislative authority, with the concurrence of
the county auditor, may enter an order on the record journal empowering
him or her so to do: PROVIDED, That if the county legislative
authority does not adopt the semimonthly pay plan, it, by resolution,
shall designate the first pay period as a draw day. Not more than
forty percent of said earned monthly salary of each such county officer
or employee shall be paid to him or her on the draw day and the payroll
deductions of such officer or employee shall not be deducted from the
salary to be paid on the draw day. If officers and employees are paid
once a month, the draw day shall not be later than the last day of each
month. The balance of the earned monthly salary of each such officer
or employee shall be paid not later than the fifteenth day of the
following month.
(2) In counties with a population of less than five thousand
salaries shall be paid monthly unless the county legislative authority
by resolution adopts the ((foregoing)) draw day procedure in subsection
(1) of this section.
(3) Recipients of the WorkFirst program, authorized in chapter 58,
Laws of 1997, who are employed by a county shall be paid at least twice
monthly.

--- END ---