BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may not proceed with the total maximum daily
load process for Colville river, Kettle river, and Moses Lake until it
has (a) made all reasonable efforts to provide the information
requested by the Colville river, Kettle river, and Moses Lake advisory
committee and (b) allowed the advisory committee sufficient time to
distribute and analyze the information so that the advisory committee
report accurately reflects the current condition of the rivers, lake,
water, and adjacent uplands.
(2) For purposes of this section, "proceed with the total maximum
daily load process" means: (a) Declaring Colville river, Kettle river,
and Moses Lake to be impaired water bodies for purposes of listing the
water bodies under the provisions of section 303(d) of the federal
clean water act; (b) completing a public process related to
establishing one or more total maximum daily loads for Colville river,
Kettle river, and Moses Lake; (c) including Colville river, Kettle
river, and Moses Lake on any lists of impaired water bodies to be
submitted to the United States environmental protection agency; and (d)
proceeding with the development, completion, or distribution of a
summary implementation strategy for Colville river, Kettle river, and
Moses Lake or receiving waters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---