BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2004, within existing resources, each school
district board of directors must adopt or amend as necessary a written
policy making reasonable provisions for students to exercise freedom
of speech and expression, and freedom of the press on school grounds.
The policy shall describe the rights and responsibilities of students
regarding:
(a) The use of school bulletin boards;
(b) The distribution of printed material or petitions;
(c) Self-expression in official school publications, and other
publications;
(d) The wearing of badges, buttons, and other insignia; and
(e) The use of other school facilities for self-expression.
(2) The policy required under subsection (1) of this section must
include the following provisions:
(a) Speech and expression shall be prohibited only if it:
(i) Is obscene, libelous, or slanderous;
(ii) Incites students and creates a clear and present danger of
committing unlawful acts on school premises or violating school
regulations; or
(iii) Creates a substantial disruption to the orderly operation of
the school;
(b) Student editors of official school publications are responsible
for assigning and editing the news, features, and editorial content of
their publications, subject to the limitations of this section; and
(c) Faculty advisers must supervise the student production staff of
official school publications, maintain professional standards of
journalism, and ensure that the provisions of the school policy are not
violated.
(3) School officials may not exercise prior restraint of material
prepared for official school publications unless the speech or
expression is prohibited under subsection (2)(a) of this section.
School officials have the burden of showing justification without undue
delay before any limitation of student expression.
(4) For purposes of this section, "official school publication"
means materials produced by students in journalism, newspaper,
yearbook, or writing classes and distributed to the student body either
free or for a fee.
(5) Nothing in this section prohibits or prevents a school district
board of directors from adopting otherwise valid rules regarding oral
communication by students upon school premises.

--- END ---