BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of a school district may approve a plan
submitted by the principal of an alternative school for restructuring
the alternative school consistent with the exemptions and the
applicable state and federal laws in subsection (2) of this section.
A school board may approve a proposed restructuring plan under this
section only after holding at least one public hearing and finding
that:
(a) The proposed plan is likely to provide more opportunities for
students to meet state and federal academic achievement goals;
(b) The proposed plan is designed to ensure compliance with the
applicable state and federal laws and other requirements in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(c) A sufficient number, as determined by the school board, of the
school's employees and parents support the proposed restructuring of
the school.
(2) An approved restructuring plan for an alternative school may
exempt the school from all state statutes and rules applicable to
school districts and school district boards of directors, except those
statutes and rules as provided in this subsection, and those statutes
and rules identified in the school's approved restructuring plan.
(a) An alternative school restructured under a plan approved by the
school district board of directors must:
(i) Comply with state and federal health, safety, parents' rights,
civil rights, and nondiscrimination laws applicable to school
districts, and to the same extent as school districts, including, but
not limited to: The family educational rights and privacy act, 20
U.S.C. Sec. 1232g; chapter 28A.640 RCW, sexual equality; and Title IX
of the education amendments of 1972, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.;
(ii) Participate in free and reduced priced meal programs to the
same extent as is required for other public schools;
(iii) Participate in nationally normed standardized achievement
tests as required in RCW 28A.230.190, 28A.230.193, and 28A.230.230 and
the elementary, middle school, and high school standards, requirements,
and assessment examinations as required in chapter 28A.655 RCW;
(iv) Employ certificated instructional staff as required in RCW
28A.410.010, however alternative schools may hire noncertificated
instructional staff of unusual competence and in exceptional cases as
specified in RCW 28A.150.260;
(v) Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW
28A.400.303;
(vi) Be subject to financial examinations and audits as determined
by the state auditor, including annual audits for legal and fiscal
compliance;
(vii) Comply with the annual performance report under RCW
28A.655.110;
(viii) Follow the performance improvement goals and requirements
adopted by the academic achievement and accountability commission by
rule under RCW 28A.655.030;
(ix) Be subject to the accountability requirements of the federal
no child left behind act of 2001, including Title I requirements;
(x) Comply with and be subject to the requirements under the
individuals with disabilities education act, as amended in 1997;
(xi) Report at least annually to the board of directors of the
school district and to parents of children enrolled at the school on
progress toward the student performance goals specified in the
restructuring plan; and
(xii) Be subject to and comply with legislation enacted after the
effective date of this section governing the operation and management
of alternative schools.
(3) For purposes of this section, "alternative school" means a
school operated by and accountable to a school district board of
directors, that varies from the district's traditional educational
service delivery model, is designed to serve students with special or
unique needs or interests, may support a specific academic focus or
utilize nontraditional teaching and learning philosophies, and is
commonly regarded as an alternative to the district's other schools.
(4) The school district board of directors shall provide, for any
alternative school restructured under this section, prompt and timely
funding for the alternative school including regular apportionment,
special education, categorical, student achievement, and other nonbasic
education moneys. Allocations shall be based on the school's actual
staff mix ratio and the school's actual FTE enrollment.

--- END ---