BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.033 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 13 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A promoter of a special event within the state of Washington
shall not permit a vendor to make or solicit retail sales of tangible
personal property or services at the special event unless the promoter
((obtains)) makes a good faith effort to obtain verification that the
vendor has obtained a certificate of registration from the department.
(2) A promoter of a special event shall:
(a) Keep, in addition to the records required under RCW 82.32.070,
a record of the dates and place of each special event, and the name,
address, and registration certificate number of ((vendors)) each vendor
permitted to make or solicit retail sales of tangible personal property
or services at the special event. The record of the date and place of
a special event, and the name, address, and registration certificate
number of each vendor at the event shall be preserved for a period of
one year from the date of a special event; and
(b) Provide to the department, within twenty days of receipt of a
written request from the department, a list of vendors permitted to
make or solicit retail sales of tangible personal property or services.
The list shall be in a form and contain such information as the
department may require, and shall include the date and place of the
event, and the name, address, and registration certificate number of
each vendor.
(3) If a promoter fails to make a good faith effort to comply with
the provisions of this section, the promoter is liable for the
penalties provided in this subsection (3).
(a) If a promoter fails to make a good faith effort to comply with
the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
impose a penalty of one hundred dollars for each vendor permitted to
make or solicit retail sales of tangible personal property or services
at the special event.
(b) If a promoter fails to make a good faith effort to comply with
the provisions of subsection (2)(b) of this section, the department
shall impose a penalty of:
(i) Two hundred fifty dollars if the information requested is not
received by the department within twenty days of the department's
written request; and
(ii) One hundred dollars for each vendor for whom the information
as required by subsection (2)(b) of this section is not provided to the
department.
(4) The aggregate of penalties imposed under subsection (3) of this
section may not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars for a special
event if the promoter has not previously been penalized under this
section. Under no circumstances is a promoter liable for sales tax or
business and occupation tax not remitted to the department by a vendor
at a special event.
(5) The department shall notify a promoter by mail of any penalty
imposed under this section, and the penalty shall be due within thirty
days from the date of the notice. If any penalty imposed under this
section is not received by the department by the due date, there shall
be assessed interest on the unpaid amount beginning the day following
the due date until the penalty is paid in full. The rate of interest
shall be computed on a daily basis on the amount of outstanding penalty
at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate computed
shall be adjusted annually in the same manner as provided in RCW
82.32.050(1)(c).
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Promoter" means a person who organizes, operates, or sponsors
a special event and who contracts with vendors for participation in the
special event.
(b) "Special event" means an entertainment, amusement,
recreational, educational, or marketing event, whether held on a
regular or irregular basis, at which more than one vendor makes or
solicits retail sales of tangible personal property or services. The
term includes, but is not limited to: Auto shows, recreational vehicle
shows, boat shows, home shows, garden shows, hunting and fishing shows,
stamp shows, comic book shows, sports memorabilia shows, craft shows,
art shows, antique shows, flea markets, exhibitions, festivals,
concerts, swap meets, bazaars, carnivals, athletic contests, circuses,
fairs, or other similar activities. "Special event" does not include
an event that is organized for the exclusive benefit of any nonprofit
organization as defined in RCW 82.04.3651. An event is organized for
the exclusive benefit of a nonprofit organization if all of the gross
proceeds of retail sales of all vendors at the event inure to the
benefit of the nonprofit organization on whose behalf the event is
being held. "Special event" does not include athletic contests that
involve competition between teams, when such competition consists of
more than five contests in a calendar year by at least one team at the
same facility or site.
(c) "Vendor" means a person who, at a special event, makes or
solicits retail sales of tangible personal property or services.
(7) "Good faith effort to comply" and "good faith effort to obtain"
may be shown by, but is not limited to, circumstances where a vendor:
(a) Includes a statement on all written contracts with its vendors
that a valid registration certificate number issued by the department
of revenue is required for participation in the special event and
requires vendors to indicate their registration certificate number on
these contracts; and
(b) Provides the department with a list of vendors and their
associated registration certificate numbers as provided in subsection
(2)(b) of this section.
(8) This section does not apply to:
(a) A special event whose promoter does not charge more than two
hundred dollars for a vendor to participate in a special event;
(b) A special event whose promoter charges a percentage of sales
instead of, or in addition to, a flat charge for a vendor to
participate in a special event if the promoter, in good faith, believes
that no vendor will pay more than two hundred dollars to participate in
the special event; or
(c) A person who does not organize, operate, or sponsor a special
event, but only provides a venue, supplies, furnishings, fixtures,
equipment, or services to a promoter of a special event.

--- END ---