BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature makes the following
findings:
(a) Fewer than half of the states in the United States operate job
safety and health programs under section eighteen of the occupational
safety and health act;
(b) Fewer than half of the employees in the Washington industrial
safety and health act services division at the department of labor and
industries actually conduct workplace safety inspections;
(c) Washington's workplaces are no safer than states that rely
exclusively on the occupational safety and health administration to
conduct workplace safety inspections; and
(d) More than thirty million dollars annually in workers'
compensation funds are used to pay for this unnecessary program.
(2) Therefore, the legislature declares that the purpose of this
act is to no longer administer Washington's state plan under section
eighteen of the occupational safety and health act until the
occupational safety and health act is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall cease to administer and enforce this chapter
on the effective date of this act and until the effective date of the
repeal of the federal occupational safety and health act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In the 2005 legislative session, the
legislature must pass a joint memorial that petitions congress for
amendments to the federal occupational safety and health act. The
amendments should extend the scope of the occupational safety and
health act to include public employees.

--- END ---