BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that emissions from
metal smelters, the use of lead arsenate pesticides, the combustion of
leaded gasoline, and other sources have contributed to arsenic and lead
soil contamination covering dispersed areas in the state. The
legislature further finds area-wide soil contamination presents special
challenges with respect to human health protection, land use, financial
impacts, and public awareness. The legislature further finds that
existing clean-up rules may place a significant burden on individual
homeowners, discouraging efforts to address potential public health
risks. The legislature further finds that the area-wide soil
contamination task force report provides recommendations for a
statewide strategy for addressing area-wide soil contamination. The
legislature therefore finds it in the public interest to implement an
area-wide soil contamination initiative that contains a broad-based
approach to education and awareness, identifies areas where area-wide
soil contamination is located, provides guidance on assessing
properties, removes barriers to testing private property, and provides
for the implementation of steps to protect public health, especially
children.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.105.010 and 1989 c 376 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The words and phrases defined in this section shall have the
meanings indicated when used in this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Area-wide soil contamination" means low to moderate level soil
contamination that is dispersed over a large geographic area ranging
from several hundred acres to many square miles.
(2) "Area-wide soil contamination zone" means an area where the
department has determined a probability exists for area-wide soil
contamination.
(3) "Child-use area" means public schools, public parks, and public
and private child care facilities.
(4) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(((2))) (5) "Director" means the director of the department of
ecology or the director's designee.
(((3))) (6) "Disposal site" means a geographical site in or upon
which hazardous wastes are disposed of in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter.
(((4))) (7) "Dispose or disposal" means the discarding or
abandoning of hazardous wastes or the treatment, decontamination, or
recycling of such wastes once they have been discarded or abandoned.
(((5))) (8) "Dangerous wastes" means any discarded, useless,
unwanted, or abandoned substances, including but not limited to certain
pesticides, or any residues or containers of such substances which are
disposed of in such quantity or concentration as to pose a substantial
present or potential hazard to human health, wildlife, or the
environment because such wastes or constituents or combinations of such
wastes:
(a) Have short-lived, toxic properties that may cause death,
injury, or illness or have mutagenic, teratogenic, or carcinogenic
properties; or
(b) Are corrosive, explosive, flammable, or may generate pressure
through decomposition or other means.
(((6))) (9) "Eligible property" means child-use areas and private
residences within area-wide soil contamination zones.
(10) "Extremely hazardous waste" means any dangerous waste which
(a) will persist in a hazardous form for several years or more at
a disposal site and which in its persistent form
(i) presents a significant environmental hazard and may be
concentrated by living organisms through a food chain or may affect the
genetic make-up of man or wildlife, and
(ii) is highly toxic to man or wildlife
(b) if disposed of at a disposal site in such quantities as would
present an extreme hazard to man or the environment.
(((7))) (11) "Initiative" means the area-wide soil contamination
initiative in section 4 of this act.
(12) "Low to moderate soil contamination" means arsenic
concentrations of up to one hundred milligrams per kilogram and lead
concentrations ranging from five hundred to seven hundred milligrams
per kilogram.
(13) "Person" means any person, firm, association, county, public
or municipal or private corporation, agency, or other entity
whatsoever.
(((8))) (14) "Pesticide" shall have the meaning of the term as
defined in RCW 15.58.030 as now or hereafter amended.
(((9))) (15) "Solid waste advisory committee" means the same
advisory committee as per RCW 70.95.040 through 70.95.070.
(((10))) (16) "Designated zone facility" means any facility that
requires an interim or final status permit under rules adopted under
this chapter and that is not a preempted facility as defined in this
section.
(((11))) (17) "Facility" means all contiguous land and structures,
other appurtenances, and improvements on the land used for recycling,
storing, treating, incinerating, or disposing of hazardous waste.
(((12))) (18) "Preempted facility" means any facility that includes
as a significant part of its activities any of the following
operations: (a) Landfill, (b) incineration, (c) land treatment, (d)
surface impoundment to be closed as a landfill, or (e) waste pile to be
closed as a landfill.
(((13))) (19) "Hazardous household substances" means those
substances identified by the department as hazardous household
substances in the guidelines developed under RCW 70.105.220.
(((14))) (20) "Hazardous substances" means any liquid, solid, gas,
or sludge, including any material, substance, product, commodity, or
waste, regardless of quantity, that exhibits any of the characteristics
or criteria of hazardous waste as described in rules adopted under this
chapter.
(((15))) (21) "Hazardous waste" means and includes all dangerous
and extremely hazardous waste, including substances composed of both
radioactive and hazardous components.
(((16))) (22) "Local government" means a city, town, or county.
(((17))) (23) "Moderate-risk waste" means (a) any waste that
exhibits any of the properties of hazardous waste but is exempt from
regulation under this chapter solely because the waste is generated in
quantities below the threshold for regulation, and (b) any household
wastes which are generated from the disposal of substances identified
by the department as hazardous household substances.
(((18))) (24) "Service charge" means an assessment imposed under
RCW 70.105.280 against those facilities that store, treat, incinerate,
or dispose of dangerous or extremely hazardous waste that contains both
a nonradioactive hazardous component and a radioactive component.
Service charges shall also apply to facilities undergoing closure under
this chapter in those instances where closure entails the physical
characterization of remaining wastes which contain both a
nonradioactive hazardous component and a radioactive component or the
management of such wastes through treatment or removal, except any
commercial low-level radioactive waste facility.
(25) "Site-specific public health plan" means measures developed
for an eligible property containing individual protective measures,
site-specific mitigation, and other remedial actions to protect public
health on sites containing area-wide soil contamination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.105 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall work with the department of health, the
department of agriculture, the department of community, trade, and
economic development, and local governments to increase knowledge of
area-wide soil contamination through a broad-based education and
awareness campaign. The education campaign shall focus on persons and
organizations that care for children including parents, educators,
health care providers, and child care providers. The elements of the
education campaign shall include but are not limited to providing:
(1) Information on where area-wide soil contamination is most
likely to occur;
(2) Information on the health risks associated with exposure to
area-wide soil contamination;
(3) Information on options for conducting voluntary individual
property evaluations;
(4) Guidance on how to collect and analyze soil samples;
(5) Measures a person can take to reduce the likelihood of exposure
to arsenic and lead in soil; and
(6) Educational materials for local permitting and land-use
planning departments to educate developers and others regarding area-wide soil contamination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall implement an area-wide soil contamination
initiative to minimize the potential for exposure to area-wide soil
contamination, focusing efforts on the protection of children. The
initiative shall include additional testing of sites in counties west
of the crest of the Cascade mountains to determine the extent of
contamination and improve existing data and maps. The initiative shall
provide education, outreach, and financial incentives to seek voluntary
participation by eligible persons within area-wide soil contamination
zones.
(2) The department shall develop area-wide soil contamination
zones within the state. The department shall assist local governments
requesting assistance to identify area-wide soil contamination zones.
(3) Subject to available funds, the department shall:
(a) Conduct qualitative evaluations at all child-use areas within
an area-wide soil contamination zone; and
(b) Conduct soil samples for individual properties and child-use
areas warranting additional analysis.
(4) Within area-wide soil contamination zones, persons owning
eligible properties may volunteer to participate in the area-wide soil
contamination initiative.
(5) The department shall assist owners of eligible properties that
volunteer to participate in the initiative by providing the following
assistance including, but not limited to:
(a) Conducting qualitative evaluations to determine where area-wide
soil contamination exposures could occur;
(b) Testing soils where evaluations indicate potential for
contamination; and
(c) Providing technical and financial assistance to implement site-specific public health plans including, but not limited to, identifying
appropriate individual protective measures, installing protective
barriers, removal and replacement of small amounts of soil, tilling or
blending of soil, and other remedial actions. To implement site-specific public health plans, the department may provide up to seventy-five percent of the cost for private residences or up to one hundred
percent of the cost for child-use areas.
(6) The department shall establish a streamlined system to
recognize eligible properties that have soil samples with lead and
arsenic concentrations in compliance with model toxics control clean-up
standards in chapter 70.105D RCW.
(7) The department shall establish an enforcement forbearance
policy for eligible properties choosing to participate in the
initiative. Owners of eligible property implementing site-specific
public health plans in subsection (5) of this section are exempt from
enforcement actions under chapter 70.105D RCW. Owners of eligible
property choosing not to implement site-specific public health plans
would not be exempt from enforcement under chapter 70.105D RCW.
(8)(a) Except as specified in (b) of this subsection, the
department shall not use model toxics control act clean-up procedures
under chapter 70.105D RCW for eligible properties with low to moderate
contamination levels of lead and arsenic.
(b) The department shall use the clean-up procedures specified in
chapter 70.105D RCW when:
(i) Individual properties have above low to moderate soil
contamination levels of arsenic or lead;
(ii) Individual properties have contaminates other than arsenic and
lead above standards developed pursuant to chapter 70.105D RCW;
(iii) Individual properties have ground water contamination or the
department determines there is a significant risk of ground water
contamination;
(iv) The individual property owner has implemented a final remedy
under chapter 70.105D RCW; or
(v) The individual property owner chooses to use the clean-up
procedures specified in chapter 70.105D RCW.
(c) Subject to available funds, the department shall provide
financial assistance to eligible property owners in (b)(i) through
(iii) of this subsection that must comply with chapter 70.105D RCW.
The department shall not initiate enforcement actions against eligible
property owners voluntarily participating in the initiative that are
unable to implement remedial actions due to insufficient funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.105 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall assist other state agencies and local
governments and provide funding where appropriate to implement area-wide soil contamination initiative activities including but not limited
to:
(1) Obtaining additional scientific information on the health of
Washington residents who may be exposed to arsenic and lead;
(2) Providing financial assistance to develop mandatory soil
testing for new construction of public child-use areas;
(3) Providing financial assistance to the department of social and
health services to develop a voluntary child care certification program
to raise awareness of area-wide soil contamination;
(4) Providing financial assistance to local governments to identify
historical orchard locations and update smelter emission plume
dispersal areas, or other areas with a probability of area-wide soil
contamination;
(5) Providing financial assistance to public health districts to
conduct blood lead testing or urinary arsenic screening;
(6) Providing financial assistance to build area-wide soil
contamination training into any system for the state training and
registry system for child care training programs; and
(7) Amending the state environmental policy act checklist to
address area-wide soil contamination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The sum of one million five hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2005, from the local toxics control
account--state to the department of ecology for the purposes of
implementing sections 1 through 5 of this act.

--- END ---