BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a large and
growing academic gap exists between children who come from families in
which English is the families' first language and children from
immigrant families. The legislature also finds that parental
involvement in a child's education is one of the keys to overcoming the
achievement gap. Research indicates that parental involvement in
education leads to higher student achievement, improved graduation
rates, better attendance, and fewer discipline problems. The
legislature further finds that having school information and documents
available in a family's first language would help that family work in
partnership with their children's school.
The legislature intends to help school districts provide written
materials in the languages most commonly understood by large segments
of the districts' parents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By October 31, 2005, the superintendent of
public instruction shall report to the governor and the legislative
education and fiscal committees on the feasibility of having the state
provide direct support to school districts for school information
provided to parents and community members in the languages most
commonly understood by large segments of the districts' immigrant
parents. In preparing the report, the superintendent of public
instruction shall work in cooperation with the Washington state school
directors association, organizations concerned with the language
barriers faced by immigrant parents, and other interested
organizations, and shall consider the following:
(1) The number of languages that are understood by large segments
of immigrant parents throughout the state, in each first class
district, and in each educational service district;
(2) A recommended percentage of parents that could be used to
create a threshold over which school information and documents should
be made available in an immigrant family's first language;
(3) A set of strategies and best practices that districts might use
to communicate with immigrant families, including strategies to
communicate in the families' first languages;
(4) The types of school information and documents that should be
made available in an immigrant family's first language;
(5) The cost to school districts of providing school information in
the languages most commonly understood by immigrant parents. The
funding information should include an estimate of current expenditures
and an estimate of any additional expenditures that might be required
to expand the number of languages or the amount of translated material
provided to immigrant parents.

--- END ---