BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds the children of
Washington state need and deserve high quality public schools that will
give all students the opportunity to meet the state's academic
standards and gain the knowledge and skill required to be successful
and contented citizens of the twenty-first century. A quality public
education system is also crucial for our state's future economic
success and prosperity. The legislature further finds that Washington
state made a major commitment to improved public education by passing
the Washington education reform act in 1993. That act established new,
higher standards of academic achievement for all students. It also
established new levels of accountability for students, teachers,
schools, and school districts. Finally, it promised management and
fiscal flexibility to school districts to help them use their ingenuity
to improve student learning and help all children meet the state's new
academic standards.
The legislature intends to take the next step toward education
reform by changing the basic education act to give all children the
opportunity to make at least one year's worth of academic growth for
each year they are enrolled in a Washington public school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning September 1, 2006, basic education includes the
opportunity to attend a school in which ninety percent or more of
assessed students achieve at least one year's academic gain for each
year the students are enrolled in Washington's public schools. The
gain shall be measured by the results of the third, fourth, fifth,
sixth, seventh, eighth, and high school Washington assessments of
student learning in reading and mathematics.
(2) Beginning September 1, 2006, the superintendent of public
instruction shall annually report to school districts information on
the yearly academic gain of individual students as measured by the
assessments in subsection (1) of this section. The report shall
include the percentage of students in each assessed grade who achieved
at or above the one hundred ten percentile of the state standard and
the percentage of students who achieved at or below the eighty
percentile of the state standard in reading and in mathematics on the
Washington assessment of student learning.
(3) By October 31, 2005, the superintendent of public instruction
shall report to the governor and house of representatives and senate
education committees on any laws that need to be amended to ensure that
school districts have the tools and regulatory flexibility to provide
students with a basic education that includes the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---