BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" has the meaning provided in RCW 80.50.020 and
includes a fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facility subject
to RCW 70.94.152.
(2) "Authority" means any air pollution control agency whose
jurisdictional boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of one or
more counties.
(3) "Commercial operation" means the date that the first
electricity produced by a facility is delivered for commercial sale to
the power grid.
(4) "Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council
created by RCW 80.50.030.
(5) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(6) "Fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facility" means an
electric generation facility with an aggregate, net generating capacity
of twenty-five thousand kilowatts or more, measured using maximum
continuous electric generating capacity, less minimum auxiliary load,
at average ambient temperature and pressure.
(7) "Fossil fuel" means natural gas, petroleum, coal, or any form
of solid, liquid, or gaseous fuel derived from such material to produce
heat for the generation of electricity.
(8) "Mitigation project" means one or more of the following:
(a) Projects or actions that are implemented by the certificate
holder or order of approval holder, directly or through its agent, or
by an independent qualified organization to mitigate the emission of
carbon dioxide produced by the fossil-fueled thermal electric
generation facility. This term includes but is not limited to the use
of, energy efficiency measures, clean and efficient transportation
measures, renewable energy resources, demand side management of
electricity consumption, and carbon sequestration programs;
(b) Direct application of combined heat and power (cogeneration);
and
(c) Market carbon credits that can be traced to real and
identifiable carbon dioxide mitigation projects.
(9) "Total carbon dioxide emissions" means the amount of carbon
dioxide emitted over a thirty-year period that must be mitigated based
on the manufacturer's or designer's guaranteed total net generating
capacity, new equipment heat rate, and taking into account any
enforceable limitations on operational hours or fuel types and use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The provisions of this chapter apply to
fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facilities:
(a) For which an application for site certification is made to the
council after July 1, 2004;
(b) For which an application for an order of approval has been
submitted under RCW 70.94.152 to the department or authority after July
1, 2004; or
(c) That have an existing site certification agreement or order of
approval and, after July 1, 2004, apply to the council, department, or
authority, as appropriate, to increase the output of the carbon dioxide
emissions by fifteen percent or more through permanent changes in
facility operations or modification of equipment.
(2)(a) A proposed site certification agreement submitted to the
governor under RCW 80.50.100 must include an approved carbon dioxide
mitigation plan.
(b) For fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facilities not
under jurisdiction of the council, the order of approval shall include
the approved carbon dioxide mitigation plan.
(3) An applicant for a fossil-fueled thermal electric generation
facility must include one of the following carbon dioxide mitigation
options as part of its mitigation plan:
(a) Payment to a third party; or
(b) Direct investment in carbon dioxide mitigation projects.
(4) Fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facilities that
receive site certification approval or orders of approval shall provide
mitigation for twenty percent of the total carbon dioxide emissions
produced by the facility.
(5) A capacity factor of sixty percent, or sixty percent of the
operational limitations contained in the order of approval issued under
RCW 70.94.152, shall be used in determining the total carbon dioxide
emissions.
(6) If the certificate holder or order of approval holder chooses
to pay a third party to provide the mitigation, the mitigation rate
shall be one dollar and sixty cents per metric ton of carbon dioxide
emitted.
(a) Through rule making, the council may adjust the rate per ton
biennially as long as any increase or decrease does not exceed fifty
percent of the current rate.
(b) In adjusting the rate the council shall consider, but is not
limited to, the current market price of a ton of carbon dioxide and the
economic feasibility for potential applicants for fossil-fueled thermal
electric generation facilities.
(7) The certificate holder or order of approval holder may choose
a lump sum payment or partial payment over a period of five years.
(a) Under the lump sum payment option, the payment amount is
determined using the per ton rate established under subsections (4) and
(5) of this section for total carbon dioxide emissions multiplied by
thirty years.
(b) No later than one hundred twenty days after the start of
commercial operation, the certificate holder or order of approval
holder shall make a one-time payment to the independent qualified
organization for the amount determined under subsection (6) of this
section.
(c) As an alternative to a one-time payment, the certificate holder
or order of approval holder may make a partial payment of twenty
percent of the amount determined under subsection (6) of this section
no later than one hundred twenty days after commercial operation and a
payment in the same amount or as adjusted according to subsection
(6)(a) of this section, on the anniversary date of the initial payment
in each of the following four years. With the initial payment, the
certificate holder or order of approval holder shall provide a letter
of credit or other comparable security acceptable to the council or the
department for the remaining eighty percent mitigation payment amount
including possible changes to the rate per metric ton from rule making
under subsection (6)(a) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The carbon dioxide mitigation option
that provides for direct investment by the certificate holder or order
of approval holder is implemented through mitigation projects conducted
directly by the certificate or order of approval holder.
(2) Mitigation projects must be approved by the council,
department, or authority, as appropriate, and included in the proposed
and final site certification agreement or order of approval. Direct
investment mitigation projects must meet the following criteria:
(a) The project plan provides a reasonable certainty that the
performance requirements of the carbon dioxide mitigation plan will be
achieved;
(b) The extent to which external events can reduce the amount of
carbon dioxide offset is minimized;
(c) The project plan accomplishes carbon dioxide reductions that
would otherwise not have taken place; and
(d) The project plan provides for carbon dioxide mitigation for the
appropriate duration based on the mitigation option that is included in
the site certification agreement or order of approval.
(3) Mitigation projects must be fully in place within a reasonable
time after the start of commercial operation.
(4) The certificate holder or order of approval holder may not use
more than twenty percent of the total funds for the selection,
monitoring, and evaluation of mitigation projects and the management
and enforcement of contracts.
(5) The implementation of a carbon dioxide mitigation project shall
be monitored by an independent entity for conformance with the
performance requirements of the carbon dioxide mitigation plan.
(6) If federal carbon dioxide legislation is adopted, compliance
with this section may entitle the certificate holder or order of
approval holder to benefits applicable to that legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The council shall maintain a list of
independent qualified organizations with proven experience in emissions
mitigation activities and a demonstrated ability to carry out their
activities in an efficient, reliable, and cost-effective manner.
(2) An independent qualified organization shall not use more than
twenty percent of the total funds for selection, monitoring, and
evaluation of mitigation projects and the management and enforcement of
contracts. None of these funds shall be used to lobby federal, state,
and local agencies, their elected officials, officers, or employees.
(3) Before signing contracts to purchase offsets with funds from
certificate holders or order of approval holders, an independent
qualified organization must demonstrate to the council that the
mitigation projects it proposes to use meet the following criteria:
(a) The project plan provides a reasonable certainty that the
performance requirements of the carbon dioxide mitigation plan will be
achieved;
(b) The extent to which external events can reduce the amount of
carbon dioxide offset is minimized;
(c) The project plan accomplishes carbon dioxide reductions that
would otherwise not have taken place; and
(d) The project plan provides for carbon dioxide mitigation for the
appropriate duration based on the mitigation option that is included in
the site certification agreement or order of approval.
(4) The independent qualified organization shall permit the council
to appoint up to three persons to inspect plans, operation, and
compliance activities of the organization and to audit financial
records and performance measures for carbon dioxide mitigation projects
using carbon dioxide mitigation money paid by certificate holders or
order of approval holders under this chapter.
(5) An independent qualified organization must file biennial
reports with the council and the department on the performance of
carbon dioxide mitigation projects, including the amount of carbon
dioxide reductions achieved and a statement of cost for the mitigation
period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following types of fossil-fueled thermal
electric generators are exempt from carbon dioxide requirements under
sections 2 through 4 of this act:
(1) Fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facilities that are
standby electric generation facilities including the physical
structures necessary to install and connect standby generators, that
provide temporary electric energy in the event of a power outage and
that are physically incapable of being interconnected with the
transmission grid; and
(2) Temporary electric generation facilities with electric
generation capacity of no more than five hundred kilowatts, measured
using maximum continuous electric generating capacity, less minimum
auxiliary load, at average ambient temperature and pressure, that are
located at a site for no more than one year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of ecology or local air pollution control
authority shall implement the carbon dioxide mitigation program for
fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facilities as described in
chapter 80.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).
(2) For mitigation projects conducted directly by the applicant,
the department or local air authority shall conduct a public hearing on
the mitigation plan. Taking into consideration comments from the
public, the department or local air authority shall approve or deny the
mitigation plan.
(3) The department or authority may determine, assess, and collect
fees sufficient to cover the costs of administering the carbon dioxide
mitigation program requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Nothing in this act shall be construed to
either expand or diminish statutory authority granted under other
provisions of state law.

--- END ---