BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed under this chapter does not apply to an
eligible person for a period of twenty-four consecutive months
beginning with the month that the eligible person first engages in
business.
(2) The following definitions apply throughout this section, unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Advanced computing" means technologies used in the designing
and developing of computing hardware and software, including
innovations in designing the full spectrum of hardware from hand-held
calculators to super computers, and peripheral equipment.
(b) "Advanced materials" means materials with engineered properties
created through the development of specialized processing and synthesis
technology, including ceramics, high value-added metals, electronic
materials, composites, polymers, and biomaterials.
(c) "Biotechnology" means the application of technologies, such as
recombinant DNA techniques, biochemistry, molecular and cellular
biology, genetics and genetic engineering, cell fusion techniques, and
new bioprocesses, using living organisms, or parts of organisms, to
produce or modify products, to improve plants or animals, to develop
microorganisms for specific uses, to identify targets for small
molecule pharmaceutical development, or to transform biological systems
into useful processes and products or to develop microorganisms for
specific uses.
(d) "Electronic device technology" means technologies involving
microelectronics; semiconductors; electronic equipment and
instrumentation; radio frequency, microwave, and millimeter
electronics; optical and optic-electrical devices; and data and digital
communications and imaging devices.
(e) "Eligible person" means a person as defined in RCW 82.04.030,
who is a small business as defined in RCW 19.85.020; and a manufacturer
as defined in RCW 82.04.110 or engages in research and development in
Washington in advanced computing, advanced materials, biotechnology,
electronic device technology, or environmental technology. "Eligible
person" does not include a business existing on the effective date of
this section that incorporates, reincorporates, merges, is acquired by
another business, or otherwise changes or reforms its identity after
the effective date of this section.
(f) "Environmental technology" means assessment and prevention of
threats or damage to human health or the environment, environmental
cleanup, and the development of alternative energy sources.
(g) "Research and development" means activities performed to
discover technological information, and technical and nonroutine
activities concerned with translating technological information into
new or improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, inventions,
or software. The term includes exploration of a new use for an
existing drug, device, or biological product if the new use requires
separate licensing by the federal food and drug administration under
Title 21 C.F.R. The term does not include adaptation or duplication of
existing products where the products are not substantially improved by
application of the technology, nor does the term include surveys and
studies, social science and humanities research, market research or
testing, quality control, sale promotion and service, computer software
developed for internal use, and research in areas such as improved
style, taste, and seasonal design.

--- END ---