BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for investment in computers and preinstalled software on those
computers, used by an eligible person exclusively for business
purposes. The credit is equal to the purchase price of the property
multiplied by ten percent.
(2) No application is necessary for the tax credit. Persons taking
the credit are subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW.
In no case may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried over
to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year.
No refunds may be granted for credits under this section. Credit taken
in any one calendar year may not exceed twenty million dollars, and
credit taken under this section by any one person may not exceed one
hundred ten dollars per computer.
(3) For purposes of this section, "eligible person" means a person
as defined in RCW 82.04.030, who is a "small business" as defined in
RCW 19.85.020.

--- END ---