BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, an eligible
person is allowed a credit against the tax due. The credit is equal to
six hundred fifty dollars for each qualified employment position
created after the effective date of this section and maintained for a
period of at least twelve consecutive months. A credit is earned for
the calendar year the person is hired.
(b) Credit may not be taken for hiring of persons into positions
that exist on the effective date of this section. Credit is authorized
for new employees hired for new positions created on or after the
effective date of this section. New positions filled by existing
employees are eligible for the credit under this section only if the
position vacated by the existing employee is filled by a new hire.
(c) If a position is filled before July 1st, it qualifies for the
full yearly credit for that calendar year. If it is filled after June
30th, this position qualifies for half of the credit for that calendar
year.
(d) Credit may be accrued and carried over until it is used. No
refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(e) No application is necessary for the tax credit. Persons taking
the credit are subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW.
(2) Persons taking the credit must keep records necessary for the
department to verify eligibility under this section. This information
includes:
(a) Employment records; and
(b) Information relating to health care coverage provided to
employees.
(3) The employment security department shall provide to the
department of revenue such information needed by the department of
revenue to verify eligibility under this section.
(4) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been used is immediately due. The department shall
assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited taxes for which the
person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, shall be
assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken, and shall
accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Eligible person" means a person as defined in RCW 82.04.030,
who is a "small business" as defined in RCW 19.85.020; and who provides
health care coverage for all employees.
(b) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee who is paid at least one and one-half times the minimum wage.
Full time means a position for at least thirty-five hours a week. If
an employee is either voluntarily or involuntarily separated from
employment, the employment position is considered filled on a full-time
basis if the employer is either training or actively recruiting a
replacement employee.

--- END ---