BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that
additional funding provided under section 2 of this act be used by
school districts to provide regional cost-of-living salary supplements
to school district employees, as determined through collective
bargaining, and to provide local funds to support the purposes defined
in RCW 28A.505.210(1) (c) and (d) (Initiative 728).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county may impose a regular property tax levy for the
maintenance and operation of schools within the county in accordance
with this section.
(2) Upon receiving resolutions requesting a levy under this section
from the board of directors of school districts within the county where
the petitioning school districts represent a majority of the students
within the county, the county legislative authority shall submit an
authorizing proposition to the county voters.
(3) If the proposition is approved by a majority of the voters
voting on the proposition, the county shall impose a levy not to exceed
twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value.
(4) Ballot propositions shall conform with RCW 29A.36.210.
(5) Any tax imposed under this section shall be used only for the
maintenance and operation of schools. The county shall distribute levy
proceeds to each school district within the county based on the
district's full-time equivalent student enrollment in the prior school
year.
(6) The tax levy authorized in this section is not part of the
county levy in RCW 84.52.043(1) and the limitations in RCW 84.52.043(2)
do not apply.
(7) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the tax levy
authorized in this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.36.210 and 2003 c 111 s 921 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
the regular property tax levies authorized in RCW 36.69.145, 67.38.130,
or 84.52.069 shall contain in substance the following:
"Shall the . . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose regular property tax levies of . . . . . . (insert
the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed valuation
for each of . . . . . . (insert the maximum number of years allowable)
consecutive years?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"
Each voter shall indicate either "Yes" or "No" on his or her ballot
in accordance with the procedures established under this title.
(2) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
a permanent regular tax levy under RCW 84.52.069 or section 2 of this
act shall contain the following:
"Shall the . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose a PERMANENT regular property levy of . . . . .
(insert the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

Sec. 4 RCW 84.52.043 and 2003 c 83 s 311 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as
amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal
property by the taxing districts hereafter named shall be as follows:
(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a)
The levy by the state shall not exceed three dollars and sixty cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted to the state equalized
value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state
department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support of the
common schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not exceed one dollar
and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c) the levy
by any road district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or
town shall not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county is hereby
authorized to increase its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a
rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value for general county purposes if the
total levies for both the county and any road district within the
county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as
a result of the increased county levy.
(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior
taxing districts, other than the state, shall not exceed five dollars
and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term
"junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the
state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and
public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection
shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law
by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution;
(c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW
84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical
services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable
housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f)
the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are
protected under RCW 84.52.120; ((and)) (g) levies imposed by ferry
districts under RCW 36.54.130; and (h) levies by counties for school
purposes under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.55.005 and 2002 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of
economic analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of
the year before the taxes are payable;
(2) "Limit factor" means:
(a) For taxing districts with a population of less than ten
thousand in the calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred
one percent;
(b) For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized
under RCW 84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor under that section
or one hundred one percent;
(c) For all other districts, the lesser of one hundred one percent
or one hundred percent plus inflation; and
(3) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW
84.04.140, except does not include tax levies under section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---