BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The governing boards of the institutions of higher education of the
state of Washington shall have any and all powers necessary to carry
out their missions and shall exercise those powers to carry out the
purposes of this title and those purposes necessarily implied
therefrom, unless specifically prohibited by law.

--- END ---