BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is estimated that veterans constitute
nearly thirty percent of Washington's homeless adult population.
According to the United States department of veterans affairs, veterans
are twice as likely as nonveterans to become homeless. Women veterans
are four times as likely as nonveteran women to become homeless.
Homeless veterans experience multiple barriers to employment, including
long-term homelessness, unemployment, higher rates of hepatitis C,
physical and mental disability, posttraumatic stress disorder, and
substance abuse issues. When veterans who are seriously mentally ill
are homeless and do not have access to stable, affordable housing and
the services they need, they frequently enter the criminal justice
system or use costly emergency services, including emergency rooms,
hospitals, mental health treatment facilities, shelters, and other
services for crises that could have been avoided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the policy of this state and the purpose of this section
to facilitate and support the development and operation of housing for
homeless mentally ill veterans who possess significant barriers to
their social reintegration due to mental illness, and the effects of
long-term homelessness that render them unable to share housing with
the general homeless population.
(2) The provision of housing exclusively for mentally ill veterans
who possess significant barriers to social reintegration and employment
is hereby authorized and shall not be considered unlawful
discrimination, notwithstanding any other provision of law.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "housing for mentally ill
veterans," means emergency, transitional, or permanent housing tied to
supportive services that assist mentally ill veterans who possess
significant barriers to social reintegration and employment in
stabilizing their lives and developing the skills and resources they
need to make successful transitions to independent, self-sufficient
lives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The mental health division of the
department of social and health services shall establish a pilot
program to provide housing for fifty mentally ill, homeless veterans.
The pilot program shall be financed through the capturing of moneys
that otherwise would be spent on criminal justice, hospital emergency
room, and other sources to serve mentally ill, homeless veterans.
(2) The department of social and health services may adopt rules to
implement this section.

--- END ---