BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that: (a)
Large electricity users contribute greatly to the economy of Washington
state; (b) many of these large electricity users are located in
Washington because of the historical low cost of electricity in this
state; (c) growth and the resultant increase in demand for electricity
drives costs up, placing an economic burden on large electricity users
potentially driving them out of the state; and (d) it is in the best
interest of the state of Washington to secure low cost electricity for
large electricity users thereby keeping them in the state. It is the
intent of the legislature to establish the framework for the creation
of the Washington state conservation authority for the purpose of
applying Washington's expertise and creativity in conservation
techniques and financing to secure affordable electricity for high
electricity-use industries.
(2) The department of general administration shall develop
recommendations for the establishment of the Washington state
conservation authority. In developing these recommendations, the
department shall work with stakeholders, chairs of the appropriate
legislative committees, and the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) The recommendations required by this act shall provide that the
Washington state conservation authority have the authority to aggregate
conservation savings from all levels of state and local government
utilizing a combination of performance bonding and contract financing
to generate energy conservation. The conservation gained from this
effort may be provided to electricity consumers that require five
megawatts or more at a target price of thirty-five dollars or less a
megawatt hour. These qualifying customers may receive the power in one
megawatt increments. All potential qualifying consumers must have an
equal opportunity to acquire this lower cost power.
(4) For the purpose of this act, "performance contracting" means
utilizing a stream of revenue from long-term purchases of one megawatt
increments to finance bonds used to purchase capital investments which
result in energy conservation.
(5) The department of general administration shall submit
recommendations, including draft legislation, required by this act to
the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1,
2004.

--- END ---