BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.100.050 and 2001 c 251 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An individual or group of individuals duly licensed or
otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional services
within this state may organize and become a shareholder or shareholders
of a professional corporation for pecuniary profit under the provisions
of Title 23B RCW for the purpose of rendering professional service.
One or more of the legally authorized individuals shall be the
incorporators of the professional corporation.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, registered
architects and registered engineers may own stock in and render their
individual professional services through one professional service
corporation.
(3) Licensed health care professionals, providing services to
enrolled participants either directly or through arrangements with a
health maintenance organization registered under chapter 48.46 RCW or
federally qualified health maintenance organization, may own stock in
and render their individual professional services through one
professional service corporation.
(4) Professionals may organize a nonprofit nonstock corporation
under this chapter and chapter 24.03 RCW to provide professional
services, and the provisions of this chapter relating to stock and
referring to Title 23B RCW shall not apply to any such corporation.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, health
care professionals who are licensed or certified pursuant to chapters
18.06, 18.225, 18.22, 18.25, 18.29, 18.34, 18.35, 18.36A, 18.50, 18.53,
18.55, 18.57, 18.57A, 18.59, 18.64, 18.71, 18.71A, 18.74, 18.79, 18.83,
18.89, 18.108, and 18.138 RCW may own stock in and render their
individual professional services through one professional service
corporation and are to be considered, for the purpose of forming a
professional service corporation, as rendering the "same specific
professional services" or "same professional services" or similar
terms.
(b) ((Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, health
care professionals who are regulated under chapters 18.59 and 18.74 RCW
may own stock in and render their individual professional services
through one professional service corporation formed for the sole
purpose of providing professional services within their respective
scope of practice.
(c))) Formation of a professional service corporation under this
subsection does not restrict the application of the uniform
disciplinary act under chapter 18.130 RCW, or applicable health care
professional statutes under Title 18 RCW, including but not limited to
restrictions on persons practicing a health profession without being
appropriately credentialed and persons practicing beyond the scope of
their credential.

--- END ---