BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.090 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 13 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) If payment of any tax due on a return to be filed by a taxpayer
is not received by the department of revenue by the due date, there
shall be assessed a penalty of five percent of the amount of the tax;
and if the tax is not received on or before the last day of the month
following the due date, there shall be assessed a total penalty of
fifteen percent of the amount of the tax under this subsection; and if
the tax is not received on or before the last day of the second month
following the due date, there shall be assessed a total penalty of
twenty-five percent of the amount of the tax under this subsection. No
penalty so added shall be less than five dollars.
(2) If the department of revenue determines, other than through the
managed audit process, that any tax ((is due)) has been substantially
underpaid, there shall be assessed a penalty of five percent of the
amount of the tax determined by the department to be due; and if
payment of any tax determined by the department to be due is not
received by the department by the due date specified in the notice, or
any extension thereof, there shall be assessed a total penalty of
fifteen percent of the amount of the tax under this subsection; and if
the tax is not received on or before the thirtieth day following the
due date specified in the notice of tax due, or any extension thereof,
there shall be assessed a total penalty of twenty-five percent of the
amount of the tax under this subsection. ((No penalty so added shall
be less than five dollars.)) As used in this section, "substantially
underpaid" means that less than seventy-five percent of the taxes due
were paid and the amount of underpayment is no less than one thousand
dollars.
(3) If the department of revenue determines through the managed
audit process or other than as described in subsection (2) of this
section, that any tax is due and payment of the tax due is not received
by the department by the due date specified in the notice, or any
extension thereof, there shall be assessed a penalty of ten percent of
the amount of tax due under this subsection; and if the tax is not
received on or before the thirtieth day following the due date
specified in the notice of tax due, or extension thereof, there shall
be assessed a total penalty of twenty percent of the amount of the tax
due under this subsection.
(4) If a warrant be issued by the department of revenue for the
collection of taxes, increases, and penalties, there shall be added
thereto a penalty of ten percent of the amount of the tax, but not less
than ten dollars.
(((4))) (5) If the department finds that a person has engaged in
any business or performed any act upon which a tax is imposed under
this title and that person has not obtained from the department a
registration certificate as required by RCW 82.32.030, the department
shall impose a penalty of five percent of the amount of tax due from
that person for the period that the person was not registered as
required by RCW 82.32.030. The department shall not impose the penalty
under this subsection (((4))) (5) if a person who has engaged in
business taxable under this title without first having registered as
required by RCW 82.32.030, prior to any notification by the department
of the need to register, obtains a registration certificate from the
department.
(((5))) (6) If the department finds that all or any part of a
deficiency resulted from the disregard of specific written instructions
as to reporting or tax liabilities, the department shall add a penalty
of ten percent of the amount of the additional tax found due because of
the failure to follow the instructions. A taxpayer disregards specific
written instructions when the department of revenue has informed the
taxpayer in writing of the taxpayer's tax obligations and the taxpayer
fails to act in accordance with those instructions unless the
department has not issued final instructions because the matter is
under appeal pursuant to this chapter or departmental regulations. The
department shall not assess the penalty under this section upon any
taxpayer who has made a good faith effort to comply with the specific
written instructions provided by the department to that taxpayer.
Specific written instructions may be given as a part of a tax
assessment, audit, determination, or closing agreement, provided that
such specific written instructions shall apply only to the taxpayer
addressed or referenced on such documents. Any specific written
instructions by the department of revenue shall be clearly identified
as such and shall inform the taxpayer that failure to follow the
instructions may subject the taxpayer to the penalties imposed by this
subsection.
(((6))) (7) If the department finds that all or any part of the
deficiency resulted from an intent to evade the tax payable hereunder,
a further penalty of fifty percent of the additional tax found to be
due shall be added.
(((7))) (8) The penalties imposed under subsections (1) through
(((4))) (5) of this section can each be imposed on the same tax found
to be due. This subsection does not prohibit or restrict the
application of other penalties authorized by law.
(((8))) (9) The department of revenue may not impose both the
evasion penalty and the penalty for disregarding specific written
instructions on the same tax found to be due.
(((9))) (10) For the purposes of this section, "return" means any
document a person is required by the state of Washington to file to
satisfy or establish a tax or fee obligation that is administered or
collected by the department of revenue, and that has a statutorily
defined due date.

--- END ---