BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
manufacturer's machinery and equipment sales and use tax exemption is
vital to the continued development of economic opportunity in this
state, including the development of new businesses and the expansion or
modernization of existing businesses.
(2) The legislature finds that the printing and publishing
industries have not been able to realize the benefits of the
manufacturer's machinery and equipment sales and use tax exemption to
the same extent as other manufacturing industries due to dramatic
changes in business methods caused by computer technology not
contemplated when the manufacturer's machinery and equipment sales and
use tax exemption was adopted. As a result of these changes in
business methods, a substantial amount of computer equipment used by
printers and publishers is not eligible for the manufacturer's
machinery and equipment sales and use tax exemption because the
computer equipment is not used within the manufacturing site.
(3) The legislature further finds that additional incentives for
printers and publishers need to be adopted to provide these industries
with similar benefits as the manufacturer's machinery and equipment
sales and use tax exemption provides for other manufacturing
industries, and in recognition of the rapid rate of technological
advancement in business methods undergone by the printing and
publishing industries. The legislature intends to accomplish this by
providing a sales and use tax exemption to printers and publishers for
computer equipment, not otherwise eligible for the manufacturer's
machinery and equipment sales and use tax exemption, used primarily in
the printing or publishing of printed material, and for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving such computer equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales, to a
printer or publisher, of computer equipment, including repair parts and
replacement parts for such equipment, when the computer equipment is
used primarily in the printing or publishing of any printed material,
or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
computer equipment. This exemption applies only to computer equipment
not otherwise exempt under RCW 82.08.02565.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. This exemption is available only when the purchaser provides
the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection (3) apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Computer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(b) "Computer equipment" means a computer and the associated
physical components that constitute a computer system, including
monitors, keyboards, printers, modems, scanners, pointing devices, and
other computer peripheral equipment, cables, servers, and routers.
"Computer equipment" also includes digital cameras and computer
software.
(c) "Computer software" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(d) "Primarily" means greater than fifty percent as measured by
time.
(e) "Printer or publisher" means a person, as defined in RCW
82.04.030, who is subject to tax under RCW 82.04.280(1).
(4) "Computer equipment" does not include computer equipment that
is used primarily for administrative purposes including but not limited
to payroll processing, accounting, customer service, telemarketing, and
collection. If computer equipment is used simultaneously for
administrative and nonadministrative purposes, the administrative use
shall be disregarded during the period of simultaneous use for purposes
of determining whether the computer equipment is used primarily for
administrative purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use, by a printer or publisher, of computer equipment, including repair
parts and replacement parts for such equipment, when the computer
equipment is used primarily in the printing or publishing of any
printed material, or to labor and services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the computer
equipment. This exemption applies only to computer equipment not
otherwise exempt under RCW 82.12.02565.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 2
of this act apply.

--- END ---