BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.20.090 and 1988 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An individual shall be disqualified for benefits for any week
with respect to which the commissioner finds that the individual's
unemployment is:
(a) Due to a strike at the factory, establishment, or other
premises at which the individual is or was last employed; or
(b) Due to a lockout by his or her employer who is a member of a
multi-employer bargaining unit and who has locked out the employees at
the factory, establishment, or other premises at which the individual
is or was last employed after one member of the multi-employer
bargaining unit has been struck by its employees as a result of the
multi-employer bargaining process.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply if it is shown
to the satisfaction of the commissioner that:
(a)(i) The individual is not participating in or financing or
directly interested in the strike or lockout that caused the
individual's unemployment; and
(((b))) (ii) The individual does not belong to a grade or class of
workers of which, immediately before the commencement of the strike or
lockout, there were members employed at the premises at which the
strike or lockout occurs, any of whom are participating in or financing
or directly interested in the strike or lockout: PROVIDED, That if in
any case separate branches of work which are commonly conducted as
separate businesses in separate premises are conducted in separate
departments of the same premises, each such department shall, for the
purpose of this subdivision, be deemed to be a separate factory,
establishment, or other premises.
(b)(i) The individual is participating in a strike, or is locked
out by the employer, in a labor dispute with an employer who is a
member of a multiemployer bargaining unit; and
(ii) The labor dispute arose from contract negotiations in which
the employer's last offer prior to the commencement of the strike or
lockout included provisions that would, if implemented, result in a
substantial deterioration of the individual's working conditions.
(3) Any disqualification imposed under this section shall end when
the strike or lockout is terminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to weeks of unemployment
that begin on or after the first Sunday after the effective date of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---