BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.205 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) School district employees shall be provided an annual salary
cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
(a) The cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying the
rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base used in state funding formulas for teachers and
other school district employees. Beginning with the 2001-02 school
year, and for each subsequent school year, except for the 2003-04 and
2004-05 school years, each school district shall be provided a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to grant this cost-of-living increase,
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) A school district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
compensation policies. No later than the end of the school year, each
school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) Any funded cost-of-living increase shall be included in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for school
employees in subsequent years, except as provided in subsection (3) of
this section. For teachers and other certificated instructional staff,
the rate of the annual cost-of-living increase funded for certificated
instructional staff shall be applied to the base salary used with the
statewide salary allocation schedule established under RCW 28A.150.410
and to any other salary models used to recognize school district
personnel costs.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any school year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.
(3) For districts that have historically received teacher salary
allocations in excess of the statewide salary schedule included in the
appropriations act pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the legislature shall
decline to provide a cost-of-living increase allocation, or shall
provide a cost-of-living increase allocation at a lower rate than
otherwise required by this section, in order to bring these districts'
general apportionment allocations down to or closer to the statewide
salary schedule.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.500.020 and 1999 c 317 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(a) "Prior tax collection year" means the year immediately
preceding the year in which the local effort assistance shall be
allocated.
(b) "Statewide average ((twelve)) fifteen percent levy rate" means
((twelve)) fifteen percent of the total levy bases as defined in RCW
84.52.0531(3) summed for all school districts, and divided by the total
assessed valuation for excess levy purposes in the prior tax collection
year for all districts as adjusted to one hundred percent by the county
indicated ratio established in RCW 84.48.075.
(c) The "district's ((twelve)) fifteen percent levy amount" means
the school district's maximum levy authority after transfers determined
under RCW 84.52.0531(2) (a) through (c) divided by ((the district's
maximum levy percentage determined under RCW 84.52.0531(4))) thirty
percent, multiplied by ((twelve)) fifteen percent.
(d) The "district's ((twelve)) fifteen percent levy rate" means the
district's ((twelve)) fifteen percent levy amount divided by the
district's assessed valuation for excess levy purposes for the prior
tax collection year as adjusted to one hundred percent by the county
indicated ratio.
(e) "Districts eligible for local effort assistance" means those
districts with a ((twelve)) fifteen percent levy rate that exceeds the
statewide average ((twelve)) fifteen percent levy rate.
(2) Unless otherwise stated all rates, percents, and amounts are
for the calendar year for which local effort assistance is being
calculated under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.500.030 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 912 are each
amended to read as follows:
Allocation of state matching funds to eligible districts for local
effort assistance shall be determined as follows:
(1) Funds raised by the district through maintenance and operation
levies shall be matched with state funds using the following ratio of
state funds to levy funds:
(a) The difference between the district's ((twelve)) fifteen
percent levy rate and the statewide average ((twelve)) fifteen percent
levy rate; to
(b) The statewide average ((twelve)) fifteen percent levy rate.
(2) The maximum amount of state matching funds for districts
eligible for local effort assistance shall be the district's ((twelve))
fifteen percent levy amount, multiplied by the following percentage:
(a) The difference between the district's ((twelve)) fifteen
percent levy rate and the statewide average ((twelve)) fifteen percent
levy rate; divided by
(b) The district's ((twelve)) fifteen percent levy rate.
(3) Calendar year 2003 allocations and maximum eligibility under
this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.99.
(4) From January 1, 2004, to June 30, 2005, allocations and maximum
eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.937.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.52.0531 and 1997 c 259 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year ((1998)) 2005
and thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus
or minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as defined
in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (4) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year ((1998)) 2005
and thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations
in (a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be ((twenty-two))
thirty percent ((in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(5) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsection (3) of
this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment changes,
compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are
or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties)).
(((6))) (5) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year"
means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which
the levies are to be collected.
(((7))) (6) For the purposes of this section, "current school year"
means the year immediately following the prior school year.
(((8))) (7) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax
levies shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(((9))) (8) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
rules and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW
to read as follows:
If the total amount of local effort assistance funds and excess
levy revenue received by a district is less under sections 2 through 4
of this act than they would have been had sections 2 through 4 of this
act not been enacted, the district shall receive hold harmless
allocations. Hold harmless allocations shall be the difference between
the amount of levy revenue and local effort assistance allocations the
district would have received had sections 2 through 4 of this act not
been enacted, and the amount of levy revenue and levy equalization the
district will receive under sections 2 through 4 of this act,
multiplied by the following:
(1) In calendar year 2005, five-sixths;
(2) In calendar year 2006, two-thirds;
(3) In calendar year 2007, one-half;
(4) In calendar year 2008, one-third; and
(5) In calendar year 2009, one-sixth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.500
RCW to read as follows:
The state auditor shall monitor compliance with this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Section 1 of this act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.
(2) Sections 2 through 4 of this act take effect January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 5 of this act expires January 1,
2010.

--- END ---