BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to improve the real
estate excise tax reporting and collection process for the transfer of
water rights that are transferred separately from the land. The
legislature intends to improve reporting by requiring the department of
ecology to provide the department of revenue with information about
approvals of these transfers and to allow the reporting and payment of
any real estate excise tax for these transfers to be made directly to
the department of revenue, thereby relieving the counties of
responsibility for collection of the tax payments and reports. The
legislature intends for these improvements in processing to result in
a simpler and more coordinated system for collection of the real estate
excise tax for these types of water rights transfers. The legislature
further intends that the revenue collected from the transfer of water
rights that are transferred separately from the land be used to support
the department of ecology's water resources program.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.80.080 and 2001 c 237 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board must provide a copy of its record of decision to the
applicant. The board shall submit its record of decision on the
transfer application to the department for review. The board shall
also submit its report of examination to the department summarizing
factual findings on which the board relied in reaching its record of
decision and a copy of the files and records upon which the board's
record of decision is based. The board shall also promptly transmit
notice by mail to any person who objected to the transfer or who
requested notice of the board's record of decision.
(2) Upon receipt of a board's record of decision, the department
shall promptly post the text of the record of decision transmittal form
on the department's internet site. The director shall review each
record of decision made by a board for compliance with applicable state
water law.
(3) Any party to a transfer, third party who alleges his or her
water right will be impaired by the proposed transfer, or other person
may file a letter of concern or support with the department and the
department may consider the concern or support expressed in the letter.
Such letters must be received by the department within thirty days of
the department's receipt of the board's record of decision.
(4) The director shall review the record of decision of the board
and shall affirm, reverse, or modify the action of the board within
forty-five days of receipt. The forty-five day time period may be
extended for an additional thirty days by the director or at the
request of the board or applicant. If the director fails to act within
the prescribed time period, the board's record of decision becomes the
decision of the department and is appealable as provided by RCW
90.80.090. If the director acts within the prescribed time period, the
director's decision to affirm, modify, or reverse is appealable as
provided by RCW 90.80.090, and the director's decision to remand is
appealable as provided by RCW 90.80.120(2)(b).
(5) The department shall promptly provide the department of revenue
copies of any action, including the director's failure to act, taken
upon the record of decision for a transfer application involving the
consolidation of water rights or a change in the place of use with the
text of any modifications it has made to the decision. The department
shall also promptly provide the department of revenue with the status
of the department's action at the end of the period to appeal this
action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon granting approval of a transfer application involving the
consolidation of water rights or a change in the place of use made
under RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100, the department shall promptly provide
the text of its report of examination and findings to the department of
revenue. The department shall also promptly provide the department of
revenue with the status of any approval made on these decisions at the
end of the period to appeal.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.45.010 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 26 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" shall have its
ordinary meaning and shall include any conveyance, grant, assignment,
quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property,
including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a
valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant,
assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to
purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or
interest therein or other contract under which possession of the
property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the
purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the
vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term
also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of
improvements constructed upon leased land.
(2) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition
within any twelve-month period of a controlling interest in any entity
with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable
consideration. For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of
persons acting in concert shall be aggregated for purposes of
determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest
has taken place. The department of revenue shall adopt standards by
rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a
rule for this purpose, the department shall consider the following:
(a) Persons shall be treated as acting in concert when they have a
relationship with each other such that one person influences or
controls the actions of another through common ownership; and
(b) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they shall
be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the
purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of
ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single
entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each
purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other
purchasers, then the acquisitions shall be considered separate
acquisitions.
(3) The term "sale" shall not include:
(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.
(b) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type
mentioned above.
(c) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a
contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract
contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a
mortgage.
(d) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or
as the result of a court decree.
(e) The assignment of property or interest in property from one
spouse to the other in accordance with the terms of a decree of divorce
or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.
(f) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a
contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a
conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.
(g) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation
proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political
subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.
(h) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property
merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.
(i) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or
an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien
foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu
of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.
(j) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans
administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract
of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or
veterans administration.
(k) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or
contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or
where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax
was first imposed.
(l) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.
(m) A sale by the United States, this state or any political
subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.
(n) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation
under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW
81.112.300.
(o) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists
of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where
there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include
transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the
transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or children: PROVIDED, That
if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily
transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse, or children
voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in
the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than
(1) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or children, (2) a
trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or children
as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or
(3) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original
transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or children, within three
years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the
tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within sixty days of
becoming due, excise taxes shall become due and payable on the original
transfer as otherwise provided by law.
(p)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not
involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation,
liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not
limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of
section 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended.
(ii) However, the transfer described in (p)(i) of this subsection
cannot be preceded or followed within a twelve-month period by another
transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise
exempt transfer or transfers described in (p)(i) of this subsection,
results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for
valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously
holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property
in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert
hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(p)(ii) does not apply to that
part of the transfer involving property received that is the real
property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to
the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real
property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was
purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person
or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under
this subsection (3)(p)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who
previously held a controlling interest in the entity.
(q) The transfer of a water right to the state of Washington for
administration as a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW.
(r) The transfer of a water right to a municipally owned public
water system or to an irrigation district, for the purpose of
consolidation of the water right into the water supply services
provided by the system or district.
(s) The transfer of a water right to the United States for purposes
of instream flows, municipal water supply, irrigation, or other
beneficial uses.
(t) An exchange of a water right for inclusion of the land
associated with that right in an area served by a water system as
defined by RCW 80.04.010 when the inclusion is the sole compensation
received.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.45.090 and 2003 c 53 s 404 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for a sale of a beneficial interest in real property
where no instrument evidencing the sale is recorded in the official
real property records of the county in which the property is located,
or the sale of a water right that is transferred separately from the
land, or both, the tax imposed by this chapter shall be paid to and
collected by the treasurer of the county within which is located the
real property which was sold. In collecting the tax the treasurer
shall act as agent for the state. The county treasurer shall cause a
stamp evidencing satisfaction of the lien to be affixed to the
instrument of sale or conveyance prior to its recording or to the real
estate excise tax affidavit in the case of used mobile home sales and
used floating home sales. A receipt issued by the county treasurer for
the payment of the tax imposed under this chapter shall be evidence of
the satisfaction of the lien imposed hereunder and may be recorded in
the manner prescribed for recording satisfactions of mortgages. Except
for an instrument of sale or conveyance for the sale of a water right
that is transferred separately from the land, no instrument of sale or
conveyance evidencing a sale subject to the tax shall be accepted by
the county auditor for filing or recording until the tax shall have
been paid and the stamp affixed thereto; in case the tax is not due on
the transfer, the instrument shall not be so accepted until suitable
notation of such fact has been made on the instrument by the treasurer.
(2)(a) For a sale of a beneficial interest in real property where
a tax is due under this chapter and where no instrument is recorded in
the official real property records of the county in which the property
is located, the sale shall be reported to the department of revenue
within five days from the date of the sale on such returns or forms and
according to such procedures as the department may prescribe.
(b) For the sale of a water right that is transferred separately
from the land and tax is due under this chapter, the sale shall be
reported to the department within five days from the date of the sale
on such returns and according to such procedures as the department may
prescribe.
(c) Such forms or returns shall be signed by both the transferor
and the transferee and shall be accompanied by payment of the tax due.
(((3))) (d) Any person who intentionally makes a false statement on
any return or form required to be filed with the department under this
chapter is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The water right permit processing account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts accruing to the state of Washington from
payment of the real estate excise tax levied on the transfer of a water
right transferred separately from the land as provided in RCW
82.45.090, shall be deposited into the account. Money in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be made only for expenses incurred by the department in support of
the water resources program, including the processing of new water
right applications and water right change applications.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.45.180 and 1998 c 106 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For taxes collected by the county under this chapter, the
county treasurer shall collect a two-dollar fee on all transactions
required by this chapter where the transaction does not require the
payment of tax. A total of two dollars shall be collected in the form
of a tax and fee, where the calculated tax payment is less than two
dollars. The county treasurer shall place one percent of the proceeds
of the tax imposed by this chapter and the treasurer's fee in the
county current expense fund to defray costs of collection and shall pay
over to the state treasurer and account to the department of revenue
for the remainder of the proceeds at the same time the county treasurer
remits funds to the state under RCW 84.56.280. Except for those funds
collected on the transfer of a water right transferred separately from
the land as provided in RCW 82.45.090, the state treasurer shall
deposit the proceeds in the general fund for the support of the common
schools.
(2) For taxes collected on the transfer of a water right
transferred separately from the land as provided in RCW 82.45.090, the
department shall remit the tax to the state treasurer who shall deposit
the proceeds of any state tax in the water right permit processing
account. The account shall be administered as provided in section 6 of
this act. For all other taxes collected by the department of revenue
under this chapter, the department shall remit the tax to the state
treasurer who shall deposit the proceeds of any state tax in the
general fund for the support of the common schools. The state
treasurer shall deposit the proceeds of any local taxes imposed under
chapter 82.46 RCW in the local real estate excise tax account hereby
created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local real estate excise
tax account may be spent only for distribution to counties, cities, and
towns imposing a tax under chapter 82.46 RCW. Except as provided in
RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of investments of balances in the local
real estate excise tax account shall be credited to the local real
estate excise tax account and distributed to the counties, cities, and
towns monthly. Monthly the state treasurer shall make distribution
from the local real estate excise tax account to the counties, cities,
and towns the amount of tax collected on behalf of each taxing
authority. The state treasurer shall make the distribution under this
subsection without appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---