BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. The
legislature finds that the public-private initiatives act created under
chapter 47.46 RCW has not met the needs and expectations of the public
or private sectors for the development of transportation projects. The
legislature intends to phase out chapter 47.46 RCW coincident with the
completion of the Tacoma Narrows Bridge - SR 16 public-private
partnership. From the effective date of this act, this chapter will
provide a more desirable and effective approach to developing
transportation projects in partnership with the private sector by
applying lessons learned from other states and from this state's ten-year experience with chapter 47.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Private sector partner" and "private partner" means a person,
entity, or organization that is not the federal government, a state, or
a political subdivision of a state.
(2) "Public financing" means indebtedness that is issued, secured,
or backed by a unit of government. For purposes of this chapter,
public financing does not include financing provided through a public
or private nonprofit corporation under the terms of Internal Revenue
Code 63-20. For purposes of this chapter, public financing shall be
the exclusive method of financing available to units of government.
(3) "Public funds" means money originally derived from taxes or
fees imposed generally. This does not include revenues derived from
specific operation of a transportation project, such as user fees,
lease revenues, development rights, highway tolls, etc.
(4) "Public sector approval authority" means the transportation
commission for the state, the district administrator for the federal
highway administration, the county executive for counties where
applicable, and the legislative authority such as a council, board, or
commission for local governments.
(5) "Public sector partner" and "public partner" means any federal
or state unit of government, bistate transportation organization, or
any other political subdivision of any state.
(6) "Transportation projects" means a project, whether capital or
operating, where the primary purpose of the project is to facilitate
the transport of people or goods via any mode of travel. However, this
does not include projects that are primarily for recreational purposes,
such as parks, hiking trails, off-road vehicle trails, etc.
(7) "Unit of government" means any department or agency of the
federal government, any state or agency, office, or department of a
state, any city, county, district, commission, authority, entity, port,
or other public corporation organized and existing under statutory law
or under a voter-approved charter or initiative, and any
intergovernmental entity created pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW or
created under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 CREATING TRANSPORTATION INNOVATIVE
PARTNERSHIPS. The Transportation Innovative Partnerships Act is
created for the planning, acquisition, financing, development, design,
construction, reconstruction, replacement, improvement, maintenance,
preservation, management, repair, and operation of transportation
projects. The goals of this chapter are to:
(1) Reduce the cost of transportation project delivery;
(2) Recover transportation investment costs;
(3) Develop an expedited project delivery process;
(4) Encourage business investment in public infrastructure;
(5) Use any fund source outside the state treasury, where
financially advantageous and in the public interest;
(6) Maximize innovation; and
(7) Develop partnerships between private entities and units of
government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 JOINT AGREEMENTS WITH OTHER GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITIES. Public sector partners may, either separately or in
combination with any other public sector partner, enter into working
agreements, coordination agreements, or similar implementation
agreements, including the formation of bistate transportation
organizations, to carry out the joint implementation of a
transportation project selected under this chapter. Public sector
partners may enter into agreements with other units of government or
Canadian provinces for transborder transportation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 ELIGIBLE PROJECTS. Projects eligible for
development under this chapter include any transportation project as
defined in section 2 of this act. Concurrent development of
facilities, structures, operations, properties, vehicles, vessels, or
the like that are necessary to provide revenues to support financing of
a transportation project are also permissible under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 PUBLIC FINANCING MECHANISMS AS PART OF
PROPOSAL. Public sector partners may, in connection with the
evaluation of concepts or proposals for transportation projects,
consider any public financing mechanisms, either together with a
transportation project proposal or as a separate, stand-alone proposal
to publicly finance a project. The public partner may consider sources
identified under section 25 of this act or any other lawful source.
Financing may be considered for all or part of a proposed project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 REVIEW, EVALUATION, AND SELECTION OF
POTENTIAL PROJECTS. To carry out the purposes of this chapter, a
public partner may:
(1) Solicit concepts or proposals for transportation projects from
private entities and units of government;
(2) Accept unsolicited concepts or proposals for transportation
projects from private entities and units of government, subject to the
provisions in section 8 of this act;
(3) Evaluate projects already programmed or identified for
traditional development and financing by a unit of government; and
(4) Evaluate the concepts or proposals received under this section
and select potential projects based on the concepts or proposals. The
evaluation under this subsection must include consultation with any
appropriate unit of government. Projects selected for development
under this chapter must be identified in a regional transportation plan
approved by a regional transportation planning organization or a
metropolitan transportation planning organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 UNSOLICITED PROJECT PROPOSALS. Prior to
accepting any unsolicited project proposals, the public sector partner
must develop rules to facilitate the acceptance, review, publication,
and evaluation of unsolicited project proposals. At a minimum, these
rules must include provisions that:
(1) Identify a process for the acceptance of unsolicited proposals;
(2) Require publication of the basic elements of an unsolicited
proposal that has been submitted, for the purpose of informing the
public; and
(3) Provide a reasonable period of time for competing proposals to
be submitted.
The public sector partner may promulgate other rules as necessary
to avoid conflicts with existing laws, statutes, or contractual
obligations of the public sector partner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 ADMINISTRATIVE FEE AUTHORIZED. A public
sector partner may charge an administrative fee for the evaluation of
a project proposal in an amount determined by the public partner,
reasonably calculated to offset any costs incurred that are not
otherwise funded through governmental budget appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 AUTHORIZATION TO SPEND FUNDS FOR EVALUATION
AND NEGOTIATION OF PROPOSALS. A public sector partner may spend, out
of any funds available for the purpose, such moneys as may be necessary
for the evaluation of concepts or proposals for transportation projects
and for negotiating agreements for transportation projects authorized
by this chapter. The public sector partner may employ engineers,
consultants, or other experts the public partner determines are needed
for the purposes of doing the evaluation and negotiation. Expenses
incurred by the public partner under this section before the issuance
of transportation project revenue bonds or other financing must be paid
by the public partner and charged to the appropriate transportation
project. The public partner shall keep records and accounts showing
each amount so charged. Upon the sale of transportation project
revenue bonds or upon obtaining other financing for a transportation
project, the funds spent by the public partner under this section in
connection with the project must be repaid to the public partner from
the proceeds of the bonds or other financing, as allowed by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 PUBLIC PARTNER MAY NEGOTIATE TENTATIVE
AGREEMENTS. After an evaluation by the public sector partner of
concepts or proposals submitted or reviewed under section 7 of this
act, and the selection of potential transportation projects, the public
partner may negotiate and enter into tentative agreements described in
section 16 of this act for implementing the selected transportation
projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 PROPRIETARY BUSINESS INFORMATION.
Sensitive business, commercial, or financial information that is not
customarily provided to business competitors that is submitted to the
public partner in connection with a transportation project under this
chapter is exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW only when
releasing such information would adversely affect the financial
interest of the private entity or the bargaining position of either
entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 CONSULTATION WITH EXPERTS AUTHORIZED.
Public sector partners may consult with legal, financial, and other
experts within and outside the public sector in the evaluation,
negotiation, and development of projects under this chapter, consistent
with RCW 43.10.040 where applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 ENVIRONMENTAL, ENGINEERING, AND TECHNICAL
STUDIES CONTRACTED. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in
the absence of any direct federal funding or direction, the public
sector partner may contract with a private developer of a selected
project proposal to conduct environmental impact studies and
engineering and technical studies funded by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 REQUIRED TERMS OF PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENTS.
The following provisions are mandatory in any agreement to which the
public sector is a party:
(1) For any project that reverts to public ownership, agreements
must address responsibility for reconstruction or renovations that are
required in order for a facility to meet all applicable government
standards upon reversion of the facility to the state or local
government; and
(2) For any project that proposes terms for stand-alone maintenance
or asset management services for a publicly owned facility, those
services must be provided in a manner consistent with any collective
bargaining agreements and civil service laws that are in effect for the
publicly owned facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 ELEMENTS SUBJECT TO NEGOTIATION IN A
PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT. (1) As part of the program established under
this chapter, the public sector partner may:
(a) Enter into any agreement or any configuration of agreements
relating to transportation projects with any private entity or unit of
government or any configuration of private entities and units of
government. The subject of agreements entered into under this section
may include, but need not be limited to, planning, acquisition,
financing, development, design, construction, reconstruction,
replacement, improvement, preservation, maintenance, management,
repair, and operation of transportation projects;
(b) Include in any agreement entered into under this section any
financing mechanisms, including but not limited to sources identified
under section 25 of this act or any other lawful source.
(2) The agreements among the public and private sector partners
entered into under this section must specify at least the following:
(a) The point in the transportation project at which public and
private sector partners will enter the project and which partners will
assume responsibility for specific project elements;
(b) How the partners will share management of the risks of the
project;
(c) How the partners will share the costs of development of the
project;
(d) How the partners will allocate financial responsibility for
cost overruns;
(e) The penalties for nonperformance;
(f) The incentives for performance;
(g) The accounting and auditing standards to be used to evaluate
work on the project; and
(h) Whether the project is consistent with any applicable state
transportation plans, and any applicable regional transportation plans
or local transportation or land use plans or programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 PUBLIC INVOLVEMENT AND PARTICIPATION PLAN.
(1) Before final approval, agreements entered into under this chapter
must include a process that provides for public involvement and
participation with respect to the development of the projects. For
state projects, the plan must be submitted to the transportation
commission for approval. For other regional or local government
projects, the plan must be submitted to the appropriate executive or
legislative authority for approval.
(2) All workshops, forums, open houses, meetings, public hearings,
or similar public gatherings must be administered and attended by
representatives of public sector partners to an agreement authorized by
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 APPLICATION OF PREVAILING WAGE LAW.
Chapter 39.12 RCW does not apply to concepts or proposals submitted
under this chapter, or to agreements entered into under this chapter,
except that if public moneys are used to pay any costs of construction
of public works that are part of a project, chapter 39.12 RCW applies
to the public works. In addition, if public moneys are used to pay any
costs of construction of public works that are part of a project, the
construction contract for the public works must contain provisions that
require the payment of workers under the contract in accordance with
chapter 39.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 CONFORMITY WITH FEDERAL LAWS.
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, applicable federal laws,
rules, and regulations govern in any situation that involves federal
funds if the federal laws, rules, or regulations:
(1) Conflict with any provision of this chapter;
(2) Require procedures that are additional to or different from
those provided in this chapter; or
(3) Require contract provisions not authorized in this chapter. If
no federal funds are provided, state laws, rates, and regulations shall
govern.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 COMPETITIVE BID--FINANCIAL PRO FORMA
REQUIRED. Before presenting an agreement for approval under section 21
of this act, the public sector partner must:
(1) Consider whether further cost savings can be achieved by
competitively bidding all or portions of the transportation proposal.
The public partner must conduct an analysis of the impacts of
competitively bidding all or part of the transportation proposal, and
submit its analysis, findings, and recommendations to the public sector
approval authority before entering into a final agreement; and
(2) Prepare a financial analysis that fully discloses all project
costs, direct and indirect, including costs of any financing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 APPROVAL REQUIRED TO EXECUTE CONTRACTS.
(1) The public sector partner may not enter into an agreement under
this chapter until the agreement is reviewed and approved by the
transportation commission for state projects, or the highest executive
or legislative authority for local government projects.
(2) The public sector partner may not approve an agreement under
this chapter for the construction of a public improvement as part of a
transportation project unless the agreement provides for bonding,
financial guarantees, deposits, or the posting of other security to
secure the payment of laborers, subcontractors, and suppliers who
perform work or provide materials as part of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 DISCLOSURE OF AGREEMENTS AND SUPPORTING
DOCUMENTS. The terms of a final agreement entered into under this
chapter, the terms of a proposed agreement presented to the public
sector approval authority for review and approval under section 21 of
this act, and any documents, communications, and information referenced
or relied upon to support a final or proposed agreement are subject to
disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 EMINENT DOMAIN. A public sector partner
may exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire property, rights of
way, or other rights in property for transportation projects that are
necessary to implement a project developed under this chapter,
regardless of whether the property will be owned in fee simple by the
public entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 CREATION OF TRANSPORTATION INNOVATIVE
PARTNERSHIP ACCOUNT. (1) The transportation innovative partnership
account is established separate and distinct from the state general
fund. Interest earned by the transportation innovative partnership
account must be credited to the account.
(2) The following moneys must be deposited into the transportation
innovative partnership account:
(a) Proceeds from bonds or other financing instruments issued under
section 29 of this act;
(b) Revenues received from any transportation project developed
under this chapter; and
(c) Any other moneys that are by donation, grant, contract, law, or
other means transferred, allocated, or appropriated to the account.
(3) Moneys in the transportation innovative partnership account
must be made available to the public partner by the state treasurer
upon presentation of an ordinance, resolution, chapter law, or other
duly enacted legal document evidencing the intent of the public sector
approval authority to appropriate funds to a project developed under
this chapter.
(4) The state treasurer shall serve as a fiduciary for the purpose
of carrying out this chapter and implementing all or portions of any
transportation project financed under this chapter.
(5) Moneys in the transportation innovative partnership account
that were derived from revenue subject to Article II, section 40
(Amendment 18) of the Washington state Constitution, may be used only
for purposes authorized by that provision of the state Constitution.
(6) The state treasurer shall establish separate subaccounts within
the transportation innovative partnership account for each
transportation project that is initiated under this chapter. Except as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, a public sector partner may
pledge moneys in the transportation innovative partnership account to
secure revenue bonds or any other debt obligations relating to the
transportation project for which the account is established.
(7) Moneys in a subaccount established under subsection (6) of this
section must be used as provided in any agreement applicable to the
transportation project for which the subaccount is established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 TYPES OF PUBLIC FINANCING AVAILABLE. (1)
A transportation project may be financed in whole or in part with:
(a) The proceeds of grant anticipation revenue bonds authorized by
23 U.S.C. Sec. 122 and applicable state law. Legislative authorization
and appropriation is required in order to use this source of financing;
(b) Grants, loans, loan guarantees, lines of credit, revolving
lines of credit, or other financing arrangements available under the
Transportation Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act under 23
U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq., or any other applicable federal law;
(c) Infrastructure loans or assistance from the state
infrastructure bank established by RCW 82.44.195;
(d) Federal, state, or local revenues, subject to appropriation by
the applicable legislative authority;
(e) User fees, tolls, fares, lease proceeds, rents, gross or net
receipts from sales, proceeds from the sale of development rights,
franchise fees, rents, or any other lawful form of consideration.
(2) As security for the payment of public financing described in
this section, the revenues from the project may be pledged, but no such
pledge of revenues constitutes in any manner or to any extent a general
obligation of the state. Any public financing described in this
section may be structured on a senior, parity, or subordinate basis to
any other financing.
(3) For projects financed with bonds, only bonds issued by a unit
of government may be utilized. Bonds issued pursuant to Internal
Revenue Code 63-20 are not permissible for projects developed under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 USE OF FEDERAL FUNDS AND SIMILAR SOURCES OF
REVENUE. A public sector partner may accept from the United States or
any of its agencies such funds as are available to this state or to the
unit of government for carrying out the purposes of this chapter,
whether the funds are made available by grant, loan, or other financing
arrangement. The public sector partner may enter into such agreements
and other arrangements with the United States or any of its agencies as
may be necessary, proper, and convenient for carrying out the purposes
of this chapter, subject to section 25(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 OTHER SOURCES OF VALUABLE CONSIDERATION
AUTHORIZED. A public sector partner may accept from any source any
grant, donation, gift, or other form of conveyance of land, money,
other real or personal property, or other valuable thing made to the
state of Washington, the department, or a local government for carrying
out the purposes of this chapter.
Any transportation project may be publicly financed in whole or in
part by contribution of any funds or property made by any private
entity or public sector partner that is a party to any agreement
entered into under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 USE OF TRANSPORTATION INNOVATIVE
PARTNERSHIP ACCOUNT. (1) The public sector partner may use moneys in
the transportation innovative partnership account to ensure the
repayment of loan guarantees or extensions of credit made to or on
behalf of private entities engaged in the planning, acquisition,
financing, development, design, construction, reconstruction,
replacement, improvement, maintenance, preservation, management,
repair, or operation of any transportation project that is part of the
program established under this chapter.
(2) The lien of a pledge made under this section is subordinate to
the lien of a pledge securing bonds payable from moneys in the motor
vehicle fund established in RCW 46.68.070, or the transportation
innovative partnership account established in section 24 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 AUTHORITY TO ISSUE REVENUE BONDS AND OTHER
INDENTURES. (1) In addition to any authority the public sector partner
has to issue and sell bonds and other similar obligations, this section
establishes continuing authority for the issuance and sale of bonds and
other similar obligations in a manner consistent with this section. To
finance a transportation project in whole or in part, the public sector
partner may request that the state treasurer issue revenue bonds on
behalf of the public sector partner. The bonds must be secured by a
pledge of, and a lien on, and be payable only from moneys in the
transportation innovative partnership account established in section 24
of this act, and any other revenues specifically pledged to repayment
of the bonds. Such a pledge by the public partner creates a lien that
is valid and binding from the time the pledge is made. Revenue bonds
issued under this section are not general obligations of the state or
local government and are not secured by or payable from any funds or
assets of the public partner other than the moneys and revenues
specifically pledged to the repayment of such revenue bonds.
(2) Moneys received from the issuance of revenue bonds or other
debt obligations, including any investment earnings thereon, may be
spent:
(a) For the purpose of financing the costs of the transportation
project for which the bonds are issued;
(b) To pay the costs and other administrative expenses of the
bonds;
(c) To pay the costs of credit enhancement or to fund any reserves
determined to be necessary or advantageous in connection with the
revenue bonds; and
(d) To reimburse the public sector partners for any costs related
to carrying out the purposes of the program established under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 ADVISORY COMMITTEES REQUIRED FOR LARGE
PROJECTS. For projects with costs, including financing costs, of fifty
million dollars or greater, advisory committees are required.
(1) A public sector partner that participates in a transportation
project must establish an advisory committee to advise with respect to
transportation projects. An advisory committee must consist of not
fewer than five and not more than nine members, as determined by the
public partner. Members must be appointed by the public partner, or
for projects with joint public sector participation, in a manner agreed
to by the state and any participating unit of government.
(2) An advisory committee shall review concepts or proposals for
transportation projects and submit comments to the public sector
partners.
(3) An advisory committee shall meet as necessary at times and
places fixed by the public sector partner, but not less than twice per
year. The public sector partner shall provide personnel services to
assist the advisory committee within the limits of available funds. An
advisory committee may adopt rules to govern its proceedings and may
select officers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 Section captions used in this act are not
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 Sections 1 through 31 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

--- END ---