BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A public entity providing housing to a person who is required
to register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130 and who is classified
as a risk level III sex offender is not liable for civil damages
resulting from the reoffense of a tenant unless the housing provider's
acts or omissions constituted gross negligence or willful or wanton
misconduct.
(2) This limited liability provision does not apply to the
department of corrections or any entity charged with supervision of the
offender in addition to providing housing.

--- END ---