BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All work performed by an ocularist and an apprentice ocularist
must be performed on the premises of the operating business, or a
branch office.
(2) The supervising ocularist must be present with the patient when
any work is performed upon an existing custom impression-fitted plastic
eye that is less than seven years old. The supervising ocularist must
either be supervising the apprentice ocularist or performing the work
in the presence of the patient.
(3) The matching of the color of the remaining eye must be done in
the presence of the patient and no sketches, drawings, or photographs
may be used by an ocularist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.55 RCW
to read as follows:
Any licensed ocularist, optometrist, or physician who recommends
that a patient have an ocular prosthetic device cleaned more than once
every year must provide the patient with a written statement of this
recommendation and maintain a copy of the recommendation in the
patient's records.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.55.085 and 1991 c 180 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((An ocularist or authorized service provider shall explain to
patients or customers exactly which type of prosthesis or service they
are receiving or purchasing.)) The following acts shall be considered
unprofessional conduct under chapter 18.130 RCW:
(1) Failure ((to do so)) of an ocularist or authorized service
provider to explain to patients or customers exactly which types of
prosthesis or services they are receiving or purchasing, or
misrepresentation of said services, constitutes unprofessional conduct
under this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW;
(2) Misrepresenting to a patient that an ocular prosthetic device
is custom-made.

--- END ---