BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.500 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 29 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) In negotiating price discounts with prescription drug
manufacturers for state purchased health care programs, the health care
authority shall also negotiate such discounts for county and municipal
government agencies, including jails and public health agencies, that
prescribe or dispense medications and any Washington resident:
(a) Whose family income does not exceed three hundred percent of
the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined
annually by the federal department of health and human services;
(b) Whose existing prescription drug need is not covered by
insurance; and
(c) Who is: (i) At least fifty years old; or (ii) between the ages
of nineteen and forty-nine and is otherwise eligible for benefits under
Title II of the social security act, federal old age, survivors, and
disability insurance benefits.
(2)(a) An attestation, which shall be submitted to the
administrator, from an individual that the individual's family income
does not exceed three hundred percent of the federal poverty level is
sufficient to satisfy the eligibility requirement of subsection (1)(a)
of this section.
(b) Any person willfully making a false statement in order to
qualify for discounts under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Notice of such shall be included on the program enrollment form.
(3) The administrator shall charge participants in this program an
annual enrollment fee sufficient to offset the cost of program
administration.
(4) Any rebate or discount provided by a pharmaceutical
manufacturer and made available to individuals under this section shall
not be at the expense of retail pharmacies. This does not prohibit
participating state agencies from using discounted pharmacy
reimbursements for services or ingredients provided by the pharmacies.

--- END ---