BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.41.190 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 29 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Any pharmacist filling a prescription under a state purchased
health care program as defined in RCW 41.05.011(2) shall substitute,
where identified, a preferred drug for any nonpreferred drug in a given
therapeutic class, unless the endorsing practitioner has indicated on
the prescription that the nonpreferred drug must be dispensed as
written, or the prescription is for a refill of an antipsychotic,
antidepressant, chemotherapy, antiretroviral, or immunosuppressive
drug, in which case the pharmacist shall dispense the prescribed
nonpreferred drug. As used in this subsection, "refill" includes a
prescription authorized by a prescriber for an inmate after the inmate
is released from a jail or state correctional facility.
(2) When a substitution is made under subsection (1) of this
section, the dispensing pharmacist shall notify the prescribing
practitioner of the specific drug and dose dispensed.

--- END ---