BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the department of
social and health services' medical assistance administration's
brokerage contracting services implemented in 1988 has saved the state
and taxpayers millions of dollars.
The legislature intends that all administrative departments in
state government participate in the competitive bidding process of the
department of social and health services' medical assistance
administration's brokerage system. It is intended that this
participation will save tax dollars while increasing the services
provided to a greater number of persons.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.19.1905 and 2002 c 299 s 5 and 2002 c 285 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The director of general administration shall establish overall
state policy for compliance by all state agencies, including
educational institutions, regarding the following purchasing and
material control functions:
(1) Development of a state commodity coding system, including
common stock numbers for items maintained in stores for reissue;
(2) Determination where consolidations, closures, or additions of
stores operated by state agencies and educational institutions should
be initiated;
(3) Institution of standard criteria for determination of when and
where an item in the state supply system should be stocked;
(4) Establishment of stock levels to be maintained in state stores,
and formulation of standards for replenishment of stock;
(5) Formulation of an overall distribution and redistribution
system for stock items which establishes sources of supply support for
all agencies, including interagency supply support;
(6) Determination of what function data processing equipment,
including remote terminals, shall perform in statewide purchasing and
material control for improvement of service and promotion of economy;
(7) Standardization of records and forms used statewide for supply
system activities involving purchasing, receiving, inspecting, storing,
requisitioning, and issuing functions, including a standard
notification form for state agencies to report cost-effective direct
purchases, which shall at least identify the price of the goods as
available through the division of purchasing, the price of the goods as
available from the alternative source, the total savings, and the
signature of the notifying agency's director or the director's
designee;
(8) Screening of supplies, material, and equipment excess to the
requirements of one agency for overall state need before sale as
surplus;
(9) Establishment of warehouse operation and storage standards to
achieve uniform, effective, and economical stores operations;
(10) Establishment of time limit standards for the issuing of
material in store and for processing requisitions requiring purchase;
(11) Formulation of criteria for determining when centralized
rather than decentralized purchasing shall be used to obtain maximum
benefit of volume buying of identical or similar items, including
procurement from federal supply sources;
(12) Development of criteria for use of leased, rather than state
owned, warehouse space based on relative cost and accessibility;
(13) Institution of standard criteria for purchase and placement of
state furnished materials, carpeting, furniture, fixtures, and nonfixed
equipment, in newly constructed or renovated state buildings;
(14) Determination of how transportation costs incurred by the
state for materials, supplies, services, and equipment can be reduced
by improved freight and traffic coordination and control;
(15) Establishment of a formal certification program for state
employees who are authorized to perform purchasing functions as agents
for the state under the provisions of chapter 43.19 RCW;
(16) Development of performance measures for the reduction of total
overall expense for material, supplies, equipment, and services used
each biennium by the state;
(17) Establishment of a standard system for all state organizations
to record and report dollar savings and cost avoidance which are
attributable to the establishment and implementation of improved
purchasing and material control procedures;
(18) Development of procedures for mutual and voluntary cooperation
between state agencies, including educational institutions, and
political subdivisions for exchange of purchasing and material control
services;
(19) Resolution of all other purchasing and material matters which
require the establishment of overall statewide policy for effective and
economical supply management;
(20) Development of guidelines and criteria for the purchase of
vehicles, high gas mileage vehicles, alternate vehicle fuels and
systems, equipment, and materials that reduce overall energy-related
costs and energy use by the state, including investigations into all
opportunities to aggregate the purchasing of clean technologies by
state and local governments, and including the requirement that new
passenger vehicles purchased by the state meet the minimum standards
for passenger automobile fuel economy established by the United States
secretary of transportation pursuant to the energy policy and
conservation act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2002);
(21) Development of goals for state use of recycled or
environmentally preferable products through specifications for products
and services, processes for requests for proposals and requests for
qualifications, contractor selection, and contract negotiations; and
(22) Implementation of a purchasing system requiring state agencies
that purchase services on a regional basis to utilize the brokerage
system developed and managed by the department of social and health
services' medical assistance administration in accordance with RCW
39.29.040 and 43.19.190.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The director of general administration shall
report to the legislature by December 1, 2004, on services provided by
state agencies that should use the brokerage system under RCW
43.19.1905(22).

--- END ---