BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.96.010 and 2000 c 184 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that the issuance by state and
local governments of bonds and other obligations involves exposure to
changes in interest rates; that a number of financial instruments are
available to lower the net cost of these borrowings, or to reduce the
exposure of state and local governments to changes in interest rates;
that these reduced costs for state and local governments will benefit
taxpayers and ratepayers; and that the legislature desires to provide
state and local governments with express statutory authority to take
advantage of these instruments. In recognition of the complexity of
these financial instruments, the legislature desires that this
authority be subject to certain limitations((, and be granted for a
period of twelve years)).

Sec. 2 RCW 39.96.020 and 2003 c 47 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Financial advisor" means a financial services or financial
advisory firm:
(a) With recognized knowledge and experience in connection with the
negotiation and execution of payment agreements;
(b) That is acting solely as financial advisor to the governmental
entity in connection with the execution of the payment agreement and
the issuance or incurring of any related obligations, and not as a
principal, placement agent, purchaser, underwriter, or other similar
party, and that does not control, nor is it controlled by or under
common control with, any such party;
(c) That is compensated for its services in connection with the
execution of payment agreements, either directly or indirectly, solely
by the governmental entity; and
(d) Whose compensation is not based on a percentage of the notional
amount of the payment agreement or of the principal amount of any
related obligations.
(2) "Governmental entity" means state government or local
government.
(3) "Local government" means any city, county, city transportation
authority, port district, public hospital district, or public utility
district, or any joint operating agency formed under RCW 43.52.360,
that has or will have outstanding obligations in an aggregate principal
amount of at least one hundred million dollars as of the date a payment
agreement is executed or is scheduled by its terms to commence or had
at least one hundred million dollars in gross revenues during the
preceding calendar year.
(4) "Obligations" means bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes,
commercial paper, or other obligations for borrowed money, or lease,
installment purchase, or other similar financing agreements or
certificates of participation in such agreements.
(5) "Payment agreement" means a written agreement which provides
for an exchange of payments based on interest rates, or for ceilings or
floors on these payments, or an option on these payments, or any
combination, entered into on either a current or forward basis.
(6) "State government" means (a) the state of Washington, acting by
and through its state finance committee, (b) the Washington health care
facilities authority, (c) the Washington higher education facilities
authority, (d) the Washington state housing finance commission, or (e)
the state finance committee upon adoption of a resolution approving a
payment agreement on behalf of any state institution of higher
education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016: PROVIDED, That such
approval shall not constitute the pledge of the full faith and credit
of the state, but a pledge of only those funds specified in the
approved agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 39.96.070 (Payment agreements not
allowed after June 30, 2005 -- Exception) and 2000 c 184 s 3, 1998 c 245
s 35, 1995 c 192 s 2, & 1993 c 273 s 7 are each repealed.

--- END ---