BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as follows:
The law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
plan 1 medical account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from contributions under section 2 of this act
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for the catastrophic medical expenses of employers for the
benefit of members or beneficiaries as defined in rule under section 3
of this act. Only the director of retirement systems or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as follows:
(1) Every member shall have deducted from each payroll a sum equal
to six percent of basic salary minus any member contribution deducted
under RCW 41.26.080 for deposit into the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 medical account under section
1 of this act.
(2) Every employer shall contribute monthly a sum equal to six
percent of basic salary for each plan 1 employee minus any employer
contribution made under RCW 41.26.080 for deposit into the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1
medical account under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The director of retirement systems shall
adopt rules governing the qualifications necessary for the receipt of
distributions from the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 1 medical account.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2003 c 403 s 9, 2003 c 313 s 10, 2003
c 191 s 7, 2003 c 148 s 15, 2003 c 92 s 8, and 2003 c 19 s 12 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 medical account,
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund,
the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar pool account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the
children's trust fund((, and the investing in innovation account)).
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---