BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The county financial assistance advisory council is established
within the department of community, trade, and economic development.
The council shall include: Two members of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, one from each caucus; two members of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate, one from each caucus; two
representatives appointed by the Washington state association of
counties; and one member appointed by the governor, who shall serve as
chairperson of the advisory council.
(2) Members shall not be compensated, but shall receive
reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. The department of community, trade, and economic
development shall provide administrative and clerical assistance to the
advisory council.
(3) The advisory council shall determine which counties have a tax
base insufficient to provide basic county services to their citizens
and shall determine the county allocation of funds deposited in the
county assistance account created in this section. Counties that had
a decrease of less than six percent in their current expense budget due
to the repeal of the state motor vehicle excise tax are not eligible
for the disbursement of funds under this section. The advisory council
shall make disbursement recommendations to the department on an annual
basis.
(4) The department shall administer a grant program to the
counties, taking into consideration the annual recommendations of the
advisory council.
(5) The county assistance account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
the purposes provided in this section. Only the director of the
department of community, trade, and economic development or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2003 c 403 s 9, 2003 c 313 s 10, 2003
c 191 s 7, 2003 c 148 s 15, 2003 c 92 s 8, and 2003 c 19 s 12 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the county
assistance account, the Washington international exchange scholarship
endowment fund, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund,
the energy account, the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection
account, the game farm alternative account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural
rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the
youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the
sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the children's trust fund((, and
the investing in innovation account)). However, the earnings to be
distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---