BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.46.010 and 1994 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county or city shall identify
in the adopted budget the capital projects funded in whole or in part
from the proceeds of the tax authorized in this section, and shall
indicate that such tax is intended to be in addition to other funds
that may be reasonably available for such capital projects.
(2) The legislative authority of any county or any city may impose
an excise tax on each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas
of the county for the county tax and in the corporate limits of the
city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-quarter of one
percent of the selling price.
(a) The revenues from this tax shall be used by any city or county
with a population of five thousand or less and any city or county that
does not plan under RCW 36.70A.040 for: (i) Any capital purpose
identified in a capital improvements plan and local capital
improvements, including those listed in RCW 35.43.040; or (ii) the
provision of emergency medical care or emergency medical service.
(b) After April 30, 1992, revenues generated from the tax imposed
under this subsection in counties over five thousand population and
cities over five thousand population that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be used ((solely)) for: (i) Financing
capital projects specified in a capital facilities plan element of a
comprehensive plan and housing relocation assistance under RCW
59.18.440 and 59.18.450; or (ii) the provision of emergency medical
care or emergency medical service. However, revenues (((a))) (A)
pledged by such counties and cities to debt retirement prior to April
30, 1992, may continue to be used for that purpose until the original
debt for which the revenues were pledged is retired, or (((b))) (B)
committed prior to April 30, 1992, by such counties or cities to a
project may continue to be used for that purpose until the project is
completed.
(c) The legislative authority of any county or city that originally
imposes the tax authorized under this subsection or that modifies the
tax or use of the tax authorized under this subsection after the
effective date of this act shall indicate in the resolution or
ordinance adopting or modifying the tax, the percentage of the tax
dedicated to capital projects and the percentage of the tax dedicated
to the provision of emergency medical care or emergency medical
service.
(3) In lieu of imposing the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2), the
legislative authority of any county or any city may impose an
additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the
unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the
corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding
one-half of one percent of the selling price.
(4) Taxes imposed under this section shall be collected from
persons who are taxable by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the unincorporated areas of the
county or within the corporate limits of the city, as the case may be.
(5) Taxes imposed under this section shall comply with all
applicable rules, regulations, laws, and court decisions regarding real
estate excise taxes as imposed by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW.
(6) As used in this section, (a) "city" means any city or town and
"capital project" means those public works projects of a local
government for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction,
repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets; roads;
highways; sidewalks; street and road lighting systems; traffic signals;
bridges; domestic water systems; storm and sanitary sewer systems;
parks; recreational facilities; law enforcement facilities; fire
protection facilities; trails; libraries; administrative and/or
judicial facilities; river and/or waterway flood control projects by
those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended funds
derived from the tax authorized by this section for such purposes; and,
until December 31, 1995, housing projects for those jurisdictions that,
prior to June 11, 1992, have expended or committed to expend funds
derived from the tax authorized by this section or the tax authorized
by RCW 82.46.035 for such purposes; and
(b) "Emergency medical care or emergency medical service" means
equipment, supplies, vehicles, and structures needed for the provision
of emergency medical care or emergency medical service and includes
related personnel and training costs.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.46.030 and 2000 c 103 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county treasurer shall place one percent of the proceeds of
the taxes imposed under this chapter in the county current expense fund
to defray costs of collection.
(2) The remaining proceeds from the county tax under RCW
82.46.010(2) shall be placed in a county capital improvements fund or
a special fund set aside for the specific purpose of providing
emergency medical care or emergency medical service, as defined in RCW
82.46.010. The remaining proceeds from city or town taxes under RCW
82.46.010(2) shall be distributed to the respective cities and towns
monthly and placed by the city treasurer in a municipal capital
improvements fund or a special fund set aside for the specific purpose
of providing emergency medical care or emergency medical service, as
defined in RCW 82.46.010.
(3) This section does not limit the existing authority of any city,
town, or county to impose special assessments on property specially
benefited thereby in the manner prescribed by law.

--- END ---