BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.390 and 1995 c 77 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall submit to each
regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year a
programmed budget request for special education programs for students
with disabilities. ((Funding for programs operated by local school
districts shall be on an excess cost basis from appropriations provided
by the legislature for special education programs for students with
disabilities and shall take account of state funds accruing through RCW
28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, federal medical assistance and private funds
accruing under RCW 74.09.5249 through 74.09.5253 and 74.09.5254 through
74.09.5256, and other state and local funds, excluding special excess
levies.)) To determine the budget request, the superintendent of
public instruction, in consultation with school districts, shall: (1)
Design a verifiable funding formula that meets service delivery
standards that address the special education obligations of school
districts; and (2) adopt service delivery standards. The formula shall
align the amount of funding requested of the state with the policy
expectations, goals, and legal obligations established under the
individuals with disabilities education act and chapter 28A.155 RCW.
The formula shall be based on degree of student need of the students in
each school district who qualify for state funding for special
education services.

--- END ---