BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter shall not apply to amounts received from the canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits and
vegetables which are subsequently sold at wholesale outside the state
or which are sold at wholesale by the person canning, preserving,
freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits and vegetables to
purchasers outside the state or to purchasers who transport in the
ordinary course of business the goods out of this state, or selling at
wholesale fresh fruits and vegetables canned, preserved, frozen,
processed, or dehydrated by the seller and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state. As proof of sale to a person who transports in the ordinary
course of business goods out of this state, the seller shall annually
provide a statement in a form prescribed by the department and retain
the statement as a business record.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.260 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 4 and 2003 2nd
sp.s. c 1 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits and vegetables((, or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and
vegetables canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated by the
seller and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state)); as to such persons the amount
of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent((. As proof of sale to a person who
transports in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state,
the seller shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by
the department and retain the statement as a business record));
(d) Dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in
21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including byproducts
from the manufacturing of the dairy products such as whey and casein;
or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports
in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller
shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by the
department and retain the statement as a business record;
(e) Alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, as those
terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol
fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock manufactured, multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. This subsection (1)(e) expires July 1,
2009; and
(f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales, at retail or wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the assemblies multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing nuclear fuel assemblies, as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(11) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to
such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income of such
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(12) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(13)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of
commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, manufactured by
that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the airplanes
or components multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (13), "commercial
airplane," "component," and "final assembly of a superefficient
airplane" have the meanings given in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (13) must report
as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (13) does not apply after the earlier of: July
1, 2024; or December 31, 2007, if assembly of a superefficient airplane
does not begin by December 31, 2007, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to
store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, or any
combination thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality
of the product for orderly marketing.
(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(4) "Eligible investment project" means an investment in qualified
buildings or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and
services rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of
the project. The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not
eligible for a deferral unless the underlying ownership of the
buildings, machinery, and equipment vests exclusively in the same
person, or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the
economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee in the form of reduced
rent payments.
(5) "Fresh fruit and vegetable processing" means manufacturing as
defined in RCW 82.04.120 which consists of the canning, preserving,
freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits and/or vegetables.
(6) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(7) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and
expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for fresh fruit and
vegetable processing, cold storage warehouse, and research and
development activities, including plant offices and warehouses or other
facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods if such
facilities are an essential or an integral part of a factory, plant, or
laboratory used for fresh fruit and vegetable processing, cold storage
warehousing, or research and development. If a building is used partly
for fresh fruit and vegetable processing, cold storage warehousing, or
research and development and partly for other purposes, the applicable
tax deferral shall be determined by apportionment of the costs of
construction under rules adopted by the department.
(8) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a fresh fruit and vegetable processing,
cold storage warehouse, or research and development operation.
"Qualified machinery and equipment" includes: Computers; software;
data processing equipment; laboratory equipment; manufacturing
components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds,
tools, and dies; operating structures; and all equipment used to
control or operate the machinery.
(9) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(10) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process related to fresh fruit and vegetable processing or cold storage
warehousing before commercial sales have begun. As used in this
subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales
for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the
product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Application for deferral of taxes under
this chapter must be made before initiation of the construction of the
investment project or acquisition of equipment or machinery. The
application shall be made to the department in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The application shall contain
information regarding the location of the investment project, the
applicant's average employment in the state for the prior year,
estimated or actual new employment related to the project, estimated or
actual wages of employees related to the project, estimated or actual
costs, time schedules for completion and operation, and other
information required by the department.
(2) The department shall rule on the application within sixty days.
The department shall keep a running total of all deferrals granted
under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department shall issue a sales and
use tax deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes
due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible
investment project if the investment project is undertaken for the
purpose of fresh fruit and vegetable processing, cold storage
warehousing, or research and development.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Each recipient of a deferral granted
under this chapter shall submit a report to the department on December
31st of the year in which the investment project is certified by the
department as having been operationally completed, and on December 31st
of each of the seven succeeding calendar years. The report shall
contain information, as required by the department, from which the
department may determine whether the recipient is meeting the
requirements of this chapter. If the recipient fails to submit a
report or submits an inadequate report, the department may declare the
amount of deferred taxes outstanding to be immediately assessed and
payable.
(2) If, on the basis of a report under this section or other
information, the department finds that an investment project is not
eligible for tax deferral under this chapter, the amount of deferred
taxes outstanding for the project are immediately due. For any taxes
that are due, penalties and interest applicable to delinquent excise
taxes shall be assessed and imposed for delinquent payments under this
chapter. The debt for deferred taxes will not be extinguished by
insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership
does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is transferred, subject
to the successor meeting the eligibility requirements of this chapter,
for the remaining periods of the deferral.
(3) Deferred taxes need not be repaid if the department determines,
in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section,
that the recipient has met the requirements of this chapter for the
seven calendar years following the certification by the department that
the investment project has been operationally completed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The employment security department shall
make, and certify to the department of revenue, all determinations of
employment and wages as requested by the department under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the
administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Applications, reports, and any other
information received by the department under this chapter shall not be
confidential and shall be subject to disclosure.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.08.820 and 1997 c 450 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
on:
(a) Material-handling and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment; or
(b) Construction of a warehouse or grain elevator, including
materials, and including service and labor costs,
are eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount
of the remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this section and
is based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;
(b) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to
store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, or any
combination thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality
of the product for orderly marketing;
(c) "Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion if the expansion adds at least
twenty-five thousand square feet of additional space to an existing
cold storage warehouse, at least two hundred thousand square feet of
additional space to an existing warehouse other than a cold storage
warehouse, or additional storage capacity of at least one million
bushels to an existing grain elevator. "Construction" does not include
renovation, remodeling, or repair;
(((c))) (d) "Department" means the department of revenue;
(((d))) (e) "Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used
exclusively by a retailer solely for the storage and distribution of
finished goods to retail outlets of the retailer. "Distribution
center" does not include a warehouse at which retail sales occur;
(((e))) (f) "Finished goods" means tangible personal property
intended for sale by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does
not include agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party
warehouses, or retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the
person who produced the agricultural product. "Finished goods" does
not include logs, minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products
stored as raw materials or in bulk;
(((f))) (g) "Grain elevator" means a structure used for storage and
handling of grain in bulk;
(((g))) (h) "Material-handling equipment and racking equipment"
means equipment in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used
to handle, store, organize, convey, package, or repackage finished
goods. The term includes tangible personal property with a useful life
of one year or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the
equipment, including repair and replacement parts. The term does not
include equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like
space, within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used for
nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes but is
not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized
systems, including containers that are an integral part of the system,
whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers
that control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal
property; and forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used
to lift or move tangible personal property and that cannot be operated
legally on roads and streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not
limited to, conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers,
pallets, and other containers and storage devices that form a necessary
part of the storage system;
(((h))) (i) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;
(((i))) (j) "Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail"
as defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;
(((j))) (k) "Square footage" means the product of the two
horizontal dimensions of each floor of a specific warehouse. The
entire footprint of the warehouse shall be measured in calculating the
square footage, including space that juts out from the building profile
such as loading docks. "Square footage" does not mean the aggregate of
the square footage of more than one warehouse at a location or the
aggregate of the square footage of warehouses at more than one
location;
(((k))) (l) "Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under
RCW 82.04.280(4);
(((l))) (m) "Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in
which finished goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may
have more than one storage room and more than one floor. Office space,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other space within the warehouse and
necessary for the operation of the warehouse are considered part of the
warehouse as are loading docks and other such space attached to the
building and used for handling of finished goods. Landscaping and
parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A storage yard
is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and
(((m))) (n) "Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at
wholesale" as defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal
property, but "wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales
exempt under 82.04.330.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the department for remittance
of all or part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. For grain
elevators with bushel capacity of one million but less than two
million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or
more, other than cold storage warehouses, and for grain elevators with
bushel capacity of two million or more, the remittance is equal to one
hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying construction,
materials, service, and labor, and fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment,
and labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment. For cold storage
warehouses with square footage of twenty-five thousand or more, the
remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid
for qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor, and one
hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment;
location and size of warehouses and grain elevators; and construction
invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications during the
previous quarter.
(4) Warehouses, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment
and racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has
been or is being received under chapter 82.60, 82.61, 82.62, or 82.63
RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any
remittance under this section. Warehouses and grain elevators upon
which construction was initiated before May 20, 1997, are not eligible
for a remittance under this section.
(5) The lessor or owner of a warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance under this section unless the underlying
ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and the material-handling
equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in the same person,
or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.12.820 and 2003 c 5 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators, and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied under RCW
82.12.020 on:
(a) Material-handling equipment and racking equipment and labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the equipment; or
(b) Materials incorporated in the construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator, are eligible for an exemption on tax paid in the form
of a remittance or credit against tax owed. The amount of the
remittance or credit is computed under subsection (2) of this section
and is based on the state share of use tax.
(2)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.12.020 to the department. The person may then apply to the
department for remittance of all or part of the tax paid under RCW
82.12.020. For grain elevators with bushel capacity of one million but
less than two million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the
amount of tax paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred
thousand or more, other than cold storage warehouses, and for grain
elevators with bushel capacity of two million or more, the remittance
is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for
qualifying construction materials, and fifty percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking
equipment. For cold storage warehouses with square footage of twenty-five thousand or more, the remittance is equal to one hundred percent
of the amount of tax paid for qualifying construction, materials,
service, and labor, and one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid
for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and
labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment;
location and size of warehouses, if applicable; and construction
invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit or credit
exempted amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications
during the previous quarter.
(3) Warehouse, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment and
racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has been
or is being received under chapter 82.60, 82.61, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or
RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any remittance
under this section. Materials incorporated in warehouses and grain
elevators upon which construction was initiated prior to May 20, 1997,
are not eligible for a remittance under this section.
(4) The lessor or owner of the warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance or credit under this section unless the
underlying ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and material-handling equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in the same
person, or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the
economic benefit of the exemption to the lessee in the form of reduced
rent payments.
(5) The definitions in RCW 82.08.820 apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 3 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect July 1, 2005.

--- END ---