BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that the
building industry is a key driver of the state economy. The
legislature further recognizes that the building industry single-handedly kept the state economy afloat during the recent recession.
The building industry, through single-family and multifamily
construction, generated one hundred two thousand three hundred forty-one direct jobs and an additional ten thousand five hundred eighty-two
spin-off jobs in Washington, more than any other industry.
(2) The legislature recognizes that the governor recently entered
into a contract with the Boeing company to ensure that the Boeing
company will build the new 7E7 plant in Washington. Among other
provisions, the governor granted the Boeing company state protection
against environmental lawsuits.
(3) The legislature recognizes that developers and builders are
consistently sued by no-growth activists to prevent legitimate
development. The legislature finds that these suits stymie the state
economy and fetter thoughtful land use planning. Because the building
industry is the most important job creator and economic driver in the
state, the legislature extends the legal protections granted to the
Boeing company to the entire building industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) For the purposes of this section, "construction
professional" means a land developer, builder, builder vendor,
contractor, or subcontractor performing or furnishing the design,
supervision, construction, or observation of the construction of any
improvement to real property, whether operating as a sole proprietor,
partnership, corporation, or other business entity.
(b) "Project permit" or "project permit application" means any land
use or environmental permit or license required from a local government
for a project action, including but not limited to building permits,
subdivisions, binding site plans, planned unit developments,
conditional uses, shoreline substantial development permits, site plan
review, permits or approvals required by critical area ordinances,
site-specific rezones authorized by a comprehensive plan or subarea
plan, but excluding the adoption or amendment of a comprehensive plan,
subarea plan, or development regulations except as otherwise
specifically included in this subsection (1)(b).
(2)(a) In the event that any party, other than the state or a
political subdivision of the state, institutes any legal proceeding,
including but not limited to proceedings under chapters 36.70C and
90.58 RCW, against a construction professional regarding a project
permit granted by the state or a political subdivision of the state,
the office of the attorney general shall assume the entire defense of
the proceedings, including all fees, costs, and expenses.
(b) Without prior consultation with the construction professional,
the office of the attorney general may not: (i) Make any settlement or
compromise of the legal proceedings; (ii) fail to pursue any available
legal theory of avenue of appeal of any adverse judgment against which
the construction professional believes is likely to be successful;
(iii) elect to abandon any litigation or other legal proceedings under
(a) of this subsection; or (iv) take any action that would result in
the imposition of fees, charges, or costs upon the construction
professional.

--- END ---