BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature declares that effective
aquatic pest control is crucial to maintaining and enhancing
agricultural, aquacultural, fishing, and recreational opportunities as
well as the quality of life in Washington. The legislature recognizes
that aquatic pesticides are an integral part of strategies to eliminate
and control the growth of aquatic pests. The legislature also
recognizes that aquatic pesticides include a variety of chemicals, such
as herbicides, insecticides, piscicides, and algaecides, that are
applied in our state's lakes, rivers, and estuaries.
(2) The legislature also recognizes that the ninth circuit court of
appeals concluded in Headwaters, Inc. v. Talent Irrigation District,
243 F.3d 526 (9th cir. 2001), that an application of aquatic herbicides
into an irrigation canal was the discharge of a pollutant to navigable
waters from a point source. In addition, the legislature recognizes
that the ninth circuit court of appeals in the Talent decision
concluded that such an application required a national pollutant
discharge elimination system (NPDES) permit. The legislature
recognizes that the court in the Talent decision also determined that
compliance with the registration and labeling requirements of the
federal insecticide, fungicide, and rodenticide act (FIFRA) did not
obviate the need for the NPDES permit.
(3) The legislature further recognizes that the department of
ecology implemented an NPDES permit program for the application of
aquatic pesticides in response to the Talent decision. The legislature
recognizes that the department of ecology has developed NPDES permits
for irrigation system weed control, mosquito larvae control, noxious
weed control, nuisance plant and algae control, fish management, and
oyster growers.
(4) The legislature also recognizes that, after the Talent
decision, the federal environmental protection agency issued guidance
that the application of an aquatic herbicide consistent with the FIFRA
label to ensure the passage of irrigation return flow is a nonpoint
source discharge not subject to NPDES permit requirements under the
federal clean water act. The legislature recognizes that the federal
environmental protection agency based its decision on the federal clean
water act's exemption of discharges composed entirely of return flows
from irrigated agriculture and its exclusion of return flows from the
point source definition. The legislature also recognizes that this
federal guidance does not address whether other types of direct
applications of FIFRA-registered pesticides beyond the scope of the
exemption are subject to NPDES permitting requirements.
(5) The legislature declares the state should require NPDES permits
for application of aquatic pesticides only when such requirement is
consistent with federal environmental protection agency guidance and
federal permitting requirements in nondelegated states. The
legislature therefore intends to require this consistency in the
state's NPDES permit program.
(6) The legislature also intends to transfer authority for issuing
any NPDES permits required for application of aquatic pesticides from
the department of ecology to the department of agriculture, subject to
federal approval, and provide for permit program operations until
federal approval of transfer of this authority is obtained.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.48.020 and 2002 c 161 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Whenever the word)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aquatic pesticides" includes a variety of chemicals, such as
herbicides, insecticides, piscicides, and algaecides, applied in waters
of the state for aquatic pest control.
(2) "Person" ((is used in this chapter, it shall be construed to))
includes any political subdivision, government agency, municipality,
industry, public or private corporation, copartnership, association,
firm, individual, or any other entity whatsoever.
((Wherever the words)) (3) "Waters of the state" ((shall be used in
this chapter, they shall be construed to)) includes lakes, rivers,
ponds, streams, inland waters, underground waters, salt waters, and all
other surface waters and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the
state of Washington.
((Whenever the word)) (4) "Pollution" ((is used in this chapter, it
shall be construed to)) means such contamination, or other alteration
of the physical, chemical, or biological properties, of any waters of
the state, including change in temperature, taste, color, turbidity, or
odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid, gaseous, solid,
radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the state as will or
is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters harmful,
detrimental, or injurious to the public health, safety, or welfare, or
to domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or
other legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds,
fish, or other aquatic life.
((Wherever the word)) (5) "Department" ((is used in this chapter it
shall)) means the department of ecology.
((Whenever the word)) (6) "Director" ((is used in this chapter it
shall)) means the director of ecology.
((Whenever the words)) (7) "Aquatic noxious weed" ((are used in
this chapter, they have)) has the same meaning ((prescribed under)) as
in RCW 17.26.020.
((Whenever the words)) (8) "General sewer plan" ((are used in this
chapter they shall be construed to)) includes all sewerage general
plans, sewer general comprehensive plans, plans for a system of
sewerage, and other plans for sewer systems adopted by a local
government entity including but not limited to cities, towns, public
utility districts, and water-sewer districts.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.48.030 and 1987 c 109 s 123 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 90.48.260, the department shall have the
jurisdiction to control and prevent the pollution of streams, lakes,
rivers, ponds, inland waters, salt waters, water courses, and other
surface and underground waters of the state of Washington.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.48.260 and 2003 c 325 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of ecology is hereby designated as the State
Water Pollution Control Agency for all purposes of the federal clean
water act ((as it exists on February 4, 1987)), and is hereby
authorized to participate fully in the programs of the federal clean
water act as well as to take all action necessary to secure to the
state the benefits and to meet the requirements of that act. With
regard to the national estuary program established by section 320 of
that act, the department shall exercise its responsibility jointly with
the Puget Sound ((water quality authority)) action team.
(2) The department of ecology may delegate its authority under this
chapter, including its national pollutant discharge elimination permit
system authority and duties regarding animal feeding operations and
concentrated animal feeding operations, to the department of
agriculture through a memorandum of understanding. Until any such
delegation receives federal approval, the department of agriculture's
adoption or issuance of animal feeding operation and concentrated
animal feeding operation rules, permits, programs, and directives
pertaining to water quality shall be accomplished after reaching
agreement with the director of the department of ecology. Adoption or
issuance and implementation shall be accomplished so that compliance
with such animal feeding operation and concentrated animal feeding
operation rules, permits, programs, and directives will achieve
compliance with all federal and state water pollution control laws.
(3) Subject to federal approval, the department's authority related
to national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for
application of aquatic pesticides shall be transferred to the
department of agriculture.
(a) The department and department of agriculture shall specify in
a memorandum of understanding their respective responsibilities and
activities, including permit issuance and collection of permit fees,
with respect to national pollutant discharge elimination system permits
for application of aquatic pesticides during the transfer period. The
memorandum of understanding remains in effect until federal approval
for the transfer is received.
(b) Until federal approval is received, the department of
agriculture's adoption or issuance of aquatic pesticide application
rules, permits, programs, and directives shall be accomplished after
reaching agreement with the director. Adoption or issuance and
implementation shall be accomplished so that compliance with such
aquatic pesticide application rules, permits, programs, and directives
will achieve compliance with all federal and state water pollution
control laws.
(4) The powers granted herein include, among others, and
notwithstanding any other provisions of chapter 90.48 RCW or otherwise,
the following:
(((1))) (a) Complete authority to establish and administer a
comprehensive state point source waste discharge or pollution discharge
elimination permit program which will enable the department to qualify
for full participation in any national waste discharge or pollution
discharge elimination permit system and will allow the department to be
the sole agency issuing permits required by such national system
operating in the state of Washington subject to the provisions of RCW
90.48.262(2). Program elements authorized herein may include, but are
not limited to:
(((a))) (i) Effluent treatment and limitation requirements together
with timing requirements related thereto;
(((b))) (ii) Applicable receiving water quality standards
requirements;
(((c))) (iii) Requirements of standards of performance for new
sources;
(((d))) (iv) Pretreatment requirements;
(((e))) (v) Termination and modification of permits for cause;
(((f))) (vi) Requirements for public notices and opportunities for
public hearings;
(((g))) (vii) Appropriate relationships with the secretary of the
army in the administration of ((his)) the secretary's responsibilities
which relate to anchorage and navigation, with the administrator of the
environmental protection agency in the performance of ((his)) the
secretary's duties, and with other governmental officials under the
federal clean water act;
(((h))) (viii) Requirements for inspection, monitoring, entry, and
reporting;
(((i))) (ix) Enforcement of the program through penalties,
emergency powers, and criminal sanctions;
(((j))) (x) A continuing planning process; and
(((k))) (xi) User charges.
(((2))) (b) The power to establish and administer state programs in
a manner ((which)) that will ((insure)) ensure the procurement of
moneys, whether in the form of grants, loans, or otherwise; to assist
in the construction, operation, and maintenance of various water
pollution control facilities and works; and the administering of
various state water pollution control management, regulatory, and
enforcement programs.
(((3))) (c) The power to develop and implement appropriate programs
pertaining to continuing planning processes, area-wide waste treatment
management plans, and basin planning.
(5) The governor shall have authority to perform those actions
required of him or her by the federal clean water act.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.48.465 and 2002 c 361 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish annual fees to collect expenses
for issuing and administering each class of permits under RCW
90.48.160, 90.48.162, and 90.48.260. An initial fee schedule shall be
established by rule and be adjusted no more often than once every two
years. This fee schedule shall apply to all permits, regardless of
date of issuance, and fees shall be assessed prospectively. All fees
charged shall be based on factors relating to the complexity of permit
issuance and compliance and may be based on pollutant loading and
toxicity and be designed to encourage recycling and the reduction of
the quantity of pollutants. Fees shall be established in amounts to
fully recover and not to exceed expenses incurred by the department in
processing permit applications and modifications, monitoring and
evaluating compliance with permits, conducting inspections, securing
laboratory analysis of samples taken during inspections, reviewing
plans and documents directly related to operations of permittees,
overseeing performance of delegated pretreatment programs, and
supporting the overhead expenses that are directly related to these
activities.
(2) The annual fee paid by a municipality, as defined in 33 U.S.C.
Sec. 1362, for all domestic wastewater facility permits issued under
RCW 90.48.162 and 90.48.260 shall not exceed the total of a maximum of
fifteen cents per month per residence or residential equivalent
contributing to the municipality's wastewater system.
(3) The department shall ensure that indirect dischargers do not
pay twice for the administrative expense of a permit. Accordingly,
administrative expenses for permits issued by a municipality under RCW
90.48.165 are not recoverable by the department.
(4) In establishing fees, the department shall consider the
economic impact of fees on small dischargers and the economic impact of
fees on public entities required to obtain permits for storm water
runoff and shall provide appropriate adjustments.
(5) The fee for an individual permit issued for a dairy farm as
defined under chapter 90.64 RCW shall be fifty cents per animal unit up
to one thousand two hundred fourteen dollars for fiscal year 1999. The
fee for a general permit issued for a dairy farm as defined under
chapter 90.64 RCW shall be fifty cents per animal unit up to eight
hundred fifty dollars for fiscal year 1999. Thereafter, these fees may
rise in accordance with the fiscal growth factor as provided in chapter
43.135 RCW.
(6) The fee for a general permit or an individual permit
((developed solely as a result of the federal court of appeals decision
in Headwaters, Inc. v. Talent Irrigation District, 243 F.3rd 526 (9th
Cir. 2001))) for the application of aquatic pesticides is limited,
until June 30, 2003, to a maximum of three hundred dollars. ((Such a
permit is required only, and as long as, the interpretation of this
court decision is not overturned or modified by future court rulings,
administrative rule making, or clarification of scope by the United
States environmental protection agency or legislative action. In such
a case the department shall take appropriate action to rescind or
modify these permits.)) Thereafter, the fee may be increased according
to the fiscal growth factor as provided in chapter 43.135 RCW.
(7) All fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the
water quality permit account hereby created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be appropriated only for purposes of
administering permits under RCW 90.48.160, 90.48.162, and 90.48.260.
(8) The department shall present a biennial progress report on the
use of moneys from the account to the legislature. The report will be
due December 31st of odd-numbered years. The report shall consist of
information on fees collected, actual expenses incurred, and
anticipated expenses for the current and following fiscal years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A national pollutant discharge elimination system permit for
the application of aquatic pesticides shall be required only, and as
long as, such a permit requirement is consistent with:
(a) Rules, guidance, or policy of the United States environmental
protection agency; and
(b) The United States environmental protection agency's permit
requirements in states that have not been delegated authority under the
federal clean water act to issue such permits.
(2) If any inconsistency in permit requirements as specified in
subsection (1) of this section occurs, the department, or the
department of agriculture once transfer of permit authority receives
federal approval, shall take appropriate action to rescind or modify
any permits that have been issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department and department of agriculture shall cooperate in
requesting federal approval for the transfer of the national pollutant
discharge elimination system permit program for the application of
aquatic pesticides from the department to the department of
agriculture. When federal approval is received, the department of
agriculture shall assume the powers and duties of the department
specified in this chapter as they relate to the aquatic pesticide
permit program and consistent with the federal approval.
(2) By December 31, 2004, the department and the department of
agriculture shall jointly submit to the legislature a progress report
regarding the transfer of the aquatic pesticides permit program and the
federal approval and include in that report recommendations for any
statutory or regulatory changes necessary to facilitate the transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---