BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The health of the children of Washington state is critical to
their success in school and throughout their lives. Children with
health insurance coverage have better health outcomes than those who
lack coverage. Children without health insurance coverage are more
likely to be in poor health and more likely to delay receiving, or go
without, needed health care services; and
(b) Access to preventive and well-child health services for
children are a cost-effective investment of both public and private
dollars that improve the health of children and of our communities at
large.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to provide access
to health insurance coverage for all children in the state of
Washington by 2008, by building upon and strengthening the successes of
employer-sponsored health insurance coverage and publicly supported
children's health insurance programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The administrator of the health care
authority shall conduct a study and prepare recommendations to the
legislature to achieve the goal of providing access to health insurance
coverage for all children in the state of Washington by 2008. The
report and recommendations must be submitted to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2004.
(2) In conducting the study and preparing recommendations, the
administrator of the health care authority shall establish and actively
consult with an advisory committee that includes representatives of at
least the following individuals or entities: Consumers, including
people with disabilities and communities of color; health care
providers and facilities; health insurance carriers; academic or health
care research institutions; the department of social and health
services; the department of health; and the state board of health.
(3) The administrator, in consultation with the advisory committee,
shall, in its report to the governor and the legislature:
(a) Examine and address the following:
(i) Current rates of health care coverage among children in the
state of Washington;
(ii) The role of medicaid, the state children's health insurance
program, and other publicly funded programs in providing health care
coverage to children in the state of Washington, including the extent
to which administrative requirements related to applications for
coverage and to continuing eligibility verification affect the
participation in the programs of children who are eligible for these
programs;
(iii) The role of employer-sponsored health insurance in providing
health care coverage to children in the state of Washington; and
(iv) The experiences of other states that have attempted to provide
health care coverage for children, including the approaches they have
taken to providing coverage, the extent to which they have integrated
the provision of proven preventive health services into coverage, and
the results of their efforts; and
(b) Provide a recommended system to achieve the goal of providing
access to health insurance coverage for all children in the state of
Washington by 2008, including recommendations related to delivery of
health services, integrating the provision of proven preventive health
services, and financing.

--- END ---