BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The central purposes of a university are the pursuit of truth,
the discovery of new knowledge through scholarship and research, the
study and reasoned criticism of intellectual and cultural traditions,
the teaching and general development of students to help them become
creative individuals and productive citizens of a pluralistic
democracy, and the transmission of knowledge and learning to a society
at large. Free inquiry and free speech within the academic community
are indispensable to the achievement of these goals. The freedom to
teach and to learn depend upon the creation of appropriate conditions
and opportunities on the campus as a whole as well as in classrooms and
lecture halls. These purposes reflect the values, pluralism,
diversity, opportunity, critical intelligence, openness, and fairness,
that are the cornerstones of American society.
(2) Academic freedom and intellectual diversity are values
indispensable to American universities. From its first formulation in
the "General Report of the Committee on Academic Freedom and Tenure of
the American Association of University Professors," the concept of
academic freedom has been premised on the idea that human knowledge is
a never-ending pursuit of the truth, that there is no humanly
accessible truth that is not in principle open to challenge, and that
no party or intellectual faction has a monopoly on wisdom. Therefore,
academic freedom is most likely to thrive in an environment of
intellectual diversity that protects and fosters independence of
thought and speech. In the words of the general report, it is vital to
protect "as the first condition of progress, [a] complete and unlimited
freedom to pursue inquiry and publish its results."
(3) Because free inquiry and its fruits are crucial to the
democratic enterprise itself, academic freedom is a national value as
well. In a historic 1967 decision, Keyishian v. Board of Regents of
the University of the State of New York, the supreme court of the
United States overturned a New York state loyalty provision for
teachers with these words: "Our Nation is deeply committed to
safeguarding academic freedom, [a] transcendent value to all of us and
not merely to the teachers concerned." In Sweezy v. New Hampshire,
1957, the court observed that the "essentiality of freedom in the
community of American universities [was] almost self-evident."
(4) Academic freedom consists in protecting the intellectual
independence of professors, researchers, and students in the pursuit of
knowledge and the expression of ideas from interference by legislators
or authorities within the institution itself. This means that no
political, ideological, or religious orthodoxy will be imposed on
professors and researchers through the hiring, tenure, or termination
process, or through any other administrative means by the academic
institution. Nor shall legislatures impose any such orthodoxy through
their control of the university budget.
(5) This protection includes students. From the first statement on
academic freedom, it has been recognized that intellectual independence
means the protection of students, as well as faculty, from the
imposition of any orthodoxy of a political, religious, or ideological
nature. The 1915 general report admonished faculty to avoid "taking
unfair advantage of the student's immaturity by indoctrinating him with
the teacher's own opinions before the student has had an opportunity
fairly to examine other opinions upon the matters in question, and
before he has sufficient knowledge and ripeness of judgment to be
entitled to form any definitive opinion of his own." In 1967, the
American association of university professors' "Joint Statement on
Rights and Freedoms of Students" reinforced and amplified this
injunction by affirming the inseparability of "the freedom to teach and
freedom to learn." In the words of the report, "Students should be
free to take reasoned exception to the data or views offered in any
course of study and to reserve judgment about matters of opinion."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
To secure the intellectual independence of faculty and students and
to protect the principle of intellectual diversity, the following
principles and procedures shall be observed. These principles apply
only to public universities and to private universities that present
themselves as bound by the canons of academic freedom. Private
institutions choosing to restrict academic freedom on the basis of
creed must explicitly disclose the scope and nature of these
restrictions.
(1) All faculty shall be hired, fired, promoted, and granted tenure
on the basis of their competence and appropriate knowledge in the field
of their expertise and, in the humanities, the social sciences, and the
arts, with a view toward fostering a plurality of methodologies and
perspectives. No faculty may be hired, fired, or denied promotion or
tenure on the basis of his or her political or religious beliefs.
(2) No faculty member may be excluded from tenure, search, and
hiring committees on the basis of the member's political or religious
beliefs.
(3) Students will be graded solely on the basis of their reasoned
answers and appropriate knowledge of the subjects and disciplines they
study, not on the basis of their political or religious beliefs.
(4) Curricula and reading lists in the humanities and social
sciences should reflect the uncertainty and unsettled character of all
human knowledge in these areas by providing students with dissenting
sources and viewpoints where appropriate. While teachers are and
should be free to pursue their own findings and perspectives in
presenting their views, they should consider and make their students
aware of other viewpoints. Academic disciplines should welcome a
diversity of approaches to unsettled questions.
(5) Exposing students to the spectrum of significant scholarly
viewpoints on the subjects examined in their courses is a major
responsibility of faculty. Faculty will not use their courses for the
purpose of political, ideological, religious, or antireligious
indoctrination.
(6) Selection of speakers, allocation of funds for speakers'
programs, and other student activities will observe the principles of
academic freedom and promote intellectual pluralism.
(7) An environment conducive to the civil exchange of ideas is an
essential component of a free university; the obstruction of invited
campus speakers, destruction of campus literature, or other effort to
obstruct this exchange is prohibited.
(8) Knowledge advances when individual scholars are left free to
reach their own conclusions about which methods, facts, and theories
have been validated by research. Academic institutions and
professional societies formed to advance knowledge within an area of
research, maintain the integrity of the research process, and organize
the professional lives of related researchers serve as indispensable
venues within which scholars circulate research findings and debate
their interpretation. To perform these functions adequately, academic
institutions and professional societies should maintain a posture of
organizational neutrality with respect to the substantive disagreements
that divide researchers on questions within, or outside, their fields
of inquiry.

--- END ---