BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that consumers
increasingly use telephonic and electronic communications to purchase
goods and services, inquire about their accounts, and obtain technical
support or other information. Most telephonic and electronic customer
service transactions are provided by customer service or sales
representatives located in centralized contact centers. Many
businesses do not operate their own customer sales and service
operations, but contract with third party contact centers that
misrepresent themselves as the businesses themselves. Contact centers
may be subject to different privacy and security standards depending on
their location. The legislature also finds that consumer rights when
dealing with contact centers need greater protection. Consumers have
a right to know who they have contacted, to know where they are
located, to receive truthful information, and to engage in secure
financial transactions. For these reasons, the legislature hereby
establishes standards governing contact centers to strengthen consumer
rights to choose, to be informed, and to protect the privacy and
security of their personal information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Contact center" means a physical or electronic operation that
uses telephonic or electronic communications in one or more of the
following activities: (a) Providing customer services, including
information about customer accounts; (b) soliciting sales; (c)
reactivating dormant accounts; (d) conducting surveys or research; (e)
collecting receivables; (f) taking or receiving reservations; or (g)
taking or receiving orders.
(2) "Location" means: (a) City, town, or other local jurisdiction;
(b) state, province, or comparable jurisdiction; and (c) country.
"Location" does not mean street address.
(3) "Personal information" means personally identifiable
information that is provided by a person to a contact center, which
includes, but is not limited to, a person's name, address, telephone
number, electronic mail address, social security number, or credit or
other financial information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 At the request of a party using telephonic
or electronic communications with an employee of a contact center, the
employee must identify: (1) The name and location of his or her
employer; and (2) if applicable, the name, location, and telephone
number of the entity contracting with the contact center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 An employee at a contact center may not
solicit any personal information, whether using telephonic or
electronic communications, unless the employee first informs the party
that disclosing that information to the employee is optional and
receives the affirmative consent of the party to whom the information
relates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If an entity offering goods for sale in this
state contracts with any contact centers:
(1) The terms of the contract must include a requirement that the
contact center comply with sections 3 and 4 of this act; and
(2) The entity must disclose the locations of the contact centers
in a notice to buyers. The notice must be printed in twelve-point type
or larger, and must clearly and conspicuously set forth the locations
of any contact centers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. Violations of this chapter are not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business. A violation
of this chapter is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and
an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the
consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---