BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.08.177 and 1986 c 9 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
"Successor" means any person to whom a taxpayer quitting, selling
out, exchanging, or disposing of a business sells or otherwise conveys,
directly or indirectly, in bulk and not in the ordinary course of the
taxpayer's business, a major part of the ((materials, supplies,
merchandise, inventory, fixtures, or equipment)) property, whether real
or personal, tangible or intangible, of the taxpayer.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.12.070 and 1981 c 128 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this title ((shall)) apply to all work done by
contract; the person, firm, or corporation who lets a contract for such
work ((shall be)) is responsible primarily and directly for all
premiums upon the work. The contractor and any subcontractor ((shall
be)) are subject to the provisions of this title and the person, firm,
or corporation letting the contract ((shall be)) is entitled to collect
from the contractor the full amount payable in premiums and the
contractor in turn ((shall be)) is entitled to collect from the
subcontractor his or her proportionate amount of the payment.
For the purposes of this section, a contractor registered under
chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW ((shall not be))
is not responsible for any premiums upon the work of any subcontractor
if:
(1) The subcontractor is currently engaging in a business which is
registered under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW;
(2) The subcontractor has a principal place of business which would
be eligible for a business deduction for internal revenue service tax
purposes other than that furnished by the contractor for which the
business has contracted to furnish services;
(3) The subcontractor maintains a separate set of books or records
that reflect all items of income and expenses of the business; ((and))
(4) The subcontractor has contracted to perform:
(a) The work of a contractor as defined in RCW 18.27.010; or
(b) The work of installing wires or equipment to convey electric
current or installing apparatus to be operated by such current as it
pertains to the electrical industry as described in chapter 19.28 RCW;
and
(5) The subcontractor has an industrial insurance account in good
standing with the department or is a self-insurer. For the purposes of
this subsection, a contractor may consider a subcontractor's account to
be in good standing if, within a year prior to letting the contract or
master service agreement, and at least once a year thereafter, the
contractor has verified with the department that the account is in good
standing and the contractor has not received written notice from the
department that the subcontractor's account status has changed.
Acceptable documentation of verification includes a department document
which includes an issued date or a dated printout of information from
the department's internet web site showing a subcontractor's good
standing. The department shall develop an approach to provide
contractors with verification of the date of inquiries validating that
the subcontractor's account is in good standing.
It ((shall be)) is unlawful for any county, city, or town to issue
a construction building permit to any person who has not submitted to
the department an estimate of payroll and paid premium thereon as
provided by chapter 51.16 RCW of this title or proof ((that such person
has qualified)) of qualification as a self-insurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 51.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon termination, dissolution, or abandonment of a corporate or
limited liability company business, any officer, member, manager, or
other person having control or supervision of payment and/or reporting
of industrial insurance, or who is charged with the responsibility for
the filing of returns, is personally liable for any unpaid premiums and
interest and penalties on those premiums if such officer or other
person willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid any premiums due
the department under chapter 51.16 RCW.
For purposes of this subsection "willfully fails to pay or to cause
to be paid" means that the failure was the result of an intentional,
conscious, and voluntary course of action.
(2) The officer, member, manager, or other person is liable only
for premiums that became due during the period he or she had the
control, supervision, responsibility, or duty to act for the
corporation described in subsection (1) of this section, plus interest
and penalties on those premiums.
(3) The officer, member, manager, or other person is not liable if
that person is not exempt from mandatory coverage under RCW 51.12.020
and was directed not to pay the employer's premiums by someone who is
exempt.
(4) The officer, member, manager, or other person is not liable if
all of the assets of the corporation or limited liability company have
been applied to its debts through bankruptcy or receivership.
(5) Any person having been issued a notice of assessment under this
section is entitled to the appeal procedures under RCW 51.48.131.
(6) This section does not relieve the corporation or limited
liability company of its liabilities under Title 51 RCW or otherwise
impair other tax collection remedies afforded by law.
(7) Collection authority and procedures prescribed in this chapter
apply to collections under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 51.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall, working with business associations and other
employer and employee groups when practical, publish information and
provide training to promote understanding of the premium liability that
may be incurred under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 51.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall, working with business associations and other
employer and employee groups when practical, publish information and
provide training to promote understanding of the premium liability that
may be incurred under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 51.36.110 and 1994 c 154 s 312 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of the department of labor and industries or the
director's authorized representative shall have the authority to:
(1) Conduct audits and investigations of providers of medical,
chiropractic, dental, vocational, and other health services furnished
to industrially injured workers pursuant to Title 51 RCW. In the
conduct of such audits or investigations, the director or the
director's authorized representatives may examine all records, or
portions thereof, including patient records, for which services were
rendered by a health services provider and reimbursed by the
department, notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute which
may make or purport to make such records privileged or confidential:
PROVIDED, That no original patient records shall be removed from the
premises of the health services provider, and that the disclosure of
any records or information obtained under authority of this section by
the department of labor and industries is prohibited and constitutes a
violation of RCW 42.52.050, unless such disclosure is directly
connected to the official duties of the department: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the disclosure of patient information as required under
this section shall not subject any physician or other health services
provider to any liability for breach of any confidential relationships
between the provider and the patient: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
director or the director's authorized representative shall destroy all
copies of patient medical records in their possession upon completion
of the audit, investigation, or proceedings;
(2) Approve or deny applications to participate as a provider of
services furnished to industrially injured workers pursuant to Title 51
RCW; ((and))
(3) Terminate or suspend eligibility to participate as a provider
of services furnished to industrially injured workers pursuant to Title
51 RCW; and
(4) Pursue collection of unpaid overpayments and/or penalties plus
interest accrued from health care providers pursuant to RCW
51.32.240(6).

Sec. 7 RCW 51.32.240 and 2001 c 146 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever any payment of benefits under this title is made
because of clerical error, mistake of identity, innocent
misrepresentation by or on behalf of the recipient thereof mistakenly
acted upon, or any other circumstance of a similar nature, all not
induced by ((fraud)) willful misrepresentation, the recipient thereof
shall repay it and recoupment may be made from any future payments due
to the recipient on any claim with the state fund or self-insurer, as
the case may be. The department or self-insurer, as the case may be,
must make claim for such repayment or recoupment within one year of the
making of any such payment or it will be deemed any claim therefor has
been waived.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this
section, the department may only assess an overpayment of benefits
because of adjudicator error when the order upon which the overpayment
is based is not yet final as provided in RCW 51.52.050 and 51.52.060.
"Adjudicator error" includes the failure to consider information in the
claim file, failure to secure adequate information, or an error in
judgment.
(c) The director, pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with the
procedures provided in the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW, may exercise his discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the
amount of any such timely claim where the recovery would be against
equity and good conscience.
(2) Whenever the department or self-insurer fails to pay benefits
because of clerical error, mistake of identity, or innocent
misrepresentation, all not induced by recipient ((fraud)) willful
misrepresentation, the recipient may request an adjustment of benefits
to be paid from the state fund or by the self-insurer, as the case may
be, subject to the following:
(a) The recipient must request an adjustment in benefits within one
year from the date of the incorrect payment or it will be deemed any
claim therefore has been waived.
(b) The recipient may not seek an adjustment of benefits because of
adjudicator error. Adjustments due to adjudicator error are addressed
by the filing of a written request for reconsideration with the
department of labor and industries or an appeal with the board of
industrial insurance appeals within sixty days from the date the order
is communicated as provided in RCW 51.52.050. "Adjudicator error"
includes the failure to consider information in the claim file, failure
to secure adequate information, or an error in judgment.
(3) Whenever the department issues an order rejecting a claim for
benefits paid pursuant to RCW 51.32.190 or 51.32.210, after payment for
temporary disability benefits has been paid by a self-insurer pursuant
to RCW 51.32.190(3) or by the department pursuant to RCW 51.32.210, the
recipient thereof shall repay such benefits and recoupment may be made
from any future payments due to the recipient on any claim with the
state fund or self-insurer, as the case may be. The director, under
rules adopted in accordance with the procedures provided in the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, may exercise
discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the amount of any such
payments where the recovery would be against equity and good
conscience.
(4) Whenever any payment of benefits under this title has been made
pursuant to an adjudication by the department or by order of the board
or any court and timely appeal therefrom has been made where the final
decision is that any such payment was made pursuant to an erroneous
adjudication, the recipient thereof shall repay it and recoupment may
be made from any future payments due to the recipient on any claim with
the state fund or self-insurer, as the case may be. The director,
pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with the procedures provided in
the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, may exercise his
discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the amount of any such
payments where the recovery would be against equity and good
conscience.
(5)(a) Whenever any payment of benefits under this title has been
induced by ((fraud)) willful misrepresentation the recipient thereof
shall repay any such payment together with a penalty of fifty percent
of the total of any such payments and the amount of such total sum may
be recouped from any future payments due to the recipient on any claim
with the state fund or self-insurer against whom the ((fraud)) willful
misrepresentation was committed, as the case may be, and the amount of
such penalty shall be placed in the supplemental pension fund. Such
repayment or recoupment must be demanded or ordered within three years
of the discovery of the ((fraud)) willful misrepresentation.
(b) For purposes of this subsection (5), it is willful
misrepresentation for a person to obtain payments or other benefits
under this title in an amount greater than that to which the person
otherwise would be entitled. Willful misrepresentation includes:
(i) Willful false statement; or
(ii) Willful misrepresentation, omission, or concealment of any
material fact.
(c) For purposes of this subsection (5), "willful" means a
conscious or deliberate false statement, misrepresentation, omission,
or concealment of a material fact with the specific intent of
obtaining, continuing, or increasing benefits under this title.
(d) For purposes of this subsection (5), failure to disclose a
work-type activity must be willful in order for a misrepresentation to
have occurred.
(e) For purposes of this subsection (5), a material fact is one
which would result in additional, increased, or continued benefits,
including but not limited to facts about physical restrictions, or
work-type activities which either result in wages or income or would be
reasonably expected to do so. Wages or income include the receipt of
any goods or services. For a work-type activity to be reasonably
expected to result in wages or income, a pattern of repeated activity
must exist. For those activities that would reasonably be expected to
result in wages or produce income, but for which actual wage or income
information cannot be reasonably determined, the department shall
impute wages pursuant to RCW 51.08.178(4).
(6) The worker, beneficiary, or other person affected thereby shall
have the right to contest an order assessing an overpayment pursuant to
this section in the same manner and to the same extent as provided
under RCW 51.52.050 and 51.52.060. In the event such an order becomes
final under chapter 51.52 RCW and notwithstanding the provisions of
subsections (1) through (5) of this section, the director, director's
designee, or self-insurer may file with the clerk in any county within
the state a warrant in the amount of the sum representing the unpaid
overpayment and/or penalty plus interest accruing from the date the
order became final. The clerk of the county in which the warrant is
filed shall immediately designate a superior court cause number for
such warrant and the clerk shall cause to be entered in the judgment
docket under the superior court cause number assigned to the warrant,
the name of the worker, beneficiary, or other person mentioned in the
warrant, the amount of the unpaid overpayment and/or penalty plus
interest accrued, and the date the warrant was filed. The amount of
the warrant as docketed shall become a lien upon the title to and
interest in all real and personal property of the worker, beneficiary,
or other person against whom the warrant is issued, the same as a
judgment in a civil case docketed in the office of such clerk. The
sheriff shall then proceed in the same manner and with like effect as
prescribed by law with respect to execution or other process issued
against rights or property upon judgment in the superior court. Such
warrant so docketed shall be sufficient to support the issuance of
writs of garnishment in favor of the department or self-insurer in the
manner provided by law in the case of judgment, wholly or partially
unsatisfied. The clerk of the court shall be entitled to a filing fee
under RCW 36.18.012(10), which shall be added to the amount of the
warrant. A copy of such warrant shall be mailed to the worker,
beneficiary, or other person within three days of filing with the
clerk.
The director, director's designee, or self-insurer may issue to any
person, firm, corporation, municipal corporation, political subdivision
of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state, a notice to
withhold and deliver property of any kind if there is reason to believe
that there is in the possession of such person, firm, corporation,
municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public
corporation, or agency of the state, property that is due, owing, or
belonging to any worker, beneficiary, or other person upon whom a
warrant has been served for payments due the department or self-insurer. The notice and order to withhold and deliver shall be served
by certified mail accompanied by an affidavit of service by mailing or
served by the sheriff of the county, or by the sheriff's deputy, or by
any authorized representative of the director, director's designee, or
self-insurer. Any person, firm, corporation, municipal corporation,
political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or agency of
the state upon whom service has been made shall answer the notice
within twenty days exclusive of the day of service, under oath and in
writing, and shall make true answers to the matters inquired or in the
notice and order to withhold and deliver. In the event there is in the
possession of the party named and served with such notice and order,
any property that may be subject to the claim of the department or
self-insurer, such property shall be delivered forthwith to the
director, the director's authorized representative, or self-insurer
upon demand. If the party served and named in the notice and order
fails to answer the notice and order within the time prescribed in this
section, the court may, after the time to answer such order has
expired, render judgment by default against the party named in the
notice for the full amount, plus costs, claimed by the director,
director's designee, or self-insurer in the notice. In the event that
a notice to withhold and deliver is served upon an employer and the
property found to be subject thereto is wages, the employer may assert
in the answer all exemptions provided for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which
the wage earner may be entitled.
This subsection shall only apply to orders assessing an overpayment
which are issued on or after July 28, 1991: PROVIDED, That this
subsection shall apply retroactively to all orders assessing an
overpayment resulting from fraud, civil or criminal.
(7) Orders assessing an overpayment which are issued on or after
July 28, 1991, shall include a conspicuous notice of the collection
methods available to the department or self-insurer.

Sec. 8 RCW 51.52.050 and 1987 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever the department has made any order, decision, or award, it
shall promptly serve the worker, beneficiary, employer, or other person
affected thereby, with a copy thereof by mail, which shall be addressed
to such person at his or her last known address as shown by the records
of the department. The copy, in case the same is a final order,
decision, or award, shall bear on the same side of the same page on
which is found the amount of the award, a statement, set in black faced
type of at least ten point body or size, that such final order,
decision, or award shall become final within sixty days from the date
the order is communicated to the parties unless a written request for
reconsideration is filed with the department of labor and industries,
Olympia, or an appeal is filed with the board of industrial insurance
appeals, Olympia: PROVIDED, That a department order or decision making
demand, whether with or without penalty, for repayment of sums paid to
a provider of medical, dental, vocational, or other health services
rendered to an industrially injured worker, shall state that such order
or decision shall become final within twenty days from the date the
order or decision is communicated to the parties unless a written
request for reconsideration is filed with the department of labor and
industries, Olympia, or an appeal is filed with the board of industrial
insurance appeals, Olympia.
Whenever the department has taken any action or made any decision
relating to any phase of the administration of this title the worker,
beneficiary, employer, or other person aggrieved thereby may request
reconsideration of the department, or may appeal to the board. In an
appeal before the board, the appellant shall have the burden of
proceeding with the evidence to establish a prima facie case for the
relief sought in such appeal: PROVIDED, That in an appeal from an
order of the department that alleges ((fraud)) willful
misrepresentation, the department or self-insured employer shall
initially introduce all evidence in its case in chief. Any such person
aggrieved by the decision and order of the board may thereafter appeal
to the superior court, as prescribed in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 7 of this act applies to willful
misrepresentation determinations issued on or after July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The department shall adopt rules to
implement this act.

--- END ---