BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
A person shall not raise or lower the height of a motor vehicle by
mechanical means while the motor vehicle is moving on a highway at a
speed in excess of fifteen miles per hour.

--- END ---