BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the Boy
Scouts Protection Act of 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature recognizes that the Boy
Scouts of America and other private organizations have constitutionally
protected rights of freedom of speech and religion under both the
United States Constitution and the Washington state Constitution.
Implicit in the right to freely engage in these activities as protected
by the federal and state constitutions is a corresponding right to
associate with others in pursuit of a wide variety of political,
religious, social, economic, educational, and cultural ends.
This right is crucial in preventing the majority from imposing its
views on groups that prefer to express other, perhaps unpopular, ideas.
Thus, the protection of the right to expressive association is
especially important in preserving political and cultural diversity and
in shielding dissident expression from suppression by the majority.
Government actions that may unconstitutionally burden this freedom
may take many forms, one of which is discrimination against private
entities by government through the use of public policies designed to
force such entities to accept memberships or associations they do not
desire or, in the alternative, forfeit opportunities for obtaining
various government benefits generally available to the public at large.
Forcing private entities to accept certain memberships or associations
in order to enjoy public benefits shared by others unduly impairs and
impermissibly burdens the ability of such entities to express the
views, and only those views, they intend to express. Thus, the freedom
of association plainly presupposes a freedom not to associate.
The legislature finds, therefore, that private entities have a
constitutionally protected right to establish their own particular
values, standards, or criteria for determining membership or
association and that government shall not discriminate against private
entities as a result of policies such entities may adopt or pursue that
qualify membership in or association with the entity based on the
sexual preference or orientation of any person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The state of Washington, and its political subdivisions, including
counties, cities, towns, school districts, and institutions of higher
education, and any agency or officer thereof, shall not enact or
enforce any policy that discriminates, directly or indirectly, against
any private entity in contracting with public entities, receiving
public funds, obtaining access to public facilities, participating in
public programs, or receiving any other public benefit, privilege,
advantage, opportunity, or entitlement based, in whole or in part, on
any policy, purpose, or practice of the entity to exclude, limit, or
qualify membership in or association with the entity because of the
sexual preference or orientation of any person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The provisions of this act are to be
liberally construed to effectuate the policies and purposes of this
act. In the event of conflict between this act and any other provision
of state law, the provisions of this act shall govern.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

--- END ---