BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Approved course" is any classroom or field study or activity
that meets the intent of this chapter and has been evaluated and
approved by the department and assigned a credit value.
(2) "Board" means the advisory board established in section 6 of
this act.
(3) "Compliance period" means the time between the issuance of a
license and the renewal of the license or the time between renewals of
the license.
(4) "Continuing education provider" is an organization or an
individual that is approved by the department to provide continuing
education classes and/or opportunities to licensed pump installers and
trainees.
(5) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries.
(7) "License" means a domestic pump installer or commercial pump
installer license.
(8) "Verification of completion statement" is any written document
or certificate signed by the provider and identifying the licensee as
the one who has completed the approved course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) All conductors and equipment, and
installations thereof, that convey electric current, installations of
equipment to be operated by electric current, and pumps, pipes, and
pipe fittings that convey water or wastewater, as applied to the scope
of work covered within this chapter shall be in strict conformity with
this chapter, and the rules issued by the department, and shall be in
conformity with approved methods of construction for safety to life and
property. Compliance with the regulations and articles in the national
electrical code, the national electrical safety code, uniform plumbing
code, and plumbing code standards published by the international
association of plumbing and mechanical officials, and other
installation and safety regulations approved by the national fire
protection association, as modified or supplemented by rules issued by
the department in furtherance of safety to life and property
demonstrates prima facie evidence of the approved methods of
construction. All materials, devices, appliances, and equipment used
in such installations shall be of a type that conforms to applicable
standards or be indicated as acceptable by the established standards of
any product testing laboratory that is accredited by the department.
Industrial control panels, utilization equipment, and their components
do not need to be listed, labeled, or otherwise indicated as acceptable
by an accredited electrical product testing laboratory unless
specifically required by the national electrical code.
(2) Nothing in this chapter may be construed as permitting the
connection of any conductor of any electric circuit with a pipe that is
connected with or designed to be connected with a waterworks piping
system, without the consent of the person or persons legally
responsible for the operation and maintenance of the waterworks piping
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Before January 1st of each year, the
director shall obtain an authentic copy of the national electrical code
and the uniform plumbing code, latest editions. The department, after
consulting with the board and receiving the board's recommendations,
shall adopt reasonable rules in furtherance of safety to life and
property. All rules shall be kept on file by the department.
Compliance with the rules shall be prima facie evidence of compliance
with this chapter. The department upon request shall deliver a copy of
the rules to all persons, firms, partnerships, corporations, or other
entities licensed under this chapter.
(2) The department shall also obtain and keep on file an authentic
copy of any applicable regulations and standards of any electrical
product testing laboratory that is accredited by the department
prescribing rules, regulations, and standards for electrical materials,
devices, appliances, and equipment, including any modifications and
changes that have been made during the previous year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) It is unlawful for any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity to engage in, offer to engage
in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing, repairing, or
replacing pumps, pitless adapters, pressure and storage tanks,
filtration equipment, electric controls, conductors, service
disconnect, telemetry, auxiliary components, and plumbing or pipe
fitting of water or wastewater systems without having an unrevoked,
unsuspended, and unexpired domestic pump installer or commercial pump
installer license, issued by the department in accordance with this
chapter. No contractor may employ a person to engage in, or offer to
engage in, the trade of pump installation unless the person employed
has a domestic or commercial pump installer license or trainee license.
This section does not apply to a contractor who is contracting for work
on his or her own residence. This license is required regardless of
whether the work is performed on a temporary or permanent system, but
does not apply to pumps used solely for well testing and powered by a
portable generating plant.
(2) No contractor may advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or
perform any work under this chapter without being registered as a
contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW.
(3) A license will be issued for one of the two following
categories:
(a) Domestic pump installer.
(i) A domestic pump installer license is limited to the
installation, repair, or replacement of pumps, pitless adapters, water
filtration or treatment equipment, electrical controls, conductors and
telemetry, auxiliary components, and plumbing or pipefitting of water
and wastewater systems. A domestic pump installation is limited to the
installation that serves one domestic residence, a group domestic
system that serves fourteen residences or less, or a business that has
twenty-five or fewer full-time employees. The scope of work includes
all work required for complete and operational installation or repair
of pumps or pump stations, effluent or lift pumps, conveyance systems,
ground source heat pump loops, and irrigation pumps. The electrical
work is limited to the extension of a branch circuit that is supplied
and installed by others and is not to exceed ten horsepower.
(ii) Except as provided in section 5 of this act, a domestic pump
installer license will be issued to an applicant who has worked as a
trainee, under the direction and supervision of a licensed domestic or
commercial pump installer, for two thousand hours and has passed a
competency examination. After working seven hundred twenty hours, and
passing the competency examination, the trainee may be issued a trainee
card that will allow him or her to work fifty percent of his or her
hours without the direct supervision of a licensed domestic or
commercial pump installer. After the trainee has worked two thousand
hours he or she will be issued a license. Proof of hours may be, but
is not limited to, time cards, paystubs, or a signed affidavit from a
current or past employer or employers.
(b) Commercial pump installer.
(i) A commercial pump installer license is limited to the
installation, repair, or replacement of pumps, pitless adapters, water
filtration or treatment equipment, electrical controls, conductors and
telemetry, auxiliary components, and plumbing or pipefitting of water
and wastewater systems. A commercial pump installation is not limited
as to the size or type of the installation or the size of the
equipment, components, voltage, or horsepower, but is defined by the
scope of the work being performed. The scope of work includes all work
required for the complete and operational installation or repair of
pumps or pump stations, effluent or lift pumps, conveyance systems,
ground source heat pump loops, and irrigation pumps.
(ii) Except as provided in section 5 of this act, a commercial pump
installation license will be issued to an applicant who has worked as
a trainee, under the direction and supervision of a licensed commercial
pump installer, for four thousand hours and has passed a competency
examination. After working two thousand hours, the trainee will be
issued a trainee card that will allow him or her to work fifty percent
of his or her hours without the direct supervision of a licensed
commercial pump installer. After the trainee has worked four thousand
hours, he or she will be issued a license. Proof of hours may be, but
is not limited to, time cards, paystubs, or a signed affidavit from a
current or past employer or employers.
(4) Licenses expire on the second anniversary of the licensee's
birthdate following the issuance of the license. A licensee may renew
his or her license on or before the expiration date by submitting a
complete application, paying the fee, and submitting proof of obtaining
the required continuing education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) On the effective date of this act,
licenses will be issued to all applicants who can provide convincing
evidence that they have at least two years' experience as a pump
installer. Evidence will include, but is not limited to, invoicing for
jobs performed, completed contracts for work performed, and employee
records.
(2) Applicants have twelve months after the effective date of this
act to apply for a license under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) An advisory board is established. The
board consists of the following and their alternates: The director or
the director's designee, who will serve as chair of the board; one
licensed domestic pump installer; one licensed commercial pump
installer; two licensed pump contractors; and one licensed water well
operator. The director will appoint the pump installer members and
their alternates. The Washington state ground water association will
appoint the pump contractors and water well operator members and their
alternates. Terms for the appointees are for four years unless the
appointee voluntarily gives up his or her position or the director
removes the appointee for due cause. Due cause includes, but is not
limited to, absence from three consecutive regular scheduled meetings,
disregard for the orderly proceedings of the board, or dishonest
activities within the attendance of the board. At the first meeting of
the board lots will be drawn to determine the terms of the first
members and alternates. Two members and alternates will have four-year
terms; two members and alternates will have three-year terms; and one
member and alternate will have a two-year term.
(2) The board must meet quarterly, but may meet more often to
accomplish board business. Alternates do not have a vote unless they
are filling in for a board member. The chair is a nonvoting member,
however, the chair may vote to break a tie in the board.
(3) The board must carry out all the functions and duties specified
in this chapter. The board must also assist the department in the
development and revision of rules, the preparation and revision of
competency examinations, and the administration of the continuing
education program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department may revoke or suspend a
license for any of the following:
(a) The license was obtained through error or fraud;
(b) The licensee is judged to be incompetent to carry on the trade
of pump installation; or
(c) The licensee has violated any provision of this chapter or any
rule adopted under this chapter.
(2) The department may deny an application for a license for up to
two years if the applicant's previous license has been revoked.
(3) Before a license is revoked or suspended, the department shall
send written notice of infraction by registered mail with return
receipt requested to the licensee's last known address. The notice
must list the allegations against the licensee and give him or her the
opportunity to refute the allegations and request a hearing before the
board. At the hearing, the department and the licensee may produce
witnesses and give testimony. The hearing must be conducted in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall render its decision
based upon the testimony and evidence presented and will notify the
parties within ten days of the hearing. At least five board members or
their alternates and the chair must be in attendance for the board to
hear testimony on license actions. Decisions will be based on a vote
of the board.
(4) The department may deny renewal of a license issued under this
chapter if the applicant owes outstanding penalties for a final
judgment under this chapter. The department shall notify the applicant
of the denial by registered mail, return receipt requested, to the
address on the application. The applicant may appeal the denial within
twenty days by filing a notice of appeal with the department
accompanied by two hundred dollars, which shall be returned to the
applicant if the decision of the department is not upheld by the
hearings officer. The office of administrative hearings shall conduct
the hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW. If the hearings officer sustains
the decision of the department, the fee must be applied to the cost of
the hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department, in consultation with the
board, may adopt rules to carry out this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The department, in consultation with the
board, shall prepare a written competency examination to be
administered to applicants for domestic pump installer licenses,
commercial pump installer licenses, and trainee licenses. The
examination shall be constructed to determine:
(a) Whether the applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the
technical information and practical procedures that are identified with
the trade of domestic pump installer and commercial pump installer; and
(b) Whether the applicant is familiar with the applicable plumbing,
electrical, and well construction codes and the administrative rules of
the department and the department of ecology pertaining to pump
installation.
(2) The department shall administer the examination to eligible
persons. All applicants shall, before taking the examination, pay a
fee to the department.
(3) The department shall certify the results of the examination,
and shall notify the applicant in writing whether he or she has passed
or failed. Any applicant who has failed the examination may retake the
examination, upon the terms and after a period of time that the
director sets in rule. The director may not limit the number of times
that a person may take the examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Licensees shall complete, during their
compliance period, the continuing education requirement as determined
by the department, in consultation with the board. Continuing
education units will be on the subjects of pump installation, testing,
theory, operation, maintenance, pump equipment, tools, safety,
installation methods, administrative rules, and electrical and plumbing
codes as applied to pump installation. Continuing education units may
include other subjects that apply to the pump installation industry as
established in rule. Every licensed pump installer shall obtain the
required continuing education units during his or her compliance period
and submit to the department verification of completion statements from
approved providers.
(2) Any organization or individual may apply to the department to
become an approved continuing education provider. Continuing education
providers will be organizations or individuals with a history of
providing continuing education courses that have complied with the
requirements for course approval under this section and the rules
adopted by the department. Any individual or organization that desires
to become an approved provider but does not have a history of providing
continuing education courses, must submit a comprehensive plan to the
department for approval. The department will, in consultation with the
board, develop rules identifying elements of the comprehensive plan and
approval criteria. An approved continuing education provider must, at
a minimum, develop and implement methods to evaluate its course
offerings to determine their effectiveness and the extent to which they
meet the needs of licensed pump installers. The continuing education
provider must provide, upon request from the department, course
evaluations from attendees. The continuing education provider will
obtain course approval and credit value before offering the course to
licensees for approval. The continuing education provider will present
courses consistent with the standards set forth in this section and
rules adopted by the department and make the course available to all
licensed pump installers and trainees at locations logistically chosen
to facilitate the attendance of licensees throughout the state. The
department, in consultation with the board, will establish in rule the
procedure for approval of providers and for sanctions including
revocation of approval.
(3) The department, in consultation with the board, will adopt in
rule methods to approve courses and establish course credit for
continuing education units and the amount of continuing education units
required by licensees. To be approved for credit, a continuing
education course must be of intellectual or practical content,
contribute directly to the pump installation industry, promote
professional competence or skills, or contribute to licensees'
education with respect to their professional or ethical obligations.
If a course does not bear entirely on the general requirements for
continuing education or the ground water or well construction industry,
or if the method of presenting the course is below minimum standards,
the department may assign partial credit. Courses must be presented in
a suitable setting devoted to the educational activity of the program.
The department may approve alternate course curriculum to accommodate
the needs of the handicapped, incapacitated, or a licensee who may be
out of state for the majority of his or her compliance period. Video,
motion picture, or audiotape presentations may be used if a presenter
is in attendance at all presentations to comment and answer questions.
The course must be opened to all licensed operators and trainees. The
department will make available to all interested parties, upon request,
a list of all approved continuing education providers and courses. The
department will, in consultation with the board, adopt in rule
procedures that will allow providers to obtain prior approval of
continuing education courses or which may allow providers to obtain
postpresentation approval of continuing education courses. The
department may, in consultation with the board, establish in rule other
requirements for course approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Nothing in this chapter requires that
a person obtain a license or be a licensed pump installer in order to
do pump installation work at his or her residence, farm, place of
business, or on other property owned by him or her.
(2) A current pump installer license or trainee license is not
required for:
(a) Electrical work by certified journeyman electricians, or
electrical trainees working for an electrical contractor and performing
work covered within the scope of their license; or
(b) Plumbing work by certified journeyman plumbers, or plumbing
trainees performing work covered within the scope of their license.
(3) Nothing in this chapter eliminates the requirements of a valid
pump installing code, plumbing code, or electrical code enacted by a
political subdivision of the state. However, no code may require the
licensee to demonstrate additional proof of competency or obtain any
other license or pay a fee to engage in the trade of pump installing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The department must charge fees for
issuance, renewal, and reinstatement of all licenses, permits, and
examinations required by this chapter. The department must set the
fees in rule.
(2) The fees must cover the full cost of issuing the certificates
and permits, devising and administering the examinations, and
administering and enforcing this chapter. The costs shall include
travel, per diem, and administrative support costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 An authorized representative of the
department may investigate alleged or apparent violations of this
chapter. An authorized representative of the department upon
presentation of credentials may inspect sites at which a person is
doing pump installation work to determine if that person has a license
issued by the department in accordance with this chapter or is
supervised by a person who has such a license. Upon request of the
authorized representative of the department, a person doing pump
installation work must produce evidence that the person has a license
issued by the department in accordance with this chapter or is
supervised by a person who has such a license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) An authorized representative of the
department may issue a notice of infraction as specified in section 7
of this act if:
(a) A person who is doing pump installation work or who is offering
to do pump installation work fails to produce evidence of:
(i) Having a license issued by the department in accordance with
this chapter, or being supervised by a person who has such a license;
and
(ii) Being registered as a contractor as required under chapter
18.27 RCW or this chapter, or being employed by a person who is
registered as a contractor; or
(b) A person who employs anyone, or offers or advertises to employ
anyone, to do pump installation work fails to produce evidence of being
registered as a contractor as required under chapter 18.27 RCW or this
chapter.
(2) A notice of infraction issued under this section must be
personally served on the person named in the notice by an authorized
representative of the department or sent by certified mail to the last
known address provided to the department of the person named in the
notice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The form of the notice of infraction issued
under this chapter must include the following statements:
(1) The notice represents a determination that the infraction has
been committed by the person named in the notice and the determination
is final unless contested as provided in this chapter;
(2) The infraction is a noncriminal offense for which imprisonment
will not be imposed as a sanction;
(3) The specific infraction for which the notice was issued;
(4) The monetary penalty that has been established for the
infraction;
(5) The options provided in this chapter for responding to the
notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these options;
(6) At any hearing to contest the determination the state has the
burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the
infraction was committed. The person may subpoena witnesses, including
the authorized representative of the department who issued and served
the notice of infraction;
(7) An acknowledgment form, to be signed by the person, in which
the person promises to respond to the notice of infraction in one of
the ways provided in this chapter; and
(8) Refusal to sign the infraction as directed in subsection (7) of
this section is punishable as a misdemeanor under RCW 9.92.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A violation designated as an infraction
under this chapter shall be heard and determined by an administrative
law judge of the office of administrative hearings. If a party desires
to contest the notice of infraction, the party shall file a notice of
appeal with the department within twenty days of issuance of the
infraction. The administrative law judge shall conduct hearings in
these cases at locations in the county where the infraction is alleged
to have occurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Unless contested in accordance with this
chapter, the notice of infraction represents a determination that the
person to whom the notice was issued committed the infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) A person who receives a notice of
infraction shall respond to the notice as provided in this section
within fourteen days of the date the notice was served.
(2) If the person named in the notice of infraction does not wish
to contest the notice of infraction, the person shall pay to the
department, by check or money order, the amount of the penalty
prescribed for the infraction. When a response that does not contest
the determination is received by the department with the appropriate
payment, the department shall make the appropriate entry in its
records.
(3) If the person named in the notice of infraction wishes to
appeal the notice of infraction, the person shall respond by filing an
answer of protest, requesting a hearing, with the department specifying
the grounds of protest.
(4) The administrative law judge shall enter an appropriate order
assessing the monetary penalty prescribed for the infraction and shall
notify the department of the failure to respond to the notice of
infraction or to appear at a requested hearing, if any person issued a
notice of infraction:
(a) Fails to respond to the notice of infraction as provided in
subsection (2) of this section; or
(b) Fails to appear at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 It is a misdemeanor for any person who has
been personally served with a notice of infraction:
(1) To refuse to sign a written promise to respond to the notice;
or
(2) To willfully violate the written promise to respond to a notice
of infraction as provided in this chapter, regardless of the ultimate
disposition of the infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A person subject to proceedings under this
chapter may appear or be represented by counsel. The department shall
be represented by the attorney general in any proceeding under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 (1) The administrative law judge shall
conduct notice of infraction cases under this chapter pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The burden of proof is on the department to establish the
commission of the infraction by a preponderance of the evidence. The
notice of infraction shall be dismissed if the appellant establishes
that, at the time the notice was issued:
(a) The appellant had a certificate or permit issued by the
department in accordance with this chapter, was supervised by a person
who has such a certificate or permit, or was exempt from this chapter
under section 11 of this act; or
(b) The person employed or supervised by the appellant has a
certificate or permit issued by the department in accordance with this
chapter, was supervised by a person who had such a certificate or
permit, was exempt from this chapter under section 11 of this act, or
was registered as a contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW.
(3) After consideration of the evidence and argument, the
administrative law judge shall determine whether the infraction was
committed. If it has not been established that the infraction was
committed, an order dismissing the notice shall be entered in the
record of the proceeding. If it has been established that the
infraction was committed, the administrative law judge shall issue
findings of fact and conclusions of law in its decision and order
determining whether the infraction was committed.
(4) An appeal from the administrative law judge's determination or
order shall be to the superior court. The decision of the superior
court is subject only to discretionary review pursuant to rule 2.3 of
the rules of appellate procedure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 (1) A person found to have committed an
infraction under this chapter shall be assessed a monetary penalty.
The department shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for
infractions imposed under this chapter.
(2) The administrative law judge may waive, reduce, or suspend the
monetary penalty imposed for the infraction for good cause shown.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 (1) Contractors shall accurately verify and
attest to the trainee hours worked by pump installer trainees on behalf
of the contractor and that all training hours were under the
supervision of a licensed pump installer and within the proper ratio,
and shall provide the supervising pump installers' names and license
numbers. However, contractors are not required to identify which hours
a trainee works with a specific licensed pump installer.
(2) The department may audit the records of a contractor that has
verified the hours of experience submitted by a pump installer trainee
to the department under this chapter in the following circumstances:
Excessive hours were reported; hours were reported outside the normal
course of the contractor's business; or for other similar circumstances
in which the department demonstrates a likelihood of excessive or
improper hours being reported. The department shall limit the audit to
records necessary to verify hours for the trainee in question. The
department shall adopt rules implementing audit procedures.
Information obtained from a contractor under this section is
confidential pursuant to section 24 of this act.
(3) Violation of this section by a contractor is an infraction
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
Information obtained from a contractor under section 23 of this act
is exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Sections 1 through 23 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---