BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
No cause of action shall be maintained for civil damages in any
court of this state against any radio or television broadcasting
station or cable television system, or the employees, officers,
directors, managers, or agents of the radio or television broadcasting
station or cable television system, based on the broadcast of
information including, but not limited to, the name or description of
an abducted child, the name or description of a suspected abductor, and
the circumstances of an abduction supplied by law enforcement officials
pursuant to the voluntary broadcast notification system commonly known
as the "Amber alert," or as the same system may otherwise be known in
this state, which is used to notify the public of missing or abducted
children. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or
restrict in any way any immunity or privilege a radio or television
broadcasting station or cable television system may have under statute
or common law for broadcasting or otherwise disseminating information.

--- END ---