BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.10 RCW
to read as follows:
LEGISLATIVE INTENT--TRANSPORTATION PROJECT FUNDING MUST REDUCE
TRAFFIC CONGESTION AND IMPROVE MOBILITY. Traffic congestion costs
Washington billions of dollars and thousands of jobs and is a drain on
our state economy. Since 1990, growth in vehicle travel far exceeded
new construction of lanes of freeways and arterial roads. Projects
constructed in Washington have generally exceeded costs of comparable
construction in the rest of the country. The Puget Sound region is
among the worst in the United States measured by delay per driver, fuel
consumed per person, and annual congestion cost per person. This
congestion continues to worsen with serious economic effects reducing
economic development, hurting businesses, and costing jobs. Applying
up to twenty percent of existing revenues to complete priority projects
will reduce traffic delay to significantly below today's level, and
substantially improve Washington's economic climate. Long-term
implementation of this Traffic Congestion Relief Act will make such
improvements possible statewide. In order to create jobs and economic
growth, it is necessary to act to reduce traffic delay by requiring
dedication of up to twenty percent of some existing funds as provided
in this act to construct the most cost-effective projects. The
legislature directs that the provisions of this act be implemented
without impact on education funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.10 RCW
to read as follows:
CRITERIA FOR HIGHWAY PROJECT FUNDING AND CONSTRUCTION--STATE AND
REGIONAL EFFORTS. (1) The department of transportation, a county, a
regional transportation investment district, or other entity proposing
to construct freeways or principal arterial projects defined as
highways of statewide significance over ten million dollars shall first
conduct a traffic congestion relief analysis of the proposed project.
This analysis must include the cost-effectiveness of reducing
congestion through road construction.
(2) Expenditures from the traffic congestion relief account created
by section 8 of this act may be made only for freeway and principal
arterial improvements certified after the traffic congestion relief
analysis shows those improvements to be the best in the state or in
each region of the state, as specified in subsection (4) of this
section. The analysis by the department or entity set forth in
subsection (3) of this section must:
(a) Be based on commonly accepted transportation planning
procedures;
(b) Recognize regionally adopted population and employment
projections;
(c) Estimate current afternoon/evening peak period vehicle-hours of
delay for the project area or corridor;
(d) Estimate projected afternoon/evening peak vehicle-hours of
delay for the project area or corridor for the tenth year in the future
without project improvements;
(e) Estimate projected afternoon/evening peak vehicle-hours of
delay for the project area or corridor for the tenth year in the future
with the project completed and in operation; and
(f) Prepare an estimated present-value capital cost of the project.
(3) The calculated savings in vehicle-delay hours per million
dollars of capital investment becomes the traffic congestion relief
score. The score establishes priority ranking for projects that must
be funded in descending order of delay reduction per million dollars of
capital investment.
(4) No more than sixty percent of the funds dedicated through
section 8 of this act may be committed for projects in any three-county
area.
(5) In any region of the state, established under RCW 47.01.101, at
least one project with the highest traffic congestion relief rating
after analysis under subsections (2) and (3) of this section may be
funded and constructed in each biennium. For purposes of this section,
the Northwest and Olympic regions will be redefined to exclude King,
Pierce, and Snohomish counties. A single county or other cooperative
operating agency formed between counties or counties and cities under
chapter 39.34 RCW may apply for and receive an appropriation of traffic
congestion relief funds to construct the projects. A regional
transportation investment district created under chapter 36.120 RCW may
apply for and receive matching funds for such projects on a one-to-one
basis.
(6) The minimum threshold for a project qualifying for funding from
the traffic congestion relief account is a projected fifteen-year
corridor level-of-service (LOS) decline of "E" or worse. If in any
region no projects meet this minimum threshold, then one
safety-related, major-maintenance-related, or congestion relief project
from that region may qualify for funding. The project so selected must
be the one with the highest congestion benefit/cost ratio.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION REQUIRED TO IMPLEMENT. (1) The
department shall designate an office or division of dedicated staff and
services whose primary responsibility is the analysis, design,
permitting, and construction of transportation projects and conversion
of existing high-occupancy vehicle lanes to general purpose lanes,
which will reduce traffic congestion as determined to be necessary and
appropriate as provided in section 2 of this act and in this section.
(2) As an immediate action, all high-occupancy vehicle lanes will
be opened for off-peak and weekend hours and each lane analyzed for
capacity to reduce traffic congestion through conversion to general
purpose vehicle lanes. Each lane must be immediately converted to a
general purpose lane unless peak period congestion is not reduced by
opening a high-occupancy vehicle lane to general purpose traffic.
Future high-occupancy vehicle lanes may be implemented only if that
projected use would carry more person-trips than would a general
purpose lane in its place. In performing this analysis, the average
car occupancy (ACO) of vehicles using the high-occupancy vehicle lane
must be assumed to be constant when converted to a general purpose
lane. This section does not affect RCW 46.44.080, 46.61.110, or
46.61.135 as relates to truck traffic.
(3) All of the powers granted the department under this title
relating to highway construction must be used to implement this act and
to construct, convert, or aid and facilitate these traffic congestion
relief projects, including those projects proposed by counties,
cooperative operating agencies, or regional transportation investment
districts if meeting the criteria in section 2 of this act.
(4) At the request of a county, cooperative operating agency, or
regional transportation investment district, the department shall
perform the traffic congestion relief analysis specified in section 2
of this act for each proposed project and report the results within six
months to the requesting entity and to the legislature.
(5) In an application for federal funding made by or through the
department, each project costing over ten million dollars must be
analyzed for traffic congestion relief cost-effectiveness and the
results, and a cumulative summary of all state projects, submitted with
any report of the proposal to federal agencies and to the United States
Congress. The department shall prioritize these projects and seek
maximum federal funding to implement this act and match the funds
dedicated by this act to traffic congestion reduction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.06 RCW
to read as follows:
COST CONTROLS AND WAIVER OF SALES AND USE TAXES ON TRAFFIC
CONGESTION RELIEF PROJECTS. Capital costs of major roadway projects of
the department have exceeded national costs. To be eligible for
funding under this act, project costs must be controlled to meet the
following requirements:
(1) Added lane-mile costs must be no more than fifty percent above
prevailing national costs for roads of a similar type and in locations
of comparable density by location (central city, urban, suburban,
exurb, and rural);
(2) Prevailing national costs must be determined from average lane-mile costs by roadway type and location type provided by the federal
highway administration or United States congressional committee
reports. If these are unavailable, prevailing national costs may be
calculated from the most recently completed or projects contracted and
under construction in a sample of at least ten comparison states,
including states subject to significant seismic design requirements and
states with variable terrain. The comparison states must be
geographically distributed around the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The taxes levied by RCW 82.08.020 do not apply to materials and
labor used in the construction or maintenance of publicly owned roads,
streets, and highways where funded by this act and meeting the traffic
congestion relief criteria in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The taxes levied by RCW 82.12.020 do not apply to materials and
labor used in the construction or maintenance of publicly owned roads,
streets, and highways where funded by this act and meeting the traffic
congestion relief criteria in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
ACCOUNTABILITY AND PERFORMANCE AUDITS. (1) The state auditor shall
conduct a performance audit of any constructing agency, including the
department of transportation, and any county, regional transportation
investment district, or other public agency that has constructed
traffic congestion relief funded projects costing in excess of ten
million dollars. The funds from sections 8 and 9 of this act must be
used for the cost of the audit. The first audit report for each agency
must be submitted to the legislature and made available to the public
on or before December 31, 2005. Subsequent performance audits must be
conducted by the state auditor and made available at least one year
after the completion of any project or payment of over ninety percent
of contracted costs for any project. For counties and cities, this
audit may be conducted as part of audits otherwise required by state
law.
(2) The state auditor shall also conduct a performance audit of the
department of transportation administration and support of the traffic
congestion relief program at least each fiscal biennium. Each audit
must also include a summary and comparison of all highway and road
construction under other funding sources of the department analyzed
under the criteria set forth in section 2 of this act in order to allow
comparison of the congestion relief effectiveness per million dollars
spent of all department of transportation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
TRAFFIC CONGESTION RELIEF ACCOUNT CREATED. (1) The traffic
congestion relief account is created in the motor vehicle fund. Money
in the account may be appropriated and spent in accordance with this
act. Expenditures from the account must be used only for projects or
improvements identified as traffic congestion relief projects and to
pay the principal and interest on the bonds authorized for traffic
congestion relief projects or improvements.
(2) That portion of fuel tax, weight fees, and sales and use tax
specified in section 11 of this act must be immediately transferred to
the traffic congestion relief account.
(3) The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by sections 9
and 10 of this act must also be deposited in the traffic congestion
relief account of the motor vehicle fund. The proceeds are available
only for the purposes enumerated in this act and for the payment of
anticipation notes, if any, and for the payment of bond issuance costs,
including the costs of underwriting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 47.10 RCW
to read as follows:
TRAFFIC CONGESTION RELIEF BONDS AUTHORIZED. In order to provide
funds necessary for the immediate design and construction of selected
traffic congestion relief highway and road projects under this act,
there shall be issued and sold a total of ten billion dollars of
general obligation bonds of the state of Washington, which must be
appropriated in accordance with this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 47.10 RCW
to read as follows:
As the bonds authorized by section 9 of this act are repaid, new
bonds may be issued to the maximum of ten billion dollars as set forth
in section 9 of this act, and the moneys appropriated to construct
additional projects statewide that meet the traffic congestion relief
criteria specified in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
FUNDING FOR BOND PAYMENTS--TAXES AND FEES DEDICATED. (1) The
following taxes, fees, and tolls are transferred and dedicated to the
traffic congestion relief account to directly fund projects or to be
applied to the repayment of bonds sold to fund the traffic congestion
relief projects authorized by this act:
(a) Beginning January 1, 2005, 5.6 cents per gallon of the motor
fuel tax rate applied by RCW 82.36.025 to the sale, distribution, or
use of motor vehicle fuel will be transferred to the traffic congestion
relief account;
(b) Beginning January 1, 2005, the proceeds of the tax rate of 5.6
cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet of
compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and temperature
imposed on special fuel users by RCW 82.38.030 will be transferred to
the traffic congestion relief account;
(c) Beginning January 1, 2005, that portion of sales and use tax on
motor vehicles specified in RCW 82.08.020 and 82.12.020 of up to two
percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or two
percent of the value of the motor vehicle used, in the case of a use
tax, upon the occurrence of any taxable event will be transferred to
the traffic congestion relief account;
(d) Beginning January 1, 2005, twenty percent of the license fees
for motor buses and other trucks and tractor vehicles based on gross
weight imposed by RCW 46.16.070 will be transferred to the traffic
congestion relief account.
(2) Revenues from the taxes and fees specified in subsection (1) of
this section may be used only to implement the traffic congestion
relief projects as set forth in this act, including audits required by
section 7 of this act. The department shall contract with the state
department of revenue or other appropriate entities for administration
and collection of the taxes or fees authorized in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
DISTRIBUTIONS TO CITIES AND COUNTIES UNAFFECTED. The funds
credited and distributed to cities and counties under RCW 46.68.090
through 46.68.120 and 35.76.050 and to the transportation improvement
board under chapter 47.26 RCW are not affected by the provisions of
this act, and those payments must continue as otherwise provided by
law. However, each such entity shall apply twenty percent of those
funds in accordance with section 2 of this act emphasizing improvement
to principal arterial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 GAS AND VEHICLE TAXES AND WEIGHT FEES NOT
TO BE RAISED. Existing statewide motor vehicle fuel and special fuel
taxes, at the distribution rates in effect on January 1, 2004, and
sales and use taxes on vehicles are not to be raised or altered by this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 47.10 RCW
to read as follows:
TRAFFIC CONGESTION RELIEF BOND FUNDS. Bond issues under the
authority of sections 9 and 10 of this act must distinctly state that
they are a general obligation of the state of Washington, pledge the
full faith and credit of the state to the payment of the principal
thereof and the interest thereon, and contain an unconditional promise
to pay the principal and interest as they become due. The principal
and interest on the bonds are first payable from the portion of the
state excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and vehicle
weight fees and from the sales and use taxes transferred by section 11
of this act. Proceeds of these taxes transferred by section 11 of this
act are pledged to the payment of any bonds and the interest on them.
The state agrees to continue to impose these excise taxes, vehicle
weight fees, and sales and use taxes in amounts sufficient to pay, when
due, the principal and interest on all bonds issued under the authority
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 47.10 RCW
to read as follows:
Both principal and interest on the bonds issued for the purposes of
section 9 of this act are payable from the traffic congestion relief
funds. The state finance committee may provide that a special account
be created to facilitate payment of the principal and interest of these
bonds. The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount required for
principal and interest on the bonds in accordance with the bond
proceedings. The state treasurer shall withdraw revenues from the
traffic congestion relief account in the motor vehicle fund and deposit
in the highway bond retirement fund, or a special account, such
amounts, and at such times, as are required by the bond proceedings.
Any funds required for bond retirement or interest on the bonds
authorized by sections 9 and 10 of this act must be taken from the
traffic congestion relief account in the motor vehicle fund. Funds
required do not constitute a charge against any other allocations of
motor vehicle fuel and special fuel tax revenues to the state,
counties, cities, and towns unless the amounts arising from excise
taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels distributed to the state in
the traffic congestion relief account proves insufficient to meet the
requirements for bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.

Sec. 16 RCW 36.120.160 and 2002 c 56 s 116 are each amended to
read as follows:
OWNERSHIP OF IMPROVEMENTS. Any improvement to a state highway or
road facility constructed under this chapter becomes and remains the
property of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 47.05 RCW
to read as follows:
NONAPPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter does not apply to the
projects authorized under sections 1 through 15 of this act or to the
process set forth therein for authorization and funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 LIBERAL CONSTRUCTION. The provisions of
this act are to be liberally construed to effectuate the policies and
purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected. If the provisions
transferring taxing is held to impair any bond or other contract in
existence at the time the act becomes effective, the provisions shall
be applied prospectively and to all other persons and circumstances.

--- END ---