BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Claim" means a demand for payment of a loss caused by medical
malpractice.
(a) Two or more claims arising out of a single injury or incident
of medical malpractice is one claim.
(b) A series of related incidents of medical malpractice is one
claim.
(2) "Claimant" means a person filing a claim against a health care
provider or health care facility.
(3) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner.
(4) "Health care facility" or "facility" means a clinic, diagnostic
center, hospital, laboratory, mental health center, nursing home,
office, surgical facility, treatment facility, or similar place where
a health care provider provides health care to patients.
(5) "Health care provider" or "provider" means a health care
provider as defined in RCW 48.43.005.
(6) "Insuring entity" means:
(a) An insurer;
(b) A joint underwriting association;
(c) A risk retention group; or
(d) An unauthorized insurer that provides surplus lines coverage.
(7) "Medical malpractice" means a negligent act, error, or omission
in providing or failing to provide professional health care services,
failure to obtain informed consent, or breach of promise of a
particular result.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Beginning on April 1, 2005, every
insuring entity or self-insurer that provides medical malpractice
insurance to any facility or provider in Washington state must report
to the commissioner by the first of each quarter any claim related to
medical malpractice, if the claim resulted in a final:
(a) Judgment in any amount;
(b) Settlement in any amount; or
(c) Disposition of a medical malpractice claim resulting in no
indemnity payment on behalf of an insured.
(2) If a claim is not reported by an insuring entity or self-insurer under subsection (1) of this section due to limitations in the
medical malpractice coverage of a facility or provider, the facility or
provider must report the claim to the commissioner.
(3) Reports under this section must be filed with the commissioner
within sixty days after the claim is resolved.
(4)(a) The commissioner may impose a fine of up to two hundred
fifty dollars per day per case against any insuring entity or surplus
lines producer that violates the requirements of this section. The
total fine per case may not exceed ten thousand dollars.
(b) The department of health may impose a fine of up to two hundred
fifty dollars per day per case against any facility or provider that
violates the requirements of this section. The total fine per case may
not exceed ten thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The reports required under section 2 of this
act must contain the following data in a form prescribed by the
commissioner for each claim:
(1) The health care provider's name, address, provider professional
license number, and type of medical specialty for which the provider is
insured; the name of the facility, if any, and the location within the
facility where the injury occurred; and the names and professional
license numbers if applicable, of all defendants involved in the claim.
This information is confidential and exempt from public disclosure, but
may be disclosed:
(a) Publicly, if the provider or facility provides written consent;
or
(b) To the commissioner at any time for the purpose of identifying
multiple or duplicate claims arising out of the same occurrence;
(2) The provider or facility policy number or numbers;
(3) The date of the loss;
(4) The date the claim was reported to the insuring entity, self-insurer, facility, or provider;
(5) The name and address of the claimant. This information is
confidential and exempt from public disclosure, but may be disclosed:
(a) Publicly, if the claimant provides written consent; or
(b) To the commissioner at any time for the purpose of identifying
multiple or duplicate claims arising out of the same occurrence;
(6) The date of suit, if filed;
(7) The claimant's age and sex;
(8) Specific information about the judgment or settlement
including:
(a) The date and amount of any judgment or settlement;
(b) Whether the settlement:
(i) Was the result of an arbitration, judgment, or mediation; and
(ii) Occurred before or after trial;
(c) An itemization of:
(i) Economic damages, such as incurred and anticipated medical
expense and lost wages;
(ii) Noneconomic damages;
(iii) Allocated loss adjustment expense, including but not limited
to court costs, attorneys' fees, and costs of expert witnesses; and
(d) If there is no judgment or settlement:
(i) The date and reason for final disposition; and
(ii) The date the claim was closed;
(9) A summary of the occurrence that created the claim, which must
include:
(a) The final diagnosis for which the patient sought or received
treatment;
(b) A description of any misdiagnosis made by the provider of the
actual condition of the patient;
(c) The operation, diagnostic, or treatment procedure that caused
the injury;
(d) A description of the principal injury that led to the claim;
and
(e) The safety management actions the facility or provider has
taken to make similar occurrences or injuries less likely in the
future. This reporting requirement does not create a legal duty on the
part of a facility or provider to implement safety management actions;
and
(10) Any other information required by the commissioner, by rule,
that helps the commissioner analyze and evaluate the nature, causes,
location, cost, and damages involved in medical malpractice cases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The commissioner must prepare aggregate
statistical summaries of closed claims based on calendar year data
submitted under section 2 of this act.
(1) At a minimum, data must be sorted by calendar year and calendar
accident year. The commissioner may also decide to display data in
other ways.
(2) The summaries must be available by March 31st of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Beginning in 2006, the commissioner must
prepare an annual report by June 30th that summarizes and analyzes the
closed claim reports for medical malpractice filed under section 2 of
this act and the annual financial reports filed by insurers writing
medical malpractice insurance in this state. The report must include:
(1) An analysis of closed claim reports of prior years for which
data are collected and show:
(a) Trends in the frequency and severity of claims payments;
(b) An itemization of economic and noneconomic damages;
(c) The types of medical malpractice for which claims have been
paid; and
(d) Any other information the commissioner determines illustrates
trends in closed claims;
(2) An analysis of the medical malpractice insurance market in
Washington state, including:
(a) An analysis of the financial reports of the insurers with a
combined market share of at least ninety percent of net written medical
malpractice premium in Washington state for the prior calendar year;
(b) A loss ratio analysis of medical malpractice insurance written
in Washington state; and
(c) A profitability analysis of each insurer writing medical
malpractice insurance;
(3) A comparison of loss ratios and the profitability of medical
malpractice insurance in Washington state to other states based on
financial reports filed with the national association of insurance
commissioners and any other source of information the commissioner
deems relevant;
(4) A summary of the rate filings for medical malpractice that have
been approved by the commissioner for the prior calendar year,
including an analysis of the trend of direct and incurred losses as
compared to prior years;
(5) The commissioner must post reports required by this section on
the internet no later than thirty days after they are due; and
(6) The commissioner may adopt rules that require insuring entities
and self-insurers required to report under section 2(1) of this act to
report data related to:
(a) The frequency and severity of open claims for the reporting
period;
(b) The aggregate amounts reserved for incurred claims;
(c) Changes in reserves from the previous reporting period; and
(d) Any other information that helps the commissioner monitor
losses and claims development in the Washington state medical
malpractice insurance market.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The commissioner shall adopt all rules
needed to implement this chapter. To ensure that claimants and health
care providers cannot be individually identified when data is disclosed
to the public, the commissioner shall adopt rules that require the
protection of information that, in combination, could result in the
ability to identify the claimant or health care provider in a
particular claim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any action filed under this chapter that results in a final:
(a) Judgment in any amount;
(b) Settlement in any amount; or
(c) Disposition resulting in no indemnity payment,
the claimant or his or her attorney shall report to the office of the
insurance commissioner on forms provided by the commissioner any court
costs, attorneys' fees, or costs of expert witnesses incurred in
pursuing the action.
(2) The commissioner may adopt rules requiring the submission of
any other information that would help the commissioner analyze and
evaluate the costs involved in medical malpractice cases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---