BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends, by establishing a
six-year statute of repose in RCW 4.16.350, to respond to the court's
decision in DeYoung v. Providence Medical Center, 136 Wn.2d 136 (1998),
by expressly stating the legislature's rationale for a statute of
repose.
The legislature recognizes that a six-year statute of repose alone
may not solve the crisis in the medical insurance industry. However,
to the extent that a six-year statute of repose has an effect on
medical malpractice insurance, that effect will tend to reduce rather
than increase the cost of malpractice insurance.
Whether or not the statute of repose has the actual effect of
reducing insurance costs, the legislature finds it will provide
protection against claims, however few, that are stale, based on
untrustworthy evidence, or that place undue burdens on defendants.
In accordance with the court's opinion in DeYoung, the legislature
further finds that compelling even one defendant to answer a stale
claim is a substantial wrong, and setting an outer limit to the
operation of the discovery rule is an appropriate aim.
The legislature further finds that a six-year statute of repose is
a reasonable time period in light of the need to balance the interests
of injured plaintiffs and the health care industry.
The legislature intends to establish a six-year statute of repose
in section 2 of this act and specifically set forth for the court the
legislature's legitimate rationale for adopting the six-year statute of
repose. The legislature further intends that the six-year statute of
repose established in section 2 of this act be applied to actions
commenced on or after the effective date of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.16.350 and 1998 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil action for damages that is based upon alleged
professional negligence, that is for an injury or condition occurring
as a result of health care which is provided after June 25, 1976, and
that is brought against((:
(1))) a person or entity identified in subsection (2) of this
section, shall:
(a) With respect to a patient who was eighteen years old or older
at the time of the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition, be commenced by the later of:
(i) Three years from the act or omission; or
(ii) One year from the time the patient or his or her
representative discovered or reasonably should have discovered that the
injury or condition was caused by the act or omission; and
(b) With respect to a patient who was under the age of eighteen
years at the time of the act or omission alleged to have caused the
injury or condition, be commenced by the later of:
(i) When the patient reaches age twenty-one or six years from the
act or omission, whichever occurs first; or
(ii) One year from the time the patient or his or her
representative discovered or reasonably should have discovered that the
injury or condition was caused by the act or omission; and
(c) Notwithstanding (a) or (b) of this subsection, in any event be
commenced no later than six years after the act or omission.
(2) Persons or entities against whom an action is brought under
subsection (1) of this section include:
(a) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or
related services, including, but not limited to, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician
and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist,
pharmacist, optician, physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's
assistant, nurse practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive
care paramedic, including, in the event such person is deceased, his or
her estate or personal representative;
(((2))) (b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of
this subsection (((1) of this section)), acting in the course and scope
of his or her employment, including, in the event such employee or
agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative; or
(((3))) (c) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in (a) of this
subsection (((1) of this section)), including, but not limited to, a
hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or
an officer, director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course
and scope of his or her employment, including, in the event such
officer, director, employee, or agent is deceased, his or her estate or
personal representative((;
based upon alleged professional negligence shall be commenced within
three years of the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition, or one year of the time the patient or his representative
discovered or reasonably should have discovered that the injury or
condition was caused by said act or omission, whichever period expires
later, except that in no event shall an action be commenced more than
eight years after said act or omission: PROVIDED, That)).
(3) The time for commencement of an action is tolled upon proof of
fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence of a foreign body not
intended to have a therapeutic or diagnostic purpose or effect, until
the date the patient or the patient's representative has actual
knowledge of the act of fraud or concealment, or of the presence of the
foreign body; the patient or the patient's representative has one year
from the date of the actual knowledge in which to commence a civil
action for damages.
(4) For purposes of this section, ((notwithstanding RCW 4.16.190,))
the knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall be imputed to a
person under the age of eighteen years, and such imputed knowledge
shall operate to bar the claim of such minor to the same extent that
the claim of an adult would be barred under this section. Any action
not commenced in accordance with this section shall be barred.
For purposes of this section, with respect to care provided after
June 25, 1976, and before August 1, 1986, the knowledge of a custodial
parent or guardian shall be imputed as of April 29, 1987, to persons
under the age of eighteen years.
This section does not apply to a civil action based on intentional
conduct brought against those individuals or entities specified in this
section by a person for recovery of damages for injury occurring as a
result of childhood sexual abuse as defined in RCW 4.16.340(5).

Sec. 3 RCW 4.16.190 and 1993 c 232 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise provided in this section, if a person entitled
to bring an action mentioned in this chapter, except for a penalty or
forfeiture, or against a sheriff or other officer, for an escape, be at
the time the cause of action accrued either under the age of eighteen
years, or incompetent or disabled to such a degree that he or she
cannot understand the nature of the proceedings, such incompetency or
disability as determined according to chapter 11.88 RCW, or imprisoned
on a criminal charge prior to sentencing, the time of such disability
shall not be a part of the time limited for the commencement of action.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section with respect to a person under
the age of eighteen years does not apply to the time limited for the
commencement of an action under RCW 4.16.350.

--- END ---