BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.84.185 and 1991 c 70 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
In any civil action, the court having jurisdiction ((may)) shall,
upon written findings by the judge that the action, counterclaim,
cross-claim, third party claim, or defense was frivolous and advanced
without reasonable cause, require the nonprevailing party to pay the
prevailing party the reasonable expenses, including fees of attorneys
and expert witnesses, incurred in opposing such action, counterclaim,
cross-claim, third party claim, or defense. This determination shall
be made upon motion by the prevailing party after a voluntary or
involuntary order of dismissal, order on summary judgment, final
judgment after trial, or other final order terminating the action as to
the prevailing party. The judge shall consider all evidence presented
at the time of the motion to determine whether the position of the
nonprevailing party was frivolous and advanced without reasonable
cause. In no event may such motion be filed more than thirty days
after entry of the order.
The provisions of this section apply unless otherwise specifically
provided by statute.

--- END ---