BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.470 and 1993 c 495 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Except as otherwise provided in subsection (15) of this
section,)) The following fees shall be collected by the department in
advance:
(1) For the examination of an application for permit to appropriate
water or on application to change point of diversion, withdrawal,
purpose or place of use, a minimum of ((ten)) one hundred thirty
dollars, to be paid with the application. For each second foot between
one and five hundred second feet, ((two)) twenty-six dollars per second
foot; for each second foot between five hundred and two thousand second
feet, six dollars and fifty cents per second foot; and for each second
foot in excess thereof, ((twenty)) two dollars and sixty cents per
second foot. For each acre foot of storage up to and including one
hundred thousand acre feet, ((one)) thirteen cents per acre foot, and
for each acre foot in excess thereof, ((one-fifth)) three cents per
acre foot. The ((ten)) one hundred thirty dollar fee payable with the
application shall be a credit to that amount whenever the fee for
direct diversion or storage totals more than ((ten)) one hundred thirty
dollars under the above schedule and in such case the further fee due
shall be the total computed amount less ((ten)) one hundred thirty
dollars.
Within five days from receipt of an application the department
shall notify the applicant by registered mail of any additional fees
due under the ((above)) schedule in this subsection and any additional
fees shall be paid to and received by the department within thirty days
from the date of filing the application, or the application shall be
rejected.
(2) For filing and recording a permit to appropriate water for
irrigation purposes, ((forty)) five dollars and twenty cents per acre
for each acre to be irrigated up to and including one hundred acres,
and ((twenty)) two dollars and sixty cents per acre for each acre in
excess of one hundred acres up to and including one thousand acres, and
((ten)) one dollar and thirty cents for each acre in excess of one
thousand acres; and also ((twenty)) two dollars and sixty cents for
each theoretical horsepower up to and including one thousand
horsepower, and ((four)) fifty-two cents for each theoretical
horsepower in excess of one thousand horsepower, but in no instance
shall the minimum fee for filing and recording a permit to appropriate
water be less than ((five)) sixty-five dollars. For all other
beneficial purposes the fee shall be twice the amount of the
examination fee except that for individual household and domestic use,
which may include water for irrigation of a family garden, the fee
shall be ((five)) sixty-five dollars.
(3) For filing and recording any other water right instrument,
((four)) fifty-two dollars for the first hundred words and ((forty))
five dollars and twenty cents for each additional hundred words or
fraction thereof.
(4) For making a copy of any document recorded or filed in his or
her office, ((forty)) five dollars and twenty cents for each hundred
words or fraction thereof, but when the amount exceeds ((twenty)) two
hundred sixty dollars, only the actual cost in excess of that amount
shall be charged.
(5) For certifying to copies, documents, records or maps, ((two))
twenty-six dollars for each certification.
(6) For blueprint copies of a map or drawing, or, for such other
work of a similar nature as may be required of the department, at
actual cost of the work.
(7) For granting each extension of time for beginning construction
work under a permit to appropriate water, an amount equal to one-half
of the filing and recording fee, except that the minimum fee shall be
not less than ((five)) sixty-five dollars for each year that an
extension is granted, and for granting an extension of time for
completion of construction work or for completing application of water
to a beneficial use, ((five)) sixty-five dollars for each year that an
extension is granted.
(8) For the inspection of any hydraulic works to insure safety to
life and property, the actual cost of the inspection, including the
expense incident thereto.
(9) For the examination of plans and specifications as to safety of
controlling works for storage of ten acre feet or more of water, a
minimum fee of ((ten)) one hundred thirty dollars, or the actual cost.
(10) For recording an assignment either of a permit to appropriate
water or of an application for such a permit, a fee of ((five)) sixty-five dollars.
(11) For preparing and issuing all water right certificates,
((five)) sixty-five dollars.
(12) For filing and recording a protest against granting any
application, ((two)) twenty-six dollars.
(13) The department shall provide timely notification by certified
mail with return receipt requested to applicants that fees are due. No
action may be taken until the fee is paid in full. Failure to remit
fees within sixty days of the department's notification shall be
grounds for rejecting the application or canceling the permit. Cash
shall not be accepted. Fees must be paid by check or money order and
are nonrefundable.
(14) For purposes of calculating fees for ground water filings, one
cubic foot per second shall be regarded as equivalent to four hundred
fifty gallons per minute.
(15) ((For the period beginning July 1, 1993, and ending June 30,
1994, there is imposed and the department shall collect a one hundred
dollar surcharge on all water rights applications or changes filed
under this section, and upon all water rights applications or changes
pending as of July 1, 1993. This charge shall be in addition to any
other fees imposed under this section)) Beginning July 1, 2005, and
each July 1st thereafter, the department shall increase the fees in
this section by an amount equal to the fiscal growth factor calculated
under RCW 43.135.025.

--- END ---