BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.007 and 2003 c 111 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this title:
(1) "Ballot" means, as the context implies, either:
(a) The issues and offices to be voted upon in a jurisdiction or
portion of a jurisdiction at a particular primary, general election, or
special election;
(b) A facsimile of the contents of a particular ballot whether
printed on a paper ballot or ballot card or as part of a voting machine
or voting device;
(c) A physical or electronic record of the choices of an individual
voter in a particular primary, general election, or special election;
or
(d) The physical document on which the voter's choices are to be
recorded;
(2) "Paper ballot" means a piece of paper on which the ballot for
a particular election or primary has been printed, on which a voter may
record his or her choices for any candidate or for or against any
measure, and that is to be tabulated manually;
(3) "Ballot card" means any type of card or piece of paper of any
size on which a voter may record his or her choices for any candidate
and for or against any measure and that is to be tabulated on a vote
tallying system;
(4) "Sample ballot" means a printed facsimile of all the issues and
offices on the ballot in a jurisdiction and is intended to give voters
notice of the issues, offices, and candidates that are to be voted on
at a particular primary, general election, or special election;
(5) "Provisional ballot" means a ballot issued to a voter at the
polling place on election day by the precinct election board, for one
of the following reasons:
(a) The voter's name does not appear in the poll book;
(b) There is an indication in the poll book that the voter has
requested an absentee ballot, but the voter wishes to vote at the
polling place;
(c) There is a question on the part of the voter concerning the
issues or candidates on which the voter is qualified to vote;
(6) "Party ballot" means a primary election ballot specific to a
particular major political party listing all partisan offices to be
voted on at that primary, and the candidates for those offices who
affiliate with that same major political party;
(7) "Nonpartisan ballot" means a primary election ballot listing
all nonpartisan races and ballot measures to be voted on at a primary.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.085 and 2003 c 111 s 115 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Major political party" means a political party of which at least
one nominee for president, vice president, United States senator, or a
statewide office received at least five percent of the total vote cast
at the last preceding state general election in an even-numbered year.
A political party qualifying as a major political party under this
section retains such status until the next even-year election at which
a candidate of that party does not achieve at least five percent of the
vote for one of the previously specified offices. If none of these
offices appear on the ballot in an even-year general election, the
major party retains its status as a major party through that election.
However, a political party of which no nominee received at least ten
percent of the total votes cast may forgo its status as a major
political party by filing with the secretary of state an appropriate
party rule within sixty days of attaining major party status under this
section, or within fifteen days of the effective date of this section,
whichever is later.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29A.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Registered party member" means a registered voter who chooses to
affiliate with a major political party as part of his or her voter
registration. Party affiliation as part of voter registration is
limited to major political parties only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 29A.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Unaffiliated voter" means a registered voter who does not qualify
as a registered party member for any major political party.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.04.215 and 2003 c 111 s 134 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor of each county shall be ex officio the
supervisor of all primaries and elections, general or special, and it
shall be the county auditor's duty to provide places for holding such
primaries and elections; to appoint the precinct election officers and
to provide for their compensation; to provide the supplies and
materials necessary for the conduct of elections to the precinct
election officers; and to publish and post notices of calling such
primaries and elections in the manner provided by law. The notice of
a ((general election)) primary held in an even-numbered year must
indicate that the office of precinct committee officer will be on the
party ballot. The auditor shall also apportion to each city, town, or
district, and to the state of Washington in the odd-numbered year, its
share of the expense of such primaries and elections. This section
does not apply to general or special elections for any city, town, or
district that is not subject to RCW 29A.04.320 and 29A.04.330, but all
such elections must be held and conducted at the time, in the manner,
and by the officials (with such notice, requirements for filing for
office, and certifications by local officers) as provided and required
by the laws governing such elections.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.04.310 and 2003 c 111 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nominating primaries for general elections to be held in November,
and the election of precinct committee officers, must be held on the
third Tuesday of the preceding September or on the seventh Tuesday
immediately preceding such general election, whichever occurs first.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.04.320 and 2003 c 111 s 144 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All state, county, city, town, and district general elections
for the election of federal, state, legislative, judicial, county,
city, town, and district((, and)) precinct officers, and for the
submission to the voters of the state, county, city, town, or district
of any measure for their adoption and approval or rejection, shall be
held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November, in the
year in which they may be called. A statewide general election shall
be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November of each
year. However, the statewide general election held in odd-numbered
years shall be limited to (a) city, town, and district general
elections as provided for in RCW 29A.04.330, or as otherwise provided
by law; (b) the election of federal officers for the remainder of any
unexpired terms in the membership of either branch of the Congress of
the United States; (c) the election of state and county officers for
the remainder of any unexpired terms of offices created by or whose
duties are described in Article II, section 15, Article III, sections
16, 17, 19, 20, 21, 22, and 23, and Article IV, sections 3 and 5 of the
state Constitution and RCW 2.06.080; (d) the election of county
officers in any county governed by a charter containing provisions
calling for general county elections at this time; and (e) the approval
or rejection of state measures, including proposed constitutional
amendments, matters pertaining to any proposed constitutional
convention, initiative measures and referendum measures proposed by the
electorate, referendum bills, and any other matter provided by the
legislature for submission to the electorate.
(2) A county legislative authority may, if it deems an emergency to
exist, call a special county election by presenting a resolution to the
county auditor at least forty-five days prior to the proposed election
date. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a special
election called by the county legislative authority shall be held on
one of the following dates as decided by such governing body:
(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;
(b) The second Tuesday in March;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(d) The third Tuesday in May;
(e) The day of the primary as specified by RCW 29A.04.310; or
(f) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) In addition to the dates set forth in subsection (2)(a) through
(f) of this section, a special election to validate an excess levy or
bond issue may be called at any time to meet the needs resulting from
fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God. Such county special
election shall be noticed and conducted in the manner provided by law.
(4) In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter
29A.56 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called by the
county legislative authority under subsection (2) of this section
during the month of that primary is the date of the presidential
primary.
(5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections except
for those elections held pursuant to a home-rule charter adopted under
Article XI, section 4 of the state Constitution. This section shall
not be construed as fixing the time for holding primary elections, or
elections for the recall of any elective public officer.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.08.110 and 2003 c 111 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On receipt of an application for voter registration under this
chapter, the county auditor shall review the application to determine
whether the information supplied is complete. An application that
contains the applicant's name, complete valid residence address, date
of birth, and signature attesting to the truth of the information
provided on the application is complete. If it is not complete, the
auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice of the deficiency to
the applicant. This verification notice shall require the applicant to
provide the missing information. If the verification notice is not
returned by the applicant or is returned as undeliverable the auditor
shall not place the name of the applicant on the county voter list. If
the applicant provides the required information, the applicant shall be
registered to vote as of the date of mailing of the original voter
registration application. Party affiliation information is not
required for a complete voter registration.
(2) If the information is complete, the applicant is considered to
be registered to vote as of the date of mailing. The auditor shall
record the appropriate precinct identification, taxing district
identification, ((and)) date of registration, and party affiliation, if
any, on the voter's record. Within forty-five days after the receipt
of an application but no later than seven days before the next primary,
special election, or general election, the auditor shall send to the
applicant, by first class mail, an acknowledgement notice identifying
the registrant's precinct and containing such other information as may
be required by the secretary of state. The postal service shall be
instructed not to forward a voter registration card to any other
address and to return to the auditor any card which is not deliverable.
If the applicant has indicated that he or she is registered to vote in
another county in Washington but has also provided an address within
the auditor's county that is for voter registration purposes, the
auditor shall send, on behalf of the registrant, a registration
cancellation notice to the auditor of that other county and the auditor
receiving the notice shall cancel the registrant's voter registration
in that other county. If the registrant has indicated on the form that
he or she is registered to vote within the county but has provided a
new address within the county that is for voter registration purposes,
the auditor shall transfer the voter's registration.
(3) If an acknowledgement notice card is properly mailed as
required by this section to the address listed by the voter as being
the voter's mailing address and the notice is subsequently returned to
the auditor by the postal service as being undeliverable to the voter
at that address, the auditor shall promptly send the voter a
confirmation notice. The auditor shall place the voter's registration
on inactive status pending a response from the voter to the
confirmation notice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the information required by RCW 29A.08.010 for voter
registration, the county auditor shall provide each voter an
opportunity to affiliate with a major political party as part of his or
her voter registration. Under no circumstances may an individual be
required to affiliate with a political party in order to register to
vote. Each voter who chooses to affiliate with a major political party
as part of his or her voter registration is considered a "registered
party member" of that political party. A voter may not affiliate with
more than one major political party at a time, but may change his or
her party affiliation information in a manner consistent with the
procedures for changing a voter registration address, as provided in
RCW 29A.08.140, 29A.08.145, and 29A.08.430.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.08.125 and 2003 c 111 s 209 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each county auditor shall maintain a computer file containing the
records of all registered voters within the county. The auditor may
provide for the establishment and maintenance of such files by private
contract or through interlocal agreement as provided by chapter 39.34
RCW. The computer file must include, but not be limited to, each
voter's last name, first name, middle initial, date of birth, residence
address, gender, party affiliation, if any, date of registration,
applicable taxing district and precinct codes, and the last date on
which the individual voted. The county auditor shall subsequently
record each consecutive date upon which the individual has voted and
retain at least the last five such consecutive dates. If the voter has
not voted at least five times since establishing his or her current
registration record, only the available dates will be included.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.08.135 and 2003 c 111 s 211 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall acknowledge each new voter registration or
transfer of address or party affiliation by providing or sending the
voter a card identifying his or her current precinct and containing
such other information as may be prescribed by the secretary of state.
When a person who has previously registered to vote in a jurisdiction
applies for voter registration in a new jurisdiction, the person shall
provide on the registration form, all information needed to cancel any
previous registration. The county auditor shall forward any
information pertaining to the voter's prior voter registration to the
county where the voter was previously registered, so that registration
may be canceled. If the prior voter registration is in another state,
the notification must be made to the state elections office of that
state. A county auditor receiving official information that a voter
has registered to vote in another jurisdiction shall immediately cancel
that voter's registration.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.08.140 and 2003 c 111 s 212 are each amended to
read as follows:
The registration files of all precincts shall be closed against
original registration or transfers of address or party affiliation for
thirty days immediately preceding every primary, special election, and
general election to be held in such precincts.
The county auditor shall give notice of the closing of the precinct
files for original registration and transfer and notice of the special
registration and voting procedure provided by RCW 29A.08.145 by one
publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at
least five days before the closing of the precinct files.
No person may vote at any primary, special election, or general
election in a precinct polling place unless he or she has registered to
vote at least thirty days before that primary or election. If a
person, otherwise qualified to vote in the state, county, and precinct
in which he or she applies for registration, does not register at least
thirty days before any primary, special election, or general election,
he or she may register and vote by absentee ballot for that primary or
election under RCW 29A.08.145.

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.08.145 and 2003 c 111 s 213 are each amended to
read as follows:
This section establishes a special procedure which an elector may
use to register to vote or change his or her voter registration address
or party affiliation during the period beginning after the closing of
registration for voting at the polls under RCW 29A.08.140 and ending on
the fifteenth day before a primary, special election, or general
election. A qualified elector in the ((county)) state may register to
vote or change his or her registration address or party affiliation in
person in the office of the county auditor or at a voter registration
location specifically designated for this purpose by the county auditor
of the county in which the applicant resides, and apply for an absentee
ballot for that primary or election. The auditor or registration
assistant shall register that individual in the manner provided in this
chapter. The application for an absentee ballot executed by the newly
registered voter for the primary or election that follows the execution
of the registration shall be promptly transmitted to the auditor with
the completed voter registration form.

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.08.210 and 2003 c 111 s 216 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application
providing the following information concerning his or her
qualifications as a voter in this state:
(1) The address of the last former registration of the applicant as
a voter in the state;
(2) The applicant's full name;
(3) The applicant's date of birth;
(4) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes;
(5) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the
same as the address in subsection (4) of this section;
(6) The sex of the applicant;
(7) A declaration that the applicant is a citizen of the United
States;
(8) The applicant's signature; and
(9) Any other information that the secretary of state determines is
necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and prevent
duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.
The application must also include a place for the applicant to
indicate affiliation with a major political party. Affiliation with a
major political party is not required for registration, and lack of
party affiliation may not be used as grounds for not registering an
applicant to vote.
This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to
be prescribed by the secretary of state.
If the applicant fails to provide the information required for
voter registration, the auditor shall send the applicant a verification
notice. The auditor shall not register the applicant until the
required information is provided. If a verification notice is returned
as undeliverable or the applicant fails to respond to the notice within
forty-five days, the auditor shall not register the applicant to vote.
The following warning shall appear in a conspicuous place on the
voter registration form:

"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter
registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your
qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class
C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, or by
a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both imprisonment and fine."
The voter registration form must include information on the option
to affiliate with a major political party, and the fact that party
affiliation is not required to register to vote.

Sec. 15 RCW 29A.08.340 and 2003 c 111 s 225 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person may register to vote((, transfer a voter
registration,)) or change his or her voter registration name ((for
voter registration purposes)), address, or party affiliation when he or
she applies for or renews a driver's license or identification card
under chapter 46.20 RCW.
(2) To register to vote((, transfer his or her voter
registration,)) or change his or her voter registration name ((for
voter registration purposes)), address, or party affiliation under this
section, the applicant shall provide the information required by RCW
29A.08.210.
(3) The driver licensing agent shall record that the applicant has
requested to register to vote or ((transfer a)) change voter
((registration)) information.

Sec. 16 RCW 29A.08.350 and 2003 c 111 s 226 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall provide for the voter registration
forms submitted under RCW 29A.08.340 to be collected from each driver's
licensing facility within five days of their completion.
(2) The department of licensing shall produce and transmit to the
secretary of state a machine-readable file containing the following
information from the records of each individual who requested a voter
registration or transfer at a driver's license facility during each
period for which forms are transmitted under subsection (1) of this
section: The name, address, date of birth, gender, and driver's
license number of the applicant, the ((driver's license number))
applicant's party affiliation, if any, the date on which the
application for voter registration or transfer was submitted, and the
location of the office at which the application was submitted.
(3) The voter registration forms from the driver's licensing
facilities must be forwarded to the county in which the applicant has
registered to vote no later than ten days after the date on which the
forms were to be collected.
(4) For a voter registration application where the address for
voting purposes is different from the address in the machine-readable
file received from the department of licensing, the secretary of state
shall amend the record of that application in the machine-readable file
to reflect the county in which the applicant has registered to vote.
(5) The secretary of state shall sort the records in the machine-readable file according to the county in which the applicant registered
to vote and produce a file of voter registration transactions for each
county. The records of each county may be transmitted on or through
whatever medium the county auditor determines will best facilitate the
incorporation of these records into the existing voter registration
files of that county.
(6) The secretary of state shall produce a list of voter
registration transactions for each county and transmit a copy of this
list to that county with each file of voter registration transactions
no later than ten days after the date on which that information was to
be transmitted under subsection (1) of this section.
(7) If a registrant has indicated on the voter registration
application form that he or she is registered to vote in another county
in Washington but has also provided an address within the auditor's
county that is for voter registration purposes, the auditor shall send,
on behalf of the registrant, a registration cancellation notice to the
auditor of that other county and the auditor receiving the notice shall
cancel the registrant's voter registration in that other county. If
the registrant has indicated on the form that he or she is registered
to vote within the county but has provided a new address within the
county that is for voter registration purposes, the auditor shall
transfer the voter's registration.

Sec. 17 RCW 29A.08.360 and 2003 c 111 s 227 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of licensing shall provide information on all
persons changing their address on change of address forms submitted to
the department unless the voter has indicated that the address change
is not for voting purposes. This information will be transmitted to
the secretary of state each week in a machine-readable file containing
the following information on persons changing their address: The name,
address, date of birth, gender, and driver's license number of the
applicant, the applicant's ((driver's license number)) party
affiliation, if any, the applicant's former address, the county code
for the applicant's former address, and the date that the request for
address change was received.
(2) The secretary of state shall forward this information to the
appropriate county each week. When the information indicates that the
voter has moved within the county, the county auditor shall use the
change of address information to transfer the voter's registration and
send the voter an acknowledgement notice of the transfer. If the
information indicates that the new address is outside the voter's
original county, the county auditor shall send the voter a registration
by mail form at the voter's new address and advise the voter of the
need to reregister in the new county. The auditor shall then place the
voter on inactive status.

Sec. 18 RCW 29A.08.410 and 2003 c 111 s 228 are each amended to
read as follows:
((To maintain a valid voter registration,)) A registered voter who
changes his or her party affiliation, or residence from one address to
another within the same county, shall transfer his or her registration
((to the new address)) information in one of the following ways: (1)
Sending to the county auditor a signed request stating the voter's
present and previous party affiliation or registration address ((and
the address from which the voter was last registered)); (2) appearing
in person before the auditor and signing such a request; (3)
transferring the registration information in the manner provided by RCW
29A.08.430; or (4) telephoning the county auditor to transfer the
registration information. The telephone call transferring a
registration by telephone must be received by the auditor before the
precinct registration files are closed to new registrations for the
next primary or special or general election in which the voter
participates.

Sec. 19 RCW 29A.08.430 and 2003 c 111 s 230 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who is registered to vote in this state may transfer
his or her voter registration information on the day of a special,
primary, or general election ((or primary)) under the following
procedures:
(a) The voter may complete, at the polling place, a registration
transfer form designed by the secretary of state and supplied by the
county auditor; or
(b) The voter may write in his or her new residential address or
party affiliation in the precinct list of registered voters.
The county auditor shall determine which of these two procedures
are to be used in the county or may determine that both procedures are
to be available to voters for use in the county.
(2) A voter who transfers his or her registration in the manner
authorized by this section shall vote in the precinct and according to
the party affiliation in which he or she was previously registered.
(3) The auditor shall, within ninety days, mail to each voter who
has transferred a registration under this section a notice of his or
her current precinct ((and)), polling place, and party affiliation.

Sec. 20 RCW 29A.08.645 and 2003 c 111 s 244 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall create a standard electronic file
format (state transfer form) to be used for the transfer of voter
registration information between county auditors and the office of the
secretary of state. The format must be prescribed by rule and contain
at least the following information: Voter name, address, date of
birth, party affiliation, if any, date of registration, mailing
address, legislative and congressional district, and digitized
signature image. Each county shall program its voter registration
system to convert this data from the county's storage format into the
state transfer format.

Sec. 21 RCW 29A.08.710 and 2003 c 111 s 246 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall have custody of the voter registration
records for each county. The original voter registration form must be
filed without regard to precinct and is considered confidential and
unavailable for public inspection and copying. An automated file of
all registered voters must be maintained pursuant to RCW 29A.08.125.
An auditor may maintain the automated file in lieu of filing or
maintaining the original voter registration forms if the automated file
includes all of the information from the original voter registration
forms including, but not limited to, a retrievable facsimile of each
voter's signature.
(2) The following information contained in voter registration
records or files regarding a voter or a group of voters is available
for public inspection and copying: The voter's name, gender, voting
record, party affiliation, if any, date of registration, and
registration number. The address and political jurisdiction of a
registered voter are available for public inspection and copying except
as provided by chapter 40.24 RCW. No other information from voter
registration records or files is available for public inspection or
copying.

Sec. 22 RCW 29A.12.100 and 2003 c 111 s 310 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall not approve a vote tallying system
unless it:
(1) Correctly counts votes on ballots on which the proper number of
votes have been marked for any office or issue;
(2) Ignores votes marked for any office or issue where more than
the allowable number of votes have been marked, but correctly counts
the properly voted portions of the ballot;
(3) Accumulates a count of the specific number of ballots tallied
for each precinct, total votes by candidate for each office, and total
votes for and against each issue of the ballot in that precinct;
(4) ((Accommodates rotation of candidates' names on the ballot
under RCW 29A.36.140;
(5))) Produces precinct and cumulative totals in printed form; and
(((6))) (5) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this
state, has been tested, certified, and used in at least one other state
or election jurisdiction.

Sec. 23 RCW 29A.20.020 and 2003 c 111 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person filing a declaration of candidacy for an office shall,
at the time of filing, be a registered voter and possess the
qualifications specified by law for persons who may be elected to the
office.
(2) Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a
temporary elected position such as a charter review board member or
freeholder, no person may file for more than one office.
(3) The name of a candidate for an office shall not appear on a
ballot for that office unless, except as provided in RCW 3.46.067 and
3.50.057, the candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of
candidacy is filed, properly registered to vote in the geographic area
represented by the office. For the purposes of this section, each
geographic area in which registered voters may cast ballots for an
office is represented by that office. If a person elected to an office
must be nominated from a district or similar division of the geographic
area represented by the office, the name of a candidate for the office
shall not appear on a primary ballot for that office unless the
candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of candidacy is
filed, properly registered to vote in that district or division. The
officer with whom declarations of candidacy must be filed under this
title shall review each such declaration filed regarding compliance
with this subsection. This subsection does not apply to the office of
a member of the United States Congress.
(4) ((This section does not apply to the office of a member of the
United States Congress)) If a person filing a declaration of candidacy
for a partisan office designates on his or her declaration an
affiliation with a major political party, he or she must, at the time
of filing, be a registered party member of that major political party.
If a person filing a declaration of candidacy for a partisan office
designates on his or her declaration an affiliation with a minor
political party or indicates that he or she is an independent
candidate, he or she may not, at the time of filing, be a registered
party member of any major political party.

Sec. 24 RCW 29A.20.120 and 2003 c 111 s 506 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any nomination of a candidate for partisan public office by
other than a major political party may be made only: (a) In a
convention held not earlier than the last Saturday in June and not
later than the first Saturday in July or during any of the seven days
immediately preceding the first day for filing declarations of
candidacy as fixed in accordance with RCW 29A.28.040; (b) as provided
by RCW 29A.60.020; or (c) as otherwise provided in this section. Minor
political party and independent candidates may appear only on the
general election ballot.
(2) Nominations of candidates for president and vice president of
the United States other than by a major political party may be made
either at a convention conducted under subsection (1) of this section,
or at a similar convention taking place not earlier than the first
Sunday in July and not later than seventy days before the general
election. Conventions held during this time period may not nominate
candidates for any public office other than president and vice
president of the United States, except as provided in subsection (3) of
this section.
(3) If a special filing period for a partisan office is opened
under RCW 29A.24.210, candidates of minor political parties and
independent candidates may file for office during that special filing
period. The names of those candidates may not appear on the ballot
unless they are nominated by convention held no later than five days
after the close of the special filing period and a certificate of
nomination is filed with the filing officer no later than three days
after the convention. The requirements of RCW 29A.20.130 do not apply
to such a convention. ((If primary ballots or a voters' pamphlet are
ordered to be printed before the deadline for submitting the
certificate of nomination and the certificate has not been filed, then
the candidate's name will be included but may not appear on the general
election ballot unless the certificate is timely filed and the
candidate otherwise qualifies to appear on that ballot.))
(4) A minor political party may hold more than one convention but
in no case shall any such party nominate more than one candidate for
any one partisan public office or position. For the purpose of
nominating candidates for the offices of president and vice president,
United States senator, United States representative, or a statewide
office, a minor party or independent candidate holding multiple
conventions may add together the number of signatures of different
individuals from each convention obtained in support of the candidate
or candidates in order to obtain the number required by RCW 29A.20.140.
For all other offices for which nominations are made, signatures of the
requisite number of registered voters must be obtained at a single
convention.

Sec. 25 RCW 29A.20.140 and 2003 c 111 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To be valid, a convention must be attended by at least
((twenty-five)) one hundred registered voters, none of whom may be
registered party members of a major political party.
(2) In order to nominate candidates for the offices of president
and vice president of the United States, United States senator, United
States representative, or any statewide office, a nominating convention
shall obtain and submit to the filing officer the signatures of at
least ((two hundred)) one thousand registered voters of the state of
Washington, none of whom may be registered party members of a major
political party. In order to nominate candidates for any other office,
a nominating convention shall obtain and submit to the filing officer
the signatures of ((twenty-five)) one hundred persons who are
registered to vote in the jurisdiction of the office for which the
nominations are made, none of whom may be registered party members of
a major political party.

Sec. 26 RCW 29A.20.150 and 2003 c 111 s 509 are each amended to
read as follows:
A nominating petition submitted under this chapter shall clearly
identify the name of the minor party or independent candidate
convention as it appears on the certificate of nomination as required
by RCW 29A.20.160(3). The petition shall also contain a statement that
the person signing the petition is a registered voter of the state of
Washington and shall have a space for the voter to sign his or her name
and to print his or her name and address. No person may sign more than
one nominating petition under this chapter for an office for ((a
primary or)) an election.

Sec. 27 RCW 29A.20.160 and 2003 c 111 s 510 are each amended to
read as follows:
A certificate evidencing nominations made at a convention must:
(1) Be in writing;
(2) Contain the name of each person nominated, his or her
residence, a statement that he or she is not a registered party member
of a major political party, and the office for which he or she is
named, and if the nomination is for the offices of president and vice
president of the United States, a sworn statement from both nominees
giving their consent to the nomination;
(3) Identify the minor political party or the independent candidate
on whose behalf the convention was held;
(4) Be verified by the oath of the presiding officer and secretary;
(5) Be accompanied by a nominating petition or petitions bearing
the signatures and addresses of registered voters equal in number to
that required by RCW 29A.20.140;
(6) Contain proof of publication of the notice of calling the
convention; and
(7) Be submitted to the appropriate filing officer not later than
one week following the adjournment of the convention at which the
nominations were made. If the nominations are made only for offices
whose jurisdiction is entirely within one county, the certificate and
nominating petitions must be filed with the county auditor. If a minor
party or independent candidate convention nominates any candidates for
offices whose jurisdiction encompasses more than one county, all
nominating petitions and the convention certificates must be filed with
the secretary of state.

Sec. 28 RCW 29A.20.200 and 2003 c 111 s 514 are each amended to
read as follows:
Not later than the Friday immediately preceding the first day for
candidates to file, the secretary of state shall notify the county
auditors of the names and designations of all minor party and
independent candidates who have filed valid convention certificates and
nominating petitions with that office. Except for the offices of
president and vice president, persons nominated under this chapter
shall file declarations of candidacy as provided by RCW 29A.24.030 and
29A.24.070. The name of a candidate nominated at a convention shall
not be printed upon the ((primary)) general election ballot unless he
or she pays the fee required by law to be paid by candidates for the
same office to be nominated at a primary.

Sec. 29 RCW 29A.24.030 and 2003 c 111 s 603 are each amended to
read as follows:
A candidate who desires to have his or her name printed on the
ballot for election to an office other than president of the United
States, vice president of the United States, or an office for which
ownership of property is a prerequisite to voting shall complete and
file a declaration of candidacy. The secretary of state shall adopt,
by rule, a declaration of candidacy form for the office of precinct
committee officer and a separate standard form for candidates for all
other offices filing under this chapter. Included on the standard form
shall be:
(1) A place for the candidate to declare that he or she is a
registered voter within the jurisdiction of the office for which he or
she is filing, and the address at which he or she is registered;
(2) A place for the candidate to indicate the position for which he
or she is filing;
(3) A place for the candidate to indicate a party designation, if
applicable, and confirm that he or she is a registered party member if
the designation is a major political party;
(4) A place for the candidate to indicate the amount of the filing
fee accompanying the declaration of candidacy or for the candidate to
indicate that he or she is filing a nominating petition in lieu of the
filing fee under RCW 29A.24.090;
(5) A place for the candidate to sign the declaration of candidacy,
stating that the information provided on the form is true and swearing
or affirming that he or she will support the Constitution and laws of
the United States and the Constitution and laws of the state of
Washington.
In the case of a declaration of candidacy filed electronically,
submission of the form constitutes agreement that the information
provided with the filing is true, that he or she will support the
Constitutions and laws of the United States and the state of
Washington, and that he or she agrees to electronic payment of the
filing fee established in RCW 29A.24.090.
The secretary of state may require any other information on the
form he or she deems appropriate to facilitate the filing process.

Sec. 30 RCW 29A.24.100 and 2003 c 111 s 610 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The nominating petition authorized by RCW 29A.24.090 ((shall))
must be printed on sheets of uniform color and size, ((shall)) include
a place for each individual to sign and print his or her name and the
address, city, and county at which he or she is registered to vote, and
contain no more than twenty numbered lines((, and)).
(2) For candidates for nonpartisan office and candidates of a major
political party for partisan office, the nominating petition must be in
substantially the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

We, the undersigned registered voters of (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision for which the nomination is
made) , hereby petition that the name of (candidate's name) be
printed on the official primary ballot for the office of (insert
name of office) .

((The petition must include a place for each individual to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.))

(3) For independent candidates and candidates of a minor political
party for partisan office, the nominating petition must be in
substantially the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

We, the undersigned registered voters of . . . (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision for which the nomination is
made) . . ., hereby petition that the name of . . . (candidate's name)
. . . be printed on the official general election ballot for the office
of . . . (insert name of office) . . ..

Sec. 31 RCW 29A.24.130 and 2003 c 111 s 613 are each amended to
read as follows:
A candidate may withdraw his or her declaration of candidacy at any
time before the close of business on the Thursday following the last
day for candidates to file under RCW 29A.24.050 by filing, with the
officer with whom the declaration of candidacy was filed, a signed
request that his or her name not be printed on the ballot. There shall
be no withdrawal period for declarations of candidacy filed during
special filing periods held under this title. The filing officer may
permit the withdrawal of a filing for the office of precinct committee
officer at the request of the candidate at any time if no absentee
ballots have been issued for that office and the ((general election))
party ballots for that precinct have not been printed. The filing
officer may permit the withdrawal of a filing for any elected office of
a city, town, or special district at the request of the candidate at
any time before a primary if the primary ballots for that city, town,
or special district have not been ordered. No filing fee may be
refunded to any candidate who withdraws under this section. Notice of
the deadline for withdrawal of candidacy and that the filing fee is not
refundable shall be given to each candidate at the time he or she
files.

Sec. 32 RCW 29A.24.210 and 2003 c 111 s 621 are each amended to
read as follows:
Filings for a partisan elective office shall be opened for a period
of three normal business days whenever, on or after the first day of
the regular filing period and before the sixth Tuesday prior to a
primary, a vacancy occurs in that office, leaving an unexpired term to
be filled by an election for which filings have not been held.
Any such special three-day filing period shall be fixed by the
election officer with whom declarations of candidacy for that office
are filed. The election officer shall give notice of the special
three-day filing period by notifying the press, radio, and television
in the county or counties involved, and by such other means as may be
required by law.
Candidacies validly filed within the special three-day filing
period shall appear on the ((primary)) ballot as if filed during the
regular filing period.

Sec. 33 RCW 29A.24.310 and 2003 c 111 s 622 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who desires to be a write-in candidate and have such
votes counted at a primary or election may file a declaration of
candidacy with the officer designated in RCW 29A.24.070 not later than
the day before the primary or election. Declarations of candidacy for
write-in candidates must be accompanied by a filing fee in the same
manner as required of other candidates filing for the office as
provided in RCW 29A.24.090.
Votes cast for write-in candidates who have filed such declarations
of candidacy and write-in votes for persons appointed by major
political parties pursuant to RCW 29A.28.020 need only specify the name
of the candidate in the appropriate location on the ballot in order to
be counted. Write-in votes cast for any other candidate, in order to
be counted, must designate the office sought and position number or
political party, if the manner in which the write-in is done does not
make the office or position clear. In order for write-in votes to be
valid in jurisdictions employing optical-scan mark sense ballot systems
the voter must complete the proper mark next to the write-in line for
that office.
No person may file as a write-in candidate where:
(1) At a general election, the person attempting to file either
filed as a write-in candidate for the same office at the preceding
primary or the person's name appeared on the ballot for the same office
at the preceding primary;
(2) The person attempting to file as a write-in candidate has
already filed a valid write-in declaration for that primary or
election, unless one or the other of the two filings is for the office
of precinct committeeperson;
(3) The name of the person attempting to file already appears on
the ballot as a candidate for another office, unless one of the two
offices for which he or she is a candidate is precinct committeeperson.
The declaration of candidacy shall be similar to that required by
RCW 29A.24.030. No write-in candidate filing under this section may be
included in any voter's pamphlet produced under chapter 29A.32 RCW
unless that candidate qualifies to have his or her name printed on the
general election ballot. The legislative authority of any jurisdiction
producing a local voter's pamphlet under chapter 29A.32 RCW may
provide, by ordinance, for the inclusion of write-in candidates in such
pamphlets.

Sec. 34 RCW 29A.28.040 and 2003 c 111 s 704 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the United States house of
representatives or the United States senate from this state, the
governor shall order a special election to fill the vacancy. Minor
political party candidates and independent candidates may be nominated
through the convention procedures provided in RCW 29A.20.110 through
29A.20.200.
(2) Within ten days of such vacancy occurring, he or she shall
issue a writ of election fixing a date for the special vacancy election
not less than ninety days after the issuance of the writ, fixing a date
for the primary for nominating major political party candidates for the
special vacancy election not less than thirty days before the day fixed
for holding the special vacancy election, fixing the dates for the
special filing period, and designating the term or part of the term for
which the vacancy exists. If the vacancy is in the office of United
States representative, the writ of election shall specify the
congressional district that is vacant.
(3) If the vacancy occurs less than six months before a state
general election and before the second Friday following the close of
the filing period for that general election, the special primary and
special vacancy elections shall be held in concert with the state
primary and state general election in that year.
(4) If the vacancy occurs on or after the first day for filing
under RCW 29A.24.050 and on or before the second Friday following the
close of the filing period, a special filing period of three normal
business days shall be fixed by the governor and notice thereof given
to all media, including press, radio, and television within the area in
which the vacancy election is to be held, to the end that, insofar as
possible, all interested persons will be aware of such filing period.
The last day of the filing period shall not be later than the third
Tuesday before the primary at which major political party candidates
are to be nominated. The names of major political party candidates who
have filed valid declarations of candidacy during this three-day period
shall appear on the approaching primary ballot. The requirements of
RCW 29A.20.130 do not apply to a minor political party or independent
candidate convention held under this subsection.
(5) If the vacancy occurs later than the second Friday following
the close of the filing period, a special primary ((and)), special
vacancy election, and the minor party and independent candidate
conventions to fill the position shall be held after the next state
general election but, in any event, no later than the ninetieth day
following the November election.

Sec. 35 RCW 29A.28.060 and 2003 c 111 s 706 are each amended to
read as follows:
The general election laws and laws relating to partisan primaries
shall apply to the special primaries and vacancy elections provided for
in RCW 29A.28.040 through 29A.28.050 to the extent that they are not
inconsistent with the provisions of these sections. Minor political
party and independent candidates may appear only on the general
election ballot. Statutory time deadlines relating to availability of
absentee ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures
that cannot be met in a timely fashion may be modified for the purposes
of a specific primary or vacancy election under this chapter by the
secretary of state through emergency rules adopted under RCW
29A.04.610.

Sec. 36 RCW 29A.28.070 and 2003 c 111 s 707 are each amended to
read as follows:
If a vacancy occurs in the office of precinct committee officer by
reason of death, resignation, or disqualification of the incumbent, or
because of failure to elect, the respective county chair of the county
central committee shall fill the vacancy by appointment. ((However, in
a legislative district having a majority of its precincts in a county
with a population of one million or more, the appointment may be made
only upon the recommendation of the legislative district chair.)) The
person so appointed must have the same qualifications as candidates
when filing for election to the office for that precinct. When a
vacancy in the office of precinct committee officer exists because of
failure to elect at a ((state general)) primary election, the vacancy
may not be filled until after the organization meeting of the county
central committee and the new county chair has been selected as
provided by RCW 29A.80.030.

Sec. 37 RCW 29A.32.030 and 2003 c 111 s 803 are each amended to
read as follows:
The voters' pamphlet must contain:
(1) Information about each ballot measure initiated by or referred
to the voters for their approval or rejection as required by RCW
29A.32.070;
(2) In even-numbered years, statements, if submitted, advocating
the candidacies of nominees for the office of president and vice
president of the United States, United States senator, United States
representative, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state,
state treasurer, state auditor, attorney general, commissioner of
public lands, superintendent of public instruction, insurance
commissioner, state senator, state representative, justice of the
supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or judge of the superior
court. Candidates may also submit a campaign mailing address and
telephone number and a photograph not more than five years old and of
a size and quality that the secretary of state determines to be
suitable for reproduction in the voters' pamphlet;
(3) In odd-numbered years, if any office voted upon statewide
appears on the ballot due to a vacancy, then statements and photographs
for candidates for any vacant office listed in subsection (2) of this
section must appear;
(4) In even-numbered years, a section explaining how voters may
participate in the election campaign process; the address and telephone
number of the public disclosure commission established under RCW
42.17.350; and a summary of the disclosure requirements that apply when
contributions are made to candidates and political committees;
(5) In even-numbered years the name, address, and telephone number
of each political party with nominees listed in the pamphlet, if filed
with the secretary of state by the state committee of a major political
party or the presiding officer of the convention of a minor political
party;
(6) In each odd-numbered year immediately before a year in which a
president of the United States is to be nominated and elected,
information explaining the precinct caucus and convention process used
by each major political party to elect delegates to its national
presidential candidate nominating convention. The pamphlet must also
provide a description of the statutory procedures by which minor
political parties are formed and the statutory methods used by the
parties to nominate candidates for president;
(7) ((In even-numbered years, a description of the office of
precinct committee officer and its duties)) A section explaining how to
register to vote, the option of affiliating with a major political
party, and the fact that party affiliation is not required in order to
register to vote;
(8) An application form for an absentee ballot;
(9) A brief statement explaining the deletion and addition of
language for proposed measures under RCW 29A.32.080;
(10) Any additional information pertaining to elections as may be
required by law or in the judgment of the secretary of state is deemed
informative to the voters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 A new section is added to chapter 29A.32
RCW to read as follows:
If the secretary of state prints and distributes a voters' pamphlet
for a primary in an even-numbered year, it must contain:
(1) A description of the office of precinct committee officer and
its duties;
(2) An explanation of whether each major political party is
allowing unaffiliated voters to participate in that party's partisan
primary; and
(3) An explanation that minor political party candidates and
independent candidates will appear only on the general election ballot.

Sec. 39 RCW 29A.32.240 and 2003 c 111 s 816 are each amended to
read as follows:
The local voters' pamphlet shall include but not be limited to the
following:
(1) Appearing on the cover, the words "official local voters'
pamphlet," the name of the jurisdiction producing the pamphlet, and the
date of the election or primary;
(2) A list of jurisdictions that have measures or candidates in the
pamphlet;
(3) Information on how a person may register to vote, the option of
affiliating with a major political party, the fact that party
affiliation is not required in order to register to vote, and how to
obtain an absentee ballot;
(4) The text of each measure accompanied by an explanatory
statement prepared by the prosecuting attorney for any county measure
or by the attorney for the jurisdiction submitting the measure if other
than a county measure. All explanatory statements for city, town, or
district measures not approved by the attorney for the jurisdiction
submitting the measure shall be reviewed and approved by the county
prosecuting attorney or city attorney, when applicable, before
inclusion in the pamphlet;
(5) The arguments for and against each measure submitted by
committees selected pursuant to RCW 29A.32.280;
(6) For partisan primary elections, an explanation of whether each
major political party is allowing unaffiliated voters to participate in
that party's partisan primary, and an explanation that minor political
party candidates and independent candidates will appear only on the
general election ballot.

Sec. 40 RCW 29A.36.010 and 2003 c 111 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
On or before the day following the last day for political parties
to fill vacancies in the ticket as provided by RCW 29A.28.010, the
secretary of state shall certify to each county auditor a list of the
candidates who have filed declarations of candidacy in his or her
office for the primary. For each office, the certificate shall include
the name of each candidate, his or her address, and his or her party
designation, if any. Minor political party and independent candidates
may appear only on the general election ballot.

Sec. 41 RCW 29A.36.100 and 2003 c 111 s 910 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except for the candidates for the positions of president and vice
president ((or)), for a partisan or nonpartisan office for which no
primary is required, or for independent or minor party candidates, the
names of all candidates who, under this title, filed a declaration of
candidacy((,)) or were certified as a candidate to fill a vacancy on a
major party ticket((, or were nominated as an independent or minor
party candidate)) will appear on the appropriate ballot at the primary
throughout the jurisdiction in which they are to be nominated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 A new section is added to chapter 29A.36
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Partisan primaries must be conducted using party ballots for
each major political party, as well as a nonpartisan ballot for the
nonpartisan offices and ballot measures to be voted on.
(2) In order to appear on a party ballot, a candidate must have
designated that same major political party in his or her declaration of
candidacy for partisan office.
(3) Every eligible registered voter, regardless of party
affiliation, may vote a nonpartisan ballot.
(4) A voter who is a registered party member of a political party
may vote the party ballot for that same political party, and may not
vote the party ballot for any other political party.
(5) An unaffiliated voter may vote the party ballot for a
particular political party if, by May 31st of that year, the state
chair of that political party has provided to the secretary of state a
signed statement consenting to the participation of unaffiliated voters
in that party's partisan primary.

Sec. 43 RCW 29A.36.110 and 2003 c 111 s 911 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every ballot for a single combination of issues ((and)), offices
((shall)), and candidates must be uniform within a precinct and
((shall)) identify the type of primary or election, the county, and the
date of the primary or election((, and)). The ballot or voting device
shall contain instructions on the proper method of recording a vote,
including write-in votes. Each position, together with the names of
the candidates for that office, shall be clearly separated from other
offices or positions in the same jurisdiction. The offices in each
jurisdiction shall be clearly separated from each other. No paper
ballot or ballot card may be marked in any way that would permit the
identification of the person who voted that ballot.

Sec. 44 RCW 29A.36.120 and 2003 c 111 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The positions or offices on a primary nonpartisan ballot
shall be arranged in substantially the following order: ((United
States senator; United States representative; governor; lieutenant
governor; secretary of state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney
general; commissioner of public lands;)) Superintendent of public
instruction; ((insurance commissioner; state senator; state
representative; county officers;)) justices of the supreme court;
judges of the court of appeals; judges of the superior court; and
judges of the district court. For all other jurisdictions on the
primary ballot, the offices in each jurisdiction shall be grouped
together and be in the order of the position numbers assigned to those
offices, if any.
(b) The positions or offices on a primary party ballot must be
arranged in substantially the following order: United States senator;
United States representative; governor; lieutenant governor; secretary
of state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney general;
commissioner of public lands; insurance commissioner; state senator;
state representative; and county officers. For all other jurisdictions
on the party primary ballot, the offices in each jurisdiction must be
grouped together and be in the order of the position numbers assigned
to those offices, if any.
(2) The order of the positions or offices on ((an)) a general
election ballot ((shall be substantially the same as on a primary
ballot except that)) must be arranged in substantially the following
order: United States senator; United States representative; governor;
lieutenant governor; secretary of state; state treasurer; state
auditor; attorney general; commissioner of public lands; superintendent
of public instruction; insurance commissioner; state senator; state
representative; county officers; justices of the supreme court; judges
of the court of appeals; judges of the superior court; and judges of
the district court. For all other jurisdictions on the general
election ballot, the offices in each jurisdiction must be grouped
together and be in the order of the position numbers assigned to those
offices, if any. State ballot issues must be placed before all offices
on a general election ballot, and the offices of president and vice
president of the United States shall precede all other offices on a
presidential election ballot. ((State ballot issues shall be placed
before all offices on an election ballot.)) The positions on a ballot
to be assigned to ballot measures regarding local units of government
shall be established by the secretary of state by rule.
(3) The political party or independent candidacy of each candidate
for partisan office shall be indicated next to the name of the
candidate on ((the)) party primary and general election ballots. A
candidate shall file a written notice with the filing officer within
three business days after the close of the filing period designating
the political party to be indicated next to the candidate's name on the
ballot if either: (a) The candidate has been nominated by two or more
minor political parties or independent conventions; or (b) the
candidate has both filed a declaration of candidacy declaring an
affiliation with a major political party and been nominated by a minor
political party or independent convention. If no written notice is
filed the filing officer shall give effect to the party designation
shown upon the first document filed. A candidate may be deemed
nominated by a minor party or independent convention only if all
documentation required by chapter 29A.20 RCW has been timely filed.

Sec. 45 RCW 29A.36.130 and 2003 c 111 s 913 are each amended to
read as follows:
After the close of business on the last day for candidates to file
for office, the filing officer shall, from among those filings made in
person and by mail, determine by lot the order in which the names of
those candidates will appear on ((all sample and absentee)) the
applicable ballots. ((In the case of candidates for city, town, and
district office, this procedure shall also determine the order for
candidate names on the official primary ballot used at the polling
place.)) The determination shall be done publicly and may be witnessed
by the media and by any candidate. If no primary is required for any
nonpartisan office under RCW 29A.52.010 or 29A.52.220, or if any
independent or minor party candidate files a declaration of candidacy,
the names shall appear on the general election ballot in the order
determined by lot.

Sec. 46 RCW 29A.36.150 and 2003 c 111 s 915 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except in each county with a population of one million or more, on
or before the fifteenth day before a primary or election, the county
auditor shall prepare a sample ballot which shall be made readily
available to members of the public. For a partisan primary, the county
auditor shall prepare sample party ballots and a sample nonpartisan
ballot. The secretary of state shall adopt rules governing the
preparation of sample ballots in counties with a population of one
million or more. The rules shall permit, among other alternatives, the
preparation of more than one sample ballot by a county with a
population of one million or more for a primary or election, each of
which lists a portion of the offices and issues to be voted on in that
county. The position of precinct committee officer shall be shown on
the sample ballot for the ((general election)) primary, but the names
of candidates for the individual positions need not be shown.

Sec. 47 RCW 29A.36.160 and 2003 c 111 s 916 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On the top of each ballot ((there will)) must be printed clear
and concise instructions directing the voter((s)) how to mark the
ballot, including write-in votes. ((After the instructions and before
the offices,)) Instructions on each nonpartisan ballot must explain
that every registered voter eligible to vote in the precinct,
regardless of party affiliation, may vote a nonpartisan ballot.
(2) The questions of adopting constitutional amendments or any
other state measure authorized by law to be submitted to the voters at
that election ((will be placed)) must appear after the instructions and
before any offices.
(3) In a year that president and vice president appear on the
general election ballot, the names of the candidates for president and
vice president for each political party must be grouped together with
a single response position for a voter to indicate his or her choice.
(((2))) (4) On a general election ballot, the candidate or
candidates of the major political party that received the highest
number of votes from the electors of this state for the office of
president of the United States at the last presidential election
((will)) must appear first following the appropriate office
heading((,)). The candidate or candidates of the other major political
parties will follow according to the votes cast for their nominees for
president at the last presidential election, and independent candidates
and the candidate or candidates of all other parties will follow in the
order of their qualification with the secretary of state.
(((3) The names of candidates for president and vice president for
each political party must be grouped together with a single response
position for a voter to indicate his or her choice.
(4))) (5) All paper ballots and ballot cards used at a polling
place must be sequentially numbered in such a way to permit removal of
such numbers without leaving any identifying marks on the ballot.

Sec. 48 RCW 29A.36.190 and 2003 c 111 s 919 are each amended to
read as follows:
The name of a candidate for a partisan office for which a primary
was conducted shall not be printed on the ballot for that office at the
subsequent general election unless, at the preceding primary, the
candidate receives a number of votes equal to at least one percent of
the total number of votes cast for all candidates for that ((position
sought)) office and a plurality of the votes cast for the candidates of
his or her party for that office ((at the preceding primary)).

Sec. 49 RCW 29A.40.060 and 2003 c 111 s 1006 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall issue an absentee ballot for the
primary or election for which it was requested, or for the next
occurring primary or election when ongoing absentee status has been
requested if the information contained in a request for an absentee
ballot or ongoing absentee status received by the county auditor is
complete and correct and the applicant is qualified to vote under
federal or state law. Otherwise, the county auditor shall notify the
applicant of the reason or reasons why the request cannot be accepted.
Whenever two or more candidates have filed for the position of precinct
committee officer for the same party in the same precinct ((at a
general election held in an even-numbered year)), the contest for that
position must be presented to absentee voters from that precinct by
either including the contest on the regular absentee ballot or a
separate absentee ballot. The ballot must provide space designated for
writing in the name of additional candidates.
(2) A registered voter may obtain a replacement ballot if the
ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received by the voter. The
voter may obtain the ballot by telephone request, by mail,
electronically, or in person. The county auditor shall keep a record
of each replacement ballot provided under this subsection.
(3) A copy of the state voters' pamphlet must be sent to registered
voters temporarily outside the state, out-of-state voters, overseas
voters, and service voters along with the absentee ballot if such a
pamphlet has been prepared for the primary or election and is available
to the county auditor at the time of mailing. The county auditor shall
mail all absentee ballots and related material to voters outside the
territorial limits of the United States and the District of Columbia
under 39 U.S.C. 3406.

Sec. 50 RCW 29A.40.090 and 2003 c 111 s 1009 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a
security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger
envelope in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on
how to mark the ballot and how to return it to the county auditor. If
more than one major political party is allowing unaffiliated voters to
participate in its partisan primary, the instructions that accompany an
absentee partisan primary ballot to an unaffiliated voter must include
an explanation that only one party ballot may be voted, and that if
more than one party ballot is voted, none of the party ballots will be
counted. The larger return envelope must contain a declaration by the
absentee voter reciting his or her qualifications and stating that he
or she has not voted in any other jurisdiction at this election,
together with a summary of the penalties for any violation of any of
the provisions of this chapter. The return envelope must provide space
for the voter to indicate the date on which the ballot was voted and
for the voter to sign the oath. A summary of the applicable penalty
provisions of this chapter must be printed on the return envelope
immediately adjacent to the space for the voter's signature. The
signature of the voter on the return envelope must affirm and attest to
the statements regarding the qualifications of that voter and to the
validity of the ballot. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and
service voters, the signed declaration on the return envelope
constitutes the equivalent of a voter registration for the election or
primary for which the ballot has been issued. The voter must be
instructed to either return the ballot to the county auditor by whom it
was issued or attach sufficient first class postage, if applicable, and
mail the ballot to the appropriate county auditor no later than the day
of the election or primary for which the ballot was issued.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.

Sec. 51 RCW 29A.44.200 and 2003 c 111 s 1119 are each amended to
read as follows:
A voter desiring to vote shall give his or her name to the precinct
election officer who has the precinct list of registered voters. This
officer shall announce the name to the precinct election officer who
has the copy of the inspector's poll book for that precinct. If the
right of this voter to participate in the primary or election is not
challenged, the voter must be issued a ballot or permitted to enter a
voting booth or to operate a voting device. At a partisan primary,
every eligible registered voter must be issued a nonpartisan ballot,
every voter who is a registered party member must be issued the party
ballot specific to his or her political party, and every unaffiliated
voter must be issued a party ballot for each major political party that
has consented to the participation of unaffiliated voters in its
partisan primary. An unaffiliated voter who receives multiple party
ballots must be orally reminded that only one party ballot may be
voted. The number of the ballot or the voter must be recorded by the
precinct election officers. If the right of the voter to participate
is challenged, RCW 29A.08.810 and 29A.08.820 apply to that voter.

Sec. 52 RCW 29A.44.220 and 2003 c 111 s 1121 are each amended to
read as follows:
On signing the precinct list of registered voters or being issued
a ballot, the voter shall, without leaving the polling place, proceed
to one of the voting booths or voting devices to cast his or her vote.
When the voter has finished, he or she shall either (1) remove the
numbered stub from the ballot, place the ballot in the ballot box, and
return the number to the precinct election officers, or (2) deliver the
entire ballot to the precinct election officers, who shall remove the
numbered stub from the ballot and place the ballot in the ballot box.
An unaffiliated voter in a partisan primary shall also return any
unvoted party ballots to the precinct election officers, who shall void
the unvoted party ballots and return them to the county auditor.

Sec. 53 RCW 29A.44.230 and 2003 c 111 s 1122 are each amended to
read as follows:
As each voter casts his or her vote, the precinct election officers
shall insert in the poll books or precinct list of registered voters
opposite that voter's name, a notation to credit the voter with having
participated in that primary or election. In a partisan primary, no
record may be made of which party ballot an unaffiliated voter voted,
or which party ballot or ballots an unaffiliated voter returned as
unvoted. The precinct election officers shall record the voter's name
so that a separate record is kept.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 54 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
Major political party candidates for all partisan elected offices,
except for president and vice president, precinct committee officer,
and offices exempted from the primary under RCW 29A.52.010, must be
nominated at primaries held under sections 55 through 58 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 55 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A major political party may choose, by rule, to allow
unaffiliated voters to participate in its primary. The rule may be
applied only on a statewide basis and with respect to all votes cast by
unaffiliated voters, rather than with respect to votes cast in specific
districts or races or for specific candidates. If a major political
party allows unaffiliated voters to participate in its primary, no
distinction may be made by the party or by a county canvassing board
between votes cast by registered party members and votes cast by
unaffiliated voters.
(2) By May 31st of each year, the state chair of a major political
party must provide the secretary of state with a signed statement
consenting to the participation of unaffiliated voters in that party's
primary in order to be in effect for any partisan primary conducted
between September 1st of the same year and August 30th of the following
year. Once adopted, such a rule is in effect until August 30th of the
following year.
(3) Unless the chair of a major political party provides the
secretary of state a signed statement by May 31st, under subsection (2)
of this section, only registered party members may vote the party
ballot specific to that political party.
(4) The decision by one major political party to allow unaffiliated
voters to participate in its primary does not affect the rights of any
other major political party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 56 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
In a partisan primary:
(1) Every eligible voter, regardless of party affiliation, may vote
a nonpartisan ballot. A nonpartisan ballot must include all ballot
measures and nonpartisan offices to be voted on.
(2) A voter who is a registered party member of a political party
may vote the party ballot for his or her political party, and may not
vote the party ballot for any other political party. A party ballot
must include all partisan offices to be voted on.
(3) An unaffiliated voter may vote the party ballot for a
particular political party if, by May 31st of that year, the state
chair of that political party has provided to the secretary of state a
signed statement consenting to the participation of unaffiliated voters
in that party's partisan primary. Only one party ballot may be voted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 57 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
So far as applicable, the provisions of this title relating to
conducting general elections govern the conduct of primaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 58 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
An explanation of whether each major political party is allowing
unaffiliated voters to participate in that party's partisan primary,
and instructions for voting a party ballot, must appear, at the very
least, in:
(1) Any primary voters' pamphlet prepared by the secretary of state
or a local government if a partisan office will appear on the ballot;
(2) Instructions that accompany a primary absentee party ballot;
(3) Any notice of a partisan primary published in compliance with
RCW 29A.52.310; and
(4) The web site of the office of the secretary of state and any
existing web site of a county auditor's office.

Sec. 59 RCW 29A.52.230 and 2003 c 111 s 1307 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The offices of superintendent of public instruction, justice of
the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the superior
court, and judge of the district court shall be nonpartisan and the
candidates therefor shall be nominated and elected as such.
(2) All city, town, and special purpose district elective offices
shall be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be nominated and
elected as such.
(3) Nonpartisan offices may appear in a primary only on a
nonpartisan ballot.

Sec. 60 RCW 29A.52.310 and 2003 c 111 s 1309 are each amended to
read as follows:
Not more than ten nor less than three days before the primary the
county auditor shall publish notice of such primary in one or more
newspapers of general circulation within the county. The notice must
contain the proper party designations, the names and addresses of all
persons who have filed a declaration of candidacy to be voted upon at
that primary, whether each major political party is allowing
unaffiliated voters to participate in its primary, an explanation that
minor political party and independent candidates will appear only in
the general election, the hours during which the polls will be open,
and the polling places for each precinct, giving the address of each
polling place. The names of all candidates for nonpartisan offices
must be published separately with designation of the offices for which
they are candidates but without party designation. This is the only
notice required for the holding of any primary.

Sec. 61 RCW 29A.52.320 and 2003 c 111 s 1310 are each amended to
read as follows:
No later than the day following the certification of the returns of
any primary, the secretary of state shall certify to the appropriate
county auditors((,)) the names of all persons nominated for offices((,
the returns of which have been canvassed by the secretary of state)) at
a primary, or at an independent candidate or minor party convention.

Sec. 62 RCW 29A.56.020 and 2003 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) On the fourth Tuesday in May of each year in which a president
of the United States is to be nominated and elected, a presidential
primary shall be held at which ((voters)) registered party members may
vote for the nominee of ((a)) their respective major political party
for the office of president. The secretary of state may propose an
alternative date for the primary no later than the first day of August
of the year before the year in which a president is to be nominated and
elected.
(2) No later than the first day of September of the year before the
year in which a presidential nominee is selected, the state committee
of any major political party ((that will use the primary results for
candidates of that party)) may propose an alternative date for that
primary.
(3) If an alternative date is proposed under subsection (1) or (2)
of this section, a committee consisting of the chair and the vice-chair
of the state committee of each major political party, the secretary of
state, the majority leader and minority leader of the senate, and the
speaker and the minority leader of the house of representatives shall
meet and, if affirmed by a two-thirds vote of the members of the
committee, the date of the primary shall be changed. The committee
shall meet and decide on the proposed alternate date not later than the
first day of October of the year before the year in which a
presidential nominee is selected. The secretary of state shall convene
and preside over the meeting of the committee. A committee member
other than a legislator may appoint, in writing, a designee to serve on
his or her behalf. A legislator who is a member of the committee may
appoint, in writing, another legislator to serve on his or her behalf.
(4) If an alternate date is approved under this section, the
secretary of state shall adopt rules under RCW 29A.04.620 to adjust the
deadlines in RCW 29A.56.030 and related provisions of this chapter to
correspond with the date that has been approved.
(5) No presidential primary may be held in 2004.

Sec. 63 RCW 29A.56.020 and 2003 c 111 s 1402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On the fourth Tuesday in May of each year in which a president
of the United States is to be nominated and elected, a presidential
primary shall be held at which ((voters)) registered party members may
vote for the nominee of ((a)) their respective major political party
for the office of president. The secretary of state may propose an
alternative date for the primary no later than the first day of August
of the year before the year in which a president is to be nominated and
elected.
(2) No later than the first day of September of the year before the
year in which a presidential nominee is selected, the state committee
of any major political party ((that will use the primary results for
candidates of that party)) may propose an alternative date for that
primary.
(3) If an alternative date is proposed under subsection (1) or (2)
of this section, a committee consisting of the chair and the vice-chair
of the state committee of each major political party, the secretary of
state, the majority leader and minority leader of the senate, and the
speaker and the minority leader of the house of representatives shall
meet and, if affirmed by a two-thirds vote of the members of the
committee, the date of the primary shall be changed. The committee
shall meet and decide on the proposed alternate date not later than the
first day of October of the year before the year in which a
presidential nominee is selected. The secretary of state shall convene
and preside over the meeting of the committee. A committee member
other than a legislator may appoint, in writing, a designee to serve on
his or her behalf. A legislator who is a member of the committee may
appoint, in writing, another legislator to serve on his or her behalf.
(4) If an alternate date is approved under this section, the
secretary of state shall adopt rules under RCW 29A.04.620 to adjust the
deadlines in RCW 29A.56.030 and related provisions of this chapter to
correspond with the date that has been approved.

Sec. 64 RCW 29A.56.030 and 2003 c 111 s 1403 are each amended to
read as follows:
The name of any candidate for a major political party nomination
for president of the United States shall be printed on the presidential
preference primary ballot of a major political party only:
(1) By direction of the secretary of state, who in the secretary's
sole discretion has determined that the candidate's candidacy is
generally advocated or is recognized in national news media; or
(2) If registered party members of the political party of the
candidate have presented a petition for nomination of the candidate
that has attached to the petition a sheet or sheets containing the
signatures of at least one thousand registered ((voters who declare
themselves in the petition as being)) party members affiliated with the
same political party as the presidential candidate. The petition shall
be filed with the secretary of state not later than the thirty-ninth
day before the presidential ((preference)) primary. The signature
sheets shall also contain the residence address and name or number of
the precinct of each registered ((voter)) party member whose signature
appears thereon and shall be certified in the manner prescribed in RCW
29A.72.230 and 29A.72.240.
The secretary of state shall place the name of the candidate on the
ballot unless the candidate, at least thirty-five days before the
presidential ((preference)) primary, executes and files with the
secretary of state an affidavit stating without qualification that he
or she is not now and will not become a candidate for the office of
president of the United States at the forthcoming presidential
election. The secretary of state shall certify the names of all
candidates who will appear on the presidential ((preference)) primary
ballot to the respective county auditors on or before the fourth
Tuesday in April of each presidential election year.

Sec. 65 RCW 29A.56.040 and 2003 c 111 s 1404 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except where necessary to accommodate the national or state
rules of a major political party or where this chapter specifically
provides otherwise, the presidential primary must be conducted in
substantially the same manner as a state partisan primary under this
title. Only registered party members of a major political party may
participate in that party's presidential primary.
(2) Except as provided under this chapter or by rule of the
secretary of state adopted under RCW 29A.04.620, the arrangement and
form of presidential primary ballots must be substantially as provided
for a partisan primary under this title. ((Whenever requested by a
major political party, a separate ballot containing only the candidates
of that party who have qualified under RCW 29A.56.030 must be provided
for a voter who requests a ballot of that party. A primary ballot,
containing the names of all the candidates who have qualified for a
place on the ballot under RCW 29A.56.030, must be provided for
nonaffiliated voters.)) All ballots used in a presidential primary
must be party ballots.
(3) The ballot must list alphabetically the names of all candidates
for the office of president. The ballot must indicate the political
party of each candidate adjacent to the name of that candidate. Each
ballot must include a blank space to allow the voter to write in the
name of any other candidate.
(4) A presidential primary ballot with votes for more than one
candidate is void, and notice to this effect, stated in clear, simple
language and printed in large type, must appear on the face of each
presidential primary ballot or on or about each voting device.

Sec. 66 RCW 29A.56.050 and 2003 c 111 s 1405 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) A major political party ((may, under national or state
party rules,)) must base the allocation of delegates from this state to
the national nominating convention of that party ((in whole or in part
on the participation in precinct caucuses and conventions conducted
under the rules of that party)) on the results of the presidential
primary.
(((2) If requested by a major political party, the secretary of
state shall adopt rules under RCW 29A.04.620 to provide for any
declaration required by that party.
(3) Voters who subscribe to a specific political party declaration
under this section must be given ballots that are readily
distinguishable from those given to other voters. Votes cast by
persons making these declarations must be tabulated and reported
separately from other votes cast at the primary and may be used by a
major political party in its allocation of delegates under the rules of
that party.
(4) For a political party that requires a specific voter
declaration under this section, the secretary of state shall prescribe
rules for providing, to the state and county committees of that
political party, a copy of the declarations or a list of the voters who
participated in the presidential nominating process of that party.))

Sec. 67 RCW 29A.56.060 and 2003 c 111 s 1406 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to available funds specifically appropriated for this
purpose, ((whenever a presidential primary is held as provided by this
chapter,)) the state of Washington shall assume all costs of holding
the primary if it is held alone. If any other election or elections
are held at the same time, the state is liable only for a prorated
share of the costs. The county auditor shall determine the costs,
including the state's prorated share, if applicable, in the same manner
as provided under RCW 29A.04.410 and shall file a certified claim with
the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall include in his or
her biennial budget requests sufficient funds to carry out this
section. Reimbursements for primary costs must be from appropriations
specifically provided by law for that purpose.

Sec. 68 RCW 29A.60.020 and 2003 c 111 s 1502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For any office at any election or primary, any voter may write
in on the ballot the name of any person for an office who has filed as
a write-in candidate for the office in the manner provided by RCW
29A.24.310 and such vote shall be counted the same as if the name had
been printed on the ballot and marked by the voter. In a partisan
primary, a voter may write in only the name of a write-in candidate
affiliated with the same major political party as designated on the
party ballot. No write-in vote made for any person who has not filed
a declaration of candidacy pursuant to RCW 29A.24.310 is valid if that
person filed for the same office, either as a regular candidate or a
write-in candidate, at the preceding primary. Any abbreviation used to
designate office, position, or political party shall be accepted if the
canvassing board can determine, to their satisfaction, the voter's
intent.
(2) The number of write-in votes cast for each office must be
recorded and reported with the canvass for the election.
(3) Write-in votes cast for an individual candidate for an office
need not be tallied if the total number of write-in votes cast for the
office is not greater than the number of votes cast for the candidate
apparently nominated or elected, and the write-in votes could not have
altered the outcome of the primary or election. In the case of write-in votes for statewide office or for any office whose jurisdiction
encompasses more than one county, write-in votes for an individual
candidate must be tallied whenever the county auditor is notified by
either the office of the secretary of state or another auditor in a
multicounty jurisdiction that it appears that the write-in votes could
alter the outcome of the primary or election.
(4) In the case of statewide offices or jurisdictions that
encompass more than one county, if the total number of write-in votes
cast for an office within a county is greater than the number of votes
cast for a candidate apparently nominated or elected in a primary or
election, the auditor shall tally all write-in votes for individual
candidates for that office and notify the office of the secretary of
state and the auditors of the other counties within the jurisdiction,
that the write-in votes for individual candidates should be tallied.

Sec. 69 RCW 29A.80.040 and 2003 c 111 s 2004 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any registered party member of a major political party who is a
registered voter in the precinct may upon payment of a fee of one
dollar file his or her declaration of candidacy as prescribed under RCW
29A.24.030 with the county auditor for the office of precinct committee
officer of his or her party in that precinct. When elected at the
primary, the precinct committee officer shall serve so long as the
committee officer remains an eligible voter in that precinct and until
a successor has been elected at the next ensuing state ((general))
primary election in the even-numbered year.

Sec. 70 RCW 29A.80.050 and 2003 c 111 s 2005 are each amended to
read as follows:
The statutory requirements for filing as a candidate at the
primaries apply to candidates for precinct committee officer, except
that the filing period for this office alone is extended to and
includes the Friday immediately following the last day for political
parties to fill vacancies in the ticket as provided by RCW 29A.28.010.
The office ((shall not)) must be voted upon at the primaries in even-numbered years, ((but)) and the names of all candidates must appear
under the proper ((party and)) office designation((s)) on the party
ballots ((for the general election for each even-numbered year, and)).
The one receiving the highest number of votes will be declared elected.
((However, to be declared elected, a candidate must receive at least
ten percent of the number of votes cast for the candidate of the
candidate's party receiving the greatest number of votes in the
precinct.)) The term of office of precinct committee officer is two
years, commencing upon completion of the official canvass of votes by
the county canvassing board of election returns.

Sec. 71 RCW 29A.80.060 and 2003 c 111 s 2006 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within forty-five days after the statewide general election in
even-numbered years, the county chair of each major political party
shall call separate meetings of all elected precinct committee officers
in each legislative district((, a majority of the precincts of which
are within a county with a population of one million or more)) for the
purpose of electing a legislative district chair in such district. The
district chair shall hold office until the next legislative district
reorganizational meeting two years later, or until a successor is
elected.
The legislative district chair may be removed only by the majority
vote of the elected precinct committee officers in the chair's
district.

Sec. 72 RCW 42.17.020 and 2002 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(2) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(3) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
((29.01.110)) 29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum
proposition proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any
municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other voting
constituency from and after the time when the proposition has been
initially filed with the appropriate election officer of that
constituency prior to its circulation for signatures.
(4) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(5) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has filed a valid certificate of
nomination with the secretary of state under chapter ((29.24)) 29A.20
RCW;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW ((29.01.090)) 29A.04.085, that is
the body authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise
authority on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(6) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.
(7) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(8) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(9) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(10) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(11) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.
(12) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services
of any kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW
42.17.241, the term "compensation" shall not include per diem
allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse
a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged
in the official business of the governmental entity.
(13) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee
that is an organization of continuing existence not established in
anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(14)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising prepared by a candidate, a
political committee, or its authorized agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the
individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-
kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(15) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or
special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill
a vacancy in any such office.
(16) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election
for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is
submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the
qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set
forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of
the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for
purposes of this chapter.
(17) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in
opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(18) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day
of December after the date of the last previous general election for
the office that the candidate seeks and ending on November 30th after
the next election for the office. In the case of a special election to
fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period
beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on November 30th
after the special election.
(19) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of
value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure"
also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of
value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or
anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring
any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or
opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter,
agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be
reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made. The
term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete repayment
by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a loan, the
receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(20) "Final report" means the report described as a final report in
RCW 42.17.080(2).
(21) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
election that results in the election of a person to a state office.
It does not include a primary.
(22) "Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.
(23) "Immediate family" includes the spouse, dependent children,
and other dependent relatives, if living in the household. For the
purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, "immediate family" means
an individual's spouse, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister
of the individual and the spouse of any such person and a child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half
brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse and the
spouse of any such person.
(24) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each
of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of five hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.
(25)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a
contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless the
contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family as
defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an
association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(26) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments,
nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of
the state legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the
subject of action by either house or any committee of the legislature
and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both houses, are
pending approval by the governor.
(27) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the
passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of
Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate,
or other legislative enactment of any state agency under the state
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor
"lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of
communicating with the members of that association or organization.
(28) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his or
her own or another's behalf.
(29) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom a
lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is compensated
for acting as a lobbyist.
(30) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint venture,
public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or local
governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(31) "Person in interest" means the person who is the subject of a
record or any representative designated by that person, except that if
that person is under a legal disability, the term "person in interest"
means and includes the parent or duly appointed legal representative.
(32) "Political advertising" includes any advertising displays,
newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles, tabloids,
flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other means of
mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing, directly or
indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support in any election
campaign.
(33) "Political committee" means any person (except a candidate or
an individual dealing with his or her own funds or property) having the
expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in
support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any ballot proposition.
(34) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
((procedure for nominating)) election that nominates a candidate to
state office ((under chapter 29.18 or 29.21 RCW or any other primary
for an election that uses, in large measure, the procedures established
in chapter 29.18 or 29.21 RCW)).
(35) "Public office" means any federal, state, county, city, town,
school district, port district, special district, or other state
political subdivision elective office.
(36) "Public record" includes any writing containing information
relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained
by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(37) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the
date of the filing of recall charges under RCW ((29.82.015)) 29A.56.120
and ending thirty days after the recall election.
(38) "State legislative office" means the office of a member of the
state house of representatives or the office of a member of the state
senate.
(39) "State office" means state legislative office or the office of
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general,
commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of
public instruction, state auditor, or state treasurer.
(40) "State official" means a person who holds a state office.
(41) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or
candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the possession
or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the election
for which the contributions were received, and that are in excess of
the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the committee
or candidate prior to that election. In the case of a continuing
political committee, "surplus funds" mean those contributions remaining
in the possession or control of the committee that are in excess of the
amount necessary to pay all remaining debts when it makes its final
report under RCW 42.17.065.
(42) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.
As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any
gender, the other, as the context requires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 73 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.04.903 (Effective date -- 2003 c 111) and 2003 c 111 s
2405;
(2) RCW 29A.36.140 (Primaries -- Rotating names of candidates) and
2003 c 111 s 914;
(3) RCW 29A.52.110 (Application of chapter) and 2003 c 111 s 1302;
(4) RCW 29A.52.120 (General election laws govern primaries) and
2003 c 111 s 1303;
(5) RCW 29A.52.130 (Blanket primary authorized) and 2003 c 111 s
1304; and
(6) RCW 29A.56.010 (Intent) and 2003 c 111 s 1401 & 1989 c 4 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 74 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 75 Sections 1 through 62 and 64 through 74 of
this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect immediately. Section 63
of this act takes effect January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 76 Section 62 of this act expires January 1,
2005.

--- END ---