BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47.020 and 2000 c 79 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of
enrollment and payment for basic health care services, administered by
the plan administrator through participating managed health care
systems, created by this chapter.
(2) "Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any
combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health
care services, as defined by the administrator and rendered by duly
licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the
plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations
under RCW 70.47.100(7).
(4) "Subsidized enrollee" means:
(a) An individual, or an individual plus the individual's spouse or
dependent children: (((a))) (i) Who is not eligible for medicare;
(((b))) (ii) who is not confined or residing in a government-operated
institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the
administrator; (((c))) (iii) who resides in an area of the state served
by a managed health care system participating in the plan; (((d))) (iv)
whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not exceed two
hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family
size and determined annually by the federal department of health and
human services; and (((e))) (v) who chooses to obtain basic health care
coverage from a particular managed health care system in return for
periodic payments to the plan((.)); or
(b) To the extent that state funds are specifically appropriated
for this purpose, with a corresponding federal match, (("subsidized
enrollee" also means)) an individual, or an individual's spouse or
dependent children, who meets the requirements in (a)(i) through (((c)
and (e))) (iii) and (v) of this subsection and whose gross family
income at the time of enrollment is more than two hundred percent, but
less than two hundred fifty-one percent, of the federal poverty level
as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal
department of health and human services.
(5) "Home care agency enrollee" means any employee of a home care
agency under contract with the department of social and health services
to provide home care services to elderly and disabled clients, who has
chosen to obtain basic health plan coverage as part of a home care
agency group. Home care agency group enrollment is available only to
the extent that specific funding is appropriated for this purpose.
(6) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an area of
the state served by a managed health care system participating in the
plan; (d) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a
particular managed health care system; and (e) who pays or on whose
behalf is paid the full costs for participation in the plan, without
any subsidy from the plan.
(((6))) (7) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of
periodic payment the administrator makes to a managed health care
system on behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost
to the plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the
amount determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under
RCW 70.47.060(2).
(((7))) (8) "Premium" means a periodic payment, based upon gross
family income which an individual, their employer or another financial
sponsor makes to the plan as consideration for enrollment in the plan
as a subsidized enrollee or a nonsubsidized enrollee. Premiums for
home care agency enrollees are set by the administrator under RCW
70.47.060(2)(c).
(((8))) (9) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the
administrator with and paid to a participating managed health care
system, that is based upon the enrollment of subsidized ((and)),
nonsubsidized, and home care agency enrollees in the plan and in that
system.
(10) "Home care agency" means a private or public agency or
organization that provides home care services directly to ill,
disabled, or infirm persons in places of temporary or permanent
residence, and is licensed by the department of health under RCW
70.127.020 as an in-home services agency that contracts with the
department of social and health services or its designees to provide
home services.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.47.030 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 913 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The basic health plan trust account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Any nongeneral fund-state funds collected for this
program shall be deposited in the basic health plan trust account and
may be expended without further appropriation. Moneys in the account
shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter, including
payments to participating managed health care systems on behalf of
enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of administering the plan.
During the 1995-97 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
funds from the basic health plan trust account to the state general
fund.
(2) The basic health plan subscription account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from amounts due from or
on behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees and home care agency enrollees
shall be deposited into the account. Funds in the account shall be
used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter, including payments
to participating managed health care systems on behalf of nonsubsidized
enrollees and home care agency enrollees in the plan and payment of
costs of administering the plan. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for expenditures.
(3) The administrator shall take every precaution to see that none
of the funds in the separate accounts created in this section or that
any premiums paid either by subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees are
commingled in any way, except that the administrator may combine funds
designated for administration of the plan into a single administrative
account.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.47.060 and 2001 c 196 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator has the following powers and duties:
(1) To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered
basic health care services, including physician services, inpatient and
outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications, and
other services that may be necessary for basic health care. In
addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency
services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services
shall increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by
more than five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office
of financial management. All subsidized ((and)), nonsubsidized, and
home care agency enrollees in any participating managed health care
system under the Washington basic health plan shall be entitled to
receive covered basic health care services in return for premium
payments to the plan. The schedule of services shall emphasize proven
preventive and primary health care and shall include all services
necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care. However, with
respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees who are eligible to
receive prenatal and postnatal services through the medical assistance
program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not contract
for such services except to the extent that such services are necessary
over not more than a one-month period in order to maintain continuity
of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the managed care provider. The
schedule of services shall also include a separate schedule of basic
health care services for children, eighteen years of age and younger,
for those subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees who choose to secure
basic coverage through the plan only for their dependent children. In
designing and revising the schedule of services, the administrator
shall consider the guidelines for assessing health services under the
mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030, and such other factors as
the administrator deems appropriate.
(2)(a) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due
the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall not
require the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for
the plan. The structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to
subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (9) of this section and to the share of the cost of the plan
due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees pursuant
to subsection (10) of this section.
(b) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
shall be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(c) To establish premiums due the administrator from home care
agency enrollees at an amount equal to the lowest premium paid by
subsidized enrollees under the structure of periodic premiums
established by the administrator under (a) of this subsection.
(d) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator.
(((d))) (e) To develop, as an offering by every health carrier
providing coverage identical to the basic health plan, as configured on
January 1, 2001, a basic health plan model plan with uniformity in
enrollee cost-sharing requirements.
(3) To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing
due a managed health care system from subsidized ((and)),
nonsubsidized, and home care agency enrollees. The structure shall
discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services,
and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing
mechanisms, but shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a
barrier to appropriate utilization of necessary health care services.
(4) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as
to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes.
Whenever the administrator finds that there is danger of such an
overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment until the
administrator finds the danger no longer exists.
(5) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as
defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who
qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the
administrator.
(6) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery
of services and availability of the plan to residents of the state,
subject to the limitations contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act
appropriating funds for the plan.
(7) To solicit and accept applications from managed health care
systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic
health care providers under the plan for ((either)) subsidized
enrollees, ((or)) nonsubsidized enrollees, or ((both)) home care agency
enrollees. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered
basic health care services are available to any enrollee of the plan
from among a selection of two or more participating managed health care
systems. In adopting any rules or procedures applicable to managed
health care systems and in its dealings with such systems, the
administrator shall consider and make suitable allowance for the need
for health care services and the differences in local availability of
health care resources, along with other resources, within and among the
several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who
become eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue
to receive services from their existing providers within the managed
health care system if such providers have entered into provider
agreements with the department of social and health services.
(8) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized
((and)), nonsubsidized, and home care agency enrollees, deposit them in
the basic health plan operating account, keep records of enrollee
status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health care systems
on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in the respective
managed health care systems.
(9) To accept applications from individuals residing in areas
served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their spouses and
dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan
as subsidized ((or)), nonsubsidized, or home care agency enrollees, to
establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as may
be necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a reasonable
schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any enrollee,
eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding scale
premiums. Funds received by a family as part of participation in the
adoption support program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100
through 74.13.145 shall not be counted toward a family's current gross
family income for the purposes of this chapter. When an enrollee fails
to report income or income changes accurately, the administrator shall
have the authority either to bill the enrollee for the amounts overpaid
by the state or to impose civil penalties of up to two hundred percent
of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly
reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules to define the
appropriate application of these sanctions and the processes to
implement the sanctions provided in this subsection, within available
resources. No subsidy may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose
current gross family income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or,
with the exception of home care agency enrollees and subsidized
enrollees as defined under RCW 70.47.020(4)(b), subject to RCW
70.47.110, who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care
services under chapter 74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their
enrollment for no apparent good cause, the administrator may establish
appropriate rules or requirements that are applicable to such
individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in the plan.
(10) To accept applications from business owners on behalf of
themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent children, as
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by
the plan. The administrator may require all or the substantial
majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in the
plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system.
The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an
amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for
medicare who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative
cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.
(11) To require that home care agencies pay an amount equal to the
cost charged by the managed health care system provider to the state
for the plan that an employee has chosen to enroll in as a home care
agency enrollee as defined in RCW 70.47.020(5), less the premium paid
by the home care agency enrollee, plus the administrative cost of
providing the plan to those enrollees.
(12) To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed
health care system in return for the provision of covered basic health
care services to enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of
covered basic health care services will be the same or actuarially
equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated with
participating managed health care systems may vary among the systems.
In negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator
shall consider the characteristics of the populations served by the
respective systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need
to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust account, and
other factors the administrator finds relevant.
(((12))) (13) To monitor the provision of covered services to
enrollees by participating managed health care systems in order to
assure enrollee access to good quality basic health care, to require
periodic data reports concerning the utilization of health care
services rendered to enrollees in order to provide adequate information
for evaluation, and to inspect the books and records of participating
managed health care systems to assure compliance with the purposes of
this chapter. In requiring reports from participating managed health
care systems, including data on services rendered enrollees, the
administrator shall endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed
health care systems and to the plan. The administrator shall
coordinate any such reporting requirements with other state agencies,
such as the insurance commissioner and the department of health, to
minimize duplication of effort.
(((13))) (14) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private
employer-based health care coverage and to take appropriate measures
consistent with state and federal statutes that will discourage the
reduction of such coverage in the state.
(((14))) (15) To develop a program of proven preventive health
measures and to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and
consistent with this chapter.
(((15))) (16) To provide, consistent with available funding,
assistance for rural residents, underserved populations, and persons of
color.
(((16))) (17) In consultation with appropriate state and local
government agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for
persons confined or residing in government-operated institutions.
(((17))) (18) To administer the premium discounts provided under
RCW 48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with the
Washington state health insurance pool.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.47.100 and 2000 c 79 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A managed health care system participating in the plan shall do
so by contract with the administrator and shall provide, directly or by
contract with other health care providers, covered basic health care
services to each enrollee covered by its contract with the
administrator as long as payments from the administrator on behalf of
the enrollee are current. A participating managed health care system
may offer, without additional cost, health care benefits or services
not included in the schedule of covered services under the plan. A
participating managed health care system shall not give preference in
enrollment to enrollees who accept such additional health care benefits
or services. Managed health care systems participating in the plan
shall not discriminate against any potential or current enrollee based
upon health status, sex, race, ethnicity, or religion. The
administrator may receive and act upon complaints from enrollees
regarding failure to provide covered services or efforts to obtain
payment, other than authorized copayments, for covered services
directly from enrollees, but nothing in this chapter empowers the
administrator to impose any sanctions under Title 18 RCW or any other
professional or facility licensing statute.
(2) The plan shall allow, at least annually, an opportunity for
enrollees to transfer their enrollments among participating managed
health care systems serving their respective areas. The administrator
shall establish a period of at least twenty days in a given year when
this opportunity is afforded enrollees, and in those areas served by
more than one participating managed health care system the
administrator shall endeavor to establish a uniform period for such
opportunity. The plan shall allow enrollees to transfer their
enrollment to another participating managed health care system at any
time upon a showing of good cause for the transfer.
(3) Prior to negotiating with any managed health care system, the
administrator shall determine, on an actuarially sound basis, the
reasonable cost of providing the schedule of basic health care
services, expressed in terms of upper and lower limits, and recognizing
variations in the cost of providing the services through the various
systems and in different areas of the state.
(4) In negotiating with managed health care systems for
participation in the plan, the administrator shall adopt a uniform
procedure that includes at least the following:
(a) The administrator shall issue a request for proposals,
including standards regarding the quality of services to be provided;
financial integrity of the responding systems; and responsiveness to
the unmet health care needs of the local communities or populations
that may be served;
(b) The administrator shall then review responsive proposals and
may negotiate with respondents to the extent necessary to refine any
proposals;
(c) The administrator may then select one or more systems to
provide the covered services within a local area; and
(d) The administrator may adopt a policy that gives preference to
respondents, such as nonprofit community health clinics, that have a
history of providing quality health care services to low-income
persons.
(5) The administrator may contract with a managed health care
system to provide covered basic health care services to ((either))
subsidized enrollees, ((or)) nonsubsidized enrollees, or ((both)) home
care agency enrollees, or any combination of the three.
(6) The administrator may establish procedures and policies to
further negotiate and contract with managed health care systems
following completion of the request for proposal process in subsection
(4) of this section, upon a determination by the administrator that it
is necessary to provide access, as defined in the request for proposal
documents, to covered basic health care services for enrollees.
(7)(a) The administrator shall implement a self-funded or self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized enrollees,
as provided under RCW 41.05.140, if one of the following conditions is
met:
(i) The authority determines that no managed health care system
other than the authority is willing and able to provide access, as
defined in the request for proposal documents, to covered basic health
care services for all subsidized enrollees in an area; or
(ii) The authority determines that no other managed health care
system is willing to provide access, as defined in the request for
proposal documents, for one hundred thirty-three percent of the
statewide benchmark price or less, and the authority is able to offer
such coverage at a price that is less than the lowest price at which
any other managed health care system is willing to provide such access
in an area.
(b) The authority shall initiate steps to provide the coverage
described in (a) of this subsection within ninety days of making its
determination that the conditions for providing a self-funded or self-insured method of providing insurance have been met.
(c) The administrator may not implement a self-funded or self-insured method of providing insurance in an area unless the
administrator has received a certification from a member of the
American academy of actuaries that the funding available in the basic
health plan self-insurance reserve account is sufficient for the self-funded or self-insured risk assumed, or expected to be assumed, by the
administrator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---