BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary may not transfer, change, or otherwise alter a
placement decision of a resident of any residential habilitation center
as defined in RCW 71A.20.020 except as provided in this section.
(2) If the secretary deems a change of placement is appropriate for
a resident of a residential habilitation center, the secretary shall
give written notice of the decision to change placement and reasons for
the change in placement as provided in RCW 71A.10.060. The notice
shall include a statement advising the recipient of his or her right to
object to the change of placement.
(3) If the resident objects to the change in placement, the
secretary shall not transfer, change, or otherwise alter the placement
of the resident.

--- END ---