BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.87.050 and 1994 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A licensee may apply to the association to purchase midwifery and
birth center malpractice insurance and the association shall offer a
policy with liability limits of ((one million)) five hundred thousand
dollars per claim and three million dollars per annual aggregate((, or
such other minimum level of mandated coverage as determined by the
department of health)). The insurance commissioner shall require the
use of a rating plan for midwifery malpractice insurance that permits
rates to be modified according to practice volume. Any rating plan for
midwifery malpractice insurance used under this section must be based
on sound actuarial principles. Coverage may not exclude midwives who
engage in home birth or birth center deliveries.

--- END ---