BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.31.100 and 2000 c 119 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has
committed or is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest
the person without a warrant. A police officer may arrest a person
without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
only when the offense is committed in the presence of the officer,
except as provided in subsections (1) through (10) of this section.
(1) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to any person
or property or the unlawful taking of property or involving the use or
possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition, possession, or
consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years
under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(2) A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that:
(a) An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge
under RCW 26.44.063, or chapter 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, 26.50, or
74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person has violated the terms
of the order restraining the person from acts or threats of violence,
or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or entering a
residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting the person
from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a
specified distance of a location or, in the case of an order issued
under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or conditions upon
the person; or
(b) A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has
been issued of which the person under restraint has knowledge and the
person under restraint has violated a provision of the foreign
protection order prohibiting the person under restraint from contacting
or communicating with another person, or excluding the person under
restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of
any provision for which the foreign protection order specifically
indicates that a violation will be a crime; or
(c) The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding
four hours has assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and the officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has
occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred which has resulted in bodily
injury to the victim, whether the injury is observable by the
responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action has
occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear
imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the
officer has probable cause to believe that family or household members
have assaulted each other, the officer is not required to arrest both
persons. The officer shall arrest the person whom the officer believes
to be the primary physical aggressor. In making this determination,
the officer shall make every reasonable effort to consider: (i) The
intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW 10.99.010;
(ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats
creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic
violence between the persons involved.
(3) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of any of the
following traffic laws shall have the authority to arrest the person:
(a) RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(b) RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(c) RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or
racing of vehicles;
(d) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(e) RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while
operator's license is suspended or revoked;
(f) RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a
negligent manner.
(4) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor
vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in
the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the
driver has committed in connection with the accident a violation of any
traffic law or regulation. Law enforcement officers driving motor
vehicles involved in accidents while on duty are not exempt from this
subsection.
(5) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW 79A.60.040
shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(6) An officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement
officer in whose presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop,
detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic infraction to the driver
who is believed to have committed the infraction. The request by the
witnessing officer shall give an officer the authority to take
appropriate action under the laws of the state of Washington. Law
enforcement officers driving motor vehicles involved in accidents while
on duty are not exempt from this subsection.
(7) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing any act of indecent exposure, as
defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the person.
(8) A police officer may arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that
an order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under
chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that order.
(9) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has, within twenty-four hours of the alleged violation,
committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 may arrest such person.
(10) A police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person illegally possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm or
other dangerous weapon on private or public elementary or secondary
school premises shall have the authority to arrest the person.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).
(11) Except as specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4),
and (6) of this section, nothing in this section extends or otherwise
affects the powers of arrest prescribed in Title 46 RCW.
(12) No police officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for
making an arrest pursuant to RCW 10.31.100 (2) or (8) if the police
officer acts in good faith and without malice.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.52.030 and 1997 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless a report is to be made by a law enforcement officer
under subsection (3) of this section, the driver of any vehicle
involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person
or damage to the property of any one person to an apparent extent equal
to or greater than the minimum amount established by rule adopted by
the chief of the Washington state patrol in accordance with subsection
(5) of this section, shall, within four days after such accident, make
a written report of such accident to the chief of police of the city or
town if such accident occurred within an incorporated city or town or
the county sheriff or state patrol if such accident occurred outside
incorporated cities and towns. Nothing in this subsection prohibits
accident reports from being filed by drivers where damage to property
is less than the minimum amount, where a law enforcement officer on
duty was the driver of the vehicle involved in the accident, or where
a law enforcement officer has submitted a report.
(2) The original of the report shall be immediately forwarded by
the authority receiving the report to the chief of the Washington state
patrol at Olympia, Washington. The Washington state patrol shall give
the department of licensing full access to the report.
(3) Any law enforcement officer who investigates an accident for
which a report is required under subsection (1) of this section shall
submit an investigator's report as required by RCW 46.52.070.
(4) The chief of the Washington state patrol may require any driver
of any vehicle involved in an accident, of which report must be made as
provided in this section, to file supplemental reports whenever the
original report in the chief's opinion is insufficient, and may
likewise require witnesses of any such accident to render reports. For
this purpose, the chief of the Washington state patrol shall prepare
and, upon request, supply to any police department, coroner, sheriff,
and any other suitable agency or individual, sample forms of accident
reports required hereunder, which reports shall be upon a form devised
by the chief of the Washington state patrol and shall call for
sufficiently detailed information to disclose all material facts with
reference to the accident to be reported thereon, including the
location, the circumstances, the conditions then existing, the persons
and vehicles involved, the insurance information required under RCW
46.30.030, personal injury or death, if any, the amounts of property
damage claimed, the total number of vehicles involved, whether the
vehicles were legally parked, legally standing, or moving, and whether
such vehicles were occupied at the time of the accident. Every
required accident report shall be made on a form prescribed by the
chief of the Washington state patrol and each authority charged with
the duty of receiving such reports shall provide sufficient report
forms in compliance with the form devised. The report forms shall be
designated so as to provide that a copy may be retained by the
reporting person.
(5) The chief of the Washington state patrol shall adopt rules
establishing the accident-reporting threshold for property damage
accidents. Beginning October 1, 1987, the accident-reporting threshold
for property damage accidents shall be five hundred dollars. The
accident-reporting threshold for property damage accidents shall be
revised when necessary, but not more frequently than every two years.
The revisions shall only be for the purpose of recognizing economic
changes as reflected by an inflationary index recommended by the office
of financial management. The revisions shall be guided by the change
in the index for the time period since the last revision.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.52.070 and 1999 c 351 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any police officer of the state of Washington or of any county,
city, town or other political subdivision, present at the scene of any
accident or in possession of any facts concerning any accident whether
by way of official investigation or otherwise shall make report thereof
in the same manner as required of the parties to such accident and as
fully as the facts in his possession concerning such accident will
permit.
(2) The police officer shall report to the department, on a form
prescribed by the director: (a) When a collision has occurred that
results in a fatality; and (b) the identity of the operator of a
vehicle involved in the collision when the officer has reasonable
grounds to believe the operator caused the collision.
(3) The police officer shall report to the department, on a form
prescribed by the director: (a) When a collision has occurred that
results in a serious injury; (b) the identity of the operator of a
vehicle involved in the collision when the officer has reasonable
grounds to believe the operator who caused the serious injury may not
be competent to operate a motor vehicle; and (c) the reason or reasons
for the officer's belief.
(4) Nothing in this section exempts a police report from being
completed and filed for an accident involving a law enforcement officer
while on duty.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.52.130 and 2003 c 367 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A certified abstract of the driving record shall be furnished
only to:
(a) The individual named in the abstract;
(b) An employer or prospective employer or an agent acting on
behalf of an employer or prospective employer, or a volunteer
organization for which the named individual has submitted an
application for a position that could require the transportation of
children under eighteen years of age, adults over sixty-five years of
age, or physically or mentally disabled persons;
(c) An employee or agent of a transit authority checking
prospective volunteer vanpool drivers for insurance and risk management
needs;
(d) The insurance carrier that has insurance in effect covering the
employer or a prospective employer;
(e) The insurance carrier that has motor vehicle or life insurance
in effect covering the named individual;
(f) The insurance carrier to which the named individual has
applied;
(g) An alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency approved by the
department of social and health services, to which the named individual
has applied or been assigned for evaluation or treatment; or
(h) City and county prosecuting attorneys.
(2) City attorneys and county prosecuting attorneys may provide the
driving record to alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies
approved by the department of social and health services to which the
named individual has applied or been assigned for evaluation or
treatment.
(3) The director, upon proper request, shall furnish a certified
abstract covering the period of not more than the last three years to
insurance companies.
(4) Upon proper request, the director shall furnish a certified
abstract covering a period of not more than the last five years to
state approved alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies, except
that the certified abstract shall also include records of alcohol-related offenses as defined in RCW 46.01.260(2) covering a period of
not more than the last ten years.
(5) Upon proper request, a certified abstract of the full driving
record maintained by the department shall be furnished to a city or
county prosecuting attorney, to the individual named in the abstract,
to an employer or prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of
an employer or prospective employer of the named individual, or to a
volunteer organization for which the named individual has submitted an
application for a position that could require the transportation of
children under eighteen years of age, adults over sixty-five years of
age, or physically or mentally disabled persons, or to an employee or
agent of a transit authority checking prospective volunteer vanpool
drivers for insurance and risk management needs.
(6) The abstract, whenever possible, shall include:
(a) An enumeration of motor vehicle accidents in which the person
was driving;
(b) The total number of vehicles involved;
(c) Whether the vehicles were legally parked or moving;
(d) Whether the vehicles were occupied at the time of the accident;
(e) Whether the accident resulted in any fatality;
(f) Any reported convictions, forfeitures of bail, or findings that
an infraction was committed based upon a violation of any motor vehicle
law;
(g) The status of the person's driving privilege in this state; and
(h) Any reports of failure to appear in response to a traffic
citation or failure to respond to a notice of infraction served upon
the named individual by an arresting officer.
(7) Certified abstracts furnished to prosecutors and alcohol/drug
assessment or treatment agencies shall also indicate whether a recorded
violation is an alcohol-related offense as defined in RCW 46.01.260(2)
that was originally charged as one of the alcohol-related offenses
designated in RCW 46.01.260(2)(b)(i).
(8) The abstract provided to the insurance company shall exclude
any information, except that related to the commission of misdemeanors
or felonies by the individual, pertaining to ((law enforcement officers
or)) fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030((, or any officer of the
Washington state patrol,)) while driving official vehicles in the
performance of occupational duty. The abstract provided to the
insurance company shall include convictions for RCW 46.61.5249 and
46.61.525 except that the abstract shall report them only as negligent
driving without reference to whether they are for first or second
degree negligent driving. The abstract provided to the insurance
company shall exclude any deferred prosecution under RCW 10.05.060,
except that if a person is removed from a deferred prosecution under
RCW 10.05.090, the abstract shall show the deferred prosecution as well
as the removal.
(9) The director shall collect for each abstract the sum of five
dollars, which shall be deposited in the highway safety fund.
(10) Any insurance company or its agent receiving the certified
abstract shall use it exclusively for its own underwriting purposes and
shall not divulge any of the information contained in it to a third
party. No policy of insurance may be canceled, nonrenewed, denied, or
have the rate increased on the basis of such information unless the
policyholder was determined to be at fault. No insurance company or
its agent for underwriting purposes relating to the operation of
commercial motor vehicles may use any information contained in the
abstract relative to any person's operation of motor vehicles while not
engaged in such employment, nor may any insurance company or its agent
for underwriting purposes relating to the operation of noncommercial
motor vehicles use any information contained in the abstract relative
to any person's operation of commercial motor vehicles.
(11) Any employer or prospective employer or an agent acting on
behalf of an employer or prospective employer, or a volunteer
organization for which the named individual has submitted an
application for a position that could require the transportation of
children under eighteen years of age, adults over sixty-five years of
age, or physically or mentally disabled persons, receiving the
certified abstract shall use it exclusively for his or her own purpose
to determine whether the licensee should be permitted to operate a
commercial vehicle or school bus, or operate a vehicle for a volunteer
organization for purposes of transporting children under eighteen years
of age, adults over sixty-five years of age, or physically or mentally
disabled persons, upon the public highways of this state and shall not
divulge any information contained in it to a third party.
(12) Any employee or agent of a transit authority receiving a
certified abstract for its vanpool program shall use it exclusively for
determining whether the volunteer licensee meets those insurance and
risk management requirements necessary to drive a vanpool vehicle. The
transit authority may not divulge any information contained in the
abstract to a third party.
(13) Any alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency approved by
the department of social and health services receiving the certified
abstract shall use it exclusively for the purpose of assisting its
employees in making a determination as to what level of treatment, if
any, is appropriate. The agency, or any of its employees, shall not
divulge any information contained in the abstract to a third party.
(14) Release of a certified abstract of the driving record of an
employee, prospective employee, or prospective volunteer requires a
statement signed by: (a) The employee, prospective employee, or
prospective volunteer that authorizes the release of the record, and
(b) the employer or volunteer organization attesting that the
information is necessary to determine whether the licensee should be
employed to operate a commercial vehicle or school bus, or operate a
vehicle for a volunteer organization for purposes of transporting
children under eighteen years of age, adults over sixty-five years of
age, or physically or mentally disabled persons, upon the public
highways of this state. If the employer or prospective employer
authorizes an agent to obtain this information on their behalf, this
must be noted in the statement.
(15) Any negligent violation of this section is a gross
misdemeanor.
(16) Any intentional violation of this section is a class C felony.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.63.030 and 2002 c 279 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A law enforcement officer has the authority to issue a notice
of traffic infraction:
(a) When the infraction is committed in the officer's presence;
(b) When the officer is acting upon the request of a law
enforcement officer in whose presence the traffic infraction was
committed; or
(c) If an officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle
accident has reasonable cause to believe that the driver of a motor
vehicle involved in the accident has committed a traffic infraction.
(2) A court may issue a notice of traffic infraction upon receipt
of a written statement of the officer that there is reasonable cause to
believe that an infraction was committed.
(3) Nothing in subsection (1) or (2) of this section precludes a
law enforcement officer who is driving a motor vehicle involved in an
accident while on duty from being issued a traffic citation if the law
enforcement officer is at fault or otherwise caused the accident.
(4) If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked,
standing, or stopped in violation of this title or an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution, the officer finding the vehicle shall take its registration
number and may take any other information displayed on the vehicle
which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to the
vehicle a notice of traffic infraction.
(((4))) (5) In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle
under RCW 46.55.120, upon receiving a complaint by a registered tow
truck operator that has incurred costs in removing, storing, and
disposing of an abandoned vehicle, an officer of the law enforcement
agency responsible for directing the removal of the vehicle shall send
a notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known address of
the person responsible under RCW 46.55.105. The notice must be
entitled "Littering -- Abandoned Vehicle" and give notice of the monetary
penalty. The officer shall append to the notice of infraction, on a
form prescribed by the department of licensing, a notice indicating the
amount of costs incurred as a result of removing, storing, and
disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at
auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction
will not be considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty
payable under this chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied
that the person has made restitution in the amount of the deficiency
remaining after disposal of the vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---