BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1 - PRIMARY
Sec. 101 RCW 29A.04.007 and 2003 c 111 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this title:
(1) "Ballot" means, as the context implies, either:
(a) The issues and offices to be voted upon in a jurisdiction or
portion of a jurisdiction at a particular primary, general election, or
special election;
(b) A facsimile of the contents of a particular ballot whether
printed on a paper ballot or ballot card or as part of a voting machine
or voting device;
(c) A physical or electronic record of the choices of an individual
voter in a particular primary, general election, or special election;
or
(d) The physical document on which the voter's choices are to be
recorded;
(2) "Paper ballot" means a piece of paper on which the ballot for
a particular election or primary has been printed, on which a voter may
record his or her choices for any candidate or for or against any
measure, and that is to be tabulated manually;
(3) "Ballot card" means any type of card or piece of paper of any
size on which a voter may record his or her choices for any candidate
and for or against any measure and that is to be tabulated on a vote
tallying system;
(4) "Sample ballot" means a printed facsimile of all the issues and
offices on the ballot in a jurisdiction and is intended to give voters
notice of the issues, offices, and candidates that are to be voted on
at a particular primary, general election, or special election;
(5) "Provisional ballot" means a ballot issued to a voter at the
polling place on election day by the precinct election board, for one
of the following reasons:
(a) The voter's name does not appear in the poll book;
(b) There is an indication in the poll book that the voter has
requested an absentee ballot, but the voter wishes to vote at the
polling place;
(c) The voter asserts that he or she is registered in a different
major political party from what appears in the poll book and wants to
vote the party ballot of that different party;
(d) There is a question on the part of the voter concerning the
issues or candidates on which the voter is qualified to vote;
(6) "Party ballot" means a primary election ballot specific to a
particular major political party listing all partisan offices to be
voted on at that primary, and the candidates for those offices who
affiliate with that same major political party, together with all
nonpartisan races and ballot measures to be voted on at a primary;
(7) "Nonpartisan ballot" means a primary election ballot listing
only nonpartisan races and ballot measures to be voted on at that
primary election.
(8) "Party not participating in the primary" means: (a) A minor
political party; or (b) a major political party if that major political
party is required by section 301 or 302 of this act to nominate its
candidates pursuant to RCW 29A.20.110 through 29A.20.200.
(9) "Party participating in the primary" means a major political
party that is nominating its candidates pursuant to sections 157
through 160 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 29A.04
RCW to read as follows:
"Registered party member" means a registered voter who chooses to
affiliate with a political party as part of his or her voter
registration. Party affiliation as part of voter registration includes
major and minor political parties. A registered voter is not required
to affiliate with a political party to be eligible to vote in a primary
or election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to chapter 29A.04
RCW to read as follows:
"Unaffiliated voter" means a registered voter who is not a
registered party member of any major political party.

Sec. 104 RCW 29A.04.215 and 2003 c 111 s 134 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor of each county shall be ex officio the
supervisor of all primaries and elections, general or special, and it
shall be the county auditor's duty to provide places for holding such
primaries and elections; to appoint the precinct election officers and
to provide for their compensation; to provide the supplies and
materials necessary for the conduct of elections to the precinct
election officers; and to publish and post notices of calling such
primaries and elections in the manner provided by law. The notice of
a ((general election)) primary held in an even-numbered year must
indicate that the office of precinct committee officer will be on the
party ballot. The auditor shall also apportion to each city, town, or
district, and to the state of Washington in the odd-numbered year, its
share of the expense of such primaries and elections. This section
does not apply to general or special elections for any city, town, or
district that is not subject to RCW 29A.04.320 and 29A.04.330, but all
such elections must be held and conducted at the time, in the manner,
and by the officials (with such notice, requirements for filing for
office, and certifications by local officers) as provided and required
by the laws governing such elections.

Sec. 105 RCW 29A.04.310 and 2003 c 111 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nominating primaries for general elections to be held in November,
and the election of precinct committee officers, must be held on the
third Tuesday of the preceding September or on the seventh Tuesday
immediately preceding such general election, whichever occurs first.

Sec. 106 RCW 29A.04.320 and 2003 c 111 s 144 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All state, county, city, town, and district general elections
for the election of federal, state, legislative, judicial, county,
city, town, and district((, and precinct)) officers, and for the
submission to the voters of the state, county, city, town, or district
of any measure for their adoption and approval or rejection, shall be
held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November, in the
year in which they may be called. A statewide general election shall
be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November of each
year. However, the statewide general election held in odd-numbered
years shall be limited to (a) city, town, and district general
elections as provided for in RCW 29A.04.330, or as otherwise provided
by law; (b) the election of federal officers for the remainder of any
unexpired terms in the membership of either branch of the Congress of
the United States; (c) the election of state and county officers for
the remainder of any unexpired terms of offices created by or whose
duties are described in Article II, section 15, Article III, sections
16, 17, 19, 20, 21, 22, and 23, and Article IV, sections 3 and 5 of the
state Constitution and RCW 2.06.080; (d) the election of county
officers in any county governed by a charter containing provisions
calling for general county elections at this time; and (e) the approval
or rejection of state measures, including proposed constitutional
amendments, matters pertaining to any proposed constitutional
convention, initiative measures and referendum measures proposed by the
electorate, referendum bills, and any other matter provided by the
legislature for submission to the electorate.
(2) A county legislative authority may, if it deems an emergency to
exist, call a special county election by presenting a resolution to the
county auditor at least forty-five days prior to the proposed election
date. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a special
election called by the county legislative authority shall be held on
one of the following dates as decided by such governing body:
(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;
(b) The second Tuesday in March;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(d) The third Tuesday in May;
(e) The day of the primary as specified by RCW 29A.04.310; or
(f) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) In addition to the dates set forth in subsection (2)(a) through
(f) of this section, a special election to validate an excess levy or
bond issue may be called at any time to meet the needs resulting from
fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God. Such county special
election shall be noticed and conducted in the manner provided by law.
(4) In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter
29A.56 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called by the
county legislative authority under subsection (2) of this section
during the month of that primary is the date of the presidential
primary.
(5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections except
for those elections held pursuant to a home-rule charter adopted under
Article XI, section 4 of the state Constitution. This section shall
not be construed as fixing the time for holding primary elections, or
elections for the recall of any elective public officer.

Sec. 107 RCW 29A.08.110 and 2003 c 111 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On receipt of an application for voter registration under this
chapter, the county auditor shall review the application to determine
whether the information supplied is complete. An application that
contains the applicant's name, complete valid residence address, date
of birth, and signature attesting to the truth of the information
provided on the application is complete. If it is not complete, the
auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice of the deficiency to
the applicant. This verification notice shall require the applicant to
provide the missing information. If the verification notice is not
returned by the applicant or is returned as undeliverable the auditor
shall not place the name of the applicant on the county voter list. If
the applicant provides the required information, the applicant shall be
registered to vote as of the date of mailing of the original voter
registration application. Party affiliation information is not
required for a complete voter registration.
(2) If the information is complete, the applicant is considered to
be registered to vote as of the date of mailing. The auditor shall
record the appropriate precinct identification, taxing district
identification, ((and)) date of registration, and party affiliation, if
any, on the voter's record. Within forty-five days after the receipt
of an application but no later than seven days before the next primary,
special election, or general election, the auditor shall send to the
applicant, by first class mail, an acknowledgement notice identifying
the registrant's precinct and party affiliation, if any, and containing
such other information as may be required by the secretary of state.
The postal service shall be instructed not to forward a voter
registration card to any other address and to return to the auditor any
card which is not deliverable. If the applicant has indicated that he
or she is registered to vote in another county in Washington but has
also provided an address within the auditor's county that is for voter
registration purposes, the auditor shall send, on behalf of the
registrant, a registration cancellation notice to the auditor of that
other county and the auditor receiving the notice shall cancel the
registrant's voter registration in that other county. If the
registrant has indicated on the form that he or she is registered to
vote within the county but has provided a new address within the county
that is for voter registration purposes, the auditor shall transfer the
voter's registration.
(3) If an acknowledgement notice card is properly mailed as
required by this section to the address listed by the voter as being
the voter's mailing address and the notice is subsequently returned to
the auditor by the postal service as being undeliverable to the voter
at that address, the auditor shall promptly send the voter a
confirmation notice. The auditor shall place the voter's registration
on inactive status pending a response from the voter to the
confirmation notice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the information required by RCW 29A.08.010 for voter
registration, the county auditor shall provide each voter an
opportunity to affiliate with a major political party by checking the
appropriate box, or to indicate that the voter wants to affiliate with
a minor political party not listed, as part of his or her voter
registration. A voter may choose any major or minor political party,
or may make no party selection. Under no circumstances may an
individual be required to affiliate with a political party in order to
register to vote. Each voter who chooses to affiliate with a major
political party as part of his or her voter registration is considered
a "registered party member" of that political party so long as he or
she maintains that affiliation as part of his or her voter
registration. A voter who does not affiliate with any major party on
his or her voter registration form will be considered to be an
unaffiliated voter. A voter may not affiliate with more than one
political party at a time, but may change his or her party affiliation
information in a manner consistent with the procedures for changing a
voter registration address, as provided in RCW 29A.08.140, 29A.08.145,
and 29A.08.430: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a change of party affiliation
made less than thirty days prior to a primary shall not be effective
until the day after the primary.
No record may be created or maintained by a state or local
governmental agency that identifies a voter with the votes cast by the
voter.

Sec. 109 RCW 29A.08.125 and 2003 c 111 s 209 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each county auditor shall maintain a computer file containing the
records of all registered voters within the county. The auditor may
provide for the establishment and maintenance of such files by private
contract or through interlocal agreement as provided by chapter 39.34
RCW. The computer file must include, but not be limited to, each
voter's last name, first name, middle initial, date of birth, residence
address, gender, party affiliation, if any, date of registration,
applicable taxing district and precinct codes, and the last date on
which the individual voted. The county auditor shall subsequently
record each consecutive date upon which the individual has voted and
retain at least the last five such consecutive dates. If the voter has
not voted at least five times since establishing his or her current
registration record, only the available dates will be included.

Sec. 110 RCW 29A.08.135 and 2003 c 111 s 211 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall acknowledge each new voter registration or
transfer of address or party affiliation by providing or sending the
voter a card identifying his or her current precinct and party
affiliation, if any, and containing such other information as may be
prescribed by the secretary of state. When a person who has previously
registered to vote in a jurisdiction applies for voter registration in
a new jurisdiction, the person shall provide on the registration form,
all information needed to cancel any previous registration. The county
auditor shall forward any information pertaining to the voter's prior
voter registration to the county where the voter was previously
registered, so that registration may be canceled. If the prior voter
registration is in another state, the notification must be made to the
state elections office of that state. A county auditor receiving
official information that a voter has registered to vote in another
jurisdiction shall immediately cancel that voter's registration.

Sec. 111 RCW 29A.08.140 and 2003 c 111 s 212 are each amended to
read as follows:
The registration files of all precincts shall be closed against
original registration or transfers of address or party affiliation for
thirty days immediately preceding every primary, special election, and
general election to be held in such precincts.
The county auditor shall give notice of the closing of the precinct
files for original registration and transfer and notice of the special
registration and voting procedure provided by RCW 29A.08.145 by one
publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at
least five days before the closing of the precinct files.
No person may vote at any primary, special election, or general
election in a precinct polling place unless he or she has registered to
vote at least thirty days before that primary or election. If a
person, otherwise qualified to vote in the state, county, and precinct
in which he or she applies for registration, does not register at least
thirty days before any primary, special election, or general election,
he or she may register and vote ((by absentee ballot)) for that primary
or election under RCW 29A.08.145.

Sec. 112 RCW 29A.08.145 and 2003 c 111 s 213 are each amended to
read as follows:
This section establishes a special procedure which an elector may
use to register to vote or change his or her voter registration address
during the period beginning after the closing of registration for
voting at the polls under RCW 29A.08.140 and ending on the fifteenth
day before a primary, special election, or general election. A
qualified elector in the ((county)) state may register to vote or
change his or her registration address in person in the office of the
county auditor or at a voter registration location specifically
designated for this purpose by the county auditor of the county in
which the applicant resides, and apply for an absentee ballot for that
primary or election. The auditor or registration assistant shall
register that individual in the manner provided in this chapter and
provide an absentee ballot. If the elector is not registered to vote
in Washington, and registers less than thirty days before a primary
election, the absentee ballot or ballots must comply with RCW
29A.40.090, and the elector's party affiliation, if any. The
application for an absentee ballot executed by the newly registered
voter for the primary or election that follows the execution of the
registration shall be promptly transmitted to the auditor with the
completed voter registration form.

Sec. 113 RCW 29A.08.210 and 2003 c 111 s 216 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application
providing the following information concerning his or her
qualifications as a voter in this state:
(1) The address of the last former registration of the applicant as
a voter in the state;
(2) The applicant's full name;
(3) The applicant's date of birth;
(4) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes;
(5) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the
same as the address in subsection (4) of this section;
(6) The sex of the applicant;
(7) A declaration that the applicant is a citizen of the United
States;
(8) The applicant's signature; and
(9) Any other information that the secretary of state determines is
necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and prevent
duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.
The application must also include a box for the applicant to check
in order to affiliate with a major political party or indicate
affiliation with a minor political party not listed. Affiliation with
a political party is not required for registration, and lack of party
affiliation may not be used as grounds for not registering an applicant
to vote.
This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to
be prescribed by the secretary of state.
If the applicant fails to provide the information required for
voter registration, the auditor shall send the applicant a verification
notice. The auditor shall not register the applicant until the
required information is provided. If a verification notice is returned
as undeliverable or the applicant fails to respond to the notice within
forty-five days, the auditor shall not register the applicant to vote.
The following warning shall appear in a conspicuous place on the
voter registration form:

"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter
registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your
qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class
C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, or by
a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both imprisonment and fine."
The voter registration form must include information on how to
affiliate with a political party, and the fact that party affiliation
is not required to register to vote.

Sec. 114 RCW 29A.08.340 and 2003 c 111 s 225 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person may register to vote((, transfer a voter
registration,)) or change his or her voter registration name ((for
voter registration purposes)), address, or party affiliation when he or
she applies for or renews a driver's license or identification card
under chapter 46.20 RCW.
(2) To register to vote((, transfer his or her voter
registration,)) or change his or her voter registration name ((for
voter registration purposes)), address, or party affiliation under this
section, the applicant shall provide the information required by RCW
29A.08.210.
(3) The driver licensing agent shall record that the applicant has
requested to register to vote or ((transfer a)) change voter
((registration)) address, or party affiliation.

Sec. 115 RCW 29A.08.350 and 2003 c 111 s 226 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall provide for the voter registration
forms submitted under RCW 29A.08.340 to be collected from each driver's
licensing facility within five days of their completion.
(2) The department of licensing shall produce and transmit to the
secretary of state a machine-readable file containing the following
information from the records of each individual who requested a voter
registration or transfer at a driver's license facility during each
period for which forms are transmitted under subsection (1) of this
section: The name, address, date of birth, gender, and driver's
license number of the applicant, the ((driver's license number))
applicant's party affiliation, if any, the date on which the
application for voter registration or transfer was submitted, and the
location of the office at which the application was submitted.
(3) The voter registration forms from the driver's licensing
facilities must be forwarded to the county in which the applicant has
registered to vote no later than ten days after the date on which the
forms were to be collected.
(4) For a voter registration application where the address for
voting purposes is different from the address in the machine-readable
file received from the department of licensing, the secretary of state
shall amend the record of that application in the machine-readable file
to reflect the county in which the applicant has registered to vote.
(5) The secretary of state shall sort the records in the machine-readable file according to the county in which the applicant registered
to vote and produce a file of voter registration transactions for each
county. The records of each county may be transmitted on or through
whatever medium the county auditor determines will best facilitate the
incorporation of these records into the existing voter registration
files of that county.
(6) The secretary of state shall produce a list of voter
registration transactions for each county and transmit a copy of this
list to that county with each file of voter registration transactions
no later than ten days after the date on which that information was to
be transmitted under subsection (1) of this section.
(7) If a registrant has indicated on the voter registration
application form that he or she is registered to vote in another county
in Washington but has also provided an address within the auditor's
county that is for voter registration purposes, the auditor shall send,
on behalf of the registrant, a registration cancellation notice to the
auditor of that other county and the auditor receiving the notice shall
cancel the registrant's voter registration in that other county. If
the registrant has indicated on the form that he or she is registered
to vote within the county but has provided a new address within the
county that is for voter registration purposes, the auditor shall
transfer the voter's registration.

Sec. 116 RCW 29A.08.360 and 2003 c 111 s 227 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of licensing shall provide information on all
persons changing their address on change of address forms submitted to
the department unless the voter has indicated that the address change
is not for voting purposes. This information will be transmitted to
the secretary of state each week in a machine-readable file containing
the following information on persons changing their address: The name,
address, date of birth, gender, and driver's license number of the
applicant, the applicant's ((driver's license number)) party
affiliation, if any, the applicant's former address, the county code
for the applicant's former address, and the date that the request for
address change was received.
(2) The secretary of state shall forward this information to the
appropriate county each week. When the information indicates that the
voter has moved within the county, the county auditor shall use the
change of address information to transfer the voter's registration and
send the voter an acknowledgement notice of the transfer. If the
information indicates that the new address is outside the voter's
original county, the county auditor shall send the voter a registration
by mail form at the voter's new address and advise the voter of the
need to reregister in the new county. The auditor shall then place the
voter on inactive status.

Sec. 117 RCW 29A.08.410 and 2003 c 111 s 228 are each amended to
read as follows:
((To maintain a valid voter registration,)) A registered voter who
changes his or her party affiliation, or residence from one address to
another within the same county, shall transfer his or her registration
((to the new address)) information in one of the following ways: (1)
Sending to the county auditor a signed request stating the voter's
present and previous party affiliation or registration address ((and
the address from which the voter was last registered)), as applicable;
(2) appearing in person before the auditor and signing such a request;
or (3) transferring the registration information in the manner provided
by RCW 29A.08.430((; or (4) telephoning the county auditor to transfer
the registration. The telephone call transferring a registration by
telephone must be received by the auditor before the precinct
registration files are closed to new registrations for the next primary
or special or general election in which the voter participates)). A
change in the voter's party affiliation made less than thirty days
prior to a primary election is not effective until the day after the
primary election.

Sec. 118 RCW 29A.08.430 and 2003 c 111 s 230 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who is registered to vote in this state may transfer
his or her voter registration information on the day of a special,
primary, or general election ((or primary)) under the following
procedures:
(a) The voter may complete, at the polling place, a registration
transfer form designed by the secretary of state and supplied by the
county auditor; or
(b) The voter may write in his or her new residential address in
the precinct list of registered voters.
The county auditor shall determine which of these two procedures
are to be used in the county or may determine that both procedures are
to be available to voters for use in the county.
(2) A voter who transfers his or her registration in the manner
authorized by this section shall vote in the precinct in which he or
she was previously registered.
(3) The auditor shall, within ninety days, mail to each voter who
has transferred a registration under this section a notice of his or
her current precinct and polling place.
(4) A change in the voter's party affiliation made less than thirty
days prior to a primary election is not effective until the day after
the primary election.

Sec. 119 RCW 29A.08.645 and 2003 c 111 s 244 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall create a standard electronic file
format (state transfer form) to be used for the transfer of voter
registration information between county auditors and the office of the
secretary of state. The format must be prescribed by rule and contain
at least the following information: Voter name, address, date of
birth, party affiliation, if any, date of registration, mailing
address, legislative and congressional district, and digitized
signature image. Each county shall program its voter registration
system to convert this data from the county's storage format into the
state transfer format.

Sec. 120 RCW 29A.08.710 and 2003 c 111 s 246 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall have custody of the voter registration
records for each county. The original voter registration form must be
filed without regard to precinct and is considered confidential and
unavailable for public inspection and copying. An automated file of
all registered voters must be maintained pursuant to RCW 29A.08.125.
An auditor may maintain the automated file in lieu of filing or
maintaining the original voter registration forms if the automated file
includes all of the information from the original voter registration
forms including, but not limited to, a retrievable facsimile of each
voter's signature.
(2) The following information contained in voter registration
records or files regarding a voter or a group of voters is available
for public inspection and copying: The voter's name, gender, voting
record, party affiliation, if any, date of registration, and
registration number. The address and political jurisdiction of a
registered voter are available for public inspection and copying except
as provided by chapter 40.24 RCW. No other information from voter
registration records or files is available for public inspection or
copying, including an unaffiliated voter's choice of ballot under RCW
29A.44.230.

Sec. 121 RCW 29A.12.100 and 2003 c 111 s 310 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall not approve a vote tallying system
unless it:
(1) Correctly counts votes on ballots on which the proper number of
votes have been marked for any office or issue;
(2) Ignores votes marked for any office or issue where more than
the allowable number of votes have been marked, but correctly counts
the properly voted portions of the ballot;
(3) Accumulates a count of the specific number of ballots tallied
for each precinct, total votes by candidate for each office, and total
votes for and against each issue of the ballot in that precinct;
(4) ((Accommodates rotation of candidates' names on the ballot
under RCW 29A.36.140;
(5))) Produces precinct and cumulative totals in printed form; and
(((6))) (5) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this
state, has been tested, certified, and used in at least one other state
or election jurisdiction.

Sec. 122 RCW 29A.20.020 and 2003 c 111 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person filing a declaration of candidacy for an office shall,
at the time of filing, be a registered voter and possess the
qualifications specified by law for persons who may be elected to the
office.
(2) Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a
temporary elected position such as a charter review board member or
freeholder, no person may file for more than one office. This
subsection does not apply to the office of a member of the United
States congress.
(3) The name of a candidate for an office shall not appear on a
ballot for that office unless, except as provided in RCW 3.46.067 and
3.50.057, the candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of
candidacy is filed, properly registered to vote in the geographic area
represented by the office, and, if seeking a partisan office, the
candidate is qualified to run as a candidate of the party indicated or
as an independent. For the purposes of this section, each geographic
area in which registered voters may cast ballots for an office is
represented by that office. If a person elected to an office must be
nominated from a district or similar division of the geographic area
represented by the office, the name of a candidate for the office shall
not appear on a primary ballot for that office unless the candidate is,
at the time the candidate's declaration of candidacy is filed, properly
registered to vote in that district or division. The officer with whom
declarations of candidacy must be filed under this title shall review
each such declaration filed regarding compliance with this subsection.
This subsection does not apply to the office of a member of the United
States Congress.
(4) ((This section does not apply to the office of a member of the
United States Congress)) For a primary conducted in 2004, if a person
filing a declaration of candidacy for a partisan office designates on
his or her declaration an affiliation with a major political party, he
or she must, at the time of filing, be a registered party member of
that major political party. Beginning January 1, 2005, if a person
filing a declaration of candidacy for a partisan office designates on
his or her declaration an affiliation with a major political party, he
or she must, at the time of filing: (a) Be a registered party member
of that major political party; and (b)(i) be qualified to run as a
candidate of that party according to the party's rules in effect on the
fifth day of March preceding the filing; (ii) submit a petition
substantially in the form required by RCW 29A.24.100(3) to the filing
officer containing the signatures of registered party members of at
least five percent of the registered party members of that party
residing within the jurisdiction of the office sought as of the March
1st preceding the filing; or (iii) meet any party rules in effect on
March 5th preceding the primary regarding the number of signatures
required for ballot eligibility, provided that such rules may not
exceed the five percent requirement of (b)(ii) of this subsection and
the signatures shall be submitted substantially in the form required by
RCW 29A.24.100(3). The candidate may gather petition signatures at any
time after the first day of February preceding the primary, and may
provide documentation and assistance to qualified electors desiring to
register to vote, affiliate with a political party, or change party
affiliation.
(5) If a person filing a declaration of candidacy for a partisan
office designates on his or her declaration an affiliation with a minor
political party or indicates that he or she is an independent
candidate, he or she may not, at the time of filing, be a registered
party member of any major political party.
(6) Within thirty days after the effective date of this section,
each major political party shall file with the secretary of state a
copy of its rules governing the eligibility of persons to seek election
to public office using the party's name. The secretary of state shall
place the text of the rules on its web site. A copy of any party's
rules shall be publicly available upon request. If a major political
party changes its rules governing the eligibility of persons to seek
the nomination of the party to public office, the amended rules must be
filed with the secretary of state and take effect no later than March
1st for purposes of any partisan primary conducted that year.

Sec. 123 RCW 29A.20.120 and 2003 c 111 s 506 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any nomination of a candidate for partisan public office by
((other than a major political party)) a party not participating in the
primary may be made only: (a) In ((a)) conventions held not earlier
than the last Saturday in ((June)) February and not later than the
first Saturday in July or during any of the seven days immediately
preceding the first day for filing declarations of candidacy as fixed
in accordance with RCW 29A.28.040; (b) as provided by RCW 29A.60.020;
or (c) as otherwise provided in this section. Candidates of a party
not participating in the primary and independent candidates may appear
only on the general election ballot.
(2) Nominations of candidates for president and vice president of
the United States other than by a major political party may be made
either at a convention conducted under subsection (1) of this section,
or at a similar convention taking place not earlier than the first
Sunday in July and not later than seventy days before the general
election. Conventions held during this time period may not nominate
candidates for any public office other than president and vice
president of the United States, except as provided in subsection (3) of
this section.
(3) If a special filing period for a partisan office is opened
under RCW 29A.24.210, candidates of ((minor political)) parties not
participating in the primary that year and independent candidates may
file for office during that special filing period. The names of those
candidates may not appear on the ballot unless they are nominated by
convention held no later than five days after the close of the special
filing period and a certificate of nomination is filed with the filing
officer no later than three days after the convention. The
requirements of RCW 29A.20.130 do not apply to such a convention. ((If
primary ballots or a voters' pamphlet are ordered to be printed before
the deadline for submitting the certificate of nomination and the
certificate has not been filed, then the candidate's name will be
included but may not appear on the general election ballot unless the
certificate is timely filed and the candidate otherwise qualifies to
appear on that ballot.))
(4) A ((minor political)) party not participating in the primary
may hold more than one convention but in no case shall any such party
nominate more than one candidate for any one partisan public office or
position. ((For the purpose of nominating candidates for the offices
of president and vice president, United States senator, or a statewide
office, minor party or)) A candidate of a party not participating in
the primary or an independent candidate holding multiple conventions
may add together the number of signatures of different individuals from
each convention obtained in support of the candidate or candidates in
order to obtain the number required by RCW 29A.20.140. ((For all other
offices for which nominations are made, signatures of the requisite
number of registered voters must be obtained at a single convention.))

Sec. 124 RCW 29A.20.140 and 2003 c 111 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To be valid, a convention must be attended by at least
((twenty-five)) one hundred registered voters, not including registered
party members of a party participating in the primary. A candidate of
a party not participating in the primary or an independent candidate
holding multiple conventions may add together the number of different
individuals attending different conventions in order to obtain the
required number of registered voters.
(2) In order to nominate candidates for the offices of president
and vice president of the United States, United States senator, or any
statewide office, a nominating convention shall obtain and submit to
the filing officer the signatures of at least ((two hundred)) one
thousand registered voters of the state of Washington, not including
the signatures of registered party members of a party participating in
the primary. A candidate of a party not participating in the primary
or an independent candidate holding multiple conventions may add
together the number of signatures of different individuals from
different conventions in order to obtain the required number of
required signatures. In order to nominate candidates for any other
office, a nominating convention shall obtain and submit to the filing
officer the signatures of ((twenty-five)) one hundred persons who are
registered to vote in the jurisdiction of the office for which the
nominations are made, none of whom may be registered party members of
a major political party.
(3) A person signing a nominating petition for a candidate of a
party not participating in the primary shall be limited to voting a
nonpartisan ballot at the subsequent primary election and may not vote
a party ballot.

Sec. 125 RCW 29A.20.150 and 2003 c 111 s 509 are each amended to
read as follows:
A nominating petition submitted under this chapter shall clearly
identify the name of the ((minor)) party not participating in the
primary or independent candidate convention as it appears on the
certificate of nomination as required by RCW 29A.20.160(3). The
petition shall ((also)) contain a statement that the person signing the
petition is a registered voter of the state of Washington and that the
person signing the petition will not be eligible to vote a party ballot
at the subsequent primary election. The petition shall also have a
space for the voter to sign his or her name and to print his or her
name and address. No person may sign more than one nominating petition
under this chapter for an office for ((a primary or)) an election.

Sec. 126 RCW 29A.20.160 and 2003 c 111 s 510 are each amended to
read as follows:
A certificate evidencing nominations made at a convention or
conventions must:
(1) Be in writing;
(2) Contain the name of each person nominated, his or her
residence, a statement that he or she is not a registered party member
of a party participating in the primary, and the office for which he or
she is named, and if the nomination is for the offices of president and
vice president of the United States, a sworn statement from both
nominees giving their consent to the nomination;
(3) Identify the ((minor political)) party not participating in the
primary or the independent candidate on whose behalf the convention was
held;
(4) Be verified by the oath of the presiding officer and secretary;
(5) Be accompanied by a nominating petition or petitions bearing
the signatures and addresses of registered voters equal in number to
that required by RCW 29A.20.140;
(6) Contain proof of publication of the notice of calling the
convention; and
(7) Be submitted to the appropriate filing officer not later than
one week following the adjournment of the convention at which the
nominations were made. If the nominations are made only for offices
whose jurisdiction is entirely within one county, the certificate and
nominating petitions must be filed with the county auditor. If a
((minor party)) convention of a party not participating in the primary
or independent candidate convention nominates any candidates for
offices whose jurisdiction encompasses more than one county, all
nominating petitions and the convention certificates must be filed with
the secretary of state.

Sec. 127 RCW 29A.20.170 and 2003 c 111 s 511 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For a general election or qualifying primary, if two or more
valid certificates of nomination are filed purporting to nominate
different candidates for the same position using the same party name or
confusingly similar party names, or if a valid certificate is filed
using the same party name as a party participating in the primary or a
name confusingly similar to the name of a party participating in the
primary, the filing officer must give effect to ((both)) all
certificates. If conflicting claims to the party name are not resolved
either by mutual agreement or by a judicial determination of the right
to the name, the candidates must be treated as independent candidates.
Disputes over the right to the name must not be permitted to delay the
printing of either ballots or a voters' pamphlet. Other candidates
nominated by the same conventions may continue to use the partisan
affiliation unless a court of competent jurisdiction directs otherwise.
(2) A person or party participating in the primary affected may
petition the superior court of the county in which the filing officer
is located for a judicial determination of the right to the name of a
minor political party, either before or after documents are filed with
the filing officer. The court shall resolve the conflict between
competing claims to the use of the same or similar party name according
to the following principles: (a) The prior established public use of
the name during previous elections by a party composed of or led by the
same individuals or individuals in documented succession; (b) prior
established public use of the name earlier in the same election cycle;
(c) the nomination of a more complete slate of candidates for a number
of offices or in a number of different regions of the state; (d)
documented affiliation with a national or statewide party organization
with an established use of the name; (e) the first date of filing of a
certificate of nomination; ((and)) (f) if the issue is whether the
names are confusingly similar, the likelihood of confusion on the part
of a reasonable voter; and (g) such other indicia of an established
right to use of the name as the court may deem relevant. If more than
one filing officer is involved, and one of them is the secretary of
state, the petition must be filed in the superior court for Thurston
county. Upon resolving the conflict between competing claims, the
court may also address any ballot designation for the candidate who
does not prevail. An action brought under this section has priority
over other docket items and shall be heard within seven days of filing
and the completion of service.
(3) This section also applies to candidates of a major political
party if the primary is being held under section 302 or 303 of this
act.

Sec. 128 RCW 29A.20.190 and 2003 c 111 s 513 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the receipt of the certificate of nomination, the officer with
whom it is filed shall check the certificate and canvass the signatures
on the accompanying nominating petitions to determine if the
requirements of RCW 29A.20.140 have been met. Once the determination
has been made, the filing officer shall notify the presiding officer of
the convention and any other persons requesting the notification, of
his or her decision regarding the sufficiency of the certificate or the
nominating petitions, and forward to the secretary of state the name
and address of all registered voters who have signed the nominating
petition. Any appeal regarding the filing officer's determination must
be filed with the superior court of the county in which the certificate
or petitions were filed not later than five days from the date the
determination is made, and shall be heard and finally disposed of by
the court within five days of the filing. Nominating petitions shall
not be available for public inspection or copying.

Sec. 129 RCW 29A.20.200 and 2003 c 111 s 514 are each amended to
read as follows:
Not later than the Friday immediately preceding the first day for
candidates to file, the secretary of state shall notify the county
auditors of the names and designations of all minor party and
independent candidates who have filed valid convention certificates and
nominating petitions with that office. The secretary of state shall
also forward to the appropriate county auditors the names and addresses
of all voters on the nominating petitions residing in that county.
Except for the offices of president and vice president, persons
nominated under this chapter shall file declarations of candidacy as
provided by RCW 29A.24.030 and 29A.24.070. The name of a candidate
nominated at a convention shall not be printed upon the ((primary))
general election ballot unless he or she pays the fee required by law
to be paid by candidates for the same office to be nominated at a
primary.

Sec. 130 RCW 29A.24.030 and 2003 c 111 s 603 are each amended to
read as follows:
A candidate who desires to have his or her name printed on the
ballot for election to an office other than president of the United
States, vice president of the United States, or an office for which
ownership of property is a prerequisite to voting shall complete and
file a declaration of candidacy. The secretary of state shall adopt,
by rule, a declaration of candidacy form for the office of precinct
committee officer and a separate standard form for candidates for all
other offices filing under this chapter. Included on the standard form
shall be:
(1) A place for the candidate to declare that he or she is a
registered voter within the jurisdiction of the office for which he or
she is filing, and the address at which he or she is registered;
(2) A place for the candidate to indicate the position for which he
or she is filing;
(3) A place for the candidate to indicate a party designation, if
applicable, and declare that he or she meets the requirements of RCW
29A.20.020 if the designation is a major political party;
(4) A place for the candidate to indicate the amount of the filing
fee accompanying the declaration of candidacy or for the candidate to
indicate that he or she is filing a nominating petition in lieu of the
filing fee under RCW 29A.24.090; and
(5) A place for the candidate to sign the declaration of candidacy,
stating that the information provided on the form is true and swearing
or affirming that he or she will support the Constitution and laws of
the United States and the Constitution and laws of the state of
Washington.
In the case of a declaration of candidacy filed electronically,
submission of the form constitutes agreement that the information
provided with the filing is true, that he or she will support the
Constitutions and laws of the United States and the state of
Washington, and that he or she agrees to electronic payment of the
filing fee established in RCW 29A.24.090.
The secretary of state may require any other information on the
form he or she deems appropriate to facilitate the filing process.

Sec. 131 RCW 29A.24.100 and 2003 c 111 s 610 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The nominating petition authorized by RCW 29A.24.090 ((shall))
must be printed on sheets of uniform color and size, ((shall)) include
a place for each individual to sign and print his or her name and the
address, city, and county at which he or she is registered to vote, and
contain no more than twenty numbered lines((, and)).
(2) For candidates for nonpartisan office, the nominating petition
must be in substantially the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

We, the undersigned registered voters of (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision for which the nomination is
made) , hereby petition that the name of (candidate's name) be
printed on the official primary ballot for the office of (insert
name of office) .

((The petition must include a place for each individual to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.))

(3) For candidates of a major political party for partisan office,
the nominating petition must be in substantially the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

We, the undersigned registered voters of (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision for which the nomination is
made) , and registered party members of the (major political
party), hereby petition that the name of (candidate's name) be
printed on the official primary ballot for the office of (insert
name of office) as a candidate of the (major political party).

(4) For independent candidates and candidates of a minor political
party for partisan office, the nominating petition must be in
substantially the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

We, the undersigned registered voters of . . . (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision for which the nomination is
made) . . ., hereby petition that the name of . . . (candidate's name)
. . . be printed on the official general election ballot for the office
of . . . (insert name of office) . . ..

Sec. 132 RCW 29A.24.130 and 2003 c 111 s 613 are each amended to
read as follows:
A candidate may withdraw his or her declaration of candidacy at any
time before the close of business on the Thursday following the last
day for candidates to file under RCW 29A.24.050 by filing, with the
officer with whom the declaration of candidacy was filed, a signed
request that his or her name not be printed on the ballot. There shall
be no withdrawal period for declarations of candidacy filed during
special filing periods held under this title. The filing officer may
permit the withdrawal of a filing for the office of precinct committee
officer at the request of the candidate at any time if no absentee
ballots have been issued for that office and the ((general election))
party ballots for that precinct have not been printed. The filing
officer may permit the withdrawal of a filing for any elected office of
a city, town, or special district at the request of the candidate at
any time before a primary if the primary ballots for that city, town,
or special district have not been ordered. No filing fee may be
refunded to any candidate who withdraws under this section. Notice of
the deadline for withdrawal of candidacy and that the filing fee is not
refundable shall be given to each candidate at the time he or she
files.

Sec. 133 RCW 29A.24.210 and 2003 c 111 s 621 are each amended to
read as follows:
Filings for a partisan elective office shall be opened for a period
of three normal business days whenever, on or after the first day of
the regular filing period and before the sixth Tuesday prior to a
primary, a vacancy occurs in that office, leaving an unexpired term to
be filled by an election for which filings have not been held.
Any such special three-day filing period shall be fixed by the
election officer with whom declarations of candidacy for that office
are filed. The election officer shall give notice of the special
three-day filing period by notifying the press, radio, and television
in the county or counties involved, and by such other means as may be
required by law.
Candidacies validly filed within the special three-day filing
period shall appear on the ((primary)) ballot as if filed during the
regular filing period.

Sec. 134 RCW 29A.24.310 and 2003 c 111 s 622 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who desires to be a write-in candidate and have such
votes counted at a primary or election may file a declaration of
candidacy with the officer designated in RCW 29A.24.070 not later than
the day before the primary or election. Declarations of candidacy for
write-in candidates must be accompanied by a filing fee in the same
manner as required of other candidates filing for the office as
provided in RCW 29A.24.090.
Votes cast for write-in candidates who have filed such declarations
of candidacy and write-in votes for persons appointed by major
political parties pursuant to RCW 29A.28.020 need only specify the name
of the candidate in the appropriate location on the ballot in order to
be counted. Write-in votes cast for any other candidate, in order to
be counted, must designate the office sought and position number or
political party, if the manner in which the write-in is done does not
make the office or position clear. In order for write-in votes to be
valid in jurisdictions employing optical-scan mark sense ballot systems
the voter must complete the proper mark next to the write-in line for
that office.
No person may file as a write-in candidate ((where)):
(1) Where at a general election, the person attempting to file
either filed as a write-in candidate for the same office at the
preceding primary or the person's name appeared on the ballot for the
same office at the preceding primary;
(2) Where the person attempting to file as a write-in candidate has
already filed a valid write-in declaration for that primary or
election, unless one or the other of the two filings is for the office
of precinct ((committeeperson)) committee officer;
(3) Where the name of the person attempting to file already appears
on the ballot as a candidate for another office, unless one of the two
offices for which he or she is a candidate is precinct
((committeeperson)) committee officer;
(4) At a party primary election unless the person meets the
requirements of RCW 29A.20.020.
The declaration of candidacy shall be similar to that required by
RCW 29A.24.030. No write-in candidate filing under this section may be
included in any voter's pamphlet produced under chapter 29A.32 RCW
unless that candidate qualifies to have his or her name printed on the
general election ballot. The legislative authority of any jurisdiction
producing a local voter's pamphlet under chapter 29A.32 RCW may
provide, by ordinance, for the inclusion of write-in candidates in such
pamphlets.

Sec. 135 RCW 29A.28.040 and 2003 c 111 s 704 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the United States house of
representatives or the United States senate from this state, the
governor shall order a special election to fill the vacancy.
Candidates of a party not participating in a primary that year and
independent candidates may be nominated through the convention
procedures provided in RCW 29A.20.110 through 29A.20.200.
(2) Within ten days of such vacancy occurring, he or she shall
issue a writ of election fixing a date for the special vacancy election
not less than ninety days after the issuance of the writ, fixing a date
for the primary for nominating major political party candidates for the
special vacancy election not less than thirty days before the day fixed
for holding the special vacancy election, fixing the dates for the
special filing period, and designating the term or part of the term for
which the vacancy exists. If the vacancy is in the office of United
States representative, the writ of election shall specify the
congressional district that is vacant.
(3) If the vacancy occurs less than six months before a state
general election and before the second Friday following the close of
the filing period for that general election, the special primary and
special vacancy elections shall be held in concert with the state
primary and state general election in that year.
(4) If the vacancy occurs on or after the first day for filing
under RCW 29A.24.050 and on or before the second Friday following the
close of the filing period, a special filing period of three normal
business days shall be fixed by the governor and notice thereof given
to all media, including press, radio, and television within the area in
which the vacancy election is to be held, to the end that, insofar as
possible, all interested persons will be aware of such filing period.
The last day of the filing period shall not be later than the third
Tuesday before the primary at which major political party candidates
are to be nominated. The names of major political party candidates who
have filed valid declarations of candidacy during this three-day period
shall appear on the approaching primary ballot. The requirements of
RCW 29A.20.130 do not apply to the convention of parties not
participating in the primary or an independent candidate convention
held under this subsection.
(5) If the vacancy occurs later than the second Friday following
the close of the filing period, a special primary ((and)), special
vacancy election, and the conventions of parties not participating in
the primary and independent candidates to fill the position shall be
held after the next state general election but, in any event, no later
than the ninetieth day following the November election.

Sec. 136 RCW 29A.28.060 and 2003 c 111 s 706 are each amended to
read as follows:
The general election laws and laws relating to partisan primaries
shall apply to the special primaries and vacancy elections provided for
in RCW 29A.28.040 through 29A.28.050 to the extent that they are not
inconsistent with the provisions of these sections. Candidates of a
party not participating in a primary and independent candidates may
appear only on the general election ballot. Statutory time deadlines
relating to availability of absentee ballots, certification,
canvassing, and related procedures that cannot be met in a timely
fashion may be modified for the purposes of a specific primary or
vacancy election under this chapter by the secretary of state through
emergency rules adopted under RCW 29A.04.610.

Sec. 137 RCW 29A.28.070 and 2003 c 111 s 707 are each amended to
read as follows:
If a vacancy occurs in the office of precinct committee officer by
reason of death, resignation, or disqualification of the incumbent, or
because of failure to elect, the respective county chair of the county
central committee shall fill the vacancy by appointment. ((However, in
a legislative district having a majority of its precincts in a county
with a population of one million or more, the appointment may be made
only upon the recommendation of the legislative district chair.)) The
person so appointed must have the same qualifications as candidates
when filing for election to the office for that precinct. When a
vacancy in the office of precinct committee officer exists because of
failure to elect at a ((state general)) primary election, the vacancy
may not be filled until after the organization meeting of the county
central committee and the new county chair has been selected as
provided by RCW 29A.80.030.

Sec. 138 RCW 29A.32.030 and 2003 c 111 s 803 are each amended to
read as follows:
The voters' pamphlet must contain:
(1) Information about each ballot measure initiated by or referred
to the voters for their approval or rejection as required by RCW
29A.32.070;
(2) In even-numbered years, statements, if submitted, advocating
the candidacies of nominees for the office of president and vice
president of the United States, United States senator, United States
representative, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state,
state treasurer, state auditor, attorney general, commissioner of
public lands, superintendent of public instruction, insurance
commissioner, state senator, state representative, justice of the
supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or judge of the superior
court. The voters' pamphlet must not contain any statement of
affiliation with any major political party unless the candidate is the
nominee of that party. Candidates may also submit a campaign mailing
address and telephone number and a photograph not more than five years
old and of a size and quality that the secretary of state determines to
be suitable for reproduction in the voters' pamphlet;
(3) In odd-numbered years, if any office voted upon statewide
appears on the ballot due to a vacancy, then statements and photographs
for candidates for any vacant office listed in subsection (2) of this
section must appear;
(4) In even-numbered years, a section explaining how voters may
participate in the election campaign process; the address and telephone
number of the public disclosure commission established under RCW
42.17.350; and a summary of the disclosure requirements that apply when
contributions are made to candidates and political committees;
(5) In even-numbered years the name, address, and telephone number
of each political party with nominees listed in the pamphlet, if filed
with the secretary of state by the state committee of a major political
party or the presiding officer of the convention of a minor political
party;
(6) In each odd-numbered year immediately before a year in which a
president of the United States is to be nominated and elected,
information explaining the precinct caucus and convention process used
by each major political party to elect delegates to its national
presidential candidate nominating convention. The pamphlet must also
provide a description of the statutory procedures by which minor
political parties are formed and the statutory methods used by the
parties to nominate candidates for president;
(7) ((In even-numbered years, a description of the office of
precinct committee officer and its duties)) A section explaining how to
register to vote, how to affiliate with a major or minor political
party, and the fact that party affiliation is not required in order to
register to vote;
(8) An application form for an absentee ballot;
(9) A brief statement explaining the deletion and addition of
language for proposed measures under RCW 29A.32.080;
(10) Any additional information pertaining to elections as may be
required by law or in the judgment of the secretary of state is deemed
informative to the voters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139 A new section is added to chapter 29A.32
RCW to read as follows:
If the secretary of state prints and distributes a voters' pamphlet
for a primary in an even-numbered year, it must not contain any
statement of affiliation of a candidate with any major political party
unless that candidate is qualified under RCW 29A.20.020(4) to run as a
candidate of that party.
If the secretary of state prints and distributes a voters' pamphlet
for a primary in an even-numbered year, it must contain:
(1) A description of the office of precinct committee officer and
its duties;
(2) An explanation of whether each major political party is
allowing unaffiliated voters to participate in that party's partisan
primary;
(3) An explanation that minor political party candidates and
independent candidates will appear only on the general election ballot;
and
(4) For 2004 only, an explanation that the party primary will be
conducted as a statewide vote-by-mail primary.

Sec. 140 RCW 29A.32.240 and 2003 c 111 s 816 are each amended to
read as follows:
The local voters' pamphlet must not contain any statement of
affiliation of a candidate with any major political party unless that
candidate is qualified under RCW 29A.20.020(4) to run as a candidate of
that party, and shall include but not be limited to the following:
(1) Appearing on the cover, the words "official local voters'
pamphlet," the name of the jurisdiction producing the pamphlet, and the
date of the election or primary;
(2) A list of jurisdictions that have measures or candidates in the
pamphlet;
(3) Information on how a person may register to vote, how to
affiliate with a major or minor political party, the fact that party
affiliation is not required in order to register to vote, and how to
obtain an absentee ballot;
(4) The text of each measure accompanied by an explanatory
statement prepared by the prosecuting attorney for any county measure
or by the attorney for the jurisdiction submitting the measure if other
than a county measure. All explanatory statements for city, town, or
district measures not approved by the attorney for the jurisdiction
submitting the measure shall be reviewed and approved by the county
prosecuting attorney or city attorney, when applicable, before
inclusion in the pamphlet;
(5) The arguments for and against each measure submitted by
committees selected pursuant to RCW 29A.32.280;
(6) For partisan primary elections, an explanation of whether each
major political party is allowing unaffiliated voters to participate in
that party's partisan primary, and an explanation that minor political
party candidates and independent candidates will appear only on the
general election ballot;
(7) For the 2004 primary, an explanation that the party primary
will be conducted as a statewide vote-by-mail primary.

Sec. 141 RCW 29A.36.010 and 2003 c 111 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
On or before the day following the last day for political parties
to fill vacancies in the ticket as provided by RCW 29A.28.010, the
secretary of state shall certify to each county auditor a list of the
candidates who have filed declarations of candidacy in his or her
office for the primary. For each office, the certificate shall include
the name of each candidate, his or her address, and his or her party
designation, if any. Candidates of parties not participating in the
primary and independent candidates may appear only on the general
election ballot.

Sec. 142 RCW 29A.36.100 and 2003 c 111 s 910 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except for the candidates for the positions of president and vice
president ((or)), for a partisan or nonpartisan office for which no
primary is required, or for independent candidates or candidates of
parties not participating in the primary, the names of all candidates
who, under this title, filed a declaration of candidacy((,)) or were
certified as a candidate to fill a vacancy on a major party ticket((,
or were nominated as an independent or minor party candidate)) will
appear on the appropriate ballot at the primary throughout the
jurisdiction in which they are to be nominated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 A new section is added to chapter 29A.36
RCW to read as follows:
(1) At all partisan primaries, the county auditor must prepare a
nonpartisan ballot, if nonpartisan races or ballot measures are to be
voted on at the primary, and party ballots for each major political
party. Partisan primaries must be conducted using party ballots when
applicable.
(2) In order to appear on a party ballot, a candidate must be a
registered party member, have designated that same major political
party in his or her declaration of candidacy for partisan office, and
meet the requirements of RCW 29A.20.020(4).
(3) Every eligible registered voter, regardless of party
affiliation, may vote in a partisan primary as follows:
(a) A voter who is a registered party member of a major political
party may vote the party ballot for that same political party, and may
not vote the party ballot for any other political party.
(b) An unaffiliated voter may vote the party ballot for any
particular political party unless, by March 1st of that year, the state
chair of that political party has provided to the secretary of state a
signed statement refusing to consent to the participation of
unaffiliated voters in that party's partisan primary. If a state chair
does not provide such a statement, the party is deemed to have
consented to the participation of unaffiliated voters in that party's
partisan primary.
(c) An unaffiliated voter who has signed a minor party or
independent candidate nominating petition may vote only the nonpartisan
ballot and may not vote a party ballot.

Sec. 144 RCW 29A.36.110 and 2003 c 111 s 911 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every ballot for a single combination of issues ((and)), offices
((shall)), and candidates must be uniform within a precinct and
((shall)) identify the type of primary or election, the county, and the
date of the primary or election((, and)). The ballot or voting device
shall contain instructions on the proper method of recording a vote,
including write-in votes. Each position, together with the names of
the candidates for that office, shall be clearly separated from other
offices or positions in the same jurisdiction. The offices in each
jurisdiction shall be clearly separated from each other. No paper
ballot or ballot card may be marked in any way that would permit the
identification of the person who voted that ballot.

Sec. 145 RCW 29A.36.120 and 2003 c 111 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The positions or offices on a primary ballot shall be arranged
in substantially the following order: United States senator; United
States representative; governor; lieutenant governor; secretary of
state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney general; commissioner
of public lands; superintendent of public instruction; insurance
commissioner; state senator; state representative; county officers;
justices of the supreme court; judges of the court of appeals; judges
of the superior court; and judges of the district court. For all other
jurisdictions on the primary ballot, the offices in each jurisdiction
shall be grouped together and be in the order of the position numbers
assigned to those offices, if any.
(2) The order of the positions or offices on ((an)) a general
election ballot shall be substantially the same as on a primary ballot
except that the offices of president and vice president of the United
States shall precede all other offices on a presidential election
ballot. ((State ballot issues shall be placed before all offices on an
election ballot.)) The positions on a ballot to be assigned to ballot
measures regarding local units of government shall be established by
the secretary of state by rule.
(3) The political party or independent candidacy of each candidate
for partisan office shall be indicated next to the name of the
candidate on ((the)) party primary and general election ballots. A
candidate shall file a written notice with the filing officer within
three business days after the close of the filing period designating
the political party to be indicated next to the candidate's name on the
ballot if either: (a) The candidate has been nominated by two or more
minor political parties or independent conventions; or (b) the
candidate has both filed a declaration of candidacy declaring an
affiliation with a major political party and been nominated by a minor
political party or independent convention. If no written notice is
filed the filing officer shall give effect to the party designation
shown upon the first valid document filed. A candidate may be deemed
nominated by a ((minor party)) convention of a party not participating
in the primary or independent convention only if all documentation
required by chapter 29A.20 RCW has been timely filed.

Sec. 146 RCW 29A.36.130 and 2003 c 111 s 913 are each amended to
read as follows:
After the close of business on the last day for candidates to file
for office, the filing officer shall, from among those filings made in
person and by mail, determine by lot the order in which the names of
those candidates will appear on ((all sample and absentee)) the
applicable ballots. ((In the case of candidates for city, town, and
district office, this procedure shall also determine the order for
candidate names on the official primary ballot used at the polling
place.)) The determination shall be done publicly and may be witnessed
by the media and by any candidate. If no primary is required for any
nonpartisan office under RCW 29A.52.010 or 29A.52.220, or if any
independent or minor party candidate files a declaration of candidacy,
the names shall appear on the general election ballot in the order
determined by lot.

Sec. 147 RCW 29A.36.150 and 2003 c 111 s 915 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except in each county with a population of one million or more, on
or before the fifteenth day before a primary or election, the county
auditor shall prepare a sample ballot which shall be made readily
available to members of the public. For a partisan primary, the county
auditor shall prepare a sample nonpartisan ballot and sample party
ballots. The secretary of state shall adopt rules governing the
preparation of sample ballots in counties with a population of one
million or more. The rules shall permit, among other alternatives, the
preparation of more than one sample ballot by a county with a
population of one million or more for a primary or election, each of
which lists a portion of the offices and issues to be voted on in that
county. The position of precinct committee officer shall be shown on
the sample party ballot for the ((general election)) primary, but the
names of candidates for the individual positions need not be shown.

Sec. 148 RCW 29A.36.160 and 2003 c 111 s 916 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On the top of each ballot ((there will)) must be printed clear
and concise instructions directing the voter((s)) how to mark the
ballot, including write-in votes. ((After the instructions and before
the offices,))
(2) The questions of adopting constitutional amendments or any
other state measure authorized by law to be submitted to the voters at
that election ((will be placed)) must appear after the instructions and
before any offices.
(3) In a year that president and vice president appear on the
general election ballot, the names of the candidates for president and
vice president for each political party must be grouped together with
a single response position for a voter to indicate his or her choice.
(((2))) (4) On a general election ballot, the candidate or
candidates of the major political party that received the highest
number of votes from the electors of this state for the office of
president of the United States at the last presidential election
((will)) must appear first following the appropriate office
heading((,)). The candidate or candidates of the other major political
parties will follow according to the votes cast for their nominees for
president at the last presidential election, and independent candidates
and the candidate or candidates of all other parties will follow in the
order of their qualification with the secretary of state.
(((3) The names of candidates for president and vice president for
each political party must be grouped together with a single response
position for a voter to indicate his or her choice.
(4))) (5) All paper ballots and ballot cards used at a polling
place must be sequentially numbered in such a way to permit removal of
such numbers without leaving any identifying marks on the ballot.

Sec. 149 RCW 29A.36.190 and 2003 c 111 s 919 are each amended to
read as follows:
The name of a candidate for a partisan office for which a primary
was conducted shall not be printed on the ballot for that office at the
subsequent general election unless the candidate receives ((a number of
votes equal to at least one percent of the total number cast for all
candidates for that position sought and)) a plurality of the votes cast
for the candidates of his or her party for that office at the preceding
primary.

Sec. 150 RCW 29A.40.060 and 2003 c 111 s 1006 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall issue an absentee ballot for the
primary or election for which it was requested, or for the next
occurring primary or election when ongoing absentee status has been
requested if the information contained in a request for an absentee
ballot or ongoing absentee status received by the county auditor is
complete and correct and the applicant is qualified to vote under
federal or state law. Otherwise, the county auditor shall notify the
applicant of the reason or reasons why the request cannot be accepted.
Whenever two or more candidates have filed for the position of precinct
committee officer for the same party in the same precinct ((at a
general election held in an even-numbered year)), the contest for that
position must be presented to absentee voters from that precinct by
either including the contest on the regular absentee ballot or a
separate absentee ballot. The ballot must provide space designated for
writing in the name of additional candidates.
(2) A registered voter may obtain a replacement ballot if the
ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received by the voter. The
voter may obtain the ballot by telephone request, by mail,
electronically, or in person. The county auditor shall keep a record
of each replacement ballot provided under this subsection.
(3) A copy of the state voters' pamphlet must be sent to registered
voters temporarily outside the state, out-of-state voters, overseas
voters, and service voters along with the absentee ballot if such a
pamphlet has been prepared for the primary or election and is available
to the county auditor at the time of mailing. The county auditor shall
mail all absentee ballots and related material to voters outside the
territorial limits of the United States and the District of Columbia
under 39 U.S.C. 3406.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151 A new section is added to chapter 29A.40
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For the 2004 primary, all registered voters shall be considered
to be absentee voters. Each county auditor shall issue ballots to all
registered voters in accordance with RCW 29A.40.090.
(2) This section expires January 1, 2005.

Sec. 152 RCW 29A.40.090 and 2003 c 111 s 1009 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For a primary election with at least one partisan race, the
county auditor shall:
(a) Send each absentee unaffiliated voter a party ballot for each
major political party, one security envelope in which to seal the voted
party ballot, a larger envelope in which to return the security
envelope, instructions on how to mark and return one ballot to the
county auditor, and instructions to destroy unused party ballots. The
instructions that accompany absentee party ballots to an unaffiliated
voter must include an explanation that only one party ballot may be
voted and returned, and that if more than one party ballot is voted and
returned in the security envelope, none of the party ballots will be
counted;
(b) Send each absentee unaffiliated voter who has signed a
nominating petition for a candidate of a party not participating in the
primary or an independent candidate nominating petition a nonpartisan
ballot, a security envelope in which to seal the nonpartisan ballot
after voting, a larger envelope in which to return the security
envelope, and instructions on how to mark the ballot and how to return
it to the county auditor;
(c) Send each absentee voter who is a registered party member of a
major political party the party ballot of the major political party
with which the voter is affiliated, a security envelope in which to
seal the party ballot after voting, a larger envelope in which to
return the security envelope, and instructions on how to mark the
ballot and how to return it to the county auditor; and
(d) Instruct the voter to destroy and discard all unvoted party
ballots.
(2) For a general election, the county auditor shall send each
absentee voter a ballot, a security envelope in which to seal the
ballot after voting, a larger envelope in which to return the security
envelope, and instructions on how to mark the ballot and how to return
it to the county auditor.
(3) For primary and general elections, the larger return envelope
must contain a declaration by the absentee voter reciting his or her
qualifications and stating that he or she has not voted in any other
jurisdiction at this election and, if for a primary election, that he
or she has destroyed any unused primary ballots, together with a
summary of the penalties for any violation of any of the provisions of
this chapter. The return envelope must provide space for the voter to
indicate the date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter to
sign the oath. A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this
chapter must be printed on the return envelope immediately adjacent to
the space for the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the
return envelope must affirm and attest to the statements regarding the
qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the ballot. For
out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, the signed
declaration on the return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a
voter registration for the election or primary for which the ballot has
been issued. The voter must be instructed to either return the ballot
to the county auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first
class postage, if applicable, and mail the ballot to the appropriate
county auditor no later than the day of the election or primary for
which the ballot was issued.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.

Sec. 153 RCW 29A.44.020 and 2003 c 111 s 1102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) At any election, general or special, or at any primary, any
political party or committee may designate a person other than a
precinct election officer, for each polling place to check a list of
registered voters of the precinct to determine who has and who has not
voted.
(2) The precinct committee officer or his or her designee or
designees must not seek to obtain or keep a record of the party ballot
voted by an unaffiliated voter voting in any election.
(3) The lists must be furnished by the party or committee
concerned.
(4) Every person who violates subsection (2) of this section is
guilty of a class C felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 154 RCW 29A.44.200 and 2003 c 111 s 1119 are each amended to
read as follows:
A voter desiring to vote shall give his or her name to the precinct
election officer who has the precinct list of registered voters. This
officer shall announce the name to the precinct election officer who
has the copy of the inspector's poll book for that precinct. If the
right of this voter to participate in the primary or election is not
challenged, the voter must be issued a ballot or permitted to enter a
voting booth or to operate a voting device. At a partisan primary,
every voter who is a registered party member of a major political party
must be issued the party ballot specific to his or her political party;
every unaffiliated voter must be issued a party ballot for each major
political party that has consented to the participation of unaffiliated
voters in its partisan primary under section 143 of this act; and every
unaffiliated voter who has signed a nominating petition for a candidate
of a party not participating in the primary or independent candidate
nominating petition must be issued only the nonpartisan ballot. The
number of the ballot or the voter must be recorded by the precinct
election officers. If the right of the voter to participate is
challenged, RCW 29A.08.810 and 29A.08.820 apply to that voter.

Sec. 155 RCW 29A.44.230 and 2003 c 111 s 1122 are each amended to
read as follows:
As each voter casts his or her vote, the precinct election officers
shall insert in the poll books or precinct list of registered voters
opposite that voter's name, a notation to credit the voter with having
participated in that primary or election. In a partisan primary, no
record may be made of which party ballot an unaffiliated voter voted,
except as necessary for conducting the provisions of chapter 29A.60,
29A.64, or 29A.68 RCW. Any record made under this section shall be
subject to the provisions of RCW 29A.08.710 and section 167 of this
act. The precinct election officers shall record the voter's name so
that a separate record is kept.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 156 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
Major political party candidates for all partisan elected offices,
except for president, vice president, precinct committee officer, and
offices exempted from the primary under RCW 29A.52.010, must be
nominated at primaries held under sections 157 through 160 of this act,
or, if applicable, chapter 29A.-- RCW (sections 201 through 255 of this
act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 157 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
(1) After June 15, 2004, a major political party may choose, by
rule, to allow unaffiliated voters to participate in its primary. The
rule may be applied only on a statewide basis and with respect to all
votes cast by unaffiliated voters, rather than with respect to votes
cast in specific districts or races or for specific candidates. If a
major political party allows unaffiliated voters to participate in its
primary, no distinction may be made by the party or by a county
canvassing board between votes cast by registered party members and
votes cast by unaffiliated voters.
(2) A major political party shall be deemed to have chosen to allow
unaffiliated voters to participate in its primary unless by March 1st
of the year of the primary, the state chair of the major political
party has provided to the secretary of state a signed statement
refusing to consent to the participation of unaffiliated voters in that
party's primary. Any such refusal to consent shall only be effective
for any partisan primary conducted between September 1st of the same
year and August 30th of the following year.
(3) In any year after 2004 in which the chair of a major political
party provides the secretary of state a signed statement by March 1st,
under subsection (2) of this section, that only registered party
members may vote the party ballot specific to that political party,
sections 302 and 303 of this act apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 158 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
In a partisan primary:
(1) Every eligible voter, regardless of party affiliation, may vote
a party ballot if at least one major political party has consented to
allowing unaffiliated voters to participate in its primary.
(2) A voter who is a registered party member of a major political
party may vote the party ballot for his or her political party, and may
not vote the party ballot for any other political party.
(3) An unaffiliated voter may vote the party ballot for any
particular political party unless, by March 1st of that year, the state
chair of that political party has provided to the secretary of state a
signed statement refusing to consent to the participation of
unaffiliated voters in that party's partisan primary. Only one party
ballot may be voted.
(4) An unaffiliated voter who has signed a nominating petition for
a candidate of a party not participating in the primary or an
independent candidate nominating petition may vote only the nonpartisan
ballot, and may not vote a party ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 159 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
So far as applicable, the provisions of this title relating to
conducting general elections govern the conduct of primaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 160 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
An explanation of whether each major political party is allowing
unaffiliated voters to participate in that party's partisan primary,
and instructions for voting a party ballot, must appear, at the very
least, in:
(1) Any primary voters' pamphlet prepared by the secretary of state
or a local government if a partisan office will appear on the ballot;
(2) Instructions that accompany a primary absentee party ballot;
(3) Any notice of a partisan primary published in compliance with
RCW 29A.52.310; and
(4) The web site of the office of the secretary of state and any
web site of a county auditor's office.

Sec. 161 RCW 29A.52.230 and 2003 c 111 s 1307 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The offices of superintendent of public instruction, justice of
the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the superior
court, and judge of the district court shall be nonpartisan and the
candidates therefor shall be nominated and elected as such.
(2) All city, town, and special purpose district elective offices
shall be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be nominated and
elected as such.
(3) Nonpartisan offices shall appear in a primary on the
nonpartisan ballot and on every party ballot.

Sec. 162 RCW 29A.52.310 and 2003 c 111 s 1309 are each amended to
read as follows:
Not more than ten nor less than three days before the primary the
county auditor shall publish notice of such primary in one or more
newspapers of general circulation within the county. The notice must
contain the proper party designations, the names and addresses of all
persons who have filed a declaration of candidacy to be voted upon at
that primary, whether each major political party is allowing
unaffiliated voters to participate in its primary, an explanation that
candidates of political parties not participating in the primaries and
independent candidates will appear only in the general election, the
hours during which the polls will be open, and the polling places for
each precinct, giving the address of each polling place. The names of
all candidates for nonpartisan offices must be published separately
with designation of the offices for which they are candidates but
without party designation. This is the only notice required for the
holding of any primary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 163 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The notice required by RCW 29A.52.310 shall prominently include
an explanation that the 2004 primary will be conducted exclusively by
mail.
(2) This section expires January 1, 2005.

Sec. 164 RCW 29A.52.320 and 2003 c 111 s 1310 are each amended to
read as follows:
No later than the day following the certification of the returns of
any primary, the secretary of state shall certify to the appropriate
county auditors((,)) the names of all persons nominated for offices((,
the returns of which have been canvassed by the secretary of state)) at
a primary, or at an independent candidate convention or a convention of
a party not participating in the primary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 165 A new section is added to chapter 29A.60
RCW to read as follows:
(1) No record of the party ballot voted by an unaffiliated voter
voting in a primary or election may be created or maintained by any
public agency, organization, or person except for the purposes of
conducting the provisions of this chapter and chapters 29A.64 and
29A.68 RCW. Any such record created for the purpose defined in this
chapter is not a public record and is not available for public
inspection or copying.
(2) No record of the party ballot voted by an unaffiliated voter
voting in a primary shall be recorded or sought by individuals
conducting activities authorized under RCW 29A.44.020.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to prohibit a
political organization from conducting voter identification and party
building activities that occur outside the polling place or at any time
other than on the day of the primary or election.
(4) Every person who violates this section is guilty of a class C
felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 166 RCW 29A.60.020 and 2003 c 111 s 1502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For any office at any election or primary, any voter may write
in on the ballot the name of any person for an office who has filed as
a write-in candidate for the office in the manner provided by RCW
29A.24.310 and such vote shall be counted the same as if the name had
been printed on the ballot and marked by the voter. In a partisan
primary, a voter may write in only the name of a write-in candidate
affiliated with the same major political party as designated on the
party ballot and eligible for nomination as a candidate of that party.
No write-in vote made for any person who has not filed a declaration of
candidacy pursuant to RCW 29A.24.310 is valid if that person filed for
the same office, either as a regular candidate or a write-in candidate,
at the preceding primary. Any abbreviation used to designate office,
position, or political party shall be accepted if the canvassing board
can determine, to their satisfaction, the voter's intent.
(2) The number of write-in votes cast for each office must be
recorded and reported with the canvass for the election.
(3) Write-in votes cast for an individual candidate for an office
need not be tallied if the total number of write-in votes cast for the
office is not greater than the number of votes cast for the candidate
apparently nominated or elected, and the write-in votes could not have
altered the outcome of the primary or election. In the case of write-in votes for statewide office or for any office whose jurisdiction
encompasses more than one county, write-in votes for an individual
candidate must be tallied whenever the county auditor is notified by
either the office of the secretary of state or another auditor in a
multicounty jurisdiction that it appears that the write-in votes could
alter the outcome of the primary or election.
(4) In the case of statewide offices or jurisdictions that
encompass more than one county, if the total number of write-in votes
cast for an office within a county is greater than the number of votes
cast for a candidate apparently nominated or elected in a primary or
election, the auditor shall tally all write-in votes for individual
candidates for that office and notify the office of the secretary of
state and the auditors of the other counties within the jurisdiction,
that the write-in votes for individual candidates should be tallied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 167 A new section is added to chapter 29A.64
RCW to read as follows:
(1) No record of the party ballot voted by an unaffiliated voter
voting in a primary or election may be created or maintained by any
public agency, organization, or person except for the purposes of
conducting the provisions of this chapter and chapters 29A.60 and
29A.68 RCW. Any such record created for the purpose defined in this
chapter is not a public record and therefore is not available for
public inspection or copying.
(2) No record of the party ballot voted by an unaffiliated voter
voting in a primary shall be recorded or sought by individuals
conducting activities authorized under RCW 29A.44.020.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to prohibit a
political organization from conducting voter identification and party
building activities that occur outside the polling place or at any time
other than on the day of the primary or election.
(4) Every person who violates this section is guilty of a class C
felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 168 A new section is added to chapter 29A.68
RCW to read as follows:
(1) No record of the party ballot voted by an unaffiliated voter
voting in a primary or election may be created or maintained by any
public agency, organization, or person except for the purposes of
conducting the provisions of this chapter and chapters 29A.60 and
29A.64 RCW. Any such record created for the purpose defined in this
chapter is not a public record and therefore is not available for
public inspection or copying.
(2) No record of the party ballot voted by an unaffiliated voter
voting in a primary shall be recorded or sought by individuals
conducting activities authorized under RCW 29A.44.020.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to prohibit a
political organization from conducting voter identification and party
building activities that occur outside the polling place or at any time
other than on the day of the primary or election.
(4) Every person who violates this section is guilty of a class C
felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 169 RCW 29A.80.040 and 2003 c 111 s 2004 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any registered party member of a major political party who is a
registered voter in the precinct may upon payment of a fee of one
dollar file his or her declaration of candidacy as prescribed under RCW
29A.24.030 with the county auditor for the office of precinct committee
officer of his or her party in that precinct. When elected at the
primary, the precinct committee officer shall serve so long as the
committee officer remains an eligible voter in that precinct and until
a successor has been elected at the next ensuing state ((general))
primary election in the even-numbered year.

Sec. 170 RCW 29A.80.050 and 2003 c 111 s 2005 are each amended to
read as follows:
The statutory requirements for filing as a candidate at the
primaries apply to candidates for precinct committee officer, except
that the filing period for this office alone is extended to and
includes the Friday immediately following the last day for political
parties to fill vacancies in the ticket as provided by RCW 29A.28.010.
The office ((shall not)) must be voted upon at the primaries in even-numbered years, ((but)) and the names of all candidates must appear
under the proper ((party and)) office designation((s)) on the party
ballots ((for the general election for each even-numbered year, and)).
The one receiving the highest number of votes will be declared elected.
((However, to be declared elected, a candidate must receive at least
ten percent of the number of votes cast for the candidate of the
candidate's party receiving the greatest number of votes in the
precinct.)) The term of office of precinct committee officer is two
years, commencing upon completion of the official canvass of votes by
the county canvassing board of election returns.

Sec. 171 RCW 42.17.020 and 2002 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(2) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(3) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
((29.01.110)) 29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum
proposition proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any
municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other voting
constituency from and after the time when the proposition has been
initially filed with the appropriate election officer of that
constituency prior to its circulation for signatures.
(4) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(5) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has filed a valid certificate of
nomination with the secretary of state under chapter ((29.24)) 29A.20
RCW;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW ((29.01.090)) 29A.04.085, that is
the body authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise
authority on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(6) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.
(7) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(8) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(9) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(10) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(11) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.
(12) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services
of any kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW
42.17.241, the term "compensation" shall not include per diem
allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse
a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged
in the official business of the governmental entity.
(13) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee
that is an organization of continuing existence not established in
anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(14)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising prepared by a candidate, a
political committee, or its authorized agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the
individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(15) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or
special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill
a vacancy in any such office.
(16) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election
for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is
submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the
qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set
forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of
the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for
purposes of this chapter.
(17) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in
opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(18) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day
of December after the date of the last previous general election for
the office that the candidate seeks and ending on November 30th after
the next election for the office. In the case of a special election to
fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period
beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on November 30th
after the special election.
(19) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of
value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure"
also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of
value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or
anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring
any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or
opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter,
agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be
reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made. The
term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete repayment
by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a loan, the
receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(20) "Final report" means the report described as a final report in
RCW 42.17.080(2).
(21) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
election that results in the election of a person to a state office.
It does not include a primary.
(22) "Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.
(23) "Immediate family" includes the spouse, dependent children,
and other dependent relatives, if living in the household. For the
purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, "immediate family" means
an individual's spouse, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister
of the individual and the spouse of any such person and a child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half
brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse and the
spouse of any such person.
(24) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each
of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of five hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.
(25)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a
contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless the
contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family as
defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an
association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(26) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments,
nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of
the state legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the
subject of action by either house or any committee of the legislature
and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both houses, are
pending approval by the governor.
(27) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the
passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of
Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate,
or other legislative enactment of any state agency under the state
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor
"lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of
communicating with the members of that association or organization.
(28) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his or
her own or another's behalf.
(29) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom a
lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is compensated
for acting as a lobbyist.
(30) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint venture,
public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or local
governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(31) "Person in interest" means the person who is the subject of a
record or any representative designated by that person, except that if
that person is under a legal disability, the term "person in interest"
means and includes the parent or duly appointed legal representative.
(32) "Political advertising" includes any advertising displays,
newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles, tabloids,
flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other means of
mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing, directly or
indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support in any election
campaign.
(33) "Political committee" means any person (except a candidate or
an individual dealing with his or her own funds or property) having the
expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in
support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any ballot proposition.
(34) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
((procedure for nominating)) election that nominates a candidate of a
major political party to state office ((under chapter 29.18 or 29.21
RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in large measure,
the procedures established in chapter 29.18 or 29.21 RCW)). In the
event that all major parties adopt rules prohibiting the counting of
unaffiliated ballots at the primary election, primary means the
procedure for qualifying a candidate to state office under chapter
29A.-- RCW (sections 201 through 255 of this act).
(35) "Public office" means any federal, state, county, city, town,
school district, port district, special district, or other state
political subdivision elective office.
(36) "Public record" includes any writing containing information
relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained
by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(37) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the
date of the filing of recall charges under RCW ((29.82.015)) 29A.56.120
and ending thirty days after the recall election.
(38) "State legislative office" means the office of a member of the
state house of representatives or the office of a member of the state
senate.
(39) "State office" means state legislative office or the office of
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general,
commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of
public instruction, state auditor, or state treasurer.
(40) "State official" means a person who holds a state office.
(41) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or
candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the possession
or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the election
for which the contributions were received, and that are in excess of
the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the committee
or candidate prior to that election. In the case of a continuing
political committee, "surplus funds" mean those contributions remaining
in the possession or control of the committee that are in excess of the
amount necessary to pay all remaining debts when it makes its final
report under RCW 42.17.065.
(42) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.
As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any
gender, the other, as the context requires.

Sec. 172 RCW 42.17.310 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 926, 2003 c 277
s 3, and 2003 c 124 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The following are exempt from public inspection and copying:
(a) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients.
(b) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy.
(c) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would (i) be prohibited to such persons by
RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340 or (ii) violate the
taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer.
(d) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy.
(e) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the public disclosure
commission, if disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical
safety, or property. If at the time a complaint is filed the
complainant, victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or
nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed
with the public disclosure commission about any elected official or
candidate for public office must be made in writing and signed by the
complainant under oath.
(f) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination.
(g) Except as provided by chapter 8.26 RCW, the contents of real
estate appraisals, made for or by any agency relative to the
acquisition or sale of property, until the project or prospective sale
is abandoned or until such time as all of the property has been
acquired or the property to which the sale appraisal relates is sold,
but in no event shall disclosure be denied for more than three years
after the appraisal.
(h) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss.
(i) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, and intra-agency
memorandums in which opinions are expressed or policies formulated or
recommended except that a specific record shall not be exempt when
publicly cited by an agency in connection with any agency action.
(j) Records which are relevant to a controversy to which an agency
is a party but which records would not be available to another party
under the rules of pretrial discovery for causes pending in the
superior courts.
(k) Records, maps, or other information identifying the location of
archaeological sites in order to avoid the looting or depredation of
such sites.
(l) Any library record, the primary purpose of which is to maintain
control of library materials, or to gain access to information, which
discloses or could be used to disclose the identity of a library user.
(m) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (i) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (ii) highway
construction or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070.
(n) Railroad company contracts filed prior to July 28, 1991, with
the utilities and transportation commission under RCW 81.34.070, except
that the summaries of the contracts are open to public inspection and
copying as otherwise provided by this chapter.
(o) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided pursuant to
chapter 43.163 RCW and chapter 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to
export projects pursuant to RCW 43.23.035.
(p) Financial disclosures filed by private vocational schools under
chapters 28B.85 and 28C.10 RCW.
(q) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095.
(r) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW,
or during application for economic development loans or program
services provided by any local agency.
(s) Membership lists or lists of members or owners of interests of
units in timeshare projects, subdivisions, camping resorts,
condominiums, land developments, or common-interest communities
affiliated with such projects, regulated by the department of
licensing, in the files or possession of the department.
(t) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant.
(u) The residential addresses or residential telephone numbers of
employees or volunteers of a public agency which are held by any public
agency in personnel records, public employment related records, or
volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees or
volunteers of any public agency.
(v) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order.
(w)(i) The federal social security number of individuals governed
under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files of the department of
health, except this exemption does not apply to requests made directly
to the department from federal, state, and local agencies of
government, and national and state licensing, credentialing,
investigatory, disciplinary, and examination organizations; (ii) the
current residential address and current residential telephone number of
a health care provider governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in
the files of the department, if the provider requests that this
information be withheld from public inspection and copying, and
provides to the department an accurate alternate or business address
and business telephone number. On or after January 1, 1995, the
current residential address and residential telephone number of a
health care provider governed under RCW 18.130.040 maintained in the
files of the department shall automatically be withheld from public
inspection and copying unless the provider specifically requests the
information be released, and except as provided for under RCW
42.17.260(9).
(x) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090.
(y) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420.
(z) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW.
(aa) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information.
(bb) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120.
(cc) Client records maintained by an agency that is a domestic
violence program as defined in RCW 70.123.020 or 70.123.075 or a rape
crisis center as defined in RCW 70.125.030.
(dd) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (i) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (ii) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed.
(ee) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting a current investigation of a possible unfair practice under
chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other federal, state,
or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment.
(ff) Business related information protected from public inspection
and copying under RCW 15.86.110.
(gg) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW.
(hh) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee pursuant to
RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250, regardless of which agency is in possession of the
information and documents.
(ii) Personal information in files maintained in a data base
created under RCW 43.07.360.
(jj) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010.
(kk) Names of individuals residing in emergency or transitional
housing that are furnished to the department of revenue or a county
assessor in order to substantiate a claim for property tax exemption
under RCW 84.36.043.
(ll) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service. However, these records may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides.
(mm) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons.
(nn) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes and other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose this information to a person, employer,
educational institution, or other entity that is responsible, in whole
or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when reporting
on public transportation or public safety. This information may also
be disclosed at the agency's discretion to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety.
(oo) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310. If a request for
such information is received, the submitting entity must be notified of
the request. Within ten business days of receipt of the notice, the
submitting entity shall provide a written statement of the continuing
need for confidentiality, which shall be provided to the requester.
Upon receipt of such notice, the department of health shall continue to
treat information designated under this section as exempt from
disclosure. If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality.
(pp) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance
appeals that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation
claims filed with the board under RCW 7.68.110.
(qq) Financial and commercial information supplied by or on behalf
of a person, firm, corporation, or entity under chapter 28B.95 RCW
relating to the purchase or sale of tuition units and contracts for the
purchase of multiple tuition units.
(rr) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b).
(ss) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law.
(tt) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license.
(uu) Records maintained by the employment security department and
subject to chapter 50.13 RCW if provided to another individual or
organization for operational, research, or evaluation purposes.
(vv) Individually identifiable information received by the work
force training and education coordinating board for research or
evaluation purposes.
(ww) Those portions of records assembled, prepared, or maintained
to prevent, mitigate, or respond to criminal terrorist acts, which are
acts that significantly disrupt the conduct of government or of the
general civilian population of the state or the United States and that
manifest an extreme indifference to human life, the public disclosure
of which would have a substantial likelihood of threatening public
safety, consisting of:
(i) Specific and unique vulnerability assessments or specific and
unique response or deployment plans, including compiled underlying data
collected in preparation of or essential to the assessments, or to the
response or deployment plans; and
(ii) Records not subject to public disclosure under federal law
that are shared by federal or international agencies, and information
prepared from national security briefings provided to state or local
government officials related to domestic preparedness for acts of
terrorism.
(xx) Commercial fishing catch data from logbooks required to be
provided to the department of fish and wildlife under RCW 77.12.047,
when the data identifies specific catch location, timing, or
methodology and the release of which would result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the commercial fisher providing the catch data.
However, this information may be released to government agencies
concerned with the management of fish and wildlife resources.
(yy) Sensitive wildlife data obtained by the department of fish and
wildlife. However, sensitive wildlife data may be released to
government agencies concerned with the management of fish and wildlife
resources. Sensitive wildlife data includes:
(i) The nesting sites or specific locations of endangered species
designated under RCW 77.12.020, or threatened or sensitive species
classified by rule of the department of fish and wildlife;
(ii) Radio frequencies used in, or locational data generated by,
telemetry studies; or
(iii) Other location data that could compromise the viability of a
specific fish or wildlife population, and where at least one of the
following criteria are met:
(A) The species has a known commercial or black market value;
(B) There is a history of malicious take of that species; or
(C) There is a known demand to visit, take, or disturb, and the
species behavior or ecology renders it especially vulnerable or the
species has an extremely limited distribution and concentration.
(zz) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
recreational licenses under RCW 77.32.010 or commercial licenses under
chapter 77.65 or 77.70 RCW, except name, address of contact used by the
department, and type of license, endorsement, or tag. However, the
department of fish and wildlife may disclose personally identifying
information to:
(i) Government agencies concerned with the management of fish and
wildlife resources;
(ii) The department of social and health services, child support
division, and to the department of licensing in order to implement RCW
77.32.014 and 46.20.291; and
(iii) Law enforcement agencies for the purpose of firearm
possession enforcement under RCW 9.41.040.
(aaa)(i) Discharge papers of a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States filed at the office of the county auditor before July 1,
2002, that have not been commingled with other recorded documents.
These records will be available only to the veteran, the veteran's next
of kin, a deceased veteran's properly appointed personal representative
or executor, a person holding that veteran's general power of attorney,
or to anyone else designated in writing by that veteran to receive the
records.
(ii) Discharge papers of a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States filed at the office of the county auditor before July 1,
2002, that have been commingled with other records, if the veteran has
recorded a "request for exemption from public disclosure of discharge
papers" with the county auditor. If such a request has been recorded,
these records may be released only to the veteran filing the papers,
the veteran's next of kin, a deceased veteran's properly appointed
personal representative or executor, a person holding the veteran's
general power of attorney, or anyone else designated in writing by the
veteran to receive the records.
(iii) Discharge papers of a veteran filed at the office of the
county auditor after June 30, 2002, are not public records, but will be
available only to the veteran, the veteran's next of kin, a deceased
veteran's properly appointed personal representative or executor, a
person holding the veteran's general power of attorney, or anyone else
designated in writing by the veteran to receive the records.
(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(aaa), next of kin of
deceased veterans have the same rights to full access to the record.
Next of kin are the veteran's widow or widower who has not remarried,
son, daughter, father, mother, brother, and sister.
(bbb) Those portions of records containing specific and unique
vulnerability assessments or specific and unique emergency and escape
response plans at a city, county, or state adult or juvenile
correctional facility, the public disclosure of which would have a
substantial likelihood of threatening the security of a city, county,
or state adult or juvenile correctional facility or any individual's
safety.
(ccc) Information compiled by school districts or schools in the
development of their comprehensive safe school plans pursuant to RCW
28A.320.125, to the extent that they identify specific vulnerabilities
of school districts and each individual school.
(ddd) Information regarding the infrastructure and security of
computer and telecommunications networks, consisting of security
passwords, security access codes and programs, access codes for secure
software applications, security and service recovery plans, security
risk assessments, and security test results to the extent that they
identify specific system vulnerabilities.
(eee) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW.
(fff) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (i) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (ii)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (iii)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011.
(ggg) Proprietary information deemed confidential for the purposes
of section 923, chapter 26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.
(hhh) Any records of the party ballot voted and returned by a
particular unaffiliated voter.
(2) Except for information described in subsection (1)(c)(i) of
this section and confidential income data exempted from public
inspection pursuant to RCW 84.40.020, the exemptions of this section
are inapplicable to the extent that information, the disclosure of
which would violate personal privacy or vital governmental interests,
can be deleted from the specific records sought. No exemption may be
construed to permit the nondisclosure of statistical information not
descriptive of any readily identifiable person or persons.
(3) Inspection or copying of any specific records exempt under the
provisions of this section may be permitted if the superior court in
the county in which the record is maintained finds, after a hearing
with notice thereof to every person in interest and the agency, that
the exemption of such records is clearly unnecessary to protect any
individual's right of privacy or any vital governmental function.
(4) Agency responses refusing, in whole or in part, inspection of
any public record shall include a statement of the specific exemption
authorizing the withholding of the record (or part) and a brief
explanation of how the exemption applies to the record withheld.

Sec. 173 RCW 42.17.310 and 2003 c 277 s 3 and 2003 c 124 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The following are exempt from public inspection and copying:
(a) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients.
(b) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy.
(c) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would (i) be prohibited to such persons by
RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340 or (ii) violate the
taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer.
(d) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy.
(e) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the public disclosure
commission, if disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical
safety, or property. If at the time a complaint is filed the
complainant, victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or
nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed
with the public disclosure commission about any elected official or
candidate for public office must be made in writing and signed by the
complainant under oath.
(f) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination.
(g) Except as provided by chapter 8.26 RCW, the contents of real
estate appraisals, made for or by any agency relative to the
acquisition or sale of property, until the project or prospective sale
is abandoned or until such time as all of the property has been
acquired or the property to which the sale appraisal relates is sold,
but in no event shall disclosure be denied for more than three years
after the appraisal.
(h) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss.
(i) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, and intra-agency
memorandums in which opinions are expressed or policies formulated or
recommended except that a specific record shall not be exempt when
publicly cited by an agency in connection with any agency action.
(j) Records which are relevant to a controversy to which an agency
is a party but which records would not be available to another party
under the rules of pretrial discovery for causes pending in the
superior courts.
(k) Records, maps, or other information identifying the location of
archaeological sites in order to avoid the looting or depredation of
such sites.
(l) Any library record, the primary purpose of which is to maintain
control of library materials, or to gain access to information, which
discloses or could be used to disclose the identity of a library user.
(m) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (i) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (ii) highway
construction or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070.
(n) Railroad company contracts filed prior to July 28, 1991, with
the utilities and transportation commission under RCW 81.34.070, except
that the summaries of the contracts are open to public inspection and
copying as otherwise provided by this chapter.
(o) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided pursuant to
chapter 43.163 RCW and chapter 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to
export projects pursuant to RCW 43.23.035.
(p) Financial disclosures filed by private vocational schools under
chapters 28B.85 and 28C.10 RCW.
(q) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095.
(r) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW,
or during application for economic development loans or program
services provided by any local agency.
(s) Membership lists or lists of members or owners of interests of
units in timeshare projects, subdivisions, camping resorts,
condominiums, land developments, or common-interest communities
affiliated with such projects, regulated by the department of
licensing, in the files or possession of the department.
(t) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant.
(u) The residential addresses or residential telephone numbers of
employees or volunteers of a public agency which are held by any public
agency in personnel records, public employment related records, or
volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees or
volunteers of any public agency.
(v) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order.
(w)(i) The federal social security number of individuals governed
under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files of the department of
health, except this exemption does not apply to requests made directly
to the department from federal, state, and local agencies of
government, and national and state licensing, credentialing,
investigatory, disciplinary, and examination organizations; (ii) the
current residential address and current residential telephone number of
a health care provider governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in
the files of the department, if the provider requests that this
information be withheld from public inspection and copying, and
provides to the department an accurate alternate or business address
and business telephone number. On or after January 1, 1995, the
current residential address and residential telephone number of a
health care provider governed under RCW 18.130.040 maintained in the
files of the department shall automatically be withheld from public
inspection and copying unless the provider specifically requests the
information be released, and except as provided for under RCW
42.17.260(9).
(x) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090.
(y) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420.
(z) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW.
(aa) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information.
(bb) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120.
(cc) Client records maintained by an agency that is a domestic
violence program as defined in RCW 70.123.020 or 70.123.075 or a rape
crisis center as defined in RCW 70.125.030.
(dd) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (i) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (ii) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed.
(ee) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting a current investigation of a possible unfair practice under
chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other federal, state,
or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment.
(ff) Business related information protected from public inspection
and copying under RCW 15.86.110.
(gg) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW.
(hh) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee pursuant to
RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250, regardless of which agency is in possession of the
information and documents.
(ii) Personal information in files maintained in a data base
created under RCW 43.07.360.
(jj) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010.
(kk) Names of individuals residing in emergency or transitional
housing that are furnished to the department of revenue or a county
assessor in order to substantiate a claim for property tax exemption
under RCW 84.36.043.
(ll) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service. However, these records may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides.
(mm) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons.
(nn) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes and other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose this information to a person, employer,
educational institution, or other entity that is responsible, in whole
or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when reporting
on public transportation or public safety. This information may also
be disclosed at the agency's discretion to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety.
(oo) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310. If a request for
such information is received, the submitting entity must be notified of
the request. Within ten business days of receipt of the notice, the
submitting entity shall provide a written statement of the continuing
need for confidentiality, which shall be provided to the requester.
Upon receipt of such notice, the department of health shall continue to
treat information designated under this section as exempt from
disclosure. If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality.
(pp) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance
appeals that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation
claims filed with the board under RCW 7.68.110.
(qq) Financial and commercial information supplied by or on behalf
of a person, firm, corporation, or entity under chapter 28B.95 RCW
relating to the purchase or sale of tuition units and contracts for the
purchase of multiple tuition units.
(rr) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b).
(ss) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law.
(tt) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license.
(uu) Records maintained by the employment security department and
subject to chapter 50.13 RCW if provided to another individual or
organization for operational, research, or evaluation purposes.
(vv) Individually identifiable information received by the work
force training and education coordinating board for research or
evaluation purposes.
(ww) Those portions of records assembled, prepared, or maintained
to prevent, mitigate, or respond to criminal terrorist acts, which are
acts that significantly disrupt the conduct of government or of the
general civilian population of the state or the United States and that
manifest an extreme indifference to human life, the public disclosure
of which would have a substantial likelihood of threatening public
safety, consisting of:
(i) Specific and unique vulnerability assessments or specific and
unique response or deployment plans, including compiled underlying data
collected in preparation of or essential to the assessments, or to the
response or deployment plans; and
(ii) Records not subject to public disclosure under federal law
that are shared by federal or international agencies, and information
prepared from national security briefings provided to state or local
government officials related to domestic preparedness for acts of
terrorism.
(xx) Commercial fishing catch data from logbooks required to be
provided to the department of fish and wildlife under RCW 77.12.047,
when the data identifies specific catch location, timing, or
methodology and the release of which would result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the commercial fisher providing the catch data.
However, this information may be released to government agencies
concerned with the management of fish and wildlife resources.
(yy) Sensitive wildlife data obtained by the department of fish and
wildlife. However, sensitive wildlife data may be released to
government agencies concerned with the management of fish and wildlife
resources. Sensitive wildlife data includes:
(i) The nesting sites or specific locations of endangered species
designated under RCW 77.12.020, or threatened or sensitive species
classified by rule of the department of fish and wildlife;
(ii) Radio frequencies used in, or locational data generated by,
telemetry studies; or
(iii) Other location data that could compromise the viability of a
specific fish or wildlife population, and where at least one of the
following criteria are met:
(A) The species has a known commercial or black market value;
(B) There is a history of malicious take of that species; or
(C) There is a known demand to visit, take, or disturb, and the
species behavior or ecology renders it especially vulnerable or the
species has an extremely limited distribution and concentration.
(zz) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
recreational licenses under RCW 77.32.010 or commercial licenses under
chapter 77.65 or 77.70 RCW, except name, address of contact used by the
department, and type of license, endorsement, or tag. However, the
department of fish and wildlife may disclose personally identifying
information to:
(i) Government agencies concerned with the management of fish and
wildlife resources;
(ii) The department of social and health services, child support
division, and to the department of licensing in order to implement RCW
77.32.014 and 46.20.291; and
(iii) Law enforcement agencies for the purpose of firearm
possession enforcement under RCW 9.41.040.
(aaa)(i) Discharge papers of a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States filed at the office of the county auditor before July 1,
2002, that have not been commingled with other recorded documents.
These records will be available only to the veteran, the veteran's next
of kin, a deceased veteran's properly appointed personal representative
or executor, a person holding that veteran's general power of attorney,
or to anyone else designated in writing by that veteran to receive the
records.
(ii) Discharge papers of a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States filed at the office of the county auditor before July 1,
2002, that have been commingled with other records, if the veteran has
recorded a "request for exemption from public disclosure of discharge
papers" with the county auditor. If such a request has been recorded,
these records may be released only to the veteran filing the papers,
the veteran's next of kin, a deceased veteran's properly appointed
personal representative or executor, a person holding the veteran's
general power of attorney, or anyone else designated in writing by the
veteran to receive the records.
(iii) Discharge papers of a veteran filed at the office of the
county auditor after June 30, 2002, are not public records, but will be
available only to the veteran, the veteran's next of kin, a deceased
veteran's properly appointed personal representative or executor, a
person holding the veteran's general power of attorney, or anyone else
designated in writing by the veteran to receive the records.
(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(aaa), next of kin of
deceased veterans have the same rights to full access to the record.
Next of kin are the veteran's widow or widower who has not remarried,
son, daughter, father, mother, brother, and sister.
(bbb) Those portions of records containing specific and unique
vulnerability assessments or specific and unique emergency and escape
response plans at a city, county, or state adult or juvenile
correctional facility, the public disclosure of which would have a
substantial likelihood of threatening the security of a city, county,
or state adult or juvenile correctional facility or any individual's
safety.
(ccc) Information compiled by school districts or schools in the
development of their comprehensive safe school plans pursuant to RCW
28A.320.125, to the extent that they identify specific vulnerabilities
of school districts and each individual school.
(ddd) Information regarding the infrastructure and security of
computer and telecommunications networks, consisting of security
passwords, security access codes and programs, access codes for secure
software applications, security and service recovery plans, security
risk assessments, and security test results to the extent that they
identify specific system vulnerabilities.
(eee) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW.
(fff) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (i) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (ii)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (iii)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011.
(ggg) Any records of the party ballot voted and returned by a
particular unaffiliated voter.
(2) Except for information described in subsection (1)(c)(i) of
this section and confidential income data exempted from public
inspection pursuant to RCW 84.40.020, the exemptions of this section
are inapplicable to the extent that information, the disclosure of
which would violate personal privacy or vital governmental interests,
can be deleted from the specific records sought. No exemption may be
construed to permit the nondisclosure of statistical information not
descriptive of any readily identifiable person or persons.
(3) Inspection or copying of any specific records exempt under the
provisions of this section may be permitted if the superior court in
the county in which the record is maintained finds, after a hearing
with notice thereof to every person in interest and the agency, that
the exemption of such records is clearly unnecessary to protect any
individual's right of privacy or any vital governmental function.
(4) Agency responses refusing, in whole or in part, inspection of
any public record shall include a statement of the specific exemption
authorizing the withholding of the record (or part) and a brief
explanation of how the exemption applies to the record withheld.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 174 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.04.903 (Effective date -- 2003 c 111) and 2003 c 111 s
2405;
(2) RCW 29A.36.140 (Primaries -- Rotating names of candidates) and
2003 c 111 s 914;
(3) RCW 29A.52.110 (Application of chapter) and 2003 c 111 s 1302;
(4) RCW 29A.52.120 (General election laws govern primaries) and
2003 c 111 s 1303;
(5) RCW 29A.52.130 (Blanket primary authorized) and 2003 c 111 s
1304; and
(6) RCW 29A.56.010 (Intent) and 2003 c 111 s 1401 & 1989 c 4 s 1.

PART 2 - ALTERNATIVE PRIMARY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 "Major political party" means a political
party identified as the party best approximating his or her political
philosophy by at least one candidate for an office voted upon statewide
who also received at least five percent of the total votes cast for
that office at the last primary or general election in a year in which
the governor is elected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 The rights of Washington voters are
protected by its Constitution and laws and include the following
fundamental rights:
(1) The right of qualified voters to vote at all elections;
(2) The right of absolute secrecy of the vote. No voter may be
required to disclose political faith or adherence in order to vote; and
(3) The right to cast a vote for any candidate for each office
without any limitation based on party preference or affiliation, of
either the voter or the candidate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 "Partisan office" means an office for
which a candidate may identify a political philosophy under section
214(3) or 215 of this act, and is limited to the following offices:
(1) United States senator and representative;
(2) All state offices except (a) judicial offices and (b) the
office of superintendent of public instruction;
(3) All county offices except (a) judicial offices and (b) those
offices where a county home rule charter provides otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 "Primary" means a statutory qualifying
procedure in which each registered voter eligible to vote in the
district or jurisdiction is permitted to cast a vote for his or her
preferred candidate for each office appearing on the ballot, without
any limitation based on party preference or affiliation on the part of
the voter or the candidate, with the result that not more than two
candidates for each office qualify to appear on the general election
ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 Qualifying primaries for general elections
to be held in November must be held on the third Tuesday of the
preceding September or on the seventh Tuesday immediately preceding
such general election, whichever occurs first.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 (1) A person filing a declaration of
candidacy for an office shall, at the time of filing, be a registered
voter and possess the qualifications specified by law for persons who
may be elected to the office.
(2) Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a
temporary elected position such as a charter review board member or
freeholder, no person may file for more than one office.
(3) The name of a candidate for an office shall not appear on a
ballot for that office unless, except as provided in RCW 3.46.067 and
3.50.057, the candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of
candidacy is filed, properly registered to vote in the geographic area
represented by the office. For the purposes of this section, each
geographic area in which registered voters may cast ballots for an
office is represented by that office. If a person elected to an office
must be elected from a district or similar division of the geographic
area represented by the office, the name of a candidate for the office
shall not appear on a primary ballot for that office unless the
candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of candidacy is
filed, properly registered to vote in that district or division. The
officer with whom declarations of candidacy must be filed under this
title shall review each such declaration filed regarding compliance
with this subsection.
(4) The requirements of voter registration and residence within the
geographic area of a district do not apply to candidates for
congressional office. Qualifications for United States Congress are
specified in the United States Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 Nominations of candidates for president
and vice president of the United States other than by a major political
party must be made at a convention to be held not earlier than the
first Sunday in July and not later than seventy days before the general
election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 In order to nominate candidates for the
offices of president and vice president of the United States, a
nominating convention shall obtain and submit to the filing officer the
signatures of at least two hundred registered voters of the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 A nominating petition submitted under this
chapter shall clearly identify the name of the minor party or
independent candidate. The petition shall also contain a statement
that the person signing the petition is a registered voter of the state
of Washington and shall have a space for the voter to sign his or her
name and to print his or her name and address. The nominating petition
must be submitted to the secretary of state not later than ten days
after adjournment of the convention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 A certificate evidencing nominations of
candidates for the offices of president and vice president made at a
convention must:
(1) Be in writing;
(2) Contain the name of each person nominated for the offices of
president and vice president of the United States, their addresses, and
a sworn statement from both nominees giving their consent to the
nomination;
(3) Identify the minor political party or the independent candidate
on whose behalf the convention was held;
(4) Be verified by the oath of the presiding officer and secretary;
(5) Be accompanied by a nominating petition or petitions bearing
the signatures and addresses of registered voters equal in number to
that required by section 208 of this act;
(6) Contain proof of publication of the notice of calling the
convention; and
(7) Be submitted to the secretary of state not later than one week
following the adjournment of the convention at which the nominations
were made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 (1) If two or more valid certificates of
nomination are filed purporting to nominate different candidates for
president and vice president using the same party name, the filing
officer must give effect to both certificates. If conflicting claims
to the party name are not resolved either by mutual agreement or by a
judicial determination of the right to the name, the candidates must be
treated as independent candidates. Disputes over the right to the name
must not be permitted to delay the printing of either ballots or a
voters' pamphlet.
(2) A person affected may petition the superior court of Thurston
county for a judicial determination of the right to the name of a minor
political party, either before or after documents are filed with the
secretary of state. The court shall resolve the conflict between
competing claims to the use of the same party name according to the
following principles: (a) The prior established public use of the name
during previous elections by a party composed of or led by the same
individuals or individuals in documented succession; (b) prior
established public use of the name earlier in the same election cycle;
(c) documented affiliation with a national or statewide party
organization with an established use of the name; (d) the first date of
filing of a certificate of nomination; and (e) such other indicia of an
established right to use of the name as the court may deem relevant.
Upon resolving the conflict between competing claims, the court may
also address any ballot designation for the candidate who does not
prevail.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 A minor political party or independent
candidate convention nominating candidates for the offices of president
and vice president of the United States shall, not later than ten days
after the adjournment of the convention, submit a list of presidential
electors to the office of the secretary of state. The list shall
contain the names and the mailing addresses of the persons selected and
shall be verified by the candidates named on the nominating petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 Upon the receipt of the nominating
petition, the secretary of state shall canvass the signatures. Once
the determination of the sufficiency of the petitions has been made,
the filing officer shall notify the candidates and any other persons
requesting the notification. Any appeal regarding the filing officer's
determination must be filed with the superior court of Thurston county
not later than five days from the date the determination is made, and
shall be heard and finally disposed of by the court within five days of
the filing. Nominating petitions shall not be available for public
inspection or copying.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 A candidate who desires to have his or her
name printed on the ballot for election to an office other than
president of the United States, vice president of the United States, or
an office for which ownership of property is a prerequisite to voting
shall complete and file a declaration of candidacy. The secretary of
state shall adopt, by rule, a declaration of candidacy form for the
office of precinct committee officer and a separate standard form for
candidates for all other offices filing under this chapter. Included
on the standard form shall be:
(1) A place for the candidate to declare that he or she is a
registered voter within the jurisdiction of the office for which he or
she is filing, and the address at which he or she is registered;
(2) A place for the candidate to indicate the position for which he
or she is filing;
(3) For those offices defined in section 203 of this act only, a
place for the candidate to identify a major or minor political party,
if any, the candidate regards as best approximating his or her own
political philosophy. No candidate may list more than one political
party. Nothing in this indication of political philosophy may be
construed as denoting an endorsement or nomination by that party. The
sole purpose of allowing candidates to identify a political party
preference is to provide to voters a brief description of each
candidate's political philosophy, which the voters may consider when
casting their votes at a primary or general election. If a court of
competent jurisdiction holds that a political party has a right to
control the use of the name in a manner inconsistent with this
subsection, this subsection is inoperative and section 215 of this act
applies;
(4) A place for the candidate to indicate the amount of the filing
fee accompanying the declaration of candidacy or for the candidate to
indicate that he or she is filing a petition in lieu of the filing fee
under section 217 of this act;
(5) A place for the candidate to sign the declaration of candidacy,
stating that the information provided on the form is true and swearing
or affirming that he or she will support the Constitution and laws of
the United States and the Constitution and laws of the state of
Washington.
In the case of a declaration of candidacy filed electronically,
submission of the form constitutes agreement that the information
provided with the filing is true, that he or she will support the
Constitutions and laws of the United States and the state of
Washington, and that he or she agrees to electronic payment of the
filing fee established in section 217 of this act.
The secretary of state may require any other information on the
form he or she deems appropriate to facilitate the filing process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 If, as provided in section 214(3) of this
act, a court of competent jurisdiction holds that a political party has
the right to control the use of its name in a manner inconsistent with
the provisions of that subsection, then the following process applies:
For those offices defined in section 203 of this act, a place for
the candidate to submit a description of up to three words that the
candidate regards as best approximating his or her own political
philosophy. The sole purpose of allowing a candidate to submit a
three-word description is to provide to voters information about each
candidate's political philosophy, which the voters may consider when
casting their votes at a primary or general election. The secretary of
state shall adopt rules as necessary for the implementation of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 Any candidate may mail his or her
declaration of candidacy for an office to the filing officer. Such
declarations of candidacy shall be processed by the filing officer in
the following manner:
(1) Any declaration received by the filing officer by mail before
the tenth business day immediately preceding the first day for
candidates to file for office shall be returned to the candidate
submitting it, together with a notification that the declaration of
candidacy was received too early to be processed. The candidate shall
then be permitted to resubmit his or her declaration of candidacy
during the filing period.
(2) Any properly executed declaration of candidacy received by mail
on or after the tenth business day immediately preceding the first day
for candidates to file for office and before the close of business on
the last day of the filing period shall be included with filings made
in person during the filing period. In primaries for partisan office
and judicial offices the filing officer shall determine by lot the
order in which the names of those candidates shall appear upon sample
and absentee primary ballots.
(3) Any declaration of candidacy received by the filing officer
after the close of business on the last day for candidates to file for
office shall be rejected and returned to the candidate attempting to
file it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 A filing fee of one dollar shall accompany
each declaration of candidacy for precinct committee officer; a filing
fee of ten dollars shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any
office with a fixed annual salary of one thousand dollars or less; a
filing fee equal to one percent of the annual salary of the office at
the time of filing shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any
office with a fixed annual salary of more than one thousand dollars per
annum. No filing fee need accompany a declaration of candidacy for any
office for which compensation is on a per diem or per meeting attended
basis.
A candidate who lacks sufficient assets or income at the time of
filing to pay the filing fee required by this section shall submit with
his or her declaration of candidacy a filing petition. The petition
shall contain not less than a number of signatures of registered voters
equal to the number of dollars of the filing fee. The signatures shall
be of voters registered to vote within the jurisdiction of the office
for which the candidate is filing.
When the candidacy is for:
(1) A legislative or judicial office that includes territory from
more than one county, the fee shall be paid to the secretary of state
for equal division between the treasuries of the counties comprising
the district.
(2) A city or town office, the fee shall be paid to the county
auditor who shall transmit it to the city or town clerk for deposit in
the city or town treasury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 The filing petition authorized by section
217 of this act shall be printed on sheets of uniform color and size,
shall contain no more than twenty numbered lines, and must be in
substantially the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

We, the undersigned registered voters of . . .(the state of
Washington or the political subdivision for which the filing is
made). . ., hereby petition that the name of . . .(candidate's
name). . . be printed on the official primary ballot for the office of
. . .(insert name of office). . ..

If the candidate listed a political party on the declaration of
candidacy, then the name of that party must appear on the filing
petition.
The petition must include a place for each individual to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 Petitions may be rejected for the
following reasons:
(1) The petition is not in the proper form;
(2) The petition clearly bears insufficient signatures;
(3) The petition is not accompanied by a declaration of candidacy;
(4) The time within which the petition and the declaration of
candidacy could have been filed has expired.
If the petition is accepted, the officer with whom it is filed
shall canvass the signatures contained on it and shall reject the
signatures of those persons who are not registered voters and the
signatures of those persons who are not registered to vote within the
jurisdiction of the office for which the petition is filed. He or she
shall additionally reject any signature that appears on the petitions
of two or more candidates for the same office and shall also reject,
each time it appears, the name of any person who signs the same
petition more than once.
If the officer with whom the petition is filed refuses to accept
the petition or refuses to certify the petition as bearing sufficient
valid signatures, the person filing the petition may appeal that action
to the superior court. The application for judicial review shall take
precedence over other cases and matters and shall be speedily heard and
determined.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 A void in candidacy for an office occurs
when an election for such office, except for the short term, has been
scheduled and no valid declaration of candidacy has been filed for the
position or all persons filing such valid declarations of candidacy
have died or been disqualified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 The election officer with whom
declarations of candidacy are filed shall give notice of a void in
candidacy for an office by notifying press, radio, and television in
the county or counties involved and by such other means as may now or
hereafter be provided by law. The notice shall state the office, and
the time and place for filing declarations of candidacy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 Filings to fill a void in candidacy for an
office must be made in the same manner and with the same official as
required during the regular filing period for such office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 Filings for an office shall be reopened
for a period of three normal business days, such three day period to be
fixed by the election officer with whom such declarations of candidacy
are filed and notice thereof given by notifying press, radio, and
television in the county or counties and by such other means as may now
or hereafter be provided by law whenever before the sixth Tuesday prior
to a primary:
(1) A void in candidacy occurs;
(2) A vacancy occurs in an office leaving an unexpired term to be
filled by an election for which filings have not been held; or
(3) A candidate for judge of the superior court entitled to a
certificate of election pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41
of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified.
Candidacies validly filed within said three-day period shall appear
on the ballot as if made during the earlier filing period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 Filings for a nonpartisan office (other
than judge of the supreme court or superintendent of public
instruction) shall be reopened for a period of three normal business
days, such three day period to be fixed by the election officer with
whom such declarations of candidacy are filed and notice thereof given
by notifying press, radio, and television in the county and by such
other means as may now or hereafter be provided by law, when:
(1) A void in candidacy for such nonpartisan office occurs on or
after the sixth Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the sixth
Tuesday before an election; or
(2) A candidate for judge of the superior court eligible after a
contested primary for a certificate of election by Article 4, section
29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified
within the ten day period immediately following the last day allotted
for a candidate to withdraw; or
(3) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office on or after the
sixth Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the sixth Tuesday before
an election leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an election for
which filings have not been held.
The candidate receiving a plurality of the votes cast for that
office in the general election shall be deemed elected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 A scheduled election lapses, the office is
deemed stricken from the ballot, no purported write-in votes may be
counted, and no candidate may be certified as elected, when:
(1) In an election for judge of the supreme court, superintendent
of public instruction, or a partisan office, a void in candidacy occurs
on or after the sixth Tuesday prior to a primary, public filings and
the primary being an indispensable phase of the election process for
such offices;
(2) Except as otherwise specified in section 224 of this act, a
candidate for judge of the superior court entitled to a certificate of
election pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state
Constitution dies or is disqualified on or after the sixth Tuesday
prior to a primary;
(3) In other elections for nonpartisan office a void in candidacy
occurs or a vacancy occurs involving an unexpired term to be filled on
or after the sixth Tuesday prior to an election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 Any person who desires to be a write-in
candidate and have such votes counted at a primary or election may file
a declaration of candidacy with the officer designated in RCW
29A.24.070 not later than the day before the primary or election.
Declarations of candidacy for write-in candidates must be accompanied
by a filing fee in the same manner as required of other candidates
filing for the office as provided in section 217 of this act.
Votes cast for write-in candidates who have filed such declarations
of candidacy need only specify the name of the candidate in the
appropriate location on the ballot in order to be counted. Write-in
votes cast for any other candidate, in order to be counted, must
designate the office sought and position number, if the manner in which
the write-in is done does not make the office or position clear. In
order for write-in votes to be valid in jurisdictions employing
optical-scan mark sense ballot systems the voter must complete the
proper mark next to the write-in line for that office.
No person may file as a write-in candidate where:
(1) At a general election, the person attempting to file either
filed as a write-in candidate for the same office at the preceding
primary or the person's name appeared on the ballot for the same office
at the preceding primary;
(2) The person attempting to file as a write-in candidate has
already filed a valid write-in declaration for that primary or
election, unless one or the other of the two filings is for the office
of precinct committeeperson;
(3) The name of the person attempting to file already appears on
the ballot as a candidate for another office, unless one of the two
offices for which he or she is a candidate is precinct committeeperson.
The declaration of candidacy shall be similar to that required by
section 214 of this act. No write-in candidate filing under this
section may be included in any voter's pamphlet produced under chapter
29A.32 RCW unless that candidate qualifies to have his or her name
printed on the general election ballot. The legislative authority of
any jurisdiction producing a local voter's pamphlet under chapter
29A.32 RCW may provide, by ordinance, for the inclusion of write-in
candidates in such pamphlets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227 If the death or disqualification of a
candidate for a partisan or nonpartisan office does not give rise to
the opening of a new filing period under section 223 of this act, then
the following will occur:
(1) If the candidate dies or becomes disqualified after filing a
declaration of candidacy but before the close of the filing period,
then the declaration of candidacy is void and his or her name will not
appear on the ballot;
(2) If the candidate dies or becomes disqualified after the close
of the filing period but before the day of the primary, then his or her
name will appear on the primary ballot and all otherwise valid votes
for that candidate will be tabulated. The candidate's name will not
appear on the general election ballot even if he or she otherwise would
have qualified to do so, but no other candidate will advance, or be
substituted, in the place of that candidate. If the candidate was the
only candidate to qualify to advance to the general election, then the
general election for that office lapses, and the office will be
regarded as vacant as of the time the newly elected official would have
otherwise taken office;
(3) If the candidate dies or becomes disqualified on or after the
day of the primary, and he or she would have otherwise qualified to
appear on the general election ballot, then his or her name will appear
on the general election ballot and all otherwise valid votes for that
candidate will be tabulated. If the candidate received a number of
votes sufficient to be elected to office, but for his or her death or
disqualification, then the office will be regarded as vacant as of the
time the newly elected official would have otherwise taken office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 228 (1) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the
United States house of representatives or the United States senate from
this state, the governor shall order a special election to fill the
vacancy.
(2) Within ten days of such vacancy occurring, he or she shall
issue a writ of election fixing a date for the special vacancy election
not less than ninety days after the issuance of the writ, fixing a date
for the primary for qualifying candidates for the special vacancy
election not less than thirty days before the day fixed for holding the
special vacancy election, fixing the dates for the special filing
period, and designating the term or part of the term for which the
vacancy exists. If the vacancy is in the office of United States
representative, the writ of election shall specify the congressional
district that is vacant.
(3) If the vacancy occurs less than six months before a state
general election and before the second Friday following the close of
the filing period for that general election, the special primary and
special vacancy elections shall be held in concert with the state
primary and state general election in that year.
(4) If the vacancy occurs on or after the first day for filing
under RCW 29A.24.050 and on or before the second Friday following the
close of the filing period, a special filing period of three normal
business days shall be fixed by the governor and notice thereof given
to all media, including press, radio, and television within the area in
which the vacancy election is to be held, to the end that, insofar as
possible, all interested persons will be aware of such filing period.
The last day of the filing period shall not be later than the third
Tuesday before the primary. The names of candidates who have filed
valid declarations of candidacy during this three-day period shall
appear on the approaching primary ballot.
(5) If the vacancy occurs later than the second Friday following
the close of the filing period, a special primary and special vacancy
election to fill the position shall be held after the next state
general election but, in any event, no later than the ninetieth day
following the November election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 229 After calling a special primary and
special vacancy election to fill a vacancy in the United States house
of representatives or the United States senate from this state, the
governor shall immediately notify the secretary of state who shall, in
turn, immediately notify the county auditor of each county wholly or
partly within which the vacancy exists.
Each county auditor shall publish notices of the special primary
and the special vacancy election at least once in any legal newspaper
published in the county, as provided by RCW 29A.52.310 and 29A.52.350
respectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 230 The general election laws and laws
relating to primaries for partisan offices apply to the special
primaries and vacancy elections provided for in sections 228 and 229 of
this act to the extent that they are not inconsistent with the
provisions of these sections. Statutory time deadlines relating to
availability of absentee ballots, certification, canvassing, and
related procedures that cannot be met in a timely fashion may be
modified for the purposes of a specific primary or vacancy election
under this chapter by the secretary of state through emergency rules
adopted under RCW 29A.04.610.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 231 The voters' pamphlet must contain:
(1) Information about each ballot measure initiated by or referred
to the voters for their approval or rejection as required by RCW
29A.32.070;
(2) In even-numbered years, statements, if submitted, advocating
the candidacies of candidates qualified to appear on the ballot for the
office of president and vice president of the United States, United
States senator, United States representative, governor, lieutenant
governor, secretary of state, state treasurer, state auditor, attorney
general, commissioner of public lands, superintendent of public
instruction, insurance commissioner, state senator, state
representative, justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of
appeals, or judge of the superior court. Candidates may also submit a
campaign mailing address and telephone number and a photograph not more
than five years old and of a size and quality that the secretary of
state determines to be suitable for reproduction in the voters'
pamphlet;
(3) In odd-numbered years, if any office voted upon statewide
appears on the ballot due to a vacancy, then statements and photographs
for candidates for any vacant office listed in subsection (2) of this
section must appear;
(4) In even-numbered years, a section explaining how voters may
participate in the election campaign process; the address and telephone
number of the public disclosure commission established under RCW
42.17.350; and a summary of the disclosure requirements that apply when
contributions are made to candidates and political committees;
(5) In even-numbered years the name, address, and telephone number
of each political party for which a candidate appearing on the ballot
has expressed a preference on his or her declaration of candidacy, if
the party has provided that information to the secretary of state;
(6) In each odd-numbered year immediately before a year in which a
president of the United States is to be nominated and elected,
information explaining the precinct caucus and convention process used
by each major political party to elect delegates to its national
presidential candidate nominating convention. The pamphlet must also
provide a description of the statutory procedures by which minor
political parties are formed and the statutory methods used by the
parties to nominate candidates for president;
(7) In even-numbered years, a description of the office of precinct
committee officer and its duties;
(8) An application form for an absentee ballot;
(9) A brief statement explaining the deletion and addition of
language for proposed measures under RCW 29A.32.080;
(10) Any additional information pertaining to elections as may be
required by law or in the judgment of the secretary of state is deemed
informative to the voters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 232 (1) The maximum number of words for
statements submitted by candidates is as follows: State
representative, one hundred words; state senator, judge of the superior
court, judge of the court of appeals, justice of the supreme court, and
all state offices voted upon throughout the state, except that of
governor, two hundred words; president and vice president, United
States senator, United States representative, and governor, three
hundred words.
(2) Arguments written by committees under RCW 29A.32.060 may not
exceed two hundred fifty words in length.
(3) Rebuttal arguments written by committees may not exceed
seventy-five words in length.
(4) The secretary of state shall allocate space in the pamphlet
based on the number of candidates for each office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 233 On or before the day following the last
day allowed for candidates to withdraw under RCW 29A.24.130, the
secretary of state shall certify to each county auditor a list of the
candidates who have filed declarations of candidacy in his or her
office for the primary. For each office, the certificate shall include
the name of each candidate, his or her address, and his or her party
preference, if any.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 234 (1) Except as provided to the contrary in
RCW 82.14.036, 82.46.021, or 82.80.090, the ballot title of any
referendum filed on an enactment or portion of an enactment of a local
government and any other question submitted to the voters of a local
government consists of three elements: (a) An identification of the
enacting legislative body and a statement of the subject matter; (b) a
concise description of the measure; and (c) a question. The ballot
title must conform with the requirements and be displayed substantially
as provided under RCW 29A.72.050, except that the concise description
must not exceed seventy-five words. If the local governmental unit is
a city or a town, the concise statement shall be prepared by the city
or town attorney. If the local governmental unit is a county, the
concise statement shall be prepared by the prosecuting attorney of the
county. If the unit is a unit of local government other than a city,
town, or county, the concise statement shall be prepared by the
prosecuting attorney of the county within which the majority area of
the unit is located.
(2) A referendum measure on the enactment of a unit of local
government shall be advertised in the manner provided for candidates
for elective office.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if another
provision of law specifies the ballot title for a specific type of
ballot question or proposition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 235 Except for the candidates for the
positions of president and vice president or for a partisan or
nonpartisan office for which no primary is required, the names of all
candidates who, under this title, filed a declaration of candidacy will
appear on the appropriate ballot at the primary throughout the
jurisdiction of the office for which they are a candidate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 236 (1) Except as provided in RCW 29A.36.180
and in subsection (2) of this section, on the ballot at the general
election for an office for which a primary was held, only the names of
the candidate who received the greatest number of votes and the
candidate who received the next greatest number of votes for that
office shall appear under the title of that office, and the names shall
appear in that order. If a primary was conducted, no candidate's name
may be printed on the subsequent general election ballot unless he or
she receives at least one percent of the total votes cast for that
office at the preceding primary. On the ballot at the general election
for an office for which no primary was held, the names of the
candidates shall be listed in the order determined under RCW
29A.36.130.
(2) On the ballot at the general election for the office of justice
of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the
superior court, or state superintendent of public instruction, if a
candidate in a contested primary receives a majority of all the votes
cast for that office or position, only the name of that candidate may
be printed under the title of the office for that position.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 237 The names of the persons certified by the
secretary of state or the county canvassing board as having qualified
to appear on the general election ballot shall be printed on the ballot
at the ensuing election.
No name of any candidate for an office for which a primary is
conducted may be placed upon the ballot at a general or special
election unless it appears upon the certificate of either (1) the
secretary of state or (2) the county canvassing board.
Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a temporary
elected position such as a charter review board member or freeholder,
a candidate's name shall not appear more than once upon a ballot for a
position regularly elected at the same election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 238 Whenever it shall be necessary to hold a
special election in an odd-numbered year to fill an unexpired term of
any office which is scheduled to be voted upon for a full term in an
even-numbered year, no primary election shall be held in the odd-
numbered year if, after the last day allowed for candidates to withdraw
no more than two candidates have filed a declaration of candidacy for
a single office to be filled.
In this event, the officer with whom the declarations of candidacy
were filed shall immediately notify all candidates concerned and the
names of the candidates that would have been printed upon the primary
ballot, but for the provisions of this section, shall be printed as
candidates for the positions sought upon the general election ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 239 Candidates for partisan offices will
appear on the ballot at primaries held under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 240 (1) Whenever candidates for partisan
office are to be elected, the general election must be preceded by a
primary conducted under this chapter, except as otherwise provided in
law. Based upon votes cast at the primary, two candidates must be
certified as qualified to appear on the general election ballot, under
sections 236 and 242 of this act.
(2) A primary may not be used to select the nominees of a political
party. A primary is a critical stage in the public process by which
voters elect candidates to public office.
(3) If a candidate indicates a political philosophy as provided by
section 214(3) or 215 of this act on his or her declaration of
candidacy, then the philosophy will be listed for the candidate on the
primary and general election ballots. Each candidate who does not
express a philosophy will be listed as an independent candidate on the
primary and general election ballots. Political philosophy will be
listed for the information of the voters only, and may not be used for
any purpose relating to the conduct, canvassing, or certification of
the primary, and may in no way limit the options available to voters in
deciding for whom to cast a vote.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 241 The offices of superintendent of public
instruction, justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of
appeals, judge of the superior court, and judge of the district court
shall be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be qualified and
elected as such.
All city, town, and special purpose district elective offices shall
be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be qualified and
elected as such.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 242 No later than the day following the
certification of the returns of any primary, the secretary of state
shall certify to the appropriate county auditors, the names of all
persons qualified to appear on the general election ballot as
candidates for offices, the returns of which have been canvassed by the
secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 243 Except as provided in RCW 29A.32.260,
notice for any state, county, district, or municipal election, whether
special or general, must be given by at least one publication not more
than ten nor less than three days before the election by the county
auditor or the officer conducting the election as the case may be, in
one or more newspapers of general circulation within the county. The
legal notice must contain the title of each office under the proper
party preference, the names and addresses of all candidates who have
been qualified to appear on the ballot for an office to be voted upon
at that election, together with the ballot titles of all measures, the
hours during which the polls will be open, and the polling places for
each precinct, giving the address of each polling place. The names of
all candidates for nonpartisan offices must be published separately
with designation of the offices for which they are candidates but
without party designation. This is the only notice required for a
state, county, district, or municipal general or special election and
supersedes the provisions of any and all other statutes, whether
general or special in nature, having different requirements for the
giving of notice of any general or special elections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 244 (1) For any office at any election or
primary, any voter may write in on the ballot the name of any person
for an office who has filed as a write-in candidate for the office in
the manner provided by section 226 of this act and such vote shall be
counted the same as if the name had been printed on the ballot and
marked by the voter. No write-in vote made for any person who has not
filed a declaration of candidacy pursuant to section 226 of this act is
valid if that person filed for the same office, either as a regular
candidate or a write-in candidate, at the preceding primary. Any
abbreviation used to designate office, position, or political party
shall be accepted if the canvassing board can determine, to their
satisfaction, the voter's intent.
(2) The number of write-in votes cast for each office must be
recorded and reported with the canvass for the election.
(3) Write-in votes cast for an individual candidate for an office
need not be tallied if the total number of write-in votes cast for the
office is not greater than the number of votes cast for the candidate
apparently qualified to appear on the general election ballot or
elected, and the write-in votes could not have altered the outcome of
the primary or election. In the case of write-in votes for statewide
office or for any office whose jurisdiction encompasses more than one
county, write-in votes for an individual candidate must be tallied
whenever the county auditor is notified by either the office of the
secretary of state or another auditor in a multicounty jurisdiction
that it appears that the write-in votes could alter the outcome of the
primary or election.
(4) In the case of statewide offices or jurisdictions that
encompass more than one county, if the total number of write-in votes
cast for an office within a county is greater than the number of votes
cast for a candidate apparently qualified to appear on the general
election ballot or elected in a primary or election, the auditor shall
tally all write-in votes for individual candidates for that office and
notify the office of the secretary of state and the auditors of the
other counties within the jurisdiction, that the write-in votes for
individual candidates should be tallied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 245 (1) If the requisite number of any
federal, state, county, city, or district offices have not qualified to
appear on the general election ballot in a primary by reason of two or
more persons having an equal and requisite number of votes for being
placed on the general election ballot, the official empowered by state
law to certify candidates for the general election ballot shall give
notice to the several persons so having the equal and requisite number
of votes to attend at the appropriate office at the time designated by
that official, who shall then and there proceed publicly to decide by
lot which of those persons will be declared qualified and placed on the
general election ballot.
(2) If the requisite number of any federal, state, county, city,
district, or precinct officers have not been elected by reason of two
or more persons having an equal and highest number of votes for one and
the same office, the official empowered by state law to issue the
original certificate of election shall give notice to the several
persons so having the highest and equal number of votes to attend at
the appropriate office at the time to be appointed by that official,
who shall then and there proceed publicly to decide by lot which of
those persons will be declared duly elected, and the official shall
make out and deliver to the person thus duly declared elected a
certificate of election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 246 An officer of a political party or any
person for whom votes were cast in a primary who was not declared
qualified to appear on the general election ballot may file a written
application for a recount of the votes or a portion of the votes cast
at that primary for all persons for whom votes were cast for that
office.
An officer of a political party or any person for whom votes were
cast at any election may file a written application for a recount of
the votes or a portion of the votes cast at that election for all
candidates for election to that office.
Any group of five or more registered voters may file a written
application for a recount of the votes or a portion of the votes cast
upon any question or issue. They shall designate one of the members of
the group as chair and shall indicate the voting residence of each
member of the group.
An application for a recount of the votes cast for an office or on
a ballot measure must be filed with the officer with whom filings are
made for the jurisdiction.
An application for a recount must specify whether the recount will
be done manually or by the vote tally system. A recount done by the
vote tally system must use programming that recounts and reports only
the office or ballot measure in question. The county shall also
provide for a test of the logic and accuracy of that program.
An application for a recount must be filed within three business
days after the county canvassing board or secretary of state has
declared the official results of the primary or election for the office
or issue for which the recount is requested.
This chapter applies to the recounting of votes cast by paper
ballots and to the recounting of votes recorded on ballots counted by
a vote tally system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 247 (1) If the official canvass of all of the
returns for any office at any primary or election reveals that the
difference in the number of votes cast for a candidate apparently
qualified to appear on the general election ballot or elected to any
office and the number of votes cast for the closest apparently defeated
opponent is less than two thousand votes and also less than one-half of
one percent of the total number of votes cast for both candidates, the
county canvassing board shall conduct a recount of all votes cast on
that position.
(a) Whenever such a difference occurs in the number of votes cast
for candidates for a position the declaration of candidacy for which
was filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall,
within three business days of the day that the returns of the primary
or election are first certified by the canvassing boards of those
counties, direct those boards to recount all votes cast on the
position.
(b) If the difference in the number of votes cast for the apparent
winner and the closest apparently defeated opponent is less than one
hundred fifty votes and also less than one-fourth of one percent of the
total number of votes cast for both candidates, the votes shall be
recounted manually or as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) A mandatory recount shall be conducted in the manner provided
by sections 248, 249, and 250 of this act. No cost of a mandatory
recount may be charged to any candidate.
(3) The apparent winner and closest apparently defeated opponent
for an office for which a manual recount is required under subsection
(1)(b) of this section may select an alternative method of conducting
the recount. To select such an alternative, the two candidates shall
agree to the alternative in a signed, written statement filed with the
election official for the office. The recount shall be conducted using
the alternative method if: It is suited to the balloting system that
was used for casting the votes for the office; it involves the use of
a vote tallying system that is approved for use in this state by the
secretary of state; and the vote tallying system is readily available
in each county required to conduct the recount. If more than one
balloting system was used in casting votes for the office, an
alternative to a manual recount may be selected for each system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 248 An application for a recount shall state
the office for which a recount is requested and whether the request is
for all or only a portion of the votes cast in that jurisdiction of
that office. The person filing an application for a manual recount
shall, at the same time, deposit with the county canvassing board or
secretary of state, in cash or by certified check, a sum equal to
twenty-five cents for each ballot cast in the jurisdiction or portion
of the jurisdiction for which the recount is requested as security for
the payment of any costs of conducting the recount. If the application
is for a machine recount, the deposit must be equal to fifteen cents
for each ballot. These charges shall be determined by the county
canvassing board or boards under RCW 29A.64.080.
The county canvassing board shall determine a time and a place or
places at which the recount will be conducted. This time shall be less
than three business days after the day upon which: The application was
filed with the board; the request for a recount or directive ordering
a recount was received by the board from the secretary of state; or the
returns are certified which indicate that a recount is required under
RCW 29A.64.020 for an issue or office voted upon only within the
county. Not less than two days before the date of the recount, the
county auditor shall mail a notice of the time and place of the recount
to the applicant or affected parties and, if the recount involves an
office, to any person for whom votes were cast for that office. The
county auditor shall also notify the affected parties by either
telephone, fax, e-mail, or other electronic means at the time of
mailing. At least three attempts must be made over a two-day period to
notify the affected parties or until the affected parties have received
the notification. Each attempt to notify affected parties must request
a return response indicating that the notice has been received. Each
person entitled to receive notice of the recount may attend, witness
the recount, and be accompanied by counsel.
Proceedings of the canvassing board are public under chapter 42.30
RCW. Subject to reasonable and equitable guidelines adopted by the
canvassing board, all interested persons may attend and witness a
recount.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 249 (1) At the time and place established for
a recount, the canvassing board or its duly authorized representatives,
in the presence of all witnesses who may be in attendance, shall open
the sealed containers containing the ballots to be recounted, and shall
recount the votes for the offices or issues for which the recount has
been ordered. Ballots shall be handled only by the members of the
canvassing board or their duly authorized representatives.
Witnesses shall be permitted to observe the ballots and the process
of tabulating the votes, but they shall not be permitted to handle the
ballots. The canvassing board shall not permit the tabulation of votes
for any office or issue other than the ones for which a recount was
applied for or required.
(2) At any time before the ballots from all of the precincts listed
in the application for the recount have been recounted, the applicant
may file with the board a written request to stop the recount.
(3) The recount may be observed by persons representing the
candidates affected by the recount or the persons representing both
sides of an issue that is being recounted. The observers may not make
a record of the names, addresses, or other information on the ballots,
poll books, or applications for absentee ballots unless authorized by
the superior court. The secretary of state or county auditor may limit
the number of observers to not less than two on each side if, in his or
her opinion, a greater number would cause undue delay or disruption of
the recount process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 250 Upon completion of the canvass of a
recount, the canvassing board shall prepare and certify an amended
abstract showing the votes cast in each precinct for which the recount
was conducted. Copies of the amended abstracts must be transmitted to
the same officers who received the abstract on which the recount was
based.
If the office or issue for which the recount was conducted was
submitted only to the voters of a county, the canvassing board shall
file the amended abstract with the original results of that election or
primary.
If the office or issue for which a recount was conducted was
submitted to the voters of more than one county, the secretary of state
shall canvass the amended abstracts and shall file an amended abstract
with the original results of that election. An amended abstract
certified under this section supersedes any prior abstract of the
results for the same offices or issues at the same primary or election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 251 The canvassing board shall determine the
expenses for conducting a recount of votes.
The cost of the recount shall be deducted from the amount deposited
by the applicant for the recount at the time of filing the request for
the recount, and the balance shall be returned to the applicant. If
the costs of the recount exceed the deposit, the applicant shall pay
the difference. No charges may be deducted by the canvassing board
from the deposit for a recount if the recount changes the result of the
primary or election for which the recount was ordered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 252 Any justice of the supreme court, judge of
the court of appeals, or judge of the superior court in the proper
county shall, by order, require any person charged with error, wrongful
act, or neglect to forthwith correct the error, desist from the
wrongful act, or perform the duty and to do as the court orders or to
show cause forthwith why the error should not be corrected, the
wrongful act desisted from, or the duty or order not performed,
whenever it is made to appear to such justice or judge by affidavit of
an elector that:
(1) An error or omission has occurred or is about to occur in
printing the name of any candidate on official ballots; or
(2) An error other than as provided in subsections (1) and (3) of
this section has been committed or is about to be committed in printing
the ballots; or
(3) The name of any person has been or is about to be wrongfully
placed upon the ballots; or
(4) A wrongful act other than as provided for in subsections (1)
and (3) of this section has been performed or is about to be performed
by any election officer; or
(5) Any neglect of duty on the part of an election officer other
than as provided for in subsections (1) and (3) of this section has
occurred or is about to occur; or
(6) An error or omission has occurred or is about to occur in the
issuance of a certificate of election.
An affidavit of an elector under subsections (1) and (3) above when
relating to a primary election must be filed with the appropriate court
no later than the second Friday following the closing of the filing
period for such office and shall be heard and finally disposed of by
the court not later than five days after the filing thereof. An
affidavit of an elector under subsections (1) and (3) of this section
when relating to a general election must be filed with the appropriate
court no later than three days following the official certification of
the primary election returns and shall be heard and finally disposed of
by the court not later than five days after the filing thereof. An
affidavit of an elector under subsection (6) of this section shall be
filed with the appropriate court no later than ten days following the
issuance of a certificate of election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 253 The following apply to persons signing
petitions prescribed by sections 209 and 218 of this act:
(1) A person who signs a petition with any other than his or her
name shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
(2) A person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor if the person
knowingly: Signs more than one petition for any single candidacy of
any single candidate; signs the petition when he or she is not a legal
voter; or makes a false statement as to his or her residence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 254 Every person who:
(1) Knowingly provides false information on his or her declaration
of candidacy, filing petition, or nominating petition; or
(2) Conceals or fraudulently defaces or destroys a certificate that
has been filed with an elections officer under sections 207 through 212
of this act or a declaration of candidacy or petition of nomination
that has been filed with an elections officer, or any part of such a
certificate, declaration, or petition, is guilty of a class C felony
punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 255 Every person who:
(1) Knowingly and falsely issues a certificate of qualification or
election; or
(2) Knowingly provides false information on a certificate which
must be filed with an elections officer under sections 207 through 212
of this act, is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW
9A.20.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 256 (1) The subheadings in chapter 29A.52 RCW
"PARTISAN PRIMARIES" AND "NONPARTISAN PRIMARIES" will be combined under
one subheading "PRIMARIES."
(2) The subheading in chapter 29A.20 RCW "MINOR PARTY AND
INDEPENDENT CANDIDATE NOMINATIONS" will be changed to "MINOR AND
INDEPENDENT PRESIDENTIAL CANDIDATES."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 257 Sections 201 through 255 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 29A RCW.

PART 3 - SELECTION OF PRIMARY PROCEDURES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
No political party or person may obtain information from any state
or local governmental unit that could link a particular voter to the
votes cast by that voter, or could reveal the choice of party ballot
made by any particular unaffiliated voter.
After June 15, 2004, if before March 1st in any election year, the
rules of a major political party require the disclosure of information
from any state or local governmental unit that could link a particular
voter to the votes cast by that voter, or could reveal the choice of
party ballot made by any particular unaffiliated voter, the party must
nominate its candidates according to section 302 of this act for that
election year and the following election year.
After June 15, 2004, if after March 1st in any election year, the
rules of a major political party require the disclosure of information
from any state or local governmental unit that could link a particular
voter to the votes cast by that voter, or could reveal the choice of
party ballot made by any particular unaffiliated voter, the party must
nominate its candidates according to section 302 of this act for the
following two election years.
For the purposes of this section, an "election year" begins on
November 1st and continues until October 31st of the next year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
If the state chair of a major political party has provided the
secretary of state with a signed statement refusing to consent to the
participation of unaffiliated voters in that party's primary as
described in section 157(2) of this act, or if section 301 of this act
applies, the following provisions apply to that party's nomination of
candidates for the general election:
(1) The major political party shall be deemed a party not
participating in the primary and must nominate its candidates for the
general election using the processes otherwise applicable to minor
political parties and independent candidates contained in RCW
29A.20.110 through 29A.20.200.
(2) The party shall submit to the secretary of state the names and
voter registration addresses of the registered party members of the
party who participated in the nomination of a party candidate to the
general election ballot. The secretary of state shall: (a) Segregate
the names and addresses by county; and (b) transmit the names and
addresses of the party members from each county to the county auditor
for that county.
(3) Any voter who participated in the nomination of a candidate may
only vote a nonpartisan ballot in the subsequent primary. The county
auditor for the county in which the voter is registered to vote shall
provide a nonpartisan ballot for the voter's use at the primary, if
nonpartisan races or ballot measures are on the ballot.
(4) The expenses incurred to nominate a candidate for inclusion on
the general election ballot shall be borne by that party to the same
extent as such expenses are borne by minor political parties and
independent candidates.
(5) This section does not apply if the secretary of state has
issued notice under section 303 of this act that no partisan primary
may be held.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
(1) After June 15, 2004, if on March 15th every major political
party: (a) Has refused to consent to the participation of unaffiliated
voters under section 157 of this act; or (b) will not be participating
in the forthcoming partisan primary due to a violation of section 301
of this act, no partisan primary may be held.
(2) If subsection (1) of this section applies, no later than March
15th the secretary of state shall notify the governor, the majority and
minority leaders of the two largest caucuses in the senate and the
house of representatives, the code reviser, and each county auditor
that all major parties are ineligible to participate in the partisan
primaries described in this title. Upon issuance of the notification,
no partisan primary will be held in that calendar year.
(3) The secretary of state shall determine each year thereafter
whether subsection (1) of this section continues to apply, and shall
notify the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the two
largest caucuses in the senate and the house of representatives, the
code reviser, and each county auditor accordingly.
(4) All eligible electors may only vote a nonpartisan ballot in the
primary.
(5) Until such time as subsection (1) of this section no longer
applies, the state and counties shall conduct qualifying primaries as
provided in chapter 29A.-- RCW (sections 201 through 255 of this act).

PART 4 - MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for section 173 of this act which takes effect June
30, 2005.

--- END ---