BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 18.19 RCW to read as follows:

Confidential
communications between a client and an individual certified under this chapter
are privileged against compulsory disclosure to the same extent and subject to
the same conditions as confidential communications between a psychologist and
client, but this exception is subject to the limitations under RCW 70.96A.140.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.19.180 and 1991 c 3 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

An
individual registered ((or certified)) under this chapter shall not
disclose the written acknowledgment of the disclosure statement pursuant to RCW
18.19.060 nor any information acquired from persons consulting the individual
in a professional capacity when that information was necessary to enable the
individual to render professional services to those persons except:

(1)
With the written consent of that person or, in the case of death or disability,
the person's personal representative, other person authorized to sue, or the
beneficiary of an insurance policy on the person's life, health, or physical
condition;

(2)
That ((a person)) an individual registered ((or certified))
under this chapter is not required to treat as confidential a communication
that reveals the contemplation or commission of a crime or harmful act;

(3)
If the person is a minor, and the information acquired by the ((person))
individual registered ((or certified)) under this chapter
indicates that the minor was the victim or subject of a crime, the ((person))
individual registered ((or certified)) may testify fully upon any
examination, trial, or other proceeding in which the commission of the crime is
the subject of the inquiry;

(4)
If the person waives the privilege by bringing charges against the ((person))
individual registered ((or certified)) under this chapter;

(5)
In response to a subpoena from a court of law or the secretary. The secretary
may subpoena only records related to a complaint or report under chapter 18.130
RCW; or

(6) As required under chapter 26.44 RCW.

---
END ---