BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.52.420 and 1994 c 154 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
After the filing of any complaint, except as provided in RCW 42.52.450, the
staff of the appropriate ethics board shall investigate the complaint. The
investigation shall be limited to the ((alleged facts)) allegations
contained in the complaint.

(2)
The results of the investigation shall be reduced to writing and the staff
shall either make a determination ((shall be made)) that the
complaint should be dismissed pursuant to section 2 of this act, or recommend
to the board that there is or that there is not reasonable cause to believe
that a violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it has been or is being
committed.

((A
copy of the written)) (3) The board's determination on reasonable
cause shall be provided to the complainant and to the person named in such
complaint.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Based on the investigation conducted under RCW 42.52.420, and subject to rules
issued by each board, the staff of the appropriate ethics board may issue an
order of dismissal based on any of the following findings:

(a)
Any violation that may have occurred is not within the jurisdiction of the
board;

(b)
The complaint is obviously unfounded or frivolous; or

(c)
Any violation that may have occurred does not constitute a material violation
because it was inadvertent and minor, or has been cured, and, after
consideration of all of the circumstances, further proceedings would not serve
the purposes of this section.

(2)
Written notice of the determination under subsection (1) of this section shall
be provided to the complainant, respondent, and the board.

(3)
In the event that a complaint is dismissed under this section, the complainant
may request that the board review the action. Following review, the board
shall:

(a)
Affirm the staff dismissal;

(b)
Direct the staff to conduct further investigation; or

(c)
Issue a determination that there is reasonable cause to believe that a
violation has been or is being committed.

(4)
The board's decision under subsection (3) of this section shall be reduced to
writing and provided to the complainant and the respondent.

Sec.
3. RCW
42.52.180 and 1995 c 397 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use of facilities
of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign
for election of a person to an office, for the appointment of a person to a
vacancy in an elective office, or for the promotion of or opposition to a
ballot proposition. Knowing acquiescence by a person with authority to direct,
control, or influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using
public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation of this
section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited to, use of
stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state employees of the
agency during working hours, vehicles, office space, publications of the
agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the agency.

(2)
This section shall not apply to the following activities:

(a)
Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected legislative
body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion,
proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot
proposition as long as (i) required notice of the meeting includes the title
and number of the ballot proposition, and (ii) members of the legislative body
or members of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for
the expression of an opposing view;

(b)
A statement by an elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot
proposition at an open press conference or in response to a specific inquiry.
For the purposes of this subsection, it is not a violation of this section for
an elected official to respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to
make incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an actual,
measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards shall adopt by rule
a definition of measurable expenditure;

(c)
Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or
agency; and

(d)
De minimis use of public facilities by state-wide elected officials and
legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of permissible
communications, including written and verbal communications initiated by them
of their views on ballot propositions that foreseeably may affect a matter that
falls within their constitutional or statutory responsibilities.

(3)
As to state officers and employees, this section operates to the exclusion of
RCW 42.17.130.

Sec.
4. RCW
42.17.130 and 1979 ex.s. c 265 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

No
elective official nor any employee of his or her office nor any person
appointed to or employed by any public office or agency may use or authorize
the use of any of the facilities of a public office or agency, directly or
indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign for election of any person
to any office, for the appointment of a person to a vacancy in an elective
office, or for the promotion of or opposition to any ballot proposition.
Facilities of public office or agency include, but are not limited to, use of
stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of employees of the office or
agency during working hours, vehicles, office space, publications of the office
or agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the office or agency:
PROVIDED, That the foregoing provisions of this section shall not apply to the
following activities:

(1)
Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected legislative
body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion,
proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot
proposition so long as (a) any required notice of the meeting includes the
title and number of the ballot proposition, and (b) members of the legislative
body or members of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity
for the expression of an opposing view;

(2)
A statement by an elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot
proposition at an open press conference or in response to a specific inquiry;

(3)
Activities which are part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or
agency.

Sec.
5. RCW
42.52.120 and 1997 c 318 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No state officer or state employee may receive any thing of economic value
under any contract or grant outside of his or her official duties. The
prohibition in this subsection does not apply where the state officer or state
employee has complied with RCW 42.52.030(2) or each of the following conditions
are met:

(a)
The contract or grant is bona fide and actually performed;

(b)
The performance or administration of the contract or grant is not within the
course of the officer's or employee's official duties, or is not under the
officer's or employee's official supervision;

(c)
The performance of the contract or grant is not prohibited by RCW 42.52.040 or
by applicable laws or rules governing outside employment for the officer or
employee;

(d)
The contract or grant is neither performed for nor compensated by any person
from whom such officer or employee would be prohibited by RCW 42.52.150(4) from
receiving a gift;

(e)
The contract or grant is not one expressly created or authorized by the officer
or employee in his or her official capacity;

(f)
The contract or grant would not require unauthorized disclosure of confidential
information.

(2)
In addition to satisfying the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, a
state officer or state employee may have a beneficial interest in a grant or
contract or a series of substantially identical contracts or grants with a
state agency only if:

(a)
The contract or grant is awarded or issued as a result of an open and
competitive bidding process in which more than one bid or grant application was
received; or

(b)
The contract or grant is awarded or issued as a result of an open and
competitive bidding or selection process in which the officer's or employee's
bid or proposal was the only bid or proposal received and the officer or
employee has been advised by the appropriate ethics board, before execution of
the contract or grant, that the contract or grant would not be in conflict with
the proper discharge of the officer's or employee's official duties; or

(c)
The process for awarding the contract or issuing the grant is not open and
competitive, but the officer or employee has been advised by the appropriate
ethics board that the contract or grant would not be in conflict with the
proper discharge of the officer's or employee's official duties.

(3)
A state officer or state employee awarded a contract or issued a grant in
compliance with subsection (2) of this section shall file the contract or grant
with the appropriate ethics board within thirty days after the date of
execution; however, if proprietary formulae, designs, drawings, or research are
included in the contract or grant, the proprietary formulae, designs, drawings,
or research may be deleted from the contract or grant filed with the
appropriate ethics board.

(4)
This section does not prevent a state officer or state employee from receiving
compensation contributed from the treasury of the United States, another state,
county, or municipality if the compensation is received pursuant to
arrangements entered into between such state, county, municipality, or the
United States and the officer's or employee's agency. This section does not
prohibit a state officer or state employee from serving or performing any
duties ((under an employment contract with a)) as an officer or
employee of more than one governmental entity. Such compensation or
employment is subject to the restrictions in RCW 42.52.020.

(5)
As used in this section, "officer" and "employee" do not
include officers and employees who, in accordance with the terms of their
employment or appointment, are serving without compensation from the state of
Washington or are receiving from the state only reimbursement of expenses
incurred or a predetermined allowance for such expenses.

Sec.
6. RCW
42.17.020 and 1995 c 397 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal
corporation, or special purpose district, or any office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or other local public agency.

(2)
"Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized by a
candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges have been
filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf of the candidate
or public official.

(3)
"Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29.01.110, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition proposed to be
submitted to the voters of the state ((or)); any municipal
corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency; or the
state legislature, from and after the time when the proposition has been
initially filed with the appropriate election officer of that constituency
prior to its circulation for signatures. An initiative to the legislature
shall not be considered a ballot proposition during the period beginning the
first day following the close of the time for signature gathering and ending on
the last day of the legislative session, or the day when the legislature takes
final action on the initiative, whichever comes first.

(4)
"Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or
monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary, financial,
economic, or monetary disadvantage.

(5)
"Bona fide political party" means:

(a)
An organization that has filed a valid certificate of nomination with the
secretary of state under chapter 29.24 RCW;

(b)
The governing body of the state organization of a major political party, as
defined in RCW 29.01.090, that is the body authorized by the charter or bylaws
of the party to exercise authority on behalf of the state party; or

(c)
The county central committee or legislative district committee of a major
political party. There may be only one legislative district committee for each
party in each legislative district.

(6)
"Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or political
committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.

(7)
"Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW 42.17.050, to
perform the duties specified in that section.

(8)
"Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for election or
election to public office. An individual seeks nomination or election when he
or she first:

(a)
Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space or facilities
with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;

(b)
Announces publicly or files for office;

(c)
Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to promote his or her
candidacy; or

(d)
Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of the individual
any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.

(9)
"Caucus political committee" means a political committee organized
and maintained by the members of a major political party in the state senate or
state house of representatives.

(10)
"Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service of
communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast or
distribution to the general public or segments of the general public whether
through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio stations,
billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies, printing companies, or
otherwise.

(11)
"Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.

(12)
"Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services of any
kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW 42.17.241, the
term "compensation" shall not include per diem allowances or other
payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse a public official for
expenses incurred while the official is engaged in the official business of the
governmental entity.

(13)
"Continuing political committee" means a political committee that is
an organization of continuing existence not established in anticipation of any
particular election campaign.

(14)(a)
"Contribution" includes:

(i)
A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of indebtedness, donation,
advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds between political committees, or
anything of value, including personal and professional services for less than
full consideration;

(ii)
An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation, or concert with,
or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a political committee, or
their agents;

(iii)
The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution, or republication,
in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic, or other form of political
advertising prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;

(iv)
Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners and parties,
except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at the event.

(b)
"Contribution" does not include:

(i)
Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's account;

(ii)
Ordinary home hospitality;

(iii)
A contribution received by a candidate or political committee that is returned
to the contributor within five business days of the date on which it is
received by the candidate or political committee;

(iv)
A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly scheduled news
medium that is of primary interest to the general public, that is in a news
medium controlled by a person whose business is that news medium, and that is
not controlled by a candidate or a political committee;

(v)
An internal political communication primarily limited to the members of or
contributors to a political party organization or political committee, or to
the officers, management staff, or stockholders of a corporation or similar
enterprise, or to the members of a labor organization or other membership
organization;

(vi)
The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer
campaign workers, or incidental expenses personally incurred by volunteer
campaign workers not in excess of fifty dollars personally paid for by the
worker. "Volunteer services," for the purposes of this section,
means services or labor for which the individual is not compensated by any
person;

(vii)
Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or window signs
displayed on a person's own property or property occupied by a person.
However, a facility used for such political advertising for which a rental
charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts
towards any applicable contribution limit of the person providing the facility;

(viii)
Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:

(A)
A political party or caucus political committee if the person paying for the
services is the regular employer of the person rendering such services; or

(B)
A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for the services is
the regular employer of the individual rendering the services and if the
services are solely for the purpose of ensuring compliance with state election
or public disclosure laws.

(c)
Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to have a monetary
value equivalent to the fair market value of the contribution. Services or
property or rights furnished at less than their fair market value for the
purpose of assisting any candidate or political committee are deemed a
contribution. Such a contribution must be reported as an in-kind contribution
at its fair market value and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the provider.

(15)
"Elected official" means any person elected at a general or special
election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy in
any such office.

(16)
"Election" includes any primary, general, or special election for
public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is submitted to
the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the qualifications for voting
include other than those requirements set forth in Article VI, section 1
(Amendment 63) of the Constitution of the state of Washington shall not be
considered an election for purposes of this chapter.

(17)
"Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in opposition
to a candidate for election to public office and any campaign in support of, or
in opposition to, a ballot proposition.

(18)
"Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day of
December after the date of the last previous general election for the office
that the candidate seeks and ending on November 30th after the next election
for the office. In the case of a special election to fill a vacancy in an
office, "election cycle" means the period beginning on the day the
vacancy occurs and ending on November 30th after the special election.

(19)
"Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of value,
and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not legally
enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure" also
includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of value in
exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or anything of value for
the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring any public official or
candidate, or assisting in furthering or opposing any election campaign. For
the purposes of this chapter, agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and
promises to pay may be reported as estimated obligations until actual payment
is made. The term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or
complete repayment by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a
loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly reported.

(20)
"Final report" means the report described as a final report in RCW
42.17.080(2).

(21)
"General election" means the election that results in the election of
a person to a state office. It does not include a primary.

(22)
"Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.

(23)
"Immediate family" includes the spouse, dependent children, and other
dependent relatives, if living in the household. For the purposes of RCW
42.17.640 through 42.17.790, "immediate family" means an individual's
spouse, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent,
brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual and the spouse
of any such person and a child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent,
grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's
spouse and the spouse of any such person.

(24)
"Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each of the
following elements:

(a)
It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for office by a person
who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an authorized committee of
that candidate for that office, (iii) a person who has received the candidate's
encouragement or approval to make the expenditure, if the expenditure pays in
whole or in part for political advertising supporting that candidate or
promoting the defeat of any other candidate or candidates for that office, or
(iv) a person with whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of
making the expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for
political advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;

(b)
The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political advertising that either
specifically names the candidate supported or opposed, or clearly and beyond
any doubt identifies the candidate without using the candidate's name; and

(c)
The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another expenditure or other
expenditures of the same person in support of or opposition to that candidate,
has a value of five hundred dollars or more. A series of expenditures, each of
which is under five hundred dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if
their cumulative value is five hundred dollars or more.

(25)(a)
"Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a contribution to a
candidate or committee from another person unless the contribution is from the
individual's employer, immediate family as defined for purposes of RCW
42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an association to which the individual belongs.

(b)
A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes of the committee
that the treasurer or candidate serves.

(c)
A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is
compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and customary rate.

(d)
A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's home is not an
intermediary for purposes of that event.

(26)
"Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments,
nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of the state
legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the subject of action by
either house or any committee of the legislature and all bills and resolutions
that, having passed both houses, are pending approval by the governor.

(27)
"Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence
the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of
Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other
legislative enactment of any state agency under the state Administrative
Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor
"lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of
communicating with the members of that association or organization.

(28)
"Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his or her own
or another's behalf.

(29)
"Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom a lobbyist
is employed and all persons by whom he or she is compensated for acting as a
lobbyist.

(30)
"Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint venture, public
or private corporation, association, federal, state, or local governmental
entity or agency however constituted, candidate, committee, political
committee, political party, executive committee thereof, or any other
organization or group of persons, however organized.

(31)
"Person in interest" means the person who is the subject of a record
or any representative designated by that person, except that if that person is
under a legal disability, the term "person in interest" means and
includes the parent or duly appointed legal representative.

(32)
"Political advertising" includes any advertising displays, newspaper
ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles, tabloids, flyers, letters, radio
or television presentations, or other means of mass communication, used for the
purpose of appealing, directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or
other support in any election campaign.

(33)
"Political committee" means any person (except a candidate or an
individual dealing with his or her own funds or property) having the
expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in support of, or
opposition to, any candidate or any ballot proposition.

(34)
"Primary" means the procedure for nominating a candidate to state
office under chapter 29.18 or 29.21 RCW or any other primary for an election
that uses, in large measure, the procedures established in chapter 29.18 or
29.21 RCW.

(35)
"Public office" means any federal, state, county, city, town, school
district, port district, special district, or other state political subdivision
elective office.

(36)
"Public record" includes any writing containing information relating
to the conduct of government or the performance of any governmental or
proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained by any state or local
agency regardless of physical form or characteristics. For the office of the
secretary of the senate and the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives, public records means legislative records as defined in RCW
40.14.100 and also means the following: All budget and financial records;
personnel leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated a public
record by any official action of the senate or the house of representatives.

(37)
"Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the date of
the filing of recall charges under RCW 29.82.015 and ending thirty days after
the recall election.

(38)
"State legislative office" means the office of a member of the state
house of representatives or the office of a member of the state senate.

(39)
"State office" means state legislative office or the office of
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general,
commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of public
instruction, state auditor, or state treasurer.

(40)
"State official" means a person who holds a state office.

(41)
"Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or
candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the possession or
control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the election for which the
contributions were received, and that are in excess of the amount necessary to
pay remaining debts incurred by the committee or candidate prior to that
election. In the case of a continuing political committee, "surplus
funds" mean those contributions remaining in the possession or control of
the committee that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining
debts when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17.065.

(42)
"Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating,
photographing, and every other means of recording any form of communication or
representation, including, but not limited to, letters, words, pictures,
sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof, and all papers, maps, magnetic or
paper tapes, photographic films and prints, motion picture, film and video recordings,
magnetic or punched cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other
documents including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.

As
used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any gender, the
other, as the context requires.

Sec.
7. RCW
42.52.010 and 1998 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Agency" means any state board, commission, bureau, committee,
department, institution, division, or tribunal in the legislative, executive,
or judicial branch of state government. "Agency" includes all
elective offices, the state legislature, those institutions of higher education
created and supported by the state government, and those courts that are parts
of state government.

(2)
"Head of agency" means the chief executive officer of an agency. In
the case of an agency headed by a commission, board, committee, or other body
consisting of more than one natural person, agency head means the person or
board authorized to appoint agency employees and regulate their conduct.

(3)
"Assist" means to act, or offer or agree to act, in such a way as to
help, aid, advise, furnish information to, or otherwise provide assistance to
another person, believing that the action is of help, aid, advice, or
assistance to the person and with intent so to assist such person.

(4)
"Ballot proposition" means any proposition as defined by RCW
42.17.020.

(5)
"Beneficial interest" has the meaning ascribed to it under the
Washington case law. However, an ownership interest in a mutual fund or
similar investment pooling fund in which the owner has no management powers
does not constitute a beneficial interest in the entities in which the fund or
pool invests.

(((5)))
(6) "Compensation" means anything of economic value, however
designated, that is paid, loaned, granted, or transferred, or to be paid,
loaned, granted, or transferred for, or in consideration of, personal services
to any person.

(((6)))
(7) "Confidential information" means (a) specific information,
rather than generalized knowledge, that is not available to the general public
on request or (b) information made confidential by law.

(((7)))
(8) "Contract" or "grant" means an agreement between
two or more persons that creates an obligation to do or not to do a particular
thing. "Contract" or "grant" includes, but is not limited
to, an employment contract, a lease, a license, a purchase agreement, or a
sales agreement.

(((8)))
(9) "Ethics boards" means the commission on judicial conduct,
the legislative ethics board, and the executive ethics board.

(((9)))
(10) "Family" has the same meaning as "immediate
family" in RCW 42.17.020.

(((10)))
(11) "Gift" means anything of economic value for which no
consideration is given. "Gift" does not include:

(a)
Items from family members or friends where it is clear beyond a reasonable
doubt that the gift was not made as part of any design to gain or maintain
influence in the agency of which the recipient is an officer or employee;

(b)
Items related to the outside business of the recipient that are customary and
not related to the recipient's performance of official duties;

(c)
Items exchanged among officials and employees or a social event hosted or
sponsored by a state officer or state employee for coworkers;

(d)
Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of reasonable expenses
incurred in connection with a speech, presentation, appearance, or trade
mission made in an official capacity. As used in this subsection,
"reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging, and subsistence
expenses incurred the day before through the day after the event;

(e)
Items a state officer or state employee is authorized by law to accept;

(f)
Payment of enrollment and course fees and reasonable travel expenses
attributable to attending seminars and educational programs sponsored by a bona
fide governmental or nonprofit professional, educational, trade, or charitable
association or institution. As used in this subsection, "reasonable
expenses" are limited to travel, lodging, and subsistence expenses
incurred the day before through the day after the event;

(g)
Items returned by the recipient to the donor within thirty days of receipt or
donated to a charitable organization within thirty days of receipt;

(h)
Campaign contributions reported under chapter 42.17 RCW;

(i)
Discounts available to an individual as a member of an employee group,
occupation, or similar broad-based group; and

(j)
Awards, prizes, scholarships, or other items provided in recognition of
academic or scientific achievement.

(((11)))
(12) "Honorarium" means money or thing of value offered to a
state officer or state employee for a speech, appearance, article, or similar
item or activity in connection with the state officer's or state employee's
official role.

(((12)))
(13) "Official duty" means those duties within the specific
scope of employment of the state officer or state employee as defined by the
officer's or employee's agency or by statute or the state Constitution.

(((13)))
(14) "Participate" means to participate in state action or a
proceeding personally and substantially as a state officer or state employee,
through approval, disapproval, decision, recommendation, the rendering of
advice, investigation, or otherwise but does not include preparation,
consideration, or enactment of legislation or the performance of legislative
duties.

(((14)))
(15) "Person" means any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, firm, institution, or other entity, whether or not operated for
profit.

(((15)))
(16) "Regulatory agency" means any state board, commission,
department, or officer, except those in the legislative or judicial branches,
authorized by law to conduct adjudicative proceedings, issue permits or
licenses, or to control or affect interests of identified persons.

(((16)))
(17) "Responsibility" in connection with a transaction
involving the state, means the direct administrative or operating authority,
whether intermediate or final, and either exercisable alone or through
subordinates, effectively to approve, disapprove, or otherwise direct state action
in respect of such transaction.

(((17)))
(18) "State action" means any action on the part of an agency,
including, but not limited to:

(a)
A decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order; and

(b)
A grant, payment, award, license, contract, transaction, sanction, or approval,
or the denial thereof, or failure to act with respect to a decision,
determination, finding, ruling, or order.

(((18)))
(19) "State officer" means every person holding a position of
public trust in or under an executive, legislative, or judicial office of the
state. "State officer" includes judges of the superior court, judges
of the court of appeals, justices of the supreme court, members of the
legislature together with the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of
the house of representatives, holders of elective offices in the executive
branch of state government, chief executive officers of state agencies, members
of boards, commissions, or committees with authority over one or more state
agencies or institutions, and employees of the state who are engaged in
supervisory, policy-making, or policy-enforcing work. For the purposes of this
chapter, "state officer" also includes any person exercising or
undertaking to exercise the powers or functions of a state officer.

(((19)))
(20) "State employee" means an individual who is employed by
an agency in any branch of state government. For purposes of this chapter,
employees of the superior courts are not state officers or state employees.

(((20)))
(21) "Thing of economic value," in addition to its ordinary
meaning, includes:

(a)
A loan, property interest, interest in a contract or other chose in action, and
employment or another arrangement involving a right to compensation;

(b)
An option, irrespective of the conditions to the exercise of the option; and

(c)
A promise or undertaking for the present or future delivery or procurement.

(((21)))
(22)(a) "Transaction involving the state" means a proceeding,
application, submission, request for a ruling or other determination, contract,
claim, case, or other similar matter that the state officer, state employee, or
former state officer or state employee in question believes, or has reason to
believe:

(i)
Is, or will be, the subject of state action; or

(ii)
Is one to which the state is or will be a party; or

(iii)
Is one in which the state has a direct and substantial proprietary interest.

(b) "Transaction involving the state" does not include
the following: Preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation,
including appropriation of moneys in a budget, or the performance of
legislative duties by an officer or employee; or a claim, case, lawsuit, or
similar matter if the officer or employee did not participate in the underlying
transaction involving the state that is the basis for the claim, case, or
lawsuit.

---
END ---