BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
department of natural resources shall not adopt a new management plan
pertaining to any natural area preserves in Grays Harbor county and Pacific
county before January 10, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
house of representatives natural resources committee shall study the following
aspects of the natural area preserves program created under chapter 79.70 RCW:

(1)
The potential impact, if any, of defining natural area preserve boundaries
which encompass land that has not yet been purchased for the program;

(2)
The correlation between the goals and purposes of the natural area preserves
program and the natural resource conservation area program and the potential
use of both programs in selected areas;

(3)
The current procedures that ensure the adequacy of local public input
concerning natural area preserve boundaries and management;

(4) The criteria and scientific methods used to ensure that natural
area preserves fulfill the purposes of the program.

---
END ---