BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.120 and 1990 c 9 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No
new driver's license may be issued and no previously issued license may be
renewed until the applicant therefor has successfully passed a driver licensing
examination. However, the department may waive all or any part of the
examination of any person applying for the renewal of a driver's license except
when the department determines that an applicant for a driver's license is not
qualified to hold a driver's license under this title. The department may also
waive the actual demonstration of the ability to operate a motor vehicle by a
person who surrenders a valid driver's license issued by the person's previous
home state and who is otherwise qualified to be licensed. For a new license
examination a fee of seven dollars shall be paid by each applicant, in addition
to the fee charged for issuance of the license. A new license is one issued to
a driver who has not been previously licensed in this state or to a driver
whose last previous Washington license has been expired for more than four
years.

Any
person renewing his or her driver's license more than sixty days after the
license has expired shall pay a penalty fee of ten dollars in addition to the
renewal fee under RCW 46.20.181. The penalty fee shall be deposited in the
highway safety fund.

Any
person who is outside the state at the time his or her driver's license expires
or who is unable to renew the license due to any incapacity may renew the
license within sixty days after returning to this state or within sixty days
after the termination of any such incapacity without the payment of the penalty
fee. The department may adopt rules setting the procedures by which a
person who is outside the state at the time his or her driver's license expires
may extend the validity of the license for up to six months. The department
shall collect a fee for an extension granted under this section. The department
shall set the fee by rule, for an amount of not more than five dollars. An
extension granted under this section does not change the expiration date of the
license for purposes of RCW 46.20.181.

The department shall provide for giving examinations at places and
times reasonably available to the people of this state.

---
END ---