BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.030 and 1998 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.

(1)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department
of corrections, means that the department is responsible for monitoring and
enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial
obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with
current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk
without depositing it in a departmental account.

(2)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(3)
"Community corrections officer" means an employee of the department
who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced
offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(4)
"Community custody" means that portion of an inmate's sentence of
confinement in lieu of earned early release time or imposed pursuant to RCW
9.94A.120 (6), (8), or (10) served in the community subject to controls placed
on the inmate's movement and activities by the department of corrections.

(5)
"Community placement" means that period during which the offender is
subject to the conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision,
which begins either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease
supervision) or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned early release. Community placement may consist of
entirely community custody, entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination
of the two.

(6)
"Community service" means compulsory service, without compensation,
performed for the benefit of the community by the offender.

(7)
"Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence
conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or
46.61.524. For first-time offenders, the supervision may include crime-related
prohibitions and other conditions imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(5). Where
the court finds that any offender has a chemical dependency that has
contributed to his or her offense, the conditions of supervision may, subject
to available resources, include treatment. For purposes of the interstate
compact for out-of-state supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW
9.95.270, community supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and
should be considered the same as probation by other states.

(8)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement as defined in this
section.

(9)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(10)
"Court-ordered legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that
is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal financial
obligations which may include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed
crime victims' compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court
costs, county or interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and
costs of defense, fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to
the offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular
assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense of an
emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction, subject to the
provisions in RCW 38.52.430.

(11)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs
or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts
necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by
the department.

(12)
"Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions
and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or
elsewhere. The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms
thereof; and (b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(13)
"Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing judge that equals
the difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(14)
"Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to
monitor the defendant's daily activities and compliance with sentence
conditions, and in which the defendant is required to report daily to a
specific location designated by the department or the sentencing judge.

(15)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(16)
"Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude
the number of actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial
confinement, of community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of
community service work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation.
The fact that an offender through "earned early release" can reduce
the actual period of confinement shall not affect the classification of the
sentence as a determinate sentence.

(17)
"Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
individual remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount
required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this definition,
"earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services,
whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and,
notwithstanding any other provision of law making the payments exempt from
garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal
financial obligation, specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to
pension or retirement programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not
include payments made under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020
and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.

(18)
"Drug offense" means:

(a)
Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance
(RCW 69.50.403);

(b)
Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates to the
possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled
substance; or

(c)
Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state
would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(19)
"Escape" means:

(a)
Escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful
failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be
available for supervision by the department while in community custody (RCW
72.09.310); or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this
subsection.

(20)
"Felony traffic offense" means:

(a)
Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding
a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW
46.52.020(4)); or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(21)
"Fines" means the requirement that the offender pay a specific sum of
money over a specific period of time to the court.

(22)
"First-time offender" means any person who is convicted of a felony
(a) not classified as a violent offense or a sex offense under this chapter, or
(b) that is not the manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to
manufacture or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II
that is a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, nor the
manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine,
its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers as defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2),
nor the selling for profit of any controlled substance or counterfeit substance
classified in Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of
marihuana, who previously has never been convicted of a felony in this state,
federal court, or another state, and who has never participated in a program of
deferred prosecution for a felony offense.

(23)
"Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a
felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing or
hereafter amended:

(a)
Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation
of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b)
Assault in the second degree;

(c)
Assault of a child in the second degree;

(d)
Child molestation in the second degree;

(e)
Controlled substance homicide;

(f)
Extortion in the first degree;

(g)
Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h)
Indecent liberties;

(i)
Kidnapping in the second degree;

(j)
Leading organized crime;

(k)
Manslaughter in the first degree;

(l)
Manslaughter in the second degree;

(m)
Promoting prostitution in the first degree;

(n)
Rape in the third degree;

(o)
Robbery in the second degree;

(p)
Sexual exploitation;

(q)
Vehicular assault;

(r)
Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by
any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as
defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless
manner;

(s)
Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as
"sexual motivation" is defined under this section;

(t)
Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.125;

(u)
Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is
comparable to a most serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and
(c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979,
RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June
11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988;

(ii)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it
existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was
committed against a child under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship
between the victim and perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent
liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through
July 27, 1997, or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.

(24)
"Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(25)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms
"offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(26)
"Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in a
facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any
other unit of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been ordered
by the court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day
with the balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement
includes work release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work
crew and home detention as defined in this section.

(27)
"Persistent offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i)
Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious
offense; and

(ii)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been
convicted as an offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this
state or elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be
considered most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score
under RCW 9.94A.360; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at
least one conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the
other most serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i)
Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the
first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree,
rape of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion; (B) murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second
degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a
child in the first degree, or burglary in the first degree, with a finding of
sexual motivation; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (27)(b)(i); and

(ii)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been
convicted as an offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for
rape of a child in the first degree constitutes a conviction under subsection
(27)(b)(i) only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second
degree constitutes a conviction under subsection (27)(b)(i) only when the
offender was eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the
offense.

(28)
"Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's community
placement that is not community custody.

(29)
"Restitution" means the requirement that the offender pay a specific
sum of money over a specific period of time to the court as payment of
damages. The sum may include both public and private costs. The imposition of
a restitution order does not preclude civil redress.

(30)
"Serious traffic offense" means:

(a)
Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.502), actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or
hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b)
Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense
under (a) of this subsection.

(31)
"Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and
means:

(a)
Murder in the first degree, homicide by abuse, murder in the second degree,
manslaughter in the first degree, assault in the first degree, kidnapping in
the first degree, or rape in the first degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, or an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit
one of these felonies; or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(32)
"Sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(33)
"Sex offense" means:

(a)
A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW or RCW 9A.64.020 or 9.68A.090
or a felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal
solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;

(b)
A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.127 or 13.40.135;
or

(c)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(34)
"Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the
defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual
gratification.

(35)
"Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries
of a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state
or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(36)
"Transition training" means written and verbal instructions and
assistance provided by the department to the offender during the two weeks prior
to the offender's successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The
transition training shall include instructions in the offender's requirements
and obligations during the offender's period of community custody.

(37)
"Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological,
physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the
crime charged.

(38)
"Violent offense" means:

(a)
Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a
class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second
degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in
the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree,
assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, robbery
in the second degree, drive-by shooting, vehicular assault, and vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b)
Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of
this subsection; and

(c)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b)
of this subsection.

(39)
"Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of
civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community of not less than
thirty-five hours per week that complies with RCW 9.94A.135. The civic
improvement tasks shall have minimal negative impact on existing private
industries or the labor force in the county where the service or labor is
performed. The civic improvement tasks shall not affect employment
opportunities for people with developmental disabilities contracted through
sheltered workshops as defined in RCW 82.04.385. Only those offenders sentenced
to a facility operated or utilized under contract by a county or the state are
eligible to participate on a work crew. Offenders sentenced for a sex offense
as defined in subsection (33) of this section are not eligible for the work
crew program.

(40)
"Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program designed
to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders
to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills development,
substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy training, and basic adult
education.

(41)
"Work release" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study
at school. Participation in work release shall be conditioned upon the
offender attending work or school at regularly defined hours and abiding by the
rules of the work release facility.

(42)
"Home detention" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to
electronic surveillance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Where the court finds that the offender has a chemical dependency that has
contributed to his or her offense, the court may, as a condition of the
sentence and subject to available resources, order the offender to participate
in rehabilitative programs or otherwise to perform affirmative conduct
reasonably related to the circumstances of the crime for which the offender has
been convicted and reasonably necessary or beneficial to the offender and the
community in rehabilitating the offender.

(2)
This section applies to sentences which include any term other than, or in
addition to, a term of total confinement, including suspended sentences.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.94A.110 and 1998 c 260 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Before
imposing a sentence upon a defendant, the court shall conduct a sentencing
hearing. The sentencing hearing shall be held within forty court days
following conviction. Upon the motion of either party for good cause shown, or
on its own motion, the court may extend the time period for conducting the
sentencing hearing.

Unless
specifically waived by the court, the court shall order the department to
complete a chemical dependency screening report before imposing a sentence
upon a defendant who has been convicted of a violation of the uniform
controlled substances act under chapter 69.50 RCW or where the court finds that
the offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her
offense. In addition, the court shall order the department to complete a
presentence report before imposing a sentence upon a defendant who has been
convicted of a felony sexual offense. The department of corrections shall give
priority to presentence investigations for sexual offenders. If the court
determines that the defendant may be a mentally ill person as defined in RCW
71.24.025, although the defendant has not established that at the time of the
crime he or she lacked the capacity to commit the crime, was incompetent to
commit the crime, or was insane at the time of the crime, the court shall order
the department to complete a presentence report before imposing a sentence.

The
court shall consider the presentence reports, if any, including any victim
impact statement and criminal history, and allow arguments from the prosecutor,
the defense counsel, the offender, the victim, the survivor of the victim, or a
representative of the victim or survivor, and an investigative law enforcement
officer as to the sentence to be imposed.

If
the court is satisfied by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant
has a criminal history, the court shall specify the convictions it has found to
exist. All of this information shall be part of the record. Copies of all
presentence reports presented to the sentencing court and all written findings
of facts and conclusions of law as to sentencing entered by the court shall be
sent to the department by the clerk of the court at the conclusion of the
sentencing and shall accompany the offender if the offender is committed to the
custody of the department. Court clerks shall provide, without charge,
certified copies of documents relating to criminal convictions requested by
prosecuting attorneys.

Sec.
4. RCW
9.94A.120 and 1998 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

When
a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose punishment as
provided in this section.

(1)
Except as authorized in subsections (2), (4), (5), (6), and (8) of this
section, the court shall impose a sentence within the sentence range for the
offense.

(2)
The court may impose a sentence outside the standard sentence range for that
offense if it finds, considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are
substantial and compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

(3)
Whenever a sentence outside the standard range is imposed, the court shall set
forth the reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions
of law. A sentence outside the standard range shall be a determinate sentence.

(4)
A persistent offender shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement for
life without the possibility of parole or, when authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for
the crime of aggravated murder in the first degree, sentenced to death,
notwithstanding the maximum sentence under any other law. An offender
convicted of the crime of murder in the first degree shall be sentenced to a
term of total confinement not less than twenty years. An offender convicted of
the crime of assault in the first degree or assault of a child in the first
degree where the offender used force or means likely to result in death or
intended to kill the victim shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement
not less than five years. An offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first
degree shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than five
years. The foregoing minimum terms of total confinement are mandatory and
shall not be varied or modified as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
In addition, all offenders subject to the provisions of this subsection shall
not be eligible for community custody, earned early release time, furlough,
home detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form
of early release as defined under RCW 9.94A.150 (1), (2), (3), (5), (7), or
(8), or any other form of authorized leave of absence from the correctional
facility while not in the direct custody of a corrections officer or officers
during such minimum terms of total confinement except in the case of an
offender in need of emergency medical treatment or for the purpose of
commitment to an inpatient treatment facility in the case of an offender
convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree.

(5)
In sentencing a first-time offender the court may waive the imposition of a
sentence within the sentence range and impose a sentence which may include up
to ninety days of confinement in a facility operated or utilized under contract
by the county and a requirement that the offender refrain from committing new
offenses. The sentence may also include up to two years of community
supervision, which, in addition to crime-related prohibitions, may include
requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(a)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(b)
Undergo available outpatient treatment for up to two years, or inpatient
treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement for that offense;

(c)
Pursue a prescribed, secular course of study or vocational training;

(d)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(e)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer; or

(f)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030
and/or perform community service work.

(6)(a)
An offender is eligible for the special drug offender sentencing alternative
if:

(i)
The offender is convicted of ((the manufacture, delivery, or possession with
intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule
I or II that is a narcotic drug or a felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW or
RCW 69.50.407, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes,)) a felony that is not a violent
offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.310 (3) or (4);

(ii)
The offender has no current or prior convictions for a ((felony))
sex offense or violent offense in this state, another state, or the
United States; ((and))

(iii)
For violations of the uniform controlled substances act under chapter 69.50
RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of the particular
controlled substance as determined by the judge upon consideration of such
factors as the weight, purity, packaging, sale price, and street value of the
controlled substance; and

(iv)
The offender has not been found by the United States attorney general to be
subject to a deportation detainer or order.

(b)
If the ((midpoint of the)) standard range is greater than one year and
the sentencing judge determines that the offender is eligible for this option
and that the offender and the community will benefit from the use of the
special drug offender sentencing alternative, the judge may waive imposition of
a sentence within the standard range and impose a sentence that must include a
period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half of the midpoint of
the standard range. During incarceration in the state facility, offenders
sentenced under this subsection shall undergo a comprehensive substance abuse
assessment and receive, within available resources, treatment services
appropriate for the offender. The treatment services shall be designed by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health
services, in cooperation with the department of corrections. ((If the
midpoint of the standard range is twenty-four months or less, no more than
three months of the sentence may be served in a work release status.))

The
court shall also impose ((one year of concurrent community custody and
community supervision that)):

(i)
The remainder of the midpoint of the standard range as a term of community
custody which must include appropriate ((outpatient)) substance
abuse treatment((,)) in a program that has been approved by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health
services;

(ii)
Crime-related prohibitions including a condition not to use illegal
controlled substances((,)); and

(iii)
A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to monitor that
status.

The
court may prohibit the offender from using alcohol or controlled substances
and may require that the monitoring for controlled substances be conducted
by the department or by a treatment alternatives to street crime program or a
comparable court or agency-referred program. The offender may be required to
pay thirty dollars per month while on community custody to offset the cost of
monitoring. In addition, the court shall impose three or more of the following
conditions:

(((i)))
(A) Devote time to a specific employment or training;

(((ii)))
(B) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the
court or the community corrections officer before any change in the offender's
address or employment;

(((iii)))
(C) Report as directed to a community corrections officer;

(((iv)))
(D) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations;

(((v)))
(E) Perform community service work;

(((vi)))
(F) Stay out of areas designated by the sentencing judge;

(G)
Such other conditions as the court may require such as affirmative conditions.

(c)
If the offender violates any of the sentence conditions in (b) of this
subsection, ((the department shall impose sanctions administratively, with
notice to the prosecuting attorney and the sentencing court. Upon motion of
the court or the prosecuting attorney,)) a violation hearing shall be held
by the ((court)) department unless waived by the offender. If
the ((court)) department finds that conditions have been
willfully violated, the ((court may impose confinement consisting of up to
the remaining one-half of the midpoint of the standard range. All total
confinement served during the period of community custody shall be credited to
the offender, regardless of whether the total confinement is served as a result
of the original sentence, as a result of a sanction imposed by the department,
or as a result of a violation found by the court. The term of community
supervision shall be tolled by any period of time served in total confinement
as a result of a violation found by the court)) offender may be
reclassified to serve the remaining balance of the original sentence.

(d)
The department shall determine the rules for calculating the value of a day
fine based on the offender's income and reasonable obligations which the
offender has for the support of the offender and any dependents. These rules
shall be developed in consultation with the administrator for the courts, the
office of financial management, and the commission.

(e)
An offender who fails to complete the special drug offender sentencing
alternative program or who is administratively terminated from the program
shall be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence as
ordered by the sentencing judge and shall be subject to all rules relating to
earned early release time. An offender who violates any conditions of
supervision as defined by the department shall be sanctioned. Sanctions may
include, but are not limited to, reclassifying the offender to serve the
unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered by the sentencing judge. If
an offender is reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence,
the offender shall be subject to all rules relating to earned early release
time.

(7)
If a sentence range has not been established for the defendant's crime, the
court shall impose a determinate sentence which may include not more than one
year of confinement, community service work, a term of community supervision
not to exceed one year, and/or other legal financial obligations. The court
may impose a sentence which provides more than one year of confinement if the
court finds, considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are
substantial and compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

(8)(a)(i)
When an offender is convicted of a sex offense other than a violation of RCW
9A.44.050 or a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense and has no
prior convictions for a sex offense or any other felony sex offenses in this or
any other state, the sentencing court, on its own motion or the motion of the
state or the defendant, may order an examination to determine whether the
defendant is amenable to treatment.

The
report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The
defendant's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
defendant's offense history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged
deviant behaviors, the offender's social and employment situation, and other
evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the
evaluator's information.

The
examiner shall assess and report regarding the defendant's amenability to
treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall
be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(A)
Frequency and type of contact between offender and therapist;

(B)
Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and description of planned
treatment modalities;

(C)
Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions,
lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members and others;

(D)
Anticipated length of treatment; and

(E)
Recommended crime-related prohibitions.

The
court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a
second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The defendant
shall pay the cost of any second examination ordered unless the court finds the
defendant to be indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(ii)
After receipt of the reports, the court shall consider whether the offender and
the community will benefit from use of this special sex offender sentencing
alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should
receive a treatment disposition under this subsection. If the court determines
that this special sex offender sentencing alternative is appropriate, the court
shall then impose a sentence within the sentence range. If this sentence is
less than eleven years of confinement, the court may suspend the execution of
the sentence and impose the following conditions of suspension:

(A)
The court shall place the defendant on community custody for the length of the
suspended sentence or three years, whichever is greater, and require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department of corrections
under subsection (14) of this section;

(B)
The court shall order treatment for any period up to three years in duration.
The court in its discretion shall order outpatient sex offender treatment or
inpatient sex offender treatment, if available. A community mental health
center may not be used for such treatment unless it has an appropriate program
designed for sex offender treatment. The offender shall not change sex
offender treatment providers or treatment conditions without first notifying
the prosecutor, the community corrections officer, and the court, and shall not
change providers without court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or
community corrections officer object to the change. In addition, as conditions
of the suspended sentence, the court may impose other sentence conditions
including up to six months of confinement, not to exceed the sentence range of
confinement for that offense, crime-related prohibitions, and requirements that
the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(I)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(II)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(III)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer;

(IV)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030,
perform community service work, or any combination thereof; or

(V)
Make recoupment to the victim for the cost of any counseling required as a
result of the offender's crime; and

(C)
Sex offenders sentenced under this special sex offender sentencing alternative
are not eligible to accrue any earned early release time while serving a
suspended sentence.

(iii)
The sex offender therapist shall submit quarterly reports on the defendant's
progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The report shall reference
the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of
attendance, defendant's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the
defendant's relative progress in treatment, and any other material as specified
by the court at sentencing.

(iv)
At the time of sentencing, the court shall set a treatment termination hearing
for three months prior to the anticipated date for completion of treatment.
Prior to the treatment termination hearing, the treatment professional and
community corrections officer shall submit written reports to the court and
parties regarding the defendant's compliance with treatment and monitoring
requirements, and recommendations regarding termination from treatment,
including proposed community supervision conditions. Either party may request
and the court may order another evaluation regarding the advisability of
termination from treatment. The defendant shall pay the cost of any additional
evaluation ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent in which
case the state shall pay the cost. At the treatment termination hearing the
court may: (A) Modify conditions of community custody, and either (B)
terminate treatment, or (C) extend treatment for up to the remaining period of
community custody.

(v)
If a violation of conditions occurs during community custody, the department
shall either impose sanctions as provided for in RCW 9.94A.205(2)(a) or refer
the violation to the court and recommend revocation of the suspended sentence
as provided for in (a)(vi) of this subsection.

(vi)
The court may revoke the suspended sentence at any time during the period of
community custody and order execution of the sentence if: (A) The defendant
violates the conditions of the suspended sentence, or (B) the court finds that
the defendant is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment. All
confinement time served during the period of community custody shall be
credited to the offender if the suspended sentence is revoked.

(vii)
Except as provided in (a)(viii) of this subsection, after July 1, 1991,
examinations and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be
conducted by sex offender treatment providers certified by the department of
health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW.

(viii)
A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a sex offender pursuant to this
subsection (8) does not have to be certified by the department of health
pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court finds that: (A) The offender has
already moved to another state or plans to move to another state for reasons
other than circumventing the certification requirements; (B) no certified
providers are available for treatment within a reasonable geographical distance
of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and treatment plan comply with
this subsection (8) and the rules adopted by the department of health.

(ix)
For purposes of this subsection (8), "victim" means any person who
has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person
or property as a result of the crime charged. "Victim" also means a
parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or
guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

(x)
If the defendant was less than eighteen years of age when the charge was filed,
the state shall pay for the cost of initial evaluation and treatment.

(b)
When an offender commits any felony sex offense on or after July 1, 1987, and
is sentenced to a term of confinement of more than one year but less than six
years, the sentencing court may, on its own motion or on the motion of the
offender or the state, request the department of corrections to evaluate
whether the offender is amenable to treatment and the department may place the
offender in a treatment program within a correctional facility operated by the
department.

Except
for an offender who has been convicted of a violation of RCW 9A.44.040 or
9A.44.050, if the offender completes the treatment program before the
expiration of his or her term of confinement, the department of corrections may
request the court to convert the balance of confinement to community supervision
and to place conditions on the offender including crime-related prohibitions
and requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(i)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(ii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(iii)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer;

(iv)
Undergo available outpatient treatment.

If
the offender violates any of the terms of his or her community supervision, the
court may order the offender to serve out the balance of his or her community
supervision term in confinement in the custody of the department of
corrections.

Nothing
in this subsection (8)(b) shall confer eligibility for such programs for
offenders convicted and sentenced for a sex offense committed prior to July 1,
1987. This subsection (8)(b) does not apply to any crime committed after July
1, 1990.

(c)
Offenders convicted and sentenced for a sex offense committed prior to July 1,
1987, may, subject to available funds, request an evaluation by the department
of corrections to determine whether they are amenable to treatment. If the
offender is determined to be amenable to treatment, the offender may request
placement in a treatment program within a correctional facility operated by the
department. Placement in such treatment program is subject to available funds.

(9)(a)
When a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the custody
of the department of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense or
a serious violent offense committed after July 1, 1988, but before July 1,
1990, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the second degree,
any crime against a person where it is determined in accordance with RCW
9.94A.125 that the defendant or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon at
the time of commission, or any felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW
not sentenced under subsection (6) of this section, committed on or after July
1, 1988, the court shall in addition to the other terms of the sentence,
sentence the offender to a one-year term of community placement beginning
either upon completion of the term of confinement or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned early release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). When the court sentences an
offender under this subsection to the statutory maximum period of confinement then
the community placement portion of the sentence shall consist entirely of such
community custody to which the offender may become eligible, in accordance with
RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). Any period of community custody actually served
shall be credited against the community placement portion of the sentence.

(b)
When a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the custody
of the department of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense
committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before June 6, 1996, a serious violent
offense, vehicular homicide, or vehicular assault, committed on or after July
1, 1990, the court shall in addition to other terms of the sentence, sentence
the offender to community placement for two years or up to the period of earned
early release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is
longer. The community placement shall begin either upon completion of the term
of confinement or at such time as the offender is transferred to community custody
in lieu of earned early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2).
When the court sentences an offender under this subsection to the statutory
maximum period of confinement then the community placement portion of the
sentence shall consist entirely of the community custody to which the offender
may become eligible, in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). Any period
of community custody actually served shall be credited against the community
placement portion of the sentence. Unless a condition is waived by the court,
the terms of community placement for offenders sentenced pursuant to this
section shall include the following conditions:

(i)
The offender shall report to and be available for contact with the assigned
community corrections officer as directed;

(ii)
The offender shall work at department of corrections-approved education,
employment, and/or community service;

(iii)
The offender shall not possess or consume controlled substances except pursuant
to lawfully issued prescriptions;

(iv)
The offender shall pay supervision fees as determined by the department of
corrections;

(v)
The residence location and living arrangements are subject to the prior
approval of the department of corrections during the period of community
placement; and

(vi)
The offender shall submit to affirmative acts necessary to monitor compliance
with the orders of the court as required by the department.

(c)
As a part of any sentence imposed under (a) or (b) of this subsection, the
court may also order any of the following special conditions:

(i)
The offender shall remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical
boundary;

(ii)
The offender shall not have direct or indirect contact with the victim of the
crime or a specified class of individuals;

(iii)
The offender shall participate in crime-related treatment or counseling
services;

(iv)
The offender shall not consume alcohol;

(v)
The offender shall comply with any crime-related prohibitions; or

(vi)
For an offender convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim after
June 6, 1996, the offender shall comply with any terms and conditions of
community placement imposed by the department of corrections relating to
contact between the sex offender and a minor victim or a child of similar age
or circumstance as a previous victim.

(d)
Prior to transfer to, or during, community placement, any conditions of
community placement may be removed or modified so as not to be more restrictive
by the sentencing court, upon recommendation of the department of corrections.

(10)(a)
When a court sentences a person to the custody of the department of corrections
for an offense categorized as a sex offense committed on or after June 6, 1996,
the court shall, in addition to other terms of the sentence, sentence the
offender to community custody for three years or up to the period of earned
early release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is
longer. The community custody shall begin either upon completion of the term
of confinement or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1)
and (2).

(b)
Unless a condition is waived by the court, the terms of community custody shall
be the same as those provided for in subsection (9)(b) of this section and may
include those provided for in subsection (9)(c) of this section. As part of
any sentence that includes a term of community custody imposed under this subsection,
the court shall also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed
by the department of corrections under subsection (14) of this section.

(c)
At any time prior to the completion of a sex offender's term of community
custody, if the court finds that public safety would be enhanced, the court may
impose and enforce an order extending any or all of the conditions imposed
pursuant to this section for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for
the crime as it is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the
expiration of the offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a
condition extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of the
sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.195 and may be punishable as contempt of
court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040.

(11)
If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty days or less,
the court may, in its discretion, specify that the sentence be served on
consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence requiring more than thirty days
of confinement shall be served on consecutive days. Local jail administrators
may schedule court-ordered intermittent sentences as space permits.

(12)
If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial obligation, the
sentence shall specify the total amount of the legal financial obligation owed,
and shall require the offender to pay a specified monthly sum toward that legal
financial obligation. Restitution to victims shall be paid prior to any other
payments of monetary obligations. Any legal financial obligation that is
imposed by the court may be collected by the department, which shall deliver
the amount paid to the county clerk for credit. The offender's compliance with
payment of legal financial obligations shall be supervised by the department
for ten years following the entry of the judgment and sentence or ten years
following the offender's release from total confinement. All monetary payments
ordered shall be paid no later than ten years after the last date of release
from confinement pursuant to a felony conviction or the date the sentence was
entered unless the superior court extends the criminal judgment an additional
ten years. If the legal financial obligations including crime victims'
assessments are not paid during the initial ten-year period, the superior court
may extend jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an additional ten years as
provided in RCW 9.94A.140, 9.94A.142, and 9.94A.145. If jurisdiction under the
criminal judgment is extended, the department is not responsible for
supervision of the offender during the subsequent period. Independent of the
department, the party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed
shall have the authority to utilize any other remedies available to the party
or entity to collect the legal financial obligation. Nothing in this section
makes the department, the state, or any of its employees, agents, or other
persons acting on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the payment
of these legal financial obligations. If an order includes restitution as one
of the monetary assessments, the county clerk shall make disbursements to
victims named in the order.

(13)
Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.140(1) and 9.94A.142(1), a court may not
impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or community supervision
or community placement which exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as
provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(14)
All offenders sentenced to terms involving community supervision, community
service, community placement, or legal financial obligation shall be under the
supervision of the department of corrections and shall follow explicitly the
instructions and conditions of the department of corrections. The department
may require an offender to perform affirmative acts it deems appropriate to
monitor compliance with the conditions of the sentence imposed.

(a)
The instructions shall include, at a minimum, reporting as directed to a
community corrections officer, remaining within prescribed geographical
boundaries, notifying the community corrections officer of any change in the
offender's address or employment, and paying the supervision fee assessment.

(b)
For offenders sentenced to terms involving community custody for crimes
committed on or after June 6, 1996, the department may include, in addition to
the instructions in (a) of this subsection, any appropriate conditions of
supervision, including but not limited to, prohibiting the offender from having
contact with any other specified individuals or specific class of individuals.
The conditions authorized under this subsection (14)(b) may be imposed by the
department prior to or during an offender's community custody term. If a
violation of conditions imposed by the court or the department pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section occurs during community custody, it shall be
deemed a violation of community placement for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.207 and
shall authorize the department to transfer an offender to a more restrictive
confinement status as provided in RCW 9.94A.205. At any time prior to the
completion of a sex offender's term of community custody, the department may
recommend to the court that any or all of the conditions imposed by the court
or the department pursuant to subsection (10) of this section be continued
beyond the expiration of the offender's term of community custody as authorized
in subsection (10)(c) of this section.

The
department may require offenders to pay for special services rendered on or
after July 25, 1993, including electronic monitoring, day reporting, and
telephone reporting, dependent upon the offender's ability to pay. The
department may pay for these services for offenders who are not able to pay.

(15)
All offenders sentenced to terms involving community supervision, community
service, or community placement under the supervision of the department of
corrections shall not own, use, or possess firearms or ammunition. Offenders
who own, use, or are found to be in actual or constructive possession of
firearms or ammunition shall be subject to the appropriate violation process
and sanctions. "Constructive possession" as used in this subsection
means the power and intent to control the firearm or ammunition.
"Firearm" as used in this subsection means a weapon or device from
which a projectile may be fired by an explosive such as gunpowder.

(16)
The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all confinement time
served before the sentencing if that confinement was solely in regard to the
offense for which the offender is being sentenced.

(17)
A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.400 (1) and (2) governing whether
sentences are to be served consecutively or concurrently is an exceptional
sentence subject to the limitations in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
and may be appealed by the defendant or the state as set forth in RCW 9.94A.210
(2) through (6).

(18)
The court shall order restitution whenever the offender is convicted of a
felony that results in injury to any person or damage to or loss of property,
whether the offender is sentenced to confinement or placed under community
supervision, unless extraordinary circumstances exist that make restitution
inappropriate in the court's judgment. The court shall set forth the
extraordinary circumstances in the record if it does not order restitution.

(19)
As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce an order that
relates directly to the circumstances of the crime for which the offender has
been convicted, prohibiting the offender from having any contact with other
specified individuals or a specific class of individuals for a period not to
exceed the maximum allowable sentence for the crime, regardless of the
expiration of the offender's term of community supervision or community
placement.

(20)
The court may order an offender whose sentence includes community placement or
community supervision to undergo a mental status evaluation and to participate
in available outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds that
reasonable grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill person
as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable, mental
status evaluations that have been filed with the court to determine the
offender's competency or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may
order additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.

(21)
In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require the defendant to
serve the partial confinement in work release, in a program of home detention,
on work crew, or in a combined program of work crew and home detention.

(22)
All court-ordered legal financial obligations collected by the department and
remitted to the county clerk shall be credited and paid where restitution is
ordered. Restitution shall be paid prior to any other payments of monetary
obligations.

Sec.
5. RCW
9.94A.137 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
An offender is eligible to be sentenced to a work ethic camp if the offender:

(i)
Is sentenced to a term of total confinement of not less than ((sixteen))
twelve months and one day or more than thirty-six months; ((and))

(ii)
Has no current or prior convictions for any sex offenses or for violent
offenses ((other than drug offenses for manufacturing, possession, delivery,
or intent to deliver a controlled substance)); and

(iii)
Has no current violations of the uniform controlled substances act under
chapter 69.50 RCW.

(b)
The length of the work ethic camp shall be at least one hundred twenty days and
not more than one hundred eighty days. ((Because of the conversion ratio,
earned early release time shall not accrue to offenders who successfully
complete the program.))

(2)
If the sentencing judge determines that the offender is eligible for the work
ethic camp and is likely to qualify under subsection (3) of this section, the
judge shall impose a sentence within the standard range and may recommend that
the offender serve the sentence at a work ethic camp. ((The sentence shall
provide that if the offender successfully completes the program, the department
shall convert the period of work ethic camp confinement at the rate of one day
of work ethic camp confinement to three days of total standard confinement.))
In sentencing an offender to the work ethic camp, the court shall specify: (a)
That upon completion of the work ethic camp the offender shall be released on
community custody for any remaining time of total confinement; (b) the
applicable conditions of supervision on community custody status as required by
RCW 9.94A.120(9)(b) and authorized by RCW 9.94A.120(9)(c); and (c) that
violation of the conditions may result in a return to total confinement for the
balance of the offender's remaining time of confinement.

(3)
The department shall place the offender in the work ethic camp program, subject
to capacity, unless: (a) The department determines that the offender has
physical or mental impairments that would prevent participation and completion
of the program; (b) the department determines that the offender's custody level
prevents placement in the program; ((or)) (c) the offender refuses to
agree to the terms and conditions of the program; (d) the offender has been
found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a deportation
detainer or order; or (e) the offender has participated in the work ethic camp
program in the past.

(4)
An offender who fails to complete the work ethic camp program, who is
administratively terminated from the program, or who otherwise violates any
conditions of supervision, as defined by the department, shall be reclassified
to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered by the sentencing
judge and shall be subject to all rules relating to earned early release time.

(5)
During the last two weeks prior to release from the work ethic camp program the
department shall provide the offender with comprehensive transition training.

Sec.
6. RCW
9.94A.380 and 1988 c 157 s 4 and 1988 c 155 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Alternatives
to total confinement are available for offenders with sentences of one year or
less. These alternatives include the following sentence conditions that the
court may order as substitutes for total confinement:

(1)
One day of partial confinement may be substituted for one day of total
confinement;

(2)
In addition, for offenders convicted of nonviolent offenses only, eight
hours of community service may be substituted for one day of total confinement,
with a maximum conversion limit of two hundred forty hours or thirty days.
Community service hours must be completed within the period of community
supervision or a time period specified by the court, which shall not exceed
twenty-four months, pursuant to a schedule determined by the department; and

(3)
For offenders convicted of nonviolent and nonsex offenses, the court may
authorize county jails to convert jail confinement to an available county
supervised community option and may require the offender to perform affirmative
conduct pursuant to section 2 of this act.

For
sentences of nonviolent offenders for one year or less, the court shall
consider and give priority to available alternatives to total confinement and
shall state its reasons in writing on the judgment and sentence form if the
alternatives are not used.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
legislature recognizes the utility of drug court programs in reducing
recidivism and assisting the courts by diverting potential offenders from the
normal course of criminal trial proceedings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 10.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The superior and district courts of Washington may establish drug court
programs to accept offenders that have been diverted by the courts from the
normal course of prosecution for drug offenses.

(2)
Pursuant to this section, "drug court" is defined as a program that
meets the criteria set forth in section 9 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 2.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Counties may establish and operate drug courts.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "drug court" means a court that has
special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a reduction in recidivism and
substance abuse among nonviolent, substance abusing offenders by increasing
their likelihood for successful rehabilitation through early, continuous, and
intense judicially supervised treatment; mandatory periodic drug testing; and
the use of appropriate sanctions and other rehabilitation services.

(3)
Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a drug court program
must first exhaust all federal funding received from the office of national
drug control policy that is available to support the operations of its drug
court and associated services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
department of corrections must develop criteria for successful completion of
the special drug offender sentencing alternative program by December 31, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---