BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.08.080 and 1993 c 434 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary of state shall furnish registration forms necessary to carry out the
registration of voters as provided by this chapter without cost to the
respective counties. ((However, costs incurred by the secretary of state
during 1994 and 1995 in the printing and distribution of voter registration
forms shall be reimbursed by the counties. This cost shall be considered an
election cost under RCW 29.13.045 and be prorated as part of the 1994 and 1995
general election costs.))

All
newly printed voter registration forms must include clear and conspicuous
language designed to draw an applicant's attention stating that only citizens
of the United States may register to vote. Similar language must be stamped
conspicuously onto existing voter registration forms in the possession of the
office of the secretary of state.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.155 and 1990 c 143 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Before
issuing an original license or identification card or renewing a license or identification
card under this chapter, the licensing agent shall determine if the applicant
wants to register to vote or transfer his or her voter registration by
asking the following as a single question:

"Are
you a United States citizen and do you want to register to vote or transfer
your voter registration?".

If
the applicant ((chooses to register or transfer a registration)) responds
in the affirmative, the agent shall provide the applicant with a voter
registration form and instructions and shall record that the applicant has
requested to register to vote or transfer a voter registration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---