BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that increased human population has resulted in growth and
development into areas previously wild in nature. This growth is leading to an
inevitable interaction between wild animals and humans. These interactions may
threaten homes, property, pets, and livestock, and may even be life
threatening. The legislature further finds that the population levels of both
black bear and cougar have experienced steady growth in recent years.

These
populations, though fluctuating, have the potential to reach unmanageable
levels.

Sec.
2. RCW
77.16.360 and 1997 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW ((77.12.240 and 77.12.265 or other
provisions of law)) 77.36.020 or 77.36.030, it is unlawful to take,
hunt, or attract black bear with the aid of bait.

(a)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the killing of black
bear with the aid of bait by employees or agents of county, state, or federal
agencies while acting in their official capacities for the purpose of
protecting livestock, domestic animals, private property, or the public safety.

(b)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the establishment and
operation of feeding stations for black bear in order to prevent damage to
commercial timberland.

(c)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the director from
issuing a permit or memorandum of understanding to a public agency, university,
or scientific or educational institution for the use of bait to attract black
bear for scientific purposes.

(d)
As used in this subsection, "bait" means a substance placed, exposed,
deposited, distributed, scattered, or otherwise used for the purpose of
attracting black bears to an area where one or more persons hunt or intend to
hunt them.

(2)
Notwithstanding RCW ((77.12.240 or any other provisions of law)) 77.36.020
or 77.36.030, it is unlawful to hunt or pursue black bear, cougar, bobcat,
or lynx with the aid of a dog or dogs.

(a)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the killing of black
bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx with the aid of a dog or dogs by employees or
agents of county, state, or federal agencies while acting in their official
capacities for the purpose of protecting livestock, domestic animals, private
property, or the public safety. ((A dog or dogs may be used by the owner or
tenant of real property consistent with a permit issued and conditioned by the
director under RCW 77.12.265.))

(b)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the director from
issuing a permit or memorandum of understanding to a public agency, university,
or scientific or educational institution for the use of a dog or dogs for the
pursuit of black bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx for scientific purposes.

(3)
Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section:

(a)
The commission shall authorize the use of dogs or bait only in selected areas
within a game management unit or units to address a specific black bear or
cougar population or public safety need. This authority may only be exercised
after the commission has determined that no other practical alternative to the
use of dogs or bait exists, and after the commission has adopted a rule or
rules describing the conditions in which dogs or bait may be used. Conditions
which may warrant the use of dogs or bait within a game management unit
include, but are not limited to, confirmed cougar and black bear human safety
incidents, confirmed cougar and black bear livestock and pet depredations, and
the number of cougar and black bear capture attempts and relocations;

(b)
The director may authorize the use of dogs or bait with a permit issued
pursuant to RCW 77.12.240.

(4)
A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor. In addition to appropriate criminal penalties, the director
shall revoke the hunting license of a person who violates subsection (1) or (2)
of this section and a hunting license shall not be issued for a period of five
years following the revocation. Following a subsequent violation of subsection
(1) or (2) of this section by the same person, a hunting license shall not be
issued to the person at any time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---