BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to update and fund the higher education
competitive grant program established by the 1991 legislature, known as the
Washington fund for innovation and quality in higher education. Changes are
needed so that the goals and priorities set forth for awarding grants reflect
the 1999-01 goals and priorities. The legislature also intends to improve the
administration of the program by separating responsibilities between the higher
education coordinating board and the state board for community and technical
colleges.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.120.005 and 1991 c 98 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that encouraging collaboration among the various educational
sectors to meet state-wide needs will strengthen the entire educational system,
kindergarten through twelfth grade and higher education. The legislature also
recognizes that the most effective way to develop innovative and collaborative
programs is to encourage institutions to develop them voluntarily, in line with
established state goals. Through a system of competitive grants, the
legislature shall encourage the development of innovative and collaborative
solutions to issues of critical state-wide need, including:

(1)
((Improving rates of participation and completion at each educational level;

(2)))
Recognizing needs of special populations of students;

(((3)
Improving the effectiveness of education by better coordinating communication
and understanding between sectors.))

(2)
Furthering the development of learner-centered, technology-assisted course
delivery;

(3)
Furthering the development of competency-based measurements of student
achievement to be used as the basis for awarding degrees and certificates; and

(4)
Increasing the collaboration among both public and private sector institutions
of higher education.

Sec.
3. RCW
28B.120.020 and 1996 c 41 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
higher education coordinating board shall have the following powers and duties
in administering the program for those proposals in which a four-year
institution of higher education is named as the lead institution and fiscal
agent:

(1)
To adopt rules necessary to carry out the program;

(2)
To establish one or more review committees to assist in the evaluation of
proposals for funding. The review committee shall include individuals with
significant experience in higher education in areas relevant to one or more of
the funding period priorities and shall include representatives from both
the four-year and two-year sectors of higher education;

(3)
To award grants no later than September 1st in those years when funding is
available by June 30th;

(4)
To establish each biennium specific guidelines for submitting grant proposals
consistent with the overall goals of the program and consistent with the
guidelines established by the state board for community and technical colleges
under section 4 of this act. During the ((1995-97)) 1999-01
biennium the guidelines shall be consistent with the following desired outcomes
of ((increasing access, improving time to degree, improving student
learning, and increasing efficiency and collaboration between institutions of
higher education and the private sector through projects that may emphasize)):

(a)
Minority and diversity initiatives that encourage the participation of
minorities in higher education, including students with disabilities((, at a
rate consistent with their proportion of the population));

(b)
K‑12 teacher preparation models that encourage collaboration between
higher education and K‑12 to improve the preparedness of teachers,
including provisions for higher education faculty involved with teacher
preparation to spend time teaching in K‑12 schools;

(c)
((Multi-institutional or multifaculty development and evaluation of:

(i)))
Collaborative instructional programs involving K‑12, community and
technical colleges, and four‑year institutions of higher education to
develop a three‑year degree program, or reduce the time to degree;

(((ii)
Instructional technology and multimedia curricular projects; and

(iii)
A degree offered entirely on the internet;

(d)
Individual institutional or faculty pilot projects to:

(i)
Improve efficiency by five percent per year in cost or graduation rate;

(ii)
Improve student retention;

(iii)
Develop competencies and outcomes for general education or university
requirements and degree programs;

(iv))) (d)
Contracts with public or private institutions or businesses to provide
services or the development of collaborative programs;

(e)
Articulation and transfer activities to smooth the transfer of students from K‑12
to higher education, or from the community colleges and technical colleges to
four-year institutions; ((and))

(f)
((Other innovative proposals)) Projects that further the development
of learner-centered, technology-assisted course delivery; and

(g)
Projects that further the development of competency-based measurements of
student achievement to be used as the basis for awarding degrees and
certificates.

After
June 30, ((1996)) 2001, and each biennium thereafter, the board
shall determine funding priorities for collaborative proposals for the biennium
in consultation with the governor, the legislature, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the work force training and education coordinating board,
higher education institutions, educational associations, and business and
community groups consistent with state-wide needs;

(((4)))
(5) To solicit grant proposals and provide information to the
institutions of higher education about the program; and

(((5)))
(6) To establish reporting, evaluation, accountability, monitoring, and
dissemination requirements for the recipients of the grants awarded by the
higher education coordinating board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.120 RCW to read as follows:

The
state board for community and technical colleges has the following powers and
duties in administering the program for those proposals in which a community or
technical college is named as the lead institution and fiscal agent:

(1)
To adopt rules necessary to carry out the program;

(2)
To establish one or more review committees to assist in the evaluation of proposals
for funding. The review committee shall include individuals with significant
experience in higher education in areas relevant to one or more of the funding
period priorities and shall include representatives from both the four-year and
two-year sectors of higher education;

(3)
To award grants no later than September 1st in those years when funding is
available by June 30th;

(4)
To establish each biennium specific guidelines for submitting grant proposals
consistent with the overall goals of the program and consistent with the
guidelines established by the higher education coordinating board under RCW
28B.120.020. During the 1999-01 biennium the guidelines shall be consistent
with the following desired outcomes of:

(a)
Minority and diversity initiatives that encourage the participation of
minorities in higher education, including students with disabilities;

(b)
K‑12 teacher preparation models that encourage collaboration between
higher education and K‑12 to improve the preparedness of teachers, including
provisions for higher education faculty involved with teacher preparation to
spend time teaching in K‑12 schools;

(c)
Collaborative instructional programs involving K‑12, community and
technical colleges, and four‑year institutions of higher education to
develop a three‑year degree program, or reduce the time to degree;

(d)
Contracts with public or private institutions or businesses to provide services
or the development of collaborative programs;

(e)
Articulation and transfer activities to smooth the transfer of students from K‑12
to higher education, or from the community colleges and technical colleges to
four-year institutions;

(f)
Projects that further the development of learner-centered, technology-assisted
course delivery; and

(g)
Projects that further the development of competency-based measurements of
student achievement to be used as the basis for awarding degrees and
certificates;

(5)
To solicit grant proposals and provide information to the community and
technical colleges and private career schools; and

(6)
To establish reporting, evaluation, accountability, monitoring, and
dissemination requirements for the recipients of the grants awarded by the
state board for community and technical colleges.

Sec.
5. RCW
28B.120.010 and 1996 c 41 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington fund for innovation and quality in higher education program is
established. The higher education coordinating board shall administer the
program for the purpose of awarding grants in which a four-year institution
of higher education is named as the lead institution. The state board for
community and technical colleges shall administer the program for the purpose
of awarding grants in which a community or technical college is named as the
lead institution. Through this program the boards may award on a
competitive basis incentive grants to state public institutions of higher
education or consortia of institutions to encourage cooperative programs
designed to address specific system problems. Grants shall not exceed a
two-year period. Each institution or consortia of institutions receiving the
award shall contribute some financial support, either by covering part of the
costs for the program during its implementation, or by assuming continuing
support at the end of the grant period. Strong priority will be given to
proposals that involve more than one sector of education, and to proposals that
show substantive institutional commitment. Institutions are encouraged to solicit
nonstate funds to support these cooperative programs.

Sec.
6. RCW
28B.120.030 and 1991 c 98 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
higher education coordinating board and the state board for community and
technical colleges may solicit and receive such gifts, grants, and
endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in
trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the program and
may expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the
gifts, grants, or endowments.

Sec.
7. RCW
28B.120.040 and 1996 c 41 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
higher education coordinating board fund for innovation and quality is
hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer. The higher education
coordinating board shall deposit in the fund all moneys received under RCW
28B.120.030. Moneys in the fund may be spent only for the purposes of RCW
28B.120.010 and 28B.120.020. Disbursements from the fund shall be on the
authorization of the higher education coordinating board. The fund is subject
to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for disbursements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.120 RCW to read as follows:

The community and technical college fund for innovation and quality
is hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer. The state board
for community and technical colleges shall deposit in the fund all moneys
received under RCW 28B.120.030. Moneys in the fund may be spent only for the
purposes of RCW 28B.120.010 and section 4 of this act. Disbursements from the
fund shall be on the authorization of the state board for community and
technical colleges. The fund is subject to the allotment procedure provided
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements.

---
END ---