BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
88.12.115 and 1993 c 244 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person may operate or permit the operation of a vessel on the waters of the
state without a personal flotation device on board for each person on the
vessel. Each personal flotation device shall be in serviceable condition, of
an appropriate size, and readily accessible.

(2)
Except as provided in RCW 88.12.015, a violation of subsection (1) of this
section is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW if the vessel is not carrying
passengers for hire.

(3)
A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a misdemeanor punishable under
RCW 9.92.030, if the vessel is carrying passengers for hire.

(4)
No person shall operate a vessel under nineteen feet in length on the waters of
this state with a child twelve years old and under, unless the child is wearing
a personal flotation device that meets or exceeds the United States coast guard
approval standards of the appropriate size, while the vessel is underway. For
the purposes of this section, a personal flotation device is not considered
readily accessible for children twelve years old and under unless the device is
worn by the child while the vessel is underway. The personal flotation device
must be worn at all times by a child twelve years old or under whenever a
vessel under nineteen feet in length is underway and the child is on an open
deck or open cockpit of the vessel. The following circumstances are excepted:

(a)
While a child is below deck or in the cabin of a vessel with an enclosed cabin;
or

(b)
While a child is on a United States coast guard inspected passenger-carrying
vessel operating on the navigable waters of the United States.

(5) Except as provided in RCW 88.12.015, a violation of
subsection (4) of this section is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.
Enforcement of subsection (4) of this section by law enforcement officers may
be accomplished as a primary action, and need not be accompanied by the
suspected violation of some other offense.

---
END ---