BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that policies that encourage regional planning and access to
higher education benefit both the students and the state. Such policies
improve access, reduce unnecessary duplication, and make higher education more
cost-effective. The western undergraduate exchange program, coordinated by the
western interstate commission for higher education is a program through which
students in participating states may enroll in designated institutions in other
participating states at a special, reduced tuition level. During the 1998-99
school year institutions in fifteen western states participated in the western
undergraduate exchange program, including Washington's bordering states of
Oregon and Idaho. Eastern Washington University participated on a pilot
basis. It is the intent of the legislature to permit Washington's institutions
of higher education to participate in the western undergraduate exchange
program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

Subject
to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of Washington State
University, Eastern Washington University, and Central Washington University
may waive all or a portion of the difference between fifty percent of the
resident tuition and fees amount and the nonresident tuition fees differential
for nonresident students who enroll under the western interstate commission for
higher education western undergraduate exchange program.

Sec.
3. RCW
28B.15.910 and 1998 c 346 s 904 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except for revenue waived under programs listed in subsections (3) and
(4) of this section, and unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus
state appropriations act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived,
exempted, or reduced by a state university, a regional university, The
Evergreen State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue ((set forth
below)) in this subsection. As used in this section, "gross
authorized operating fees revenue" means the estimated gross operating
fees revenue as estimated under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of
financial management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to
all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.

(a)
University of Washington 21 percent

(b)
Washington State University 20 percent

(c)
Eastern Washington University 11 percent

(d)
Central Washington University 8 percent

(e)
Western Washington University 10 percent

(f)
The Evergreen State College 6 percent

(g)
Community colleges as a whole 35 percent

(2)
The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to waivers, exemptions,
or reductions in operating fees contained in the following:

(a)
RCW 28B.10.265;

(b)
RCW 28B.15.014;

(c)
RCW 28B.15.100;

(d)
RCW 28B.15.225;

(e)
RCW 28B.15.380;

(f)
RCW 28B.15.520;

(g)
RCW 28B.15.526;

(h)
RCW 28B.15.527;

(i)
RCW 28B.15.543;

(j)
RCW 28B.15.545;

(k)
RCW 28B.15.555;

(l)
RCW 28B.15.556;

(m)
RCW 28B.15.615;

(n)
RCW 28B.15.620;

(o)
RCW 28B.15.628;

(p)
RCW 28B.15.730;

(q)
RCW 28B.15.740;

(r)
RCW 28B.15.750;

(s)
RCW 28B.15.756;

(t)
RCW 28B.50.259;

(u)
RCW 28B.70.050;

(v)
RCW 28B.80.580; and

(w)
During the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the western interstate commission for
higher education undergraduate exchange program for students attending Eastern
Washington University.

(3)
The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply to waivers,
exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees contained in the
following:

(a)
RCW 28B.15.522;

(b)
RCW 28B.15.540; and

(c)
RCW 28B.15.558.

(4)
The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or reduced by
institutions of higher education participating in the western interstate
commission for higher education western undergraduate exchange program under
section 2 of this act shall not exceed the percentage of total gross authorized
operating fees revenue in this subsection.

(a)
Washington State University 1 percent

(b) Eastern Washington University 3
percent

(c) Central Washington University 3
percent

---
END ---