BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28B.10.510 and 1973 c 62 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The attorney general of the state shall be the legal advisor to the
presidents and the boards of regents and trustees of the ((institutions of
higher education)) state college, state universities, and regional
universities and ((he)) shall institute and prosecute or defend all
suits in behalf of the same. Community and technical colleges may retain
private legal counsel or may employ the services of the attorney general.

---
END ---