BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28C.04.545 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 7 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The respective governing boards of the public technical colleges shall provide
fee waivers for a maximum of two years for those recipients of the Washington
award for vocational excellence established under RCW 28C.04.520 through
28C.04.540 who received the award before June 30, 1994. To qualify for the
waiver, recipients shall enter the public technical college within three years
of receiving the award. An above average rating at the ((vocational-technical
institute)) technical college in the first year shall be required to
qualify for the second-year waiver.

(2)
Students named by the work force training and education coordinating board
after June 30, 1994, as recipients of the Washington award for vocational
excellence under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.550 shall be eligible to receive
a grant for undergraduate course work as authorized under RCW 28B.80.272.

(3)(a)
Beginning with awards made during the 1998-99 academic year, recipients must
complete using the award before the fall term in the sixth year following the
date of the award. For these recipients, eligibility for the award is
forfeited after this period.

(b)
All persons awarded a Washington award for vocational excellence before the
1995-96 academic year and who have remaining eligibility on the effective date
of this section must complete using the award before September 2002. For these
recipients, eligibility for the award is forfeited after this period.

(c)
All persons awarded a Washington award for vocational excellence during the
1995-96, 1996-97, and 1997-98 academic years must complete using the award
before September 2005. For these recipients, eligibility for the award is
forfeited after this period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---