BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.40.023 and 1997 c 254 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Membership
in the retirement system shall consist of all regularly compensated employees
and appointive and elective officials of employers, as defined in this chapter,
with the following exceptions:

(1)
Persons in ineligible positions;

(2)
Employees of the legislature except the officers thereof elected by the members
of the senate and the house and legislative committees, unless membership of
such employees be authorized by the said committee;

(3)(a)
Persons holding elective offices or persons appointed directly by the
governor: PROVIDED, That such persons shall have the option of applying for
membership during such periods of employment: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any
persons holding or who have held elective offices or persons appointed by the
governor who are members in the retirement system and who have, prior to
becoming such members, previously held an elective office, and did not at the
start of such initial or successive terms of office exercise their option to
become members, may apply for membership to be effective during such term or
terms of office, and shall be allowed to establish the service credit
applicable to such term or terms of office upon payment of the employee
contributions therefor by the employee with interest as determined by the
director and employer contributions therefor by the employer or employee with interest
as determined by the director: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That all contributions
with interest submitted by the employee under this subsection shall be placed
in the employee's individual account in the employee's savings fund and be
treated as any other contribution made by the employee, with the exception that
any contributions submitted by the employee in payment of the employer's
obligation, together with the interest the director may apply to the employer's
contribution, shall not be considered part of the member's annuity for any
purpose except withdrawal of contributions;

(b)
A member holding elective office who has elected to apply for membership
pursuant to (a) of this subsection and who later wishes to be eligible for a
retirement allowance shall have the option of ending his or her membership in
the retirement system. A member wishing to end his or her membership under
this subsection must file, on a form supplied by the department, a statement
indicating that the member agrees to irrevocably abandon any claim for service
for future periods served as an elected official. A member who receives more
than fifteen thousand dollars per year in compensation for his or her elective
service, adjusted annually for inflation by the director, is not eligible for
the option provided by this subsection (3)(b);

(4)
Employees holding membership in, or receiving pension benefits under, any
retirement plan operated wholly or in part by an agency of the state or
political subdivision thereof, or who are by reason of their current employment
contributing to or otherwise establishing the right to receive benefits from
any such retirement plan except as follows: ((PROVIDED, HOWEVER,))

(a)
In any case where the retirement system has in existence an agreement with another
retirement system in connection with exchange of service credit or an agreement
whereby members can retain service credit in more than one system, such an
employee shall be allowed membership rights should the agreement so provide((:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That));

(b)
An employee shall be allowed membership if otherwise eligible while
receiving survivor's benefits((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That));

(c)
An employee shall not either before or after June 7, 1984, be excluded from
membership or denied service credit pursuant to this subsection solely on
account of: (((a))) (i) Membership in the plan created under
chapter 2.14 RCW; or (((b))) (ii) enrollment under the relief and
compensation provisions or the pension provisions of the volunteer fire fighters'
relief and pension fund under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(d)
Except as provided in (f) of this subsection, on or after the effective date of
this act, an employee shall not be excluded from membership or denied service
credit pursuant to this subsection solely on account of participation in a
defined contribution pension plan administered pursuant to section 401 of the
internal revenue code;

(e)
Employees who have previously been reported in the public employees' retirement
system while simultaneously participating in a defined contribution pension
plan administered pursuant to section 401 of the internal revenue code shall
not be excluded from previous public employees' retirement system membership
and service credit on account of such participation;

(f)
If an employee has been excluded from membership or denied service credit
pursuant to this subsection prior to the effective date of this act solely on
account of participation in a defined contribution pension plan administered
pursuant to section 401 of the internal revenue code, the employer may continue
to exclude such employee from membership as long as the employee is actively
employed by such employer.

If
the employer determines that such employee will no longer be excluded, such
determination shall apply only to the employee's services rendered on or after
the effective date of this act and after the date of the employer's election;

(5)
Patient and inmate help in state charitable, penal, and correctional
institutions;

(6)
"Members" of a state veterans' home or state soldiers' home;

(7)
Persons employed by an institution of higher learning or community college,
primarily as an incident to and in furtherance of their education or training,
or the education or training of a spouse;

(8)
Employees of an institution of higher learning or community college during the
period of service necessary to establish eligibility for membership in the
retirement plans operated by such institutions;

(9)
Persons rendering professional services to an employer on a fee, retainer, or
contract basis or when the income from these services is less than fifty
percent of the gross income received from the person's practice of a
profession;

(10)
Persons appointed after April 1, 1963, by the liquor control board as agency
vendors;

(11)
Employees of a labor guild, association, or organization: PROVIDED, That
elective officials and employees of a labor guild, association, or organization
which qualifies as an employer within this chapter shall have the option of
applying for membership;

(12)
Retirement system retirees: PROVIDED, That following reemployment in an
eligible position, a retiree may elect to prospectively become a member of the
retirement system if otherwise eligible;

(13)
Persons employed by or appointed or elected as an official of a first class
city that has its own retirement system: PROVIDED, That any member elected or
appointed to an elective office on or after April 1, 1971, shall have the
option of continuing as a member of this system in lieu of becoming a member of
the city system. A member who elects to continue as a member of this system
shall pay the appropriate member contributions and the city shall pay the
employer contributions at the rates prescribed by this chapter. The city shall
also transfer to this system all of such member's accumulated contributions
together with such further amounts as necessary to equal all employee and
employer contributions which would have been paid into this system on account
of such service with the city and thereupon the member shall be granted credit
for all such service. Any city that becomes an employer as defined in RCW
41.40.010(4) as the result of an individual's election under this subsection
shall not be required to have all employees covered for retirement under the
provisions of this chapter. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a city
of the first class with its own retirement system from: (a) Transferring all
of its current employees to the retirement system established under this
chapter, or (b) allowing newly hired employees the option of continuing
coverage under the retirement system established by this chapter.

Notwithstanding
any other provision of this chapter, persons transferring from employment with
a first class city of over four hundred thousand population that has its own
retirement system to employment with the state department of agriculture may
elect to remain within the retirement system of such city and the state shall
pay the employer contributions for such persons at like rates as prescribed for
employers of other members of such system;

(14)
Employees who (a) are not citizens of the United States, (b) do not reside in
the United States, and (c) perform duties outside of the United States;

(15)
Employees who (a) are not citizens of the United States, (b) are not covered by
chapter 41.48 RCW, (c) are not excluded from membership under this chapter or
chapter 41.04 RCW, (d) are residents of this state, and (e) make an irrevocable
election to be excluded from membership, in writing, which is submitted to the
director within thirty days after employment in an eligible position;

(16)
Employees who are citizens of the United States and who reside and perform
duties for an employer outside of the United States: PROVIDED, That unless
otherwise excluded under this chapter or chapter 41.04 RCW, the employee may
apply for membership (a) within thirty days after employment in an eligible
position and membership service credit shall be granted from the first day of
membership service, and (b) after this thirty-day period, but membership
service credit shall be granted only if payment is made for the noncredited
membership service under RCW 41.50.165(2), otherwise service shall be from the
date of application;

(17)
The city manager or chief administrative officer of a city or town, other than
a retiree, who serves at the pleasure of an appointing authority: PROVIDED,
That such persons shall have the option of applying for membership within
thirty days from date of their appointment to such positions. Persons serving
in such positions as of April 4, 1986, shall continue to be members in the
retirement system unless they notify the director in writing prior to December
31, 1986, of their desire to withdraw from membership in the retirement
system. A member who withdraws from membership in the system under this
section shall receive a refund of the member's accumulated contributions.

Persons
serving in such positions who have not opted for membership within the
specified thirty days, may do so by paying the amount required under RCW
41.50.165(2) for the period from the date of their appointment to the date of
acceptance into membership;

(18) Persons enrolled in state-approved apprenticeship programs,
authorized under chapter 49.04 RCW, and who are employed by local governments
to earn hours to complete such apprenticeship programs, if the employee is a
member of a union-sponsored retirement plan and is making contributions to such
a retirement plan or if the employee is a member of a Taft-Hartley retirement
plan.

---
END ---