BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 2.28 RCW to read as follows:

Each
county that elects to participate in the court improvement act of 1999 shall
submit to the administrator for the courts a joint resolution signed by the
chair of the legislative body of the county and by the presiding judges of the
superior court and the district court for the county. Such resolution must be
submitted by September 1st of an odd-numbered year in order to be effective for
the biennium beginning July 1st of the following year.

Upon
submission of a timely resolution, the state will appropriate to the county an
amount equal to the costs of trial court judicial officers for superior and
district courts pursuant to RCW 2.56.030(19). The county in the resolution
must agree not to use such funds to supplant existing funding levels for court
operations, not including judicial salaries and benefits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 2.28 RCW to read as follows:

There
is created an account in the custody of the state treasurer to be known as the
court improvement account. The office of the administrator for the courts upon
the direction of the board for judicial administration shall maintain and
administer the account, in which shall be deposited all moneys received from
the portion of superior court filing fees imposed pursuant to RCW 36.18.020(3)
and the portion of district court filing fees imposed pursuant to RCW
3.62.060(1)(b) for the purposes of providing court improvements. The
legislature shall appropriate the funds in the account for the purposes of
court improvements in counties that have enacted a local option resolution
pursuant to section 1 of this act and appellate courts. Counties receiving
funds from this account must agree not to use such funds to supplant existing
funding levels for maintenance of the courts, not including judicial salaries
and benefits.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.08.250 and 1997 c 149 s 910 are each amended to read as follows:

The
money received by the state treasurer from fees, fines, forfeitures, penalties,
reimbursements or assessments by any court organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW,
or chapter 2.08 RCW, shall be deposited in the public safety and education
account which is hereby created in the state treasury. The legislature shall
appropriate the funds in the account to promote traffic safety education,
highway safety, criminal justice training, crime victims' compensation,
judicial education, the judicial information system, civil representation of
indigent persons, winter recreation parking, and state game programs. ((During
the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 1999,)) The legislature may
appropriate moneys from the public safety and education account for purposes of
((appellate)) indigent defense and indigent juvenile dependency
defense, jury improvements, the criminal litigation unit of the attorney
general's office, the treatment alternatives to street crimes program, crime
victims advocacy programs, justice information network telecommunication
planning, sexual assault treatment, ((operations of the office of
administrator for the courts,)) security in the common schools, criminal
justice data collection, and Washington state patrol criminal justice
activities.

Sec.
4. RCW
3.46.120 and 1995 c 291 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All money received by the clerk of a municipal department including penalties,
fines, bail forfeitures, fees and costs shall be paid by the clerk to the city
treasurer.

(2)
The city treasurer shall remit monthly ((thirty-two)) forty-eight
percent of the noninterest money received under this section, other than for
parking infractions, and certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain
costs" as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing
parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs
awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the specific
reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or town in the
prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited as provided in
RCW 43.08.250.

(3)
The balance of the noninterest money received under this section shall be
retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.

(4)
Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the
rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency.
Interest may accrue only while the case is in collection status.

(5)
Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and
costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in
the public safety and education account as provided in RCW 43.08.250,
twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial
information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to
the city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund
local courts.

Sec.
5. RCW
3.50.100 and 1995 c 291 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Costs in civil and criminal actions may be imposed as provided in district
court. All fees, costs, fines, forfeitures and other money imposed by any
municipal court for the violation of any municipal or town ordinances shall be
collected by the court clerk and, together with any other noninterest revenues
received by the clerk, shall be deposited with the city or town treasurer as a
part of the general fund of the city or town, or deposited in such other fund
of the city or town, or deposited in such other funds as may be designated by
the laws of the state of Washington.

(2)
The city treasurer shall remit monthly ((thirty-two)) forty-eight
percent of the noninterest money received under this section, other than for
parking infractions, and certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain
costs" as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing
parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs
awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the specific
reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or town in the
prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited as provided in
RCW 43.08.250.

(3)
The balance of the noninterest money received under this section shall be
retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.

(4)
Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the
rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency.
Interest may accrue only while the case is in collection status.

(5)
Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and
costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in
the public safety and education account as provided in RCW 43.08.250,
twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial
information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to
the city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund
local courts.

Sec.
6. RCW
3.62.020 and 1995 c 301 s 31 and 1995 c 291 s 5 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all costs, fees, fines,
forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected in whole or in part by
district courts, except costs, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and
collected, in whole or in part, because of the violation of city ordinances,
shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court to the county treasurer at
least monthly, together with a financial statement as required by the state
auditor, noting the information necessary for crediting of such funds as
required by law.

(2)
The county treasurer shall remit ((thirty-two)) forty-eight
percent of the noninterest money received under subsection (1) of this section
except certain costs and fees in civil cases collected pursuant to RCW
3.62.060 to the state treasurer. The county treasurer shall remit
thirty-two percent of the fees in civil cases received pursuant to RCW
3.62.060. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means
those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010
or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal
actions under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes
if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded
for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state or county in the
prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited as provided in
RCW 43.08.250.

(3)
The balance of the noninterest money received by the county treasurer under
subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in the county current expense
fund.

(4)
All money collected for county parking infractions shall be remitted by the
clerk of the district court at least monthly, with the information required
under subsection (1) of this section, to the county treasurer for deposit in
the county current expense fund.

(5)
Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the
rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency.
Interest may accrue only while the case is in collection status.

(6)
Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and
costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in
the public safety and education account as provided in RCW 43.08.250,
twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial
information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to
the county current expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county current
expense fund to fund local courts.

Sec.
7. RCW
3.62.040 and 1995 c 291 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all costs, fines,
forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected, in whole or in part, by
district courts because of violations of city ordinances shall be remitted by
the clerk of the district court at least monthly directly to the treasurer of
the city wherein the violation occurred.

(2)
The city treasurer shall remit monthly ((thirty-two)) forty-eight
percent of the noninterest money received under this section, other than for
parking infractions and certain costs, to the state treasurer. "Certain
costs" as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing
parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs
awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the specific
reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or town in the
prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited as provided in
RCW 43.08.250.

(3)
The balance of the noninterest money received under this section shall be
retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.

(4)
All money collected for city parking infractions shall be remitted by the clerk
of the district court at least monthly to the city treasurer for deposit in the
city's general fund.

(5)
Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the
rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency.
Interest may accrue only while the case is in collection status.

(6)
Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and
costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in
the public safety and education account as provided in RCW 43.08.250,
twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial
information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to
the city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund
local courts.

Sec.
8. RCW
3.62.060 and 1992 c 62 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Clerks
of the district courts shall collect the following fees for their official
services:

(1)(a)
In any civil action commenced before or transferred to a district court, the
plaintiff shall, at the time of such commencement or transfer, pay to such
court a filing fee of thirty-one dollars plus any surcharge authorized by RCW
7.75.035.

(b)
In every county that has enacted a local option resolution pursuant to section
1 of this act, the clerks of the district courts shall collect an additional
filing fee of fourteen dollars upon the commencement or transfer of a civil
action for which a filing fee is collected under (a) of this subsection.
Revenue collected under this subsection (1)(b) shall be deposited in the court
improvement account created in section 2 of this act, and is exempt from the
percentage distribution remittance required in RCW 3.62.020(2).

(c)
No party shall be compelled to pay to the court any other fees or charges up to
and including the rendition of judgment in the action other than those listed.

(2)
For issuing a writ of garnishment or other writ a fee of six dollars.

(3)
For filing a supplemental proceeding a fee of twelve dollars.

(4)
For demanding a jury in a civil case a fee of fifty dollars to be paid by the
person demanding a jury.

(5)
For preparing a transcript of a judgment a fee of six dollars.

(6)
For certifying any document on file or of record in the clerk's office a fee of
five dollars.

(7)
For preparing the record of a case for appeal to superior court a fee of forty
dollars including any costs of tape duplication as governed by the rules of
appeal for courts of limited jurisdiction (RALJ).

(8)
For duplication of part or all of the electronic tape or tapes of a proceeding
ten dollars per tape.

The
fees or charges imposed under this section shall be allowed as court costs
whenever a judgment for costs is awarded.

Sec.
9. RCW
3.62.090 and 1997 c 331 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There shall be assessed and collected in addition to any fines, forfeitures, or
penalties assessed, other than for parking infractions and for fines levied
under RCW 46.61.5055, by all courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW a
public safety and education assessment equal to ((sixty)) one hundred
percent of such fines, forfeitures, or penalties, which shall be remitted as
provided in chapters 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, and 35.20 RCW. The assessment required
by this section shall not be suspended, reduced, or waived by the court.

(2)
There shall be assessed and collected in addition to any ((fines,
forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than for parking infractions and for))
fines levied under RCW 46.61.5055((, and in addition to the public safety
and education assessment required under subsection (1) of this section, by all
courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, an additional public safety and
education assessment equal to fifty percent of the public safety and education
assessment required under subsection (1) of this section, which shall be
remitted to the state treasurer and deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
The additional assessment required by this subsection shall not be suspended or
waived by the court)) by all courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW a
public safety and education assessment equal to sixty percent of such fines,
which shall be remitted as provided in chapters 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, and 35.20
RCW. The assessment required by this section shall not be suspended, reduced,
or waived by the court.

(3)
This section does not apply to the fee imposed under RCW 43.63.110(6).

Sec.
10. RCW
27.24.070 and 1992 c 54 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In
each county pursuant to this chapter, the county treasurer shall deposit in the
county or regional law library fund a sum equal to twelve dollars for every new
probate or civil filing fee, including appeals, collected by the clerk of the
superior court and six dollars for every fee collected for the commencement of
a civil action in district court for the support of the law library in that
county or the regional law library to which the county belongs: PROVIDED, That
upon a showing of need the twelve dollar contribution may be increased up to
fifteen dollars upon the request of the law library board of trustees and with
the approval of the county legislative body or bodies: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That in each county, upon a showing of need by the law library board
of trustees, a county legislative body or bodies may impose an additional
surcharge not to exceed the maximum amount established in this section for
every new probate or civil filing in superior court and an additional surcharge
not to exceed the maximum amount established in this section for every fee
collected for the commencement of a civil action in district court for the
purpose of funding the county law library. Any surcharge imposed shall be
collected by the clerk of the court and remitted to the county treasurer for
deposit in the county or regional law library fund.

Sec.
11. RCW
35.20.220 and 1995 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The chief clerk, under the supervision and direction of the court administrator
of the municipal court, shall have the custody and care of the books, papers
and records of said court; he shall be present by himself or deputy during the
session of said court, and shall have the power to swear all witnesses and
jurors, and administer oaths and affidavits, and take acknowledgments. He
shall keep the records of said court, and shall issue all process under his
hand and the seal of said court, and shall do and perform all things and have
the same powers pertaining to his office as the clerks of the superior courts
have in their office. He shall receive all fines, penalties and fees of every
kind, and keep a full, accurate and detailed account of the same; and shall on
each day pay into the city treasury all money received for said city during the
day previous, with a detailed account of the same, and taking the treasurer's
receipt therefor.

(2)
The city treasurer shall remit monthly ((thirty-two)) forty-eight
percent of the noninterest money received under this section, other than for
parking infractions and certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain
costs" as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing
parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs
awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the specific
reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or town in the
prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited as provided in
RCW 43.08.250.

(3)
The balance of the noninterest money received under this section shall be
retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.

(4)
Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the
rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency.
Interest may accrue only while the case is in collection status.

(5)
Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and
costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in
the public safety and education account as provided in RCW 43.08.250,
twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial
information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to
the city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund
local courts.

Sec.
12. RCW
36.18.020 and 1996 c 211 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Revenue collected under subsection (2) of this section is subject to
division with the state public safety and education account under RCW 36.18.025
and with the county or regional law library fund under RCW 27.24.070.

(2)
Clerks of superior courts shall collect the following fees for their official
services:

(a)
The party filing the first or initial paper in any civil action, including, but
not limited to an action for restitution, adoption, or change of name, shall
pay, at the time the paper is filed, a fee of one hundred ten dollars except,
in an unlawful detainer action under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW for which the
plaintiff shall pay a case initiating filing fee of thirty dollars, or in
proceedings filed under RCW 28A.225.030 alleging a violation of the compulsory
attendance laws where the petitioner shall not pay a filing fee. The thirty
dollar filing fee under this subsection for an unlawful detainer action shall
not include an order to show cause or any other order or judgment except a
default order or default judgment in an unlawful detainer action.

(b)
Any party, except a defendant in a criminal case, filing the first or initial
paper on an appeal from a court of limited jurisdiction or any party on any
civil appeal, shall pay, when the paper is filed, a fee of one hundred ten
dollars.

(c)
For filing of a petition for judicial review as required under RCW 34.05.514 a
filing fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(d)
For filing of a petition for unlawful harassment under RCW 10.14.040 a filing
fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(e)
For filing the notice of debt due for the compensation of a crime victim under
RCW 7.68.120(2)(a) a fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(f)
In probate proceedings, the party instituting such proceedings, shall pay at
the time of filing the first paper therein, a fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(g)
For filing any petition to contest a will admitted to probate or a petition to
admit a will which has been rejected, or a petition objecting to a written
agreement or memorandum as provided in RCW 11.96.170, there shall be paid a fee
of one hundred ten dollars.

(h)
Upon conviction or plea of guilty, upon failure to prosecute an appeal from a
court of limited jurisdiction as provided by law, or upon affirmance of a
conviction by a court of limited jurisdiction, a defendant in a criminal case
shall be liable for a fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(i)
With the exception of demands for jury hereafter made and garnishments
hereafter issued, civil actions and probate proceedings filed prior to
midnight, July 1, 1972, shall be completed and governed by the fee schedule in
effect as of January 1, 1972: PROVIDED, That no fee shall be assessed if an
order of dismissal on the clerk's record be filed as provided by rule of the
supreme court.

(3)
In every county that has enacted a local option resolution pursuant to
section 1 of this act, the clerk shall collect an additional filing fee of
thirty dollars upon the provision of any service for which a filing fee is
collected under subsection (2) of this section. Revenue collected under this
subsection shall be deposited in the court improvement account created in
section 2 of this act.

(4)
No fee shall be collected when a petition for relinquishment of parental rights
is filed pursuant to RCW 26.33.080 or for forms and instructional brochures
provided under RCW 26.50.030.

Sec.
13. RCW
36.18.025 and 1992 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Forty-six
percent of the money received from filing fees paid pursuant to RCW 36.18.020(2)
shall be transmitted by the county treasurer each month to the state treasurer
for deposit in the public safety and education account established under RCW
43.08.250.

Sec.
14. RCW
46.63.110 and 1997 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a
monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and fifty dollars for each
offense unless authorized by this chapter or title.

(2)
The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for
designated traffic infractions. This rule shall also specify the conditions
under which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines and
penalties for traffic infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the
supreme court to adjust this schedule every two years for inflation.

(3)
There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a
notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction relates to parking as
defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a
monetary penalty imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local legislative body
may set a monetary penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty set by
the local legislative body.

(4)
Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are civil in nature
and penalties which may be assessed for violations of chapter 46.44 RCW
relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles are not subject to the
limitation on the amount of monetary penalties which may be imposed pursuant to
this chapter.

(5)
Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter it is
immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at that time the court
may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the period in which the penalty
may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time established for
payment the court shall notify the department of the failure to pay the
penalty, and the department shall suspend the person's driver's license or
driving privilege until the penalty has been paid and the penalty provided in
subsection (3) of this section has been paid.

(6)
In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject
to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have
committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a fee of five dollars per
infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived.
Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in
the emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account under RCW
70.168.040.

(7)
The legislature respectfully requests that the supreme court provide by rule
for an increase of five dollars to the penalty amount imposed under subsection
(2) of this section effective October 1, 1999.

Sec.
15. RCW
2.14.010 and 1988 c 109 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The purpose of this chapter is to provide a supplemental retirement benefit to
judges who are elected or appointed under chapter 2.04, 2.06, ((or))
2.08, or 3.34 RCW and who are members of the public employees'
retirement system for their service as a judge.

(2)
This chapter may be known and cited as the judicial retirement account act.

Sec.
16. RCW
2.14.030 and 1988 c 109 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The
judicial retirement account plan is established for judges appointed or elected
under chapter 2.04, 2.06, ((or)) 2.08, or 3.34 RCW and who are
members of the public employees' retirement system for their service as a
judge.

Sec.
17. RCW
2.56.030 and 1997 c 41 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
administrator for the courts shall, under the supervision and direction of the
chief justice:

(1)
Examine the administrative methods and systems employed in the offices of the
judges, clerks, stenographers, and employees of the courts and make
recommendations, through the chief justice, for the improvement of the same;

(2)
Examine the state of the dockets of the courts and determine the need for
assistance by any court;

(3)
Make recommendations to the chief justice relating to the assignment of judges
where courts are in need of assistance and carry out the direction of the chief
justice as to the assignments of judges to counties and districts where the
courts are in need of assistance;

(4)
Collect and compile statistical and other data and make reports of the business
transacted by the courts and transmit the same to the chief justice to the end
that proper action may be taken in respect thereto;

(5)
Prepare and submit budget estimates of state appropriations necessary for the
maintenance and operation of the judicial system and make recommendations in
respect thereto;

(6)
Collect statistical and other data and make reports relating to the expenditure
of public moneys, state and local, for the maintenance and operation of the judicial
system and the offices connected therewith;

(7)
Obtain reports from clerks of courts in accordance with law or rules adopted by
the supreme court of this state on cases and other judicial business in which
action has been delayed beyond periods of time specified by law or rules of
court and make report thereof to supreme court of this state;

(8)
Act as secretary of the judicial conference referred to in RCW 2.56.060;

(9)
Submit annually, as of February 1st, to the chief justice, a report of the activities
of the administrator's office for the preceding calendar year including
activities related to courthouse security;

(10)
Administer programs and standards for the training and education of judicial
personnel;

(11)
Examine the need for new superior court and district judge positions under a
weighted caseload analysis that takes into account the time required to hear
all the cases in a particular court and the amount of time existing judges have
available to hear cases in that court. The results of the weighted caseload
analysis shall be reviewed by the board for judicial administration which shall
make recommendations to the legislature. It is the intent of the legislature
that weighted caseload analysis become the basis for creating additional district
court positions, and recommendations should address that objective;

(12)
Provide staff to the judicial retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW;

(13)
Attend to such other matters as may be assigned by the supreme court of this
state;

(14)
Within available funds, develop a curriculum for a general understanding of
child development, placement, and treatment resources, as well as specific
legal skills and knowledge of relevant statutes including chapters 13.32A,
13.34, and 13.40 RCW, cases, court rules, interviewing skills, and special
needs of the abused or neglected child. This curriculum shall be completed and
made available to all juvenile court judges, court personnel, and service
providers and be updated yearly to reflect changes in statutes, court rules, or
case law;

(15)
Develop, in consultation with the entities set forth in RCW 2.56.150(3), a
comprehensive state-wide curriculum for persons who act as guardians ad litem
under Title 13 or 26 RCW. The curriculum shall be made available July 1, 1997,
and include specialty sections on child development, child sexual abuse, child
physical abuse, child neglect, clinical and forensic investigative and
interviewing techniques, family reconciliation and mediation services, and
relevant statutory and legal requirements. The curriculum shall be made
available to all superior court judges, court personnel, and all persons who
act as guardians ad litem;

(16)
Develop a curriculum for a general understanding of crimes of malicious
harassment, as well as specific legal skills and knowledge of RCW 9A.36.080,
relevant cases, court rules, and the special needs of malicious harassment
victims. This curriculum shall be made available to all superior court and
court of appeals judges and to all justices of the supreme court;

(17)
Develop, in consultation with the criminal justice training commission and the
commissions established under chapters 43.113, 43.115, and 43.117 RCW, a
curriculum for a general understanding of ethnic and cultural diversity and its
implications for working with youth of color and their families. The
curriculum shall be available to all superior court judges and court
commissioners assigned to juvenile court, and other court personnel. Ethnic
and cultural diversity training shall be provided annually so as to incorporate
cultural sensitivity and awareness into the daily operation of juvenile courts
state-wide;

(18)
Authorize the use of closed circuit television and other electronic equipment
in judicial proceedings. The administrator shall promulgate necessary
standards and procedures and shall provide technical assistance to courts as
required;

(19)
Submit an annual report to the legislature on the cost to each county for
constitutionally mandated services of trial courts, including salary and
benefits of the authorized trial court judges, criminal trial expert witness
fees, jury costs, interpreter costs, and indigent criminal defense costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

The
extraordinary criminal justice assistance account is created in the state
treasury. Appropriations may be made from the general fund or the public
safety and education account into this account. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation and as authorized by the legislature.
Expenditures from the account may be used only to reimburse the extraordinary
costs associated with the prosecution, indigent defense, jury impanelment,
expert witnesses, interpreters, incarceration, and other adjudication costs of
aggravated murder cases. Only the director of community, trade, and economic
development or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

Counties
may submit claims to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for reimbursement from the extraordinary criminal justice
assistance account.

(1)
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall develop
procedures for processing the claims, for auditing the veracity of the claims,
and for prioritizing the claims. Prioritization of the claims shall be based
on, but not limited to, such factors as disproportionate fiscal impact relative
to the county budget, efficient use of resources, and whether the costs are
extraordinary and could not be reasonably accommodated and anticipated in the
normal budget process.

(2)
Before January 1 of each year, the department shall develop and submit to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives a
prioritized list of submitted claims that are recommended for funding by the
legislature from the extraordinary criminal justice assistance account. The list
shall include a summary of each claim and the nature of the costs incurred.

(3)
The department shall not financially obligate funds from the extraordinary
criminal justice assistance account before the legislature has appropriated
funds for a specific list of claims. The legislature may remove projects from
the list recommended by the department. The legislature shall not change the
order of the priorities recommended for funding by the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. (1)(a)
The sum of eight million four hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000,
from the public safety and education account to the department of community,
trade, and economic development to contract with a qualified provider for civil
representation of indigent persons in accordance with the requirements of RCW
43.08.260.

(b)
The sum of eight million four hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001,
from the public safety and education account to the department of community,
trade, and economic development to contract with a qualified provider for civil
representation of indigent persons in accordance with the requirements of RCW
43.08.260.

(2)
The sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from
the public safety and education account to the extraordinary criminal justice
assistance account for payment of claims under section 19 of this act.

(3)
The sum of five million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the public safety and
education account to the office of public defense for the purposes of providing
defense representation for indigent persons in juvenile dependency actions
filed in superior court.

(4)(a)
The sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the public safety
and education account to the criminal justice training commission for the
purposes of additional training for law enforcement personnel.

(b)
The sum of one million nine hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from
the public safety and education account to the criminal justice training
commission for the purposes of additional training for law enforcement
personnel.

(5)(a)
The sum of five million four hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000,
from the court improvement account to the office of the administrator for the
courts for the purposes stated in section 2 of this act.

(b)
The sum of five million four hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001,
from the court improvement account to the office of the administrator for the
courts for the purposes stated in section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21.
(1)(a) The sum of six million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund
to the office of the administrator for the courts for the purposes of funding
operations not funded by the public safety and education account.

(b)
The sum of six million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the office of the administrator for the courts for the purposes of funding
operations not funded by the public safety and education account.

(2)(a)
The sum of twenty million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the board for judicial administration for the purposes of reimbursing costs
relating to trial court judges pursuant to RCW 2.56.030(19) in counties that
have enacted a local option resolution pursuant to section 1 of this act.

(b)
The sum of twenty million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the board for judicial administration for the purposes of reimbursing costs
relating to trial court judges pursuant to RCW 2.56.030(19) in counties that
have enacted a local option resolution pursuant to section 1 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22. This
act shall be known and cited as the court funding and improvement act of 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23.
Sections 4 through 7, 9, and 11 of this act take effect October 1, 1999.

---
END ---