BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.101.030 and 1981 c 132 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall consist of ((twelve)) fourteen members, who
shall be selected as follows:

(1)
The governor shall appoint two incumbent sheriffs and two incumbent chiefs of
police.

(2)
The governor shall appoint one officer at or below the level of first line
supervisor from a county law enforcement agency and one officer at or below the
level of first line supervisor from a municipal law enforcement agency. Each
appointee under this subsection (2) shall have at least ten years experience as
a law enforcement officer.

(3)
The governor shall appoint one person employed in a county correctional system
and one person employed in the state correctional system.

(((3)))
(4) The governor shall appoint one incumbent county prosecuting attorney
or municipal attorney.

(((4)))
(5) The governor shall appoint one elected official of a local government.

(((5)))
(6) The governor shall appoint one private citizen.

(((6)))
(7) The three remaining members shall be:

(a)
The attorney general;

(b)
The special agent in charge of the Seattle office of the federal bureau of
investigation; and

(c)
The chief of the state patrol.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.101.060 and 1974 ex.s. c 94 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall elect a ((chairman)) chair and a vice ((chairman))
chair from among its members. ((Six)) Seven members of
the commission shall constitute a quorum. The governor shall summon the
commission to its first meeting.

Meetings may be called by the ((chairman)) chair and
shall be called by him or her upon the written request of ((five))
six members.

---
END ---