BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

A
city or town that imposes any tax or payment measured by gross receipts
received for electricity or electrical distribution services may not impose
such tax or payment in respect to electricity delivered within the corporate
limits of another city or town. For the purposes of this section, electricity
is delivered at the situs of the meter measuring the electricity delivered to
the consumer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect August 1, 1999.

---
END ---