BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
No telecommunications company shall execute or otherwise cause a change in a
subscriber's selection of local exchange or interexchange telecommunications
company without the subscriber's authorization in a manner provided for by the
commission. In addition to any other penalties provided by law, the commission
may impose any one or more of the following penalties:

(a)
Order payment by an unauthorized service provider to the service provider
previously selected by the subscriber in an amount not to exceed all charges
billed to such subscriber by the unauthorized service provider for services
provided during the unauthorized service period;

(b)
Order the unauthorized service provider to cancel any charges billed to a
subscriber for services provided during the unauthorized service period; and

(c)
Order the unauthorized service provider to refund all payments made by the
subscriber for services provided during the unauthorized service period.

(2) In addition to the penalties provided in subsection (1) of this
section, if the commission finds a pattern or practice of violation of this
section by any telecommunications company, the commission may require the
telecommunications company to obtain a signed letter of agency from every new
subscriber for a period of time established by the commission.

---
END ---