BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
All property owned and used by a community public radio station is exempt from
taxation.

(2)
As used in this section "community public radio station" means a
nonprofit organization, other than a government entity or an educational
institution, that holds a noncommercial FM broadcast license under 47 C.F.R.
Sec. 73.503.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.36.805 and 1998 c 311 s 25, 1998 c 202 s 3, and 1998 c 184 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

In
order to be exempt pursuant to RCW 84.36.030, 84.36.035, 84.36.037, 84.36.040,
84.36.041, 84.36.043, 84.36.045, 84.36.046, 84.36.047, 84.36.050, 84.36.060, section
1 of this act, 84.36.350, 84.36.480, 84.36.550, and 84.36.042, the
nonprofit organizations, associations or corporations shall satisfy the
following conditions:

(1)
The property is used exclusively for the actual operation of the activity for
which exemption is granted, unless otherwise provided, and does not exceed an
amount reasonably necessary for that purpose, except:

(a)
The loan or rental of the property does not subject the property to tax if:

(i)
The rents and donations received for the use of the portion of the property are
reasonable and do not exceed the maintenance and operation expenses
attributable to the portion of the property loaned or rented; and

(ii)
Except for the exemptions under RCW 84.36.030(4) and 84.36.037, the property
would be exempt from tax if owned by the organization to which it is loaned or
rented;

(b)
The use of the property for fund-raising activities does not subject the
property to tax if the fund-raising activities are consistent with the purposes
for which the exemption is granted;

(2)
The property is irrevocably dedicated to the purpose for which exemption has
been granted, and on the liquidation, dissolution, or abandonment by said
organization, association, or corporation, said property will not inure
directly or indirectly to the benefit of any shareholder or individual, except
a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation which too would be
entitled to property tax exemption. This property need not be irrevocably
dedicated if it is leased or rented to those qualified for exemption pursuant
to RCW 84.36.035, 84.36.040, 84.36.041, 84.36.043, 84.36.045, 84.36.046, or
84.36.042 or those qualified for exemption as an association engaged in the
production or performance of musical, dance, artistic, dramatic, or literary
works pursuant to RCW 84.36.060, but only if under the terms of the lease or
rental agreement the nonprofit organization, association, or corporation
receives the benefit of the exemption;

(3)
The facilities and services are available to all regardless of race, color,
national origin or ancestry;

(4)
The organization, association, or corporation is duly licensed or certified
where such licensing or certification is required by law or regulation;

(5)
Property sold to organizations, associations, or corporations with an option to
be repurchased by the seller shall not qualify for exempt status;

(6)
The director of the department of revenue shall have access to its books in
order to determine whether such organization, association, or corporation is
exempt from taxes within the intent of RCW 84.36.030, 84.36.035, 84.36.037,
84.36.040, 84.36.041, 84.36.043, 84.36.045, 84.36.046, 84.36.047, 84.36.050,
84.36.060, section 1 of this act, 84.36.350, 84.36.480, and 84.36.042.

Sec.
3. RCW
84.36.810 and 1998 c 311 s 26 and 1998 c 202 s 4 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Upon cessation of a use under which an exemption has been granted pursuant to
RCW 84.36.030, 84.36.037, 84.36.040, 84.36.041, 84.36.043, 84.36.046,
84.36.050, 84.36.060, 84.36.550, ((and)) 84.36.042, and section 1 of
this act, the county treasurer shall collect all taxes which would have
been paid had the property not been exempt during the three years preceding, or
the life of such exemption, if such be less, together with the interest at the
same rate and computed in the same way as that upon delinquent property taxes.
Where the property has been granted an exemption for more than ten years, taxes
and interest shall not be assessed under this section.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section applies only when ownership of the property is
transferred or when fifty-one percent or more of the area of the property has
lost its exempt status. The additional tax under subsection (1) of this
section shall not be imposed if the cessation of use resulted solely from:

(a)
Transfer to a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation for a use
which also qualifies and is granted exemption under the provisions of chapter
84.36 RCW;

(b)
A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or sale or
transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the
exercise of such power;

(c)
Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or
city within which the property is located which disallows the present use of
such property;

(d)
A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other such calamity
rather than by virtue of the act of the organization, association, or
corporation changing the use of such property;

(e)
Relocation of the activity and use of another location or site except for
undeveloped properties of camp facilities exempted under RCW 84.36.030;

(f)
Cancellation of a lease on property that had been exempt under RCW 84.36.040,
84.36.041, 84.36.043, 84.36.046, 84.36.060, or 84.36.042;

(g)
A change in the exempt portion of a home for the aging under RCW 84.36.041(3),
as long as some portion of the home remains exempt((;

(h)
The conversion of a full exemption of a home for the aging to a partial
exemption or taxable status or the conversion of a partial exemption to taxable
status under RCW 84.36.041(8))).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Section 1 of this act is effective for taxes levied for collection in 2000 and
thereafter.

---
END ---