BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The names and other identifying or personally identifiable information of, or
relating to, the following persons, which information is maintained by or on
behalf of a public agency performing public transportation functions, are
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:

(a)
Current or former participants, applicants, and potential participants in any
vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing programs processed or administered by
such public agency, except that the agency may disclose this information to
persons or entities that are participating or applying to participate in those
programs;

(b)
Persons who acquire and use transit passes and other fare payment media
including, but not limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip
cards, except that the agency may disclose this information to a person,
employer, educational institution, or other entity that is responsible, in
whole or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit pass
or other fare payment media;

(c)
Current or former participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit
service operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons; and

(d)
Persons who apply for or participate in other public transportation programs
administered by such public agencies.

(2)
This section does not apply to published statistical compilations and reports
relating to public transportation programs that do not provide information that
identifies or could be used to identify specific individuals.

(3) This section does not prohibit such public agencies from
disclosing at their discretion any information exempted under this section.
This section does not create a right of privacy in the information exempted by
this section, and no person, as a result of this section, has a cause of action
on account of the release of information covered by this section.

---
END ---