BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.27.080 and 1984 c 106 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in RCW 29.81A.060, notice for any state, county, district,
or municipal election, whether special or general, shall be given by at least
one publication not more than ten nor less than three days prior to the
election by the county auditor or the officer conducting the election as the
case may be, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
county. Said legal notice shall contain the title of each office under the
proper party designation, the names and addresses of all officers who have been
nominated for an office to be voted upon at that election, together with the
ballot titles of all measures, the hours during which the polls will be open,
and that the election will be held in the regular polling places in each
precinct, giving the address of each polling place: PROVIDED, That the names
of all candidates for nonpartisan offices shall be published separately with designation
of the offices for which they are candidates but without party designation.
This shall be the only notice required for a state, county, district, or
municipal general or special election and shall supersede the provisions of any
and all other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
requirements for the giving of notice of any general or special elections.

(2)
All school district elections held on February 5, 1980, at which the number and
proportion of persons required by law voted to authorize bonds or tax levies,
are hereby validated regardless of any failure to publish notice of such
election. No action challenging the validity of any such election may be
brought later than April 15, 1980, or thirty days from June 12, 1980, whichever
is later. Notice of provisions of this subsection shall be published within
five days after February 28, 1980, in a newspaper of general circulation within
each county where a school district election was held on February 5, 1980, and where
notice of such election was not published as provided in subsection (1) of this
section.

(3)
All school district elections held on May 19, 1998, at which the number and
proportion of persons required by law voted to authorize bonds or tax levies,
are hereby validated regardless of any failure to publish notice of such
election. No action challenging the validity of any such election may be
brought later than thirty days after the effective date of this section.
Notice of provisions of this subsection shall be published within five days
after the effective date of this section, in a newspaper of general circulation
within each county where a school district election was held on May 19, 1998,
and where notice of such election was not published as provided in subsection
(1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---