BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
73.04.110 and 1987 c 98 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who is a veteran as defined in RCW 41.04.005 who submits to the
department of licensing satisfactory proof of a service-connected disability
rating from the veterans administration or the military service from which the
veteran was discharged and:

(((1)))
(a) Has lost the use of both hands or one foot;

(((2)))
(b) Was captured and incarcerated for more than twenty-nine days by an
enemy of the United States during a period of war with the United States; or

(((3)))
(c) Has become blind in both eyes as the result of military service; ((or

(4)
Is rated by the veterans administration or the military service from which the
veteran was discharged and is receiving service-connected compensation at the
one hundred percent rate that is expected to exist for more than one year;))

is
entitled to regular or special license plates issued by the department of
licensing described in subsection (3) of this section.

(2)
Any person who has served as a member in the armed forces of the United States
who:

(a)
Received an honorable discharge or received a discharge for physical reasons
with an honorable record;

(b)
Submits to the department of licensing satisfactory proof of a
service-connected disability rating from the veterans' administration or the
military service from which the veteran was discharged; and

(c)
Is receiving service-connected compensation at the one hundred percent rate
that is expected to exist for more than one year;

is
entitled to regular or special license plates issued by the department of
licensing described in subsection (3) of this section.

(3)
The special license plates authorized by this section shall bear
distinguishing marks, letters, or numerals indicating that the motor vehicle is
owned by a disabled veteran or former prisoner of war. This license shall be
issued annually for one personal use vehicle without payment of any license
fees or excise tax thereon. Whenever any person who has been issued license
plates under the provisions of this section applies to the department for
transfer of the plates to a subsequently acquired motor vehicle, a transfer fee
of five dollars shall be charged in addition to all other appropriate fees.
The department may periodically verify the one hundred percent rate as provided
in subsection (((4))) (2)(c) of this section.

Any
person who has been issued free motor vehicle license plates under this section
prior to July 1, 1983, shall continue to be eligible for the annual free
license plates.

For
the purposes of this section, "blind" means the definition of
"blind" used by the state of Washington in determining eligibility
for financial assistance to the blind under Title 74 RCW.

Any unauthorized use of a special plate is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.120.170 and 1998 c 342 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall administer a system for emission inspections of all motor
vehicles, except those described in RCW 46.16.015(2), that are registered
within the boundaries of each emission contributing area. Under such system a
motor vehicle shall be inspected biennially except where an annual program
would be required to meet federal law and prevent federal sanctions. In
addition, motor vehicles shall be inspected at each change of registered owner
of a licensed vehicle as provided under RCW 46.16.015.

(2)
The director shall:

(a)
Adopt procedures for conducting emission inspections of motor vehicles. The
inspections may include idle and high revolution per minute emission tests.
The emission test for diesel vehicles shall consist solely of a smoke opacity
test.

(b)
Adopt criteria for calibrating emission testing equipment. Electronic
equipment used to test for emissions standards provided for in this chapter
shall be properly calibrated. The department shall examine frequently the
calibration of the emission testing equipment used at the stations.

(c)
Authorize, through contracts, the establishment and operation of inspection
stations for conducting vehicle emission inspections authorized in this
chapter. No person contracted to inspect motor vehicles may perform for
compensation repairs on any vehicles. No public body may establish or operate
contracted inspection stations. Any contracts must be let in accordance with
the procedures established for competitive bids in chapter 43.19 RCW.

(3)
Subsection (2)(c) of this section does not apply to volunteer motor vehicle
inspections under RCW 70.120.020(1) if the inspections are conducted for the
following purposes:

(a)
Auditing;

(b)
Contractor evaluation;

(c)
Collection of data for establishing calibration and performance standards; or

(d)
Public information and education.

(4)(a)
The director shall establish by rule the fee to be charged for emission
inspections. The inspection fee shall be a standard fee applicable state-wide
or throughout an emission contributing area and shall be no greater than
fifteen dollars. Surplus moneys collected from fees over the amount due the
contractor shall be paid to the state and deposited in the general fund. Fees
shall be set at the minimum whole dollar amount required to (i) compensate the
contractor or inspection facility owner, and (ii) offset the general fund
appropriation to the department to cover the administrative costs of the motor
vehicle emission inspection program.

(b)
Before each inspection, a person whose motor vehicle is to be inspected shall
pay to the inspection station the fee established under this section except
as provided in (c) of this subsection. The person whose motor vehicle is
inspected shall receive the results of the inspection. If the inspected
vehicle complies with the standards established by the director, the person
shall receive a dated certificate of compliance. If the inspected vehicle does
not comply with those standards, one reinspection of the vehicle shall be
afforded without charge.

(c)
The inspection fee is waived for no more than one vehicle owned by any person
who has served as a member in the armed forces of the United States who:

(i)
Received an honorable discharge or received a discharge for physical reasons
with an honorable record;

(ii)
Submits satisfactory proof to the department of a service-connected disability
rating from the veterans' administration or the military service from which the
veteran was discharged; and

(iii)
Is receiving service-connected compensation at the one hundred percent rate
that is expected to exist for more than one year.

(5) All units of local government and agencies of the state with
motor vehicles garaged or regularly operated in an emissions contributing area
shall test the emissions of those vehicles annually to ensure that the
vehicle's emissions comply with the emission standards established by the
director. All state agencies outside of emission contributing areas with more
than twenty motor vehicles housed at a single facility or contiguous facilities
shall test the emissions of those vehicles annually to ensure that the
vehicles' emissions comply with standards established by the director. A
report of the results of the tests shall be submitted to the department.

---
END ---