BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.16.020 and 1994 c 189 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
period prescribed for the commencement of actions shall be as follows:

Within
ten years:

(1)
((For actions for the recovery of real property, or for the recovery of the
possession thereof; and no action shall be maintained for such recovery unless
it appears that the plaintiff, his or her ancestor, predecessor or grantor was
seized or possessed of the premises in question within ten years before the commencement
of the action.

(2))) For
an action upon a judgment or decree of any court of the United States, or of
any state or territory within the United States, or of any territory or
possession of the United States outside the boundaries thereof, or of any
extraterritorial court of the United States, unless the ten-year period is
extended in accordance with RCW 6.17.020(3).

(((3)))
(2) Of the eighteenth birthday of the youngest child named in the order
for whom support is ordered for an action to collect past due child support
that has accrued under an order entered after July 23, 1989, by any of the
above-named courts or that has accrued under an administrative order as defined
in RCW 74.20A.020(6), which is issued after July 23, 1989.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 4.16 RCW to read as follows:

An
action to recover real property, or to recover the possession of real property,
must be commenced within twenty years. The action may not be maintained unless
it appears that the plaintiff, or the plaintiff's ancestor, predecessor, or
grantor, was seized or possessed of the premises in question within twenty
years before commencing the action.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
7.28.010 and 1911 c 83 s 1, 1890 c 72 s 1, Code 1881 s 536, 1879
p 134 s 1, 1877 p 112 s 540, 1869 p 128 s 488, & 1854 p 205 s 398;

(2) RCW
7.28.050 and 1893 c 11 s 1;

(3) RCW
7.28.060 and 1893 c 11 s 2;

(4) RCW
7.28.070 and 1893 c 11 s 3;

(5) RCW
7.28.080 and 1893 c 11 s 4;

(6) RCW
7.28.085 and 1998 c 57 s 1;

(7) RCW
7.28.090 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 7, 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 7, &
1893 c 11 s 5;

(8) RCW
7.28.100 and 1893 c 11 s 6;

(9) RCW
7.28.110 and Code 1881 s 537, 1877 p 112 s 541, & 1869 p 128
s 489;

(10) RCW
7.28.120 and Code 1881 s 538, 1879 p 134 s 2, 1877 p 113 s 542,
& 1869 p 128 s 490;

(11) RCW
7.28.130 and Code 1881 s 539, 1877 p 113 s 543, & 1869 p 129
s 491;

(12) RCW
7.28.140 and Code 1881 s 540, 1877 p 113 s 544, & 1869 p 129
s 492;

(13) RCW
7.28.150 and Code 1881 s 541, 1877 p 113 s 545, & 1869 p 129
s 493;

(14) RCW
7.28.160 and 1903 c 137 s 1;

(15) RCW
7.28.170 and 1903 c 137 s 2;

(16) RCW
7.28.180 and 1903 c 137 s 3;

(17) RCW
7.28.190 and Code 1881 s 542, 1877 p 114 s 546, & 1869 p 130
s 494;

(18) RCW
7.28.200 and Code 1881 s 543, 1877 p 114 s 547, & 1869 p 130
s 495;

(19) RCW
7.28.210 and Code 1881 s 544, 1877 p 114 s 548, & 1869 p 130
s 496;

(20) RCW
7.28.220 and Code 1881 s 545, 1877 p 114 s 549, & 1869 p 130
s 497;

(21) RCW
7.28.230 and 1991 c 188 s 1, 1989 c 73 s 1, 1969 ex.s. c 122 s
1, Code 1881 s 546, 1877 p 114 s 550, & 1869 p 130 s 498;

(22) RCW
7.28.240 and Code 1881 s 547, 1877 p 114 s 551, & 1869 p 130
s 499;

(23) RCW
7.28.250 and Code 1881 s 548, 1877 p 114 s 552, & 1869 p 131
s 500;

(24) RCW
7.28.260 and 1909 c 35 s 1, Code 1881 s 549, 1877 p 114 s 553,
& 1869 p 131 s 501;

(25) RCW
7.28.270 and Code 1881 s 550, 1877 p 115 s 554, & 1869 p 131
s 502;

(26) RCW
7.28.280 and Code 1881 s 551, 1877 p 116 s 556, & 1869 p 132
s 504;

(27) RCW
7.28.300 and 1998 c 295 s 17 & 1937 c 124 s 1;

(28) RCW
7.28.310 and 1929 c 100 s 1; and

(29) RCW
7.28.320 and 1929 c 100 s 2.

---
END ---