BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
LEGISLATIVE RECOGNITION AND INTENT. The legislature recognizes
the economic hardship that rural distressed areas throughout the state have
undergone in recent years. Numerous rural distressed areas across the state
have encountered serious economic downturns resulting in significant job loss
and business failure. In 1991 the legislature enacted two major pieces of
legislation to promote economic development and job creation, with particular
emphasis on worker training, income, and emergency services support, along with
community revitalization through planning services and infrastructure
assistance. However even though these programs have been of assistance, rural
distressed areas still face serious economic problems including: Above-average
unemployment rates from job losses and below-average employment growth; low
rate of business start-ups; and persistent erosion of vitally important
resource-dependent industries.

The
legislature also recognizes that rural distressed areas in Washington have an
abiding ability and consistent will to overcome these economic obstacles by
building upon their historic foundations of business enterprise, local
leadership, and outstanding work ethic.

The
legislature intends to assist rural distressed areas in their ongoing efforts
to address these difficult economic problems by providing a comprehensive and
significant array of economic tools, necessary to harness the persistent and
undaunted spirit of enterprise that resides in the citizens of rural distressed
areas throughout the state.

The
further intent of this act is to provide:

(1)
A strategically designed plan of assistance, emphasizing state, local, and
private sector leadership and partnership;

(2)
A comprehensive and significant array of business assistance, services, and tax
incentives that are accountable and performance-based;

(3)
An array of community assistance including infrastructure development and
business retention, attraction, and expansion programs that will provide a
competitive advantage to rural distressed areas throughout Washington; and

(4)
Regulatory relief to reduce and streamline zoning, permitting, and regulatory
requirements in order to enhance the capability of businesses to grow and
prosper in rural distressed areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. GOALS.
The primary goals of chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act) are to:

(1)
Promote and retain the operation of businesses in rural distressed areas;

(2)
Promote the expansion of existing businesses in rural distressed areas;

(3)
Attract new businesses to rural distressed areas;

(4)
Assist in the development of new businesses from within rural distressed areas;

(5)
Provide family wage jobs to the citizens of rural distressed areas; and

(6)
Promote the development of communities of excellence in rural distressed areas.

PART
I

BUSINESS
ASSISTANCE

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

STATE
OFFICE OF BUSINESS ASSISTANCE AND RECRUITMENT FOR RURAL DISTRESSED AREAS.
There is established within the department of community, trade, and economic
development the office of business assistance and recruitment for rural
distressed areas. The primary responsibilities of the office are to coordinate
and administer a comprehensive and effective set of business assistance
programs and services including:

(1)
Business recruitment. The office shall: Provide a comprehensive and
aggressive program to attract viable businesses to rural distressed areas; work
with local communities to identify select industry sectors that have a
competitive advantage in specific rural distressed areas; collaborate with
state and local officials to modify their infrastructure plans and priorities
to facilitate business growth; and assist rural distressed areas in developing
strategic business recruitment plans.

(2)
Business permitting and zoning one-stop shop. The office shall: Provide a
streamlined and customer driven siting service to businesses in order to
promote their attraction and expansion in rural distressed areas; provide
preliminary permit application and zoning information and services for
businesses in order to attract firms and facilitate business growth in rural
distressed areas.

(3)
Business regulatory assistance and ombudsman services. The office shall:
Provide comprehensive business regulatory services to assist businesses in
addressing and responding to local, state, and federal regulations; and provide
recommendations on streamlining and modifying government regulations.

(a)
The office is authorized to review state zoning, permitting, or regulatory
requirements that pose difficulty for businesses wishing or likely to site in a
rural enterprise area. In situations where the office considers the zoning,
permitting, or regulatory requirements placed on a business in a rural
enterprise area to be burdensome the director may petition the regulatory
agency or agencies for regulatory relief. In addition the director may
petition the agency or agencies for relief under the regulatory fairness act,
chapter 19.85 RCW.

(b)
In situations where a business or entity in a rural enterprise zone is
encountering regulatory oversight from more than one state agency and is
experiencing conflicting direction or an unintended consequence as a result of
a confusing process, the business or entity may petition the director to
intercede. The director upon review of the circumstances involved is
authorized to designate a lead agency to collaborate with other state agencies
in order to streamline and reduce the regulatory difficulties.

(c)
Businesses or entities in a rural enterprise zone may petition the director for
an accelerated zoning, permitting, or regulatory process. The director upon
reviewing the petition and the circumstances involved may make a finding of
regulatory burden and may direct the state agency or agencies to process the
business or entities' application in an expeditious manner.

(4)
"Brown Fields" Program. The office shall develop with the department
of ecology and recommend to the legislature a streamlined and cost-effective
process to redevelop hazardous sites that are suitable for industrial and
commercial growth in order to promote industrial and commercial growth in rural
distressed areas.

(5)
Rural enterprise zone development and foreign trade zone. The office is
authorized to provide technical assistance to local governments in rural
distressed areas to establish rural enterprise zones and foreign trade zones.
The office shall target rural enterprise zones and foreign trade zones in the
delivery of its services in order to maximize the impact of its economic
development assistance as outlined in RCW 43.63A.715 to businesses and rural
distressed areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

OFFICE
ADMINISTRATION. The office shall be administered by an appointee of the
director of community, trade, and economic development, in consultation with
the rural distressed areas economic recovery coordination board. The office
appointee shall coordinate activities with the rural distressed areas resource
coordinator and report on the activities and performance of the office on a
quarterly basis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 28C.04 RCW to read as follows:

JOB
SKILLS/RURAL DISTRESSED AREA EMPLOYEE TRAINING. At least seventy-five percent
of all discretionary expenditures in the job skills program shall be made to
assist businesses in rural distressed areas. For the purposes of this section,
"rural distressed area" means the same as "rural natural
resources impact area" under RCW 43.31.601.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.168.140 and 1995 c 226 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

RURAL
DISTRESSED AREAS. Any funds appropriated by the legislature to the development
loan fund for purposes of the timber recovery act shall be used for development
loans in rural ((natural resources impact areas as defined in RCW 43.31.601))
distressed areas. At least seventy-five percent of all discretionary
expenditures shall be to assist businesses in rural distressed areas. For the
purposes of this section, "rural distressed area" means the same as
"rural natural resources impact area" under RCW 43.31.601.

Sec.
7. RCW
43.163.210 and 1998 c 48 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purpose of facilitating economic development in the state of Washington and
encouraging the employment of Washington workers at meaningful wages:

(1)
The authority may develop and conduct a program or programs to provide
nonrecourse revenue bond financing for the project costs for economic
development activities.

(2)
The authority may develop and conduct a program that will stimulate and
encourage the development of new products within Washington state by the
infusion of financial aid for invention and innovation in situations in which
the financial aid would not otherwise be reasonably available from commercial
sources. The authority is authorized to provide nonrecourse revenue bond
financing for this program.

(a)
For the purposes of this program, the authority shall have the following powers
and duties:

(i)
To enter into financing agreements with eligible persons doing business in
Washington state, upon terms and on conditions consistent with the purposes of
this chapter, for the advancement of financial and other assistance to the
persons for the development of specific products, procedures, and techniques,
to be developed and produced in this state, and to condition the agreements
upon contractual assurances that the benefits of increasing or maintaining
employment and tax revenues shall remain in this state and accrue to it;

(ii)
Own, possess, and take license in patents, copyrights, and proprietary
processes and negotiate and enter into contracts and establish charges for the
use of the patents, copyrights, and proprietary processes when the patents and
licenses for products result from assistance provided by the authority;

(iii)
Negotiate royalty payments to the authority on patents and licenses for
products arising as a result of assistance provided by the authority;

(iv)
Negotiate and enter into other types of contracts with eligible persons that
assure that public benefits will result from the provision of services by the
authority; provided that the contracts are consistent with the state
Constitution;

(v)
Encourage and provide technical assistance to eligible persons in the process
of developing new products;

(vi)
Refer eligible persons to researchers or laboratories for the purpose of
testing and evaluating new products, processes, or innovations; and

(vii)
To the extent permitted under its contract with eligible persons, to consent to
a termination, modification, forgiveness, or other change of a term of a
contractual right, payment, royalty, contract, or agreement of any kind to which
the authority is a party.

(b)
Eligible persons seeking financial and other assistance under this program
shall forward an application, together with an application fee prescribed by
rule, to the authority. An investigation and report concerning the advisability
of approving an application for assistance shall be completed by the staff of
the authority. The investigation and report may include, but is not limited
to, facts about the company under consideration as its history, wage standards,
job opportunities, stability of employment, past and present financial
condition and structure, pro forma income statements, present and future
markets and prospects, integrity of management as well as the feasibility of
the proposed product and invention to be granted financial aid, including the
state of development of the product as well as the likelihood of its commercial
feasibility. After receipt and consideration of the report set out in this
subsection and after other action as is deemed appropriate, the application
shall be approved or denied by the authority. The applicant shall be promptly
notified of action by the authority. In making the decision as to approval or
denial of an application, priority shall be given to those persons operating or
planning to operate businesses of special importance to Washington's economy,
including, but not limited to: (i) Existing resource-based industries of
agriculture, forestry, and fisheries; (ii) existing advanced technology
industries of electronics, computer and instrument manufacturing, computer
software, and information and design; and (iii) emerging industries such as
environmental technology, biotechnology, biomedical sciences, materials
sciences, and optics.

(3)
The authority may also develop and implement, if authorized by the legislature,
such other economic development financing programs adopted in future general
plans of economic development finance objectives developed under RCW
43.163.090.

(4)
The authority shall develop a program and target their resources in
assisting rural distressed areas in their business and job creation and
assistance efforts under chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act). For
the purposes of this section, "rural distressed area" means the same
as "rural natural resources impact area" under RCW 43.31.601.

(5)
The authority may not issue any bonds for the programs authorized under this
section after June 30, 2004.

PART
II

COMMUNITY
INFRASTRUCTURE

Sec.
8. RCW
43.160.080 and 1998 c 321 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a fund in the state treasury known as the public facilities
construction loan revolving account, which shall consist of all moneys
collected under this chapter, except moneys of the board collected in
connection with the issuance of industrial development revenue bonds and moneys
deposited in the distressed county public facilities construction loan account
under RCW 43.160.220, and any moneys appropriated to it by law((: PROVIDED,
That seventy-five percent of all principal and interest payments on loans made
with the proceeds deposited in the account under section 901, chapter 57, Laws
of 1983 1st ex. sess. shall be deposited in the general fund as reimbursement
for debt service payments on the bonds authorized in RCW 43.83.184)).
Disbursements from the revolving account shall be on authorization of the
board. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the
public facilities construction loan revolving account shall be subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW.

PART
III

REGULATORY
FAIRNESS

Sec.
9. RCW
19.85.011 and 1994 c 249 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

RURAL
DISTRESSED AREAS REGULATORY FAIRNESS ACT. The legislature finds that
administrative rules adopted by state agencies can have a disproportionate
impact on the state's small businesses and rural distressed areas
because of the size of those businesses and communities. This
disproportionate impact reduces competition, innovation, employment, and new
employment opportunities, and threatens the very existence of some small
businesses and rural distressed areas. The legislature therefore enacts
the Regulatory Fairness Act with the intent of reducing the disproportionate
impact of state administrative rules on small business and rural distressed
areas.

Sec.
10. RCW
19.85.020 and 1994 c 249 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
through this chapter.

(1)
"Small business" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that is owned
and operated independently from all other businesses, that has the purpose of
making a profit, and that has fifty or fewer employees.

(2)
"Small business or rural distressed areas economic impact
statement" means a statement meeting the requirements of RCW 19.85.040
prepared by a state agency pursuant to RCW 19.85.030.

(3)
"Industry" means all of the businesses in this state in any one
four-digit standard industrial classification as published by the United States
department of commerce. However, if the use of a four-digit standard
industrial classification would result in the release of data that would
violate state confidentiality laws, "industry" means all businesses
in a three-digit standard industrial classification.

(4)
"Rural distressed areas" means the same as natural resource impact area
under RCW 43.31.601.

Sec.
11. RCW
19.85.025 and 1997 c 409 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless an agency receives a written objection to the expedited repeal of a
rule, this chapter does not apply to a rule proposed for expedited repeal
pursuant to RCW 34.05.354. If an agency receives a written objection to
expedited repeal of the rule, this chapter applies to the rule-making
proceeding.

(2)
This chapter does not apply to a rule proposed for expedited adoption under RCW
34.05.230 (1) through (8), unless a written objection is timely filed with the
agency and the objection is not withdrawn.

(3)
This chapter does not apply to the adoption of a rule described in RCW
34.05.310(4).

(4)
An agency is not required to prepare a separate small business or rural
distressed areas economic impact statement under RCW 19.85.040 if it
prepared an analysis under RCW 34.05.328 that meets the requirements of a small
business or rural distressed areas economic impact statement, and if the
agency reduced the costs imposed by the rule on small business or rural
distressed areas to the extent required by RCW 19.85.030(3). The portion
of the analysis that meets the requirements of RCW 19.85.040 shall be filed
with the code reviser and provided to any person requesting it in lieu of a
separate small business or rural distressed areas economic impact
statement.

Sec.
12. RCW
19.85.030 and 1995 c 403 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the adoption of a rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, an agency shall prepare a
small business or rural distressed areas economic impact statement: (a)
If the proposed rule will impose more than minor costs on businesses in an
industry or rural distressed areas; or (b) if requested to do so by a
majority vote of the joint administrative rules review committee within
forty-five days of receiving the notice of proposed rule making under RCW
34.05.320. However, if the agency has completed the pilot rule process as
defined by RCW 34.05.313 before filing the notice of a proposed rule, the
agency is not required to prepare a small business or rural distressed areas
economic impact statement.

An
agency shall prepare the small business or rural distressed areas
economic impact statement in accordance with RCW 19.85.040, and file it with
the code reviser along with the notice required under RCW 34.05.320. An agency
shall file a statement prepared at the request of the joint administrative
rules review committee with the code reviser upon its completion before the
adoption of the rule. An agency shall provide a copy of the small business or
rural distressed areas economic impact statement to any person requesting
it.

An
agency may request assistance from ((the business assistance center)) the
affected businesses or rural distressed areas in the preparation of the
small business or rural distressed areas economic impact statement.

(2)
((The business assistance center)) Agencies shall develop
guidelines to assist ((agencies)) in determining whether a proposed rule
will impose more than minor costs on businesses in an industry or rural
distressed areas and therefore require preparation of a small business or
rural distressed areas economic impact statement. The ((business
assistance center)) affected businesses or rural distressed areas
may review an agency determination that a proposed rule will not impose such
costs, and shall advise the joint administrative rules review committee on
disputes involving agency determinations under this section.

(3)
Based upon the extent of disproportionate impact on small business or rural
distressed areas identified in the statement prepared under RCW 19.85.040,
the agency shall, where legal and feasible in meeting the stated objectives of
the statutes upon which the rule is based, reduce the costs imposed by the rule
on small businesses or rural distressed areas. Methods to reduce the
costs on small businesses or rural distressed areas may include:

(a)
Reducing, modifying, or eliminating substantive regulatory requirements;

(b)
Simplifying, reducing, or eliminating recordkeeping and reporting requirements;

(c)
Reducing the frequency of inspections;

(d)
Delaying compliance timetables;

(e)
Reducing or modifying fine schedules for noncompliance; or

(f)
Any other mitigation techniques.

Sec.
13. RCW
19.85.040 and 1995 c 403 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A small business or rural distressed areas economic impact statement
must include a brief description of the reporting, recordkeeping, and other
compliance requirements of the proposed rule, and the kinds of professional
services that a small business or rural distressed areas is likely to
need in order to comply with such requirements. It shall analyze the costs of
compliance for businesses or rural distressed areas required to comply
with the proposed rule adopted pursuant to RCW 34.05.320, including costs of
equipment, supplies, labor, and increased administrative costs. It shall
consider, based on input received, whether compliance with the rule will cause
businesses or rural distressed areas to lose sales or revenue. To
determine whether the proposed rule will have a disproportionate impact on
small businesses or rural distressed areas, the impact statement must
compare the cost of compliance for small business or rural distressed areas
with the cost of compliance for the ten percent of businesses or rural
distressed areas that are the largest businesses or rural distressed
areas required to comply with the proposed rules using one or more of the
following as a basis for comparing costs:

(a)
Cost per employee;

(b)
Cost per hour of labor; or

(c)
Cost per one hundred dollars of sales.

(2)
A small business or rural distressed areas economic impact statement
must also include:

(a)
A statement of the steps taken by the agency to reduce the costs of the rule on
small businesses or rural distressed areas as required by RCW
19.85.030(3), or reasonable justification for not doing so, addressing the
options listed in RCW 19.85.030(3);

(b)
A description of how the agency will involve small businesses and rural
distressed areas in the development of the rule; and

(c)
A list of industries or rural distressed areas that will be required to
comply with the rule. However, this subsection (2)(c) shall not be construed
to preclude application of the rule to any business ((or)), industry,
or rural distressed areas to which it would otherwise apply.

(3)
To obtain information for purposes of this section, an agency may survey a
representative sample of affected businesses ((or)), trade
associations, and rural distressed areas and should, whenever possible,
appoint a committee under RCW 34.05.310(2) to assist in the accurate assessment
of the costs of a proposed rule, and the means to reduce the costs imposed on
small business and rural distressed areas.

Sec.
14. RCW
19.85.050 and 1989 c 175 s 74 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Within one year after ((June 10, 1982)) the effective date of this
act, each agency shall publish and deliver to the office of financial
management and to all persons who make requests of the agency for a copy of a
plan to periodically review all rules then in effect and which have been issued
by the agency which have an economic impact on more than twenty percent of all
industries or ten percent of the businesses in any one industry or
significant number of rural distressed areas. Such plan may be amended by
the agency at any time by publishing a revision to the review plan and
delivering such revised plan to the office of financial management and to all
persons who make requests of the agency for the plan. The purpose of the review
is to determine whether such rules should be continued without change or should
be amended or rescinded, consistent with the stated objectives of applicable
statutes, to minimize the economic impact on small businesses or rural
distressed areas as described by this chapter. The plan shall provide for
the review of all such agency rules in effect on ((June 10, 1982)) the
effective date of this act, within ten years of that date.

(2)
In reviewing rules to minimize any significant economic impact of the rule on
small businesses or rural distressed areas as described by this chapter,
and in a manner consistent with the stated objectives of applicable statutes,
the agency shall consider the following factors:

(a)
The continued need for the rule;

(b)
The nature of complaints or comments received concerning the rule from the
public;

(c)
The complexity of the rule;

(d)
The extent to which the rule overlaps, duplicates, or conflicts with other
state or federal rules, and, to the extent feasible, with local governmental
rules; and

(e)
The degree to which technology, economic conditions, or other factors have
changed in the subject area affected by the rule.

(3)
Each year each agency shall publish a list of rules which are to be reviewed
pursuant to this section during the next twelve months and deliver a copy of
the list to the office of financial management and all persons who make
requests of the agency for the list. The list shall include a brief
description of the legal basis for each rule as described by RCW 34.05.360, and
shall invite public comment upon the rule.

Sec.
15. RCW
19.85.070 and 1992 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

When
any rule is proposed for which a small business or rural distressed areas
economic impact statement is required, the adopting agency shall provide notice
to small businesses and rural distressed areas of the proposed rule
through any of the following:

(1)
Direct notification of known interested small businesses ((or)),
trade organizations, and rural distressed areas affected by the proposed
rule; or

(2)
Providing information of the proposed rule making to publications likely to be
obtained by small businesses and the legislative authority of rural
distressed areas of the types affected by the proposed rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. A
new section is added to chapter 19.85 RCW to read as follows:

The
office of business assistance and recruitment for rural distressed areas is
authorized to:

(1)
Petition state agencies for regulatory relief for businesses or other entities
in rural distressed areas that encounter regulatory problems;

(2)
Designate a lead state agency when businesses or other entities in a rural
enterprise zone are encountering conflicting or confusing regulatory
requirements from more than one state agency; and

(3)
Direct a state regulatory agency or agencies to accelerate a permitting,
zoning, or regulatory requirement according to the requirements outlined in
section 3(3) of this act.

PART
IV

EVALUATION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17.
REVIEW AND EVALUATION. The joint legislative audit and review committee shall
design an evaluation mechanism for economically distressed counties under this
act and undertake an evaluation of this act's effectiveness by November 1,
2003. The agencies implementing the programs under this act shall assist the
joint legislative audit and review committee evaluation.

PART
V

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding
does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application
to the agencies concerned. The rules under this act shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19.
Section captions and part headings used in this act are not any part of the
law.

---
END ---