BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the following project loans recommended by the
public works board are authorized to be made with funds previously appropriated
from the public works assistance account:

(1)
Alderwood Water DistrictCdomestic
water projectCcover existing reservoir,
make structural improvements to conform with current seismic standards.............................................. $3,420,060

(2)
Annapolis Water DistrictCdomestic
water projectCreplace asbestos cement and
lead joint cast iron mains with approximately 5,000 lineal feet of 8-inch water
main, and 1,900 lineal feet of water service line $524,250

(3)
City of AuburnCdomestic
water projectCconstruct corrosion control
facilities on Coal Creek Springs and Well #2........... $3,850,000

(4)
City of BuckleyCdomestic
water projectCreplace approximately two
miles of various sized transmission lines, and stabilization of slope adjacent
to the pipeline. The method of stabilization will be based on engineering
report and recommendations............................... $500,000

(5)
City of BurlingtonCsanitary
sewer projectCmodification of wastewater
treatment plant to include replacement of aging equipment, expand the effluent
pump station, add ultraviolet-light effluent disinfection, anaerobic digestion
of waste sludge, and an outfall pipe to the Skagit River.................................................... $556,875

(6)
City of CamasCsanitary sewer projectCdesign and construct wastewater treatment plant
improvements, including repair and replacement of main raw sewage lift station,
construct headworks facility primary clarifiers, activated sludge basins,
ultraviolet disinfection, laboratory, and modifications to the sludge handling
facilities ....... $3,452,590

(7)
Chelan River Irrigation DistrictCdomestic
water projectCconstruct new domestic water
system including 17,900 lineal feet of 8-inch diameter distribution main,
service connections, meters, a 200-gpm duplex booster pump station, and a
117,000 gallon reservoir

....................................................... $1,553,989

(8)Clark
Public UtilitiesCdomestic
water projectCimprove five water storage
tanks. Improvements include safety improvements, interior and exterior lining,
coating, patching, ladders, inspection, and testing

......................................................... $387,485

(9)
Cowlitz CountyCsanitary
sewer projectCimprove regional collection
system, pump station, force mains, central wastewater treatment plant, and
solids stream work..................................... $7,000,000

(10)
City of Des MoinesCstorm
sewer projectCreplace Marine View Drive
Bridge and Culvert..................................... $2,349,500

(11)
City of DuPontCsanitary
sewer projectCreplace deteriorated water
and sewer systems, including lines, booster pumps, relocation of the water
distribution system, and possible connection of the sanitary sewer system to
Pierce County's system.............................. $1,451,968

(12)
City of Federal WayCstorm
sewer projectCimprove Sea-Tac Mall Area
Drainage System. Improvements will include storage system, water quality
treatment, and conveyance system....................... $2,750,000

(13)
City of GoldendaleCdomestic
water projectCreplace water source with a
well, fence watershed and install over 16,000 lineal feet of water line to
storage facility....................................... $1,213,000

(14)
City of GrandviewCdomestic
water projectCreplace four shallow wells
with three new deep aquifer wells, including video inspections, testing, new
pumps, pumphouses with security, appurtenances, piping, and chlorination
equipment and controls...................... $539,000

(15)
City of Kettle FallsCdomestic
water projectCconstruct a two-million
gallon reservoir, install 2,000 lineal feet of 18-inch transmission main, and
acquire a new auxiliary power generator

....................................................... $1,651,539

(16)
King County Water District #111Cdomestic
water projectCconstruct piping, pump
stations, meters, and source facilities for the water supply intertie between
the City of Auburn, King County Water District #111, and Covington Water
District............................... $1,850,613

(17)
King County Water District No. 54Cdomestic
water projectCdesign and construct a ground-level
650,000-gallon water reservoir, drill new well, and water pumping and
transmission facilities to lift water from reservoir to 250,000-gallon spheroid............................. $1,116,240

(18)
Kitsap County Sewer District No. 5Csanitary
sewer projectCreplace approximately 4,800
lineal feet of 8-inch sewer main and 4,750 lineal feet of 4-inch side sewer................................... $1,119,600

(19)
Kitsap County Sewer District No. 5Csanitary
sewer projectCupgrade Port Orchard pump
station with replacement of approximately 1,650 lineal feet of sewer force main............................... $1,117,350

(20)
City of LaceyCroad projectCconstruct a one-way couplet, which includes class II
bicycle facilities, bus shelters, extension of Lacey Boulevard from Golf Club
Road across Burlington Northern Railroad, connecting to Pacific Avenue near
Selma Street, appropriate signals, overlay, and restriping................................ $1,610,000

(21)
City of LeavenworthCsanitary
sewer projectCconstruct a regional
cocomposting facility in Chelan County to stabilize sewage sludge generated at
wastewater treatment plants throughout the county

......................................................... $735,461

(22)
City of MoxeeCsanitary sewer projectCupgrade the city's wastewater treatment facility by
installing disinfection system improvements, an effluent composite sampler,
replacing clarifier mechanism, add sludge-drying beds, and a lift station pump
to the headworks.... $439,650

(23)
Town of NachesCsanitary
sewer projectCimprove wastewater system by
installing influent and effluent samplers, replace and reconfigure oxidation
ditch effluent pumps, add sludge-drying beds, and replace bar screens.................................................. $535,500

(24)
North Perry Avenue Water DistrictCdomestic
water projectCinstall 6, 8, and 12-inch
water mains in pressure zones 315 and 345, and construct a booster pump system
in pressure zone 490............... $1,070,757

(25)
City of PalouseCdomestic
water projectCdrilling and completing a
500-foot ground water for use as an emergency backup well. Also includes
approximately 600 feet of 8-inch C900 PVC force main, an access road to the
well house, replacement of approximately 1,000 lineal feet of 4-inch water line
with 8-inch C900 PVC water, and a liquid sodium hypochlorite disinfection
system...................................... $237,899

(26)
City of PaterosCsanitary
sewer projectCreplace existing sewer
treatment plant, which will include headworks, aeration basin and clarifier,
upgrade of existing disinfection system, replacement of existing sludge
dewatering facilities, and plant electrical upgrade

......................................................... $505,000

(27)
City of Port TownsendCsanitary
sewer projectCreplace approximately 7,800
lineal feet of an existing 18-inch trunk sewer line and approximately 1,400
lineal feet of 15-inch trunk sewer line with new 30-inch and 18-inch sewer
lines and replacement of the Gaines Street Lift Station................................................ $1,593,739

(28)
PUD No. 1 of Chelan CountyCdomestic
water projectCconstruct a new booster pump
station with the 1096 Pressure Zone to pump up to the 1395 Pressure Zone............................................ $608,400

(29)
City of PullmanCdomestic
water projectCconstruct a domestic water
well located in the north intermediate Pressure Zone of the city

......................................................... $622,534

(30)
City of Rock IslandCdomestic
water projectCconstruction of a new
4-million gallon steel reservoir, which consists of site grading and
development, installation of a welded steel reservoir, connection to the city
transmission system, and telemetry system for Wells #2 and #3 $492,800

(31)
Scatchet Head Water DistrictCdomestic
water projectCinstall an ozone treatment
plant to eliminate bacteriological contamination and remove iron and manganese
from the water. Also, add a dedicated well supply line and new booster pump
station to the Guemes Avenue standpipe.. $365,640

(32)
City of SelahCsanitary sewer projectCreplace the chlorine disinfection system with an
ultraviolet process, install a belt filter press, and construct a pretreatment
clarifier.......... $2,261,000

(33)
Silver Lake Water DistrictCdomestic
water projectCprovide a new point of water
delivery and necessary facilities to the Silver Lake Water District. Project
would add a new 8.5-mile transmission pipeline of 42-inch diameter, pump
station with a capacity of 45.6 mgd to divert water from the existing Everett
pipeline #5, a new 24-million gallon reservoir, and new water mains.................................... $6,208,160

(34)
City of South BendCdomestic
water projectCreplace water treatment system
with a membrane filtration plant. Project includes installation of two
membrane filtration treatment "mega modules," piping modifications,
installation of controls and telemetry, standby generator, safety equipment,
site work, and a new building................. $889,700

(35)
PUD No. 1 of Stevens CountyCdomestic
water projectCreplace the current Stone
Lodge water system, with 7,900 lineal feet of 6-inch water pipe, install
twenty-eight water meters, four 6-inch fire hydrants, replace forty-six 1-inch
service connections, and eliminate five dead-end lines.................................................... $130,550

(36)
Terrace Heights Sewer DistrictCsanitary
sewer projectCupgrade pipe connecting the
district to the City of Yakima Regional Wastewater treatment facility, with
approximately 8,000 lineal feet of concrete sewer main..................................................... $610,470

(37)
Vashon Sewer DistrictCsanitary
sewer projectCrehabilitate and construct
improvements to wastewater treatment facility. Project includes the
replacement of existing oxidation ditch with sequencing batch reactors,
construction of an ultraviolet disinfection system, a 20,000 gallon sludge
storage tank, and an equipment building to house the sludge press with related
equipment and storage for dewatered sludge $2,150,000

(38)
City of Walla WallaCsanitary
sewer projectCrehabilitation of city's
wastewater treatment plant. Project consists of improvements to filtration
plant, biosolids handling equipment, and reclamation improvements........................................... $7,000,000

(39)
Willapa Valley Water DistrictCdomestic
water projectCinstall new filtration plant
and alterations to other related systems $420,000

(40)
City of WoodlandCsanitary
sewer projectCinstall variable speed
drives, primary and secondary clarifiers, replacement of the existing
disinfection system, digesters, biosolids handling equipment, and other
ancillary improvements................................. $4,271,760

(41)
Yakima CountyCbridge projectCproject consists of design, right of way acquisition,
demolition, and reconstruction of 18 bridges on county roads that span from 25
feet to 150 feet in length, including roadway approaches, guardrails, drainage
facilities, and other miscellaneous items relative to the project................................ $5,000,000

(42)
Yakima CountyCroad projectCproject includes design right of way acquisition,
reconstruction, and paving of gravel roads throughout the county, this includes
asphalt and concrete paving, curbs, gutters, sidewalks, drainage facilities,
traffic control signs, irrigation crossings, illumination, excavation,
embankments, and other miscellaneous items relative to the project.......................... $2,000,000

Total................................................. $76,163,079

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of twenty-six million five hundred twenty-one thousand six hundred
eighty-eight dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the public works assistance account
to the department of community, trade, and economic development for project
loans recommended by the public works board and previously approved by the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---