BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that preparing future teachers is critical to the well-being
of our state. An essential component of teacher preparation is the opportunity
for students in teacher preparation programs to learn from experienced
classroom teachers. These cooperating teachers are able to provide advice and
counsel based on the many lessons they have learned from their experience in
the classroom.

The
legislature recognizes the importance of actual classroom experience in the
training of new teachers, and therefore intends to provide an incentive to
exceptional, experienced teachers to guide student teachers' classroom‑based
student teaching experiences.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
"Cooperating teacher" means a teacher who:

(a)
Holds a continuing or professional certificate and supervises and mentors a
student teacher in a public school;

(b)
Is an excellent teacher based on the teacher's evaluations pursuant to RCW
28A.405.100;

(c)
Has at least four school years of teaching experience; and

(d)
Holds high expectations for students and demonstrates the ability to help
students achieve at high levels and meet or exceed any academic standards
adopted by the school district and the state.

(2)
"Student teacher" means a candidate for initial or residency teacher
certification who is in a state board of education-approved teacher preparation
program in a public or private institution of higher education in Washington,
and who is student teaching in a public school.

(3)
"Student teaching" means a field experience lasting a minimum of
approximately a full academic quarter during which the student teacher
participates in instructional activities and assumes both part-time and
full-time teaching responsibilities under the supervision of the cooperating
teacher. Student teaching does not mean field experiences that are limited to
opportunities for observation, tutoring, microteaching, extended practicums,
and clinical and laboratory experiences that do not fall within the meaning of
student teaching.

(4) If funding to pay stipends to cooperating teachers is provided
in the omnibus appropriations act, the amount of the stipend shall be adjusted
to conform with any budget proviso and funding for the stipends shall be
provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to the
school district that employs the cooperating teacher or to the educational
service district to which the district belongs, as appropriate. The school
district or educational service district shall pay the full amount of the
stipend to the cooperating teacher. Any funds provided through the omnibus
appropriations act for stipends shall supplement and not supplant stipends and
other forms of monetary assistance provided to cooperating teachers during the
previous academic year by institutions of higher education with approved
teacher preparation programs. The institution of higher education shall use,
at a minimum, the base year funding amounts to directly support cooperating
teachers. The support may include, in combination or separately, higher
stipends, material and supplies, and tuition assistance or academic
scholarships.

---
END ---