BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
2.08.065 and 1996 c 208 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be in the county of Grant, two judges of the superior court; in the
county of Okanogan, ((one)) two judges of the superior
court; in the county of Mason, two judges of the superior court; in the county
of Thurston, eight judges of the superior court; in the counties of Pacific and
Wahkiakum jointly, one judge of the superior court; in the counties of Ferry, Pend
Oreille, and Stevens jointly, two judges of the superior court; and in the
counties of San Juan and Island jointly, two judges of the superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act is effective only
if Okanogan county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents
its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out
of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the
existing and additional judicial positions as provided by state law or the
state Constitution.

---
END ---