BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
2.06.020 and 1993 c 420 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
court shall have three divisions, one of which shall be headquartered in
Seattle, one of which shall be headquartered in Spokane, and one of which shall
be headquartered in Tacoma:

(1)
The first division shall have twelve judges from three districts, as follows:

(a)
District 1 shall consist of King county and shall have eight judges;

(b)
District 2 shall consist of Snohomish county and shall have two judges; and

(c)
District 3 shall consist of Island, San Juan, Skagit and Whatcom counties and
shall have two judges.

(2)
The second division shall have ((six)) seven judges from the
following districts:

(a)
District 1 shall consist of Pierce county and shall have ((two)) three
judges;

(b)
District 2 shall consist of Clallam, Grays Harbor, Jefferson, Kitsap, Mason,
and Thurston counties and shall have two judges;

(c)
District 3 shall consist of Clark, Cowlitz, Lewis, Pacific, Skamania, and
Wahkiakum counties and shall have two judges.

(3)
The third division shall have five judges from the following districts:

(a)
District 1 shall consist of Ferry, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend Oreille, Spokane and
Stevens counties and shall have two judges;

(b)
District 2 shall consist of Adams, Asotin, Benton, Columbia, Franklin,
Garfield, Grant, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and shall have one judge;

(c)
District 3 shall consist of Chelan, Douglas, Kittitas, Klickitat and Yakima
counties and shall have two judges.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 2.06 RCW to read as follows:

The
new judicial position for the second division, district 1, Pierce county,
created pursuant to the 1999 amendment to RCW 2.06.020 shall become effective
July 1, 2000, and shall be filled by gubernatorial appointment.

The person appointed by the governor shall hold office until the
general election to be held in November 2000. At the general election, the
judge appointed shall be entitled to run for a term of six years or until the
second Monday in January 2007, and until a successor is elected and qualified.
Thereafter, the judge shall be elected for a term of six years and until a
successor is elected and qualified, commencing with the second Monday in
January succeeding the election.

---
END ---