BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.86A.050 and 1994 c 81 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
city of the first or second class may by ordinance create a parking commission
for the purpose of establishing and operating off-street parking facilities.

Such
parking commission shall consist of at least five members appointed by
the mayor and confirmed by the city council, who shall serve without
compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses. One member of the
parking commission shall be selected from among persons actively engaged in the
private parking industry, if available.

Three
of those first appointed shall be designated to serve for one, two, and three
years respectively, and two shall be designated to serve four years. The terms
for all subsequently appointed members shall be four years. In event of any
vacancy, the mayor, subject to confirmation of the city council, shall make
appointments to fill the unexpired portion of the term.

A
member may be reappointed, and shall hold office until his or her successor has
been appointed and has qualified. Members may be removed by the mayor upon
consent of the city council.

Sec.
2. RCW
35.86A.060 and 1969 ex.s. c 204 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
parking commission shall select from its members a chairman, and may establish
its own rules, regulations and procedures not inconsistent with this chapter.
No resolution shall be adopted by the parking commission except upon the
concurrence of ((at least three members)) a majority of the parking
commission.

Sec.
3. RCW
35.86A.070 and 1980 c 127 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
parking commission is authorized and empowered, in the name of the municipality
by resolution to:

(1)
Own and acquire property and property rights by purchase, gift, devise, or
lease for the construction, maintenance, or operation of off-street parking
facilities, or for effectuating the purpose of this chapter; and accept
grants-in-aid, including compliance with conditions attached thereto;

(2)
Construct, maintain, and operate off-street parking facilities located on land
dedicated for park or civic center purposes, or on other municipally-owned land
where the primary purpose of such off-street parking facility is to provide
parking for persons who use such park or civic center facilities, and undertake
research, and prepare plans incidental thereto subject to applicable statutes
and charter provisions for municipal purchases, expenditures, and improvements;
and in addition may own other off-street parking facilities and operate them in
accordance with RCW 35.86A.120: PROVIDED, That the provisions of chapter 35.86
RCW as now or hereafter amended shall not apply to such construction, operation
or maintenance;

(3)
Establish and collect parking fees, require that receipts be provided for
parking fees, make exemption for handicapped persons, lease space for
commercial, store, advertising or automobile accessory purposes, and regulate
prices and service charges, for use of and within and the aerial space over
parking facilities under its control;

(4)
Subject to applicable city civil service provisions, provide for the
appointment, removal and control of officers and employees, and prescribe their
duties and compensation, and to control all equipment and property under the
commission's jurisdiction;

(5)
Contract with private persons and organizations for the management and/or
operation of parking facilities under its control, and services related
thereto, including leasing of such facilities or portions thereof;

(6)
Cause construction of parking facilities as a condition of an operating
agreement or lease, derived through competitive bidding, or in the manner
authorized by chapter 35.42 RCW;

(7)
Execute and accept instruments, including deeds, necessary or convenient for
the carrying on of its business; acquire rights to develop parking facilities
over or under city property; and to contract to operate and manage parking
facilities under the jurisdiction of other city departments or divisions and of
other public bodies;

(8)
Determine the need for and recommend to the city council:

(a)
The establishment of local improvement districts to pay the cost of parking
facilities or any part thereof;

(b)
The issuance of bonds or other financing by the city for construction of
parking facilities;

(c)
The acquisition of property and property rights by condemnation from the
public, or in street areas;

(9)
Transfer its control of property to the city and liquidate its affairs, so long
as such transfer does not contravene any covenant or agreement made with the
holders of bonds or other creditors; and

(10)
Require payment of the excise tax hereinafter provided.

Parking
fees for parking facilities under the control of the parking commission shall
be maintained commensurate with and ((neither higher nor)) not
lower than prevailing rates for parking charged by commercial operators in the
general area.

Sec.
4. RCW
35.86A.120 and 1980 c 127 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Except for off-street parking facilities situated on real
property leased or rented to a city and not used for park and civic center
parking,)) Cities may operate off-street parking facilities with
city forces. Leased or rented off-street parking facilities shall be operated
by responsible, experienced private operators of such facilities. The call for
bids shall specify the terms and conditions under which the facility will be
leased for private operation. The call for bids shall specify the time and
place at which the bids will be received and the time and when the same will be
opened, and such call shall be advertised once a week for two successive weeks
before the time fixed for the filing of bids in a newspaper of general
circulation in the city. If no bid is received for the operation of such an
off-street parking facility, or if the bids received are not satisfactory, the
legislative body of the city may reject such bids and shall readvertise the
facility for lease. In the event that no bids or no satisfactory bids shall
have been received following the second advertising, the city may negotiate
with a private operator for the operation of the facility without competitive
bidding. In the event the city shall be unable to negotiate for satisfactory
private operation within a reasonable time, the city may operate the facility
for a period not to exceed three years, at which time it shall readvertise as
provided above in this section.

---
END ---