BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1)
RCW 43.22.200 and 1994 c 164 s 8, 1973 1st ex.s. c 52 s 5, & 1965 c 8 s
43.22.200; and

(2) RCW 43.22.210 and 1994 c 164 s 9, 1989 c
12 s 14, 1973 1st ex.s. c 52 s 6, & 1965 c 8 s 43.22.210.

---
END ---