BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Subject to this section, in addition to members eligible to retire under RCW
41.40.180, any member of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 who
meets the following criteria may retire after providing written notification to
the member's employer and submitting the required application to the director
on a form provided by the department:

(1)
The member is employed by an employer in an eligible position on March 1,
1999. Eligible positions are those positions within job titles designated by
the agency director to be permanently abolished, subject to approval by the
director of financial management. If the number of applicants serving in a
designated job title exceeds the number of targeted eligible positions,
inclusion in this early retirement program is based on seniority.

(2)(a)
A member eligible under subsection (1) of this section must file an application
between June 15, 1999, and August 31, 1999, with an effective date of
retirement on or before September 30, 1999.

(b)
In addition to any other years of creditable service, for every five years of
actual service the member may be granted credit for one additional year of
service. Under no circumstances may more than thirty years of service credit
be established.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act is added to chapter 41.40 RCW, but because of its
temporary nature, shall not be codified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. In
order to ensure that the state derives the expected benefits from the early
retirement provisions of this act, no state agency may hire persons who retire
from service under the provisions of this act as temporary or project
employees, as defined by the Washington personnel resources board for employees
covered under chapter 41.06 RCW. Exceptions to this section may be granted by
written approval from the director of financial management if the director
finds that the temporary or project employment of a retiree is necessary to
protect the public safety, protect against the loss of federal certification or
loss of critical federal funds, or carry out functions so essential to the
agency that even temporary suspension or delay of services would have a significant
negative impact on the public. At the end of each three-month period in which
exceptions are approved, the director shall forward a copy of any approvals,
together with justification for the exceptions, to the fiscal committees of the
legislature. Each forwarded approval shall include the name of the temporary
or project employee, the agency and division or department requesting the
employment, duration and cost of the proposed employment, and specific
functions and duties to be carried out during the employment. This section
expires June 30, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Section 3 of this act is added to chapter 43.01 RCW, but because of its
temporary nature, shall not be codified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. In
order to ensure that the state derives the expected benefits from the early
retirement provisions of this act, no state agency may engage through personal
service contracts persons who retire from service under the provisions of this
act. Exceptions to this section may be granted by written approval from the
director of the office of financial management if the director finds that the
proposed contract is necessary to protect the public safety, protect against
the loss of federal certification or loss of critical federal funds, or carry
out functions so essential to the agency that even temporary suspension or
delay of services would have a significant negative impact on the public. At
the end of each three-month period in which exceptions are approved, the
director shall forward a copy of any approvals, together with justification for
the exceptions, to the fiscal committees of the legislature. Each forwarded
approval shall include the name of the proposed contractor, the agency and division
or department requesting the contract, duration and cost of the proposed
contract, and specific functions and duties to be carried out under the
contract. This section expires June 30, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Section
5 of this act is added to chapter 39.29 RCW, but because of its temporary
nature, shall not be codified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---