BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Trappers licensed under RCW 77.32.010 shall not use leghold traps. The
director shall adopt rules to implement this section.

(2)
For purposes of this section, "leghold trap" means a spring-powered
trap, featuring two metal jaws that clap shut on an animal's leg when the
animal steps on a weight-sensitive trigger. These traps are known as: Steel
leghold traps; steel-jawed traps; leghold traps; foothold traps; long-spring
traps; coilspring traps; underspring or jump traps; and guarded or stop-loss
traps.

Sec.
2. RCW
77.12.040 and 1987 c 506 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as provided in section 1 of this act, the commission shall adopt, amend, or
repeal, and enforce reasonable rules prohibiting or governing the time, place,
and manner of taking or possessing game animals, game birds, or game fish. The
commission may specify the quantities, species, sex, and size of game animals,
game birds, or game fish that may be taken or possessed. The commission shall
regulate the taking, sale, possession, and distribution of wildlife and
deleterious exotic wildlife. The director may adopt emergency rules under RCW
77.12.150.

The
commission may establish by rule game reserves and closed areas where hunting
for wild animals or wild birds may be prohibited and closed waters where
fishing for game fish may be prohibited.

Sec.
3. RCW
77.32.191 and 1991 sp.s. c 7 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A
state trapping license allows the holder to trap fur-bearing animals throughout
the state; however, a trapper may not place traps on private property without written
permission of the owner, lessee, or tenant ((where the land is improved and
apparently used, or where the land is fenced or enclosed in a manner designed
to exclude intruders or to indicate a property boundary line, or where notice
is given by posting in a conspicuous manner)). A state trapping license is
void on April 1st following the date of issuance. The fee for this license is
thirty-six dollars for residents sixteen years of age or older, fifteen dollars
for residents under sixteen years of age, and one hundred eighty dollars for
nonresidents.

Sec.
4. RCW
77.32.197 and 1987 c 506 s 82 are each amended to read as follows:

Persons
purchasing a state trapping license for the first time shall present
certification of completion of a course of instruction in safe, humane, and
proper trapping techniques or pass an examination to establish that the
applicant has the requisite knowledge.

The director shall establish a program for training persons in
trapping techniques and responsibilities, ((including)) emphasizing
the use of trapping devices designed to painlessly capture or instantly kill.
The director shall cooperate with national and state animal, humane, hunter
education, and trapping organizations in the development of a curriculum. Upon
successful completion of the course, trainees shall receive a trapper's
training certificate signed by an authorized instructor. This certificate is
evidence of compliance with this section.

---
END ---