BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Research has shown that interventions designed to deter juvenile violence and
delinquency are cost-effective and compare favorably with the cost of
detention. The legislature intends to develop a grant program to fund
research-based prevention and early intervention programs targeting youth and
their families who have not yet entered the juvenile justice system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The governor's juvenile justice advisory committee shall administer the grant
program created under this chapter.

(2)
All grant applications shall:

(a)
Identify the program or proposed program;

(b)
Identify the entity or organization proposing the program. Eligible
organizations include, but are not limited to, nonprofit, civic, and charitable
organizations, local governments, tribes, and community networks;

(c)
Include a plan for expenditure of the funds, including specifying what
percentage of the grant will be spent on administration and evaluation costs;
and

(d)
Include a plan to analyze the effectiveness of the program.

(3)
A program is eligible for a grant under this section only if the program:

(a)
Is designed to reduce conditions associated with the entry of youth into the
juvenile justice system;

(b)
Is a new program or replicates in another location an existing program that
meets the criteria of this chapter;

(c)
Is based on research that supports the program's effectiveness in reducing the
targeted population's risk for delinquency;

(d)
Has community support and is community-based;

(e)
Will be used for prevention of juvenile crime and not as a disposition or
confinement option for adjudicated or diverted juvenile offenders. This
restriction shall not preclude serving juveniles who have been adjudicated or
diverted prior to participation in the program or who are diverted or
adjudicated during participation in the program; and

(f)
Is in addition to any other state or locally funded juvenile violence
deterrence program and will not supplant existing federal, state, or local funds.

(4)
To encourage local ownership of youth violence deterrence programs, grants
awarded by the committee under this section shall:

(a)
Have a duration of up to two years, with renewal options based on the
achievement of outcomes; and

(b)
Not exceed more than seventy-five percent of the total estimated cost of a
program. Entities or organizations applying for grants under this section must
demonstrate that at least twenty-five percent of the cost of the program will
be funded from nonstate moneys.

(5)
To encourage grant applications, the committee shall simplify the grant
application process to the greatest extent possible.

(6)
The committee may require that a percentage of the expenditures for a grant be
spent to evaluate the program's effectiveness. The committee may also require
that the evaluation be conducted by individuals or organizations that are not
participating in the program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) A
review team is established to make recommendations to the governor's juvenile
justice advisory committee on the funding of grants under this chapter.

(2)
The review team shall consist of no more than fifteen persons appointed by the
committee. Appointees must represent the state's geographic and cultural
diversity and have demonstrated an interest in juvenile violence and its
prevention. The review team shall include representatives from entities that
disperse funds targeted at youth, including, but not limited to, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, the office of crime victims advocacy,
the family policy council, the department of health, the juvenile court
administration, the Washington council for the prevention of child abuse and
neglect, and the division of alcohol and substance abuse within the department
of social and health services.

(3)
Review team members are eligible for reimbursement of expenses under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
sum of five million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the governor's juvenile justice advisory
committee for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, to carry out the purposes
of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act shall be known as the juvenile violence deterrence act of 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 3 and 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 13
RCW.

---
END ---