BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Authorized depository" means a mailbox, post office box, or rural
box used by postal customers to deposit outgoing mail or used by the postal
service to deliver incoming mail.

(2)
"Letter box" means a receptacle that is used for a specific address
intended or used for the receipt or delivery of mail on a mail route.

(3)(a)
"Mail" means a letter, card, parcel, or other material that:

(i)
Is sent or delivered by means of the postal service;

(ii)
Has postage affixed by the postal customer or postal service; and

(iii)
Is placed in an authorized depository or mail receptacle.

(b)
"Mail" includes articles contained in mail.

(4)
"Mail receptacle" means a place used by the postal service or postal
customers to place outgoing mail or receive incoming mail.

(5)
"Postage" means a postal service stamp, permit imprint, meter strip,
or other authorized indication of prepayment for service provided by the postal
service for collection and delivery of mail.

(6)
"Postal service" means the United States postal service.

(7)
The phrase "of another" does not include persons with whom the
defendant has a familial, parental, spousal, employment, or other relationship
that would otherwise reasonably allow the defendant to take, dispose of, or
otherwise intercept the person's mail.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
person commits the crime of obstruction of mail if the person intentionally
obstructs or unreasonably delays:

(a)
The passage of the mail; or

(b)
A carrier or conveyance carrying the mail.

(2)
Obstruction of mail is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) A
person commits the crime of destruction of letter boxes if the person knowingly
and maliciously:

(a)
Tears down or destroys a letter box belonging to another; or

(b)
Breaks open a letter box belonging to another.

(2)
Destruction of letter boxes is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
person commits the crime of destruction of mail if the person knowingly and
maliciously injures, destroys, or defaces mail of another that has been
deposited in an authorized depository.

(2)
Destruction of mail is a class C felony.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) A
person commits the crime of mail theft or receipt of stolen mail if the person
knowingly:

(a)
Takes, or by fraud or deception, obtains mail of another from a mail
receptacle, authorized depository, or mail carrier;

(b)
Secretes, embezzles, or destroys mail of another;

(c)
Takes, or by fraud or deception, obtains mail of another that has been left for
collection on or adjacent to an authorized depository or mail receptacle; or

(d)
Buys, receives, conceals, or unlawfully possesses mail of another knowing that
the mail was taken, obtained, or embezzled as described in this subsection.

(2)
Mail theft or receipt of stolen mail is a class C felony.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. In a
prosecution under this chapter, it is a defense that the defendant acted under
an honest claim of right in that:

(1)
The defendant was unaware that the property was that of another person;

(2)
The defendant reasonably believed that the defendant was entitled to the
property involved or had a right to acquire or dispose of it as the defendant
did; or

(3)
The property involved was that of the defendant's minor child or spouse, unless
the parties were not living together as husband and wife and were residing in,
and intended to continually reside in, separate abodes at the time of the
alleged offense.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 9A RCW.

Sec.
8. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1999 c 352 s 3, 1999 c 322 s 5, and 1999 c 45 s 4 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE
2

CRIMES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic
from Schedule I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18
(RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (((RCW 88.12.029))) (RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW
70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or
V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V
to someone under 18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel
in a reckless manner (((RCW 88.12.029))) (RCW 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver
amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver
heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with intent
to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in
a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of
others (((RCW 88.12.029))) (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW
9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of
others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver
narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam
from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VAbandonment of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for extortionate extension
of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person
eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Pretrial Condition (RCW 10.99.040(4) (b) and (c))

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Sentence Condition (RCW 10.99.050(2))

On and after July 1, 2000: Protection Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Civil Action (RCW 26.50.110 (4) and (5))

On and after July 1, 2000: Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

IVArson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (((RCW 88.12.032))) (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run‑-Injury Accident (RCW 46.52.020(4))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (((RCW
88.12.155(3)))) (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen
(subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver
narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except
marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080
(1) and (2))

Vehicular Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for Controlled
Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver
marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or
Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(1))

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat
of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW
69.53.010)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

IIComputer Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Mail Theft or Receipt of Stolen Mail (section 5
of this act)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of controlled substance that is either
heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at one thousand five hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW
18.130.190(7))

IAttempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW
46.61.024)

Destruction of Mail (section 4 of this act)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW
69.50.403)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine
or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at two hundred fifty dollars or more but less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec.
9. RCW
13.40.0357 and 1998 c 290 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION
AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile juvenile
disposition

disposition category
for attempt,

offense bailjump,
conspiracy,

category description
(rcw citation) or solicitation

........................................

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious
Mischief 3 (<$50 is

E class) (9A.48.090) E

E Tampering
with Fire Alarm

Apparatus (9.40.100) E

A Possession
of Incendiary Device

(9.40.120) B+

Assault
and Other Crimes

Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By
Shooting

(9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless
Endangerment

(9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting
Suicide Attempt

(9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential
Burglary

(9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary
Tools (Possession of)

(9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal
Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle
Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption
of Alcohol

(66.44.270) E

C Illegally
Obtaining Legend Drug

(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale,
Delivery, Possession of Legend

Drug
with Intent to Sell

(69.41.030) D+

E Possession
of Legend Drug

(69.41.030) E

B+ Violation
of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine,
or Flunitrazepam

Sale (69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)) B+

C Violation
of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic Sale

(69.50.401(a)(1)(iii)) C

E Possession
of Marihuana <40 grams

(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently
Obtaining Controlled

Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of
Controlled Substance

for Profit (69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation
of Uniform Controlled

Substances
Act - Narcotic,

Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam

Counterfeit
Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1) (i) or (ii)) B

C Violation
of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Nonnarcotic

Counterfeit
Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1) (iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation
of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Possession of a

Controlled
Substance

(69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation
of Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Possession of a

Controlled
Substance

(69.50.401(c)) C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession
of Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310) C

E Carrying
Loaded Pistol Without

Permit (9.41.050) E

C Possession
of Firearms by Minor (<18)

(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession
of Dangerous Weapon

(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating
Another Person by use

of Weapon (9.41.270) E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful
Imprisonment

(9A.40.040) D+

Obstructing
Governmental Operation

D Obstructing
a Law Enforcement

Officer (9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing
Contraband 1

(9A.76.140) C

C Introducing
Contraband 2

(9A.76.150) D

E Introducing
Contraband 3

(9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating
a Public Servant

(9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating
a Witness

(9A.72.110) C+

Public
Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot
Without Weapon

(9A.84.010) E

E Failure
to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex
Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent
Exposure

(Victim <14) (9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure

(Victim 14 or over) (9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1

(9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting
Prostitution 2

(9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution)
(9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft,
Robbery, Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Mail Theft or Receipt of
Stolen

Mail (section 5 of this act) D

D Destruction of Mail
(section 4

of this act) E

B Possession
of Stolen Property 1

(9A.56.150) C

C Possession
of Stolen Property 2

(9A.56.160) D

D Possession
of Stolen Property 3

(9A.56.170) E

C Taking
Motor Vehicle Without

Owner's Permission (9A.56.070) D

Motor
Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving
Without a License

(46.20.005) E

C Hit and
Run - Injury

(46.52.020(4)) D

D Hit and
Run-Attended

(46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and
Run-Unattended

(46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting
to Elude Pursuing

Police Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving
While Under the Influence

(46.61.502 and 46.61.504) E

Other

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene,
Harassing, Etc.,

Phone Calls (9.61.230) E

A Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult Class A Felony B+

B Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult Class B Felony C

C Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult Class C Felony D

D Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other
Offense Equivalent to an

Adult Misdemeanor E

V Violation
of Order of Restitution,

Community
Supervision, or

Confinement (13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are
classed as C offenses and the standard range is established as follows:

1st
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks confinement

2nd
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd
and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks
confinement

2If the
court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose a
penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders.
The court may select sentencing option A, B, or C.

OPTION A

JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD RANGE

A+ 180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS|WEEKS

EXCEPT | | |

30-40 | | |

WEEKS FOR | | |

15-17 | | |

YEAR OLDS | | |

Current B+ 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

Offense WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL | |52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) |15-36 WEEKS |WEEKS

C+ LS |

|15-36 WEEKS

C LS |15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions: |

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Service

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4 or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE:
References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement.

(1)
The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category. The current
offense category is determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2)
The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included
in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count
as one point. Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor
adjudication shall count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded
down.

(3)
The standard range disposition for each offense is determined by the
intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications and the row
defined by the current offense category.

(4)
RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense.

(5)
A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of
E. However, a disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION
B

CHEMICAL
DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If
the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+
offense, the court may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(((5))) (4)
and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION
C

MANIFEST
INJUSTICE

If the court determines that
a disposition under option A or B would effectuate a manifest injustice, the
court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range under RCW
13.40.160(2).

---
END ---