BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
81.75.020 and 1977 ex.s. c 217 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Through
its council or other legislative body, any city, town, county, public
transportation benefit area authority, or other municipal corporation,
authorized to operate public transportation services, may construct or
otherwise acquire intermodal transportation centers by donation, lease, or
purchase and may ((operate or)) let for purposes of leasing space at
fair market value for the services set forth in RCW 81.75.030(1), and to
perform other functions permitted by law, the centers or portions of the
centers, for public or private purposes or for compensation or rental upon such
conditions as its council or other legislative body shall from time to time
prescribe. The city, town, county, public transportation benefit area
authority, or municipal corporation, may apply for and receive grants from the
federal government for purposes of funding a transportation center and may
consolidate a transportation center with other lawful city or town activities.
A transportation center authorized by this chapter, including all of the
uses permitted by this chapter, must comply with all applicable laws,
ordinances, and regulations.

Sec.
2. RCW
81.75.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 217 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To the extent feasible, the services available to the public at any
transportation center may include taxi, auto rental, passenger trains, motor
buses, travel agents, restrooms, food, telegraph, baggage handling, transfer
and delivery of light freight and packages, commercial airlines, air charter,
place of temporary rest for citizens and travelers (but not overnight), mail,
private auto parking for users of public transportation through the
transportation center, local transit, limousine, ((and any other use
necessary to the foregoing)) commercial retail services, offices,
professional services, financial institutions, and any other use necessary and
convenient for the users of the public transportation system operating at the
transportation center.

(2) Any city, town, county, public transportation benefit
area authority, or municipal corporation, which elects to operate a
transportation center shall operate the center for the general public good.
The operator may establish the terms of usage for the various modes of
transportation and for others that utilize its facilities, may make reasonable
rules concerning public and private use, and may exclude all persons therefrom
who refuse to comply with the terms or rules of use. The operator may own,
operate, maintain, and manage a transportation center, but shall not engage in
providing a transportation or other related service at the center unless
otherwise authorized by law.

---
END ---