BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 39.19 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes that disabled persons contracting independently or
as owners of small businesses may initially lack capital to start a business,
may initially have increased costs for personal care attendants and assistive
technology, and may initially have difficulty competing economically because of
a disability. The legislature further recognizes that these disadvantages
diminish as the business grows in size and as employees become available for
support. Therefore, it is the intent of this chapter to limit participation in
the program established for disabled persons' business enterprises under this
chapter to newly established businesses of small size.

(2)
This chapter shall not apply to disabled persons' business enterprises that:

(a)
Have more than seven employees; or

(b)
Have been certified under this chapter for more than nine years. However, a
business that would be ineligible to participate under this subsection (2)(b)
may, no later than one year after becoming ineligible, petition the office for
one additional period of eligibility not exceeding nine years from the date the
additional period of eligibility is granted. Before extending eligibility, the
office must find that the business continues to experience significant
competitive disadvantages in contracting.

Sec.
2. RCW
39.19.010 and 1987 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that ((minority and women-owned)) businesses owned
and controlled by minorities, women, or disabled persons are significantly
under-represented and have been denied equitable competitive opportunities in
contracting. It is the intent of this chapter to mitigate societal
discrimination and other factors in participating in public works and in
providing goods and services and to delineate a policy that an increased level
of participation by ((minority and women-owned and controlled))
businesses owned and controlled by minorities, women, or disabled persons
is desirable at all levels of state government. The purpose and intent of this
chapter are to provide the maximum practicable opportunity for increased
participation by ((minority and women-owned and controlled)) businesses owned
and controlled by minorities, women, and disabled persons in participating
in public works and the process by which goods and services are procured by
state agencies and educational institutions from the private sector. The
legislature further finds that no court has held that a program which promotes
contracting opportunities for businesses owned and controlled by disabled
persons must be subjected to the strict-scrutiny standard or must be justified
by a disparity study. If a court of proper jurisdiction determines that the
program for disabled persons is subject to the strict-scrutiny standard or must
be justified by a disparity study, the program may be suspended until the
legislature determines a proper course of action.

Sec.
3. RCW
39.19.020 and 1996 c 69 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
(("Advisory committee" means the advisory committee on minority
and women's business enterprises.

(2)))
"Broker" means a person that provides a bona fide service, such as
professional, technical, consultant, brokerage, or managerial services and
assistance in the procurement of essential personnel, facilities, equipment,
materials, or supplies required for performance of a contract.

(((3)))
(2) "Director" means the director of the office of minority ((and)),
women's, and disabled persons' business enterprises.

(3)
"Disabled person" means a person with a physical or mental impairment
that substantially limits a major life activity. The impairment must be
material and medically cognizable or diagnosable. The impairment must also be
permanent in that it is seldom significantly corrected by medical replacement,
therapy, or surgical means. Impairment does not include drug or alcohol
addiction or any negative effects brought on by the use of drugs or alcohol.

(4)
"Educational institutions" means the state universities, the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community colleges.

(5)
"Goals" means annual overall agency goals, expressed as a percentage
of dollar volume, for participation by minority and women-owned and controlled
businesses and shall not be construed as a minimum goal for any particular
contract or for any particular geographical area. It is the intent of this
chapter that such overall agency goals shall be achievable and shall be met on
a contract-by-contract or class-of-contract basis.

(6)
"Goods and/or services" includes professional services and all other
goods and services.

(7)
"Office" means the office of minority ((and)), women's,
and disabled persons' business enterprises.

(8)
"Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives, legal representatives,
trustees and receivers, or any group of persons.

(9)
"Procurement" means the purchase, lease, or rental of any goods or
services.

(10)
"Public works" means all work, construction, highway and ferry
construction, alteration, repair, or improvement other than ordinary
maintenance, which a state agency or educational institution is authorized or
required by law to undertake.

(11) "State agency" includes the state of Washington and
all agencies, departments, offices, divisions, boards, commissions, and
correctional and other types of institutions.

Sec.
4. RCW
39.19.030 and 1996 c 69 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby created the office of minority ((and)), women's, and
disabled persons' business enterprises. The governor shall appoint a
director for the office, subject to confirmation by the senate. The director
may employ a deputy director and a confidential secretary, both of which shall
be exempt under chapter 41.06 RCW, and such staff as are necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter.

The
office ((shall)) may consult with ((the)) a
minority ((and)), women's, and disabled persons' business
enterprises ad hoc advisory committee, established under RCW
39.19.041, to accomplish the purpose stated in this section.

The
office shall:

(1)
Develop, plan, and implement programs to provide an opportunity for
participation by qualified ((minority and women-owned and controlled))
businesses owned and controlled by minorities, women, or disabled persons
in public works and the process by which goods and services are procured by
state agencies and educational institutions from the private sector;

(2)
Develop a comprehensive plan insuring that qualified ((minority and
women-owned and controlled)) businesses owned and controlled by
minorities, women, or disabled persons are provided an opportunity to
participate in public contracts for public works and goods and services;

(3)
Identify barriers to equal participation by qualified ((minority and
women-owned and controlled)) businesses owned and controlled by
minorities, women, or disabled persons in all state agency and educational
institution contracts;

(4)
Establish annual overall goals for participation by qualified minority and
women-owned and controlled businesses for each state agency and educational
institution to be administered on a contract-by-contract basis or on a
class-of-contracts basis;

(5)
Develop and maintain a central minority ((and)), women's, and
disabled persons' business enterprise certification list for all state
agencies and educational institutions. No business is entitled to
certification under this chapter unless it meets the definition of small
business concern as established by the office. All applications for
certification under this chapter shall be sworn under oath;

(6)
Develop, implement, and operate a system of monitoring compliance with this
chapter;

(7)
Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act,
governing: (a) Establishment of agency goals for participation by qualified
businesses owned and controlled by minorities and women; (b) development
and maintenance of a central minority ((and)), women's, and
disabled persons' business enterprise certification program, including a
definition of "small business concern" which shall be consistent with
the small business requirements defined under section 3 of the Small Business
Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 632, and its implementing regulations as guidance; (c)
procedures for monitoring and enforcing compliance with goals, regulations,
contract provisions, and this chapter; (d) utilization of standard clauses by
state agencies and educational institutions, as specified in RCW 39.19.050; and
(e) determination of an agency's or educational institution's goal attainment
consistent with the limitations of RCW 39.19.075;

(8)
Submit an annual report to the governor and the legislature outlining the
progress in implementing this chapter;

(9)
Investigate complaints of violations of this chapter with the assistance of the
involved agency or educational institution; and

(10)
Cooperate and act jointly or by division of labor with the United States or
other states, and with political subdivisions of the state of Washington and
their respective minority, socially and economically disadvantaged ((and)),
women, and disabled persons business enterprise programs to carry out
the purposes of this chapter. However, the power which may be exercised by the
office under this subsection permits investigation and imposition of sanctions
only if the investigation relates to a possible violation of this
chapter ((39.19 RCW)), and not to violation of local ordinances, rules,
regulations, however denominated, adopted by political subdivisions of the
state.

Sec.
5. RCW
39.19.080 and 1987 c 328 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person, firm, corporation, business, union, or other organization shall not:

(a)
Prevent or interfere with a contractor's or subcontractor's compliance with
this chapter, or any rule adopted under this chapter;

(b)
Submit false or fraudulent information to the state concerning compliance with
this chapter or any such rule;

(c)
Fraudulently obtain, retain, attempt to obtain or retain, or aid another in
fraudulently obtaining or retaining or attempting to obtain or retain
certification as a minority ((or)), women's, or disabled
persons' business enterprise for the purpose of this chapter;

(d)
Knowingly make a false statement, whether by affidavit, verified statement,
report, or other representation, to a state official or employee for the
purpose of influencing the certification or denial of certification of any
entity as a minority ((or)), women's, or disabled persons'
business enterprise;

(e)
Knowingly obstruct, impede, or attempt to obstruct or impede any state official
or employee who is investigating the qualification of a business entity that
has requested certification as a minority ((or)), women's, or
disabled persons' business enterprise;

(f)
Fraudulently obtain, attempt to obtain, or aid another person in fraudulently
obtaining or attempting to obtain public moneys to which the person is not
entitled under this chapter; or

(g)
Knowingly make false statements that any entity is or is not certified as a
minority ((or)), women's, or disabled persons' business
enterprise for purposes of obtaining a contract governed by this chapter.

(2)
Any person or entity violating this chapter or any rule adopted under this
chapter shall be subject to the penalties in RCW 39.19.090. Nothing in this
section prevents the state agency or educational institution from pursuing such
procedures or sanctions as are otherwise provided by statute, rule, or contract
provision.

Sec.
6. RCW
39.19.120 and 1987 c 328 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
office shall be the sole authority to perform certification of ((minority
business enterprises, socially and economically disadvantaged business
enterprises, and women's)) business enterprises owned and controlled by
minorities, socially and economically disadvantaged, women, or disabled persons
throughout the state of Washington. Certification by the state office will
allow these firms to participate in programs for these enterprises administered
by the state of Washington, any city, town, county, special purpose district,
public corporation created by the state, municipal corporation, or
quasi-municipal corporation within the state of Washington. The certification
process for businesses owned and controlled by disabled persons will be limited
to eighty applicants per year.

This
state-wide certification process will prevent duplication of effort, achieve
efficiency, and permit local jurisdictions to further develop, implement,
and/or enhance comprehensive systems of monitoring and compliance for contracts
issued by their agencies.

Sec.
7. RCW
39.19.150 and 1987 c 328 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any city, county, town, special purpose district, public corporation created by
the state, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation having reason
to believe that a particular minority ((and)), women's, or
disabled persons' business enterprise should not have been certified under
RCW 39.19.140 may petition the office for reconsideration. The basis for the
petition may be one or more of the following:

(a)
The office's rules or regulations were improperly applied; or

(b)
Material facts relating to the minority ((and)), women's, or
disabled persons' business enterprise's certification application to the
office are untrue.

(2)
The petitioner shall carry the burden of persuasion. The affected minority ((or)),
women's, or disabled persons' business enterprise shall receive notice
of the petition and an opportunity to respond.

(3)
After reviewing the information presented in support of and in opposition to
the petition, the office shall issue a written decision, granting or denying
the petition. If the office grants the petition, it may revoke, suspend, or
refuse to renew the certification or impose sanctions under this chapter as
appropriate.

(4)
The office's decision on a petition is administratively final and the rights of
appeal set out in the office regulations shall apply. A certification shall
remain in effect while a petition is pending.

Sec.
8. RCW
39.19.170 and 1993 c 512 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
State agencies shall not require a performance bond for any public works
project that does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars awarded to a
prequalified and certified ((minority or woman-owned)) business owned
and controlled by minorities, women, or disabled persons that has been
prequalified as provided under subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
A limited prequalification questionnaire shall be required assuring:

(a)
That the bidder has adequate financial resources or the ability to secure such
resources;

(b)
That the bidder can meet the performance schedule;

(c)
That the bidder is experienced in the type of work to be performed; and

(d)
That all equipment to be used is adequate and functioning and that all
equipment operators are qualified to operate such equipment.

Sec.
9. RCW
39.19.200 and 1993 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
minority ((and)), women's, and disabled persons' business
enterprises account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts
from RCW 39.19.210, 39.19.220, and 39.19.230 shall be deposited in the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes
defraying all or part of the costs of the office in administering this
chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding
does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application
to the agencies concerned. The rules under this act shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. A
new section is added to chapter 39.19 RCW to read as follows:

The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed, effective June 30, 2004:

(1)
Section 1, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 1 of this act);

(2)
Section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 2 of this act);

(3)
Section 3, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 3 of this act);

(4)
Section 4, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 4 of this act);

(5)
Section 5, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 5 of this act);

(6)
Section 6, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 6 of this act);

(7)
Section 7, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 7 of this act);

(8)
Section 8, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 8 of this act); and

(9)
Section 9, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 9 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---