BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW to read as follows:

Within
one month after the end of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall
determine: (1) The amount of revenue credited to the general fund under this
chapter for the fiscal year that just ended; and (2) the average annual amount
of revenue credited to the general fund under this chapter for the six most
recent fiscal years. When determining these amounts the state treasurer shall
disregard any transfers made under this section. If the amount determined
under subsection (1) of this section exceeds the average determined under subsection
(2) of this section, the state treasurer shall transfer an amount equal to that
excess from the general fund to the common school fund.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.45.180 and 1998 c 106 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For taxes collected by the county under this chapter, the county treasurer
shall collect a two-dollar fee on all transactions required by this chapter
where the transaction does not require the payment of tax. A total of two
dollars shall be collected in the form of a tax and fee, where the calculated
tax payment is less than two dollars. The county treasurer shall place one
percent of the proceeds of the tax imposed by this chapter and the treasurer's
fee in the county current expense fund to defray costs of collection and shall
pay over to the state treasurer and account to the department of revenue for
the remainder of the proceeds at the same time the county treasurer remits
funds to the state under RCW 84.56.280. The state treasurer shall deposit the
proceeds in the general fund for the support of the common schools except as
provided in section 1 of this act.

(2) For taxes collected by the department of revenue under this
chapter, the department shall remit the tax to the state treasurer who shall deposit
the proceeds of any state tax in the general fund for the support of the common
schools except as provided in section 1 of this act. The state
treasurer shall deposit the proceeds of any local taxes imposed under chapter
82.46 RCW in the local real estate excise tax account hereby created in the
state treasury. Moneys in the local real estate excise tax account may be
spent only for distribution to counties, cities, and towns imposing a tax under
chapter 82.46 RCW. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of
investments of balances in the local real estate excise tax account shall be
credited to the local real estate excise tax account and distributed to the
counties, cities, and towns monthly. Monthly the state treasurer shall make
distribution from the local real estate excise tax account to the counties,
cities, and towns the amount of tax collected on behalf of each taxing
authority. The state treasurer shall make the distribution under this
subsection without appropriation.

---
END ---