BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that neighborhood activity centers create a sense of
community that, in turn, deters crime and promotes mutual respect and
cooperation.

The
legislature further finds that public school facilities are well-suited to
serve as neighborhood activity centers since schools are often located in the
center of neighborhoods. In addition, schools can be used more efficiently and
productively if they are readily available for neighborhood activities and
services during nonschool hours.

The
legislature further finds that communities should be afforded the opportunity
to fund school facilities in a manner that maximizes use and ensures that
education funds are not diverted to nonschool purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to the maximum dollar amount that may be levied by any school
district for maintenance and operation support under RCW 84.52.0531, a supplemental
levy for use of school facilities for community activities and services may be
authorized by the directors of any school district and approved at a general or
special election.

(2)
Such supplemental levy shall not exceed three percent of the district's levy
base as determined by RCW 84.52.0531(3) and may only be used for community
activities and services authorized by the school district board of directors.

(3)
The school board in a school district authorizing a levy under this section
shall appoint a citizen advisory committee to advise the district on the
appropriate use of facilities for community activities and services and on the
expenditure of the supplemental levy funds.

(4)
Property tax statements issued by city and county treasurers shall clearly
indicate that the taxes raised by the approval of the supplemental tax levy are
to be used for the community use of school facilities. The tax statement shall
have a separate line item for these taxes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.500 RCW to read as follows:

Approval of a supplemental levy authorized by section 2 of this act
does not entitle a school district to local effort assistance funds as defined
by RCW 28A.500.010.

---
END ---