BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
This section is intended to establish how state and local laws, including
statutes, ordinances, regulations, and rules, that impose any tax, including
any fee, charge, surcharge, license, permit, or any other cost imposed on any
of the following, whether public or private, should be interpreted with respect
to:

(a)
Property, real or personal, tangible or intangible;

(b)
Income;

(c)
Service; or

(d)
The ownership, possession, manufacture, use, sale, purchase, or transfer of any
property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, income, or service,
including any goods or labor.

(2)
Any property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, income, or service, or
the ownership, possession, manufacture, use, sale, purchase, or transfer of any
property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, income, or service,
including any goods or labor, located in, derived in, operated in, or occurring
in Washington is to be considered not subject to taxation, except that for
which a tax has been clearly and expressly imposed by law.

(3)
The following principles govern the construction of laws that impose any tax:

(a)
Property, real and personal, tangible and intangible, income, and service, and
the ownership, possession, manufacture, use, sale, purchase, and transfer of
any property, real and personal, tangible and intangible, income, and service,
including any goods and labor, shall not be taxed unless a governmental entity
has imposed a tax by clear and explicit language;

(b)
There is no need to construe a law when the law's language is plain;

(c)
Laws imposing the tax must be strictly construed, though fairly and in keeping
with the ordinary meaning of the language employed;

(d)
If there is any doubt regarding the exact meaning of a law imposing the tax,
the law must be construed in favor of the person who is disputing the tax
obligation and against the governmental entity claiming the person has a tax
obligation because nontaxation is the rule and taxation is the exception;

(e)
The burden of proving that a valid tax obligation exists rests upon the
governmental entity claiming that a tax obligation exists;

(f)
If a governmental entity has imposed the tax, the tax must not be enlarged by
construction since it is reasonable to presume that the governmental entity has
stated in express terms all that it intended to tax; and

(g)
A tax must be limited to the very terms of the law enacted. If not so limited,
the tax would be enlarged beyond what the governmental entity intended to tax.

(4)
This section shall not be construed as changing the burden of showing that any
exemption, deduction, or credit applies.

(5)(a)
Upon request, governmental entities seeking to collect a disputed tax
obligation shall make available to the person disputing the tax obligation all
records, documents, or facts necessary for the person to determine the
historical background, intent, construction, interpretation, application, or
implementation of the law imposing the tax.

(b)
Failure to fully cooperate with the person may result in a determination that
the property, income, or service, or the ownership, possession, manufacture,
use, sale, purchase, or transfer is not taxable for the current year.

(6)(a)
Upon request, persons who are disputing a tax obligation shall make available
at reasonable times to the governmental entity claiming the tax obligation
exists for inspection, investigation, or examination all property, records,
documents, or facts necessary for the governmental entity to determine the
taxable status of the obligation in dispute.

(b)
Failure to fully cooperate with the governmental entity may result in a
determination that the property, income, or service, or the ownership,
possession, manufacture, use, sale, purchase, or transfer is taxable for the
current year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

---
END ---