BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, in conjunction with the
department of corrections, and the sentencing guidelines commission, shall
study county jails in Washington state and shall produce and deliver to the
legislature by January 1, 2001, a study that:

(1)
Determines the capacity of county jails and identifies the most effective
mechanism for tracking jail capacity and daily offender populations on a daily
basis;

(2)
Develops offender classification systems applicable to county inmates; and

(3)
Creates or adopts a risk assessment system for classifying county jail inmates
that is compatible with the state's risk assessment system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---