BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
10.43.040 and 1909 c 249 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever, upon the trial of any person for a crime, it appears that
the offense was committed in another state or country, under such circumstances
that the courts of this state had jurisdiction thereof, and that the defendant
has already been acquitted or convicted upon the merits, ((upon a criminal
prosecution)) in a judicial proceeding conducted under the criminal
laws of such state or country, founded upon the act or omission with respect to
which he is upon trial, such former acquittal or conviction is a sufficient
defense. Nothing in this section affects or prevents a prosecution in a
court of this state of any person who has received administrative or
nonjudicial punishment, civilian or military, in another state or country based
upon the same act or omission.

---
END ---