BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
pardoning power is vested in the governor under such regulations and
restrictions as may be prescribed by law. To assist the governor in gathering
the facts necessary to the wise exercise of this power, the legislature created
the clemency and pardons board.

In
recognition of the severe and detrimental impact of crime on victims, survivors
of victims, and witnesses of crime, an intelligent recommendation on an
application for clemency is dependent upon input from the victims and survivors
of victims of crimes. It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that all
victims and survivors of victims of crimes are afforded a meaningful role in
the clemency process.

The
impact of the crime on the community must also be assessed when passing upon an
application for clemency. The prosecuting attorney who obtained the conviction
and the law enforcement agency that conducted the investigation are uniquely
situated to provide an accurate account of the offense and the impact felt by
the community as a result of the offense. It is the intent of the legislature
to ensure that the prosecuting attorney who obtained the conviction and the law
enforcement agency that conducted the investigation are afforded a meaningful
role in the clemency process.

Sec.
2. RCW
7.69.030 and 1997 c 343 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a reasonable effort made to ensure that victims, survivors of victims,
and witnesses of crimes have the following rights:

(1)
With respect to victims of violent or sex crimes, to receive, at the time of
reporting the crime to law enforcement officials, a written statement of the
rights of crime victims as provided in this chapter. The written statement
shall include the name, address, and telephone number of a county or local
crime victim/witness program, if such a crime victim/witness program exists in
the county;

(2)
To be informed by local law enforcement agencies or the prosecuting attorney of
the final disposition of the case in which the victim, survivor, or witness is
involved;

(3)
To be notified by the party who issued the subpoena that a court proceeding to
which they have been subpoenaed will not occur as scheduled, in order to save
the person an unnecessary trip to court;

(4)
To receive protection from harm and threats of harm arising out of cooperation
with law enforcement and prosecution efforts, and to be provided with
information as to the level of protection available;

(5)
To be informed of the procedure to be followed to apply for and receive any
witness fees to which they are entitled;

(6)
To be provided, whenever practical, a secure waiting area during court
proceedings that does not require them to be in close proximity to defendants
and families or friends of defendants;

(7)
To have any stolen or other personal property expeditiously returned by law
enforcement agencies or the superior court when no longer needed as evidence.
When feasible, all such property, except weapons, currency, contraband,
property subject to evidentiary analysis, and property of which ownership is
disputed, shall be photographed and returned to the owner within ten days of
being taken;

(8)
To be provided with appropriate employer intercession services to ensure that
employers of victims, survivors of victims, and witnesses of crime will
cooperate with the criminal justice process in order to minimize an employee's
loss of pay and other benefits resulting from court appearance;

(9)
To access to immediate medical assistance and not to be detained for an
unreasonable length of time by a law enforcement agency before having such
assistance administered. However, an employee of the law enforcement agency
may, if necessary, accompany the person to a medical facility to question the
person about the criminal incident if the questioning does not hinder the
administration of medical assistance;

(10)
With respect to victims of violent and sex crimes, to have a crime victim
advocate from a crime victim/witness program present at any prosecutorial or
defense interviews with the victim, and at any judicial proceedings related to
criminal acts committed against the victim. This subsection applies if
practical and if the presence of the crime victim advocate does not cause any
unnecessary delay in the investigation or prosecution of the case. The role of
the crime victim advocate is to provide emotional support to the crime victim;

(11)
With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to be physically present in
court during trial, or if subpoenaed to testify, to be scheduled as early as
practical in the proceedings in order to be physically present during trial
after testifying and not to be excluded solely because they have testified;

(12)
With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to be informed by the
prosecuting attorney of the date, time, and place of the trial and of the
sentencing hearing for felony convictions upon request by a victim or survivor;

(13)
To submit a victim impact statement or report to the court, with the assistance
of the prosecuting attorney if requested, which shall be included in all
presentence reports and permanently included in the files and records
accompanying the offender committed to the custody of a state agency or
institution;

(14)
With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to present a statement
personally or by representation, at the sentencing hearing for felony
convictions; ((and))

(15)
With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to entry of an order of
restitution by the court in all felony cases, even when the offender is
sentenced to confinement, unless extraordinary circumstances exist which make
restitution inappropriate in the court's judgment; and

(16)
With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to present a statement
personally or by representation at any hearing conducted regarding an
application for pardon or commutation of sentence.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.94A.260 and 1989 c 214 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The clemency and pardons board shall receive petitions from individuals,
organizations, and the department for review and commutation of sentences and
pardoning of offenders in extraordinary cases, and shall make recommendations
thereon to the governor.

(2)
The board shall receive petitions from individuals or organizations for the
restoration of civil rights lost by operation of state law as a result of
convictions for federal offenses or out-of-state felonies. The board may issue
certificates of restoration limited to the elective rights to vote and to
engage in political office. Any certifications granted by the board must be
filed with the secretary of state to be effective. In all other cases, the
board shall make recommendations to the governor.

(3) The board shall not recommend that the governor grant
clemency under subsection (1) of this section until a public hearing has been
held on the petition. The prosecuting attorney of the county where the
conviction was obtained shall be notified at least thirty days prior to the
scheduled hearing that a petition has been filed and the date and place at
which the hearing on the petition will be held. The board may waive the
thirty-day notice requirement in cases where it determines that waiver is
necessary to permit timely action on the petition. A copy of the petition
shall be sent to the prosecuting attorney. The prosecuting attorney shall make
reasonable efforts to notify victims, survivors of victims, witnesses, and the
law enforcement agency or agencies that conducted the investigation, of the
date and place of the hearing. Information regarding victims, survivors of
victims, or witnesses receiving this notice are confidential and shall not be
available to the offender. The board shall consider written or oral statements
regarding the petition received, personally or by representation, from the
individuals who receive notice pursuant to this section. This subsection is
intended solely for the guidance of the board. Nothing in this section is
intended or may be relied upon to create a right or benefit, substantive or
procedural, enforceable at law by any person.

Sec.
4. RCW
9.95.260 and 1981 c 136 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It shall be the duty of the indeterminate sentence review board ((of
prison terms and paroles)), when requested by the governor, to pass on the
representations made in support of applications for pardons for convicted
persons and to make recommendations thereon to the governor.

(2)
It will be the duty of the secretary of corrections to exercise supervision
over such convicted persons as have been conditionally pardoned by the
governor, to the end that such persons shall faithfully comply with the
conditions of such pardons. The indeterminate sentence review board ((of
prison terms and paroles)) shall also pass on any representations made in
support of applications for restoration of civil rights of convicted persons,
and make recommendations to the governor. The department of corrections shall
prepare materials and make investigations requested by the indeterminate
sentence review board ((of prison terms and paroles)) in order to
assist the board in passing on the representations made in support of
applications for pardon or for the restoration of civil rights.

(3) The board shall make no recommendations to the governor in
support of an application for pardon until a public hearing has been held under
this section or RCW 9.94A.260(3) upon the application. The prosecuting
attorney of the county where the conviction was obtained shall be notified at
least thirty days prior to the scheduled hearing that an application for pardon
has been filed and the date and place at which the hearing on the application
for pardon will be held. The board may waive the thirty-day notice requirement
in cases where it determines that waiver is necessary to permit timely action
on the petition. A copy of the application for pardon shall be sent to the
prosecuting attorney. The prosecuting attorney shall make reasonable efforts
to notify victims, survivors of victims, witnesses, and the law enforcement
agency or agencies that conducted the investigation of the date and place of
the hearing. Information regarding victims, survivors of victims, or witnesses
receiving this notice are confidential and shall not be available to the
offender. The board shall consider written or oral statements regarding the
application for pardon received, personally or by representation, from the
individuals who receive notice pursuant to this section. This subsection is
intended solely for the guidance of the board. Nothing in this section is
intended or may be relied upon to create a right or benefit, substantive or
procedural, enforceable at law by any person.

---
END ---