BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.103.090 and 1995 c 398 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
council may:

(1)
Meet at such times and places as may be designated by a majority vote of the
council members or, if a majority cannot agree, by the chair;

(2)
Adopt rules governing the council and the conduct of its meetings;

(3)
Require reports from the state toxicologist on matters pertaining to the
toxicology laboratory;

(4)
Require reports from the chief of the Washington state patrol on matters
pertaining to the crime laboratory;

(5)
Be actively involved in the preparation of the crime laboratory and toxicology
laboratory budgets and shall approve the crime laboratory and toxicology
laboratory budgets prior to their formal submission to the office of financial
management pursuant to RCW 43.88.030;

(6)
Authorize the expenditure of up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars per
biennium from the council's death investigations account appropriation for the
purpose of assisting local jurisdictions in the investigation of multiple
deaths involving unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic events, or
involving multiple jurisdictions. The council shall adopt rules consistent
with this subsection for the purposes of authorizing expenditure of the funds;

(7)
Do anything, necessary or convenient, which enables the council to perform its
duties and to exercise its powers;

(((7)))
(8) Appoint a toxicologist as state toxicologist to serve at the
pleasure of the council; and

(((8))) (9) Set the salary for the state
toxicologist.

---
END ---