BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.44.140 and 1998 c 278 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All materials purchased and work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in
excess of five thousand dollars, shall be by contract. Before awarding any
such contract, the commission shall publish a notice at least thirteen days
before the last date upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed
proposals for such work. The plans and specifications must at the time of the
publication of such notice be on file at the office of the public hospital
district, subject to public inspection: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the commission
may at the same time, and as part of the same notice, invite tenders for the
work or materials upon plans and specifications to be submitted by bidders.
The notice shall state generally the work to be done, and shall call for
proposals for doing the same, to be sealed and filed with the commission on or
before the day and hour named therein. Each bid shall be accompanied by bid
proposal security in the form of a certified check, cashier's check, postal
money order, or surety bond made payable to the order of the commission, for a
sum not less than five percent of the amount of the bid, and no bid shall be
considered unless accompanied by such bid proposal security. At the time and
place named, such bids shall be publicly opened and read, and the commission
shall proceed to canvass the bids, and may let such contract to the lowest
responsible bidder upon plans and specifications on file, or to the best bidder
submitting his or her own plans and specifications: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no
contract shall be let in excess of the estimated cost of the materials or work,
or if, in the opinion of the commission, all bids are unsatisfactory, they may
reject all of them and readvertise, and in such case all bid proposal security
shall be returned to the bidders. If the contract is let, then all bid
proposal security shall be returned to the bidders, except that of the
successful bidder, which is retained until a contract shall be entered into for
the purchase of such materials for doing such work, and a bond to perform such
work furnished, with sureties satisfactory to the commission, in an amount to
be fixed by the commission, not less than twenty-five percent of contract price
in any case, between the bidder and commission, in accordance with the bid. If
such bidder fails to enter into the contract in accordance with the bid and
furnish such bond within ten days from the date at which the bidder is notified
that he or she is the successful bidder, the bid proposal security and the
amount thereof shall be forfeited to the public hospital district. A low
bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from
bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for
the project.

(2)
In lieu of the procedures of subsection (1) of this section, a public hospital
district may use the ((small works roster process)) contracting
processes provided in RCW 39.04.155 ((and award public works contracts));
however, public hospital districts may only use the small works roster process
for projects ((with an)) estimated ((value in excess of)) to
cost less than fifty thousand dollars.

(3)
Any purchases with an estimated cost of up to fifteen thousand dollars may be
made using the process provided in RCW 39.04.190.

(4) The commission may waive the competitive bidding requirements
of this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that
section applies to the purchase or public work.

---
END ---