BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 39.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Public bodies may use a job order contract for public works projects when:

(a)
A public body has made a determination that the use of job order contracts will
benefit the public by providing an effective means of reducing the total
lead-time and cost for public works projects or repair required at public
facilities through the use of unit price books and work orders by eliminating
time-consuming, costly aspects of the traditional public works process, which
require separate contracting actions for each small project;

(b)
The work order to be issued for a particular project does not exceed two
hundred thousand dollars;

(c)
Less than twenty percent of the dollar value of the work order consists of
items of work not contained in the unit price book; and

(d)
At least eighty percent of the job order contract must be subcontracted to
entities other than the job order contractor.

(2)
Public bodies shall award job order contracts through a competitive process
utilizing public requests for proposals. The public body shall publish, at
least once in a legal newspaper of general circulation published in or as near
as possible to that part of the county in which the public works will be done,
a request for proposals for job order contracts and the availability and
location of the request for proposal documents. The public body shall ensure
that the request for proposal documents at a minimum includes:

(a)
A detailed description of the scope of the job order contract including
performance, technical requirements and specifications, functional and
operational elements, minimum and maximum work order amounts, duration of the
contract, and options to extend the job order contract;

(b)
The reasons for using job order contracts;

(c)
A description of the qualifications required of the proposer;

(d)
The identity of the specific unit price book to be used;

(e)
The minimum contracted amount committed to the selected job order contractor;

(f)
A description of the process the public body will use to evaluate
qualifications and proposals, including evaluation factors and the relative
weight of factors. The public body shall ensure that evaluation factors
include, but are not limited to, proposal price and the ability of the proposer
to perform the job order contract. In evaluating the ability of the proposer
to perform the job order contract, the public body may consider: The ability
of the professional personnel who will work on the job order contract; past
performance on similar contracts; ability to meet time and budget requirements;
ability to provide a performance and payment bond for the job order contract;
recent, current, and projected work loads of the proposer; location; and the
concept of the proposal;

(g)
The form of the contract to be awarded;

(h)
The method for pricing renewals of or extensions to the job order contract;

(i)
A notice that the proposals are subject to the provisions of RCW 39.10.100; and

(j)
Other information relevant to the project.

(3)
A public body shall establish a committee to evaluate the proposals. After the
committee has selected the most qualified finalists, the finalists shall submit
final proposals, including sealed bids based upon the identified unit price
book. Such bids may be in the form of coefficient markups from listed price
book costs. The public body shall award the contract to the firm submitting
the highest scored final proposal using the evaluation factors and the relative
weight of factors published in the public request for proposals.

(4)
The public body shall provide a protest period of at least ten business days
following the day of the announcement of the apparent successful proposal to
allow a protester to file a detailed statement of the grounds of the protest.
The public body shall promptly make a determination on the merits of the
protest and provide to all proposers a written decision of denial or acceptance
of the protest. The public body shall not execute the contract until two
business days following the public body's decision on the protest.

(5)
Job order contracts may be executed for an initial contract term of not to
exceed two years, with the option of extending or renewing the job order
contract for one year. All extensions or renewals must be priced as provided
in the request for proposals. The extension or renewal must be mutually agreed
to by the public body and the job order contractor.

(6)
The maximum total dollar amount that may be awarded under a job order contract
shall not exceed three million dollars in the first year of the job order
contract, five million dollars over the first two years of the job order
contract, and, if extended or renewed, eight million dollars over the three years
of the job order contract.

(7)
For each job order contract, public bodies shall not issue more than two work
orders equal to or greater than one hundred fifty thousand dollars in a
twelve-month contract performance period.

(8)
All work orders issued for the same project shall be treated as a single work
order for purposes of the one hundred fifty thousand dollar limit on work
orders in subsection (7) of this section and the two hundred thousand dollar
limit on work orders in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

(9)
Any new permanent, enclosed building space constructed under a work order shall
not exceed two thousand gross square feet.

(10)
Each public body may have no more than two job order contracts in effect at any
one time.

(11)
For purposes of chapters 39.08, 39.76, and 60.28 RCW, each work order issued
shall be treated as a separate contract.

(12)
The requirements of RCW 39.30.060 do not apply to requests for proposals for
job order contracts.

(13)
Job order contractors shall pay prevailing wages for all work that would
otherwise be subject to the requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW. Prevailing
wages for a job order contract must be determined as of the time of the
execution of the job order contract and any extension or renewal.

(14)
If, in the initial contract term, the public body, at no fault of the job order
contractor, fails to issue the minimum amount of work orders stated in the
public request for proposals, the public body shall pay the contractor an
amount equal to the difference between the minimum work order amount and the
actual total of the work orders issued multiplied by an appropriate percentage
for overhead and profit contained in the general conditions for Washington
state facility construction. This will be the contractor's sole remedy.

(15)
All job order contracts awarded under this section must be executed before July
1, 2001, however the job order contract may be extended or renewed as provided
for in this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
39.10.020 and 1997 c 376 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Alternative public works contracting procedure" means the
design-build and the general contractor/construction manager contracting
procedures authorized in RCW 39.10.050 and 39.10.060, respectively.

(2)
"Public body" means the state department of general administration;
the University of Washington; Washington State University; every city with a
population greater than one hundred fifty thousand; every city authorized to
use the design-build procedure for a water system demonstration project under
RCW 39.10.065(3); every county with a population greater than four hundred
fifty thousand; and every port district with a population greater than five
hundred thousand.

(3)
"Public works project" means any work for a public body within the
definition of the term public work in RCW 39.04.010.

(4)
"Job order contract" means a contract between a public body and a
registered or licensed contractor in which the contractor agrees to a fixed
period, indefinite quantity delivery order contract which provides for the use
of negotiated, definitive work orders for public works as defined in RCW
39.04.010.

(5)
"Job order contractor" means a registered or licensed contractor
awarded a job order contract.

(6)
"Unit price book" means a book containing specific prices, based on
generally accepted industry standards and information, where available, for
various items of work to be performed by the job order contractor. The prices
may include: All the costs of materials; labor; equipment; overhead, including
bonding costs; and profit for performing the items of work.

(7)
"Work order" means an order issued for a definite scope of work to be
performed pursuant to a job order contract.

Sec.
3. RCW
39.08.030 and 1989 c 58 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
bond mentioned in RCW 39.08.010 shall be in an amount equal to the full
contract price agreed to be paid for such work or improvement, except for
job order contracts authorized in section 1 of this act, and shall be to
the state of Washington, except as otherwise provided in RCW 39.08.100, and
except in cases of cities and towns, in which cases such municipalities may by
general ordinance fix and determine the amount of such bond and to whom such
bond shall run: PROVIDED, The same shall not be for a less amount than
twenty-five percent of the contract price of any such improvement, and may
designate that the same shall be payable to such city, and not to the state of
Washington, and all such persons mentioned in RCW 39.08.010 shall have a right
of action in his, her, or their own name or names on such bond for work done by
such laborers or mechanics, and for materials furnished or provisions and goods
supplied and furnished in the prosecution of such work, or the making of such
improvements: PROVIDED, That such persons shall not have any right of action
on such bond for any sum whatever, unless within thirty days from and after the
completion of the contract with an acceptance of the work by the affirmative
action of the board, council, commission, trustees, officer, or body acting for
the state, county or municipality, or other public body, city, town or
district, the laborer, mechanic or subcontractor, or materialman, or person
claiming to have supplied materials, provisions or goods for the prosecution of
such work, or the making of such improvement, shall present to and file with
such board, council, commission, trustees or body acting for the state, county
or municipality, or other public body, city, town or district, a notice in
writing in substance as follows:

To
(here insert the name of the state, county or municipality or other public
body, city, town or district):

Notice
is hereby given that the undersigned (here insert the name of the laborer,
mechanic or subcontractor, or materialman, or person claiming to have furnished
labor, materials or provisions for or upon such contract or work) has a claim
in the sum of . . . . . . dollars (here insert the
amount) against the bond taken from . . . . . . (here
insert the name of the principal and surety or sureties upon such bond) for the
work of . . . . . . (here insert a brief mention or
description of the work concerning which said bond was taken).

(here
to be signed) .........................

Such
notice shall be signed by the person or corporation making the claim or giving
the notice, and said notice, after being presented and filed, shall be a public
record open to inspection by any person, and in any suit or action brought
against such surety or sureties by any such person or corporation to recover
for any of the items hereinbefore specified, the claimant shall be entitled to
recover in addition to all other costs, attorney's fees in such sum as the
court shall adjudge reasonable: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no attorney's fees
shall be allowed in any suit or action brought or instituted before the expiration
of thirty days following the date of filing of the notice hereinbefore
mentioned: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any city may avail itself of the provisions
of RCW 39.08.010 through 39.08.030, notwithstanding any charter provisions in
conflict herewith: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any city or town may impose any
other or further conditions and obligations in such bond as may be deemed
necessary for its proper protection in the fulfillment of the terms of the
contract secured thereby, and not in conflict herewith. However, the bond
for job order contracts authorized in section 1 of this act must be in an
amount not less than the dollar value of all open work orders.

Sec.
4. RCW
39.30.060 and 1999 c 109 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
invitation to bid on a contract that is expected to cost one million dollars or
more for the construction, alteration, or repair of any public building or
public work of the state or a state agency or municipality as defined under RCW
39.04.010 or an institution of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016
shall require each bidder to submit as part of the bid, or within one hour
after the published bid submittal time, the names of the subcontractors with
whom the bidder, if awarded the contract, will subcontract for performance of
the work of heating, ventilation and air conditioning, plumbing as described in
chapter 18.106 RCW, and electrical as described in chapter 19.28 RCW, or to
name itself for the work. The bidder shall not list more than one
subcontractor for each category of work identified, unless subcontractors vary
with bid alternates, in which case the bidder must indicate which subcontractor
will be used for which alternate. Failure of the bidder to submit as part of
the bid the names of such subcontractors or to name itself to perform such work
or the naming of two or more subcontractors to perform the same work shall
render the bidder's bid nonresponsive and, therefore, void. The requirement of
this section to name the bidder's proposed heating, ventilation and air
conditioning, plumbing, and electrical subcontractors applies only to proposed
heating, ventilation and air conditioning, plumbing, and electrical
subcontractors who will contract directly with the general contractor
submitting the bid to the public entity. This section does not apply to job
order contract requests for proposals under section 1 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW to read as follows:

Job
order contracts under section 1 of this act must pay prevailing wages for all
work that would otherwise be subject to the requirements of this chapter.
Prevailing wages for a job order contract must be determined as of the time the
job order contract and any extension or renewal is executed.

Sec.
6. RCW
60.28.011 and 1994 c 101 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Public improvement contracts shall provide, and public bodies shall reserve, a
contract retainage not to exceed five percent of the moneys earned by the
contractor as a trust fund for the protection and payment of: (a) The claims
of any person arising under the contract; and (b) the state with respect to
taxes imposed pursuant to Title 82 RCW which may be due from such contractor.

(2)
Every person performing labor or furnishing supplies toward the completion of a
public improvement contract shall have a lien upon moneys reserved by a public
body under the provisions of a public improvement contract. However, the
notice of the lien of the claimant shall be given within forty-five days of
completion of the contract work, and in the manner provided in RCW 39.08.030.

(3)
The contractor at any time may request the contract retainage be reduced to one
hundred percent of the value of the work remaining on the project.

(a)
After completion of all contract work other than landscaping, the contractor
may request that the public body release and pay in full the amounts retained
during the performance of the contract, and sixty days thereafter the public
body must release and pay in full the amounts retained (other than continuing
retention of five percent of the moneys earned for landscaping) subject to the
provisions of chapters 39.12 and 60.28 RCW.

(b)
Sixty days after completion of all contract work the public body must release
and pay in full the amounts retained during the performance of the contract
subject to the provisions of chapters 39.12 and 60.28 RCW.

(4)
The moneys reserved by a public body under the provisions of a public
improvement contract, at the option of the contractor, shall be:

(a)
Retained in a fund by the public body;

(b)
Deposited by the public body in an interest bearing account in a bank, mutual
savings bank, or savings and loan association. Interest on moneys reserved by
a public body under the provision of a public improvement contract shall be
paid to the contractor;

(c)
Placed in escrow with a bank or trust company by the public body. When the
moneys reserved are placed in escrow, the public body shall issue a check
representing the sum of the moneys reserved payable to the bank or trust
company and the contractor jointly. This check shall be converted into bonds and
securities chosen by the contractor and approved by the public body and the
bonds and securities shall be held in escrow. Interest on the bonds and
securities shall be paid to the contractor as the interest accrues.

(5)
The contractor or subcontractor may withhold payment of not more than five
percent from the moneys earned by any subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or
supplier contracted with by the contractor to provide labor, materials, or
equipment to the public project. Whenever the contractor or subcontractor
reserves funds earned by a subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier, the
contractor or subcontractor shall pay interest to the subcontractor or
sub-subcontractor or supplier at a rate equal to that received by the
contractor or subcontractor from reserved funds.

(6)
A contractor may submit a bond for all or any portion of the contract retainage
in a form acceptable to the public body and from a bonding company meeting
standards established by the public body. The public body shall accept a bond
meeting these requirements unless the public body can demonstrate good cause
for refusing to accept it. This bond and any proceeds therefrom are subject to
all claims and liens and in the same manner and priority as set forth for
retained percentages in this chapter. The public body shall release the bonded
portion of the retained funds to the contractor within thirty days of accepting
the bond from the contractor. Whenever a public body accepts a bond in lieu of
retained funds from a contractor, the contractor shall accept like bonds from
any subcontractors or suppliers from which the contractor has retained funds.
The contractor shall then release the funds retained from the subcontractor or
supplier to the subcontractor or supplier within thirty days of accepting the
bond from the subcontractor or supplier.

(7)
If the public body administering a contract, after a substantial portion of the
work has been completed, finds that an unreasonable delay will occur in the
completion of the remaining portion of the contract for any reason not the
result of a breach thereof, it may, if the contractor agrees, delete from the
contract the remaining work and accept as final the improvement at the stage of
completion then attained and make payment in proportion to the amount of the
work accomplished and in this case any amounts retained and accumulated under
this section shall be held for a period of sixty days following the
completion. In the event that the work is terminated before final completion
as provided in this section, the public body may thereafter enter into a new
contract with the same contractor to perform the remaining work or improvement
for an amount equal to or less than the cost of the remaining work as was
provided for in the original contract without advertisement or bid. The
provisions of this chapter are exclusive and shall supersede all provisions and
regulations in conflict herewith.

(8)
Whenever the department of transportation has contracted for the construction
of two or more ferry vessels, sixty days after completion of all contract work
on each ferry vessel, the department must release and pay in full the amounts
retained in connection with the construction of the vessel subject to the
provisions of RCW 60.28.020 and chapter 39.12 RCW. However, the department of
transportation may at its discretion condition the release of funds retained in
connection with the completed ferry upon the contractor delivering a good and
sufficient bond with two or more sureties, or with a surety company, in the
amount of the retained funds to be released to the contractor, conditioned that
no taxes shall be certified or claims filed for work on the ferry after a
period of sixty days following completion of the ferry; and if taxes are
certified or claims filed, recovery may be had on the bond by the department of
revenue and the materialmen and laborers filing claims.

(9)
Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, reservation by a public
body for any purpose from the moneys earned by a contractor by fulfilling its
responsibilities under public improvement contracts is prohibited.

(10)
Contracts on projects funded in whole or in part by farmers home administration
and subject to farmers home administration regulations are not subject to subsections
(1) through (9) of this section.

(11)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this section.

(a)
"Contract retainage" means an amount reserved by a public body from
the moneys earned by a person under a public improvement contract.

(b)
"Person" means a person or persons, mechanic, subcontractor, or
materialperson who performs labor or provides materials for a public
improvement contract, and any other person who supplies the person with provisions
or supplies for the carrying on of a public improvement contract.

(c)
"Public body" means the state, or a county, city, town, district,
board, or other public body.

(d)
"Public improvement contract" means a contract for public
improvements or work, other than for professional services, or a work order
as defined in RCW 39.10.020.

Sec.
7. RCW
39.10.902 and 1997 c 376 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each
repealed, effective July 1, 2001:

(1)
RCW 39.10.010 and 1994 c 132 s 1;

(2)
((RCW 39.10.020 and 1994 c 132 s 2;

(3))) RCW
39.10.030 and 1997 c 376 s 2 & 1994 c 132 s 3;

(((4)))
(3) RCW 39.10.040 and 1994 c 132 s 4;

(((5)))
(4) RCW 39.10.050 and 1997 c 376 s 3 & 1994 c 132 s 5;

(((6)))
(5) RCW 39.10.060 and 1997 c 376 s 4, 1996 c 18 s 6, & 1994 c
132 s 6;

(((7)))
(6) RCW 39.10.065 and 1997 c 376 s 5;

(((8)))
(7) RCW 39.10.070 and 1994 c 132 s 7;

(((9)))
(8) RCW 39.10.080 and 1994 c 132 s 8;

(((10)))
(9) RCW 39.10.090 and 1994 c 132 s 9;

(((11)))
(10) RCW 39.10.100 and 1994 c 132 s 10;

(((12)))
(11) RCW 39.10.110 and 1997 c 376 s 6 & 1994 c 132 s 11;

(((13)))
(12) RCW 39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13; and

(((14)))
(13) RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14((; and

(15)
RCW 39.10.902 and 1994 c 132 s 15)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each
repealed, effective July 1, 2004:

(1) RCW
39.10.020 and 2000 c . . . s 2 (section 2 of this act),
1997 c 376 s 1, & 1994 c 132 s 2; and

(2) RCW
39.10.--- and 2000 c . . . s 1 (section 1 of this act).

---
END ---