BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
53.08.120 and 1998 c 278 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

All
material required by a port district may be procured in the open market or by
contract and all work ordered may be done by contract or day labor. All such
contracts for work, the estimated cost of which exceeds ((one)) two
hundred thousand dollars, shall be let at public bidding upon notice published
in a newspaper of general circulation in the district at least thirteen days
before the last date upon which bids will be received, calling for sealed bids
upon the work, plans and specifications for which shall then be on file in the
office of the commission for public inspection. The same notice may call for
bids on such work or material based upon plans and specifications submitted by
the bidder. The competitive bidding requirements for purchases or public works
may be waived pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that
section applies to the purchase or public work.

Each
port district shall maintain a small works roster, as provided in RCW
39.04.155, and may use the small works roster process to award contracts in
lieu of calling for sealed bids whenever work is done by contract, the
estimated cost of which is ((one)) two hundred thousand dollars
or less. Whenever possible, the managing official shall invite at least one
proposal from a minority contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this
section.

When
awarding such a contract for work, when utilizing proposals from the small
works roster, the managing official shall give weight to the contractor
submitting the lowest and best proposal, and whenever it would not violate the
public interest, such contracts shall be distributed equally among contractors,
including minority contractors, on the small works roster.

A report on the effectiveness of the change in the bid limit
will be made to the alternative works construction methods oversight committee
prior to the 2003 legislative session.

---
END ---