BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.40.710 and 1996 c 61 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer
shall continue to receive service credit as provided for under the provisions
of RCW 41.40.610 through 41.40.740.

(2)
A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized
leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and
whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation
paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be
on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's
leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that
provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the
period of leave. The compensation earnable reported for a member who
establishes service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the
salary paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.

(3)
Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member shall be
eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit during a member's
entire working career for those periods when a member is on an unpaid leave of
absence authorized by an employer. Such credit may be obtained only if:

(a)
The member makes both the plan II employer and member contributions plus
interest as determined by the department for the period of the authorized leave
of absence within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement
whichever comes sooner; or

(b)
If not within five years of resumption of service but prior to retirement, pay
the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

The
contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be based on the
average of the member's compensation earnable at both the time the authorized
leave of absence was granted and the time the member resumed employment.

(4)
A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the armed forces of the
United States shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to
five years of military service. This subsection shall be administered in a
manner consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services
employment and reemployment rights act.

(a)
The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i)
Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the United States
armed forces, the member applies for reemployment with the employer who
employed the member immediately prior to the member entering the United States
armed forces; and

(ii)
The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.40.650 within
five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes
sooner; or

(iii)
Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the member's honorable
discharge or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount
required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

(b)
Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii) of this subsection, the
department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the
employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.40.650 for the period of
military service, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c)
The contributions required under (a)(ii) of this subsection shall be based on
the compensation the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that
cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for
the member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.

(5) After completing twenty-five years of creditable service,
any member who is a veteran of the Vietnam conflict may have service in the
armed forces credited to him or her as a member whether or not he or she left
the employ of an employer to enter the armed service: PROVIDED, That in no
instance under this subsection may military service in excess of five years be
credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance the member must restore
all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which restoration must be completed
within five years of membership service following the first resumption of
employment or complete twenty-five years of creditable service. In no instance
under this subsection may military service be credited to any member who is
receiving full military retirement benefits pursuant to Title 10 United States
Code. For the purposes of this section, "veteran of the Vietnam
conflict" means a person who (a) served during the period beginning August
5, 1964, and ending May 7, 1975, (b) received an honorable discharge or
received a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record, and (c)
meets one or more of the criteria listed in RCW 41.04.005 (1) and (2).

---
END ---