BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Insurers have a duty to process claims for benefits under an insurance policy
in a prompt and fair manner. An insurer shall pay a claim within forty-five
days of receipt unless the insurer complies with standards for prompt
investigation and settlement of claims adopted by the commissioner by rule, as
currently existing or as hereafter amended. If the insurer disputes part of
the claim and agrees to part, the insurer shall pay the part agreed to
immediately and resolve the disputed amount in a prompt and fair manner. The
insurance commissioner may investigate a policyholder's complaint that a claim
has not been processed in a prompt or fair manner and take appropriate action
against the insured, including imposing a fine of up to ten thousand dollars to
be deposited in the general fund, if the commissioner finds that the insurer
did not process the claim in a prompt or fair manner and that the insured has
not resolved the claim as directed by the commissioner.

(2) This section does not limit other actions or remedies available
to the commissioner or the insured under statute, rule, contract, or common
law.

---
END ---