BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
38.40.060 and 1991 c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every officer and employee of the state or of any county, city, or
other ((political)) municipal or quasi-municipal corporation, or any
subdivision thereof who is a member of the Washington national guard or of the
army, navy, air force, coast guard, or marine corps reserve of the United
States, or of any organized reserve or armed forces of the United States shall
be entitled to and shall be granted military leave of absence from such
employment for a period not exceeding fifteen days during each calendar year.
Such leave shall be granted in order that the person may report for active
duty, when called, or take part in active training duty or inactive training
duty in such manner and at such time as he or she may be ordered to active
duty ((or)), active training duty, or inactive training duty.
Such military leave of absence shall be in addition to any vacation or sick
leave to which the officer or employee might otherwise be entitled, and shall
not involve any loss of efficiency rating, privileges, or pay. During the
period of military leave, the officer or employee shall receive from the state,
or the county, city, or other municipal or quasi-municipal corporation, or
any political subdivision, his or her normal pay.

---
END ---