BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that citizens who assist individuals in emergency situations
perform a needed and valuable role that deserves recognition and support. The
legislature further finds that emergency assistance in the form of mouth to
mouth resuscitation or other emergency medical procedures resulting in the
exchange of bodily fluids significantly increases the odds of being exposed to
a deadly infectious disease. Some of the more life-threatening diseases that
can be transferred during an emergency procedure where bodily fluids are
exchanged include hepatitis A, B, and C, and human immunodeficiency virus
(HIV). The legislature further finds that a number of good samaritans who
perform life-saving emergency procedures such as cardiopulmonary resuscitation
are unable to pay for the tests necessary for detecting infectious diseases
that could have been transmitted during the emergency procedure. It is the
purpose of this act to provide infectious disease testing at no cost to good
samaritans who request testing for infectious diseases after rendering
emergency assistance that has brought them into contact with a bodily fluid.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.05 RCW to read as follows:

A
person rendering emergency care or transportation, commonly known as a
"Good Samaritan," as described in RCW 4.24.300 and 4.24.310, may
request and receive appropriate infectious disease testing free of charge from
the local health department of the county of her or his residence, if: (1)
While rendering emergency care she or he came into contact with bodily fluids;
and (2) she or he does not have health insurance that covers the testing.
Nothing in this section requires a local health department to provide health care
services beyond testing. The department shall adopt rules implementing this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---