BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that part-time faculty at the community and technical
colleges have an essential role in providing students with an excellent and
affordable education. The legislature also finds that the salary, retirement
benefits, and health care disparities between full-time and part-time faculty
at many colleges are excessive and inequitable. Therefore, it is the intent of
the legislature that part-time faculty employed in public community and
technical colleges receive equal compensation for equal work when compared to
full-time faculty. Equal compensation for equal work should include prorated
compensation for salary, retirement benefits, and health care benefits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
This section applies to part-time faculty of public community and technical
colleges.

(2)
Part-time faculty under this section shall be paid a pro rata share of the
salary paid to full-time faculty based on the full-time faculty salary schedule
of the college district where the part-time faculty member is employed.

(3)
Part-time faculty shall be eligible for a pro rata share of retirement benefits
from the state board for community and technical colleges.

(4)
Part-time faculty under this section who are employed for less than fifty
percent of a full-time equivalent position as described in RCW 28B.50.489 shall
receive compensation in lieu of health benefits equivalent to the pro rata
share of the cost to the state for individual health benefits. The amount to
be prorated shall be based on the average premium for health care for a full-time
faculty member.

(5)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this section.

(a)
A "pro rata share" means a percentage of a full-time academic
workload as defined in RCW 28B.50.489(1).

(b) "Part-time faculty" means nontenured instructors
employed by public community or technical college districts for less than one
hundred percent of a full-time academic workload as defined in RCW
28B.50.489(1).

---
END ---