BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

The
state of Washington desires a skilled and dedicated, well trained work force
for the community and technical college system. The legislature finds that
community and technical colleges offer quality, cost-effective instructional
programs to the citizens of the state.

The
legislature finds that adjunct faculty at the community and technical colleges
have an essential role in providing students with an excellent and affordable
education. Stagnated salaries and lack of career advancement opportunities
within the community college system are hindrances to adjunct faculty. Low
salaries also create a perception of a lack of fairness. The legislature
further finds that adjunct faculty members make a major contribution to student
learning in their formal teaching duties and in their nonteaching duties.

Therefore,
it is the intent of the legislature to recognize adjunct faculty members for
their teaching and for their nonteaching contributions to community colleges.
Adjunct faculty should be compensated for all their contributions to students,
contributions to faculty, and the furtherance of the community and technical
college mission.

Therefore,
it is the intent of the legislature that part-time faculty employed in public
community and technical colleges receive fair compensation for work when
compared to full-time faculty. Fair compensation for work should include the
goal of closing the gap between the average adjunct faculty pay rate and the
average full-time faculty pay rate. Fair compensation may also include
compensation for nonteaching duties performed by adjunct faculty.

---
END ---