BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of:

(1)
Items that become components of a public school, as defined in RCW 28A.150.010;
or

(2)
Labor and services rendered for constructing, repairing, decorating, or
improving a public school, as defined in RCW 28A.150.010.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of items that become components of a public school, as defined in RCW
28A.150.010.

---
END ---