BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.160.010 and 1996 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that it is the public policy of the state of Washington
to direct financial resources toward the fostering of economic development
through the stimulation of investment and job opportunities and the retention
of sustainable existing employment for the general welfare of the inhabitants
of the state. Reducing unemployment and reducing the time citizens remain
jobless is important for the economic welfare of the state. A valuable means
of fostering economic development is the construction of public facilities
which contribute to the stability and growth of the state's economic base.
Strengthening the economic base through issuance of industrial development bonds,
whether single or umbrella, further serves to reduce unemployment.
Consolidating issues of industrial development bonds when feasible to reduce
costs additionally advances the state's purpose to improve economic vitality.
Expenditures made for these purposes as authorized in this chapter are declared
to be in the public interest, and constitute a proper use of public funds. A
community economic revitalization board is needed which shall aid the
development of economic opportunities. The general objectives of the board
should include:

(a)
Strengthening the economies of areas of the state which have experienced or are
expected to experience chronically high unemployment rates or below average
growth in their economies;

(b)
Encouraging the diversification of the economies of the state and regions
within the state in order to provide greater seasonal and cyclical stability of
income and employment;

(c)
Encouraging wider access to financial resources for both large and small
industrial development projects;

(d)
Encouraging new economic development or expansions to maximize employment;

(e)
Encouraging the retention of viable existing firms and employment; and

(f)
Providing incentives for expansion of employment opportunities for groups of
state residents that have been less successful relative to other groups in
efforts to gain permanent employment.

(2)
The legislature also finds that the state's economic development efforts can be
enhanced by, in certain instances, providing funds to ((improve state highways
in the vicinity of new industries considering locating in this state or
existing industries that are considering significant expansion.

(a)
The legislature finds it desirable to provide a process whereby the need for
diverse public works improvements necessitated by planned economic development
can be addressed in a timely fashion and with coordination among all
responsible governmental entities.

(b)
It is the intent of the legislature to create an economic development account
within the motor vehicle fund from which expenditures can be made by the
department of transportation for state highway improvements necessitated by
planned economic development. All such improvements must first be approved by
the state transportation commission and the community economic revitalization
board in accordance with the procedures established by RCW 43.160.074 and
47.01.280. It is further the intent of the legislature that such improvements
not jeopardize any other planned highway construction projects. The improvements
are intended to be of limited size and cost, and to include such items as
additional turn lanes, signalization, illumination, and safety improvements)) assist
development of telecommunications infrastructure that supports business
development, retention, and expansion in rural natural resources impact areas
and distressed counties of the state.

(3)
The legislature also finds that the state's economic development efforts can be
enhanced by providing funds to improve markets for those recyclable materials
representing a large fraction of the waste stream. The legislature finds that
public facilities which result in private construction of processing or
remanufacturing facilities for recyclable materials are eligible for
consideration from the board.

(4)
The legislature finds that sharing economic growth state-wide is important to
the welfare of the state. Distressed counties and rural natural
resource impact areas do not share in the economic vitality of the Puget Sound
region. The ability of these communities to pursue business and job
retention, expansion, and development opportunities depends on their capacity
to ready necessary economic development project plans, sites, permits, and
infrastructure for private investments. Project specific planning,
predevelopment, and infrastructure ((is one of several ingredients that))
are critical ingredients for economic development. Rural natural
resource impact areas generally lack ((the infrastructure)) these
necessary tools and resources to diversify and revitalize their
economies. It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to increase the ((availability
of funds to help provide infrastructure to rural natural resource impact areas))
amount of funding available through the community economic revitalization
board for rural natural resources impact areas and distressed counties and
authorize the flexible use of available resources in these areas to help fund
planning, predevelopment, and construction costs of infrastructure and
facilities that foster economic vitality and diversification.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.160.020 and 1997 c 367 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Board" means the community economic revitalization board.

(2)
"Bond" means any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate, or other
evidence of financial indebtedness issued by the board pursuant to this
chapter.

(3)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(4)
"Distressed county" means either: (a) A county in which the
average level of unemployment for the previous three years exceeds the average
state unemployment rate for those years by twenty percent; or (b) a county that
has a median household income that is less than seventy-five percent of the
state median household income for the previous three years.

(5)
"Financial institution" means any bank, savings and loan association,
credit union, development credit corporation, insurance company, investment
company, trust company, savings institution, or other financial institution
approved by the board and maintaining an office in the state.

(((5)))
(6) "Industrial development facilities" means "industrial
development facilities" as defined in RCW 39.84.020.

(((6)))
(7) "Industrial development revenue bonds" means tax-exempt
revenue bonds used to fund industrial development facilities.

(((7)))
(8) "Local government" or "political subdivision"
means any port district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any
other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state
providing for public facilities under this chapter.

(((8)))
(9) "Sponsor" means any of the following entities which
customarily provide service or otherwise aid in industrial or other financing
and are approved as a sponsor by the board: A bank, trust company, savings
bank, investment bank, national banking association, savings and loan
association, building and loan association, credit union, insurance company, or
any other financial institution, governmental agency, or holding company of any
entity specified in this subsection.

(((9)))
(10) "Umbrella bonds" means industrial development revenue
bonds from which the proceeds are loaned, transferred, or otherwise made
available to two or more users under this chapter.

(((10)))
(11) "User" means one or more persons acting as lessee,
purchaser, mortgagor, or borrower under a financing document and receiving or
applying to receive revenues from bonds issued under this chapter.

(((11)))
(12) "Public facilities" means bridges, roads, domestic and
industrial water, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity, natural
gas, buildings or structures, and port facilities.

(((12)))
(13) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:

(a)
A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that meets
three of the five criteria set forth in subsection (((13))) (14)
of this section;

(b)
A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty thousand in the
1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five criteria as set forth in
subsection (((13))) (14) of this section; or

(c)
A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that is located
in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five criteria set forth in
subsection (((13))) (14) of this section.

(((13)))
(14) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:

(a)
A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(b)
A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(c)
Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses of one hundred
positions or more;

(d)
Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses of one hundred
positions or more; and

(e)
An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state average. The
counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by the employment
security department for the most recent year for which data is available. For
the purposes of administration of programs under this chapter, the United
States post office five-digit zip code delivery areas will be used to determine
residence status for eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition,
a zip code delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an
urbanized area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by
zip codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also considered
nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make available a zip
code listing of the areas to all agencies and organizations providing services
under this chapter.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.160.060 and 1996 c 51 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board is authorized to make direct loans to political subdivisions of the state
for the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions in financing the cost
of public facilities, including development of land and improvements for public
facilities((,)); project-specific environmental, capital facilities,
land use, permitting, feasibility, and marketing studies and plans; project
design, site planning, and analysis; project debt and revenue impact analysis;
as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, expansion, or
improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be authorized for purposes and
activities designated in this chapter, but only when, and to the extent
that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the
political subdivision and the finding by the board that ((unique)) financial
circumstances ((exist. The board shall not obligate more than twenty
percent of its biennial appropriation as grants)) require grant
assistance to enable the project to move forward.

Application
for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In
making grants or loans the board shall conform to the following requirements:

(1)
The board shall not provide financial assistance:

(a)
For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail
shopping development or expansion.

(b)
For any project that evidence exists would result in a development or expansion
that would displace existing jobs in any other community in the state,
except a project that would relocate a business from a nondistressed urban area
to a distressed county or rural natural resources impact area.

(c)
For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and other fixtures
which are a part of real property.

(2)
The board shall only provide financial assistance:

(a)
For those projects which would result in specific private developments or
expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food processing, assembly,
warehousing, advanced technology, research and development, and
industrial distribution; (ii) for processing recyclable materials or for
facilities that support recycling, including processes not currently provided
in the state, including but not limited to, de-inking facilities, mixed waste
paper, plastics, yard waste, and problem-waste processing; (iii) for manufacturing
facilities that rely significantly on recyclable materials, including but not
limited to waste tires and mixed waste paper; (iv) which support the relocation
of businesses from nondistressed urban areas to distressed counties or
rural natural resources impact areas; or (v) which substantially support
the trading of goods or services outside of the state's borders.

(b)
For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for the successful
maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or
will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic
opportunities.

(c)
When the application includes convincing evidence that a specific private
development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the public
facility improvement is made.

(3)
The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to the relative
benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project would create, not
just the total number of jobs it would create after the project is completed
and according to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be
located. As long as there is more demand for financial assistance than there
are funds available, the board is instructed to fund projects in order of their
priority.

(4)
A responsible official of the political subdivision shall be present during
board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

Before
any financial assistance application is approved, the political subdivision
seeking the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is available to it
at costs reasonably similar to financing available from the community economic
revitalization board.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.160.076 and 1998 c 321 s 28 (Referendum Bill No. 49) and 1998 c 55 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as authorized to the contrary under subsection (2) of this section, from
all funds available to the board for financial assistance in a biennium under
this chapter without reference to financial assistance provided under RCW
43.160.220, the board shall spend at least seventy-five percent for financial
assistance for projects in distressed counties or rural natural resources
impact areas. For purposes of this section, the term "distressed
counties" includes any county, in which the average level of unemployment
for the three years before the year in which an application for financial assistance
is filed, exceeds the average state unemployment for those years by twenty
percent.

(2)
If at any time during the last six months of a biennium the board finds that
the actual and anticipated applications for qualified projects in distressed
counties or rural natural resources impact areas are clearly insufficient to
use up the seventy-five percent allocation under subsection (1) of this
section, then the board shall estimate the amount of the insufficiency and
during the remainder of the biennium may use that amount of the allocation for
financial assistance to projects not located in distressed counties or rural
natural resources impact areas.

(((3)
This section expires June 30, 2000.))

Sec.
5. RCW
43.160.200 and 1996 c 51 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The economic development account is created within the public facilities
construction loan revolving fund under RCW 43.160.080. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be
used only for the purposes of RCW 43.160.010(((3))) (4) and this
section. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW.

(2)
Applications under this section for assistance from the economic development
account are subject to all of the applicable criteria set forth under this
chapter, as well as procedures and criteria established by the board, except as
otherwise provided.

(3)
Eligible applicants under this section are limited to political subdivisions of
the state in rural natural resources impact areas ((that demonstrate, to the
satisfaction of the board, the local economy's dependence on the forest
products and salmon fishing industries)) and distressed counties.

(4)
Applicants must demonstrate that their request is part of an economic
development plan consistent with applicable state planning requirements.
Applicants must demonstrate that tourism projects have been approved by the
local government. Industrial projects must be approved by the local government
and the associate development organization.

(5)
Publicly owned projects may be financed under this section upon proof by the
applicant that the public project is a necessary component of, or constitutes
in whole, a tourism project.

(6)
Applications must demonstrate local match and participation. Such match may
include: Land donation, other public or private funds or both, or other means
of local commitment to the project.

(7)
Board financing for project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land
use, permitting, feasibility, and marketing studies and plans;
project engineering, design, and site planning and analysis; and project debt
and revenue impact analysis shall not exceed ((twenty-five)) fifty
thousand dollars per study. Board funds for ((feasibility studies)) these
purposes may be provided as a grant and require a ((dollar for dollar
match with up to one-half)) financial or in-kind match ((allowed)).

(8)
Board financing for tourism projects shall not exceed two hundred fifty
thousand dollars. Other public facility construction projects under
this section shall not exceed ((five hundred thousand)) one million
dollars. Loans with flexible terms and conditions to meet the needs of the
applicants shall be provided. Grants may also be authorized, but only when,
and to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the limited
resources of the political subdivision.

(9)
The board shall develop guidelines for allowable local match and ((feasibility
studies)) planning and predevelopment activities.

(10)
The board may allow de minimus general system improvements to be funded if
they are critically linked to the viability of the economic development project
assisted under this section.

(11)
Applications under this section need not demonstrate evidence that specific
private development or expansion is ready to occur or will occur if funds are
provided.

(((11)))
(12) The board shall establish guidelines for providing financial
assistance under this section to ensure that the requirements of this chapter
are complied with. The guidelines shall include:

(a)
A process to equitably compare and evaluate applications from competing
communities.

(b)
Criteria to ensure that approved projects will have a high probability of
success and are likely to provide long-term economic benefits to the
community. The criteria shall include: (i) A minimum amount of local
participation, determined by the board per application, to verify community
support for the project; (ii) an analysis that establishes the project is
feasible using standard economic principles; and (iii) an explanation from the
applicant regarding how the project is consistent with the communities'
economic strategy and goals.

(c)
A method of evaluating the impact of the financial assistance on the economy of
the community and whether the financial assistance achieved its purpose.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. 1998 c
321 s 29, 1997 c 367 s 10, 1995 c 226 s 7, 1993 c 320 s 10, & 1991 c 314 s
32 (uncodified) are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Section 5 of this act expires June 30, 2000.

---
END ---