BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.56.160 and 1995 c 129 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the second degree if:

(a)
He or she possesses stolen property other than a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 which exceeds two hundred fifty dollars in value but does not exceed
one thousand five hundred dollars in value; or

(b)
He or she possesses a stolen public record, writing or instrument kept, filed,
or deposited according to law; or

(c)
He or she possesses a stolen access device; or

(d)
He or she is not a financial institution and possesses a stolen check or
draft; or

(e)
He or she possesses a stolen motor vehicle of a value less than one thousand
five hundred dollars.

(2)
Possessing stolen property in the second degree is a class C felony.

Sec.
2. RCW
9A.56.140 and 1998 c 236 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Possessing stolen property" means knowingly to receive, retain,
possess, conceal, or dispose of stolen property knowing that it has been stolen
and to withhold or appropriate the same to the use of any person other than the
true owner or person entitled thereto.

(2)
The fact that the person who stole the property has not been convicted,
apprehended, or identified is not a defense to a charge of possessing stolen
property.

(3)
When a person has in his or her possession, or under his or her control, stolen
access devices issued in the names of two or more persons, or ten or more
stolen merchandise pallets, or ten or more stolen beverage crates, or a
combination of ten or more stolen merchandise pallets and beverage crates, as
defined under RCW 9A.56.010, he or she is presumed to know that they are
stolen.

(4)
When a person other than a financial institution has in his or her
possession, or under his or her control, two or more stolen checks with
different account numbers, he or she is presumed to know that they are stolen.

(5)
The presumptions in subsections (3) and (4) of this
section ((is)) are rebuttable by evidence raising a reasonable
inference that the possession of such stolen access devices, merchandise
pallets, ((or)) beverage crates, checks, or drafts was without
knowledge that they were stolen.

Sec.
3. RCW
9A.56.010 and 1998 c 236 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following definitions are applicable in this chapter unless the context
otherwise requires:

(1)
"Appropriate lost or misdelivered property or services" means
obtaining or exerting control over the property or services of another which
the actor knows to have been lost or mislaid, or to have been delivered under a
mistake as to identity of the recipient or as to the nature or amount of the
property;

(2)
"By color or aid of deception" means that the deception operated to
bring about the obtaining of the property or services; it is not necessary that
deception be the sole means of obtaining the property or services;

(3)
"Access device" means any card, plate, code, account number, or other
means of account access that can be used alone or in conjunction with another
access device to obtain money, goods, services, or anything else of value, or
that can be used to initiate a transfer of funds, other than a transfer
originated solely by paper instrument;

(4)
"Check" and "draft" each have the meanings given in RCW
62A.3‑104;

(5)
"Deception" occurs when an actor knowingly:

(a)
Creates or confirms another's false impression which the actor knows to be
false; or

(b)
Fails to correct another's impression which the actor previously has created or
confirmed; or

(c)
Prevents another from acquiring information material to the disposition of the
property involved; or

(d)
Transfers or encumbers property without disclosing a lien, adverse claim, or
other legal impediment to the enjoyment of the property, whether that
impediment is or is not valid, or is or is not a matter of official record; or

(e)
Promises performance which the actor does not intend to perform or knows will
not be performed((.));

(((5)))
(6) "Deprive" in addition to its common meaning means to make
unauthorized use or an unauthorized copy of records, information, data, trade
secrets, or computer programs;

(((6)))
(7) "Financial institution" means a business that as a regular
aspect of its operation participates in the check collection or check clearing
process, including but not limited to a person doing business under the laws of
the state of Washington, any other state or territory of the United States, or
the United States relating to commercial banks, bank holding companies, savings
banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, credit unions, clearing
houses, and the affiliates, subsidiaries, and service corporations of them.
"Financial institution" also means a person or entity employed by or
acting on behalf of a financial institution, when acting in that capacity.

(8)
"Obtain control over" in addition to its common meaning, means:

(a)
In relation to property, to bring about a transfer or purported transfer to the
obtainer or another of a legally recognized interest in the property; or

(b)
In relation to labor or service, to secure performance thereof for the benefits
of the obtainer or another;

(((7)))
(9) "Wrongfully obtains" or "exerts unauthorized
control" means:

(a)
To take the property or services of another;

(b)
Having any property or services in one's possession, custody or control as
bailee, factor, lessee, pledgee, renter, servant, attorney, agent, employee,
trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, or officer of any person, estate,
association, or corporation, or as a public officer, or person authorized by
agreement or competent authority to take or hold such possession, custody, or
control, to secrete, withhold, or appropriate the same to his or her own use or
to the use of any person other than the true owner or person entitled thereto;
or

(c)
Having any property or services in one's possession, custody, or control as
partner, to secrete, withhold, or appropriate the same to his or her use or to
the use of any person other than the true owner or person entitled thereto,
where such use is unauthorized by the partnership agreement;

(((8)))
(10) "Merchandise pallet" means a wood or plastic carrier
designed and manufactured as an item on which products can be placed prior to
or during transport to retail outlets, manufacturers, or contractors, and
affixed with language stating "property of . . .,"
"owned by . . .," or other markings or words
identifying ownership;

(((9)))
(11) "Beverage crate" means a plastic or metal box-like
container used by a manufacturer or distributor in the transportation or
distribution of individually packaged beverages to retail outlets, and affixed
with language stating "property of . . . . .,"
"owned by . . . . .," or other markings or words
identifying ownership;

(((10)))
(12) "Owner" means a person, other than the actor, who has
possession of or any other interest in the property or services involved, and
without whose consent the actor has no authority to exert control over the
property or services;

(((11)))
(13) "Receive" includes, but is not limited to, acquiring
title, possession, control, or a security interest, or any other interest in
the property;

(((12)))
(14) "Services" includes, but is not limited to, labor,
professional services, transportation services, electronic computer services,
the supplying of hotel accommodations, restaurant services, entertainment, the
supplying of equipment for use, and the supplying of commodities of a public
utility nature such as gas, electricity, steam, and water;

(((13)))
(15) "Stolen" means obtained by theft, robbery, or extortion;

(((14)))
(16) "Subscription television service" means cable or
encrypted video and related audio and data services intended for viewing on a
home television by authorized members of the public only, who have agreed to
pay a fee for the service. Subscription services include but are not limited
to those video services presently delivered by coaxial cable, fiber optic
cable, terrestrial microwave, television broadcast, and satellite transmission;

(((15)))
(17) "Telecommunication device" means (a) any type of
instrument, device, machine, or equipment that is capable of transmitting or
receiving telephonic or electronic communications; or (b) any part of such an
instrument, device, machine, or equipment, or any computer circuit, computer
chip, electronic mechanism, or other component, that is capable of facilitating
the transmission or reception of telephonic or electronic communications;

(((16)))
(18) "Telecommunication service" includes any service other
than subscription television service provided for a charge or compensation to
facilitate the transmission, transfer, or reception of a telephonic communication
or an electronic communication;

(((17)))
(19) Value. (a) "Value" means the market value of the
property or services at the time and in the approximate area of the criminal
act.

(b)
Whether or not they have been issued or delivered, written instruments, except
those having a readily ascertained market value, shall be evaluated as follows:

(i)
The value of an instrument constituting an evidence of debt, such as a check,
draft, or promissory note, shall be deemed the amount due or collectible
thereon or thereby, that figure ordinarily being the face amount of the
indebtedness less any portion thereof which has been satisfied;

(ii)
The value of a ticket or equivalent instrument which evidences a right to
receive transportation, entertainment, or other service shall be deemed the
price stated thereon, if any; and if no price is stated thereon, the value
shall be deemed the price of such ticket or equivalent instrument which the
issuer charged the general public;

(iii)
The value of any other instrument that creates, releases, discharges, or
otherwise affects any valuable legal right, privilege, or obligation shall be
deemed the greatest amount of economic loss which the owner of the instrument
might reasonably suffer by virtue of the loss of the instrument.

(c)
Whenever any series of transactions which constitute theft, would, when
considered separately, constitute theft in the third degree because of value,
and said series of transactions are a part of a common scheme or plan, then the
transactions may be aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of all
said transactions shall be the value considered in determining the degree of
theft involved.

(d)
Whenever any person is charged with possessing stolen property and such person
has unlawfully in his possession at the same time the stolen property of more
than one person, then the stolen property possessed may be aggregated in one
count and the sum of the value of all said stolen property shall be the value
considered in determining the degree of theft involved.

(e)
Property or services having value that cannot be ascertained pursuant to the
standards set forth above shall be deemed to be of a value not exceeding two
hundred and fifty dollars;

(((18)))
(20) "Shopping cart" means a basket mounted on wheels or
similar container generally used in a retail establishment by a customer for
the purpose of transporting goods of any kind;

(((19)))
(21) "Parking area" means a parking lot or other property
provided by retailers for use by a customer for parking an automobile or other
vehicle.

Sec.
4. RCW
9A.56.110 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 4 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

"Extortion"
means knowingly to obtain or attempt to obtain by threat property or services
of the owner, ((as defined in RCW 9A.56.010(8))) and specifically
includes sexual favors.

Sec.
5. RCW
9A.56.040 and 1995 c 129 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of theft in the second degree if he or she commits theft of:

(a)
Property or services which exceed(s) two hundred and fifty dollars in value
other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010, but does not exceed one
thousand five hundred dollars in value; or

(b)
A public record, writing, or instrument kept, filed, or deposited according to
law with or in the keeping of any public office or public servant; or

(c)
An access device; or

(d)
A motor vehicle, of a value less than one thousand five hundred dollars; or

(e)
A check or draft.

(2)
Theft in the second degree is a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---