BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.21.290 and 1965 c 7 s 35.21.290 are each amended to read as follows:

Cities
and towns owning their own waterworks, or electric light or power plants shall
have a lien against the premises to which water, electric light, or power
services were furnished for four months charges therefor due or to become due,
but not for any charges more than four months past due: PROVIDED, That the
owner of the premises or the owner of a delinquent mortgage thereon may give
written notice to the superintendent or other head of such works or plant to
cut off service to such premises accompanied by payment or tender of payment of
the then delinquent and unpaid charges for such service against the premises
together with the cut-off charge, whereupon the city or town shall have no lien
against the premises for charges for such service thereafter furnished, nor
shall the owner of the premises or the owner of a delinquent mortgage thereon
be held for the payment thereof.

All
charges made for utility services must be charged to the customer who contracts
for the services. In cases where the service contract is with the tenant of a
property, collection of charges must be made from the tenant, and liens against
the property owner are prohibited. A city or town may not refuse to provide
service to a residential customer who is a tenant based on the nonpayment for
services by the prior customer. The city or town may refuse to provide service
if the prior nonpaying customer continues to reside in the premises.

Sec.
2. RCW
35.67.200 and 1991 c 36 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Cities
and towns owning their own sewer systems shall have a lien for delinquent and
unpaid rates and charges for sewer service, penalties levied pursuant to RCW
35.67.190, and connection charges, including interest thereon, against the
premises to which such service has been furnished or is available, which lien
shall be superior to all other liens and encumbrances except general taxes and
local and special assessments. The city or town by ordinance may provide that
delinquent charges shall bear interest at not exceeding eight percent per annum
computed on a monthly basis: PROVIDED, That a city or town using the property
tax system for utility billing may, by resolution or ordinance, adopt the
alternative lien procedure as set forth in RCW 35.67.215.

All
charges made for utility services must be charged to the customer who contracts
for the services. In cases where the service contract is with the tenant of a
property, collection of charges must be made from the tenant, and liens against
the property owner are prohibited. A city or town may not refuse to provide
service to a residential customer who is a tenant based on the nonpayment for
services by the prior customer. The city or town may refuse to provide service
if the prior nonpaying customer continues to reside in the premises.

Sec.
3. RCW
36.94.150 and 1997 c 393 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

All
counties operating a system of sewerage and/or water shall have a lien for
delinquent connection charges and charges for the availability of sewerage
and/or water service, together with interest fixed by resolution at eight
percent per annum from the date due until paid. Penalties of not more than ten
percent of the amount due may be imposed in case of failure to pay the charges
at times fixed by resolution. The lien shall be for all charges, interest, and
penalties and shall attach to the premises to which the services were
available. The lien shall be superior to all other liens and encumbrances, except
general taxes and local and special assessments of the county.

The
county department established in RCW 36.94.120 shall certify periodically the
delinquencies to the auditor of the county at which time the lien shall attach.

Upon
the expiration of sixty days after the attachment of the lien, the county may
bring suit in foreclosure by civil action in the superior court of the county
where the property is located. Costs associated with the foreclosure of the
lien, including but not limited to advertising, title report, and personnel
costs, shall be added to the lien upon filing of the foreclosure action. In
addition to the costs and disbursements provided by statute, the court may
allow the county a reasonable attorney's fee. The lien shall be foreclosed in
the same manner as the foreclosure of real property tax liens.

All
charges made for utility services must be charged to the customer who contracts
for the services. In cases where the service contract is with the tenant of a
property, collection of charges must be made from the tenant, and liens against
the property owner are prohibited. A county may not refuse to provide service
to a residential customer who is a tenant based on the nonpayment for services
by the prior customer. The county may refuse to provide service if the prior
nonpaying customer continues to reside in the premises.

Sec.
4. RCW
57.08.081 and 1998 c 285 s 2 and 1998 c 106 s 9 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
The commissioners of any district shall provide for revenues by fixing rates
and charges for furnishing sewer and drainage service and facilities to those
to whom service is available or for providing water, such rates and charges to
be fixed as deemed necessary by the commissioners, so that uniform charges will
be made for the same class of customer or service and facility. Rates and
charges may be combined for the furnishing of more than one type of sewer or
drainage service and facilities.

(2)
In classifying customers of such water, sewer, or drainage system, the board of
commissioners may in its discretion consider any or all of the following
factors: The difference in cost to various customers; the location of the
various customers within and without the district; the difference in cost of
maintenance, operation, repair, and replacement of the various parts of the
system; the different character of the service furnished various customers; the
quantity and quality of the service and facility furnished; the time of its
use; the achievement of water conservation goals and the discouragement of
wasteful practices; capital contributions made to the system including but not
limited to assessments; and any other matters which present a reasonable difference
as a ground for distinction. Rates shall be established as deemed proper by
the commissioners and as fixed by resolution and shall produce revenues
sufficient to take care of the costs of maintenance and operation, revenue bond
and warrant interest and principal amortization requirements, and all other
charges necessary for efficient and proper operation of the system. Prior to
furnishing services, a district may require a deposit to guarantee payment for
services. However, failure to require a deposit does not affect the validity
of any lien authorized by this section.

(3)
The commissioners shall enforce collection of connection charges, and rates and
charges for water supplied against property owners connecting with the system
or receiving such water, and for sewer and drainage services charged against
property to which and its owners to whom the service is available, such charges
being deemed charges against the property served, by addition of penalties of
not more than ten percent thereof in case of failure to pay the charges at
times fixed by resolution. The commissioners may provide by resolution that
where either connection charges or rates and charges for services supplied are
delinquent for any specified period of time, the district shall certify the
delinquencies to the auditor of the county in which the real property is
located, and the charges and any penalties added thereto and interest thereon
at the rate of not more than the prime lending rate of the district's bank plus
four percentage points per year shall be a lien against the property upon which
the service was received, subject only to the lien for general taxes.

(4)
All charges made for utility services must be charged to the customer who
contracts for the services. In cases where the service contract is with the
tenant of a property, collection of charges must be made from the tenant, and
liens against the property owner are prohibited. A district may not refuse to
provide service to a residential customer who is a tenant based on the
nonpayment for services by the prior customer. The district may refuse to
provide service if the prior nonpaying customer continues to reside in the
premises.

(5)
The district may, at any time after the connection charges or rates and charges
for services supplied or available and penalties are delinquent for a period of
sixty days, bring suit in foreclosure by civil action in the superior court of
the county in which the real property is located. The court may allow, in
addition to the costs and disbursements provided by statute, attorneys' fees,
title search and report costs, and expenses as it adjudges reasonable. The
action shall be in rem, and may be brought in the name of the district against
an individual or against all of those who are delinquent in one action. The
laws and rules of the court shall control as in other civil actions.

(((5)))
(6) In addition to the right to foreclose provided in this section, the
district may also cut off all or part of the service after charges for water or
sewer service supplied or available are delinquent for a period of thirty days.

(((6)))
(7) A district may determine how to apply partial payments on past due
accounts.

(((7)))
(8) A district may provide a real property owner or the owner's designee
with duplicate bills for service to tenants, or may notify an owner or the
owner's designee that a tenant's service account is delinquent. However, if an
owner or the owner's designee notifies the district in writing that a property
served by the district is a rental property, asks to be notified of a tenant's
delinquency, and has provided, in writing, a complete and accurate mailing
address, the district shall notify the owner or the owner's designee of a
tenant's delinquency at the same time and in the same manner the district
notifies the tenant of the tenant's delinquency or by mail. When a district
provides a real property owner or the owner's designee with duplicates of
tenant utility service bills or notice that a tenant's utility account is
delinquent, the district shall notify the tenant that it is providing the
duplicate bills or delinquency notice to the owner or the owner's designee.
After January 1, 1999, if a district fails to notify the owner of a tenant's
delinquency after receiving a written request to do so and after receiving the
other information required by this subsection (((7))) (8), the
district shall have no lien against the premises for the tenant's delinquent
and unpaid charges.

Sec.
5. RCW
80.28.010 and 1995 c 399 s 211 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All charges made, demanded or received by any gas company, electrical company
or water company for gas, electricity or water, or for any service rendered or
to be rendered in connection therewith, shall be just, fair, reasonable and
sufficient. To meet the requirements of this subsection, all charges made
for utility services must be charged to the customer who contracts for the
services. In cases where the service contract is with the tenant of a
property, collection of charges must be made from the tenant, and liens against
the property owner are prohibited.

(2)
Every gas company, electrical company and water company shall furnish and
supply such service, instrumentalities and facilities as shall be safe,
adequate and efficient, and in all respects just and reasonable.

(3)
All rules and regulations issued by any gas company, electrical company or
water company, affecting or pertaining to the sale or distribution of its
product, shall be just and reasonable.

(4)
Utility service for residential space heating shall not be terminated between
November 15 through March 15 if the customer:

(a)
Notifies the utility of the inability to pay the bill, including a security
deposit. This notice should be provided within five business days of receiving
a payment overdue notice unless there are extenuating circumstances. If the
customer fails to notify the utility within five business days and service is
terminated, the customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and
fulfilling the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this
chapter;

(b)
Provides self-certification of household income for the prior twelve months to
a grantee of the department of community, trade, and economic development which
administers federally funded energy assistance programs. The grantee shall
determine that the household income does not exceed the maximum allowed for
eligibility under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance under 42
U.S.C. 8624 and shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of
household income. The grantee may verify information provided in the
self-certification;

(c)
Has applied for home heating assistance from applicable government and private
sector organizations and certifies that any assistance received will be applied
to the current bill and future utility bills;

(d)
Has applied for low-income weatherization assistance to the utility or other
appropriate agency if such assistance is available for the dwelling;

(e)
Agrees to a payment plan and agrees to maintain the payment plan. The plan
will be designed both to pay the past due bill by the following October 15 and
to pay for continued utility service. If the past due bill is not paid by the
following October 15, the customer shall not be eligible for protections under
this chapter until the past due bill is paid. The plan shall not require
monthly payments in excess of seven percent of the customer's monthly income
plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is made and
thereafter during November 15 through March 15. A customer may agree to pay a
higher percentage during this period, but shall not be in default unless
payment during this period is less than seven percent of monthly income plus
one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is made and
thereafter. If assistance payments are received by the customer subsequent to
implementation of the plan, the customer shall contact the utility to
reformulate the plan; and

(f)
Agrees to pay the moneys owed even if he or she moves.

(5)
The utility shall:

(a)
Include in any notice that an account is delinquent and that service may be
subject to termination, a description of the customer's duties in this section;

(b)
Assist the customer in fulfilling the requirements under this section;

(c)
Be authorized to transfer an account to a new residence when a customer who has
established a plan under this section moves from one residence to another
within the same utility service area;

(d)
Be permitted to disconnect service if the customer fails to honor the payment
program. Utilities may continue to disconnect service for those practices
authorized by law other than for nonpayment as provided for in this
subsection. Customers who qualify for payment plans under this section who
default on their payment plans and are disconnected can be reconnected and
maintain the protections afforded under this chapter by paying reconnection
charges, if any, and by paying all amounts that would have been due and owing
under the terms of the applicable payment plan, absent default, on the date on
which service is reconnected; and

(e)
Advise the customer in writing at the time it disconnects service that it will
restore service if the customer contacts the utility and fulfills the other
requirements of this section.

(6)
A payment plan implemented under this section ((is)) must be
consistent with RCW 80.28.080.

(7)
Every gas company and electrical company shall offer residential customers the
option of a budget billing or equal payment plan. The budget billing or equal
payment plan shall be offered low-income customers eligible under the state's
plan for low-income energy assistance prepared in accordance with 42 U.S.C.
8624(C)(1) without limiting availability to certain months of the year, without
regard to the length of time the customer has occupied the premises, and
without regard to whether the customer is the tenant or owner of the premises
occupied.

(8)
A gas company, electric company, or water company may not refuse to provide
service to a residential customer who is a tenant based on the nonpayment for
services by the prior customer. The company may refuse to provide service if
the prior nonpaying customer continues to reside in the premises.

(9)
Every gas company, electrical company and water company shall construct and
maintain such facilities in connection with the manufacture and distribution of
its product as will be efficient and safe to its employees and the public.

(((9)))
(10) An agreement between the customer and the utility, whether oral or
written, shall not waive the protections afforded under this chapter.

(((10))) (11) In establishing rates or charges for
water service, water companies as defined in RCW 80.04.010 may consider the
achievement of water conservation goals and the discouragement of wasteful
water use practices.

---
END ---