BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that traditional funding for the fair fund was reduced in
1998 by temporarily eliminating the parimutuel tax as a source of revenue. The
legislature declares that a one-time appropriation is necessary to replace the
loss of parimutuel tax revenue for fiscal years 1999, 2000, and 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of six million dollars is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
1999, from the general fund to the fair fund for the purposes set forth under
RCW 15.76.115. Of this amount, up to two million dollars shall be allotted
from the fair fund for each of the fiscal years ending June 30, 1999, June 30,
2000, and June 30, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---