BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.120 and 1998 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

When
a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose punishment as
provided in this section.

(1)
Except as authorized in subsections (2), (4), (5), and (6)((, and (8)))
of this section, the court shall impose a sentence within the sentence range
for the offense.

(2)
The court may impose a sentence outside the standard sentence range for that
offense if it finds, considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are
substantial and compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

(3)
Whenever a sentence outside the standard range is imposed, the court shall set
forth the reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions
of law. A sentence outside the standard range shall be a determinate sentence.

(4)
A persistent offender shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement for
life without the possibility of parole or, when authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for
the crime of aggravated murder in the first degree, sentenced to death,
notwithstanding the maximum sentence under any other law. An offender
convicted of the crime of murder in the first degree shall be sentenced to a
term of total confinement not less than twenty years. An offender convicted of
the crime of assault in the first degree or assault of a child in the first
degree where the offender used force or means likely to result in death or
intended to kill the victim shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement
not less than five years. An offender convicted of the crime of rape in the
first degree shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than
five years. The foregoing minimum terms of total confinement are mandatory and
shall not be varied or modified as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
In addition, all offenders subject to the provisions of this subsection shall
not be eligible for community custody, earned early release time, furlough, home
detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form of
early release as defined under RCW 9.94A.150 (1), (2), (3), (5), or (7),
((or (8),)) or any other form of authorized leave of absence from the
correctional facility while not in the direct custody of a corrections officer
or officers during such minimum terms of total confinement except in the case
of an offender in need of emergency medical treatment or for the purpose of
commitment to an inpatient treatment facility in the case of an offender
convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree.

(5)
In sentencing a first-time offender the court may waive the imposition of a
sentence within the sentence range and impose a sentence which may include up
to ninety days of confinement in a facility operated or utilized under contract
by the county and a requirement that the offender refrain from committing new
offenses. The sentence may also include up to two years of community
supervision, which, in addition to crime-related prohibitions, may include
requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(a)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(b)
Undergo available outpatient treatment for up to two years, or inpatient
treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement for that offense;

(c)
Pursue a prescribed, secular course of study or vocational training;

(d)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(e)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer; or

(f)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030
and/or perform community service work.

(6)(a)
An offender is eligible for the special drug offender sentencing alternative
if:

(i)
The offender is convicted of the manufacture, delivery, or possession with
intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule
I or II that is a narcotic drug or a felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW or
RCW 69.50.407, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes, and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.310 (3) or (4);

(ii)
The offender has no prior convictions for a felony in this state, another state,
or the United States; and

(iii)
The offense involved only a small quantity of the particular controlled
substance as determined by the judge upon consideration of such factors as the
weight, purity, packaging, sale price, and street value of the controlled
substance.

(b)
If the midpoint of the standard range is greater than one year and the
sentencing judge determines that the offender is eligible for this option and
that the offender and the community will benefit from the use of the special
drug offender sentencing alternative, the judge may waive imposition of a
sentence within the standard range and impose a sentence that must include a
period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half of the midpoint of
the standard range. During incarceration in the state facility, offenders
sentenced under this subsection shall undergo a comprehensive substance abuse
assessment and receive, within available resources, treatment services
appropriate for the offender. The treatment services shall be designed by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health
services, in cooperation with the department of corrections. If the midpoint
of the standard range is twenty-four months or less, no more than three months
of the sentence may be served in a work release status. The court shall also
impose one year of concurrent community custody and community supervision that
must include appropriate outpatient substance abuse treatment, crime-related
prohibitions including a condition not to use illegal controlled substances,
and a requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to monitor that
status. The court may require that the monitoring for controlled substances be
conducted by the department or by a treatment alternatives to street crime
program or a comparable court or agency-referred program. The offender may be
required to pay thirty dollars per month while on community custody to offset
the cost of monitoring. In addition, the court shall impose three or more of
the following conditions:

(i)
Devote time to a specific employment or training;

(ii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer before any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(iii)
Report as directed to a community corrections officer;

(iv)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations;

(v)
Perform community service work;

(vi)
Stay out of areas designated by the sentencing judge.

(c)
If the offender violates any of the sentence conditions in (b) of this
subsection, the department shall impose sanctions administratively, with notice
to the prosecuting attorney and the sentencing court. Upon motion of the court
or the prosecuting attorney, a violation hearing shall be held by the court.
If the court finds that conditions have been willfully violated, the court may
impose confinement consisting of up to the remaining one-half of the midpoint
of the standard range. All total confinement served during the period of community
custody shall be credited to the offender, regardless of whether the total
confinement is served as a result of the original sentence, as a result of a
sanction imposed by the department, or as a result of a violation found by the
court. The term of community supervision shall be tolled by any period of time
served in total confinement as a result of a violation found by the court.

(d)
The department shall determine the rules for calculating the value of a day
fine based on the offender's income and reasonable obligations which the
offender has for the support of the offender and any dependents. These rules
shall be developed in consultation with the administrator for the courts, the
office of financial management, and the commission.

(7)
If a sentence range has not been established for the defendant's crime, the
court shall impose a determinate sentence which may include not more than one
year of confinement, community service work, a term of community supervision
not to exceed one year, and/or other legal financial obligations. The court
may impose a sentence which provides more than one year of confinement if the
court finds, considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are
substantial and compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

(8)(((a)(i)
When an offender is convicted of a sex offense other than a violation of RCW
9A.44.050 or a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense and has no
prior convictions for a sex offense or any other felony sex offenses in this or
any other state, the sentencing court, on its own motion or the motion of the
state or the defendant, may order an examination to determine whether the
defendant is amenable to treatment.

The
report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The
defendant's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
defendant's offense history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged
deviant behaviors, the offender's social and employment situation, and other
evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the
evaluator's information.

The
examiner shall assess and report regarding the defendant's amenability to
treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall
be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(A)
Frequency and type of contact between offender and therapist;

(B)
Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and description of planned
treatment modalities;

(C)
Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions,
lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members and others;

(D)
Anticipated length of treatment; and

(E)
Recommended crime-related prohibitions.

The
court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a
second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The defendant
shall pay the cost of any second examination ordered unless the court finds the
defendant to be indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(ii)
After receipt of the reports, the court shall consider whether the offender and
the community will benefit from use of this special sex offender sentencing
alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should
receive a treatment disposition under this subsection. If the court determines
that this special sex offender sentencing alternative is appropriate, the court
shall then impose a sentence within the sentence range. If this sentence is
less than eleven years of confinement, the court may suspend the execution of
the sentence and impose the following conditions of suspension:

(A)
The court shall place the defendant on community custody for the length of the
suspended sentence or three years, whichever is greater, and require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department of corrections
under subsection (14) of this section;

(B)
The court shall order treatment for any period up to three years in duration.
The court in its discretion shall order outpatient sex offender treatment or
inpatient sex offender treatment, if available. A community mental health
center may not be used for such treatment unless it has an appropriate program
designed for sex offender treatment. The offender shall not change sex
offender treatment providers or treatment conditions without first notifying
the prosecutor, the community corrections officer, and the court, and shall not
change providers without court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or
community corrections officer object to the change. In addition, as conditions
of the suspended sentence, the court may impose other sentence conditions
including up to six months of confinement, not to exceed the sentence range of
confinement for that offense, crime-related prohibitions, and requirements that
the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(I)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(II)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(III)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer;

(IV)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030,
perform community service work, or any combination thereof; or

(V)
Make recoupment to the victim for the cost of any counseling required as a
result of the offender's crime; and

(C)
Sex offenders sentenced under this special sex offender sentencing alternative
are not eligible to accrue any earned early release time while serving a
suspended sentence.

(iii)
The sex offender therapist shall submit quarterly reports on the defendant's
progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The report shall reference
the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of
attendance, defendant's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the
defendant's relative progress in treatment, and any other material as specified
by the court at sentencing.

(iv)
At the time of sentencing, the court shall set a treatment termination hearing
for three months prior to the anticipated date for completion of treatment.
Prior to the treatment termination hearing, the treatment professional and
community corrections officer shall submit written reports to the court and
parties regarding the defendant's compliance with treatment and monitoring
requirements, and recommendations regarding termination from treatment,
including proposed community supervision conditions. Either party may request
and the court may order another evaluation regarding the advisability of
termination from treatment. The defendant shall pay the cost of any additional
evaluation ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent in which
case the state shall pay the cost. At the treatment termination hearing the
court may: (A) Modify conditions of community custody, and either (B)
terminate treatment, or (C) extend treatment for up to the remaining period of
community custody.

(v)
If a violation of conditions occurs during community custody, the department
shall either impose sanctions as provided for in RCW 9.94A.205(2)(a) or refer
the violation to the court and recommend revocation of the suspended sentence
as provided for in (a)(vi) of this subsection.

(vi)
The court may revoke the suspended sentence at any time during the period of
community custody and order execution of the sentence if: (A) The defendant
violates the conditions of the suspended sentence, or (B) the court finds that
the defendant is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment. All
confinement time served during the period of community custody shall be
credited to the offender if the suspended sentence is revoked.

(vii)
Except as provided in (a)(viii) of this subsection, after July 1, 1991,
examinations and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be
conducted by sex offender treatment providers certified by the department of
health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW.

(viii)
A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a sex offender pursuant to this
subsection (8) does not have to be certified by the department of health
pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court finds that: (A) The offender has
already moved to another state or plans to move to another state for reasons
other than circumventing the certification requirements; (B) no certified
providers are available for treatment within a reasonable geographical distance
of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and treatment plan comply with
this subsection (8) and the rules adopted by the department of health.

(ix)
For purposes of this subsection (8), "victim" means any person who
has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person
or property as a result of the crime charged. "Victim" also means a
parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or
guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

(x)
If the defendant was less than eighteen years of age when the charge was filed,
the state shall pay for the cost of initial evaluation and treatment.

(b)
When an offender commits any felony sex offense on or after July 1, 1987, and
is sentenced to a term of confinement of more than one year but less than six
years, the sentencing court may, on its own motion or on the motion of the
offender or the state, request the department of corrections to evaluate
whether the offender is amenable to treatment and the department may place the
offender in a treatment program within a correctional facility operated by the
department.

Except
for an offender who has been convicted of a violation of RCW 9A.44.040 or
9A.44.050, if the offender completes the treatment program before the
expiration of his or her term of confinement, the department of corrections may
request the court to convert the balance of confinement to community
supervision and to place conditions on the offender including crime-related
prohibitions and requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the
following:

(i)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(ii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(iii)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer;

(iv)
Undergo available outpatient treatment.

If
the offender violates any of the terms of his or her community supervision, the
court may order the offender to serve out the balance of his or her community
supervision term in confinement in the custody of the department of
corrections.

Nothing
in this subsection (8)(b) shall confer eligibility for such programs for
offenders convicted and sentenced for a sex offense committed prior to July 1,
1987. This subsection (8)(b) does not apply to any crime committed after July
1, 1990.

(c)
Offenders convicted and sentenced for a sex offense committed prior to July 1,
1987, may, subject to available funds, request an evaluation by the department
of corrections to determine whether they are amenable to treatment. If the
offender is determined to be amenable to treatment, the offender may request
placement in a treatment program within a correctional facility operated by the
department. Placement in such treatment program is subject to available funds.

(9)))(a)
When a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the custody
of the department of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense or
a serious violent offense committed after July 1, 1988, but before July 1,
1990, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the second degree,
any crime against a person where it is determined in accordance with RCW 9.94A.125
that the defendant or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon at the time
of commission, or any felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW not
sentenced under subsection (6) of this section, committed on or after July 1,
1988, the court shall in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence
the offender to a one-year term of community placement beginning either upon
completion of the term of confinement or at such time as the offender is
transferred to community custody in lieu of earned early release in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). When the court sentences an offender under
this subsection to the statutory maximum period of confinement then the
community placement portion of the sentence shall consist entirely of such community
custody to which the offender may become eligible, in accordance with RCW
9.94A.150 (1) and (2). Any period of community custody actually served shall
be credited against the community placement portion of the sentence.

(b)
When a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the custody
of the department of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense
committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before June 6, 1996, a serious violent
offense, vehicular homicide, or vehicular assault, committed on or after July
1, 1990, the court shall in addition to other terms of the sentence, sentence
the offender to community placement for two years or up to the period of earned
early release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is
longer. The community placement shall begin either upon completion of the term
of confinement or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1)
and (2). When the court sentences an offender under this subsection to the
statutory maximum period of confinement then the community placement portion of
the sentence shall consist entirely of the community custody to which the
offender may become eligible, in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2).
Any period of community custody actually served shall be credited against the
community placement portion of the sentence. Unless a condition is waived by
the court, the terms of community placement for offenders sentenced pursuant to
this section shall include the following conditions:

(i)
The offender shall report to and be available for contact with the assigned
community corrections officer as directed;

(ii)
The offender shall work at department of corrections-approved education,
employment, and/or community service;

(iii)
The offender shall not possess or consume controlled substances except pursuant
to lawfully issued prescriptions;

(iv)
The offender shall pay supervision fees as determined by the department of
corrections;

(v)
The residence location and living arrangements are subject to the prior
approval of the department of corrections during the period of community
placement; and

(vi)
The offender shall submit to affirmative acts necessary to monitor compliance
with the orders of the court as required by the department.

(c)
As a part of any sentence imposed under (a) or (b) of this subsection, the
court may also order any of the following special conditions:

(i)
The offender shall remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical
boundary;

(ii)
The offender shall not have direct or indirect contact with the victim of the
crime or a specified class of individuals;

(iii)
The offender shall participate in crime-related treatment or counseling
services;

(iv)
The offender shall not consume alcohol;

(v)
The offender shall comply with any crime-related prohibitions; or

(vi)
For an offender convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim after
June 6, 1996, the offender shall comply with any terms and conditions of
community placement imposed by the department of corrections relating to
contact between the sex offender and a minor victim or a child of similar age
or circumstance as a previous victim.

(d)
Prior to transfer to, or during, community placement, any conditions of
community placement may be removed or modified so as not to be more restrictive
by the sentencing court, upon recommendation of the department of corrections.

(((10)))
(9)(a) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the department
of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense committed on or
after June 6, 1996, the court shall, in addition to other terms of the
sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for three years or up to
the period of earned early release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and
(2), whichever is longer. The community custody shall begin either upon
completion of the term of confinement or at such time as the offender is
transferred to community custody in lieu of earned early release in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2).

(b)
Unless a condition is waived by the court, the terms of community custody shall
be the same as those provided for in subsection (((9))) (8)(b) of
this section and may include those provided for in subsection (((9))) (8)(c)
of this section. As part of any sentence that includes a term of community
custody imposed under this subsection, the court shall also require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department of corrections
under subsection (((14))) (13) of this section.

(c)
At any time prior to the completion of a sex offender's term of community
custody, if the court finds that public safety would be enhanced, the court may
impose and enforce an order extending any or all of the conditions imposed
pursuant to this section for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for
the crime as it is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the
expiration of the offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a
condition extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of the
sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.195 and may be punishable as contempt of
court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040.

(((11)))
(10) If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty
days or less, the court may, in its discretion, specify that the sentence be
served on consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence requiring more than
thirty days of confinement shall be served on consecutive days. Local jail
administrators may schedule court-ordered intermittent sentences as space
permits.

(((12)))
(11) If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial
obligation, the sentence shall specify the total amount of the legal financial
obligation owed, and shall require the offender to pay a specified monthly sum
toward that legal financial obligation. Restitution to victims shall be paid
prior to any other payments of monetary obligations. Any legal financial
obligation that is imposed by the court may be collected by the department,
which shall deliver the amount paid to the county clerk for credit. The
offender's compliance with payment of legal financial obligations shall be
supervised by the department for ten years following the entry of the judgment
and sentence or ten years following the offender's release from total
confinement. All monetary payments ordered shall be paid no later than ten
years after the last date of release from confinement pursuant to a felony
conviction or the date the sentence was entered unless the superior court
extends the criminal judgment an additional ten years. If the legal financial
obligations including crime victims' assessments are not paid during the
initial ten-year period, the superior court may extend jurisdiction under the
criminal judgment an additional ten years as provided in RCW 9.94A.140,
9.94A.142, and 9.94A.145. If jurisdiction under the criminal judgment is
extended, the department is not responsible for supervision of the offender
during the subsequent period. Independent of the department, the party or
entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed shall have the authority
to utilize any other remedies available to the party or entity to collect the
legal financial obligation. Nothing in this section makes the department, the
state, or any of its employees, agents, or other persons acting on their behalf
liable under any circumstances for the payment of these legal financial
obligations. If an order includes restitution as one of the monetary
assessments, the county clerk shall make disbursements to victims named in the
order.

(((13)))
(12) Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.140(1) and 9.94A.142(1), a court
may not impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or community
supervision or community placement which exceeds the statutory maximum for the
crime as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(((14)))
(13) All offenders sentenced to terms involving community supervision,
community service, community placement, or legal financial obligation shall be
under the supervision of the department of corrections and shall follow
explicitly the instructions and conditions of the department of corrections.
The department may require an offender to perform affirmative acts it deems
appropriate to monitor compliance with the conditions of the sentence imposed.

(a)
The instructions shall include, at a minimum, reporting as directed to a
community corrections officer, remaining within prescribed geographical
boundaries, notifying the community corrections officer of any change in the
offender's address or employment, and paying the supervision fee assessment.

(b)
For offenders sentenced to terms involving community custody for crimes
committed on or after June 6, 1996, the department may include, in addition to
the instructions in (a) of this subsection, any appropriate conditions of
supervision, including but not limited to, prohibiting the offender from having
contact with any other specified individuals or specific class of individuals.
The conditions authorized under this subsection (((14))) (13)(b)
may be imposed by the department prior to or during an offender's community
custody term. If a violation of conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to subsection (((10))) (9) of this section
occurs during community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of community
placement for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.207 and shall authorize the department
to transfer an offender to a more restrictive confinement status as provided in
RCW 9.94A.205. At any time prior to the completion of a sex offender's term of
community custody, the department may recommend to the court that any or all of
the conditions imposed by the court or the department pursuant to subsection (((10)))
(9) of this section be continued beyond the expiration of the offender's
term of community custody as authorized in subsection (((10))) (9)(c)
of this section.

The
department may require offenders to pay for special services rendered on or
after July 25, 1993, including electronic monitoring, day reporting, and
telephone reporting, dependent upon the offender's ability to pay. The
department may pay for these services for offenders who are not able to pay.

(((15)))
(14) All offenders sentenced to terms involving community supervision,
community service, or community placement under the supervision of the
department of corrections shall not own, use, or possess firearms or
ammunition. Offenders who own, use, or are found to be in actual or
constructive possession of firearms or ammunition shall be subject to the
appropriate violation process and sanctions. "Constructive
possession" as used in this subsection means the power and intent to
control the firearm or ammunition. "Firearm" as used in this
subsection means a weapon or device from which a projectile may be fired by an
explosive such as gunpowder.

(((16)))
(15) The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all
confinement time served before the sentencing if that confinement was solely in
regard to the offense for which the offender is being sentenced.

(((17)))
(16) A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.400 (1) and (2)
governing whether sentences are to be served consecutively or concurrently is
an exceptional sentence subject to the limitations in subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, and may be appealed by the defendant or the state as set forth
in RCW 9.94A.210 (2) through (6).

(((18)))
(17) The court shall order restitution whenever the offender is
convicted of a felony that results in injury to any person or damage to or loss
of property, whether the offender is sentenced to confinement or placed under
community supervision, unless extraordinary circumstances exist that make
restitution inappropriate in the court's judgment. The court shall set forth
the extraordinary circumstances in the record if it does not order restitution.

(((19)))
(18) As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce an
order that relates directly to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, prohibiting the offender from having any contact
with other specified individuals or a specific class of individuals for a
period not to exceed the maximum allowable sentence for the crime, regardless
of the expiration of the offender's term of community supervision or community
placement.

(((20)))
(19) The court may order an offender whose sentence includes community
placement or community supervision to undergo a mental status evaluation and to
participate in available outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds
that reasonable grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill
person as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable, mental
status evaluations that have been filed with the court to determine the
offender's competency or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may
order additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.

(((21)))
(20) In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require the
defendant to serve the partial confinement in work release, in a program of
home detention, on work crew, or in a combined program of work crew and home
detention.

(((22)))
(21) All court-ordered legal financial obligations collected by the
department and remitted to the county clerk shall be credited and paid where
restitution is ordered. Restitution shall be paid prior to any other payments
of monetary obligations.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.030 and 1998 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department
of corrections, means that the department is responsible for monitoring and
enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial
obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with
current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk
without depositing it in a departmental account.

(2)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(3)
"Community corrections officer" means an employee of the department
who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced
offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(4)
"Community custody" means that portion of an inmate's sentence of
confinement in lieu of earned early release time or imposed pursuant to RCW
9.94A.120 (6), (((8), or (10))) (7), or (9) served in the
community subject to controls placed on the inmate's movement and activities by
the department of corrections.

(5)
"Community placement" means that period during which the offender is
subject to the conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision,
which begins either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease
supervision) or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned early release. Community placement may consist of
entirely community custody, entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination
of the two.

(6)
"Community service" means compulsory service, without compensation,
performed for the benefit of the community by the offender.

(7)
"Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence
conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or
46.61.524. For first-time offenders, the supervision may include crime-related
prohibitions and other conditions imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(5). For
purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state supervision of parolees and
probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community supervision is the functional equivalent
of probation and should be considered the same as probation by other states.

(8)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement as defined in this
section.

(9)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(10)
"Court-ordered legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that
is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal financial
obligations which may include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed
crime victims' compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court
costs, county or interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and
costs of defense, fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to
the offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular
assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense of an
emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction, subject to the
provisions in RCW 38.52.430.

(11)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs
or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts
necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by
the department.

(12)
"Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions
and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or
elsewhere. The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms
thereof; and (b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(13)
"Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing judge that equals
the difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(14)
"Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to
monitor the defendant's daily activities and compliance with sentence
conditions, and in which the defendant is required to report daily to a
specific location designated by the department or the sentencing judge.

(15)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(16)
"Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude
the number of actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial
confinement, of community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of
community service work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation.
The fact that an offender through "earned early release" can reduce
the actual period of confinement shall not affect the classification of the
sentence as a determinate sentence.

(17)
"Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
individual remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount
required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this definition,
"earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services,
whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and,
notwithstanding any other provision of law making the payments exempt from
garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal
financial obligation, specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to
pension or retirement programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not
include payments made under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020
and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.

(18)
"Drug offense" means:

(a)
Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance
(RCW 69.50.403);

(b)
Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates to the
possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled
substance; or

(c)
Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state
would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(19)
"Escape" means:

(a)
Escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful
failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be
available for supervision by the department while in community custody (RCW
72.09.310); or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this
subsection.

(20)
"Felony traffic offense" means:

(a)
Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding
a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW
46.52.020(4)); or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(21)
"Fines" means the requirement that the offender pay a specific sum of
money over a specific period of time to the court.

(22)
"First-time offender" means any person who is convicted of a felony
(a) not classified as a violent offense or a sex offense under this chapter, or
(b) that is not the manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to
manufacture or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II
that is a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, nor the
manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine,
its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers as defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2),
nor the selling for profit of any controlled substance or counterfeit substance
classified in Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of
marihuana, who previously has never been convicted of a felony in this state,
federal court, or another state, and who has never participated in a program of
deferred prosecution for a felony offense.

(23)
"Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a
felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing or
hereafter amended:

(a)
Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation
of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b)
Assault in the second degree;

(c)
Assault of a child in the second degree;

(d)
Child molestation in the second degree;

(e)
Controlled substance homicide;

(f)
Extortion in the first degree;

(g)
Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h)
Indecent liberties;

(i)
Kidnapping in the second degree;

(j)
Leading organized crime;

(k)
Manslaughter in the first degree;

(l)
Manslaughter in the second degree;

(m)
Promoting prostitution in the first degree;

(n)
Rape in the third degree;

(o)
Robbery in the second degree;

(p)
Sexual exploitation;

(q)
Vehicular assault;

(r)
Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by
any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as
defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(s)
Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as
"sexual motivation" is defined under this section;

(t)
Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.125;

(u)
Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is
comparable to a most serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and
(c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979,
RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June
11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988;

(ii)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it
existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed
against a child under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the
victim and perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties
under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27,
1997, or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through
July 27, 1997.

(24)
"Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(25)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms
"offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(26)
"Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in
a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or
any other unit of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been
ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of
each day with the balance of the day spent in the community. Partial
confinement includes work release, home detention, work crew, and a combination
of work crew and home detention as defined in this section.

(27)
"Persistent offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i)
Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious
offense; and

(ii)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been
convicted as an offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this
state or elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be
considered most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score
under RCW 9.94A.360; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at
least one conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the
other most serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i)
Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the
first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree,
rape of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion; (B) murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second
degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a
child in the first degree, or burglary in the first degree, with a finding of
sexual motivation; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (27)(b)(i); and

(ii)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been
convicted as an offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for
rape of a child in the first degree constitutes a conviction under subsection
(27)(b)(i) only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the offender
committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree
constitutes a conviction under subsection (27)(b)(i) only when the offender was
eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(28)
"Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's community
placement that is not community custody.

(29)
"Restitution" means the requirement that the offender pay a specific
sum of money over a specific period of time to the court as payment of
damages. The sum may include both public and private costs. The imposition of
a restitution order does not preclude civil redress.

(30)
"Serious traffic offense" means:

(a)
Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.502), actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or
hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b)
Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense
under (a) of this subsection.

(31)
"Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and
means:

(a)
Murder in the first degree, homicide by abuse, murder in the second degree,
manslaughter in the first degree, assault in the first degree, kidnapping in
the first degree, or rape in the first degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, or an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit
one of these felonies; or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(32)
"Sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(33)
"Sex offense" means:

(a)
A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW or RCW 9A.64.020 or 9.68A.090
or a felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal
solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;

(b)
A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.127 or 13.40.135;
or

(c)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(34)
"Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the
defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual
gratification.

(35)
"Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries
of a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state
or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(36)
"Transition training" means written and verbal instructions and
assistance provided by the department to the offender during the two weeks
prior to the offender's successful completion of the work ethic camp program.
The transition training shall include instructions in the offender's
requirements and obligations during the offender's period of community custody.

(37)
"Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological,
physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the
crime charged.

(38)
"Violent offense" means:

(a)
Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a
class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second
degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in
the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree,
assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, robbery
in the second degree, drive-by shooting, vehicular assault, and vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b)
Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of
this subsection; and

(c)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b)
of this subsection.

(39)
"Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of
civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community of not less than
thirty-five hours per week that complies with RCW 9.94A.135. The civic
improvement tasks shall have minimal negative impact on existing private
industries or the labor force in the county where the service or labor is
performed. The civic improvement tasks shall not affect employment
opportunities for people with developmental disabilities contracted through
sheltered workshops as defined in RCW 82.04.385. Only those offenders
sentenced to a facility operated or utilized under contract by a county or the
state are eligible to participate on a work crew. Offenders sentenced for a
sex offense as defined in subsection (33) of this section are not eligible for
the work crew program.

(40)
"Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program designed
to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders
to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills development,
substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy training, and basic adult
education.

(41)
"Work release" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study
at school. Participation in work release shall be conditioned upon the
offender attending work or school at regularly defined hours and abiding by the
rules of the work release facility.

(42)
"Home detention" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to
electronic surveillance.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.94A.123 and 1987 c 402 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the sexual offender treatment programs at western and
eastern state hospitals, while not proven to be totally effective, may be of
some benefit in positively affecting the behavior of certain sexual offenders.
Given the significance of the problems of sexual assault and sexual abuse of
children, it is therefore appropriate to review and revise these treatment
efforts.

At
the same time, concerns regarding the lack of adequate security at the existing
programs must be satisfactorily addressed. In an effort to promote public
safety, it is the intent of the legislature to transfer the responsibility for
felony sexual offenders from the department of social and health services to
the department of corrections.

Therefore,
no person committing a felony sexual offense on or after July 1, 1987, may be
committed ((under RCW 9.94A.120(7)(b))) to the department of social and
health services at eastern state hospital or western state hospital. Any
person committed to the department of social and health services under RCW
9.94A.120(7)(b) as existing on June 30, 1987, for an offense committed before
July 1, 1987, and still in the custody of the department of social and health
services on June 30, 1993, shall be transferred to the custody of the
department of corrections. ((Any person eligible for evaluation or
treatment under RCW 9.94A.120(7)(b) shall be committed to the department of
corrections.))

Sec.
4. RCW
9.94A.130 and 1984 c 209 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
power to defer or suspend the imposition or execution of sentence is hereby
abolished in respect to sentences prescribed for felonies committed after June
30, 1984((, except for offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.120(7)(a), the
special sexual offender sentencing alternative, whose sentence may be suspended)).

Sec.
5. RCW
9.94A.137 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
An offender is eligible to be sentenced to a work ethic camp if the offender:

(i)
Is sentenced to a term of total confinement of not less than sixteen months or
more than thirty-six months; and

(ii)
Has no current or prior convictions for any sex offenses or for violent
offenses other than drug offenses for manufacturing, possession, delivery, or
intent to deliver a controlled substance.

(b)
The length of the work ethic camp shall be at least one hundred twenty days and
not more than one hundred eighty days. Because of the conversion ratio, earned
early release time shall not accrue to offenders who successfully complete the
program.

(2)
If the sentencing judge determines that the offender is eligible for the work
ethic camp and is likely to qualify under subsection (3) of this section, the
judge shall impose a sentence within the standard range and may recommend that
the offender serve the sentence at a work ethic camp. The sentence shall
provide that if the offender successfully completes the program, the department
shall convert the period of work ethic camp confinement at the rate of one day
of work ethic camp confinement to three days of total standard confinement. In
sentencing an offender to the work ethic camp, the court shall specify: (a)
That upon completion of the work ethic camp the offender shall be released on
community custody for any remaining time of total confinement; (b) the
applicable conditions of supervision on community custody status as required by
RCW 9.94A.120(((9))) (8)(b) and authorized by RCW 9.94A.120(((9)))
(8)(c); and (c) that violation of the conditions may result in a return
to total confinement for the balance of the offender's remaining time of
confinement.

(3)
The department shall place the offender in the work ethic camp program, subject
to capacity, unless: (a) The department determines that the offender has
physical or mental impairments that would prevent participation and completion
of the program; (b) the department determines that the offender's custody level
prevents placement in the program; or (c) the offender refuses to agree to the
terms and conditions of the program.

(4)
An offender who fails to complete the work ethic camp program, who is
administratively terminated from the program, or who otherwise violates any
conditions of supervision, as defined by the department, shall be reclassified
to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered by the sentencing
judge and shall be subject to all rules relating to earned early release time.

(5)
During the last two weeks prior to release from the work ethic camp program the
department shall provide the offender with comprehensive transition training.

Sec.
6. RCW
9.94A.205 and 1996 c 275 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If an inmate violates any condition or requirement of community custody, the
department may transfer the inmate to a more restrictive confinement status to
serve up to the remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any period
actually spent in community custody or in detention awaiting disposition of an
alleged violation and subject to the limitations of subsection (2) of this
section.

(2)(((a)
For a sex offender sentenced to a term of community custody under RCW
9.94A.120(8) who violates any condition of community custody, the department
may impose a sanction of up to sixty days' confinement in a local correctional
facility for each violation. If the department imposes a sanction, the
department shall submit within seventy-two hours a report to the court and the
prosecuting attorney outlining the violation or violations and the sanctions
imposed.

(b))) For
a sex offender sentenced to a term of community custody under RCW 9.94A.120(((10)))
(9) who violates any condition of community custody after having
completed his or her maximum term of total confinement, including time served
on community custody in lieu of earned early release, the department may impose
a sanction of up to sixty days in a local correctional facility for each
violation.

(3)
If an inmate is accused of violating any condition or requirement of community
custody, he or she is entitled to a hearing before the department prior to the
imposition of sanctions. The hearing shall be considered as inmate
disciplinary proceedings and shall not be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The
department shall develop hearing procedures and sanctions.

Sec.
7. RCW
9.94A.440 and 1996 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Decision not to prosecute.

STANDARD:
A prosecuting attorney may decline to prosecute, even though technically
sufficient evidence to prosecute exists, in situations where prosecution would
serve no public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in
question or would result in decreased respect for the law.

GUIDELINE/COMMENTARY:

Examples

The
following are examples of reasons not to prosecute which could satisfy the
standard.

(a)
Contrary to Legislative Intent - It may be proper to decline to charge where
the application of criminal sanctions would be clearly contrary to the intent
of the legislature in enacting the particular statute.

(b)
Antiquated Statute - It may be proper to decline to charge where the statute in
question is antiquated in that:

(i)
It has not been enforced for many years; and

(ii)
Most members of society act as if it were no longer in existence; and

(iii)
It serves no deterrent or protective purpose in today's society; and

(iv)
The statute has not been recently reconsidered by the legislature.

This
reason is not to be construed as the basis for declining cases because the law
in question is unpopular or because it is difficult to enforce.

(c)
De Minimus Violation - It may be proper to decline to charge where the
violation of law is only technical or insubstantial and where no public
interest or deterrent purpose would be served by prosecution.

(d)
Confinement on Other Charges - It may be proper to decline to charge because
the accused has been sentenced on another charge to a lengthy period of
confinement; and

(i)
Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional direct or
collateral punishment;

(ii)
The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly
aggravated; and

(iii)
Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant deterrent
purpose.

(e)
Pending Conviction on Another Charge - It may be proper to decline to charge
because the accused is facing a pending prosecution in the same or another
county; and

(i)
Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional direct or
collateral punishment;

(ii)
Conviction in the pending prosecution is imminent;

(iii)
The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly
aggravated; and

(iv)
Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant deterrent
purpose.

(f)
High Disproportionate Cost of Prosecution - It may be proper to decline to
charge where the cost of locating or transporting, or the burden on,
prosecution witnesses is highly disproportionate to the importance of
prosecuting the offense in question. This reason should be limited to minor
cases and should not be relied upon in serious cases.

(g)
Improper Motives of Complainant - It may be proper to decline charges because
the motives of the complainant are improper and prosecution would serve no
public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in question or
would result in decreased respect for the law.

(h)
Immunity - It may be proper to decline to charge where immunity is to be given
to an accused in order to prosecute another where the accused's information or
testimony will reasonably lead to the conviction of others who are responsible
for more serious criminal conduct or who represent a greater danger to the
public interest.

(i)
Victim Request - It may be proper to decline to charge because the victim requests
that no criminal charges be filed and the case involves the following crimes or
situations:

(i)
Assault cases where the victim has suffered little or no injury;

(ii)
Crimes against property, not involving violence, where no major loss was suffered;

(iii)
Where doing so would not jeopardize the safety of society.

Care
should be taken to insure that the victim's request is freely made and is not
the product of threats or pressure by the accused.

The
presence of these factors may also justify the decision to dismiss a
prosecution which has been commenced.

Notification

The
prosecutor is encouraged to notify the victim, when practical, and the law
enforcement personnel, of the decision not to prosecute.

(2)
Decision to prosecute.

STANDARD:

Crimes
against persons will be filed if sufficient admissible evidence exists, which,
when considered with the most plausible, reasonably foreseeable defense that
could be raised under the evidence, would justify conviction by a reasonable
and objective fact-finder. ((With regard to offenses prohibited by RCW
9A.44.040, 9A.44.050, 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086,
9A.44.089, and 9A.64.020 the prosecutor should avoid prefiling agreements or diversions
intended to place the accused in a program of treatment or counseling, so that
treatment, if determined to be beneficial, can be provided pursuant to RCW
9.94A.120(8).))

Crimes
against property/other crimes will be filed if the admissible evidence is of
such convincing force as to make it probable that a reasonable and objective
fact-finder would convict after hearing all the admissible evidence and the
most plausible defense that could be raised.

See
table below for the crimes within these categories.

CATEGORIZATION OF CRIMES FOR PROSECUTING STANDARDS

CRIMES AGAINST PERSONS

Aggravated Murder

1st
Degree Murder

2nd
Degree Murder

1st
Degree Kidnaping

1st
Degree Assault

1st
Degree Assault of a Child

1st
Degree Rape

1st
Degree Robbery

1st
Degree Rape of a Child

1st
Degree Arson

2nd
Degree Kidnaping

2nd
Degree Assault

2nd
Degree Assault of a Child

2nd
Degree Rape

2nd
Degree Robbery

1st
Degree Burglary

1st
Degree Manslaughter

2nd
Degree Manslaughter

1st
Degree Extortion

Indecent
Liberties

Incest

2nd
Degree Rape of a Child

Vehicular
Homicide

Vehicular
Assault

3rd
Degree Rape

3rd
Degree Rape of a Child

1st
Degree Child Molestation

2nd
Degree Child Molestation

3rd
Degree Child Molestation

2nd
Degree Extortion

1st
Degree Promoting Prostitution

Intimidating
a Juror

Communication
with a Minor

Intimidating
a Witness

Intimidating
a Public Servant

Bomb
Threat (if against person)

3rd
Degree Assault

3rd
Degree Assault of a Child

Unlawful Imprisonment

Promoting a Suicide Attempt

Riot
(if against person)

CRIMES AGAINST PROPERTY/OTHER CRIMES

2nd Degree Arson

1st
Degree Escape

2nd
Degree Burglary

1st
Degree Theft

1st
Degree Perjury

1st
Degree Introducing Contraband

1st
Degree Possession of Stolen Property

Bribery

Bribing
a Witness

Bribe
received by a Witness

Bomb
Threat (if against property)

1st
Degree Malicious Mischief

2nd
Degree Theft

2nd
Degree Escape

2nd
Degree Introducing Contraband

2nd
Degree Possession of Stolen Property

2nd
Degree Malicious Mischief

1st
Degree Reckless Burning

Taking
a Motor Vehicle without Authorization

Forgery

2nd
Degree Perjury

2nd
Degree Promoting Prostitution

Tampering
with a Witness

Trading
in Public Office

Trading
in Special Influence

Receiving/Granting
Unlawful Compensation

Bigamy

Eluding
a Pursuing Police Vehicle

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough

Escape
from Community Custody

Riot
(if against property)

Thefts
of Livestock

ALL
OTHER UNCLASSIFIED FELONIES

Selection
of Charges/Degree of Charge

(1)
The prosecutor should file charges which adequately describe the nature of
defendant's conduct. Other offenses may be charged only if they are necessary
to ensure that the charges:

(a)
Will significantly enhance the strength of the state's case at trial; or

(b)
Will result in restitution to all victims.

(2) The prosecutor should not overcharge to obtain a guilty plea.
Overcharging includes:

(a) Charging a higher degree;

(b)
Charging additional counts.

This
standard is intended to direct prosecutors to charge those crimes which
demonstrate the nature and seriousness of a defendant's criminal conduct, but
to decline to charge crimes which are not necessary to such an indication.
Crimes which do not merge as a matter of law, but which arise from the same
course of conduct, do not all have to be charged.

GUIDELINES/COMMENTARY:

Police Investigation

A
prosecuting attorney is dependent upon law enforcement agencies to conduct the
necessary factual investigation which must precede the decision to prosecute.
The prosecuting attorney shall ensure that a thorough factual investigation has
been conducted before a decision to prosecute is made. In ordinary
circumstances the investigation should include the following:

(1)
The interviewing of all material witnesses, together with the obtaining of
written statements whenever possible;

(2)
The completion of necessary laboratory tests; and

(3)
The obtaining, in accordance with constitutional requirements, of the suspect's
version of the events.

If
the initial investigation is incomplete, a prosecuting attorney should insist
upon further investigation before a decision to prosecute is made, and specify
what the investigation needs to include.

Exceptions

In
certain situations, a prosecuting attorney may authorize filing of a criminal
complaint before the investigation is complete if:

(1)
Probable cause exists to believe the suspect is guilty; and

(2)
The suspect presents a danger to the community or is likely to flee if not
apprehended; or

(3)
The arrest of the suspect is necessary to complete the investigation of the
crime.

In
the event that the exception to the standard is applied, the prosecuting
attorney shall obtain a commitment from the law enforcement agency involved to
complete the investigation in a timely manner. If the subsequent investigation
does not produce sufficient evidence to meet the normal charging standard, the
complaint should be dismissed.

Investigation
Techniques

The
prosecutor should be fully advised of the investigatory techniques that were
used in the case investigation including:

(1)
Polygraph testing;

(2)
Hypnosis;

(3)
Electronic surveillance;

(4)
Use of informants.

Pre-Filing
Discussions with Defendant

Discussions
with the defendant or his/her representative regarding the selection or
disposition of charges may occur prior to the filing of charges, and potential
agreements can be reached.

Pre-Filing
Discussions with Victim(s)

Discussions
with the victim(s) or victims' representatives regarding the selection or
disposition of charges may occur before the filing of charges. The discussions
may be considered by the prosecutor in charging and disposition decisions, and
should be considered before reaching any agreement with the defendant regarding
these decisions.

Sec.
8. RCW
18.155.010 and 1990 c 3 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that sex offender therapists ((who examine and treat sex
offenders pursuant to the special sexual offender sentencing alternative under
RCW 9.94A.120(7)(a) and)) who may treat juvenile sex offenders pursuant to
RCW 13.40.160, play a vital role in protecting the public from juvenile
sex offenders who remain in the community following conviction. The
legislature finds that the qualifications, practices, techniques, and
effectiveness of juvenile sex offender treatment providers vary widely
and that the court's ability to effectively determine the appropriateness of
granting the sentencing alternative and monitoring the offender to ensure
continued protection of the community is undermined by a lack of regulated
practices. The legislature recognizes the right of sex offender therapists to
practice, consistent with the paramount requirements of public safety. Public
safety is best served by regulating sex offender therapists whose clients are
being evaluated and being treated pursuant to RCW ((9.94A.120(7)(a) and))
13.40.160. This chapter shall be construed to require only those sex offender
therapists who examine and treat sex offenders pursuant to RCW ((9.94A.120(7)(a)
and)) 13.40.160 to obtain a sexual offender treatment certification as
provided in this chapter.

Sec.
9. RCW
18.155.020 and 1990 c 3 s 802 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter:

(1)
"Certified sex offender treatment provider" means a licensed,
certified, or registered health professional who is certified to examine and
treat sex offenders pursuant to RCW ((9.94A.120(7)(a) and)) 13.40.160.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(4)
"Sex offender treatment provider" means a person who counsels or
treats sex offenders accused of or convicted of a sex offense as defined by RCW
9.94A.030.

Sec.
10. RCW
18.155.030 and 1990 c 3 s 803 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person shall represent himself or herself as a certified sex offender
treatment provider without first applying for and receiving a certificate
pursuant to this chapter.

(2)
Only a certified sex offender treatment provider may perform or provide the
following services:

(a)
Evaluations conducted for the purposes of and pursuant to RCW ((9.94A.120(7)(a)
and)) 13.40.160;

(b)
Treatment of ((convicted sex offenders who are sentenced and ordered into
treatment pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(7)(a) and)) adjudicated juvenile sex
offenders who are ordered into treatment pursuant to RCW 13.40.160.

Sec.
11. RCW
72.09.340 and 1996 c 215 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In making all discretionary decisions regarding release plans for and
supervision of sex offenders, the department shall set priorities and make
decisions based on an assessment of public safety risks.

(2)
The department shall, no later than September 1, 1996, implement a policy
governing the department's evaluation and approval of release plans for sex
offenders. The policy shall include, at a minimum, a formal process by which victims,
witnesses, and other interested people may provide information and comments to
the department on potential safety risks to specific individuals or classes of
individuals posed by a specific sex offender. The department shall make all
reasonable efforts to publicize the availability of this process through
currently existing mechanisms and shall seek the assistance of courts,
prosecutors, law enforcement, and victims' advocacy groups in doing so. Notice
of an offender's proposed residence shall be provided to all people registered
to receive notice of an offender's release under RCW 9.94A.155(2), except that
in no case may this notification requirement be construed to require an
extension of an offender's release date.

(3)
For any offender convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim after
June 6, 1996, the department shall not approve a residence location if the
proposed residence: (a) Includes a minor victim or child of similar age or
circumstance as a previous victim who the department determines may be put at
substantial risk of harm by the offender's residence in the household; or (b)
is within close proximity of the current residence of a minor victim, unless
the whereabouts of the minor victim cannot be determined or unless such a
restriction would impede family reunification efforts ordered by the court or
directed by the department of social and health services. The department is
further authorized to reject a residence location if the proposed residence is
within close proximity to schools, child care centers, playgrounds, or other
grounds or facilities where children of similar age or circumstance as a
previous victim are present who the department determines may be put at
substantial risk of harm by the sex offender's residence at that location.

(4)
When the department requires supervised visitation as a term or condition of a
sex offender's community placement under RCW 9.94A.120(((9))) (8)(c)(vi),
the department shall, prior to approving a supervisor, consider the following:

(a)
The relationships between the proposed supervisor, the offender, and the minor;
(b) the proposed supervisor's acknowledgment and understanding of the
offender's prior criminal conduct, general knowledge of the dynamics of child
sexual abuse, and willingness and ability to protect the minor from the
potential risks posed by contact with the offender; and (c) recommendations
made by the department of social and health services about the best interests
of the child.

Sec.
12. RCW
88.12.033 and 1998 c 219 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person convicted under RCW 88.12.029 or 88.12.032 shall, as a condition of
community supervision imposed under RCW 9.94A.383 or community placement
imposed under RCW 9.94A.120(((9))) (8), complete a diagnostic
evaluation by an alcohol or drug dependency agency approved by the department
of social and health services or a qualified probation department, defined
under RCW 46.61.516, that has been approved by the department of social and
health services. If the person is found to have an alcohol or drug problem
that requires treatment, the person shall complete treatment in a program
approved by the department of social and health services under chapter 70.96A
RCW. If the person is found not to have an alcohol or drug problem that
requires treatment, he or she shall complete a course in an information school
approved by the department of social and health services under chapter 70.96A
RCW. The convicted person shall pay all costs for any evaluation, education,
or treatment required by this section, unless the person is eligible for an
existing program offered or approved by the department of social and health
services. Nothing in chapter 219, Laws of 1998 requires the addition of new treatment
or assessment facilities nor affects the department of social and health
services use of existing programs and facilities authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. This
act applies to offenses committed after July 31, 1999.

---
END ---