BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
In a civil or criminal action in which all or a part of a record or file
identified in subsection (2) of this section is offered as evidence, the court
may not allow introduction of the offered material without a prior in camera
review of the relevancy of the material.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section applies to the internal affairs files and
personnel records of a limited or general authority Washington law enforcement
agency, as defined in RCW 10.93.020.

(3)
This section does not apply to a record or file pertaining to a law enforcement
officer who is a party to the civil or criminal action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 5 RCW.

---
END ---