BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this act is to facilitate ease of boarding of commuter trains and
light rail trains operated by regional transit authorities by allowing for
barrier free entry ways. This act provides regional transit authorities with
the power to require proof of payment; to set a schedule of fines and penalties
not to exceed those classified as class 1 infractions under RCW 7.80.120; to
employ individuals to monitor fare payment or contract for such services; to
issue citations for fare nonpayment or related activities; and to keep records
regarding citations issued for the purpose of tracking violations and issuing
citations consistent with established schedules. This act is intended to be
consistent with and implemented pursuant to chapter 7.80 RCW with regard to
civil infractions, the issuance of citations, and the maintenance of citation records.

Sec.
2. RCW
81.112.020 and 1992 c 101 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Authority" means a regional transit authority authorized under this
chapter.

(2)
"Board" means the board of a regional transit authority.

(3)
"Service area" or "area" means the area included within the
boundaries of a regional transit authority.

(4)
"System" means a regional transit system authorized under this
chapter and under the jurisdiction of a regional transit authority.

(5)
"Facilities" means any lands, interest in land, air rights over
lands, and improvements thereto including vessel terminals, and any equipment,
vehicles, vessels, and other components necessary to support the system.

(6)
"Proof of payment" means evidence of fare prepayment authorized by a
regional transit authority for the use of trains, including but not limited to
commuter trains and light rail trains.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An authority is authorized to establish, by resolution, a schedule of fines and
penalties for civil infractions established in section 4 of this act. Fines
established by a regional transit authority shall not exceed those imposed for
class 1 infractions under RCW 7.80.120.

(2)(a)
A regional transit authority may designate persons to monitor fare payment who
are equivalent to and are authorized to exercise all the powers of an
enforcement officer, defined in RCW 7.80.040. An authority is authorized to
employ personnel to either monitor fare payment, or to contract for such
services, or both.

(b)
In addition to the specific powers granted to enforcement officers under RCW
7.80.050 and 7.80.060, persons designated to monitor fare payment also have the
authority to take the following actions:

(i)
Request proof of payment from passengers;

(ii)
Request personal identification from a passenger who does not produce proof of
payment when requested;

(iii)
Issue a citation conforming to the requirements established in RCW 7.80.070;
and

(iv)
Request that a passenger leave the regional transit authority train, including
but not limited to commuter trains and light rail trains, when the passenger
has not produced proof of payment after being asked to do so by a person
designated to monitor fare payment.

(3)
Regional transit authorities shall keep records of citations in the manner
prescribed by RCW 7.80.150. All civil infractions established by
chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act) shall be heard and
determined by a district court as provided in RCW 7.80.010 (1) and (4).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Persons traveling on trains, including but not limited to commuter trains or
light rail trains, operated by an authority, shall pay the fare established by
the authority. Such persons shall produce proof of payment when requested by a
person designated to monitor fare payment.

(2)
The following constitute civil infractions punishable according to the schedule
of fines and penalties established by the authority under section 3(1) of this
act:

(a)
Failure to pay the required fare;

(b)
Failure to display proof of payment when requested to do so by a person
designated to monitor fare payment; and

(c)
Failure to depart the train, including but not limited to commuter trains and
light rail trains, when requested to do so by a person designated to monitor
fare payment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing
in RCW 81.112.020 and sections 3 through 5 of this act shall be deemed to
prevent law enforcement authorities from prosecuting for theft, trespass, or
other charges by any individual who:

(1)
Fails to pay the required fare on more than one occasion within a twelve-month
period;

(2)
Fails to sign a notice of civil infraction; or

(3) Fails to depart the train, including but not limited to
commuter trains and light rail trains, when requested to do so by a person
designated to monitor fare payment.

---
END ---