BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

No
later than January 1, 2000, the administrator shall offer health plans to guard
members and retired guard members. The benefits of these plans shall be the
same as available to employees covered by this chapter, except for the
exclusions of dental services, life insurance, liability insurance, and
accidental death and dismemberment insurance. Members must pay the full cost
of coverage. Retired guard members shall not be eligible for the subsidy
provided in RCW 41.05.085.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.05.011 and 1996 c 39 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.

(2)
"State purchased health care" or "health care" means
medical and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health services, the
department of health, the basic health plan, the state health care authority,
the department of labor and industries, the department of corrections, the
department of veterans affairs, and local school districts.

(3)
"Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4)
"Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01 RCW, a
health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health
maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.

(5)
"Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows employees to
choose the level of health care coverage provided and the amount of employee
contributions from among a range of choices offered by the authority.

(6)
"Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees of
the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed
officials of the executive branch of government, including full-time members of
boards, commissions, or committees; and includes any or all part-time and
temporary employees under the terms and conditions established under this
chapter by the authority; justices of the supreme court and judges of the court
of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state legislature or of
the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees
of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if the
legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other political
subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of the authority to
provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as
provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee organizations representing
state civil service employees, at the option of each such employee
organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of employee organizations
currently pooled with employees of school districts for the purpose of
purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such employee
organization; and (c) employees of a school district if the authority agrees to
provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by contract with the
authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.

(7)
"Board" means the public employees' benefits board established under
RCW 41.05.055.

(8)
"Retired or disabled school employee" means:

(a)
Persons who separated from employment with a school district or educational
service district and are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32
or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;

(b)
Persons who separate from employment with a school district or educational
service district on or after October 1, 1993, and immediately upon separation
receive a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW;

(c)
Persons who separate from employment with a school district or educational
service district due to a total and permanent disability, and are eligible to
receive a deferred retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW.

(9)
"Benefits contribution plan" means a premium only contribution plan,
a medical flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan whereby state and
public employees may agree to a contribution to benefit costs which will allow
the employee to participate in benefits offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125
or other sections of the internal revenue code.

(10)
"Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.

(11)
"Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility and
enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.

(12)
"Plan year" means the time period established by the authority.

(13)
"Separated employees" means persons who separate from employment with
an employer as defined in RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996, and who
are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of service under the
teachers' retirement system plan III as defined in RCW 41.32.010(40).

(14)
"Guard member" means a person who is a member of the Washington
national guard, as defined in RCW 38.04.010.

(15)
"Retired guard member" means a person who is retired from the
Washington national guard pursuant to federal and state law.

Sec.
3. RCW
41.05.011 and 1998 c 341 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.

(2)
"State purchased health care" or "health care" means
medical and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health services, the
department of health, the basic health plan, the state health care authority,
the department of labor and industries, the department of corrections, the
department of veterans affairs, and local school districts.

(3)
"Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4)
"Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01 RCW, a
health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health
maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.

(5)
"Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows employees to
choose the level of health care coverage provided and the amount of employee
contributions from among a range of choices offered by the authority.

(6)
"Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees of
the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed
officials of the executive branch of government, including full-time members of
boards, commissions, or committees; and includes any or all part-time and
temporary employees under the terms and conditions established under this
chapter by the authority; justices of the supreme court and judges of the court
of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state legislature or of
the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a)
Employees of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the
state if the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of the
authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority,
as provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee organizations
representing state civil service employees, at the option of each such employee
organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of employee
organizations currently pooled with employees of school districts for the
purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such employee
organization; and (c) employees of a school district if the authority agrees to
provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by contract with the
authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.

(7)
"Board" means the public employees' benefits board established under
RCW 41.05.055.

(8)
"Retired or disabled school employee" means:

(a)
Persons who separated from employment with a school district or educational
service district and are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32
or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;

(b)
Persons who separate from employment with a school district or educational
service district on or after October 1, 1993, and immediately upon separation
receive a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW;

(c)
Persons who separate from employment with a school district or educational
service district due to a total and permanent disability, and are eligible to
receive a deferred retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW.

(9)
"Benefits contribution plan" means a premium only contribution plan,
a medical flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan whereby state and
public employees may agree to a contribution to benefit costs which will allow
the employee to participate in benefits offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125
or other sections of the internal revenue code.

(10)
"Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.

(11)
"Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility and
enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.

(12)
"Plan year" means the time period established by the authority.

(13)
"Separated employees" means persons who separate from employment with
an employer as defined in:

(a)
RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or

(b)
RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000;

and who
are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of service under the
teachers' retirement system plan III as defined in RCW 41.32.010(40) or the
Washington school employees' retirement system plan III as defined in RCW
41.35.010.

(14)
"Guard member" means a person who is a member of the Washington
national guard, as defined in RCW 38.04.010.

(15)
"Retired guard member" means a person who is retired from the
Washington national guard pursuant to federal and state law.

Sec.
4. RCW
41.05.080 and 1996 c 39 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Under the qualifications, terms, conditions, and benefits set by the board:

(a)
Retired or disabled state employees, retired or disabled school employees, ((or))
employees of county, municipal, or other political subdivisions, or retired
guard members covered by this chapter who are retired may continue their
participation in insurance plans and contracts after retirement or disablement;

(b)
Separated employees or retired guard members may continue their
participation in insurance plans and contracts if participation is selected
immediately upon separation from employment or guard service.

(2)
Rates charged retired or disabled employees, retired guard members,
separated employees, spouses, or dependent children who are not eligible for
parts A and B of medicare shall be based on the experience of the community
rated risk pool established under RCW 41.05.022.

(3)
Rates charged to retired or disabled employees, retired guard members,
separated employees, spouses, or children who are eligible for parts A and B of
medicare shall be calculated from a separate experience risk pool comprised
only of individuals eligible for parts A and B of medicare; however, the
premiums charged to medicare-eligible retirees and disabled employees shall be
reduced by the amount of the subsidy provided under RCW 41.05.085.

(4)
Retired or disabled employees, retired guard members, and separated
employees shall be responsible for payment of premium rates developed by the
authority which shall include the cost to the authority of providing insurance
coverage including any amounts necessary for reserves and administration in
accordance with this chapter. These self pay rates will be established based
on a separate rate for the employee, the spouse, and the children.

(5)
The term "retired state employees" for the purpose of this section
shall include but not be limited to members of the legislature whether
voluntarily or involuntarily leaving state office.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Section 2 of this act expires September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Section 3 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---