BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:

The board may require any person licensed under this chapter that
violates RCW 66.44.200 two or more times, or otherwise is found through
administrative action to have served any liquor to any person apparently under
the influence of liquor two or more times, to obtain and maintain liability
insurance of at least one hundred thousand dollars or a bond of at least one
hundred thousand dollars with a surety company authorized to conduct a surety
business in this state.

---
END ---