BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of corrective lenses, frames
for corrective lenses, or the components thereof. In addition, the tax levied
by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to charges made for labor and services rendered
in respect to the repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of any of the
items exempted under this section. For purposes of this section,
"corrective lens" means any lens, including a contact lens, intended
to aid or correct visual defects or anomalies of humans.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of corrective
lenses or frames for corrective lenses. For purposes of this section,
"corrective lens" means any lens, including a contact lens, intended
to aid or correct visual defects or anomalies of humans.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.08.0281 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 308 are each amended to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of prescription drugs,
including sales to the state or a political subdivision or municipal
corporation thereof of drugs to be dispensed to patients by prescription
without charge. The term "prescription drugs" shall include any
medicine, drug, ((prescription lens,)) or other substance other than
food for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of
disease or other ailment in humans, or for use for family planning purposes,
including the prevention of conception, supplied:

(1)
By a family planning clinic that is under contract with the department of
health to provide family planning services; or

(2)
Under the written prescription to a pharmacist by a practitioner authorized by
law of this state or laws of another jurisdiction to issue prescriptions; or

(3)
Upon an oral prescription of such practitioner which is reduced promptly to
writing and filed by a duly licensed pharmacist; or

(4)
By refilling any such written or oral prescription if such refilling is
authorized by the prescriber either in the original prescription or by oral
order which is reduced promptly to writing and filed by the pharmacist((; or

(5)
By physicians or optometrists by way of written directions and specifications
for the preparation, grinding, and fabrication of lenses intended to aid or
correct visual defects or anomalies of humans)).

Sec.
4. RCW
82.12.0275 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of prescription
drugs, including the use by the state or a political subdivision or municipal
corporation thereof of drugs to be dispensed to patients by prescription
without charge. The term "prescription drugs" shall include any
medicine, drug, ((prescription lens,)) or other substance other than
food for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of
disease or other ailment in humans, or for use for family planning purposes,
including the prevention of conception, supplied:

(1)
By a family planning clinic that is under contract with the department of
health to provide family planning services; or

(2)
Under the written prescription to a pharmacist by a practitioner authorized by
law of this state or laws of another jurisdiction to issue prescriptions; or

(3)
Upon an oral prescription of such practitioner which is reduced promptly to
writing and filed by a duly licensed pharmacist; or

(4)
By refilling any such written or oral prescription if such refilling is
authorized by the prescriber either in the original prescription or by oral
order which is reduced promptly to writing and filed by the pharmacist((; or

(5)
By physicians or optometrists by way of written directions and specifications
for the preparation, grinding, and fabrication of lenses intended to aid or
correct visual defects or anomalies of humans)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act takes effect August 1, 1998.

---
END ---