BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
54.04.035 and 1987 c 292 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to other powers authorized in Title 54 RCW, public utility districts
may annex territory as provided in this section.

(1)
The boundaries of a public utility district may be enlarged ((and new
contiguous territory added pursuant to the procedures for annexation by cities
and towns provided in RCW 35.13.015 through 35.13.110. The provisions of these
sections concerning community municipal corporations, review boards, and
comprehensive plans, however, do not apply to public utility district
annexations. For purposes of conforming with such procedures, the public
utility district is deemed to be the city or town and the board of
commissioners is deemed to be the city or town legislative body)) by
annexing an area following any of the procedures specified in this section.

The
annexation procedures provided in this section may only be used to annex ((territory))
an area that is both: (((1))) (a) Contiguous to the
annexing public utility district; and (((2))) (b) located within
the service area of the annexing public utility district. As used in this
section, a public utility district's "service area" means those areas
((whether)) located ((within or)) outside of the annexing public
utility district's boundaries that were generally served with electrical energy
by the annexing public utility district on January 1, ((1987)) 1999.
((Such)) A service area may, or may not, have been recognized in
an agreement made under chapter 54.48 RCW((, but)). No area may
be ((included within such service area)) annexed under this section
that was generally served with electrical energy on January 1, ((1987)) 1999,
by another public utility ((as defined in RCW 54.48.010)) district,
city or town electric utility, or a privately owned electrical company as
defined in RCW 80.04.010. No area may be annexed under this section that was
served with water or sewer service by another public utility district on the
date the initiating petition was filed or the initiating resolution was adopted.
An area ((proposed to)) may be annexed ((may be)) under
this section that is located in the same or a different county as the
annexing public utility district. An area may be annexed under this section
that is located within the boundaries of another public utility district.

((If
an area proposed to be annexed is located within the boundaries of another
public utility district, annexation may be initiated only upon petition of
registered voters residing in the area in accordance with RCW 35.13.020 and
adoption by the boards of commissioners of both districts of identical
resolutions stating (a) the boundaries of the area to be annexed, (b) a
determination that annexation is in the public interest of the residents of the
area to be annexed as well as the public interest of their respective
districts, (c) approval of annexation by the board, (d) the boundaries of the
districts after annexation, (e) the disposition of any assets of the districts
in the area to be annexed, (f) the obligations to be assumed by the annexing
district, (g) apportionment of election costs, and (h) that voters in the area
to be annexed will be advised of lawsuits that may impose liability on the
annexed territory and the possible impact of annexation on taxes and utility
rates.))

(2)
A ballot proposition authorizing the annexation of such an area shall be
submitted to voters residing in the area proposed to be annexed if the proposed
annexation is initiated by resolution of the board of commissioners of the
public utility district proposing to annex the area. An initiating resolution
must describe the area proposed to be annexed, have a map attached outlining
the area proposed to be annexed, and request that a special election be called
at which a ballot proposition authorizing the annexation is submitted to voters
residing in the area for their approval or rejection. The special election
must be held at a special election date specified under RCW 29.13.010 occurring
at least forty-five days after the date the resolution is adopted. The
annexation shall occur immediately upon the certification of the election
results that the ballot proposition was approved by a simple majority vote of
voters voting on the proposition.

(3)
A ballot proposition authorizing the annexation of such an area shall be
submitted to voters residing in the area proposed to be annexed if a petition
proposing the annexation is certified as having been signed by registered
voters residing in the area proposed to be annexed equal in number to at least
ten percent of the number of voters who voted in the area at the last state
general election and the board of commissioners of the public utility district
that is proposed to annex the area approves the annexation. An initiating
petition proposing the annexation must be filed with the county auditor of the
county in which the public utility district is located that is proposed to
annex the area. The petition shall describe the area proposed to be annexed,
request the annexation, and include space for registered voters residing in the
area to sign the petition, print their names, and insert their residential
addresses. An initiating petition must be accompanied by a map outlining the
area proposed to be annexed and a bond in the name of the county for five
thousand dollars to pay for all related election costs. The county auditor
shall review the signatures, certify the sufficiency of the petition, and
notify the public utility district proposed to annex the area about the
sufficiency. If the petition is certified as having sufficient valid
signatures, a ballot proposition authorizing the annexation shall be submitted
to the voters of the area proposed to be annexed if the board of commissioners
of the public utility district adopts a resolution approving the annexation.
However, board approval is not necessary and the ballot proposition shall be
submitted directly to the voters if the petition is certified as having been
signed by registered voters residing in the area proposed to be annexed equal
in number to at least twenty percent of the number of voters who voted in the
area at the last state general election. The ballot proposition shall be
submitted to voters of the area at the next state general election that occurs
forty-five or more days after the date the resolution is adopted or
certification is made that the petition was signed by registered voters
residing in the area proposed to be annexed equal in number to at least twenty
percent of the number of voters in the area who voted at the last state general
election. The annexation shall occur immediately upon certification of the
election results that the ballot proposition was approved by a simple majority
vote of voters voting on the proposition.

(4) If ((annexation is approved,)) the area annexed is
located in another public utility district, the area shall cease to be a
part of ((the one)) that public utility district at the same time
that it becomes a part of the ((other)) public utility district annexing
the area. ((The annexing public utility district shall assume
responsibility for providing the area annexed with the services provided by the
other public utility district in the area annexed.))

Sec.
2. RCW
54.32.010 and 1931 c 1 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Two
or more contiguous public utility districts may become consolidated into one
public utility district after proceedings had as required by ((sections
8909, 8910 and 8911, of Remington's Compiled Statutes of Washington,)) chapter
35.10 RCW: PROVIDED, That a ten percent petition shall be sufficient; and
public utility districts shall be held to be municipal corporations within the
meaning of said sections, and the commission shall be held to be the
legislative body of the public utility district as the term legislative body is
used in said sections: PROVIDED, That any such consolidation shall in nowise
affect or impair the title to any property owned or held by any such public
utility district, or in trust therefor, or any debts, demands, liabilities or
obligations existing in favor of or against either of the districts so
consolidated, or any proceeding then pending: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That no property
within either of the former public utility districts shall ever be taxed to pay
any of the indebtedness of either of the other such former districts.

((The
boundaries of any public utility district may be enlarged and new territory
included therein, after proceedings had as required by section 8894 of
Remington's Compiled Statutes of Washington: PROVIDED, That a ten percent
petition shall be sufficient; and public utility districts shall be held to be
municipal corporations within the meaning of said section, and the commission
shall be held to be the legislative body of the public utility district:
PROVIDED, That no property within such territory so annexed shall ever be taxed
to pay any portion of any indebtedness of such public utility district
contracted prior to or existing at the date of such annexation.))

In
all cases wherein public utility districts of less area than an entire county
desire to be consolidated with a public utility district including an entire
county, and in all cases wherein it is desired to enlarge a public utility
district including an entire county, by annexing a lesser area than an entire
county, no election shall be required to be held in the district including an
entire county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. RCW
54.04.035, as amended by this act, is recodified as a section in chapter 54.32
RCW.

---
END ---