BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.22 RCW to read as follows:

An insurer licensed to write homeowners' insurance in this state
may not deny or refuse to renew an application for a homeowners' insurance
policy on the basis that the applicant owns a dog, unless the dog is a
dangerous dog as defined in RCW 16.08.070.

---
END ---