BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
31.45.010 and 1995 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Check casher" means an individual, partnership, unincorporated
association, or corporation that, for compensation, engages, in whole or in
part, in the business of cashing checks, drafts, money orders, or other
commercial paper serving the same purpose.

(2)
"Check seller" means an individual, partnership, unincorporated
association, or corporation that, for compensation, engages, in whole or in
part, in the business of or selling checks, drafts, money orders, or other
commercial paper serving the same purpose.

(3)
"Licensee" means a check casher or seller licensed by the director to
engage in business in accordance with this chapter. For purposes of the
enforcement powers of this chapter, including the power to issue cease and
desist orders under RCW 31.45.110, "licensee" also means a check
casher or seller who fails to obtain the license required by this chapter.

(4)
"Small loan" means a loan of up to ((five)) six hundred
dollars for a period of thirty-one days or less.

(5)
"Director" means the director of financial institutions.

Sec.
2. RCW
31.45.073 and 1995 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No licensee may engage in the business of making small loans without first
obtaining a small loan endorsement to its license from the director in
accordance with this chapter. An endorsement will be required for each
location where a licensee engages in the business of making small loans, but a
small loan endorsement may authorize a licensee to make small loans at a
location different than the licensed locations where it cashes or sells checks
or drafts. A licensee may have more than one endorsement.

(2)
A licensee that has obtained the required small loan endorsement may charge
interest or fees for small loans not to exceed in the aggregate ((fifteen))
ten percent of the principal amount borrowed. The director may
determine by rule which fees, if any, are not subject to the fifteen percent
limitation.

(3)
In connection with making a small loan, a licensee may advance moneys on the
security of a postdated check or draft provided the time period between the
date the loan is granted and the date of the postdated check does not exceed
thirty-one days. A licensee shall deposit all postdated checks or drafts as
soon as practicable after the date of the check or draft has passed.

(4) No person may at any time cash or advance any moneys on a
postdated check or draft in excess of the amount of goods or services purchased
without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to a check casher or check
seller license.

---
END ---