BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Prior to obtaining a credit report on any person, an insurer shall disclose to
the person the intention of the insurer to obtain the credit report. If the person
requests that the insurer not obtain the credit report, the insurer shall not
obtain the credit report. Nothing in this section restricts the insurer's
ability to not quote a rate, to deny an application, or to not renew a policy
because the person refuses to allow the insurer to obtain a credit report on
that person.

(2) For purposes of this section, "credit report" means
the same as "consumer report" as defined in RCW 19.182.010.

---
END ---