BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.182.040 and 1993 c 476 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as authorized under subsection (2) of this section, no consumer
reporting agency may make a consumer report containing any of the following
items of information:

(a)
Bankruptcies that, from date of adjudication of the most recent bankruptcy,
antedate the report by more than ten years;

(b)
Suits and judgments that, from date of entry, antedate the report by more than
seven years or until the governing statute of limitations has expired,
whichever is the longer period;

(c)
Paid tax liens that, from date of payment, antedate the report by more than
seven years;

(d)
Accounts placed for collection or charged to profit and loss that antedate the
report by more than seven years;

(e)
Records of arrest, indictment, or conviction of crime that, from date of
disposition, release, or parole, antedate the report by more than seven years;

(f)
Any other adverse item of information that antedates the report by more than
seven years; or

(g)
Inquiries or requests for consumer reports related to insurance.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section is not applicable in the case of a consumer
report to be used in connection with:

(a)
A credit transaction involving, or that may reasonably be expected to involve,
a principal amount of fifty thousand dollars or more;

(b)
The underwriting of life insurance involving, or that may reasonably be
expected to involve, a face amount of fifty thousand dollars or more; or

(c) The employment of an individual at an annual salary that
equals, or that may reasonably be expected to equal, twenty thousand dollars or
more.

---
END ---