BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.30.075 and 1987 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
where a recount or litigation under RCW 29.04.030 is pending, ((the county
auditor shall have sufficient)) absentee ballots ((ready to mail to
absentee)) or mail ballots must be mailed or delivered to voters at
least twelve days, but no more than fourteen days, before the primary or
election for which they are issued, but must be mailed to overseas voters and
service voters ((of that county)) at least twenty days before ((any))
the primary((, general)) or election((, or special
election)) for which they are issued.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 29.36 RCW to read as follows:

The
canvassing board, or its designated representatives, shall process and tabulate
absentee ballots and mail ballots expeditiously. Efforts must be made to
tabulate all ballots on the day of the primary or election that are in the
auditor's possession on that day and are capable of being tabulated at that
time. Regular efforts must be made to tabulate the remaining ballots in a
timely manner at least every second working day after the primary or election.
An absentee ballot or mail ballot may only be counted if it was:

(1)
Both mailed to the county auditor from anywhere in the United States by first
class mail and received by the county auditor on or before the close of polling
sites on the day of the primary or election for which it was issued; or

(2)
Deposited at a polling site in the county of the auditor who issued the ballot,
during normal voting hours of the primary or election for which it was issued;
or

(3)
Deposited with the county auditor who issued the ballot on or before the close
of the polling places on the date of the primary or election for which it was
issued; or

(4)
Both mailed to the county auditor by an overseas voter or service voter with a
date of mailing on or before the date of the primary or election for which it
was issued and received by the county auditor on or before noon of the day the
election results are certified. The date of mailing for an overseas voter or
service voter is the date the voter attests to voting, as indicated on the
return envelope.

Sec.
3. RCW
29.36.121 and 1994 c 57 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
At any nonpartisan special election not being held in conjunction with a state
primary or general election, the county, city, town, or district requesting the
election pursuant to RCW 29.13.010 or 29.13.020 may also request that the
election be conducted by mail ballot. The county auditor may honor the request
or may determine that the election is not to be conducted by mail ballot. The
decision of the county auditor in this regard is final.

(2)
In an odd-numbered year, the county auditor may conduct by mail ballot a
primary or a special election concurrently with the primary:

(a)
For any office or ballot measure of a special purpose district which is
entirely within the county;

(b)
For any office or ballot measure of a special purpose district which lies in
the county and one or more other counties if the auditor first secures the
concurrence of the county auditors of those other counties to conduct the
primary in this manner district-wide; and

(c)
For any ballot measure or nonpartisan office of a county, city, or town if the
auditor first secures the concurrence of the legislative authority of the
county, city, or town involved.

A
primary in an odd-numbered year may not be conducted by mail ballot in any
precinct with two hundred or more active registered voters if a partisan office
or state office or state ballot measure is to be voted upon at that primary in
the precinct.

(3)
((For all special elections not being held in conjunction with a state
primary or state general election where voting is conducted by mail ballot, the
county auditor shall, not less than fifteen days before the date of such
election, mail or deliver to each registered voter a mail ballot and an
envelope, preaddressed to the issuing officer.)) The county auditor shall
notify an election jurisdiction for which a primary is to be held that the
primary will be conducted by mail ballot.

(4)
To the extent they are not inconsistent with subsections (1) through (3) of
this section, the laws governing the conduct of mail ballot special elections
apply to nonpartisan primaries conducted by mail ballot.

Sec.
4. RCW
29.36.139 and 1993 c 417 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A mail ballot shall be counted only as provided under section 2 of this act
and if it is returned in the return identification envelope, if the
envelope is signed by the registered voter to whom the ballot is issued, and if
the signature is verified as provided in this subsection. The county auditor
shall verify the signature of each voter on the return identification envelope
with the signature on the voter's registration record. A person who votes or
attempts to vote more than once in a mail ballot election is subject to the
penalties provided in chapter 29.85 RCW.

(2)
Any mail ballot may be challenged in the same manner as an absentee ballot.

Sec.
5. RCW
29.62.020 and 1995 c 139 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No later than the tenth day after a special election or primary and no later
than the fifteenth day after a general election, the county auditor shall
convene the county canvassing board to process the absentee ballots and canvass
the votes cast at that primary or election. On the tenth day after a special
election or a primary and on the fifteenth day after a general election, the
canvassing board shall complete the canvass and certify the results. The
canvass report must include each absentee ballot that ((was returned
before the closing of the polls on the date of the primary or election for
which it was issued, and each absentee ballot with a date of mailing on or before
the date of the primary or election for which it was issued and received on or
before the date on which the primary or election is certified, shall be
included in the canvass report)) may be tabulated under section 2 of
this act.

(2)
At the request of any caucus of the state legislature, the county auditor shall
transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and legislative primaries or
elections prepared by or for the county canvassing board to ((either))
the secretary of the senate ((or)) and the chief clerk of the
house.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. RCW
29.36.126 and 1993 c 417 s 4 & 1983 1st ex.s. c 71 s 4 are
each repealed.

---
END ---