BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that persons should be free of unwanted telephone calls from
commercial telephone solicitors. Opportunities for families to spend
uninterrupted time together are increasingly scarce and, consequently,
increasingly precious. A person's home should be a sanctuary from commercial
solicitation if the person so chooses. Many persons are discontent with having
no effective way to prevent intrusions upon their time by calls from commercial
telephone solicitors, beyond asking a solicitor not to call again after the
solicitor has called at least once. The legislature intends to create a way
for persons to post, in effect, a "no solicitation" sign at their
telephones, and a means by which commercial telephone solicitors can screen
persons who wish to receive calls from those who do not, so that solicitors may
more effectively use their solicitation resources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Commercial telephone solicitation" means an unsolicited telephone
call to a person initiated by a salesperson and conversation for the purpose of
inducing the person to purchase or invest in property, goods, or services.

(2)
"Commercial telephone solicitor" means any person who engages in
commercial telephone solicitation, including service bureaus. However,
"commercial telephone solicitor" does not include a person making calls
for religious, charitable, political, or other noncommercial purposes.

(3)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(4)
"Person" includes any individual, firm, association, corporation,
partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, or any other business entity.

(5)
"Salesperson" means any individual employed, appointed, or authorized
by a commercial telephone solicitor, whether referred to by the commercial
telephone solicitor as an agent, representative, or independent contractor, who
attempts to solicit or solicits a sale on behalf of the commercial telephone
solicitor.

(6)
"Service bureau" means a commercial telephone solicitor who contracts
with any person to provide commercial telephone solicitation services.

(7)
"Solicit" means to initiate contact with a person for the purpose of
attempting to sell property, goods, or services, where such person has
expressed no interest within the previous ninety days in purchasing, investing
in, or obtaining information regarding the property, goods, or services
attempted to be sold.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Any person who does not wish to receive commercial telephone solicitation calls
may have his or her telephone number placed on the list provided for in
subsection (2) of this section by notifying the department and paying an
initial ten-dollar listing fee. The notification must be made by a method
prescribed by the department. The listing shall be effective for one year,
after which the person may renew the listing for successive one-year periods by
giving annual renewal notices to the department and paying a five-dollar fee
each year the listing is renewed.

(2)(a)
The department shall establish and maintain a list of the telephone numbers of
persons who have notified the department that they do not wish to receive
commercial telephone solicitation calls and who have paid the fees required by
subsection (1) of this section. The department shall prescribe the method or
methods by which persons may notify the department of requests to be placed on
the list or to renew placements on the list.

(b)
The department shall update the list quarterly, and shall provide the list free
of charge to commercial telephone solicitors upon request.

(c)
All fees collected by the department under this section or civil penalties
collected by the attorney general in enforcing this section shall be deposited
in the commercial telephone solicitation list account created in section 6 of
this act, and used solely for the administration and enforcement of this
section.

(3)
No commercial telephone solicitor may make or cause to be made a commercial
telephone solicitation call to any telephone number if the number appears in
the then‑current list of the telephone numbers of persons who have
notified the department that they do not want to receive commercial telephone
solicitation calls.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
director of the department may make rules, create forms, and issue orders as necessary
to carry out the provisions of this chapter, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Any person injured by a violation of section 3(3) of this act may bring a civil
action in superior court to recover liquidated damages of not less than five
hundred dollars nor more than two thousand dollars per violation, plus the
costs of bringing the action and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(2)
The director of the department may refer to the attorney general any available
evidence concerning violations of this chapter or violations of any rule
adopted or order issued under this chapter. For a first violation of section
3(3) of this act, the attorney general at his or her discretion and with or
without reference, may send the commercial telephone solicitor a letter warning
the solicitor to refrain from further violations. The attorney general may
bring a civil action to enjoin future violations if the commercial telephone
solicitor commits subsequent violations after the attorney general has sent a
warning letter. In addition to granting appropriate injunctive relief, the
court shall impose a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars nor
more than two thousand dollars for each violation.

(3)
No provision of this chapter shall be construed to limit any right or remedy
provided under chapter 19.86 or 19.158 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
commercial telephone solicitation list account is created in the custody of the
state treasury. All moneys received by the department under section 3 of this
act or civil penalties collected by the attorney general in enforcing section
3(3) of this act shall be deposited in the commercial telephone solicitation
list account and used solely for the administration and enforcement of section
3 of this act. Only the director of the department or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for expenditures.

Sec.
7. RCW
19.158.110 and 1989 c 20 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Within the first minute of the telephone call, a commercial telephone solicitor
or salesperson shall:

(a)
Identify himself or herself, the company on whose behalf the solicitation is
being made, the property, goods, or services being sold; and

(b)
Terminate the telephone call within ten seconds if the purchaser indicates he
or she does not wish to continue the conversation.

(2)
If at any time during the telephone contact, the purchaser states or indicates
that he or she does not wish to be called again by the commercial telephone
solicitor or wants to have his or her name and individual telephone number
removed from the telephone lists used by the commercial telephone solicitor:

(a)
The commercial telephone solicitor shall not make any additional commercial
telephone solicitation of the called party at that telephone number within a
period of at least one year; and

(b)
The commercial telephone solicitor shall not sell or give the called party's
name and telephone number to another commercial telephone solicitor: PROVIDED,
That the commercial telephone solicitor may return the list, including the
called party's name and telephone number, to the company or organization from
which it received the list.

(3)
The utilities and transportation commission shall by rule ensure that
telecommunications companies inform their residential customers of the
provisions of this section and section 3 of this act. The notification
may be made by:

(a)
Annual inserts in the billing statements mailed to residential customers; or

(b)
Conspicuous publication of the notice in the consumer information pages of
local telephone directories.

(4)
If a sale or an agreement to purchase is completed, the commercial telephone
solicitor must inform the purchaser of his or her cancellation rights as
enunciated in this chapter, state the registration number issued by the
department of licensing, and give the street address of the seller.

(5)
If, at any time prior to sale or agreement to purchase, the commercial
telephone solicitor's registration number is requested by the purchaser, it must
be provided.

(6)
All oral disclosures required by this section shall be made in a clear and
intelligible manner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Section 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the department of licensing for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. By
November 30, 2000, the department of licensing shall report to the senate
energy, technology and telecommunications committee and house of
representatives technology, telecommunications and energy committee on the
implementation of this act and cost of administering and enforcing section 3 of
this act.

---
END ---