BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that opportunities for families to spend uninterrupted time
together are increasingly scarce and, consequently, increasingly precious. A
person's home should be a sanctuary from outside solicitation if the person so
chooses. The legislature also finds that many persons are discontent with the
large number of telephone calls they receive from commercial fund raisers or
from fund raisers outside of the local community. The legislature intends to
require, at the beginning of a solicitation by telephone, that commercial fund
raisers identify themselves as such, and that fund raisers identify the city
from which they are calling, or, if they are calling from outside of
Washington, the state from which they are calling. Then, the person receiving
the call may decide at the beginning of the call whether to terminate the
conversation or listen to the solicitation.

Sec.
2. RCW
19.09.100 and 1994 c 287 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following conditions apply to solicitations as defined by RCW 19.09.020:

(1)
A charitable organization, whether or not required to register pursuant to this
chapter, that directly solicits contributions from the public in this state
shall make the following clear and conspicuous disclosures at the point of
solicitation:

(a)
The name of the individual making the solicitation;

(b)
If the solicitation is being made by telephone, the city from which the call
is being placed if within the state, or the state from which the call is being
placed if from outside of the state;

(c)
The identity of the charitable organization and the city of the principal place
of business of the charitable organization; and

(((c)))
(d) If requested by the solicitee, the published number in the office of
the secretary for the donor to obtain additional financial disclosure
information on file with the secretary.

(2)
A commercial fund raiser shall clearly and conspicuously disclose at the point
of solicitation:

(a)
The name of the individual making the solicitation;

(b)
If the solicitation is being made by telephone, the city from which the call
is being placed if within the state, or the state from which the call is being
placed if from outside of the state;

(c)
The name of the entity for which the fund raiser is an agent or employee and
the name and city of the charitable organization for which the solicitation is
being conducted; ((and

(c))) (d)
If the solicitation is being made by telephone, that the individual making the
solicitation is a paid commercial fund raiser; and

(e)
If requested by the solicitee, the published number in the office of the
secretary for the donor to obtain additional financial disclosure information
on file with the secretary. The disclosure must be made during an oral
solicitation of a contribution, and at the same time at which a written request
for a contribution is made.

(3)
A person or organization soliciting charitable contributions by telephone shall
make the disclosures required under subsection (1) or (2) of this section ((in
the course of the solicitation but)) at the beginning of the call and
prior to asking for a commitment for a contribution from the solicitee, and in
writing to any solicitee that makes a pledge within five working days of making
the pledge. If the person or organization sends any materials to the person or
organization solicited before the receipt of any contribution, those materials
shall include the disclosures required in subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, whichever is applicable.

(4)
In the case of a solicitation by advertisement or mass distribution, including
posters, leaflets, automatic dialing machines, publication, and audio or video
broadcasts, it shall be clearly and conspicuously disclosed in the body of the
solicitation material that:

(a)
The solicitation is conducted by a named commercial fund raiser, if it is;

(b)
The notice of solicitation required by the charitable solicitation act is on
file with the secretary's office; and

(c)
The potential donor can obtain additional financial disclosure information at a
published number in the office of the secretary.

(5)
A container or vending machine displaying a solicitation must also display in a
clear and conspicuous manner the name of the charitable organization for which
funds are solicited, the name, business address, and telephone number of the
individual and any commercial fund raiser responsible for collecting funds
placed in the containers or vending machines, and the following statement:
"This charity is currently registered with the secretary's office under
the charitable solicitation act, registration number
. . . ."

(6)
A commercial fund raiser shall not represent that tickets to any fund raising
event will be donated for use by another person unless all the following
requirements are met:

(a)
The commercial fund raiser prior to conducting a solicitation has written
commitments from persons stating that they will accept donated tickets and
specifying the number of tickets they will accept;

(b)
The written commitments are kept on file by the commercial fund raiser for
three years and are made available to the secretary, attorney general, or
county prosecutor on demand;

(c)
The contributions solicited for donated tickets may not be more than the amount
representing the number of ticket commitments received from persons and kept on
file under (a) of this subsection; and

(d)
Not later than seven calendar days prior to the date of the event for which
ticket donations are solicited, the commercial fund raiser shall give all
donated tickets to the persons who made the written commitments to accept them.

(7)
Each person or organization soliciting charitable contributions shall not
represent orally or in writing that:

(a)
The charitable contribution is tax deductible unless the charitable
organization for which charitable contributions are being solicited or to which
tickets for fund raising events or other services or goods will be donated, has
applied for and received from the internal revenue service a letter of
determination granting tax deductible status to the charitable organization;

(b)
The person soliciting the charitable contribution is a volunteer or words of
similar meaning or effect that create the impression that the person soliciting
is not a paid solicitor unless such person is unpaid for his or her services;

(c)
The person soliciting the charitable contribution is a member, staffer, helper,
or employee of the charitable organization or words of similar meaning or
effect that create the impression that the person soliciting is not a paid
solicitor if the person soliciting is employed, contracted, or paid by a
commercial fund raiser.

(8)
If the charitable organization is associated with, or has a name that is
similar to, any unit of government each person or organization soliciting
contributions shall disclose to each person solicited whether the charitable
organization is or is not part of any unit of government and the true nature of
its relationship to the unit of government. This subsection does not apply to
a foundation or other charitable organization that is organized, operated, or
controlled by or in connection with a registered public charity, including any
governmental agency or unit, from which it derives its name.

(9)
No person may, in conducting any solicitation, use the name "police,"
"sheriff," "fire fighter," "firemen," or a
similar name unless properly authorized by a bona fide police, sheriff, or fire
fighter organization or police, sheriff, or fire department. A proper
authorization shall be in writing and signed by two authorized officials of the
organization or department and shall be filed with the secretary.

(10)
A person may not, in conducting any solicitation, use the name of a federally
chartered or nationally recognized military veterans' service organization as
determined by the United States veterans' administration unless authorized in
writing by the highest ranking official of that organization in this state.

(11)
A charitable organization shall comply with all local governmental regulations
that apply to soliciting for or on behalf of charitable organizations.

(12)
The advertising material and the general promotional plan for a solicitation
shall not be false, misleading, or deceptive, and shall afford full and fair
disclosure.

(13)
Solicitations shall not be conducted by a charitable organization or commercial
fund raiser that has, or if a corporation, its officers, directors, or
principals have, been convicted of a crime involving solicitations for or on
behalf of a charitable organization in this state, the United States, or any
other state or foreign country within the past ten years or has been subject to
any permanent injunction or administrative order or judgment under RCW
19.86.080 or 19.86.090, involving a violation or violations of RCW 19.86.020,
within the past ten years, or of restraining a false or misleading promotional
plan involving solicitations for charitable organizations.

(14)
No charitable organization or commercial fund raiser subject to this chapter
may use or exploit the fact of registration under this chapter so as to lead
the public to believe that registration constitutes an endorsement or approval
by the state, but the use of the following is not deemed prohibited:
"Currently registered with the Washington state secretary of state as
required by law. Registration number . . . ."

(15)
No entity may engage in any solicitation for contributions for or on behalf of
any charitable organization or commercial fund raiser unless the charitable
organization or commercial fund raiser is currently registered with the
secretary.

(16)
No entity may engage in any solicitation for contributions unless it complies
with all provisions of this chapter.

(17)(a)
No entity may place a telephone call for the purpose of charitable solicitation
that will be received by the solicitee before eight o'clock a.m. or after nine
o'clock p.m.

(b)
No entity may, while placing a telephone call for the purpose of charitable
solicitation, engage in any conduct the natural consequence of which is to
harass, intimidate, or torment any person in connection with the telephone
call.

(18) Failure to comply with subsections (1) through (17) of this
section is a violation of this chapter.

---
END ---