BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.59.020 and 1991 c 3 s 153 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Board" means the board of occupational therapy practice.

(2)
"Occupational therapy" is the scientifically based use of purposeful
activity with individuals who are limited by physical injury or illness,
psychosocial dysfunction, developmental or learning disabilities, or the aging
process in order to maximize independence, prevent disability, and maintain
health. The practice encompasses evaluation, treatment, and consultation.
Specific occupational therapy services include but are not limited to: Using
specifically designed activities and exercises to enhance neurodevelopmental,
cognitive, perceptual motor, sensory integrative, and psychomotor functioning;
administering and interpreting tests such as manual muscle and sensory
integration; teaching daily living skills; developing prevocational skills and
play and avocational capabilities; designing, fabricating, or applying selected
orthotic and prosthetic devices or selected adaptive equipment; and adapting
environments for the handicapped. These services are provided individually, in
groups, or through social systems.

(3)
"Occupational therapist" means a person licensed to practice
occupational therapy under this chapter.

(4)
"Occupational therapy assistant" means a person licensed to assist in
the practice of occupational therapy under the supervision or with the regular
consultation of an occupational therapist.

(5)
"Occupational therapy aide" means a person who is trained to perform
specific occupational therapy techniques under professional supervision as
defined by the board but who does not perform activities that require advanced
training in the sciences or practices involved in the profession of
occupational therapy.

(6)
"Occupational therapy practitioner" means a person who is
credentialed as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant.

(7)
"Person" means any individual, partnership, unincorporated
organization, or corporate body, except that only an individual may be licensed
under this chapter.

(((7)))
(8) "Department" means the department of health.

(((8)))
(9) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.59.031 and 1987 c 150 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

No person may practice or represent himself or herself as an
occupational ((therapist)) therapy practitioner without first
having a valid license to do so.

Sec.
3. RCW
18.59.100 and 1986 c 259 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

An occupational therapist shall, after evaluating a patient and if
the case is a medical one, refer the case to a physician for appropriate
medical direction if such direction is lacking. Treatment by an occupational
therapist of such a medical case may take place only upon the referral of a
physician ((or podiatrist)), osteopathic physician, podiatric
physician and surgeon, naturopath, chiropractor, physician assistant,
psychologist, or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed to
practice ((medicine)) in this state.

---
END ---