BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.15.025 and 1993 c 317 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person filing a declaration and affidavit of candidacy for an office ((shall))
must, at the time of filing, possess the qualifications specified by law
for persons who may be elected to the office and, except as provided in RCW
3.46.067 and 3.50.057, must have been properly registered to vote in the
geographic area represented by the office for at least one year before the date
of filing the declaration and affidavit of candidacy.

(2)
The name of a candidate for an office shall not appear on a ballot for that
office unless, except as provided in RCW 3.46.067 and 3.50.057, the candidate
((is)) has been, at the time the candidate's declaration and
affidavit of candidacy is filed, properly registered to vote in the geographic
area represented by the office for at least one year before the date of
filing the declaration and affidavit of candidacy. ((For the purposes
of this section, each geographic area in which registered voters may cast
ballots for an office is represented by that office. If a person elected to an
office must be nominated from a district or similar division of the geographic
area represented by the office, the name of a candidate for the office shall
not appear on a primary ballot for that office unless the candidate is, at the
time the candidate's declaration and affidavit of candidacy is filed, properly
registered to vote in that district or division.)) The officer with whom
declarations and affidavits of candidacy must be filed under this title shall
review each such declaration filed regarding compliance with this subsection.

(3)
For purposes of this section, the term "geographic area" means the
county, city, town, or district represented by the office or, where wards or
similar divisions within a larger geographic area are used for nomination or
election purposes, the ward or similar division represented by the office. The
time an eighteen year old resided in the geographic area immediately before
registering to vote must be included in computing the one-year period under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

(4)
This section does not apply to the office of a member of the United States Congress.

Sec.
2. RCW
29.01.140 and 1971 ex.s. c 178 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Residence"
for the purpose of registering and voting means a person's permanent address
where he or she physically resides and maintains his or her
abode((: PROVIDED, That)) and domicile. However, no person
gains residence by reason of his or her presence or loses his or her
residence by reason of his or her absence:

(1)
While employed in the civil or military service of the state or of the United
States;

(2)
While engaged in the navigation of the waters of this state or the United
States or the high seas;

(3)
While a student at any institution of learning;

(4)
While confined in any public prison.

Absence
from the state on business ((shall)) does not affect the question
of residence of any person unless the right to vote has been claimed or
exercised elsewhere.

Sec.
3. RCW
29.85.100 and 1991 c 81 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person who:

(1)
Knowingly and falsely issues a certificate of nomination or election; or

(2)
Knowingly provides false information on a certificate which must be filed with
an elections officer under chapter 29.24 RCW; or

(3)
Knowingly provides false information on his or her declaration and affidavit
of candidacy or petition of nomination for an office; or

(4)
Conceals or fraudulently defaces or destroys a certificate which has been filed
with an elections officer under chapter 29.24 RCW or a declaration of candidacy
or petition of nomination which has been filed with an elections officer, or
any part of such a certificate, declaration, or petition, is guilty of a class
C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 29.85 RCW to read as follows:

Regular law enforcement officers of the jurisdiction where a crime
established under this title allegedly has occurred, including the sheriff,
deputy sheriffs, police chief, police officers, town marshal, and deputy town
marshals, are responsible for investigating these alleged crimes.

---
END ---