BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.44 RCW to read as follows:

Taxes
imposed in this chapter do not apply to electric vehicles. For the purposes of
this section "electric vehicle" means a vehicle that: (1) Is
manufactured primarily for use on public streets, roads, and highways; (2) has
at least four wheels; and (3) can be propelled by an electric motor drawing
current from rechargeable batteries, fuel cells, or other portable sources of
electrical current. "Electric vehicle" includes a hybrid vehicle
that can be propelled by either an electric or nonelectric motor. This section
expires July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect August 1, 1999.

---
END ---