BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
77.04.030 and 1994 c 264 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

The fish and wildlife commission consists of nine registered voters
of the state appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the
senate. In January of each odd-numbered year, the governor shall appoint
((with the advice and consent of the senate)) two registered voters to
the commission to serve for terms of six years from that January or until their
successors are appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs on the commission
prior to the expiration of a term, the governor shall appoint a registered
voter within sixty days to complete the term. ((Three members shall be
residents of that portion of the state lying east of the summit of the Cascade
mountains, and three shall be residents of that portion of the state lying west
of the summit of the Cascade mountains.)) Six members shall be
appointed to represent the six administrative regions of the department, with
each of these members representing a different administrative region. The
department shall adopt the six administrative regions by rule. A member
representing an administrative region of the department must be a resident of
that region. The governor shall appoint commissioners to achieve this balance
by administrative region as terms of commissioners expire and vacancies occur.
Three additional members shall be appointed at-large ((effective July 1,
1993; one of whom shall serve a one and one-half year term to end December 31,
1994; one of whom shall serve a three and one-half year term to end December
31, 1996; and one of whom shall serve a five and one-half year term to end
December 31, 1998)). ((Thereafter)) All members are to serve
a six-year term. No two members may be residents of the same county. The
legal office of the commission is at the administrative office of the
department in Olympia.

---
END ---