BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
10.31.100 and 1997 c 66 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

A
police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or
is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest the person without a
warrant. A police officer may arrest a person without a warrant for committing
a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor only when the offense is committed in the
presence of the officer, except as provided in subsections (1) through (10) of
this section.

(1)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor, involving physical harm or
threats of harm to any person or property or the unlawful taking of property or
involving the use or possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition,
possession, or consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one
years under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(2)
A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail,
personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the
officer has probable cause to believe that:

(a)
An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under RCW
10.99.040(2), 10.99.050, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.44.063,
chapter 26.26 RCW, or chapter 26.50 RCW restraining the person and the person
has violated the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats
of violence or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or
entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care or, in the case of an
order issued under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or conditions
upon the person; or

(b)
The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding four hours has
assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and the
officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has occurred; (ii) an assault has
occurred which has resulted in bodily injury to the victim, whether the injury
is observable by the responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical
action has occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to
fear imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the officer has
probable cause to believe that family or household members have assaulted each
other, the officer is not required to arrest both persons. The officer shall
arrest the person whom the officer believes to be the primary physical
aggressor. In making this determination, the officer shall make every
reasonable effort to consider: (i) The intent to protect victims of domestic
violence under RCW 10.99.010; (ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted
or serious threats creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of
domestic violence between the persons involved.

(3)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing a violation of any of the following traffic laws shall have
the authority to arrest the person:

(a)
RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other
property;

(b)
RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or
damage to an attended vehicle;

(c)
RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or racing of vehicles;

(d)
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(e)
RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while operator's license is
suspended or revoked;

(f)
RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a negligent manner.

(4)
A ((law enforcement)) police officer investigating at the scene
of a motor vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved
in the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the driver
has committed in connection with the accident a violation of any traffic law or
regulation.

(5)
A police officer investigating at the scene of an accident involving a
vessel regulated under chapter 88.12 RCW may arrest the operator of a vessel
involved in the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the
operator of the vessel has committed a violation of chapter 88.12 RCW in
connection with the accident. In addition, any police officer having
probable cause to believe that a person has committed or is committing a
violation of RCW 88.12.025 shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(6)
((An)) A police officer may act upon the request of a law
enforcement officer in whose presence a traffic infraction was committed, to
stop, detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic infraction to the driver who
is believed to have committed the infraction. The request by the witnessing
officer shall give an officer the authority to take appropriate action under
the laws of the state of Washington.

(7)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing any act of indecent exposure, as defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may
arrest the person.

(8)
A police officer may arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail,
personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the
officer has probable cause to believe that an order has been issued of which
the person has knowledge under chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated
the terms of that order.

(9)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has, within
twenty-four hours of the alleged violation, committed a violation of RCW
9A.50.020 may arrest such person.

(10)
A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person illegally
possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm or other dangerous weapon on
private or public elementary or secondary school premises shall have the
authority to arrest the person.

For
purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the
meaning defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).

(11)
Except as specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4), and (6) of this
section, nothing in this section extends or otherwise affects the powers of
arrest prescribed in Title 46 RCW.

(12)
No police officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest
pursuant to RCW 10.31.100 (2) or (8) if the police officer acts in good faith
and without malice.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 88.12 RCW to read as follows:

A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of an accident
involving a vessel regulated under this chapter may issue a notice of
infraction to the operator of a vessel involved in the accident if the officer
has reasonable cause to believe that the operator of the vessel has committed
an infraction in connection with the accident.

---
END ---