BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the voters of any county
that does not operate under a home rule charter shall possess the direct
legislative powers through initiative and referendum on any matter within the
scope of the powers, functions, or duties of the county.

(2)
Ordinances of such a county shall become effective thirty days after their
adoption, and are subject to a referendum petition being filed during the
interim, except:

(a)
Ordinances initiated by petition;

(b)
Ordinances necessary for immediate preservation of public peace, health, and
safety or for the support of county government and its existing public
institutions which contain a statement of urgency and provide that the
ordinance becomes effective either immediately upon adoption or at a date less
than thirty days after its adoption;

(c)
Ordinances providing for road improvement districts, local improvement
districts, or utility local improvement districts;

(d)
Ordinances appropriating money;

(e)
Ordinances providing for or approving collective bargaining;

(f)
Ordinances providing for the compensation of or working conditions of county
employees; or

(g)
Ordinances authorizing or repealing the levy of taxes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW to read as follows:

Initiative
petitions proposing the adoption of an ordinance must be signed by county
registered voters equal in number to at least twenty percent of the number of
county voters voting at the last state general election and may not be
circulated for more than one hundred eighty days. Referendum petitions must be
signed by county registered voters equal in number to at least fifteen percent
of the number of county voters voting at the last state general election and
must be filed with the county auditor no later than 5:00 p.m., thirty days
after the ordinance that is being subjected to referendum was adopted. The
petitions shall be filed with the county auditor who shall review the signatures
and certify the sufficiency of the signatures. If it appears that the same
registered voter signed the petitions more than once, only the first signature
shall be counted.

The
county auditor shall notify the county legislative authority if the initiative
petitions are certified as having sufficient valid signatures and the county
legislative authority shall either adopt the proposed ordinance, as proposed,
or shall cause the initiative to be submitted to county voters for their
approval or rejection at the next state general election occurring forty-five
or more days after the petitions were certified as having sufficient valid
signatures.

If
the referendum petitions are certified as having sufficient valid signatures,
the ordinance that is being subjected to referendum shall not become effective,
shall be held in abeyance, and shall be submitted to the county voters for
their approval or rejection at the next state general election that occurs
forty-five or more days after the petitions were certified as having sufficient
valid signatures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW to read as follows:

Each
initiative petition shall include the text of the proposed ordinance and shall
indicate that an initiative is being proposed. Each referendum petition shall
include the text of the ordinance that is proposed to be subjected to
referendum and shall indicate that a referendum is being proposed.

Each
petition shall include numbered lines and provide space on each numbered line
for a voter to sign the petition, print his or her name, insert his or her
residential address, and indicate the date he or she signed the petition. Each
petition shall include the warning that:

"Every person who signs this petition with any
other than his or her true name, knowingly signs more than one of these
petitions, signs this petition when he or she is not a registered voter
residing in the county, or makes any false statement on the petition may be
punished by fine or imprisonment or both."

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW to read as follows:

An ordinance that is submitted to voters as a initiative measure,
or that is referred to voters as a referendum measure, shall be adopted if
approved by a simple majority vote of county voters voting on the ballot
measure. Unless the ordinance provides for a differing effective date, an
ordinance that is approved by county voters shall become effective on the date
the results of the election are certified that voters approved the ordinance.

---
END ---