BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds and declares as a matter of public policy that the purpose of
this chapter is to regulate the use of imitation crash parts by requiring
disclosure and consumer consent when any use of imitation crash parts is
proposed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter and section 3 of this
act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Imitation crash part" means a replacement for any of the
nonmechanical sheet metal or plastic parts that generally constitute the
exterior of a motor vehicle, including inner and outer panels, which was not
made for or by the manufacturer of that motor vehicle.

(2)
"Motor vehicle body shop" means a person or business establishment
that undertakes the repair of collision damage to vehicles.

(3)
"Genuine crash part" means a replacement part for any of the
nonmechanical sheet metal or plastic parts that generally constitute the
exterior of a motor vehicle, including inner and outer panels, which was
manufactured by or for the original manufacturer of that motor vehicle.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A new
section is added to chapter 48.30 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
No insurance company may require the use of imitation crash parts in the repair
of a motor vehicle for a period of five years running from the year the motor
vehicle was manufactured unless the motor vehicle owner consents in writing at
the time of the repair. If the motor vehicle owner consents to the use of
imitation crash parts, the insurer must specify on the repair estimate which
parts are genuine crash parts and which parts are imitation crash parts and
must include with the estimate a disclosure document containing the following
information in no smaller than twelve-point type:

THIS ESTIMATE IS BASED UPON THE USE OF IMITATION
CRASH PARTS THAT WERE MANUFACTURED NEITHER BY THE ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE NOR BY A MANUFACTURER AUTHORIZED BY THE ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER OF
THE VEHICLE TO USE ITS NAME OR TRADEMARK. THE USE OF AN IMITATION CRASH PART
INVALIDATES ANY REMAINING WARRANTY OF THE ORIGINAL PART IT REPLACES. THE ONLY
WARRANTIES, IF ANY, COVERING IMITATION CRASH PARTS ARE THOSE THAT MAY BE MADE
BY THE MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR OF THOSE IMITATION PARTS.

I UNDERSTAND THAT MY VEHICLE WILL BE REPAIRED USING
IMITATION CRASH PARTS AS SPECIFIED IN THE REPAIR ESTIMATE, AND I AUTHORIZE THE
REPAIR FACILITY TO INSTALL THOSE SPECIFIED PARTS.

CUSTOMER
SIGNATURE DATE

(2)
Insurers may use imitation crash parts on vehicles six years old and older only
if the insurer specifies on the estimate which parts are genuine crash parts
and which parts are imitation crash parts and includes with the estimate a
disclosure document containing the following information in no smaller than
twelve-point type:

THIS ESTIMATE IS BASED UPON THE USE OF IMITATION
CRASH PARTS THAT WERE MANUFACTURED NEITHER BY THE ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE NOR BY A MANUFACTURER AUTHORIZED BY THE ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER OF
THE VEHICLE TO USE ITS NAME OR TRADEMARK. THE USE OF AN IMITATION CRASH PART
INVALIDATES ANY REMAINING WARRANTY OF THE ORIGINAL PART IT REPLACES. THE ONLY
WARRANTIES, IF ANY, COVERING IMITATION CRASH PARTS ARE THOSE THAT MAY BE MADE
BY THE MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR OF THOSE IMITATION PARTS.

I UNDERSTAND THAT MY VEHICLE WILL BE REPAIRED USING
IMITATION CRASH PARTS AS SPECIFIED IN THE REPAIR ESTIMATE, AND I AUTHORIZE THE
REPAIR FACILITY TO INSTALL THOSE SPECIFIED PARTS.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
No motor vehicle body shop may require the use of imitation crash parts in the
repair of a motor vehicle for a period of five years running from the year the
motor vehicle was manufactured unless the motor vehicle owner consents in
writing at the time of the repair. If the motor vehicle owner consents to the
use of imitation crash parts, the motor vehicle body shop must specify on the
estimate which parts are genuine crash parts and which parts are imitation
crash parts and must include with the estimate a disclosure document containing
the following information in no smaller than twelve-point type:

THIS ESTIMATE IS BASED UPON THE USE OF IMITATION
CRASH PARTS THAT WERE MANUFACTURED NEITHER BY THE ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE NOR BY A MANUFACTURER AUTHORIZED BY THE ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER OF
THE VEHICLE TO USE ITS NAME OR TRADEMARK. THE USE OF AN IMITATION CRASH PART
INVALIDATES ANY REMAINING WARRANTY OF THE ORIGINAL PART IT REPLACES. THE ONLY
WARRANTIES, IF ANY, COVERING IMITATION CRASH PARTS ARE THOSE THAT MAY BE MADE
BY THE MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR OF THOSE IMITATION PARTS.

I UNDERSTAND THAT MY VEHICLE WILL BE REPAIRED USING
IMITATION CRASH PARTS AS SPECIFIED IN THE REPAIR ESTIMATE, AND I AUTHORIZE THE
REPAIR FACILITY TO INSTALL THOSE SPECIFIED PARTS.

CUSTOMER
SIGNATURE DATE

(2)
Motor vehicle body shops may use imitation crash parts on vehicles six years
old and older only if the motor vehicle body shop specifies on the estimate
which parts are genuine crash parts and which parts are imitation crash parts
and includes with the estimate a disclosure document containing the following
information in no smaller than twelve-point type:

THIS ESTIMATE IS BASED UPON THE USE OF IMITATION
CRASH PARTS THAT WERE MANUFACTURED NEITHER BY THE ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE NOR BY A MANUFACTURER AUTHORIZED BY THE ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER OF
THE VEHICLE TO USE ITS NAME OR TRADEMARK. THE USE OF AN IMITATION CRASH PART
INVALIDATES ANY REMAINING WARRANTY OF THE ORIGINAL PART IT REPLACES. THE ONLY
WARRANTIES, IF ANY, COVERING IMITATION CRASH PARTS ARE THOSE THAT MAY BE MADE
BY THE MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR OF THOSE IMITATION PARTS.

I UNDERSTAND THAT MY VEHICLE WILL BE REPAIRED USING
IMITATION CRASH PARTS AS SPECIFIED IN THE REPAIR ESTIMATE, AND I AUTHORIZE THE
REPAIR FACILITY TO INSTALL THOSE SPECIFIED PARTS.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters
vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is
an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1, 2, 4, and 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---