BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.101.010 and 1981 c 132 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

When
used in this chapter:

(1)
The term "commission" means the Washington state criminal justice
training commission.

(2)
The term "boards" means the education and training standards boards,
the establishment of which are authorized by this chapter.

(3)
The term "criminal justice personnel" means any person who serves in
a county, city, state, or port commission agency engaged in crime prevention,
crime reduction, or enforcement of the criminal law.

(4)
The term "law enforcement personnel" means any public employee or
volunteer having as a primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in
general or any employee or volunteer of, or any individual commissioned by, any
municipal, county, state, or combination thereof, agency having as its primary
function the enforcement of criminal laws in general as distinguished from an
agency possessing peace officer powers, the primary function of which is the
implementation of specialized subject matter areas. For the purposes of this
subsection "primary function" means that function to which the
greater allocation of resources is made.

(5)
The term "correctional personnel" means any employee or volunteer who
by state, county, municipal, or combination thereof, statute has the
responsibility for the confinement, care, management, training, treatment,
education, supervision, or counseling of those individuals whose civil rights
have been limited in some way by legal sanction.

(6)
A peace officer is "convicted" at the time a plea of guilty has been
accepted, or a verdict of guilty or finding of guilt has been filed,
notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings, including but not
limited to sentencing, posttrial or postfact-finding motions and appeals.
"Conviction" includes a deferral of sentence and also includes the
equivalent disposition by a court in a jurisdiction other than the state of
Washington.

(7)
"Discharged for disqualifying misconduct" means terminated from
employment for: (a) Conviction of (i) any crime committed under color of
authority as a peace officer, (ii) any crime involving dishonesty, (iii) the
unlawful use or possession of a controlled substance, or (iv) any other crime
the conviction of which disqualifies a Washington citizen from the legal right
to possess a firearm under state or federal law; (b) conduct that would
constitute any of the crimes addressed in (a) of this subsection; or (c)
knowingly making materially false statements during disciplinary
investigations.

(8)
A peace officer is "discharged for disqualifying misconduct" within
the meaning of subsection (7) of this section under the ordinary meaning of the
term and when the totality of the circumstances support a finding that the
officer resigned in anticipation of discipline, whether or not the misconduct
was discovered at the time of resignation, and when such discipline, if carried
forward, would more likely than not have led to discharge for disqualifying
misconduct within the meaning of subsection (7) of this section.

(9)
When used in context of proceedings referred to in this chapter,
"final" means that the peace officer has exhausted all available
civil service appeals, collective bargaining remedies, and all other such
direct administrative appeals, and the officer has not been reinstated as the
result of the action. Finality is not affected by the pendency or availability
of state or federal administrative or court actions for discrimination, or by
the pendency or availability of any remedies other than direct civil service
and collective bargaining remedies.

(10)
"Peace officer" means any law enforcement personnel subject to the
basic law enforcement training requirement of RCW 43.101.200 and any other
requirements of that section, notwithstanding any waiver or exemption granted
by the commission, and notwithstanding the statutory exemption based on date of
initial hire under RCW 43.101.200. Commissioned officers of the Washington
state patrol, whether they have been or may be exempted by rule of the
commission from the basic training requirement of RCW 43.101.200, are included
as peace officers for purposes of this chapter. Fish and wildlife officers
with enforcement powers for all criminal laws under RCW 77.12.055 are peace
officers for purposes of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
As a condition of continuing employment as peace officers, all Washington peace
officers: (a) Shall timely obtain certification as peace officers, or timely
obtain certification for exemption therefrom, by meeting all requirements of
RCW 43.101.200, as that section is administered under the rules of the
commission, as well by meeting any additional requirements under this chapter;
and (b) shall maintain the basic certification as peace officers under this
chapter. The commission shall certify peace officers who have satisfied, or
have been exempted by statute or by rule from, the basic training requirements
of RCW 43.101.200 on or before the effective date of this section. Thereafter,
the commission may revoke certification pursuant to this chapter.

(2)
The commission shall allow a peace officer to retain status as a certified
peace officer as long as the officer: (a) Timely meets the basic law
enforcement training requirements, or is exempted therefrom, in whole or in
part, under RCW 43.101.200 or under rule of the commission; (b) meets or is
exempted from any other requirements under this chapter as administered under
the rules adopted by the commission; (c) is not denied certification by the
commission under this chapter; and (d) has not had certification revoked by the
commission.

(3)
As a prerequisite to basic law enforcement certification or basic law
enforcement equivalency certification, a peace officer applicant whose initial
date of hire with a Washington law enforcement agency occurs on or after the
effective date of this section must complete an eighteen-month period of
qualification as specified in this section. The period of qualification begins
on the date the peace officer is sworn into office as a peace officer. During
the period of qualification, the peace officer must successfully complete the
employer's probation period and the employer's field training program, if any.
The eighteen-month period of qualification must be completed in continuous
employment with the department of hire, unless the officer becomes unemployed
due to a reduction in force in that particular agency, in which case, the
officer may elect to change employing law enforcement agencies without
restarting the period of qualification. An officer who transfers or separates
from the original employing agency for any other reason must start and
successfully complete a new eighteen-month period of qualification to obtain
certified status. An officer must successfully complete a continuous
eighteen-month period of qualification with a single employer within
twenty-four months of hire unless the commission extends the twenty-four month
period. This subsection does not apply to a lateral entry peace officer who is
initially hired in a supervisory or management position.

(4)
As a prerequisite to certification, a peace officer applicant for certification
must sign a perpetual release to the commission, on a form devised or adopted
by the commission, and must authorize release to the commission of all
personnel files, termination papers, criminal investigation files, or any other
files, papers, or information that the commission requires.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Upon
request by a peace officer's employer or on its own initiative, the commission
may deny or revoke certification of any peace officer, after written notice and
hearing, if a hearing is timely requested by the peace officer under section 9
of this act, based upon a finding of one or more of the following conditions:

(1)
The peace officer has failed to timely meet all requirements for obtaining a
certificate of basic law enforcement training, a certificate of basic law
enforcement training equivalency, or a certificate of exemption from the
training;

(2)
The peace officer has knowingly falsified or omitted material information on an
application for training or certification to the commission;

(3)
The peace officer has been convicted at any time of a felony offense under the
laws of this state or has been convicted of a federal or out-of-state offense
comparable to a felony under the laws of this state;

(4)
The peace officer has been discharged for disqualifying misconduct, the
discharge is final, and some or all of the acts or omissions forming the basis
for the discharge proceedings occurred on or after the effective date of this
section;

(5)
The peace officer's certificate was previously issued by administrative error
on the part of the commission;

(6)
The peace officer has failed, without good cause, to cooperate with the commission
by: (a) Not furnishing necessary papers or documents requested by the
commission; (b) not furnishing in writing, on request of the commission, a
complete explanation covering the matter before the commission; or (c) not
responding to a subpoena issued by the commission; or

(7)
The peace officer has interfered with an investigation or action for denial or
revocation of certificate by: (a) Knowingly making a materially false
statement to the commission; or (b) in any matter under investigation by or
otherwise before the commission, tampering with evidence or tampering with or
intimidating any witness.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
person denied a certification based upon dismissal or withdrawal from a basic
law enforcement academy for any reason not also involving discharge for
disqualifying misconduct is eligible for readmission and certification upon
meeting standards established in rules of the commission, which rules may
provide for probationary terms on readmission.

(2)
A person whose certification is denied or revoked based upon prior
administrative error of issuance, failure to cooperate, or interference with an
investigation is eligible for certification upon meeting standards established
in rules of the commission, rules which may provide for a probationary period
of certification in the event of reinstatement of eligibility.

(3)
A person whose certification is denied or revoked based upon a felony criminal
conviction is not eligible for certification at any time.

(4)
A peace officer whose certification is denied or revoked based upon discharge
for disqualifying misconduct, but not also based upon a felony criminal
conviction, may, five years after the revocation or denial, petition the
commission for reinstatement of the certificate or for eligibility for
reinstatement. The commission shall hold a hearing on the petition to consider
reinstatement, and the commission may allow reinstatement based upon standards
established in rules of the commission. If the certificate is reinstated or
eligibility for certification is determined, the commission may establish a
probationary period of certification.

(5)
A peace officer whose certification is revoked based solely upon a criminal
conviction may petition the commission for reinstatement immediately upon a
final judicial reversal of the conviction. The commission shall hold a hearing
on request to consider reinstatement, and the commission may allow
reinstatement based on standards established in rules of the commission. If
the certificate is reinstated or if eligibility for certification is
determined, the commission may establish a probationary period of
certification.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
peace officer's certification lapses automatically when there is a break of
more than twenty-four consecutive months in the officer's service as a
full-time law enforcement officer. The officer may petition the commission for
reinstatement of certification. Upon receipt of a petition for reinstatement
of a lapsed certificate, the commission shall determine under this chapter and
any applicable rules of the commission if the peace officer's certification
status is to be reinstated, and the commission shall also determine any
requirements which the officer must meet for reinstatement. The commission may
adopt rules establishing requirements for reinstatement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Upon
termination of a peace officer for any reason, including resignation, the
agency of termination shall, within fifteen days of the termination, notify the
commission on a personnel action report form provided by the commission. The
agency of termination shall, upon request of the commission, provide such
additional documentation or information as the commission deems necessary to
determine whether the termination provides grounds for revocation under section
3 of this act. The commission shall maintain these notices in a permanent
file, subject to section 12 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. In
addition to its other powers granted under this chapter, the commission has
authority and power to:

(1)
Adopt, amend, or repeal rules as necessary to carry out this chapter;

(2)
Issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with investigations,
hearings, or other proceedings held under this chapter;

(3)
Take or cause to be taken depositions and other discovery procedures as needed
in investigations, hearings, and other proceedings held under this chapter;

(4)
Appoint members of a hearings board as provided under section 10 of this act;

(5)
Enter into contracts for professional services determined by the commission to
be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;

(6)
Grant, deny, or revoke certification of peace officers under the provisions of
this chapter;

(7)
Designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and statements of charges
under the provisions of this chapter; and

(8)
Employ such investigative, administrative, and clerical staff as necessary for
the enforcement of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A law
enforcement officer or duly authorized representative of a law enforcement
agency may submit a written complaint to the commission charging that a peace
officer's certificate should be denied or revoked, and specifying the grounds
for the charge. Filing a complaint does not make a complainant a party to the
commission's action. The commission has sole discretion whether to investigate
a complaint, and the commission has sole discretion whether to investigate
matters relating to certification, denial of certification, or revocation of
certification on any other basis, without restriction as to the source or the
existence of a complaint. A person who files a complaint in good faith under
this section is immune from suit or any civil action related to the filing or
the contents of the complaint.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
If the commission determines, upon investigation, that there is probable cause
to believe that a peace officer's certification should be denied or revoked
under section 3 of this act, the commission must prepare and serve upon the
officer a statement of charges. Service on the officer must be by mail or by
personal service on the officer. Notice of the charges must also be mailed to
or otherwise served upon the officer's agency of termination and any current
law enforcement agency employer. The statement of charges must be accompanied
by a notice that to receive a hearing on the denial or revocation, the officer
must, within sixty days of communication of the statement of charges, request a
hearing before the hearings board appointed under section 10 of this act.
Failure of the officer to request a hearing within the sixty-day period
constitutes a default, whereupon the commission may enter an order under RCW
34.05.440.

(2)
If a hearing is requested, the date of the hearing must be scheduled not
earlier than ninety days after communication of the statement of charges to the
officer. The commission shall give written notice of hearing at least twenty
days prior to the hearing, specifying the time, date, and place of hearing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
The procedures governing adjudicative proceedings before agencies under chapter
34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, govern hearings before the
commission and govern all other actions before the commission unless otherwise
provided in this chapter. The standard of proof in actions before the
commission is preponderance of the evidence.

(2)
On all appeals brought under section 9 of this act, a five-member hearings
board shall both hear the case and make the commission's final administrative
decision. Except as otherwise specified in this subsection, the commission
shall empanel the hearings board from members of the law enforcement training
standards and education board as follows: One must be a police chief appointed
by the commission; one must be a sheriff appointed by the commission; two must
be chosen by the president of the Washington council of police officers from
officer members of the law enforcement training standards and education board;
and one must represent either the community colleges or the four-year colleges
and universities and be appointed by the commission. When the appeal is filed
in relation to employment as a peace officer of the Washington state patrol,
the police chief member of the hearings board must be replaced by an
administrator of the state patrol chosen by the chief of the state patrol, and
one of the officer members of the hearings board, as designated by the
commission, must be replaced by a member of the Washington state patrol
troopers association, chosen by the president of the Washington state patrol
troopers association.

(3)
The commission's final administrative decision is subject to judicial review
under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. The
commission, its boards, and individuals acting on behalf of the commission and
its boards are immune from suit in any civil or criminal action contesting or
based upon proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their
duties in the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. (1)
Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, the following records
of the commission are confidential and exempt from public disclosure: (a) The
contents of personnel action reports filed under section 6 of this act; (b) all
files, papers, and other information obtained by the commission pursuant to
section 2(4) of this act; and (c) all investigative files of the commission
compiled in carrying out the responsibilities of the commission under this
chapter. Such records are not subject to public disclosure, subpoena, or
discovery proceedings in any civil action, except as provided in subsection (5)
of this section.

(2)
Records which are otherwise confidential and exempt under subsection (1) of
this section may be reviewed and copied: (a) By the officer involved or the
officer's counsel or authorized representative, who may review the officer's
file and may submit any additional exculpatory or explanatory evidence,
statements, or other information, any of which must be included in the file;
(b) by a duly authorized representative of (i) the agency of termination, or
(ii) a current employing law enforcement agency, which may review and copy its
employee-officer's file; or (c) by a representative of or investigator for the
commission.

(3)
Records which are otherwise confidential and exempt under subsection (1) of
this section may also be inspected at the offices of the commission by a duly
authorized representative of a law enforcement agency considering an
application for employment by a person who is the subject of a record. A copy
of records which are otherwise confidential and exempt under subsection (1) of
this section may later be obtained by an agency after it hires the applicant. In
all other cases under this subsection, the agency may not obtain a copy of the
record.

(4)
Upon a determination that a complaint is without merit, that a personnel action
report filed under section 6 of this act does not merit action by the
commission, or that a matter otherwise investigated by the commission does not
merit action, the commission shall purge records addressed in subsection (1) of
this section.

(5)
The hearings, but not the deliberations, of the hearings board are open to the
public. The transcripts, admitted evidence, and written decisions of the
hearings board on behalf of the commission are not confidential or exempt from
public disclosure, and are subject to subpoena and discovery proceedings in
civil actions.

(6)
Every individual, legal entity, and agency of federal, state, or local
government is immune from civil liability, whether direct or derivative, for
providing information to the commission in good faith.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. The
commission shall direct the board on law enforcement training standards and
education to assemble a study group to evaluate and make recommendations
regarding the possible expansion of the certification and decertification
provisions of chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act) to include
additional categories of criminal justice personnel with law enforcement
powers, including but not limited to specially commissioned Washington peace
officers and limited authority Washington peace officers, as those terms are
defined in RCW 10.93.020. The study group shall present its recommendations to
the commission by July 1, 2000. The commission shall consider the study group
recommendations, modify them if it deems appropriate, and, by January 1, 2001,
deliver a final report of the commission on the desirability and feasibility of
expanded certification and decertification.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. If
specific funding for section 13 of this act, referencing section 13 of this act
by bill and section number or chapter and section number, is not provided by
June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 13 of this act is
null and void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15.
Sections 2 through 13 of this act are each added to chapter 43.101 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16.
Sections 1 through 12 and 15 of this act take effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---