BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The transportation budget of the state is hereby adopted and, subject to the
provisions hereinafter set forth, the several amounts hereinafter specified, or
as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes designated, are
hereby appropriated from the several accounts and funds hereinafter named to
the designated state agencies and offices for employee compensation and other
expenses, for capital projects, and for other specified purposes, including the
payment of any final judgments arising out of such activities, for the period
ending June 30, 2001.

(2)
Legislation with fiscal impacts enacted in the 1997 or 1998 legislative session
not assumed in this act are not funded in the 1997-99 transportation budget.

(3)
Legislation with fiscal impacts enacted in the 1999 legislative session not
assumed in this act are not funded in the 1999-01 transportation budget.

(4)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this act.

(a)
"Fiscal year 2000" or "FY 2000" means the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2000.

(b)
"Fiscal year 2001" or "FY 2001" means the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2001.

(c)
"FTE" means full-time equivalent.

(d)
"Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.

(e)
"Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for
the specified purpose.

(f)
"Performance-based budgeting" means a budget that bases resource
needs on quantified outcomes and results expected from use of the total appropriation.
"Performance-based budgeting" does not mean incremental budgeting
that focuses on justifying changes from the historic budget or to line-item
input-driven budgets.

(g)
"Goals" means the statements of purpose that identify a desired
result or outcome. The statements shall be realistic, achievable, directive,
assignable, evaluative, and logically linked to the agency's mission and
statutory mandate.

(h)
"Strategic plan" means the strategies agencies create for investment
choices in the future. All agency strategic plans shall present alternative
investment strategies for providing services.

(i)
"Enacted in the form passed by the legislature" means the referenced
bill, as identified by a four-digit number, was:

(i)
Passed by the legislature and enacted either with no provisions vetoed by the
governor or with only ministerial or de minimus changes resulting from a
partial veto; or

(ii)
Attached in full onto another bill as an amendment and the entire bill,
including the amendment, was passed by the legislature and enacted either with
no provisions vetoed by the governor or with only ministerial or de minimus
changes resulting from a partial veto.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
legislature recognizes that the 1999 endangered species act listing or proposed
listing of salmonid species throughout the state of Washington may require
increased operational and capital expenditures for transportation. As the
state's fiscal obligations pursuant to the listing or proposed listing become
clearer over time, it may be necessary to revisit funding decisions reflected
in this act in order to shift resources to meet those obligations. The
department of transportation, the transportation improvement board, and the
county road administration board shall report to the legislature on December 1,
1999, on capital project delay impacts, including impact on costs and project
delivery, due to the endangered species act listing or proposed listing.

PART
I

GENERAL
GOVERNMENT AGENCIES-‑OPERATING

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF AGRICULTURE

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 327,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations
and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The entire
appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the motor fuel
quality program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 102. FOR
THE LEGISLATIVE
EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 900,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$103,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the local government
finance reporting system project. This amount shall lapse unless $207,000 is
appropriated for this project from the state general fund; and

(2)
$202,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the transportation
infrastructure needs data base project. This amount shall lapse unless
$405,000 is appropriated for this project in the omnibus operations
appropriations act.

(3)
$325,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for contracting with the
office of the state auditor for the collection of local government fiscal data
associated with the local government finance reporting system. In implementing
the reporting system, the legislative evaluation and accountability program
shall work with the local government finance study technical advisory
committee. The committee shall include, but not be limited to, one member from
the senate and one member from the house of representatives. An alternate
legislator shall also be picked for each designated legislator to serve in the
event that the designated legislator is unable to fulfill his or her duties on
the committee. This amount shall lapse unless the legislature appropriates
$325,000 for the same purpose by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 103. FOR
THE UTILITIES
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Grade
Crossing Protective Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 111,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The utilities and transportation commission shall develop a competitive rail
grade crossing safety grant program which will fully fund selected safety
projects to the extent allowable under chapter 81.53 RCW.

(2)
Beginning on the effective date of this act through May 1, 2000, the utilities
and transportation commission may not grant any new certificates under chapter
81.68 RCW in any areas where a public transportation system has been formed.

(3)
The appropriation in this section is for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000.

(4)
During the 1999 interim the legislative transportation committees shall convene
a task force to study issues related to the siting of, and fees charged for the
siting of, utility facilities on, over, under, and along railroad rights of
way.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104. FOR
THE STATE
PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 931,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: A
report of actual expenditures and descriptions of the expenditures from the
motor vehicle fund will be submitted to the legislature with the governor's
2001-2003 biennial budget request.

GENERAL
GOVERNMENT AGENCIES‑-CAPITAL

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 105. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND RECREATION‑-CAPITAL
PROJECTS

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 2,690,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$900,000 is a reappropriation provided to complete the Cama Beach project and
the Damon point project funded in section 110, chapter 457, Laws of 1997. The
projects shall be completed by June 30, 2001. Upon completion of these
projects any surplus funding may be used for the projects listed in subsection
(2) of this section.

(2)
$1,790,000 is a one-time appropriation provided solely for the following
projects, apportioned as follows:

(a)
Ike Kinswa State Park, $100,000 to commission a hydrology and geology study for
the park road drainage system and a traffic study of the intersection of the
park entrance roads with SR 122;

(b)
Mt. Spokane State Park, $1,300,000;

(c)
Beacon Rock State Park, $300,000; and

(d)
Cama Beach State Park, $90,000.

These projects shall be completed by June 30, 2001. Project status
reports shall be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature
in January 2000 and January 2001.

(End of part)

PART
II

TRANSPORTATION
AGENCIES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 1,452,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $........................................... 9,038,000

School
Zone Safety Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 1,004,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION ...................... $ 11,494,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:
$25,000 of the highway safety account‑-state is provided as a one-time
appropriation to implement the Cooper Jones act, chapter 165, Laws of 1998.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. FOR
THE BOARD
OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS

Pilotage
Account‑-State Appropriation............... $ 290,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203. FOR
THE COUNTY
ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural
Arterial Trust Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 72,510,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 9,546,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation................................... $ 376,000

County
Arterial Preservation Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 28,612,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 111,044,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:
$8,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely
for projects on the freight and goods systems on county roads.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. FOR
THE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Urban
Arterial Trust Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 104,508,000

Transportation
Improvement Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 99,414,000

Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 33,496,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 237,418,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: To
the extent practicable, the board shall give preference, for amounts which
would otherwise be granted to cities, to those projects which complement
projects funded under the county corridor congestion relief program contained
in section 231(8) of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 205. FOR
THE LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 7,394,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$2,306,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided for
the operation of the senate transportation committee. The appropriation
includes $500,000 for personal service contracts and other activities as
deemed necessary by the senate transportation committee.

(2)
$2,267,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
for the operation of the house of representatives transportation committee.
The appropriation includes $500,000 for personal service contracts and other
activities as deemed necessary by the house of representatives transportation
committee.

(3)
The senate transportation committee shall work during the 1999 interim with
members of the senate ways and means committee to assess funding options for
aviation.

(4)
The transportation committees of the legislature shall evaluate the
transportation functions currently performed by the utilities and
transportation commission including but not limited to those regarding the
issuance of certificates of public convenience and necessity for auto
transportation companies.

(5)
A legislative task force consisting of one member from each caucus of the
senate and one member from each caucus of the house of representatives shall
conduct a road jurisdiction study. The legislative task force shall appoint a
technical advisory panel consisting of representatives of cities, counties, and
the department of transportation. The study shall include but not be limited
to an examination of the following issues:

(a)
Whether changed conditions merit redesignation of certain local roadways as
state routes and the return of certain state routes to local jurisdictions;

(b)
Alternatives to current revenue distribution methodologies for funding roadway
and highway needs;

(c)
Determine roadway responsibilities, authorities, and practices by
jurisdictional level; and

(d)
Evaluate governance issues associated with road jurisdiction.

(6)
The transportation committees of the legislature shall oversee program
accountability reviews of department of transportation, department of
licensing, and Washington state patrol programs selected by the senate
transportation committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 206. FOR
THE BLUE
RIBBON COMMISSION ON TRANSPORTATION

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 1,800,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The $1,800,000 motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the purpose of enabling the blue ribbon commission on transportation
to fulfill its mission. The funds are to be administered by the
transportation committees of the legislature on behalf of the blue ribbon
commission on transportation.

(2)
The blue ribbon commission on transportation shall commission and supervise the
development of a modal trade-off model. The purpose of the model is to assist,
not replace decision making; it will not simply produce numerical solutions.
The model shall be developed in cooperation with the transportation committees
of the legislature, the transportation commission, and the department of
transportation's modal directors of research, planning, and programming.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 207. FOR
THE MARINE
EMPLOYEES COMMISSION

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 356,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 208. FOR
THE TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 807,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 209. FOR
THE FREIGHT
MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 600,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: When
approving projects, the freight mobility strategic investment board shall:

(1)
Emphasize funding projects according to their order on the prioritization list
developed by the board;

(2)
Not allow the program's share of total project cost to exceed sixty-five
percent unless the board grants a special exception;

(3)
Set a $50,000,000 cap on the amount it will authorize for any one project; and

(4)
Give a project a higher priority designation if project partners increase their
funding and the board deems the reprioritization is appropriate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 210. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL‑-FIELD OPERATIONS
BUREAU

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 154,538,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation........................... $ 6,153,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation..................... $ 169,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 160,860,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The following amounts are provided solely for administration of the field
operations group subprogram: $120,372,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state
appropriation; $2,854,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-federal
appropriation; and $83,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-private/local
appropriation.

(2)
The following amounts are provided solely for the administration of the
commercial vehicle division subprogram: $26,367,000 of the state patrol highway
account‑-state appropriation; $3,299,000 of the state patrol highway
account‑-federal appropriation; and $86,000 of the state patrol highway
account‑-private/local appropriation.

(3)
$7,799,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the administration of the traffic investigation division
subprogram.

(4)
$1,137,000 of the state patrol highway account--state appropriation is provided
solely for the license fraud task force to begin on July 1, 1999. Positions
funded are one sergeant/detective, three Washington state patrol detectives,
and one clerical support person, for administrative support for the task force
as a whole. $115,400 of this amount is for reimbursement to the department of
revenue and $228,315 of this amount is for reimbursement to the attorney
general's office. If Senate Bill No. 5706 is not enacted in the form passed by
the legislature the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Any funds
provided in this subsection not used to implement Senate Bill No. 5706 as
enacted by the legislature shall revert at the end of the 1999-01 biennium.

(5)
$1,435,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely to the field operations group subprogram as a one-time
appropriation to begin funding phase III of the Washington state patrol's
upgrade to the state-wide emergency communication system. The Washington state
patrol shall provide a full analysis of the costs, benefits, and requirements
for completing all phases of the upgrade to the state-wide emergency
communication system to the transportation committees of the legislature by
December 1, 1999.

(6)
The Washington state patrol is authorized to use the federal community-oriented
policing program (COPS) for 18 COPS troopers to begin in July 2000. The
troopers must be used on the state's highways and up to six may be utilized in
the Vancouver, Washington area.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 211. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL‑-SUPPORT
SERVICES BUREAU

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 67,015,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation........................... $ 104,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation..................... $ 743,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 67,862,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:
$877,000 of the state patrol highway account‑‑state appropriation
is provided solely to maintain pursuit vehicles and provide for replacement of
the vehicles at 110,000 miles. The agency may purchase a total of 354 pursuit
vehicles during the biennium ending June 30, 2001. The appropriation in this
section reflects carry forward and new funding due to the consolidation of
gasoline, maintenance, parts, and pursuit vehicles into the fleet section of
the support services bureau.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 212. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-MANAGEMENT
AND SUPPORT SERVICES

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 118,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation............... $ 50,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 6,578,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 4,571,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 11,317,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 213. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-INFORMATION
SYSTEMS

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 102,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation............... $ 46,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 5,725,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 3,651,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 9,524,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:
$745,000 of the highway safety fund‑-state appropriation is a
reappropriation of funds originally appropriated for the document scanner
project in the 1997-99 biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 214. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING‑-VEHICLE SERVICES

Marine
Fuel Tax Refund Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 26,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation............... $ 556,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 56,137,000

DOL
Services Account‑-State Appropriation........... $ 2,907,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 59,626,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$81,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely to
implement Senate Bill No. 5000 enacted in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 5000 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
$273,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely
to implement Senate Bill No. 5280 enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5280 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$82,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely to
implement Senate Bill No. 5641 enacted in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 5641 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4)
$300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely
to implement Senate Bill No. 6009 enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6009 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$15,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely to
implement House Bill No. 2201 enacted in the form passed by the legislature.

(6)
The department of licensing shall issue license plate emblems at the discretion
of the adjutant general.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 215. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING‑-DRIVER SERVICES

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 1,960,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 78,075,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 80,035,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,880,000 of the highway safety account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the department to enter into a contract for the implementation of an
improved state driver's license and identicard. The contract with the vendor
providing the improved license and identicard shall state that the license and
the identicard shall not contain: (a) The driver's social security number in
either visible or machine readable form; or (b) the driver's fingerprint or
thumbprint. Consistent with RCW 42.17.260(9) the department shall not sell or
otherwise make available any information that it gathers from citizens of the
state of Washington in administering the driver's licensing program except as
already authorized in Title 46 RCW.

(2)
In September of 1999 the department of licensing shall report to the
transportation committees of the legislature on:

(a)
The controls implemented by the department to ensure the integrity and
credibility of the written driver's license test administered by the
department; and

(b)
The policies and procedures implemented by the department to ensure that the
driver's manuals produced and distributed by the department contain correct
data based on current federal, state, and local statutes, ordinances, and
rules.

(3)
$610,000 of the highway safety fund--state appropriation is provided solely to
implement House Bill No. 1147 enacted in the form passed by the legislature.
If House Bill No. 1147 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature by
June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4)
$17,000 of the highway safety fund--state appropriation is provided solely to
implement House Bill No. 1774 enacted in the form passed by the legislature.
If House Bill No. 1774 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature the
amount referenced in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$130,000 of the highway safety fund--state appropriation is provided solely to
implement House Bill No. 2259 enacted in the form passed by the legislature.
If House Bill No. 2259 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$34,000 of the highway safety fund--state appropriation is provided solely to
implement Senate Bill No. 5374 enacted in the form passed by the legislature.
If Senate Bill No. 5374 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature
the amount referenced in this subsection shall lapse.

(7)
If Senate Bill No. 6009 is enacted in the form passed by the legislature
$335,000 of the highway safety fund--state appropriation shall lapse.

(8)
$329,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is provided solely
to implement Senate Bill No. 5399 enacted as passed by the legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 216. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY
MANAGEMENT AND FACILITIES‑-PROGRAM D‑-OPERATING

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 44,508,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 400,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 44,908,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 217. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-AVIATION‑-PROGRAM F

Aeronautics
Account‑-State Appropriation............. $...................................... 4,010,000

Aircraft
Search and Rescue Safety and

Education
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 159,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 247,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 4,416,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 218. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 630,010,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 234,939,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation................................... $ 43,344,000

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 110,000

Special
Category C Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 55,220,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 197,284,000

Transportation
Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $........................................... 56,808,000

Puyallup
Tribal Settlement Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 8,662,000

Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 1,750,000

Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation..................... $ 1,750,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 1,229,877,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided for the location, design, right of
way acquisition, or construction of state highway projects designated as
improvements under RCW 47.05.030. The appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are
provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The special category C account‑-state appropriation of $55,220,000
includes $40,500,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by Senate
Bill No. 5060 or House Bill No. 1203 enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. The transportation commission may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

(2)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $1,285,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819(1) for match on
federal demonstration projects. The transportation commission may authorize
the use of current revenues available to the department of transportation in
lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(3)
The department shall report December 1st and June 1st of each year to the
transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial
management on the timing and the scope of work being performed for the regional
transit authority known as sound transit. This report shall provide a
description of all department activities related to the regional transit
authority including investments in state‑owned infrastructure.

(4)
The motor vehicle account‑-federal appropriation in this section is
transferrable to the transportation account to ensure efficient funds
management and program delivery.

(5)
The north Sumner interchange project shall be funded entirely from the motor
vehicle account appropriation. The project shall no longer receive a portion
of its funding from the economic development account.

(6)
$34,920,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the state program share of freight mobility projects as identified
by the freight mobility strategic investment board. The amount provided in
this subsection can only be expended upon authorization from the freight
mobility strategic investment board.

(7)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $469,779,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(8)
$500,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for analysis and design of congestion solutions at the intersections of
the South Lake Union/Mercer corridor with Interstate 5 and SR 99. The amount
provided in this subsection shall be expended on the state's portion of the
project. The department's authority to expend the amount referenced in this
subsection is contingent on the city of Seattle appropriating $500,000 or more
toward design and analysis for the local street portion of the project.

(9)
$10,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and $40,000,000
of the transportation account‑-state appropriation are provided as a cash
contribution for the development of the public private initiatives project at
Tacoma Narrows. State funds shall be used initially for the acquisition of
right of way and the forensic studies of the existing bridge including purchase
of equipment necessary to conduct the studies. The balance of state funds not
required for acquisition of right of way and forensic studies shall be placed
with the designated bond trustee at the same time the privately secured debt
proceeds are deposited.

(10)(a)
$3,992,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided for
the following two highway projects on SR 16 except as set forth under (b) of
this subsection: Union to Sixth avenue/Pearl street and Sixth avenue/Pearl
street to Jackson avenue. These projects are part of a coordinated approach
that, along with construction of the Tacoma Narrows bridge project, will
provide congestion relief on the SR 16 corridor. The appropriations in this
section include funds for the construction of high occupancy vehicle (HOV) lanes
on SR 16 on both the eastern and western sides of the Tacoma narrows bridge.
The HOV construction project is part of a coordinated approach that, along with
construction of the Tacoma Narrows bridge project, will provide congestion
relief on the SR 16 corridor.

(b)
If the Tacoma Narrows bridge project is delayed, the transportation commission
may reprioritize projects on SR 16.

(11)
$5,800,000 of the motor vehicle account‑‑state appropriation is
provided solely for the completion of the weigh stations at Stanwood and Cle
Elum along with weigh in motion at those sites an weigh in motion at Fort Lewis
Northbound. The Washington state patrol and department of transportation shall
work cooperatively to complete these projects.

(12)
$485,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is a
reappropriation provided solely to enable the translake committee to finalize
and present its recommendations. Upon presentation of the recommendations, or
upon the expenditure of the appropriation provided by this subsection, the
department of transportation shall disband the committee.

(13)
$800,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely to the Washington state department of transportation, office of urban
mobility, to advance the recommendations of the translake Washington study
committee. These funds shall be used to develop a scope of work for an
environmental impact statement and related engineering work, including an
environmental strategy, a decision process, a statement of purpose and need,
and a formal notice of intent. None of the appropriation for the scope of work
for the environmental impact statement shall be available to support any
activities of the translake Washington study committee.

(14)
$500,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for predesign of the northeast 44th street interchange on I-405. The
department of transportation and the city of Renton shall develop a proposal
that includes a funding plan for the interchange that specifies the partner's
share of the cost. The department and the city shall report to the legislative
transportation committees by December 1, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 219. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS‑-PROGRAM K

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 1,212,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 10,162,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 11,374,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The
motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $10,162,000 in proceeds
from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.834 for all forms of cash
contributions, or the payment of other costs incident to the location,
development, design, right of way, and construction of the Tacoma narrows
bridge improvements under the public-private transportation initiative program
authorized under chapter 47.46 RCW; and for support costs of the public-private
transportation initiatives program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 220. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE‑-PROGRAM M

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 251,426,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 887,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local Appropriation... $................................................ 3,417,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 255,730,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
If portions of the appropriations in this section are required to fund
maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by federal
emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides, supplemental
appropriations will be requested to restore state funding for ongoing
maintenance activities.

(2)
The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any federal moneys
received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall place an equal amount of
the motor vehicle fund‑-state into unallotted status. This exchange
shall not affect the amount of funding available for snow and ice removal.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 221. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PRESERVATION‑-PROGRAM P

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 318,691,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 284,587,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local Appropriation... $................................................ 3,117,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 121,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 606,516,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $6,650,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for
emergency purposes. However, the transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(2)
The motor vehicle account‑-federal appropriation in this section is
transferrable to the transportation account to ensure efficient funds
management and program delivery.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 222. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRAFFIC
OPERATIONS‑-PROGRAM Q

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ 221,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 37,085,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 1,662,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local Appropriation... $ 122,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 39,090,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and the specified amount is provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $4,324,000 for
state matching funds for federally selected competitive grant or congressional
earmark projects other than commercial vehicle information system and network
(CVISN). These moneys shall be placed into reserve status until such time as
federal funds are secured and a state match is required. If matching federal
funds are not obtained by September 30, 2000, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(2)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $600,000 for a
two-year pilot program for contracted roving service patrols. The department
shall provide a progress report on this pilot program to the office of
financial management, the transportation committees of the legislature on
December 1, 2000. The pilot program will be evaluated with future direction
and funding to be determined by the documented results and benefits of the
pilot program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 223. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT‑-PROGRAM S

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 4,464,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 98,390,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 125,000

Puget Sound
Ferry Operations Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 6,308,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 1,517,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 110,804,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and the specified amount is provided solely for that activity:
$586,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely to enable the secretary of transportation to implement a leadership
training program at the department of transportation. The program shall
include a mentoring component. The department shall develop performance
measures to evaluate the effectiveness of the program, including but not
limited to a performance measure to determine the effect of the program on
employee retention. The department shall provide a progress report on the
training program to the office of financial management and the transportation
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 224. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND
RESEARCH‑-PROGRAM T

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 12,109,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 17,000,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 1,371,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 30,480,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 225. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES‑-PROGRAM U

(1)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL TORT CLAIMS SUPPORT

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 2,595,000

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations‑‑State Appropriation.... $................................................ 1,155,000

(2)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 907,000

(3)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND
SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 3,743,000

(4)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 2,240,000

(5)
FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 12,039,000

(6)
FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 3,462,000

(7)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 158,000

(8)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION STATE PARKING
SERVICES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 90,000

(9)
FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS
SURCHARGE

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 1,100,000

(10)
FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 392,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 226. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM V

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 3,701,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 6,253,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 7,187,000

Transportation
Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $........................................... 7,345,000

Transportation
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation................................... $ 105,000

Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 800,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 24,391,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Up to $750,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for grants and activities relating to coordinating special
needs transportation among state and local providers. When selecting grant
recipients, the agency council on coordinated transportation shall give priority
to projects and programs that can be accomplished in the 1999-2001 biennium.
The department may expend up to $250,000 without a matching appropriation. The
department's authority to expend more than that amount is conditioned upon the
legislature authorizing a matching appropriation equal to the total expenditure
of the amount provided in this subsection.

(2)
$50,000 of the public transportation systems account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely to continue and enhance an existing pilot project between a
public transit provider and a school district expanding public transit service
to high school students in order to reduce the use of single occupancy
vehicles.

(3)
The department shall assess its commute trip reduction program. The assessment
shall include an evaluation of tax credits or other incentives to employers who
reduce commute trips to their work sites by encouraging employees to
telecommute. Up to $50,000 of the air pollution control account--state
appropriation is provided for a pilot project implementing telecommuting as
part of the commute trip reduction program. The pilot project may include use
of tax credits or other financial incentives.

(4)
In evaluating applications for rural mobility grants to public transportation
agencies, the department shall give added weight to projects that improve
connectivity among transit providers and across jurisdictional boundaries.

(5)
$4,900,000 of the transportation account‑‑federal appropriation is
provided solely for commute trip reduction programs administered by the
department of transportation. These funds come from the TEA‑21
congestion mitigation air quality program. The office of financial management
shall place $1,000,000 of the air pollution control account‑‑state
appropriation in reserve status.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 227. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM
W

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 140,135,000

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation........................... $ 29,575,000

Passenger
Ferry Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 789,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 116,221,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 286,720,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided for improving the Washington state
ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel acquisition, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel improvements, and terminal construction
and improvements. The appropriations in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for that activity:

(1)
The appropriations in this section, unless otherwise specified, are provided to
carry out only the projects in the Washington state ferries capital program
plan - version 3. The department shall reconcile the 1997-99 capital
expenditures within ninety days of the end of the biennium and submit a final
report to the transportation committees of the legislature, and the office of
financial management.

(2)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation
includes $27,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.60.800 for vessel and terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements,
and long lead time materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the Puget Sound capital construction account in lieu of bond proceeds for
any part of the state appropriation.

(3)
$1,500,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for preliminary engineering activities to develop a new class of
auto/passenger ferries. The design specifications for the vessels shall
require that the vessels deliver optimal performance in terms of vessel speed,
safety, reliability, and minimization of environmental impacts including damage
on the shoreline from the wake of the vessels. The vessels are intended to
ensure Washington state ferries compliance with applicable international and
domestic vessel safety standards and the Americans with disabilities act on
identified routes. This class of ferries should have a single adaptable design
able to operate efficiently and effectively on different ferry routes, each of
which has specific vessel capacity and handling requirements. These vessels
are intended to relieve existing and projected vehicular traffic demand on
congested routes such as, but not limited to, Seattle/Bremerton,
Fauntleroy/Southworth, and Port Townsend/Keystone.

(a)
Washington state ferries shall prepare:

(i)
A conceptual design outlining the owner's functional requirements;

(ii)
A design report that includes a budget estimate and outline of specifications
and plans;

(iii)
Specific contractual requirements and specifications;

(iv)
An evaluation of using the request for proposals process in accordance with RCW
47.56.030;

(v)
A request for interest to provide a propulsion system for this vessel class;
and

(vi)
An exploration of a public private partnership between Washington state
ferries, shipbuilders, and their supporting engineering firms for design and construction
of the vessel or vessels.

(b)
Washington state ferries shall report to the legislature by December 1, 1999,
on the conceptual design criteria and budget estimates for preferred hull
design and propulsion system/engine alternatives. The report shall include
recommended statutory changes that the legislature would need to enact in order
to proceed with acquisition of this class of vessels.

(4)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $110,729,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(5)
The department shall structure the request for proposal for the purchase of
passenger-only ferries authorized under RCW 47.60.652 to include the purchase
of a fifth back-up ferry to support maintenance schedules, emergency service
needs, and provide continuity of service on all passenger-only ferry routes.
The purchase of a fifth passenger-only ferry is subject to subsequent
legislative appropriation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 228. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-MARINE‑-PROGRAM X

Marine
Operating Account‑-State Appropriation........ $........................................... 303,014,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of $29,104,000 for
vessel operating fuel in the 1999-2001 biennium. If the actual cost of fuel is
less than this budgeted amount, the excess amount may not be expended. If the
actual cost exceeds this amount, the department shall request a supplemental
appropriation.

(2)
The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry employees. The
expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees during the 1999-2001
biennium may not exceed $205,640,000 plus a dollar amount, as prescribed by the
office of financial management, that is equal to any insurance benefit increase
granted general government employees in excess of $341.75 a month annualized
per eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for the respective fiscal year, a dollar amount as prescribed by the
office of financial management for costs associated with pension amortization
charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of financial management
for salary increases during the 1999-2001 biennium. For the purposes of this
section, the expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees shall be
limited to salaries and wages and employee benefits as defined in the office of
financial management's policies, regulations, and procedures named under
objects of expenditure "A" and "B" (7.2.6.2).

The
prescribed salary and insurance benefit increase or decrease dollar amount that
shall be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used to
increase or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 1999, and
thereafter, as established in the 1999-2001 general fund operating budget.

(3)
Up to $2,770,000 of the marine operating account‑-state appropriation may
be used for leasing and operating an appropriate passenger only ferry vessel
for the purpose of supporting existing, or testing new, passenger only service
while testing alternative vessel technologies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 229. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑- RAIL‑-PROGRAM
Y

Essential
Rail Assistance Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 85,000

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 15,094,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 95,915,000

Transportation
Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $........................................... 10,000,000

Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 5,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 126,094,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
No appropriation in this section may be used to fund rail passenger service
south of Portland, Oregon.

(2)
$2,000,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation and
$4,000,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state
appropriation are provided solely for the freight rail assistance program to
provide grants and loans for light density rail lines.

(3)
$3,000,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for acquisition of up to six rail passenger
cars to add capacity to existing advanced technology train sets operating in
Washington state.

(4)
$6,298,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state
appropriation is provided to fund the operation of a second train set providing
additional roundtrip service from Seattle to Vancouver, British Columbia. The
department's authority to expend the appropriation referenced in this
subsection for service north of Blaine is conditioned upon Canada, the province
of British Columbia, and/or private sources undertaking the capital
expenditures necessary to make the rail capital improvements required to
facilitate improved round trip rail service between Seattle and Vancouver, B.C.

(5)
$10,000,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation and $5,000,000
of the public transportation systems account‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for the King street maintenance facility to be built in
partnership with Amtrak. The amount referenced in this subsection is
conditioned on the execution of agreements between the department of
transportation, Amtrak, sound transit, and other participating parties which
will assure that the maintenance and operation of the maintenance facility will
not require state funding, except for billings for maintenance of state owned
passenger trains.

(6)
To the greatest extent practicable, expenditure of funds shall maximize funds
from partnerships and coordinate with other agencies investing in track
improvements.

(7)
$5,000,000 of the transportation account‑-federal appropriation is
provided from TEA-21 surface transportation program enhancement funds is
provided solely for restoration of and improvements to the King Street station.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 230. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 129,886,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 8,040,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation ........ $ 10,767,000

Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 3,250,000

Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation..................... $ 1,750,000

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 150,000

Highway
Infrastructure Account‑-Federal

Appropriation................................... $ 1,500,000

Highway
Infrastructure Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 234,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 155,577,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$300,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely to establish alternatives for flood management and flood hazard
reduction projects in the Chehalis basin.

(a)
The department of transportation shall convene a technical committee to develop
watershed-based solutions to flooding within the Chehalis basin. The technical
committee shall be comprised of representatives of the department of
transportation, department of ecology, department of fish and wildlife, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the military
department's emergency management division, and affected counties and tribes.
The department of transportation shall also seek the participation of the
United States army corps of engineers, federal emergency management
administration, the United States geological survey, the United States fish and
wildlife service, the United States environmental protection agency, and other
entities with critical knowledge related to the structural or nonstructural
flood hazard reduction projects in the Chehalis basin. Funds shall be
distributed by the department of transportation for alternative analysis,
mapping, and model testing projects as recommended by the technical committee.
The solutions considered by the technical committee shall be consistent with
fish and habitat recovery efforts and avoid additional flood hazard to
downstream communities. The department of transportation shall present a
report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 1999,
regarding findings and progress made by funded projects.

(b)
If the federal government makes funds available to accomplish the project
described in (a) of this subsection, the department of transportation shall
place the appropriation identified in this section in reserve.

(2)
$85,121,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the state program share of freight mobility projects as identified
by the freight mobility strategic investment board. Notwithstanding RCW
79.91.100, between July 1, 1999, and June 30, 2001, the department of natural
resources shall execute and deliver an instrument granting an easement to
cities, towns, and counties who request an easement for roadway purposes,
including the right to make necessary fills, on, over, or across the beds of
navigable waters if those easements are necessary to facilitate the
construction of projects funded in whole or part by a portion of the
appropriation referenced in this subsection. The department of natural
resources shall not charge the city, town, or county for the easement except as
necessary to recover reasonable administrative costs. The amount provided in
this subsection can only be expended upon authorization from the freight
mobility strategic investment board.

(3)
$400,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for a study by the transportation committees of the legislature in
cooperation with the port of Benton developing a strategic corridor feasibility
and master site plan for the port of Benton. If the port of Benton does not
provide at least $200,000 to fund the plan development, the transportation fund‑-state
appropriation referenced in this subsection shall lapse and this subsection
shall be null and void.

(4)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $105,121,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(5)
$10,000,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely to fund the first phase of a multiphase cooperative project
with the state of Oregon to dredge the Columbia river. The department shall
not expend the appropriation in this section unless agreement on ocean disposal
sites has been reached which protects the state's commercial crab fishery. The
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse unless the state of Oregon
appropriates a dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of the project.

(6)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $1,167,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819(1). The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(7)
$5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for a small city pavement preservation program, to be administered by
the department's TransAid division. The department, in consultation with
stakeholders, shall establish program guidelines. The guidelines should
include but not be limited to a provision limiting program eligibility to
cities with a population of 2,500 or less.

(8)
$20,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for a county corridor congestion relief program, to be administered by
the department's TransAid division. The purpose of the program is to provide
funding for congested urban corridors, as defined and selected by the
department of transportation in consultation with counties, regional
transportation planning organizations, and the transportation improvement
board. At a minimum, project selection criteria should include: Consistency
with regional transportation plans; measurable improvements in mobility; cost
effectiveness; systemic corridor mobility improvements rather than isolated
"spot" improvements; and optimal timing for construction.

(9)
$5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for improving traffic and pedestrian safety near schools. The TransAid
division within the department of transportation shall administer this
program. Funds should be used for traffic and pedestrian improvements near
schools, including roadway channelization and signalization.

(10)
The TransAid division within the department of transportation shall develop a
prequalification procedure for potential bidders on projects administered or
approved by the transportation improvement board. The board shall work with
other interested parties including but not limited to associations representing
general contractors and the office of minority and women's business
enterprises. The prequalification procedure's goal is to ascertain that
bidders are qualified by experience, financing, equipment, and organization to
do the work called for in the contract documents. The prequalification
procedure may require a bidder to (1) satisfy threshold requirements
established by the board prior to being furnished a proposal form on any
contract; or (2) complete a preaward survey of the bidder's qualification prior
to award.

(11)
Up to $100,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for audits of city and county transportation funding to determine
whether any city or county has supplanted its local transportation funding with
state funding provided under sections 408 and 409 of this act. The department
shall report the results of this audit to the transportation committees of the
legislature, and the office of financial management by December 31, 2000.

(12) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for city fish passage barrier removal and
habitat restoration. Funds should be used for eliminating fish passage
barriers, including stormwater facilities, and providing for habitat
restoration for salmonid species that are listed as threatened or endangered.
The amount provided in this section may only be expended upon authorization
from the department of transportation's environmental affairs office.

(End of part)

PART
III

TRANSPORTATION
AGENCIES CAPITAL FACILITIES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE PATROL

Appropriation:

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-State Appropriation $ 2,328,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$508,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation funds
minor works which include communication tower maintenance, Spokane district
headquarters HVAC, Morton HVAC replacement, emergency repairs, and Anacortes
scale repairs.

(2)
$500,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided for the Naselle detachment office.

(3)
$615,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided for repaving the academy drive course.

(4)
$275,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided for the squawk mountain communication tower.

(5)
$380,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided for the replacement of two traffic control aircraft.

(6)
$50,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided for the Ridgefield expansion design and the academy hookup fee for
waste treatment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. The
Washington state patrol is authorized to continue with the exchange of the
Olympia, Washington Martin Way property for a light industrial land complex to
be used to consolidate existing separately located state activities and
functions. The agency will work with the office of financial management,
department of general administration, and the transportation committees of the
legislature in the exchange and approval processes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)‑-CAPITAL

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 26,147,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Before any funds are expended for the transportation facility to be located in
Tumwater, Washington, the director of general administration shall conduct an
evaluation of the planned facility design and budget using life-cycle cost
analysis, value-engineering, and other techniques to maximize the long-term
effectiveness and efficiency of the facility or improvement as required under
RCW 43.82.010(10). Furthermore, the director shall present the findings of the
evaluation to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the
senate by December 31, 1999. Up to $100,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state
appropriation may be expended by the department of general administration to
conduct an analysis of future transportation-related facility office space
needs in Thurston county, by agency, for the next ten years. The analysis
shall consult with state agencies, private developers, and building owners to
determine the inventory of space available and planned over the next ten years
in government and nongovernment buildings, and the impact on current office
space. The analysis must be completed by January 31, 2000.

(2) The department of transportation is authorized to enter into a
financing contract using certificate of participation in the amount of
$14,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to acquire and remodel a regional complex in the department's
southwest region.

(End of part)

PART
IV

TRANSFERS
AND DISTRIBUTIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE

Highway
Bond Retirement Account Appropriation........ $........................................... 184,810,000

Ferry
Bond Retirement Account Appropriation......... $ 53,353,000

Transportation
Improvement Board Bond Retirement

Account‑-State
Appropriation.................... $ 35,158,000

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 270,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 6,543,000

Special
Category C Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 405,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 280,539,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 402. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital Construction

Account
Appropriation........................... $ 36,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 811,000

Special
Category C Account Appropriation............. $ 53,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 900,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 403. FOR
THE STATE
TREASURER‑-STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor
Vehicle Fund Appropriation for

motor
vehicle fuel tax and overload

penalties
distribution.......................... $ 492,721,000

Transportation
Fund Appropriation for

motor
vehicle excise tax distribution........... $ 491,606,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 404. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-TRANSFERS

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Patrol Highway Account:

For
transfer to the Department of

Retirement
Systems Expense Fund.................. $ 171,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 405. STATUTORY
APPROPRIATIONS. In addition to the amounts appropriated in this
act for revenue for distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system, and bond retirement and interest
including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest
on registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also
appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for these
purposes under any statutory formula or under any proper bond covenant made
under law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 406. The
department of transportation is authorized to undertake federal advance
construction projects under the provisions of 23 U.S.C. Sec. 115 in order to
maintain progress in meeting approved highway construction and preservation
objectives. The legislature recognizes that the use of state funds may be
required to temporarily fund expenditures of the federal appropriations for the
highway construction and preservation programs for federal advance construction
projects prior to conversion to federal funding.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 407. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

(1)
RV Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Motor Vehicle Fund‑-State........ $........................................... 1,590,000

(2)
Transportation Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Transportation Infrastructure

Account‑-State...................................... $ 5,000,000

The
department of transportation shall only transfer funds provided under this
subsection on an as‑needed basis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 408. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation

for
distribution to the cities.................. $ 18,250,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation

for
distribution to the counties................ $ 10,000,000

The
distributions in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation for distribution to cities is
provided solely to be distributed to cities with a population of over two
thousand five hundred in a manner consistent with RCW 46.68.110(4) in one
distribution on March 1, 2000. The motor vehicle fund‑-state
appropriation for distribution to the counties is provided solely to be distributed
in a manner consistent with RCW 46.68.122 in one distribution on March 1,
2000. If the voters of this state pass an initiative that eliminates or
reduces the motor vehicle excise tax authorized under RCW 82.44.020, the
appropriations in this section shall lapse.

(2)
The amounts provided in this section may not be used to supplant any existing
local government funding for transportation projects or programs. Any local
government in violation of this requirement shall immediately forfeit its eligibility
for future distributions provided under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 409. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation

for
distribution to the cities.................. $ 19,580,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation

for
distribution to the counties................ $ 10,000,000

The
distributions in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation for distribution to cities is
provided solely to be distributed to cities with a population of over two
thousand five hundred in a manner consistent with RCW 46.68.110(4) in one
distribution on March 1, 2001. The motor vehicle fund‑-state
appropriation for distribution to the counties is provided solely to be
distributed in a manner consistent with RCW 46.68.122 in one distribution on
March 1, 2001. If the voters of this state pass an initiative that eliminates
or reduces the motor vehicle excise tax authorized under RCW 82.44.020, the
appropriations in this section shall lapse.

(2)
The amounts provided in this section may not be used to supplant any existing
local government funding for transportation projects or programs. Any local
government in violation of this requirement shall immediately forfeit its
eligibility for future distributions provided under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 410. The
office of the state treasurer is authorized to transfer any transportation
improvement account and urban arterial trust account balances available in the
highway bond retirement account into the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account following a cooperative agreement by the department of
transportation and the transportation improvement board on the exact amount of
the transfer.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 411. The
motor vehicle account revenues are received at a relatively even flow
throughout the year. Expenditures may exceed the revenue during the
accelerated summer and fall highway construction season, creating a negative
cash balance during the heavy construction season. Negative cash balances also
may result from the use of state funds to finance federal advance construction
projects prior to conversion to federal funding. The governor and the
legislature recognize that the department of transportation may require
interfund loans or other short‑term financing to meet temporary seasonal
cash requirements and additional cash requirements to fund federal advance
construction projects.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 412. In
addition to such other appropriations as are made by this act, there is
appropriated to the department of transportation from legally available bond
proceeds in the respective transportation funds and accounts such amounts as
are necessary to pay the expenses incurred by the state finance committee in
the issuance and sale of the subject bonds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 413. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSFERS. The
department of transportation shall make the following transfers contingent on
passage of the bills referenced in each proviso as identified by bill number in
the form passed by the legislature:

(1)
If Senate Bill No. 5615 or House Bill No. 1588 is enacted in the form passed by
the legislature the department of transportation shall transfer:

(a)
The balances remaining at the close of the 1997-99 biennium in the economic
development account and the transportation capital facilities account to the
motor vehicle account‑-state; and

(b)
The balance remaining at the close of fiscal year 2000 in the marine operating
account to the Puget Sound ferry operations account.

(2)
If neither Senate Bill No. 5615 nor House Bill No. 1588 is enacted in the form
passed by the legislature the department of transportation is authorized to
transfer any balances available in the highway construction stabilization
account to the motor vehicle account to fund the appropriations contained in
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 414. FOR
THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD‑-TRANSFERS. The
transportation improvement board shall make the following transfers contingent
on passage of the bills referenced in each proviso as enacted in the form
passed by the legislature:

(1)
If Senate Bill No. 5360 or House Bill No. 1053 is enacted in the form passed by
the legislature the transportation improvement board shall transfer the
balances remaining at the close of the 1997-99 biennium in the small city
account and the city hardship assistance account to the urban arterial trust
account.

(2)
If Senate Bill No. 5615 or House Bill No. 1588 is enacted in the form passed by
the legislature the transportation improvement board shall transfer:

(a)
The balances remaining at the close of the 1997-99 biennium in the small city
account and the city hardship assistance account to the urban arterial trust
account; and

(b) The balance remaining at the close of the 1997-99 biennium in
the central Puget Sound public transportation systems account to the public
transportation systems account.

(End of part)

PART
V

1997-99
SUPPLEMENTAL APPROPRIATIONS

Transportation
Agencies

Sec.
501. 1997
c 457 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Urban Arterial Trust

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 57,159,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Transportation Improvement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 122,014,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-City Hardship Assistance

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 2,649,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Small City Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((7,921,000))

9,921,000

Central
Puget Sound Public Transportation

Account‑-State
Appropriation.. ............ $ 27,360,000

Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 3,928,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((221,031,000))

223,031,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The
transportation improvement account‑-state appropriation includes
$40,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.26.500.
However, the transportation improvement board may authorize the use of current
revenues available in lieu of bond proceeds.

Sec.
502. 1998
c 348 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL‑-FIELD OPERATIONS
BUREAU

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Patrol Highway

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((163,789,000))

166,035,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Patrol Highway

Account‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ ((4,374,000))

4,688,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Patrol Highway

Account‑-Local
Appropriation............... $ 170,000

Transportation
Fund‑‑State Appropriation........ $...................................... 4,522,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((172,855,000))

175,415,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The Washington state patrol is authorized to use the federal community oriented
policing program (COPS) for 54 troopers with 18 COPS troopers to begin in July
1998 and 36 COPS troopers to begin in January 1999.

(2)
$4,463,000 of the transportation fund--state appropriation and $3,737,000 of
the motor vehicle fund--state patrol highway account--state appropriation are
provided for an equalization salary adjustment of three percent on July 1,
1997, and six percent on July 1, 1998, for commissioned officers (entry level
trooper through captain), commercial vehicle enforcement officers, and communication
officers of the Washington state patrol. The salary adjustments are intended
to bring the existing salary levels into the fiftieth percentile of other
Washington state law enforcement compensation plans. This is in addition to
the salary increase contained in the omnibus appropriation bill or bills. The
total of the two increases, in the transportation budget and omnibus
appropriation bill or bills, may not exceed twelve percent.

(3)
The Washington state patrol will develop a vehicle replacement plan for the
next six years. The plan will include an analysis of the current 100,000 miles
replacement policy and agency assignment policy. Projected future budget
requirements will include forecasts of vehicle replacement costs, vehicle
equipment costs, and estimated surplus vehicle values when sold at auction.

(4)
The Washington state patrol vessel and terminal security (VATS) program will be
funded by the state patrol highway fund beginning July 1, 1997, and into future
biennia.

(5)
A personnel data base will be maintained of the 801 commissioned traffic law
enforcement officers, with a reconciliation at all times to the patrol
allocation model and a vehicle assignment and replacement plan.

(6)
$150,000 of the state patrol highway account appropriation is to fund the
Washington state patrol's portion of the drug recognition expert training
program previously funded by the traffic safety commission.

(7)
The Washington state patrol with legislative transportation committee staff
will perform an interim study of the Washington state patrol's commercial
vehicle enforcement program with a report to be presented to the legislature
and office of financial management in January 1998 with a developed business
plan and program recommendations which includes, but is not limited to, weigh
in motion technologies.

(8)(a)
The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the Washington traffic safety
commission, shall conduct an analysis of the most effective safety devices for
preventing accidents while delivery trucks are operating in reverse gear. The
analysis shall focus on trucks equipped with cube-style, walk-in cargo boxes,
up to eighteen feet long, that are most commonly used in the commercial
delivery of goods and services.

(b)
The state patrol shall incorporate research and analysis currently being
conducted by the national highway traffic safety administration.

(c)
Upon completion of the analysis, the state patrol shall forward its
recommendations to the legislative transportation committee and office of
financial management.

(9)
$381,000 of the transportation fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
the following traditional general fund purposes: The governor's air travel,
the license fraud program, and the special services unit. This transportation
fund‑-state appropriation is not a permanent funding source for these
purposes.

(10)
$461,000 of the state patrol highway account appropriation is provided solely
for monitoring and stopping fuel tax evasion. The Washington state patrol will
report on December 1, 1998, to the legislative transportation committee on the
activities and revenue collected associated with fuel tax evasion.

(11)
$289,000 of the state patrol highway account appropriation is provided solely
for vehicle license fraud investigation. A report will be presented each
session to the legislature on the activities and revenue collected by the
vehicle license fraud unit.

(12)
$268,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state patrol highway account is
provided solely to cover the employer's share of medicare premiums for
commissioned officers hired prior to 1986. If a referendum of these officers
does not receive majority support this appropriation shall not be expended by
the state patrol.

(13)
$105,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state patrol highway account‑-state
appropriation and $314,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state patrol
highway account‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for laptop
personal computers, peripheral equipment, and necessary software for existing
community oriented policing program (COPS) troopers.

(14)
$2,300,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state patrol highway account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely to purchase 100 equipped pursuit vehicles. If
the transportation fund‑-state appropriation reduction described in
section 503(9) of this act does not take place, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse. If the state patrol does not purchase the vehicles
prior to June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
503. 1998
c 348 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL‑-SUPPORT
SERVICES BUREAU

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Patrol Highway

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 52,926,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Patrol Highway

Account‑-Federal
Appropriation............. $ 104,000

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((2,513,000))

214,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((55,543,000))

53,244,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$1,017,000 for the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for year 2000 conversions of transportation automated systems.
For purposes of this subsection, transportation automated systems does not
include WASIS and WACIS.

(2)
$50,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for a feasibility study to assess the effect of mobile
computers on trooper productivity by type of service and measurement of the
productivity gains achieved through reduction in administrative time and
paperwork processing. The agency shall submit a copy of the proposed study
workplan to the office of financial management, the department of information
services, and the legislative transportation committee no later than October 1,
1997. A final report shall be submitted to the legislative transportation
committee, the office of financial management, and the department of
information services no later than January 31, 1998. This project is subject
to the provisions of section 502 of this act.

(3)
$50,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for a review of the feasibility of improving the patrol's computer-aided
dispatch system to permit tracking of trooper availability and response time to
calls for service. The agency shall submit a copy of the proposed study
workplan to the office of financial management, the department of information
services, and the legislative transportation committee no later than October 1,
1997. A final report shall be submitted to the legislative transportation
committee, the office of financial management, and the department of
information services no later than January 31, 1998. This project is subject
to the provisions of section 502 of this act.

(4)
These appropriations maintain current level funding for the Washington state
patrol service center and have no budget savings included for a consolidation
of service centers based on the study conducted by the technology management
group. During the 1997 interim, the costs for current level will be reviewed
by the office of financial management and department of information services
with a formal data center recommendation, that has been approved by the
information services board, to the legislature in January 1998. Current level
funding will be split between fiscal year 1998 and fiscal year 1999 with
consideration of funding adjustments based on the review and the formal policy
and budget recommendations.

(5)
$2,513,000 of the transportation fund‑-state appropriation is for the
following traditional general fund purposes: The executive protection unit,
revolving fund charges, budget and fiscal services, computer services,
personnel, human resources, administrative services, and property management.
This appropriation is not a permanent funding source for these purposes.

(6)
$22,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state patrol highway account
appropriation is provided solely to cover the employer's share of medicare
premiums for commissioned officers hired prior to 1986. If a referendum of
these officers does not receive majority support this appropriation shall not
be expended by the state patrol.

(7)
The 1998 Washington state patrol interim working group shall review the data
center, electronic services division, communications division, and strategic
planning and shall provide recommendations on increasing the effectiveness and
efficiencies of the programs under review and audit.

(8)
$1,580,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the transition of the Washington state patrol mainframe
data processing functions to the Washington state department of information
services data center in Olympia, Washington. The Washington state patrol and
the department of information services shall work cooperatively to ensure the
transition to the department of information services is completed successfully.

(9)
The transportation fund‑-state appropriation is reduced by $2,299,000 to
correct a double appropriation.

Sec.
504. 1998
c 348 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-INFORMATION
SYSTEMS

Highway
Safety Fund‑-Motorcycle Safety Education

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 94,000

General
Fund‑-Wildlife Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 42,000

Highway
Safety Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((10,732,000))

8,218,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((5,610,000))

4,735,000

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 441,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((16,919,000))

13,530,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: (((1)))
$2,498,000 of the highway safety fund‑-state appropriation and $793,000
of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation are provided for the
following activities: (1) Identify business objectives and needs relating to
technology improvements and integration of the drivers' licensing and vehicle
title and registrations systems; (2) converting the drivers' licensing software
applications to achieve Year 2000 compliance; (3) convert the drivers' field
network from a uniscope to a frame-relay network; (4) develop an interface
between the unisys system and the CRASH system; and (5) operate and maintain the
highways-licensing building network and the drivers' field network.

Sec.
505. 1998
c 348 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING‑-VEHICLE SERVICES

General
Fund‑-Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 26,000

General
Fund‑-Wildlife Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 549,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((49,630,000))

49,615,000

Department
of Licensing Services Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 2,944,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((53,149,000))

53,134,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$600,000 of the licensing service account‑-state appropriation is
provided for replacement of printers for county auditors and subagents.

(2)
The department of licensing, in cooperation with the fuel tax advisory
committee, shall prepare and submit a report to the legislative transportation
committee containing recommendations for special fuel and motor vehicle fuel
recordkeeping and reporting requirements, including but not limited to
recommendations regarding the form and manner in which records and tax reports
must be maintained and made available to the department; which persons engaged
in the business of selling, purchasing, distributing, storing, transporting, or
delivering fuel should be required to submit periodic reports regarding the
disposition of such fuel; and the feasibility of implementing an automated fuel
tracking system. The report is due no later than October 31, 1997.

(3)
The department of licensing, in cooperation with representatives of local
governments and the department of revenue shall analyze the collection of the
local option fuel tax under RCW 82.80.010. Based on that analysis the
department of licensing shall offer recommendations regarding the appropriate
government entity to collect the local option fuel tax and the best method to
accomplish that collection. The department of licensing shall report its
findings and recommendations to the legislative transportation committee and
the office of financial management by December 1, 1998.

(4)
The department of licensing, in conjunction with the interagency commission on
outdoor recreation, the department of transportation, and other affected
entities, shall conduct a study and make recommendations regarding:

(a)
Whether the study required by RCW 43.99.030 to determine what portion of the
motor vehicle fuel tax collected is tax on marine fuel is an effective and
efficient mechanism for determining what portion of fuel tax revenues should be
refunded to the marine fuel tax refund account;

(b)
Other possible methodologies for determining the appropriate amount of tax
revenue to refund from the motor vehicle fund to the marine tax refund account;
and

(c)
Whether the tax on fuel used by illegally nonregistered boats should be
refunded to the marine tax refund account.

The
department of licensing shall make a report of its findings and recommendations
to the legislative transportation committee and the office of financial
management by December 1, 1998.

(5)
$382,000 of the motor vehicle fund--state appropriation is provided solely to
implement Substitute House Bill No. 2659. If Substitute House Bill No. 2659 is
not enacted by June 30, 1998, this amount shall lapse.

Sec.
506. 1998
c 348 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING‑-DRIVER SERVICES

Highway
Safety Fund‑-Motorcycle Safety Education

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 1,411,000

Highway
Safety Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((61,087,000))

59,869,000

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... 4,985,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((64,112,000))

66,265,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$225,000 of the highway safety account-‑state appropriation is provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2442 or Senate Bill No. 6190. If
neither bill is enacted by June 30, 1998, this amount shall lapse.

(2)
$480,000 of the highway safety account-‑state appropriation is provided
solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6165. If Senate Bill No. 6165 is not
enacted by June 30, 1998, this amount shall lapse.

(((6)))
(3) $1,000,000 of the highway safety account-‑state appropriation
is provided solely to implement 1998 legislation that changes statutes relating
to driving under the influence. If legislation changing the DUI statutes is
not enacted by June 30, 1998, this amount shall lapse.

Sec.
507. 1997
c 457 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY
MANAGEMENT AND FACILITIES‑-PROGRAM D‑-OPERATING

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((24,703,000))

24,436,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Federal Appropriation...... $ 400,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Transportation Capital

Facilities
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((24,338,000))

24,330,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((49,441,000))

49,166,000

Sec.
508. 1998
c 348 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Economic Development Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 2,434,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((163,275,000))

123,575,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Federal Appropriation...... $ 155,485,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 40,000,000

Special
Category C Account‑-State Appropriation $ ((73,271,000))

65,471,000

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((230,546,000))

225,546,000

Puyallup
Tribal Settlement Account‑-State

Appropriation............................. $ 5,000,000

Puyallup
Tribal Settlement Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation............................. $ 200,000

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,401,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((671,612,000))

619,112,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided for the location, design, right of
way acquisition, or construction of state highway projects designated as
improvements under RCW 47.05.030. The appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are
provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The special category C account‑-state appropriation of (($73,271,000))
$65,471,000 includes $26,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.812 through 47.10.817 ((and includes $12,000,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by House Bill No. 1012)). The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation. ((If House Bill No. 1012 is not enacted by June
30, 1998, $7,800,000 of the special category C account‑-state
appropriation shall lapse.))

(2)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $2,685,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819(1) for match on
federal demonstration projects. The transportation commission may authorize
the use of current revenues available to the department of transportation in
lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(3)
The department shall report annually to the legislative transportation
committee on the status of the projects funded by the special category C
appropriations contained in this section. The report shall be submitted by
January 1 of each year.

(4)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation in this section includes
$600,000 solely for a rest area and information facility in the Nisqually
gateway area to Mt. Rainier, provided that at least forty percent of the total
project costs are provided from federal, local, or private sources. The
contributions from the nonstate sources may be in the form of in-kind
contributions including, but not limited to, donations of property and
services.

(5)
The appropriations in this section contain $118,247,000 reappropriation from
the 1995-97 biennium.

(6)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation in this section includes
$250,000 to establish a wetland mitigation pilot project. This appropriation
may only be expended if the department of transportation establishes a
technical committee to better implement the department's strategic plan. The
technical committee shall include, but is not limited to, cities, counties,
environmental groups, business groups, tribes, the Puget Sound action team, and
the state departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and community, trade, and
economic development, and appropriate federal agencies. The committee shall
assist the department in implementing its wetland strategic plan, including working
to eliminate barriers to improved wetland and watershed management. To this
end, the technical committee shall: (a) Work to facilitate sharing of agency
environmental data, including evaluation of off-site and out-of-kind mitigation
options; (b) develop agreed-upon guidance that will enable the preservation of
wetlands that are under imminent threat from development for use as an
acceptable mitigation option; (c) develop strategies that will facilitate the
implementation of mitigation banking, including developing mechanisms for
valuing and transferring credits; (d) provide input in the development of
wetland functions assessment protocols related to transportation projects; (e)
develop incentives for interagency participation in joint mitigation projects
within watersheds; and (f) explore options for funding environmental mitigation
strategies. The department shall prepare an annual report to the legislative
transportation committee and legislative natural resources committees on
recommendations developed by the technical committee.

(7)
The department shall report January 1st and July 1st of each year, to the
legislative transportation committee and the office of financial management of
the timing and the scope of work being performed for the regional transit
authority. This report shall provide a description of all department
activities related to the regional transit authority including investments in
state‑owned infrastructure.

(8)
The translake study funded in this section shall include recommendations to
address methods for mitigating traffic noise in the study area.

(9)
Funding for the SR 509 project extending south and east from south 188th street
in King county is contingent on the development of a proposal linking the
project to other freight corridors and a funding plan with participation from
partners of the state that are agreed to by the legislative transportation
committee and the governor.

(10)
The motor vehicle account‑-federal appropriation in this section is
transferrable to the transportation account to ensure efficient funds
management and program delivery.

(11)
$2,000,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for transfer to the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account‑-state.

(((14)))
(12) $13,000,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation
and $12,000,000 of the transportation fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for preliminary engineering and purchase of right of way for
highway construction.

(((15)
$35,000,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is conditioned
upon voter approval of a referendum on a state-wide ballot that provides
funding for transportation purposes. If the voters approve such a referendum,
$35,000,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is put in
reserve solely to be used for the purposes of preliminary engineering and
purchase of right of way for highway construction. These moneys may only be
expended upon approval of both the legislative transportation committee and the
office of financial management.))

(13)
The department may advertise and award certain specified projects prior to June
30, 1999. This authority extends to the 10 projects listed in the
transportation executive information system document titled "1999 Supplemental
Budget C
Spring Start Projects (Rev.)" dated March 13, 1999.

Sec.
509. 1998
c 348 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS‑-PROGRAM K

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((1,280,000))

1,255,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 16,235,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION........................ $ ((17,515,000))

17,490,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $16,235,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.834 for all forms of
cash contributions, or the payment of other costs incident to the location,
development, design, right of way, and construction of only the SR 16 corridor improvements
and park and ride projects selected under the public-private transportation
initiative program authorized under chapter 47.46 RCW; and support costs of the
public-private transportation initiatives program.

(2)
The appropriations in this section contain $16,235,000 reappropriated from the
1995-97 biennium.

Sec.
510. 1998
c 348 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE‑-PROGRAM M

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((239,200,000))

237,013,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Federal Appropriation...... $ 465,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation $ 3,335,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((243,000,000))

240,813,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
If portions of the appropriations in this section are required to fund
maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by federal
emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides, supplemental
appropriations will be requested to restore state funding for ongoing
maintenance activities.

(2)
The department shall deliver the highway maintenance program according to the
plans for each major maintenance group to the extent practical. However, snow
and ice expenditures are highly variable depending on actual weather conditions
encountered. If extraordinary winter needs result in increased winter
maintenance expenditures, the department shall, after prior consultation with
the transportation commission, the office of financial management, and the
legislative transportation committee adopt one or both of the following courses
of action: (a) Reduce planned maintenance activities in other groups to offset
the necessary increases for snow and ice control; or (b) continue delivery as
planned within other major maintenance groups and request a supplemental
appropriation in the following legislative session to fund the additional snow
and ice control expenditures.

(3)
The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any federal moneys received
for emergency snow and ice removal and shall place an equal amount of the motor
vehicle fund--state into unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the
amount of funding available for snow and ice removal.

(4)
Funding appropriated for local storm water charges assessed under RCW
90.03.525, which is allocated for, but not paid to, a local storm water utility
because the utility did not meet the conditions provided under RCW 90.03.525,
may be transferred by the department to program Z of the department to be
distributed as grants under the storm water grant program.

Sec.
511. 1998
c 348 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PRESERVATION‑-PROGRAM P

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State............. Appropriation $ ((288,720,000))

285,220,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Federal Appropriation...... $ 274,259,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation $ 2,400,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION.................... ... $ ((568,379,000))

561,879,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $6,800,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for
emergency purposes. However, the transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(2)
The appropriations in this section contain $27,552,000 reappropriated from the
1995-97 biennium.

(3)
If the Oregon state legislature enacts a public/private partnership program and
the Washington state transportation commission, in consultation with the
legislative transportation committee, negotiates and enters into an agreement
between Washington and Oregon to place the Lewis and Clark bridge into Oregon's
public/private partnership program, up to $3,000,000 of the motor vehicle
fund--state appropriation may be used as Washington's contribution toward the
design of the project pursuant to the agreement between Washington and Oregon.
Any additional contributions shall be subject to Washington state legislative appropriations
and approvals. The department shall provide a status report on this project to
the legislative transportation committee by June 30, 1998.

(((6)))
(4) $630,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is
provided for slope stabilization along state route 166 in the Ross Point
vicinity. This amount is intended to fund preliminary engineering, right of
way acquisition, and to begin construction.

Sec.
512. 1998
c 348 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRAFFIC
OPERATIONS‑-PROGRAM Q

State
Patrol Highway Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 153,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((30,412,000))

29,982,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund--Federal Appropriation...... $ 1,000,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund--Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 275,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((31,840,000))

31,410,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amount is provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The department, in cooperation with the Washington state patrol and the tow
truck industry, shall develop and submit to the legislative transportation
committee by October 31, 1997, a recommendation for implementing new tow truck
services during peak hours on the Puget Sound freeway system.

(2)
The department, in cooperation with the Washington state patrol, the department
of licensing, the state of Oregon, and the United States department of
transportation, shall install and operate the commercial vehicle information
systems and network (CVISN) at a selected pilot site. If the state department
of transportation receives additional federal funding for this project that is
eligible to supplant state funding, the appropriation in this section shall be
reduced by the amount of the state funds supplanted.

Sec.
513. 1998
c 348 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT‑-PROGRAM S

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital

Construction
Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 777,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((70,032,000))

69,685,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Ferry Operations

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 1,093,000

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... 1,158,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((73,060,000))

72,713,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)(a)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $14,300,000 provided
solely for programming activities and other efforts needed to bring the
department's information systems, and devices with computers built into them,
into compliance with the year 2000 requirements of the department of
information services. The department is directed to expend the moneys
internally reallocated for this purpose before spending from this
appropriation. The department is directed to provide quarterly reports on this
effort to the legislative transportation committee and the office of financial
management beginning October 1, 1997.

(b)
Up to $2,900,000 of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection may be
expended for testing and required modifications to electronic devices and other
equipment and specialized software that are essential for department operations
to ensure they are year 2000 compliant. Before expending any of this amount
for these purposes, the department shall consult with the legislative
transportation committee and the office of financial management.

(2)
The legislative transportation committee shall review and analyze freight
mobility issues affecting eastern and southeastern Washington as recommended by
the freight mobility advisory committee and report back to the legislature by
November 1, 1997. $500,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state
appropriation is provided for this review and analysis. The funding
conditioned in this subsection shall be from revenues provided for
interjurisdictional studies.

(3)
In order to increase visibility for decision making, the department shall
review its budgeting and accounting methods for management information
systems. The review shall include, but not be limited to, the cost-benefit
analysis of existing processes and evaluation of less complex alternatives such
as direct appropriations. The results of the review shall be reported to the
legislative transportation committee and the office of financial management by
July 1, 1998.

Sec.
514. 1997
c 457 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND
RESEARCH‑-PROGRAM T

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((16,098,000))

15,884,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Federal Appropriation...... $ 10,466,000

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((1,384,000))

1,379,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((27,948,000))

27,729,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: Up to
$2,400,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
regional transportation planning organizations, with allocations for
participating counties maintained at the 1995-1997 biennium levels for those
counties not having metropolitan planning organizations within their
boundaries.

Sec.
515. 1998
c 348 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES‑-PROGRAM U

(1)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL TORT CLAIMS SUPPORT

((Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation...... $ 2,515,000))

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... 3,715,000

(2)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 840,000

(3)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND
SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 3,391,000

(4)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ ((2,240,000))

2,140,000

(5)
FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 12,535,000

(6)
FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Ferry Operations

Account‑-State
Appropriation........ $ 2,928,000

(7)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 536,000

(8)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION STATE PARKING
SERVICES

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 90,000

(9)
FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS
SURCHARGE

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 735,000

(10)
FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 355,000

Sec.
516. 1998
c 348 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM
W

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital

Construction
Account‑-State Appropriation... $ ((209,886,000))

192,886,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital

Construction
Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 30,165,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital

Construction
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 765,000

Transportation
Fund‑-Passenger Ferry Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 640,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION............. $ ((241,456,000))

224,456,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided for improving the Washington state
ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel acquisition, vessel construction,
major and minor vessel improvements, and terminal construction and
improvements. The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that
activity:

(1)
The appropriations in this section are provided to carry out only the projects
(version ((3)) 2) adjusted by the legislature for the 1997-99
budget. The department shall reconcile the 1995-97 capital expenditures within
ninety days of the end of the biennium and submit a final report to the
legislative transportation committee and office of financial management.

(2)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation
includes $100,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.60.800 for vessel and terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements,
and long lead time materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries,
including construction of new jumbo ferry vessels in accordance with the
requirements of RCW 47.60.770 through 47.60.778. However, the department of
transportation may use current revenues available to the Puget Sound capital
construction account in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

(3)
The department of transportation shall provide to the legislative
transportation committee and office of financial management a quarterly
financial report concerning the status of the capital program authorized in
this section.

(4)
Washington state ferries is authorized to reimburse up to $3,000,000 from the
Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation or Puget
Sound capital construction account--federal appropriation to the city of
Bremerton and the port of Bremerton for Washington state ferries' financial
participation in the development of a Bremerton multimodal transportation
terminal, port of Bremerton passenger-only terminal expansion, and ferry
vehicular connections to downtown traffic circulation improvements. The
reimbursement shall specifically support the construction of the following
components: Appropriate passenger-only ferry terminal linkages to accommodate
bow-loading catamaran type vessels and the needed transit connections; and the
Washington state ferries' component of the Bremerton multimodal transportation
terminal as part of the downtown Bremerton redevelopment project, including
appropriate access to the new downtown traffic circulation road network.

(5)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation
includes funding for capital improvements on vessels to meet United States
Coast Guard Subchapter W regulation revisions impacting SOLAS (safety of life
at sea) requirements for ferry operations on the Anacortes to Sidney, B.C.
ferry route.

(6)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation, the
Puget Sound capital construction account--federal appropriation, and the
passenger ferry account‑-state appropriation include funding for the
construction of one new passenger-only vessel and the department's exercise of
the option to build a second passenger-only vessel. In accordance with
chapter 166, Laws of 1998, Washington state ferries shall accelerate activities
to ensure the acquisition of five additional passenger-only vessels and the
construction of related terminal facilities, including maintenance facilities
for the Southworth and Kingston to Seattle passenger-only ferry routes.

(7)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation
includes funding for the exploration and acquisition of a design for constructing
a millennium class ferry vessel.

(8)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation
includes $90,000 for the purchase of defibrillators. At least one
defibrillator shall be placed on each vessel in the ferry fleet.

(9)
The appropriations in this section contain $46,962,000 reappropriated from the
1995-97 biennium.

Sec.
517. 1998
c 348 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-MARINE‑-PROGRAM X

Marine
Operating Fund‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((270,522,000))

270,473,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of (($28,696,000))
$27,076,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 1997-99 biennium. If the
actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted amount, the excess amount may
not be expended. If the actual cost exceeds this amount, the department shall
request a supplemental appropriation.

(2)
The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry employees. The
expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees during the 1997-99
biennium may not exceed (($179,095,000)) $180,715,000 plus a
dollar amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management, that is
equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general government employees in
excess of $313.95 a month annualized per eligible marine employee multiplied by
the number of eligible marine employees for the respective fiscal year, a
dollar amount as prescribed by the office of financial management for costs
associated with pension amortization charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by
the office of financial management for salary increases during the 1997-99
biennium. For the purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation
paid to ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and employee
benefits as defined in the office of financial management's policies,
regulations, and procedures named under objects of expenditure "A"
and "B" (7.2.6.2).

The
prescribed salary and insurance benefit increase or decrease dollar amount that
shall be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used to increase
or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 1997, and thereafter, as
established in the 1997-99 general fund operating budget.

(3)
The department of transportation shall provide to the legislative
transportation committee and office of financial management a quarterly
financial report concerning the status of the operating program authorized in
this section.

(4)
The appropriation in this section includes up to $1,566,000 for additional
operating expenses required to comply with United States Coast Guard Subchapter
W regulation revisions for vessels operating on the Anacortes to Sidney, B.C.
ferry route. The department shall explore methods to minimize the cost of
meeting United States Coast Guard requirements and shall report the results to the
legislative transportation committee and office of financial management by
September 1, 1997.

(5)
The department shall request a reduction of the costs associated with the use
of the terminal leased from the Port of Anacortes and costs associated with use
of the Sidney, British Columbia terminal.

(6)
Agreements between Washington state ferries and concessionaires for automatic
teller machines on ferry terminals or vessels shall provide for and include
banks and credit unions that primarily serve the west side of Puget Sound.

(7)
In the event federal funding is provided for one or more passenger-only ferry
vessels for the purpose of transporting United States naval personnel, the
department of transportation is authorized to acquire and construct such vessels
in accordance with the authority provided in RCW 47.56.030, and the department
shall establish a temporary advisory committee comprised of representatives of
the Washington state ferries, transportation commission, legislative
transportation committee, office of financial management, and the United States
Navy to analyze and make recommendations on, at a minimum, vessel performance
criteria, docking, vessel deployment, and operating issues.

(8)
The appropriation provides funding for House Bill No. 2165 (paying interest on
retroactive raises for ferry workers).

(9)
The commission is authorized to increase Washington state ferry tariffs in
excess of the fiscal growth factor, established under chapter 43.135 RCW, in
fiscal year 1998 and fiscal year 1999.

(10)
Funding for Anacortes to Sidney advertising is contingent upon partners meeting
their commitment. In no event may the state share exceed fifty percent of the
cash contribution toward the project.

(11)
$1,370,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for the Hiyu operation for
Southworth/Vashon 5 days per week for 16 hours per day. Prior to placing the
Hiyu in permanent service on a route between Vashon and Southworth, the
Washington state ferries shall conduct a study of the impact of additional
service on Vashon and Southworth and report back to the legislative
transportation committee by May 15, 1998.

(12)
$446,000 of this appropriation is provided solely to provide an additional crew
member on Jumbo Mark 2 ferries as required by emergency evacuation regulations
adopted by the United States Coast Guard. If the Coast Guard requirement can
be met without the hiring of additional staff, the portion of this
appropriation provided to meet that requirement shall not be expended.

Sec.
518. 1998
c 348 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION AND RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y

Essential
Rail Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 256,000

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((13,225,000))

13,185,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,290,000

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((55,029,000))

46,858,000

Transportation
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation..... $ 3,947,000

Transportation
Fund‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 105,000

Central
Puget Sound Public Transportation

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((4,250,000))

250,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((83,102,000))

70,891,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Up to $46,180,000 of the transportation fund‑-state appropriation is
provided for intercity rail passenger service including up to $8,000,000 for
lease purchase of two advanced technology train sets with total purchase costs
not to exceed $20,000,000; up to $1,000,000 for one spare advanced technology
train power-car and other spare parts, subsidies for operating costs not to
exceed $12,000,000, to maintain service of two state contracted round trips
between Seattle and Portland and one state contracted round trip between
Seattle and Vancouver, British Columbia, and capital projects necessary to
provide Seattle-Vancouver, British Columbia, train operating times of under 4
hours.

(2)
Up to $3,000,000 of the transportation fund‑-state appropriation is provided
for the rural mobility program administered by the department of
transportation. Priority for grants provided from this account shall be given
to projects and programs that can be accomplished in the 1997-99 biennium.

(3)
Up to $600,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state
appropriation is provided for rail freight coordination, technical assistance,
and planning.

(4)
The department shall provide biannual reports to the legislative transportation
committee and office of financial management regarding the department's rail
freight program. The department shall also notify the committee for project
expenditures from all fund sources prior to making those expenditures. The
department shall examine the ownership of grain cars and the potential for
divestiture of those cars and other similar assets and report those findings to
the committee prior to the 1998 legislative session.

(5)
Up to $750,000 of the transportation fund‑-state appropriation and up to
$250,000 of the central Puget Sound public transportation account‑-state
appropriation are provided to fund activities relating to coordinating special
needs transportation among state and local providers. These activities may
include demonstration projects, assessments of resources available versus
needs, and identification of barriers to coordinating special needs
transportation. The department will consult with the superintendent of public
instruction, the secretary of the department of social and health services,
the office of financial management, the fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and senate, special needs consumers, and specialized
transportation providers in meeting the goals of this subsection.

(6)
The appropriations in this section contain $4,599,000 reappropriated from the
1995-97 biennium.

(7)
The high capacity transportation account--state appropriation includes $75,000
for the department to develop a strategy and to identify how the agency would
expend additional moneys to enhance the commute trip reduction program. The
report would include recommendations for grant programs for employers and
jurisdictions to reduce SOV usage and to provide transit incentives to meet
future commute trip reduction requirements. The report is due to the
legislative transportation committee by January 1, 1998.

(8)
In addition to the appropriations contained in this section, the office of
financial management shall release the $2,000,000 transportation fund--state
funds appropriated for the intercity rail passenger program in the 1995-97
biennium but held in reserve pursuant to section 502, chapter 165, Laws of
1996.

(9)
Up to $150,000 of the transportation fund--state appropriation is provided for
the management and control of the transportation corridor known as the Milwaukee
Road corridor owned by the state between Ellensburg and Lind, and to take
actions necessary to allow the department to be in a position, with further
legislative authorization, to begin to negotiate a franchise with a rail
carrier to establish and maintain a rail line over portions of the corridor by
July 1, 1999.

(((11)))
(10) $4,000,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state
appropriation for passenger rail infrastructure improvement is provided solely
for rail improvements to add rail passenger service north of Seattle. These
funds are conditioned on match of at least equal amounts from both Burlington
Northern Sante Fe and Amtrak for rail line improvements and upon Amtrak
purchasing an additional train set for operation in the corridor. These funds
shall not be expended until authorized by the legislative transportation
committee and the office of financial management; and the participation of
international partners in service provided in the corridor shall be considered
in such a decision.

Sec.
519. 1998
c 348 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State............. Appropriation $ ((9,802,000))

9,862,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Federal Appropriation...... $ 33,726,000

High
Capacity Transportation Account--

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((650,000))

450,000

Transportation
Account--State Appropriation.... $ 1,175,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((45,353,000))

45,213,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $1,785,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819(1). The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(2)
As a condition of receiving the full state subsidy in support of the Puget
Island ferry, Wahkiakum county must, by December 31, 1997, increase ferry fares
for passengers and vehicles by at least ten percent. If the fares are not
increased to meet this requirement, the department, in determining the state
subsidy after December 31, 1997, shall reduce the operating deficit by the
amount that would have been generated if the ten percent fare increase had been
implemented.

(3)
The appropriations in this section contain $1,750,000 reappropriated from the
1995-97 biennium.

(4)
Up to $500,000 of the high capacity transportation account--state appropriation
is provided for implementation of the recommendations of the freight mobility
advisory committee, and any legislation enacted resulting from those
recommendations.

(5)
$175,000 of the transportation fund--state appropriation is provided solely to
fund the freight mobility strategic investment board. If Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2180 is not enacted by June 30, 1998, this amount shall lapse.

(6)
The transportation account‑-state appropriation includes $600,000 to
establish alternatives for flood management and flood hazard reduction projects
in the Chehalis Basin. A technical committee comprised of the department of
transportation, department of ecology, the United States army corps of
engineers, federal emergency management administration, United States
geological survey, affected counties and tribes, and other entities with
critical knowledge related to flood hazard reduction projects in the Chehalis
Basin shall be formed. Funds shall be distributed to counties within the
Chehalis Basin by the department of transportation for projects that further
understanding of the causes of flooding and options for flood hazard
reduction. Alternatives shall be consistent with fish and habitat recovery
efforts. Projects funded shall be coordinated with the technical committee.
The department of transportation shall present a report to the legislative
transportation committee and other appropriate legislative committees regarding
findings and/or progress made by funded projects by December 1, 1998.

(((8)))
(7) $750,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for a median barrier upon the Spokane street viaduct. Use of
this funding is contingent upon a commitment of funding from other partners for
the remainder of the project cost.

(((9)))
(8) Up to $150,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state
appropriation is provided for the installation of active railroad crossing
warning devices at the Sunnyside beach park entrance in Steilacoom.

(((10)))
(9) $400,000 of the transportation fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for a study by the legislative transportation committee, in
cooperation with the port of Benton, developing a strategic corridor
feasibility and master site plan for the port of Benton. If the port of Benton
does not provide at least $200,000 to fund the plan development, the
transportation fund‑-state appropriation referenced in this subsection
shall lapse and this subsection shall be null and void.

Transportation
Agencies Capital Facilities

Sec.
520. 1997
c 457 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)‑-CAPITAL

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Transportation Capital

Facilities
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((21,696,000))

21,261,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The department of transportation shall provide to the legislative
transportation committee prior notice and the latest project information at
least two weeks in advance of the bid process for transportation capital
facilities projects going to bid in the 1997-99 biennium.

(2)
Construction of the Mount Rainier storage facility shall not commence until the
department has secured an operational lease that would allow the placement of
the facility on United States forest service lands near the entrance to the
Mather memorial parkway.

(3)
The appropriation in this section contains $7,719,000 reappropriated from the
1995-97 biennium.

Transfers
and Distributions

Sec.
521. 1998
c 348 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital

Construction
Account Appropriation......... $ 500,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund Appropriation............... $ 130,000

Transportation
Improvement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 200,000

Special
Category C Account Appropriation........ $ 190,000

Transportation
Capital Facilities Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,000

Urban
Arterial Account Appropriation........... $ 5,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION............. $ ((1,995,000))

1,026,000

Sec.
522. 1998
c 348 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

(1)
R V Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Motor Vehicle Fund‑-State... $........................................... 1,176,000

(2)
Motor Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Transportation Capital

Facilities
Account‑-State ................. $ 42,569,000

(3)
((Small City Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Transportation Improvement

Account‑-State............................. $ 7,500,000))

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Highway Infrastructure

Account‑-State............................. $ 234,000

Sec.
523. 1997
c 457 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
TREASURER‑-STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

City
Hardship Account Appropriation............. $ 200,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund Appropriation for motor

vehicle
fuel tax and overload penalties

distribution............................... $ 471,937,000

Transportation
Fund Appropriation for motor vehicle

excise
tax distribution.................... $ ((3,744,000))

118,747,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION............. $ ((475,881,000))

590,884,000

Miscellaneous

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 524. A
new section is added to 1997 c 457 (uncodified) to read as follows:

INFORMATION
SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies shall comply with
the following requirements regarding information systems projects when
specifically directed to do so by this act.

(1)
Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology shall be made in
the context of its information technology portfolio. "Information
technology portfolio" means a strategic management approach in which the
relationships between agency missions and information technology investments
can be seen and understood, such that: Technology efforts are linked to agency
objectives and business plans; the impact of new investments on existing
infrastructure and business functions are assessed and understood before
implementation; and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative state-wide infrastructure.

(2)
Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in making decisions
on matters related to the following:

(a)
System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;

(b)
Setting goals and objectives for using information technology in meeting
legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;

(c)
Assessment of overall information processing performance, resources, and
capabilities;

(d)
Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for the operation of
any new systems developed using external resources; and

(e)
Progress toward enabling electronic access to public information.

(3)
The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information technology projects
at the direction of the information services board and in accordance with
published department of information services policies and guidelines. At a
minimum, such studies shall include a statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus
for change; (b) the business value to the agency, including an examination and
evaluation of benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk
assessment based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d) the
impact on agency and state-wide information infrastructure; and (e) the impact
of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information technology capabilities
on meeting service delivery demands.

(4)
The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for each project. The
plan or plans shall address all factors critical to successful completion of
each project. The plan(s) shall include, but is not limited to, the following
elements: A description of the problem or opportunity that the information
technology project is intended to address; a statement of project objectives
and assumptions; a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to
be accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for the
phased approach shall be such that the business case justification for a
project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or adds measurable
value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business functions within each
development cycle.

(5)
The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for information technology
projects. Consistent with the direction of the information services board and
the published policies and guidelines of the department of information
services, the quality assurance plan shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of the project and successful integration with the agency
and state information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality
assurance plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The quality
assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements for each phase of
a project.

(6)
A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan shall be provided to the department of information services, the
office of financial management, and legislative fiscal committees. The plans
and studies shall demonstrate a sound business case that justifies the
investment of taxpayer funds on any new project, an assessment of the impact of
the proposed system on the existing information technology infrastructure, the
disciplined use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging
of private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval of the
relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality assurance plan
by the department of information services and the office of financial
management.

(7)
Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and legislative
fiscal committees at intervals specified in the project's quality assurance
plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 525. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1)
1997 c 457 s 502;

(2)
1997 c 457 s 514; and

(3) 1997 c 457 s 515.

(End of part)

PART
VI

PROVISIONS NECESSARY
TO IMPLEMENT APPROPRIATIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601. As a
management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of resources, while
improving employee productivity and morale, agencies may offer voluntary
separation and/or downshifting incentives and options according to procedures
and guidelines established by the department of personnel and the department of
retirement systems, in consultation with the office of financial management.
The options may include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for:
Voluntary resignation and retirement, voluntary leave-without-pay, voluntary
workweek or work hour reduction, voluntary downward movement, and temporary
separation for development purposes.

Agency
plans and offers shall be reviewed and monitored jointly by the department of
personnel, office of financial management, and the department of retirement
systems. The transportation committees of the legislature shall also review
and monitor the plans of agencies that receive funds appropriated under this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602. It is
the intent of the legislature that agencies may implement a voluntary
retirement incentive program that is cost neutral or results in cost savings
provided that such program is approved by the director of financial
management. Agencies participating in this authorization are required to
submit a report by June 30, 2001, to the legislature and the office of
financial management on the outcome of their approved retirement incentive
program. The report should include information on the details of the program
including resulting service delivery changes, agency efficiencies, the cost of
the retirement incentive per participant, the total cost to the state and the
projected or actual net dollar and staff savings over the 1999-2001 biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 603. PERFORMANCE
BASED BUDGETING. (1) The department of licensing, the
department of transportation, the Washington state patrol, and the Washington
traffic safety commission, in cooperation with the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature will continue
the implementation of performance based budgeting. The performance based
budgeting process will provide a measurable link between agency objectives,
service levels, and budget. The agencies shall:

(a)
Continue to develop, enhance, validate, and test indicators of performance,
stated in achieving the agencies' goals; and

(b)
Refine performance based budgeting and investment levels in the following
programs:

(i)
Department of transportation: Maintenance program M, preservation program P,
traffic operations program Q, and marine program X;

(ii)
Department of licensing: Driver's services and vehicle services;

(iii)
Washington state patrol: Field operations bureau; and

(iv)
Washington traffic safety commission; and

(c)
Submit and implement a plan to provide program managers with the training and
technical assistance necessary to extend the practices of performance
measurement and performance based budgeting throughout agency programs.

(2)
The transportation agencies shall submit a strategic plan and activity summary
with their agency request budgets and tie the plan's strategies together with
the 2001-2003 budget requests. The strategic plan must include a six-year
outlook and define and clarify the agency mission and vision, provide the basis
for budget development, and outline and prioritize the agency's goals and
strategies. The agencies will continue to improve agency infrastructures to
capture and report performance data for use by agency management, the office of
financial management, and the transportation committees of the legislature in
the decision making process.

(3)(a)
The agencies shall input monthly their financial information and quarterly
program performance measurements into the transportation executive information
system and will utilize the transportation executive information system
investment system in the development of their agency policy request budgets.

(b)
The department of licensing and the Washington state patrol shall submit
budgets to the legislature at the subprogram level.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 604. PROGRAM
ACCOUNTABILITY REVIEWS. The transportation
committees of the legislature, the office of financial management, and the
transportation agencies shall establish the means of conducting program
accountability reviews of all transportation programs. The reviews shall
include:

(1)
Review and analysis of existing programs to determine any program changes
required to meet established criteria along with the list of programs to be
reviewed as determined by the program accountability review steering committee
made up of the transportation committees of the legislature, the office of
financial management, and agency personnel. Each review will have a plan with
timelines, deliverables, and milestones to ensure it is completed on time with
anticipated deliverables. Each review will have a review accountability report
presented to the transportation committees of the legislature with
recommendations and implementation schedule agreed to by the reviewers and the
agency program being reviewed.

(2)
A concentration on:

(a)
Appropriateness of service objectives used to determine service levels;

(b)
Effectiveness of current management systems;

(c)
Development or improvement of existing outcome, output, efficiency, and
effectiveness performance measures;

(d)
The effectiveness of communication and decision making within the program;

(e)
Staffing levels and organizational structure, including changes to roles and
responsibilities;

(f)
The existence and effectiveness of oversight and control measures within the
program;

(g)
The process of distributing funds and staff among activities;

(h)
Methods for making trade off decisions within and between programs and
activities;

(i)
Development of tools that assist policymakers and managers in using performance
measures and investment tradeoff methods;

(j)
Development of long-term investment strategies; and

(k)
Other program items that would be beneficial to include in the program
accountability review.

(3)
The recommendations will be considered in future biennium transportation
budgets in determining whether to enhance, streamline, retain, reduce, or
eliminate programs based on value and benefits provided to the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 605. (1)
Forty percent of the funds available for surface transportation flexible funds
available under Sections 105(c)(2) and 133(d)(3)(A)(ii) of Title 23, United
States Code are made available for the Washington state department of
transportation.

Twenty-two
percent of the funds available for surface transportation flexible funds
available under Sections 105(c)(2) and 133(d)(3)(A)(ii) of Title 23, United
States Code are made available for rural economic development projects in rural
counties with population densities of less than one hundred persons per square
mile pro rata based on population and community empowerment zones as defined in
RCW 43.63A.700. These funds shall be used for the transportation component of
identified, emerging, nonspeculative economic development projects that create
new employment or revitalize existing business. As required under federal law,
these funds shall be administered by the Washington state department of
transportation. The community economic revitalization board within the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall work with local
project proponents and the Washington state department of transportation to
identify economic development projects with essential transportation
components. The board shall make recommendations regarding funding for a
project's transportation component to the Washington state transportation
commission. Beginning in the fiscal year 2000, any economic development funds
that are not obligated from the prior federal fiscal year by June first of each
year shall be available for economic development projects state-wide in
accordance with the same administration and selection process established in
this subsection for rural economic development projects.

(2)
Thirty-eight percent of the funds available for surface transportation flexible
funds available under Sections 105(c)(2) and 133(d)(3)(A)(ii) of Title 23,
United States Code are made available for the state-wide competitive program
for regionally significant projects. The transportation improvement board
shall be responsible for selecting projects under this program. For federal
fiscal years 2000 and 2001, to be eligible, projects shall: (a) Meet the
criteria established by the transportation improvement board for selecting
regionally significant projects; (b) be included in a metropolitan planning
organization's transportation improvement plan; (c) meet the goal of targeting
funds for coordinated projects within corridors that are regionally
significant; and (d) support the functioning of corridors for their full length
rather than in individual spot improvements.

Sec.
606. RCW
43.19.1906 and 1995 c 269 s 1404 are each amended to read as follows:

Insofar
as practicable, all purchases and sales shall be based on competitive bids, and
a formal sealed bid procedure shall be used as standard procedure for all
purchases and contracts for purchases and sales executed by the state
purchasing and material control director and under the powers granted by RCW
43.19.190 through 43.19.1939. This requirement also applies to purchases and
contracts for purchases and sales executed by agencies, including educational
institutions, under delegated authority granted in accordance with provisions
of RCW 43.19.190 or under RCW 28B.10.029. However, formal sealed bidding is
not necessary for:

(1)
Emergency purchases made pursuant to RCW 43.19.200 if the sealed bidding
procedure would prevent or hinder the emergency from being met appropriately;

(2)
Purchases not exceeding thirty-five thousand dollars, or subsequent limits as
calculated by the office of financial management: PROVIDED, That the state
director of general administration shall establish procedures to assure that
purchases made by or on behalf of the various state agencies shall not be made
so as to avoid the thirty-five thousand dollar bid limitation, or subsequent
bid limitations as calculated by the office of financial management: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the state purchasing and material control director is authorized
to reduce the formal sealed bid limits of thirty-five thousand dollars, or
subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial management, to a
lower dollar amount for purchases by individual state agencies if considered
necessary to maintain full disclosure of competitive procurement or otherwise
to achieve overall state efficiency and economy in purchasing and material
control. Quotations from four hundred dollars to thirty-five thousand dollars,
or subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial management, shall
be secured from at least three vendors to assure establishment of a competitive
price and may be obtained by telephone or written quotations, or both. The
agency shall invite at least one quotation each from a certified minority and a
certified women-owned vendor who shall otherwise qualify to perform such work.
Immediately after the award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be
recorded and open to public inspection and shall be available by telephone
inquiry. A record of competition for all such purchases from four hundred
dollars to thirty-five thousand dollars, or subsequent limits as calculated by
the office of financial management, shall be documented for audit purposes.
Purchases up to four hundred dollars may be made without competitive bids based
on buyer experience and knowledge of the market in achieving maximum quality at
minimum cost: PROVIDED, That this four hundred dollar direct buy limit without
competitive bids may be increased incrementally as required to a maximum of
eight hundred dollars, if warranted by increases in purchasing costs due to
inflationary trends;

(3)
Purchases which are clearly and legitimately limited to a single source of
supply and purchases involving special facilities, services, or market
conditions, in which instances the purchase price may be best established by
direct negotiation;

(4)
Purchases of insurance and bonds by the risk management office under RCW
43.19.1935;

(5)
Purchases and contracts for vocational rehabilitation clients of the department
of social and health services: PROVIDED, That this exemption is effective only
when the state purchasing and material control director, after consultation
with the director of the division of vocational rehabilitation and appropriate
department of social and health services procurement personnel, declares that
such purchases may be best executed through direct negotiation with one or more
suppliers in order to expeditiously meet the special needs of the state's
vocational rehabilitation clients;

(6)
Purchases by universities for hospital operation or biomedical teaching or
research purposes and by the state purchasing and material control director, as
the agent for state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010, and for health care
programs provided in state correctional institutions as defined in RCW
72.65.010(3) and veterans' institutions as defined in RCW 72.36.010 and
72.36.070, made by participating in contracts for materials, supplies, and
equipment entered into by nonprofit cooperative hospital group purchasing
organizations;

(7)
Purchases by institutions of higher education not exceeding thirty-five
thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That for purchases between two thousand five
hundred dollars and thirty-five thousand dollars quotations shall be secured
from at least three vendors to assure establishment of a competitive price and
may be obtained by telephone or written quotations, or both. For purchases
between two thousand five hundred dollars and thirty-five thousand dollars,
each institution of higher education shall invite at least one quotation each
from a certified minority and a certified women-owned vendor who shall
otherwise qualify to perform such work. A record of competition for all such
purchases made from two thousand five hundred to thirty-five thousand dollars
shall be documented for audit purposes; and

(8)
Negotiation of a contract by the department of transportation, valid until
June 30, 2001, with registered tow truck operators to provide roving service
patrols in one or more Washington state patrol tow zones whereby those
registered tow truck operators wishing to participate would cooperatively, with
the department of transportation, develop a demonstration project upon terms
and conditions negotiated by the parties.

Beginning on July 1, 1995, and on July 1 of each succeeding
odd-numbered year, the dollar limits specified in this section shall be
adjusted as follows: The office of financial management shall calculate such
limits by adjusting the previous biennium's limits by the appropriate federal
inflationary index reflecting the rate of inflation for the previous biennium.
Such amounts shall be rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars.

Sec.
607. RCW
88.16.090 and 1995 c 175 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person may pilot any vessel subject to the provisions of this chapter on
waters covered by this chapter only if appointed and licensed to pilot such
vessels on said waters under and pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(2)
A person is eligible to be appointed a pilot if the person is a citizen of the
United States, over the age of twenty-five years and under the age of seventy
years, a resident of the state of Washington at the time of appointment and
only if the pilot applicant holds as a minimum, a United States government
license as a master of ocean or near coastal steam or motor vessels of not more
than one thousand six hundred gross tons or as a master of inland steam or
motor vessels of not more than one thousand six hundred gross tons, such
license to have been held by the applicant for a period of at least two years
prior to taking the Washington state pilotage examination and a first class
United States endorsement without restrictions on that license to pilot in the
pilotage districts for which the pilot applicant desires to be licensed, and if
the pilot applicant meets such other qualifications as may be required by the
board. A person applying for a license under this section shall not have been
convicted of an offense involving drugs or the personal consumption of alcohol
in the twelve months prior to the date of application. This restriction does
not apply to license renewals under this section.

(3)
Pilots shall be licensed hereunder for a term of five years from and after the
date of the issuance of their respective state licenses. Such licenses shall
thereafter be renewed as of course, unless the board shall withhold same for
good cause. Each pilot shall pay to the state treasurer an annual license fee
as follows: For the period beginning July 1, 1995, through June 30, ((1999))
2001, the fee shall be two thousand five hundred dollars; and for the
period beginning July 1, ((1999)) 2001, the fee shall be three
thousand dollars. The fees shall be deposited in the state treasury to the
credit of the pilotage account. The board may assess partially active or
inactive pilots a reduced fee.

(4)
Pilot applicants shall be required to pass a written and oral examination
administered and graded by the board which shall test such applicants on this
chapter, the rules of the board, local harbor ordinances, and such other
matters as may be required to compliment the United States examinations and qualifications.
The board shall hold examinations at such times as will, in the judgment of the
board, ensure the maintenance of an efficient and competent pilotage service.
An examination shall be scheduled for the Puget Sound pilotage district if there
are three or fewer successful candidates from the previous examination who are
waiting to become pilots in that district.

(5)
The board shall develop an examination and grading sheet for each pilotage
district, for the testing and grading of pilot applicants. The examinations
shall be administered to pilot applicants and shall be updated as required to
reflect changes in law, rules, policies, or procedures. The board may appoint
a special independent examination committee or may contract with a firm knowledgeable
and experienced in the development of professional tests for development of
said examinations. Active licensed state pilots may be consulted for the
general development of examinations but shall have no knowledge of the specific
questions. The pilot members of the board may participate in the grading of
examinations. If the board does appoint a special examination development
committee it is authorized to pay the members of said committee the same
compensation and travel expenses as received by members of the board. When
grading examinations the board shall carefully follow the grading sheet
prepared for that examination. The board shall develop a "sample
examination" which would tend to indicate to an applicant the general
types of questions on pilot examinations, but such sample questions shall not
appear on any actual examinations. Any person who willfully gives advance
knowledge of information contained on a pilot examination is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

(6)
All pilots and applicants are subject to an annual physical examination by a
physician chosen by the board. The physician shall examine the applicant's
heart, blood pressure, circulatory system, lungs and respiratory system,
eyesight, hearing, and such other items as may be prescribed by the board.
After consultation with a physician and the United States coast guard, the
board shall establish minimum health standards to ensure that pilots licensed
by the state are able to perform their duties. Within ninety days of the date of
each annual physical examination, and after review of the physician's report,
the board shall make a determination of whether the pilot or candidate is fully
able to carry out the duties of a pilot under this chapter. The board may in
its discretion check with the appropriate authority for any convictions of
offenses involving drugs or the personal consumption of alcohol in the prior
twelve months.

(7)
The board shall prescribe, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, a number of
familiarization trips, between a minimum number of twenty-five and a maximum of
one hundred, which pilot applicants must make in the pilotage district for
which they desire to be licensed. Familiarization trips any particular
applicant must make are to be based upon the applicant's vessel handling
experience.

(8)
The board may require vessel simulator training for a pilot applicant and shall
require vessel simulator training for a pilot subject to RCW 88.16.105. The
board shall also require vessel simulator training in the first year of active
duty for a new pilot and at least once every five years for all active pilots.

(9)
The board shall prescribe, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, such reporting
requirements and review procedures as may be necessary to assure the accuracy
and validity of license and service claims, and records of familiarization
trips of pilot candidates. Willful misrepresentation of such required
information by a pilot candidate shall result in disqualification of the
candidate.

(10)
The board shall adopt rules to establish time periods and procedures for
additional training trips and retesting as necessary for pilots who at the time
of their licensing are unable to become active pilots.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 608. The
following bills, as enacted in the form passed by the legislature, are
necessary to implement portions of this act: House Bill Nos. 1053, 1147, 1304,
1466, 1588, 2201, 2245, and 2259 and Senate Bill Nos. 5060, 5283, 5360, 5605,
5615, 5955, 6030, and 6068.

Sec.
609. RCW
47.26.425 and 1999 c 94 s 21 and 1999 c . . . (SHB 1053) s 6 are each
reenacted to read as follows:

Any
funds required to repay the first authorization of two hundred million dollars
of bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.420, as amended by section 18, chapter 317,
Laws of 1977 ex. sess. or the interest thereon when due, shall be taken from
that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from the imposition of
excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is distributed to the
urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund pursuant to RCW
46.68.090(1)(g), and shall never constitute a charge against any allocations of
any other such funds in the motor vehicle fund to the state, counties, cities,
and towns unless and until the amount of the motor vehicle fund arising from
the excise tax on motor vehicle and special fuels and distributed to the urban
arterial trust account proves insufficient to meet the requirements for bond
retirement or interest on any such bonds.

Sec.
610. RCW
47.26.4252 and 1999 c 94 s 22 and 1999 c . . . (SHB 1053) s 7 are
each reenacted to read as follows:

Any
funds required to repay the authorization of series II bonds authorized by RCW
47.26.420, as reenacted by section 3, chapter 5, Laws of 1979, or the interest
thereon when due, shall first be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle
fund which results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and
special fuels imposed by chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW and which is distributed
to the urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund pursuant to RCW
46.68.090(1)(g), subject, however, to the prior lien of the first authorization
of bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.420, as reenacted by section 3, chapter 5,
Laws of 1979. If the moneys distributed to the urban arterial trust account
shall ever be insufficient to repay the first authorization bonds together with
interest thereon, and the series II bonds or the interest thereon when due, the
amount required to make such payments on such bonds or interest thereon shall
next be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from
the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is
distributed to the state, counties, cities, and towns pursuant to RCW
46.68.090. Any payments on such bonds or interest thereon taken from motor
vehicle or special fuel tax revenues which are distributable to the state,
counties, cities, and towns, shall be repaid from the first moneys distributed
to the urban arterial trust account not required for redemption of the first
authorization bonds or series II and series III bonds or interest on those bond
issues.

Sec.
611. RCW
47.26.4254 and 1999 c 94 s 23 and 1999 c . . . (SHB 1053) s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any funds required to repay series III bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.420, or
the interest thereon, when due shall first be taken from that portion of the
motor vehicle fund that results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels imposed by chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW and that is
distributed to the urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund
pursuant to RCW 46.68.090(1)(((j))) (g), subject, however, to the
prior lien of the first authorization of bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.420. If
the moneys so distributed to the urban arterial trust account, after first
being applied to administrative expenses of the transportation improvement
board and to the requirements of bond retirement and payment of interest on
first authorization bonds and series II bonds as provided in RCW 47.26.425 and
47.26.4252, are insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or
interest on any series III bonds, the amount required to make such payments on
series III bonds or interest thereon shall next be taken from that portion of
the motor vehicle fund that results from the imposition of excise taxes on
motor vehicle and special fuels and that is distributed to the state, counties,
cities, and towns pursuant to RCW 46.68.090, subject, however, to subsection
(2) of this section.

(2)
To the extent that moneys so distributed to the urban arterial trust account
are insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest on
any series III bonds, sixty percent of the amount required to make such
payments when due shall first be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle
fund that results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and
special fuels and that is distributed to the state. The remaining forty
percent shall first be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund that
results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
and that is distributed to the cities and towns pursuant to RCW 46.68.090(1)(i)
and to the counties pursuant to RCW 46.68.090(1)(j). Of the counties',
cities', and towns' share of any additional amounts required in each fiscal
year, the percentage thereof to be taken from the counties' distributive share
and from the cities' and towns' distributive share shall correspond to the
percentage of funds authorized for specific county projects and for specific
city and town projects, respectively, from the proceeds of series III bonds,
for the period through the first eleven months of the prior fiscal year as
determined by the chairman of the transportation improvement board and reported
to the state finance committee and the state treasurer not later than the first
working day of June.

(3)
Any payments on such bonds or interest thereon taken from motor vehicle or
special fuel tax revenues that are distributable to the state, counties,
cities, and towns shall be repaid from the first moneys distributed to the
urban arterial trust account not required for redemption of the first
authorization bonds, series II bonds, or series III bonds or interest on these
bonds.

Sec.
612. RCW
47.26.505 and 1999 c 94 s 24 and 1999 c . . . (SHB 1053) s 9 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Any
funds required to repay such bonds, or the interest thereon when due, shall be
taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from the
imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is
distributed to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund
under RCW 46.68.090(1)(h), and shall never constitute a charge against
any allocations of any other such funds in the motor vehicle fund to the state,
counties, cities, and towns unless and until the amount of the motor vehicle
fund arising from the excise tax on motor vehicle and special fuels and
distributed to the transportation improvement account proves insufficient to
meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.

Sec.
613. RCW
43.43.300 and 1965 c 8 s 43.43.300 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning
on July 1, 1963, every Washington state patrol employee who is a member of the
retirement fund shall contribute seven percent of his or her monthly
salary((, which)). For the biennium beginning July 1, 1999, and
ending June 30, 2001, the employee contribution rate for every member of a
retirement system created under this chapter and: (1) Covering employees whose
activities constitute a highway purpose under the eighteenth amendment (Article
II, section 40) of the state Constitution; where (2) the majority of both the
employer and employee contributions are funded from moneys appropriated from
the state patrol highway account of the motor vehicle fund; shall be set so
that the contribution rates required to fund the costs of the retirement system
shall be equal for members and employers; except that in no event shall the
member contribution rate exceed seven percent. If the pension funding council
determines that contribution rates must exceed seven percent in order to fund
the costs of the retirement system, any cost over seven percent shall be borne
by the employer. The member contribution rate determined under this section
shall be deducted from the compensation of each member on each and every
payroll.

In the
event a member severs his or her connection with the Washington state
patrol or is dismissed, the amount paid by the state of Washington shall remain
in the retirement fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 614. The
joint committee on pension policy shall study the method for setting employer
and employee contribution rates for the Washington state patrol retirement
system. The study shall include options for implementing a method or methods
that allow both the employer and members to share the benefits form investment
gains that exceed the long-term investment return assumptions adopted by the
pension funding council.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 615. The
legislature finds and declares that it is essential for the economic, social,
and environmental well-being of the state and the maintenance of a high quality
of life that the people of the state have an efficient and effective
transportation system. The legislature, public officials, and citizens need to
know the extent to which state agencies, programs, and activities that impact
the state's transportation system are achieving the purposes for which they
were created.

The
legislature recognizes that if it is to adequately fulfill its responsibility
to provide for a balanced, efficient state-wide transportation system, it is
essential to establish a joint legislative transportation committee that will
provide an opportunity for members of the house of representatives and the
senate to examine, develop, and oversee critical transportation policy and
fiscal issues and make recommendations on such issues to the house of
representatives and senate standing committees on transportation.

In
order to accomplish the mission and goals of the joint legislative
transportation committee and to effectively serve the house of representatives
and senate standing committees on transportation, the legislature acknowledges
the need to provide for a level of staffing that will adequately address the
exclusive needs of the house of representatives and senate standing committees
and the administration and staffing of the joint legislative transportation
committee.

Sec.
616. RCW
44.40.010 and 1980 c 87 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

The
joint fact-finding committee on highways, streets, and bridges originally
created by chapter 111, Laws of 1947, recreated and renamed the joint committee
on highways by chapter 3, Laws of 1963 extraordinary session, is hereby
recreated and renamed the legislative transportation committee. The renaming
of said committee shall not affect any powers invested in it or its duties
imposed upon it by any other statute. All appropriations made to the committee
under its former name shall continue to be available to said committee as
renamed, the legislative transportation committee. The committee shall consist
of ((eleven)) twelve senators to be appointed by the president of
the senate and twelve members of the house of representatives to be appointed
by the speaker thereof. Not more than six members from each house may be
from the same political party. A list of appointees shall be submitted
before the close of each regular legislative session during an odd-numbered
year or any successive special session convened by the governor or the
legislature prior to the close of such regular session or successive special
session(s) for confirmation of senate members, by the senate, and house
members, by the house. Vacancies occurring shall be filled by the appointing
authority. All vacancies must be filled from the same political party and
from the same house as the member whose seat was vacated.

The
chair shall be elected biennially by the membership of the committee. The
vice-chair must be from the opposite house.

On
the effective date of this act, the president of the senate shall appoint an
additional senate member as provided by the 1999 amendment of this section.
With the appointment of the additional member, the terms of officers elected
before the effective date of this act are terminated, and the committee shall
hold an election of officers.

The
committee shall adopt rules and procedures for its orderly operation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 617. A
new section is added to chapter 44.40 RCW to read as follows:

The
members of the legislative transportation committee shall form an executive
committee consisting of two members from each of the four major political
caucuses, which will include the chair and vice-chair of the legislative
transportation committee. There will be four alternates to the executive
committee, one from each of the four major political caucuses. Each alternate
may represent a member from the same political caucus from which they were
chosen when that member is absent, and have voting privileges during that
absence.

The
executive committee is responsible for performing all general administrative
and personnel duties assigned to it in the rules and procedures adopted by the
committee, as well as other duties delegated to it by the committee. Except
when those responsibilities are assumed by the legislative transportation
committee, the executive committee is responsible for adopting interim work
plans and meeting schedules, approving all contracts signed on behalf of the
committee, approving policies for travel of members and staff, and setting
policies for staff utilization.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 618. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
46.68.095 (Distribution of additional state-wide taxes) and 1999
c 94 s 7, 1994 c 179 s 4, & 1990 c 42 s 103; and

(2) RCW
46.68.100 (Allocation of net tax amount in motor vehicle fund)
and 1999 c 94 s 8, 1994 c 179 s 5, 1991 c 310 s 2, 1986 c 66 s 1, 1984 c 7 s
73, 1977 ex.s. c 317 s 9, 1977 c 51 s 1, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 57 s 1, 1973 1st
ex.s. c 124 s 1, 1972 ex.s. c 24 s 2, 1970 ex.s. c 85 s 4, 1967 ex.s. c 145 s
79, 1967 ex.s. c 83 s 8, 1961 ex.s. c 7 s 6, & 1961 c 12 s 46.68.100.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 619. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 620. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

BLUE
RIBBON COMMISSION ON TRANSPORTATION........................ 8

BOARD OF PILOTAGE
COMMISSIONERS................................. 6

COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION
BOARD................................ 6

DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE....................................... 3

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

DRIVER SERVICES............................................ 12,
45

INFORMATION SYSTEMS........................................ 11,
43

MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT
SERVICES................................ 11

VEHICLE SERVICES........................................... 12,
44

DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS

TRANSFERS...................................................... 33

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

AVIATION--PROGRAM F............................................ 14

CHARGES FROM OTHER
AGENCIES--PROGRAM U..................... 20, 55

HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM
M............................. 18, 50

HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND
FACILITIES--PROGRAM D--OPERATING.... 14, 46

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I.................................... 14,
46

LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z.................................. 27,
63

MARINE--PROGRAM X.......................................... 24,
58

PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P.................................... 18,
51

PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)..... 31, 65

PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION AND
RAIL--PROGRAM Y...................... 60

PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM
V............................... 21

RAIL--PROGRAM Y................................................ 25

TRAFFIC OPERATIONS--PROGRAM Q.............................. 19,
52

TRANSFERS...................................................... 36

TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC
PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K............ 17, 50

TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT--PROGRAM S........... 20, 53

TRANSPORTATION PLANNING,
DATA, AND RESEARCH--PROGRAM T..... 20, 54

WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W........... 22, 56

FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT BOARD..................... 9

INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS................................... 66

LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM............... 3

MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION..................................... 8

PERFORMANCE BASED BUDGETING.................................... 70

PROGRAM AUTHORIZATION REVIEWS.................................. 71

STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION........................... 5

STATE TREASURER

BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST............................... 33,
65

STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION......................... 33‑35, 66

TRANSFERS.................................................. 34,
66

STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS....................................... 34

TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION....................................... 9

TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT
BOARD............................ 6, 38

TRANSFERS...................................................... 37

UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION......................... 4

WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION

CAPITAL PROJECTS................................................ 5

WASHINGTON STATE PATROL........................................ 31

FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU..................................... 9,
38

SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU.................................... 10,
41

WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION............................ 6

--- END ---