BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout sections 1 through 11 of this act.

(1)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(2)
"Disclosable information" means public information that (a) is not
exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW; (b) does not pertain to an
ongoing investigation; and (c) has not previously been disclosed in a public
record.

(3)
"Fraud or abuse" means acts and practices of fraud or abuse in
programs administered by the department of social and health services,
including criminal or administrative misconduct by staff, clients, or vendors.
This does not include provider fraud as it relates to the department's administration
of funds under Title XIX of the social security act, medicaid.

(4)
"Inspector general" means the inspector general within the auditor's
office.

(5)
"Office" means the office of inspector general.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
There is established in the state auditor's office an office of inspector
general in order to create an independent unit to:

(a)
Conduct and supervise investigations relating to allegations of fraud or abuse;

(b)
Provide leadership and coordination in recommending policies and procedures
designed to detect and prevent fraud and abuse; and

(c)
Provide a method of informing the auditor and the legislature about
vulnerabilities and deficiencies relating to the detection and prevention of
fraud or abuse as may be discovered as a result of completed investigations
conducted or coordinated by the office.

(2)
The office of inspector general is designated a criminal justice agency as
defined in RCW 10.97.030 and 43.43.705.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
inspector general is the head of the office and is appointed by the auditor
solely on the basis of integrity and demonstrated ability in law enforcement
management, public administration, and investigations. The inspector general
reports to and is under the general supervision of the auditor in all matters
related to fraud and program integrity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If the
inspector general discovers that improper governmental action, as defined in
RCW 42.40.020, has occurred during an investigation with respect to an
employee, such as an abuse of authority so as to impede or interfere with an
investigation, then the inspector general may report the improper governmental
action to the auditor under chapter 42.40 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
It is the duty and responsibility of the inspector general to:

(a)
Conduct, supervise, and coordinate fraud and abuse investigations and provide
policy direction as it relates to program integrity and fraud and abuse;

(b)
Review proposed legislation and rules relating to the detection and prevention
of fraud and abuse in programs administered by the department, and make
recommendations for improvement;

(c)
Recommend policies for and coordinate activities carried out or financed by the
department for the purpose of preventing and detecting fraud or abuse;

(d)
Recommend policies for, and conduct, supervise, and coordinate, relationships
between the department and federal, state, and local governmental agencies, and
nongovernmental entities, with respect to: (i) Matters relating to the
prevention and detection of fraud or abuse in programs and operations
administered by the department; or (ii) the identification and prosecution of
participants in the fraud or abuse; and

(e)
Keep the auditor and the legislature informed by means of reports concerning
the detection and prevention of fraud or abuse, and to make recommendations for
improvement of the activities.

(2)
In carrying out the duties and responsibilities established in sections 1
through 11 of this act, the inspector general must refer all investigations in
which the inspector general has found substantial evidence supporting a finding
of a violation of federal or state criminal law to the appropriate prosecuting
authority for possible criminal prosecution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. In
addition to its other powers and duties, the office of inspector general has
the power to enforce the penal provisions of sections 1 through 11 of this act,
and as it may be amended, the penal laws of the state relating to programs
administered by the department. The office of inspector general has the
authority to apply for and execute all warrants and serve process of law issued
by the courts in enforcing the provisions of sections 1 through 11 of this
act. The office of inspector general has the power to issue and serve
subpoenas under RCW 43.20A.110 and 43.20A.605.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
The inspector general must submit a report summarizing the activities of the
office to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives
by November 30, 1999, and by November 30, 2000, and biennially thereafter. The
report shall contain only disclosable information, including:

(a)
A description of significant fraud or abuse, and of vulnerabilities or
deficiencies relating to the prevention and detection of fraud or abuse,
discovered as a result of investigations completed during the reporting period;

(b)
A description of corrective action taken by the department regarding fraud and
abuse discovered as a result of investigations conducted by the office of
inspector general;

(c)
Recommendations for improving the activities of the office with respect to the
vulnerabilities or deficiencies identified under (a) of this subsection;

(d)
An identification of each significant recommendation described in the previous
reports on which corrective action has or has not been completed;

(e)
A summary of matters referred to prosecution authorities during the reporting
period and the charges filed and convictions entered during the reporting
period that have resulted from referrals by the office; and

(f)
Any comments the auditor determines to be appropriate.

(2)
The inspector general must forward a draft of the report to the secretary of
the department of social and health services not less than twenty days prior to
the date that the report is to be issued.

(3)
Within sixty days after the transmission of the report of the inspector general
to the legislature, the auditor must make copies of the report available to the
public upon request and at a reasonable cost.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
In carrying out the provisions of sections 1 through 11 of this act, the
inspector general is authorized to:

(a)
Request information or assistance as is necessary for carrying out the duties
and responsibilities provided by sections 1 through 11 of this act from a
federal, state, or local governmental agency or unit of a governmental agency;

(b)
Issue subpoenas for witnesses, documents, information, and other data necessary
in the furtherance of an investigation conducted by the office. The subpoenas
are enforceable under RCW 34.05.588. Prior to issuing subpoenas to a state
agency, the inspector general must make a reasonable request to the agency for
documents and information in possession of the agency;

(c)
Administer oaths and take testimony, when appropriate in the performance of the
duties and responsibilities provided in sections 1 through 11 of this act,
unless otherwise prohibited by law;

(d)
Appoint not more than two deputies;

(e)
To the extent and in the amount as may be provided by appropriation, select,
appoint, and employ personnel as may be necessary to carry out the provisions
of sections 1 through 11 of this act;

(f)
To the extent and in the amount as may be provided by appropriation, enter into
contracts and other arrangements for audits, studies, analyses, and other
services with public agencies and with private persons, and make the payments
necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 1 through 11 of this act,
subject to compliance with civil service laws, collective bargaining agreements,
and other applicable law; and

(g)
To the extent and in the amount as may be provided by appropriation, purchase
or lease facilities, equipment, and supplies necessary to carry out the
provisions of sections 1 through 11 of this act.

(2)
Whenever information or assistance requested under subsection (1)(a) of this
section is, in the judgment of the inspector general, unreasonably refused or
not provided, the inspector general must report the circumstances to the
auditor without delay.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
In carrying out the provisions of sections 1 through 11 of this act, the
inspector general is authorized to:

(a)
Have reasonable access to the auditor or his or her designee when necessary in
the performance of the duties and responsibilities provided by sections 1
through 11 of this act;

(b)
Have prompt access to all individuals, records, electronic data, reports,
audits, reviews, documents, and other materials available to the department
that relate to operations of the office that is not otherwise prohibited from
disclosure to the inspector general.

(2)
Whenever information or assistance requested under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of
this section is, in the judgment of the inspector general, unreasonably refused
or not provided, the inspector general must report the circumstances to the
auditor without delay.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
The inspector general may receive and investigate complaints or information
from an employee of the department or a citizen concerning the possible
existence of an activity constituting a violation of law or rules, or
mismanagement, gross waste of funds, abuse of authority, or a substantial and
specific danger to the public health and safety.

(2)
The inspector general must not, after receipt of a complaint or information
from a complainant, disclose the identity of the complainant without the
consent of the complainant, unless the inspector general determines that the
disclosure is unavoidable during the course of investigation, except as
otherwise provided by state law.

(3)
An employee who has authority to take, direct others to take, recommend, or
approve a personnel action, must not, with respect to the authority, take or
threaten to take an action against an employee as a reprisal for making a
complaint or disclosing information to the inspector general, unless the
complaint was made with willful disregard for its truth or falsity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. (1)
The inspector general may be contracted by other state agencies to conduct
investigations into allegations of fraud and abuse in those agencies. The
requesting agency must reimburse the office of inspector general for the cost
of the investigation.

(2)
The inspector general must provide the requesting agency a report of findings
and may also file the findings with the appropriate prosecuting attorney.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. (1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the department of social and health
services division of fraud investigations pertaining to the investigation of
fraud and abuse and other duties set out under sections 1 through 11 of this
act are transferred to the office of inspector general of the state auditor's
office.

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the department of social and health services
division of fraud investigations pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the office of inspector
general of the state auditor's office.

(b)
Any appropriations made to the department of social and health services
division of fraud investigations for carrying out the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred
and credited to the office of inspector general of the state auditor's office.

(c)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies concerned.

(3)
All rules and all pending business before the department of social and health
services division of fraud investigations pertaining to the powers, functions,
and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the office of
inspector general of the state auditor's office. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the office of
inspector general of the state auditor's office.

(4)
The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the department of social
and health services division of fraud investigations shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before the effective date of this section.

(5)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify
the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with
the certification.

(6)
Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing
collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective
bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining
unit has been modified by action of the personnel board as provided by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
Sections 1 through 11 of this act are each added to chapter 43.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---