BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
64.12.030 and Code 1881 s 602 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever any person shall cut down, girdle, or otherwise
injure, or carry off any tree, timber, or shrub on the land of another
person, or on the street or highway in front of any person's house, village,
town, or city lot, or cultivated grounds, or on the commons or public
grounds of any village, town, or city, or on the street or highway in
front thereof, without lawful authority, in an action by such person, village,
town, or city against the person committing such trespasses or any of
them, if judgment be given for the plaintiff, it shall be given for treble the
amount of damages claimed or assessed therefor, as the case may be. If
judgment is given for the plaintiff, the defendant is liable for all costs
authorized by law, including expenses listed in RCW 4.84.010 and reasonable
attorneys' fees.

Sec.
2. RCW
64.12.040 and Code 1881 s 603 are each amended to read as follows:

If
upon trial of such action it shall appear that the trespass was casual or
involuntary, or that the defendant had probable cause to believe that the land
on which such trespass was committed was his or her own, or that of the
person in whose service or by whose direction the act was done, or that such
tree or timber was taken from uninclosed woodlands, for the purpose of
repairing any public highway or bridge upon the land or adjoining it, judgment
shall only be given for single damages. If judgment is given for the plaintiff,
the defendant is liable for all costs authorized by law, including expenses
listed in RCW 4.84.010 and reasonable attorneys' fees.

Sec.
3. RCW
79.40.070 and 1988 c 128 s 66 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be unlawful for any person to enter upon any of the state
lands, including all land under the jurisdiction of the department of natural
resources, or upon any private land without the permission of the owner thereof
and to cut, break, or remove therefrom for commercial purposes any
evergreen trees, commonly known as Christmas trees, including fir, hemlock,
spruce, and pine trees. Any person cutting, breaking, or removing or
causing to be cut, broken, or removed, or who cuts down, cuts off,
breaks, tops, or destroys any of such Christmas trees shall be liable to the
state, or to the private owner thereof, for payment for such trees at a price
of one dollar each if payment is made immediately upon demand. Should it be
necessary to institute civil action to recover the value of such trees, the
state in the case of state lands, or the owner in case of private lands, may
exact treble damages on the basis of three dollars per tree for each tree so
cut or removed. If judgment is given for the plaintiff, the defendant is
liable for all costs authorized by law, including expenses listed in RCW
4.84.010 and reasonable attorneys' fees.

---
END ---