BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
During the twelve-month period beginning on December 1st of the year before a
general election for a state official's election to office and continuing
through November 30th immediately after the general election, the state
official may not mail, either by regular mail or electronic mail, to a
constituent at public expense a letter, newsletter, brochure, or other piece of
literature, and may not make public service broadcasts at public expense,
except as follows:

(a)
The state official may mail two mailings of newsletters to constituents. All
newsletters within each mailing of newsletters must be identical as to their
content but not as to the constituent name or address. One such mailing may be
mailed no later than March 30th and the other mailing may be mailed no later
than June 30th;

(b)
The state official may mail as an individual letter to (i) an individual
constituent who has contacted the state official regarding the subject matter
of the letter during the official's current term of office; (ii) an individual
constituent who holds a governmental office with jurisdiction over the subject
matter of the letter; or (iii) an individual constituent who has received an
award or honor of extraordinary distinction of a type that is sufficiently
infrequent to be noteworthy to a reasonable person, including, but not limited
to: (A) An international or national award such as the Nobel prize or the
Pulitzer prize; (B) a state award such as Washington scholar; (C) an Eagle
Scout award; and (D) a Medal of Honor.

(2)
The restriction on mailings in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to
(a) brochures or other pieces of literature mailed as part of the regular
duties of the state office that only refer to the office and do not include the
name of the state official; or (b) correspondence on state office letterhead
mailed by employees of the state office that are part of the regular duties of
the state office.

(3)
The restriction on public service broadcasts under subsection (1) of this
section does not apply to public service broadcasts that are part of the
regular duties of the state office that only mention or visually display the
state office and do not mention or visually display the name of the state
official in the broadcast.

(4)
For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, "state official"
means a state official who is a "candidate," as defined by RCW
42.17.020, for any public office.

(5)
This section does not apply to legislators, who are subject to the
restrictions under RCW 42.52.185.

(6) A violation of this section constitutes use of the facilities
of a public office for the purpose of assisting a campaign under RCW 42.52.180.

---
END ---