BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28B.10.350 and 1993 c 379 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When the labor cost to The Evergreen State College, any regional
university, or state university, of any building, construction, renovation,
remodeling, or demolition other than maintenance or repairs will equal or
exceed the sum of ((twenty-five)) fifty thousand dollars,
complete plans and specifications for such work shall be prepared and such work
shall be put out for public bids and the contract shall be awarded to the lowest
responsible bidder if in accordance with the bid specifications: PROVIDED,
That when the estimated cost of such building, construction, renovation,
remodeling, or demolition equals or exceeds the sum of twenty-five thousand
dollars, such project shall be deemed a public works and "the prevailing
rate of wage," under chapter 39.12 RCW shall be applicable thereto:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That when such building, construction, renovation,
remodeling, or demolition involves one trade or craft area and the estimated labor
cost exceeds ((ten)) twenty thousand dollars, complete plans and
specifications for such work shall be prepared and such work shall be put out
for public bids, and the contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible
bidder if in accordance with the bid specifications. This subsection shall not
apply when a contract is awarded by the small works procedure authorized in RCW
28B.10.355.

(2)
The Evergreen State College, any regional university, or state university may
require a project to be put to public bid even when it is not required to do so
under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
Where the estimated cost to The Evergreen State College, any regional
university, or state university of any building, construction, renovation,
remodeling, or demolition is less than twenty-five thousand dollars or the
contract is awarded by the small works procedure authorized in RCW 28B.10.355,
the publication requirements of RCW 39.04.020 shall be inapplicable.

(4)
In the event of any emergency when the public interest or property of The
Evergreen State College, regional university, or state university would suffer
material injury or damage by delay, the president of such college or university
may declare the existence of such an emergency and reciting the facts
constituting the same may waive the requirements of this section with reference
to any contract in order to correct the condition causing the emergency:
PROVIDED, That an "emergency," for the purposes of this section,
means a condition likely to result in immediate physical injury to persons or
to property of such college or university in the absence of prompt remedial
action or a condition which immediately impairs the institution's ability to
perform its educational obligations.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.10.355 and 1993 c 379 s 110 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
board of regents of the state universities and each board of trustees of the
regional universities and The Evergreen State College may establish a small
works roster. The small works roster authorized by this section may be used
for any public works project for which the estimated labor cost is less
than one hundred thousand dollars. Each board shall adopt rules to implement
this section.

The
roster shall be composed of all responsible contractors who have requested to
be on the list. Each board shall establish a procedure for securing telephone
or written quotations from the contractors on the small works roster to assure
establishment of a competitive price and for awarding contracts to the lowest
responsible bidder. This procedure shall require either that a good faith
effort be made to request quotations from all contractors on the small works
roster who have indicated the capability of performing the kind of public works
being contracted or that the board shall solicit quotations from at least five
contractors in a manner that will equitably distribute the opportunity among
contractors on the roster. Immediately after an award is made, the bid
quotations obtained shall be recorded, open to public inspection and available
by telephone inquiry. Each board may adopt a procedure to prequalify
contractors for inclusion on the small works roster. No board may be required
to make available for public inspection or copying under chapter 42.17 RCW
financial information required to be provided by the prequalification
procedure.

The small works roster shall be revised at least once each year by
publishing notice of such opportunity in at least one newspaper of general
circulation in the state. Responsible contractors shall be added to the list
at any time they submit a written request.

---
END ---