BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.04.090 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

"Value
proceeding or accruing" means the consideration, whether money, credits,
rights, or other property expressed in terms of money, actually received or
accrued. The term shall be applied, in each case, on a cash receipts or
accrual basis according to which method of accounting is regularly employed in
keeping the books of the taxpayer. However, persons operating grain
warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW may elect to report the value
proceeding or accruing from grain warehouse operations on either a cash
receipts or accrual basis. The department of revenue may provide by
regulation that the value proceeding or accruing from sales on the installment
plan under conditional contracts of sale may be reported as of the dates when
the payments become due.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.04.280 and 1994 c 112 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
every person engaging within this state in the business of: (1) Printing, and
of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or magazines; (2) building, repairing or
improving any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which
is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by
the United States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and including
any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the facilities of any public,
private or cooperatively owned utility or railroad in the course of such
building, repairing or improving, the cost of which readjustment,
reconstruction, or relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority
whose street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is
being built, repaired or improved; (3) extracting for hire or processing for
hire; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not
including the rental of cold storage lockers; (5) representing and performing
services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an independent resident
managing general agent licensed under the provisions of RCW 48.05.310; (6)
radio and television broadcasting, excluding network, national and regional
advertising computed as a standard deduction based on the national average
thereof as annually reported by the Federal Communications Commission, or in
lieu thereof by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and
excluding that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience
computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt
signal strength and delivery by wire, if any; (7) engaging in activities which
bring a person within the definition of consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6);
as to such persons, the amount of tax on such business shall be equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

As
used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables,
meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a
desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly
marketing.

As
used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are
received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit
warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW other
than grain warehouses, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini
storage" facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual
storage areas by separate entrance.

As
used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at
least once every three months, including any supplement or special edition of
the publication.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.04.280 and 1998 c 343 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
every person engaging within this state in the business of: (1) Printing, and
of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or magazines; (2) building, repairing or
improving any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which
is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by
the United States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and
including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the facilities of
any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or railroad in the course of
such building, repairing or improving, the cost of which readjustment,
reconstruction, or relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority
whose street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is
being built, repaired or improved; (3) extracting for hire or processing for
hire; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not
including the rental of cold storage lockers; (5) representing and performing
services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an independent resident
managing general agent licensed under the provisions of RCW 48.05.310; (6)
radio and television broadcasting, excluding network, national and regional
advertising computed as a standard deduction based on the national average thereof
as annually reported by the Federal Communications Commission, or in lieu
thereof by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and excluding
that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a
ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal
strength and delivery by wire, if any; (7) engaging in activities which bring a
person within the definition of consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to
such persons, the amount of tax on such business shall be equal to the gross
income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

As
used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables,
meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a
desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly
marketing.

As
used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are
received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit
warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW other
than grain warehouses, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini
storage" facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual
storage areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not
include a building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.

As
used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at
least once every three months, including any supplement or special edition of
the publication.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1, 2001.

(2) Sections 1 and 2 of this act are necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---