BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that most law enforcement effort to prevent prostitution is
directed at punishing prostitutes. The legislature also finds that many
patrons of prostitutes use motor vehicles in order to obtain the services of
prostitutes and that successful prevention of prostitution involves efforts to
curtail the demand for services offered by prostitutes. It is the intent of
the legislature to decrease the demand for prostitution services and thereby
eliminate the economic foundation for the prostitution industry. It is also
the intent of the legislature to eliminate traffic congestion and other
concerns to neighborhoods and business areas caused by patrons cruising in
motor vehicles in areas of high prostitution activity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9A.88 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
When sentencing or imposing conditions on a person convicted of, or receiving a
deferred sentence or deferred prosecution for, violating RCW 9A.88.110 or 9.68A.100,
the court must impose a requirement that the offender:

(a)
Not be subsequently arrested for patronizing a prostitute or patronizing a
juvenile prostitute; and

(b)
Remain outside the geographical jurisdiction, prescribed by the court, in which
the person was arrested for violating RCW 9A.88.110 or 9.68A.100, unless such a
requirement would interfere with the person's legitimate employment or
residence or otherwise be infeasible.

(2)
This requirement is in addition to the penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.110,
9A.88.120, and 9.68A.100.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 9A.88 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Upon an arrest for a suspected violation of patronizing a prostitute or
patronizing a juvenile prostitute, the arresting law enforcement officer may
impound the person's vehicle if (a) the motor vehicle was used in the
commission of the crime; (b) the person arrested is the owner of the vehicle;
and (c) the person arrested has previously been convicted of patronizing a
prostitute, under RCW 9A.88.110, or patronizing a juvenile prostitute, under
RCW 9.68A.100.

(2)
Impoundments performed under this section shall be in accordance with chapter
46.55 RCW.

Sec.
4. RCW
9.68A.100 and 1989 c 32 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person is guilty of patronizing a juvenile prostitute if that person engages or
agrees or offers to engage in sexual conduct with a minor in return for a fee,
and is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW. In
addition to any other penalty provided under chapter 9A.20 RCW, a person guilty
of patronizing a juvenile prostitute is subject to the provisions under
sections 2 and 3 of this act.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.55.120 and 1998 c 203 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Vehicles or other items of personal property registered or titled with the
department that are impounded by registered tow truck operators pursuant to RCW
46.55.080, 46.55.085, ((or)) 46.55.113, or section 3 of this act
may be redeemed only under the following circumstances:

(a)
Only the legal owner, the registered owner, a person authorized in writing by
the registered owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person who is determined and verified
by the operator to have the permission of the registered owner of the vehicle
or other item of personal property registered or titled with the department, or
one who has purchased a vehicle or item of personal property registered or
titled with the department from the registered owner who produces proof of
ownership or written authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may redeem an
impounded vehicle or items of personal property registered or titled with the
department. In addition, a vehicle impounded because the operator is in
violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c) shall not be released until a person eligible
to redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (b) of
this subsection, including paying all towing, removal, and storage fees,
notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a government agency. If
the department's records show that the operator has been convicted of a
violation of RCW 46.20.342 or a similar local ordinance within the past five
years, the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written direction
of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. A vehicle impounded because the
operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342 may be released only
pursuant to a written order from the agency that ordered the vehicle
impounded. An agency may issue a written order to release pursuant to a
provision of an applicable state agency rule or local ordinance authorizing
release on the basis of economic or personal hardship to the spouse of the operator,
taking into consideration public safety factors, including the operator's
criminal history and driving record.

If
a vehicle is impounded because the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)
(a) or (b), the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written
direction of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. However, if the
department's records show that the operator has been convicted of a violation
of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b) or a similar local ordinance within the past
five years, the vehicle may be held at the written direction of the agency
ordering the vehicle impounded for up to sixty days, and for up to ninety days
if the operator has two or more such prior offenses. If a vehicle is impounded
because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342, the vehicle
may not be released until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection
(1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (b) of this subsection, including paying
all towing, removal, and storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold
was ordered by a government agency.

(b)
The vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with the
department shall be released upon the presentation to any person having custody
of the vehicle of commercially reasonable tender sufficient to cover the costs
of towing, storage, or other services rendered during the course of towing,
removing, impounding, or storing any such vehicle. In addition, if a vehicle
is impounded because the operator was arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342
or 46.20.420 and was being operated by the registered owner when it was
impounded, it must not be released to any person until the registered owner
establishes with the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded that any
penalties, fines, or forfeitures owed by him or her have been satisfied.
Commercially reasonable tender shall include, without limitation, cash, major
bank credit cards, or personal checks drawn on in-state banks if accompanied by
two pieces of valid identification, one of which may be required by the
operator to have a photograph. If the towing firm can determine through the
customer's bank or a check verification service that the presented check would
not be paid by the bank or guaranteed by the service, the towing firm may
refuse to accept the check. Any person who stops payment on a personal check
or credit card, or does not make restitution within ten days from the date a
check becomes insufficient due to lack of funds, to a towing firm that has
provided a service pursuant to this section or in any other manner defrauds the
towing firm in connection with services rendered pursuant to this section shall
be liable for damages in the amount of twice the towing and storage fees, plus
costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

(2)(a)
The registered tow truck operator shall give to each person who seeks to redeem
an impounded vehicle, or item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, written notice of the right of redemption and opportunity for a
hearing, which notice shall be accompanied by a form to be used for requesting
a hearing, the name of the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy
of the towing and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall
maintain a record evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such
notification was provided.

(b)
Any person seeking to redeem an impounded vehicle under this section has a
right to a hearing in the district or municipal court for the jurisdiction in
which the vehicle was impounded to contest the validity of the impoundment or
the amount of towing and storage charges. The district court has jurisdiction
to determine the issues involving all impoundments including those authorized
by the state or its agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine
the issues involving impoundments authorized by agents of the municipality.
Any request for a hearing shall be made in writing on the form provided for
that purpose and must be received by the appropriate court within ten days of
the date the opportunity was provided for in subsection (2)(a) of this
section. At the time of the filing of the hearing request, the petitioner
shall pay to the court clerk a filing fee in the same amount required for the
filing of a suit in district court. If the hearing request is not received by
the court within the ten-day period, the right to a hearing is waived and the
registered owner is liable for any towing, storage, or other impoundment
charges permitted under this chapter. Upon receipt of a timely hearing
request, the court shall proceed to hear and determine the validity of the
impoundment.

(3)(a)
The court, within five days after the request for a hearing, shall notify the
registered tow truck operator, the person requesting the hearing if not the
owner, the registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, and the person or agency
authorizing the impound in writing of the hearing date and time.

(b)
At the hearing, the person or persons requesting the hearing may produce any
relevant evidence to show that the impoundment, towing, or storage fees charged
were not proper. The court may consider a written report made under oath by
the officer who authorized the impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal
appearance at the hearing.

(c)
At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine whether the impoundment
was proper, whether the towing or storage fees charged were in compliance with
the posted rates, and who is responsible for payment of the fees. The court
may not adjust fees or charges that are in compliance with the posted or
contracted rates.

(d)
If the impoundment is found proper, the impoundment, towing, and storage fees
as permitted under this chapter together with court costs shall be assessed
against the person or persons requesting the hearing, unless the operator did
not have a signed and valid impoundment authorization from a private property
owner or an authorized agent.

(e)
If the impoundment is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the
registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal property
registered or titled with the department shall bear no impoundment, towing, or
storage fees, and any security shall be returned or discharged as appropriate,
and the person or agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any
towing, storage, or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The
court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered tow truck operator
against the person or agency authorizing the impound for the impoundment,
towing, and storage fees paid. In addition, the court shall enter judgment in
favor of the registered and legal owners of the vehicle, or other item of
personal property registered or titled with the department, for the amount of
the filing fee required by law for the impound hearing petition as well as
reasonable damages for loss of the use of the vehicle during the time the same
was impounded, for not less than fifty dollars per day, against the person or
agency authorizing the impound. However, if an impoundment arising from an
alleged violation of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.20.420 is determined to be in
violation of this chapter, then the law enforcement officer directing the
impoundment and the government employing the officer are not liable for damages
if the officer relied in good faith and without gross negligence on the records
of the department in ascertaining that the operator of the vehicle had a
suspended or revoked driver's license. If an impoundment arising under
section 3 of this act is determined to be in violation of this chapter or in
violation of section 3 of this act, then the law enforcement officer directing
the impoundment and the government employing the officer are not liable for
damages if the officer acted in good faith and without gross negligence.
If any judgment entered is not paid within fifteen days of notice in writing of
its entry, the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs against
the defendant in any action to enforce the judgment. Notice of entry of
judgment may be made by registered or certified mail, and proof of mailing may
be made by affidavit of the party mailing the notice. Notice of the entry of
the judgment shall read essentially as follows:

TO:
. . . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you
in the . . . . . . Court located at
. . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled
. . . . . ., Case No. . . . . YOU ARE
FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs will be awarded against you
under RCW . . . if the judgment is not paid within 15 days of the
date of this notice.

DATED this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., (year) . . .

Signature ..................

Typed name and address

of
party mailing notice

(4) Any impounded abandoned vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department that is not redeemed within fifteen
days of mailing of the notice of custody and sale as required by RCW
46.55.110(2) shall be sold at public auction in accordance with all the
provisions and subject to all the conditions of RCW 46.55.130. A vehicle or item
of personal property registered or titled with the department may be redeemed
at any time before the start of the auction upon payment of the applicable
towing and storage fees.

---
END ---