BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that those historic furnishings that illustrate the history
of the state of Washington should be maintained and preserved for the use and
benefit of the people of the state. It is the purpose of this act to establish
the capitol furnishings preservation committee to increase the awareness of the
public and state employees about the significance of the furnishings within the
state capitol campus buildings as envisioned by the original architects Wilder
and White.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A new
section is added to chapter 27.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this section.

(a)
"State capitol group" includes the legislative building, the
insurance building, the Cherberg building, the John L. O'Brien building, the
Newhouse building, and the temple of justice building.

(b)
"Historic furnishings" means furniture, fixtures, and artwork fifty
years of age or older.

(2)
The capitol furnishings preservation committee is established to promote and
encourage the recovery and preservation of the original and historic
furnishings of the state capitol group, prevent future loss of historic
furnishings, and review and advise future remodeling and restoration projects
as they pertain to historic furnishings.

(3)
The capitol furnishings preservation committee account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts designated for the account from
appropriations and from other sources must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only to finance the activities of the
capitol furnishings preservation committee. Only the director of the
Washington state historical society or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account when authorized to do so by the committee. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(4)
The committee may:

(a)
Authorize the director of the Washington state historical society or the
director's designee to expend funds from the capitol furnishings preservation
committee account for limited purposes of purchasing and preserving historic
furnishings of the state capitol group;

(b)
Accept monetary donations, grants, and donations of historic furnishings from,
but not limited to, (i) current and former legislators, state officials, and
lobbyists; (ii) the families of former legislators, state officials, and
lobbyists; and (iii) the general public. Moneys received under this section
must be deposited in the capitol furnishings preservation committee account;
and

(c)
Engage in or encourage fund raising activities including the solicitation of
charitable gifts, grants, or donations specifically for the limited purpose of
the recovery of the original and historic furnishings.

(5)
The membership of the committee shall include: Two members of the house of
representatives, one from each major caucus, appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives; two members of the senate, one from each major
caucus, appointed by the president of the senate; the chief clerk of the house
of representatives; the secretary of the senate; the governor or the governor's
designee; the lieutenant governor or the lieutenant governor's designee; a
representative from the office of the secretary of state, the office of the
state treasurer, the office of the state auditor, and the office of the
insurance commissioner; a representative from the supreme court; a
representative from the Washington state historical society, the department of
general administration, and the Thurston county planning council, each
appointed by the governor; and three private citizens, appointed by the
governor.

(6)
Original or historic furnishings from the state capitol group are not surplus
property under chapter 43.19 RCW or other authority unless designated as such
by the committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW to read as follows:

Original
or historic furnishings from the state capitol group under section 2 of this
act do not constitute surplus property under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

When soliciting charitable gifts, grants, or donations solely for
the limited purposes of section 2 of this act, members of the capitol
furnishings preservation committee are exempt from the laws of this chapter.

---
END ---