BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.42.080 and 1996 c 302 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of the crime of abandonment of a dependent person in the
third degree if:

(a)
The person is the parent of a child, a person entrusted with the physical
custody of a child or other dependent person, or a person employed to provide
to the child or dependent person any of the basic necessities of life; and

(b)
The person recklessly abandons the child or other dependent person; and:

(i)
As a result of being abandoned, the child or other dependent person suffers
bodily harm; or

(ii)
Abandoning the child or other dependent person creates an imminent and
substantial risk that the child or other person will suffer substantial bodily
harm.

(2)
Knowingly leaving a child under the age of five years old unattended for a
period of one hour or more creates a rebuttable presumption that the child has
been recklessly abandoned under circumstances creating an imminent and
substantial risk of substantial bodily harm to the child. For purposes of this
subsection, leaving a child unattended means leaving the child in a situation
in which it is not reasonable to believe that a responsible adult is available
or that a responsible adult could be summoned to respond to the needs of the
child.

(3) Abandonment of a dependent person in the third degree is
a gross misdemeanor.

---
END ---