BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.94.743 and 1998 c 68 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Consistent with the policy of the state to reduce outdoor burning to the
greatest extent practical:

(a)
Outdoor burning shall not be allowed in any area of the state where federal or
state ambient air quality standards are exceeded for pollutants emitted by
outdoor burning.

(b)
Outdoor burning shall not be allowed in any urban growth area as defined by RCW
36.70A.030, or any city of the state having a population greater than ten
thousand people if such cities are threatened to exceed state or federal air
quality standards, and alternative disposal practices consistent with good
solid waste management are reasonably available or practices eliminating
production of organic refuse are reasonably available. ((In no event shall
such burning be allowed after December 31, 2000, except that within the urban
growth areas for cities having a population of less than five thousand people,
that are neither within nor contiguous with any nonattainment or maintenance
area designated under the federal clean air act, in no event shall such burning
be allowed after December 31, 2006.))

(c)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, outdoor burning may be
allowed for the exclusive purpose of managing storm or flood-related debris.
The decision to allow burning shall be made by the entity with permitting
jurisdiction as determined under RCW 70.94.660 or 70.94.755. If outdoor
burning is allowed in areas subject to (a) or (b) of this subsection, a permit
shall be required, and a fee may be collected to cover the expenses of
administering and enforcing the permit. All conditions and restrictions
pursuant to RCW 70.94.750(1) and 70.94.775 apply to outdoor burning allowed
under this section.

(2)
"Outdoor burning" means the combustion of material of any type in an
open fire or in an outdoor container without providing for the control of
combustion or the control of emissions from the combustion.

(3)
This section shall not apply to silvicultural burning used to improve or
maintain fire dependent ecosystems for rare plants or animals within state,
federal, and private natural area preserves, natural resource conservation
areas, parks, and other wildlife areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---