BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

A
motor home may be licensed for less than a full registration year by payment
of the full annual license fees under this chapter and payment of the motor
vehicle excise tax for one or more registration months under RCW 82.44.060.

Operation
of a vehicle licensed under this section by a person upon the public highways
after the expiration of the monthly license is a traffic infraction, and in
addition the person shall pay the full motor vehicle excise tax for the vehicle
involved covering an entire registration year's operation, less the tax for any
registration month or months of the registration year already paid.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.44.060 and 1990 c 42 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

The
excise tax hereby imposed shall be due and payable to the department or its
agents at the time of registration of a motor vehicle. Whenever an application
is made to the department or its agents for a license for a motor vehicle there
shall be collected, in addition to the amount of the license fee or renewal
license fee, the amount of the excise tax imposed by this chapter, and no
dealer's license or license plates, and no license or license plates for a motor
vehicle shall be issued unless such tax is paid in full. Except as provided
in this section, the excise tax hereby imposed shall be collected for each
registration year. The excise tax upon a motor vehicle licensed for the first
time in this state shall be levied for one full registration year commencing on
the date of the calendar year designated by the department and ending on the
same date of the next succeeding calendar year. For vehicles registered under
chapter 46.87 RCW, proportional registration, and for vehicle dealer plates
issued under chapter 46.70 RCW, the registration year is the period provided in
those chapters: PROVIDED, That the tax shall in no case be less than two
dollars except for proportionally registered vehicles.

The
excise tax for a motor home, as defined in RCW 46.04.305, may be paid for any
full registration month or months at one-twelfth of the usual annual tax plus
two dollars, this sum to be multiplied by the number of full months for which
the tax is paid if for less than a full year. The department shall collect an
additional fee of two dollars each time a partial year excise tax is paid.

A
motor vehicle shall be deemed licensed for the first time in this state when
such vehicle was not previously licensed by this state for the registration
year immediately preceding the registration year in which the application for
license is made or when the vehicle has been registered in another jurisdiction
subsequent to any prior registration in this state.

No additional tax shall be imposed under this chapter upon any
vehicle upon the transfer of ownership thereof if the tax imposed with respect
to such vehicle has already been paid for the registration year or fraction of
a registration year in which transfer of ownership occurs.

---
END ---