BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 24.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The superior court of the county where a corporation's principal office, or, if
none in this state, its registered office, is located may remove a director of
the corporation from office in a proceeding commenced by the corporation if the
court finds that (a) the director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct
with respect to the corporation, and (b) removal is in the best interest of the
corporation.

(2) The court that removes a director may bar the director from
reelection for a period prescribed by the court.

---
END ---