BE IT ENACTED BY
THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.04.070 and 1961 c 189 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person who violates any order or injunction issued pursuant to RCW 9.04.050
through 9.04.080 shall be subject to a fine of not more than five thousand
dollars or imprisonment for not more than ninety days or both.

((RCW
9.01.090 shall not be applicable to the terms of RCW 9.04.050 through 9.04.080
and no penalty or remedy shall result from a violation of RCW 9.04.050 through
9.04.080 except as expressly provided herein.))

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

RCW
9.01.090 was repealed by 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.92.010.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.41.042 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW
9.41.040(1)(((e))) (b)(iii) shall not apply to any person under
the age of eighteen years who is:

(1)
In attendance at a hunter's safety course or a firearms safety course;

(2)
Engaging in practice in the use of a firearm or target shooting at an
established range authorized by the governing body of the jurisdiction in which
such range is located or any other area where the discharge of a firearm is not
prohibited;

(3)
Engaging in an organized competition involving the use of a firearm, or
participating in or practicing for a performance by an organized group that
uses firearms as a part of the performance;

(4)
Hunting or trapping under a valid license issued to the person under Title 77
RCW;

(5)
In an area where the discharge of a firearm is permitted, is not trespassing,
and the person either: (a) Is at least fourteen years of age, has been issued
a hunter safety certificate, and is using a lawful firearm other than a pistol;
or (b) is under the supervision of a parent, guardian, or other adult approved
for the purpose by the parent or guardian;

(6)
Traveling with any unloaded firearm in the person's possession to or from any
activity described in subsection (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section;

(7)
On real property under the control of his or her parent, other relative, or
legal guardian and who has the permission of the parent or legal guardian to
possess a firearm;

(8)
At his or her residence and who, with the permission of his or her parent or
legal guardian, possesses a firearm for the purpose of exercising the rights
specified in RCW 9A.16.020(3); or

(9)
Is a member of the armed forces of the United States, national guard, or
organized reserves, when on duty.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

RCW
9.41.040 was amended by 1995 c 129 s 16, changing subsection (1)(e) to
subsection (1)(b)(iv); and was subsequently amended by 1996 c 295 s 2, changing
subsection (1)(b)(iv) to subsection (1)(b)(iii).

Sec.
3. RCW
9.41.185 and 1988 c 36 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
use of "coyote getters" or similar spring-triggered shell devices
shall not constitute a violation of any of the laws of the state of Washington
when the use of such "coyote getters" is authorized by the state
department of agriculture and/or the state department of fish and
wildlife in cooperative programs with the United States Fish and Wildlife
Service, for the purpose of controlling or eliminating coyotes harmful to
livestock and game animals on range land or forest areas.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

Powers,
duties, and functions of the department of fisheries and the department of
wildlife were transferred to the department of fish and wildlife by 1993 sp.s.
c 2, effective July 1, 1994.

Sec.
4. RCW
9.44.080 and 1909 c 249 s 337 are each amended to read as follows:

In
a situation not covered by RCW 29.79.440, 29.79.490, 29.82.170, or 29.82.220, every
person who shall wilfully sign the name of another person or of a fictitious
person, or for any consideration, gratuity or reward shall sign his own name to
or withdraw his name from any referendum or other petition circulated in
pursuance of any law of this state or any municipal ordinance; or in signing
his name to such petition shall wilfully subscribe to any false statement
concerning his age, citizenship, residence or other qualifications to sign the
same; or knowing that any such petition contains any such false or wrongful
signature or statement, shall file the same, or put the same off with intent
that it should be filed, as a true and genuine petition, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

RCW
29.79.440 and 29.79.490 specifically apply to state initiative and referendum
petitions. RCW 29.82.170 and 29.82.220 specifically apply to recall petitions.

Sec.
5. RCW
9.46.0351 and 1987 c 4 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature hereby authorizes any bona fide charitable or nonprofit
organization which is licensed pursuant to RCW 66.24.400, and its officers and
employees, to allow the use of the premises, furnishings, and other facilities
not gambling devices of such organization by members of the organization, and
members of a chapter or unit organized under the same state, regional, or
national charter or constitution, who engage as players in the following types
of gambling activities only:

(a)
Social card games ((as defined in RCW 9.46.0281 (1) through (4))); and

(b)
Social dice games, which shall be limited to contests of chance, the outcome of
which are determined by one or more rolls of dice.

(2)
Bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations shall not be required to be
licensed by the commission in order to allow use of their premises in
accordance with this section. However, the following conditions must be met:

(a)
No organization, corporation, or person shall collect or obtain or charge any
percentage of or shall collect or obtain any portion of the money or thing of
value wagered or won by any of the players: PROVIDED, That a player may
collect his or her winnings; and

(b)
No organization, corporation, or person shall collect or obtain any money or
thing of value from, or charge or impose any fee upon, any person which either
enables him or her to play or results in or from his or her playing: PROVIDED,
That this subsection shall not preclude collection of a membership fee which is
unrelated to participation in gambling activities authorized under this
section.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

RCW
9.46.0281 was repealed by 1997 c 118 s 3. Later enactment of the definition in
RCW 9.46.0282 applies to chapter 9.46 generally, and makes the reference back
unnecessary.

Sec.
6. RCW
9.46.070 and 1993 c 344 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall have the following powers and duties:

(1)
To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to bona
fide charitable or nonprofit organizations approved by the commission meeting
the requirements of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant
thereto permitting said organizations to conduct bingo games, raffles,
amusement games, and social card games, to utilize punch boards and pull-tabs
in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations
adopted pursuant thereto and to revoke or suspend said licenses for violation
of any provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted pursuant
thereto: PROVIDED, That the commission shall not deny a license to an
otherwise qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to
be issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission or director shall not issue,
deny, suspend, or revoke any license because of considerations of race, sex,
creed, color, or national origin: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission
may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to
final action by the commission;

(2)
To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to any
person, association, or organization operating a business primarily engaged in
the selling of items of food or drink for consumption on the premises, approved
by the commission meeting the requirements of this chapter and any rules and
regulations adopted pursuant thereto permitting said person, association, or
organization to utilize punch boards and pull-tabs and to conduct social card
games as a commercial stimulant in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto and to revoke or
suspend said licenses for violation of any provisions of this chapter and any
rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That the commission
shall not deny a license to an otherwise qualified applicant in an effort to
limit the number of licenses to be issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses
subject to final action by the commission;

(3)
To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to any
person, association, or organization approved by the commission meeting the
requirements of this chapter and meeting the requirements of any rules and
regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter as now or
hereafter amended, permitting said person, association, or organization to
conduct or operate amusement games in such manner and at such locations as the
commission may determine;

(4)
To authorize, require, and issue, for a period not to exceed one year, such
licenses as the commission may by rule provide, to any person, association, or
organization to engage in the selling, distributing, or otherwise supplying or
in the manufacturing of devices for use within this state for those activities
authorized by this chapter;

(5)
To establish a schedule of annual license fees for carrying on specific
gambling activities upon the premises, and for such other activities as may be
licensed by the commission, which fees shall provide to the commission not less
than an amount of money adequate to cover all costs incurred by the commission
relative to licensing under this chapter and the enforcement by the commission
of the provisions of this chapter and rules and regulations adopted pursuant
thereto: PROVIDED, That all licensing fees shall be submitted with an
application therefor and such portion of said fee as the commission may
determine, based upon its cost of processing and investigation, shall be
retained by the commission upon the withdrawal or denial of any such license
application as its reasonable expense for processing the application and
investigation into the granting thereof: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if in a
particular case the basic license fee established by the commission for a
particular class of license is less than the commission's actual expenses to
investigate that particular application, the commission may at any time charge
to that applicant such additional fees as are necessary to pay the commission
for those costs. The commission may decline to proceed with its investigation
and no license shall be issued until the commission has been fully paid
therefor by the applicant: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may
establish fees for the furnishing by it to licensees of identification stamps
to be affixed to such devices and equipment as required by the commission and
for such other special services or programs required or offered by the commission,
the amount of each of these fees to be not less than is adequate to offset the
cost to the commission of the stamps and of administering their dispersal to
licensees or the cost of administering such other special services,
requirements or programs;

(6)
To prescribe the manner and method of payment of taxes, fees and penalties to
be paid to or collected by the commission;

(7)
To require that applications for all licenses contain such information as may
be required by the commission: PROVIDED, That all persons (a) having a
managerial or ownership interest in any gambling activity, or the building in
which any gambling activity occurs, or the equipment to be used for any
gambling activity, or (b) participating as an employee in the operation of any
gambling activity, shall be listed on the application for the license and the
applicant shall certify on the application, under oath, that the persons named
on the application are all of the persons known to have an interest in any
gambling activity, building, or equipment by the person making such
application: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may require fingerprinting
and background checks on any persons seeking licenses under this chapter or of
any person holding an interest in any gambling activity, building, or equipment
to be used therefor, or of any person participating as an employee in the
operation of any gambling activity;

(8)
To require that any license holder maintain records as directed by the
commission and submit such reports as the commission may deem necessary;

(9)
To require that all income from bingo games, raffles, and amusement games be
recorded and reported as established by rule or regulation of the commission to
the extent deemed necessary by considering the scope and character of the
gambling activity in such a manner that will disclose gross income from any
gambling activity, amounts received from each player, the nature and value of
prizes, and the fact of distributions of such prizes to the winners thereof;

(10)
To regulate and establish maximum limitations on income derived from bingo. In
establishing limitations pursuant to this subsection the commission shall take
into account (i) the nature, character, and scope of the activities of the
licensee; (ii) the source of all other income of the licensee; and (iii) the
percentage or extent to which income derived from bingo is used for charitable,
as distinguished from nonprofit, purposes. However, the commission's powers
and duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not mandatory;

(11)
To regulate and establish the type and scope of and manner of conducting the
gambling activities authorized by this chapter, including but not limited to,
the extent of wager, money, or other thing of value which may be wagered or
contributed or won by a player in any such activities;

(12)
To regulate the collection of and the accounting for the fee which may be
imposed by an organization, corporation, or person licensed to conduct a
social card game on a person desiring to become a player in a social card game
in accordance with RCW ((9.46.0281(4))) 9.46.0282;

(13)
To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of county, city, and other local
or state agencies in investigating any matter within the scope of its duties
and responsibilities;

(14)
In accordance with RCW 9.46.080, to adopt such rules and regulations as are
deemed necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter. All
rules and regulations shall be adopted pursuant to the administrative procedure
act, chapter 34.05 RCW;

(15)
To set forth for the perusal of counties, city-counties, cities and towns,
model ordinances by which any legislative authority thereof may enter into the
taxing of any gambling activity authorized by this chapter;

(16)
To establish and regulate a maximum limit on salaries or wages which may be
paid to persons employed in connection with activities conducted by bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organizations and authorized by this chapter, where
payment of such persons is allowed, and to regulate and establish maximum
limits for other expenses in connection with such authorized activities,
including but not limited to rent or lease payments. However, the
commissioner's powers and duties granted by this subsection are discretionary
and not mandatory.

In
establishing these maximum limits the commission shall take into account the
amount of income received, or expected to be received, from the class of activities
to which the limits will apply and the amount of money the games could generate
for authorized charitable or nonprofit purposes absent such expenses. The
commission may also take into account, in its discretion, other factors,
including but not limited to, the local prevailing wage scale and whether
charitable purposes are benefited by the activities;

(17)
To authorize, require, and issue for a period not to exceed one year such
licenses or permits, for which the commission may by rule provide, to any
person to work for any operator of any gambling activity authorized by this
chapter in connection with that activity, or any manufacturer, supplier, or
distributor of devices for those activities in connection with such business.
The commission shall not require that persons working solely as volunteers in
an authorized activity conducted by a bona fide charitable or bona fide
nonprofit organization, who receive no compensation of any kind for any purpose
from that organization, and who have no managerial or supervisory
responsibility in connection with that activity, be licensed to do such work.
The commission may require that licensees employing such unlicensed volunteers
submit to the commission periodically a list of the names, addresses, and dates
of birth of the volunteers. If any volunteer is not approved by the
commission, the commission may require that the licensee not allow that person
to work in connection with the licensed activity;

(18)
To publish and make available at the office of the commission or elsewhere to
anyone requesting it a list of the commission licensees, including the name,
address, type of license, and license number of each licensee;

(19)
To establish guidelines for determining what constitutes active membership in
bona fide nonprofit or charitable organizations for the purposes of this
chapter; and

(20)
To perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out the purposes and
provisions of this chapter.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

RCW
9.46.0281 was repealed by 1997 c 118 s 3. Later enactment, see RCW 9.46.0282.

Sec.
7. RCW
9.46.198 and 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person who works as an employee or agent or in a similar capacity for another
person in connection with the operation of an activity for which a license is
required under this chapter or by commission rule without having obtained the
applicable license required by the commission under RCW 9.46.070(((16)))
(17) shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction,
be punished by not more than one year in the county jail or a fine of not more
than five thousand dollars, or both.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

RCW
9.46.070 was amended by 1981 c 139 s 3, renumbering subsection (16) as (17).

Sec.
8. RCW
9.68A.120 and 1984 c 262 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following are subject to seizure and forfeiture:

(1)
All visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in sexually explicit
conduct.

(2)
All raw materials, equipment, and other tangible personal property of any kind
used or intended to be used to manufacture or process any visual or printed
matter that depicts a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, and all
conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels that are used or intended
for use to transport, or in any manner to facilitate the transportation of,
visual or printed matter in violation of RCW 9.68A.050 or 9.68A.060, but:

(a)
No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of
business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless
it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a
consenting party or privy to a violation of this chapter;

(b)
No property is subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or
omission established by the owner of the property to have been committed or
omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent;

(c)
A forfeiture of property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject
to the interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had knowledge
of nor consented to the act or omission; and

(d)
When the owner of a conveyance has been arrested under this chapter the
conveyance may not be subject to forfeiture unless it is seized or process is
issued for its seizure within ten days of the owner's arrest.

(3)
All personal property, moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, or other
tangible or intangible property furnished or intended to be furnished by any
person in exchange for visual or printed matter depicting a minor engaged in
sexually explicit conduct, or constituting proceeds traceable to any violation
of this chapter.

(4)
Property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by any law
enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by any superior court
having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure without process may be made if:

(a)
The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an
inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;

(b)
The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in
favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon
this chapter;

(c)
A law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property is
directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety; or

(d)
The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property was
used or is intended to be used in violation of this chapter.

(5)
In the event of seizure under subsection (4) of this section, proceedings for
forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the seizure. The law enforcement
agency under whose authority the seizure was made shall cause notice to be
served within fifteen days following the seizure on the owner of the property
seized and the person in charge thereof and any person having any known right
or interest therein, of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized
property. The notice may be served by any method authorized by law or court
rule including but not limited to service by certified mail with return receipt
requested. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the
fifteen day period following the seizure.

(6)
If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the
person's claim of ownership or right to possession of seized items within
forty-five days of the seizure, the item seized shall be deemed forfeited.

(7)
If any person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the
person's claim of ownership or right to possession of seized items within
forty-five days of the seizure, the person or persons shall be afforded a
reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall
be before an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except
that any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of
competent jurisdiction if the aggregate value of the article or articles
involved is more than five hundred dollars. The hearing before an
administrative law judge and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title 34 RCW.
In a court hearing between two or more claimants to the article or articles
involved, the prevailing party shall be entitled to a judgment for costs and
reasonable attorney's fees. The burden of producing evidence shall be upon the
person claiming to be the lawful owner or the person claiming to have the
lawful right to possession of the seized items. The seizing law enforcement
agency shall promptly return the article or articles to the claimant upon a
determination by the administrative law judge or court that the claimant is
lawfully entitled to possession thereof of the seized items.

(8)
If property is sought to be forfeited on the ground that it constitutes
proceeds traceable to a violation of this chapter, the seizing law enforcement
agency must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the property
constitutes proceeds traceable to a violation of this chapter.

(9)
When property is forfeited under this chapter the seizing law enforcement
agency may:

(a)
Retain it for official use or upon application by any law enforcement agency of
this state release the property to that agency for the exclusive use of
enforcing this chapter;

(b)
Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and which is not harmful
to the public. The proceeds and all moneys forfeited under this chapter shall
be used for payment of all proper expenses of the investigation leading to the
seizure, including any money delivered to the subject of the investigation by
the law enforcement agency, and of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale,
including expenses of seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising, actual
costs of the prosecuting or city attorney, and court costs. Fifty percent of
the money remaining after payment of these expenses shall be deposited in the
((criminal justice training)) public safety and education account
established under RCW ((43.101.210 which shall be appropriated by law to the
Washington state criminal justice training commission)) 43.08.250
and fifty percent shall be deposited in the general fund of the state, county,
or city of the seizing law enforcement agency; or

(c)
Request the appropriate sheriff or director of public safety to take custody of
the property and remove it for disposition in accordance with law.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
collection and distribution of fines and forfeitures was extensively revised by
1984 c 258 ss 301 through 340. RCW 43.101.210 was repealed by section 339 of
that act, and various criminal justice-related accounts were consolidated in
the public safety and education account.

Sec.
9. RCW
9.91.060 and 1951 c 270 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person having the care and custody, whether temporary or permanent, of minor
children under the age of twelve years, who shall leave such children in a
parked automobile unattended by an adult while such person enters a tavern or
other premises where vinous(([,])), spirituous(([,])),
or malt liquors are dispensed for consumption on the premises shall be guilty
of a gross misdemeanor.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
bracketed commas had been omitted in the 1951 enactment.

Sec.
10. RCW
9.94A.050 and 1982 c 192 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall appoint a research staff of sufficient size and with
sufficient resources to accomplish its duties. The commission may request from
the office of financial management, the indeterminate sentence review
board ((of prison terms and paroles)), administrator for the courts, the
department of corrections, and the department of social and health services
such data, information, and data processing assistance as it may need to
accomplish its duties, and such services shall be provided without cost to the
commission. The commission shall adopt its own bylaws.

The
salary for a full-time executive officer, if any, shall be fixed by the
governor pursuant to RCW 43.03.040.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
11. RCW
9.94A.127 and 1990 c 3 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The prosecuting attorney shall file a special allegation of sexual motivation
in every criminal case other than sex offenses as defined in RCW 9.94A.030(((29)))
(33) (a) or (c) when sufficient admissible evidence exists, which, when
considered with the most plausible, reasonably foreseeable defense that could
be raised under the evidence, would justify a finding of sexual motivation by a
reasonable and objective fact-finder.

(2)
In a criminal case wherein there has been a special allegation the state shall
prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the accused committed the crime with a
sexual motivation. The court shall make a finding of fact of whether or not a
sexual motivation was present at the time of the commission of the crime, or if
a jury trial is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also
find a special verdict as to whether or not the defendant committed the crime
with a sexual motivation. This finding shall not be applied to sex offenses as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030(((29))) (33) (a) or (c).

(3)
The prosecuting attorney shall not withdraw the special allegation of sexual
motivation without approval of the court through an order of dismissal of the
special allegation. The court shall not dismiss this special allegation unless
it finds that such an order is necessary to correct an error in the initial
charging decision or unless there are evidentiary problems which make proving
the special allegation doubtful.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

RCW
9.94A.030 was amended by 1994 c 1 s 3, changing subsection (29) to subsection
(31). RCW 9.94A.030 was subsequently amended by 1995 c 108 s 1, changing
subsection (31) to subsection (33).

Sec.
12. RCW
9.94A.130 and 1984 c 209 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
power to defer or suspend the imposition or execution of sentence is hereby
abolished in respect to sentences prescribed for felonies committed after June
30, 1984, except for offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.120(((7))) (8)(a),
the special sexual offender sentencing alternative, whose sentence may be
suspended.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

RCW
9.94A.120 was amended by 1995 c 108 s 3, changing subsection (7) to subsection
(8).

Sec.
13. RCW
9.94A.160 and 1984 c 246 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the governor finds that an emergency exists in that the population of a state
residential correctional facility exceeds its reasonable, maximum capacity,
then the governor may do any one or more of the following:

(1)
Call the sentencing guidelines commission into an emergency meeting for the
purpose of evaluating the standard ranges and other standards. The commission
may adopt any revision or amendment to the standard ranges or other standards
that it believes appropriate to deal with the emergency situation. The
revision or amendment shall be adopted in conformity with chapter 34.05 RCW and
shall take effect on the date prescribed by the commission. The legislature
shall approve or modify the commission's revision or amendment at the next
legislative session after the revision or amendment takes effect. Failure of
the legislature to act shall be deemed as approval of the revision or
amendment;

(2)
((If the emergency occurs prior to July 1, 1988, call the board of prison
terms and paroles into an emergency meeting for the purpose of evaluating its
guidelines and procedures for release of prisoners under its jurisdiction. The
board shall adopt guidelines for the reduction of inmate population to be used
in the event the governor calls the board into an emergency meeting under this
section. The board shall not, under this subsection, reduce the prison term of
an inmate serving a mandatory minimum term under RCW 9.95.040, an inmate
confined for treason, an inmate confined for any violent offense as defined by
RCW 9.94A.030, or an inmate who has been found to be a sexual psychopath under
chapter 71.06 RCW. In establishing these guidelines, the board shall give
priority to sentence reductions for inmates confined for nonviolent offenses,
inmates who are within six months of a scheduled parole, and inmates with the
best records of conduct during confinement. The board shall consider the
public safety, the detrimental effect of overcrowding upon inmate
rehabilitation, and the best allocation of limited correctional facility
resources. Guidelines adopted under this subsection shall be submitted to the
senate institutions and house of representatives social and health services
committees for their review. This subsection does not require the board to
reduce inmate population to or below any certain number. The board may also
take any other action authorized by law to modify the terms of prisoners under
its jurisdiction;

(3))) Call
the clemency and pardons board into an emergency meeting for the purpose of
recommending whether the governor's commutation or pardon power should be
exercised to meet the present emergency.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

Subsection
(2) is, by its own terms, obsolete.

Sec.
14. RCW
9.94A.170 and 1993 c 31 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A term of confinement, including community custody, ordered in a sentence
pursuant to this chapter shall be tolled by any period of time during which the
offender has absented him or herself from confinement without the prior
approval of the entity in whose custody the offender has been placed. A term
of partial confinement shall be tolled during any period of time spent in total
confinement pursuant to a new conviction or pursuant to sanctions for violation
of sentence conditions on a separate felony conviction.

(2)
A term of supervision, including postrelease supervision ordered in a sentence
pursuant to this chapter shall be tolled by any period of time during which the
offender has absented himself or herself from supervision without prior
approval of the entity under whose supervision the offender has been placed.

(3)
Any period of supervision shall be tolled during any period of time the
offender is in confinement for any reason. However, if an offender is detained
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.207 or 9.94A.195 and is later found not to have violated
a condition or requirement of supervision, time spent in confinement due to
such detention shall not toll ((to [the])) the period of
supervision.

(4)
For confinement or supervision sentences, the date for the tolling of the
sentence shall be established by the entity responsible for the confinement or
supervision.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

Corrects
erroneous wording.

Sec.
15. RCW
9.94A.180 and 1991 c 181 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An offender sentenced to a term of partial confinement shall be confined in the
facility for at least eight hours per day or, if serving a work crew sentence
shall comply with the conditions of that sentence as set forth in RCW
9.94A.030(((23))) (26) and 9.94A.135. The offender shall be
required as a condition of partial confinement to report to the facility at
designated times. An offender may be required to comply with crime-related
prohibitions during the period of partial confinement.

(2)
An offender in a county jail ordered to serve all or part of a term of less
than one year in work release, work crew, or a program of home detention who
violates the rules of the work release facility, work crew, or program of home
detention or fails to remain employed or enrolled in school may be transferred
to the appropriate county detention facility without further court order but
shall, upon request, be notified of the right to request an administrative
hearing on the issue of whether or not the offender failed to comply with the
order and relevant conditions. Pending such hearing, or in the absence of a
request for the hearing, the offender shall serve the remainder of the term of
confinement as total confinement. This subsection shall not affect transfer or
placement of offenders committed to the state department of corrections.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

RCW
9.94A.030 was amended by 1994 c 1 s 3, changing subsection (23) to subsection
(24). RCW 9.94A.030 was subsequently amended by 1995 c 108 s 1, changing subsection
(24) to subsection (26).

Sec.
16. RCW
9.94A.370 and 1996 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The intersection of the column defined by the offender score and the row
defined by the offense seriousness score determines the presumptive sentencing
range (see RCW 9.94A.310, (Table 1)). The additional time for deadly weapon
findings or for those offenses enumerated in RCW 9.94A.310(4) that were
committed in a state correctional facility or county jail shall be added to the
entire presumptive sentence range. The court may impose any sentence within
the range that it deems appropriate. All presumptive sentence ranges are
expressed in terms of total confinement.

(2)
In determining any sentence, the trial court may rely on no more information
than is admitted by the plea agreement, or admitted, acknowledged, or proved in
a trial or at the time of sentencing. Acknowledgement includes not objecting
to information stated in the presentence reports. Where the defendant disputes
material facts, the court must either not consider the fact or grant an
evidentiary hearing on the point. The facts shall be deemed proved at the
hearing by a preponderance of the evidence. Facts that establish the elements
of a more serious crime or additional crimes may not be used to go outside the
presumptive sentence range except upon stipulation or when specifically provided
for in RCW 9.94A.390(2) (((c), (d), (f), and (g))) (d), (e), (g), and
(h).

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

RCW
9.94A.390 was amended by 1996 c 248 s 2 and by 1996 c 121 s 1, changing
subsection (2)(c), (d), (f), and (g) to subsection (2)(d), (e), (g), and (h),
respectively.

Sec.
17. RCW
9.95.030 and 1984 c 114 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

At
the time the convicted person is transported to the custody of the department
of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board ((of prison
terms and paroles)) shall obtain from the sentencing judge and the
prosecuting attorney, a statement of all the facts concerning the convicted
person's crime and any other information of which they may be possessed
relative to him, and the sentencing judge and the prosecuting attorney shall
furnish the board ((of prison terms and paroles)) with such
information. The sentencing judge and prosecuting attorney shall indicate to
the board ((of prison terms and paroles)), for its guidance, what, in
their judgment, should be the duration of the convicted person's imprisonment.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986. See RCW 9.95.001.

Sec.
18. RCW
9.95.060 and 1988 c 202 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

When
a convicted person seeks appellate review of his or her conviction and is at
liberty on bond pending the determination of the proceeding by the supreme
court or the court of appeals, credit on his or her sentence will begin from
the date such convicted person is returned to custody. The date of return to
custody shall be certified to the department of corrections, the ((Washington
state)) indeterminate sentence review board ((of prison terms and
paroles)), and the prosecuting attorney of the county in which such
convicted person was convicted and sentenced, by the sheriff of such county.
If such convicted person does not seek review of the conviction, but is at
liberty for a period of time subsequent to the signing of the judgment and sentence,
or becomes a fugitive, credit on his sentence will begin from the date such
convicted person is returned to custody. The date of return to custody shall
be certified as provided in this section. In all other cases, credit on a
sentence will begin from the date the judgment and sentence is signed by the
court.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
19. RCW
9.95.070 and 1955 c 133 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
prisoner who has a favorable record of conduct at the penitentiary or the
reformatory, and who performs in a faithful, diligent, industrious, orderly and
peaceable manner the work, duties, and tasks assigned to him to the
satisfaction of the superintendent of the penitentiary or reformatory, and in
whose behalf the superintendent of the penitentiary or reformatory files a
report certifying that his conduct and work have been meritorious and
recommending allowance of time credits to him, shall upon, but not until, the
adoption of such recommendation by the indeterminate sentence review
board ((of prison terms and paroles)), be allowed time credit reductions
from the term of imprisonment fixed by the board ((of prison terms and
paroles)).

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
20. RCW
9.95.090 and 1955 c 133 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board ((of prison terms and paroles)) shall require of every able bodied
convicted person imprisoned in the penitentiary or the reformatory as many
hours of faithful labor in each and every day during his term of imprisonment
as shall be prescribed by the rules and regulations of the institution in which
he is confined.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
21. RCW
9.95.110 and 1955 c 133 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board ((of prison terms and paroles)) may permit a convicted person to
leave the buildings and enclosures of the penitentiary or the reformatory on
parole, after such convicted person has served the period of confinement fixed
for him by the board, less time credits for good behavior and diligence in
work: PROVIDED, That in no case shall an inmate be credited with more than
one-third of his sentence as fixed by the board.

The
board ((of prison terms and paroles)) may establish rules and
regulations under which a convicted person may be allowed to leave the confines
of the penitentiary or the reformatory on parole, and may return such person to
the confines of the institution from which he was paroled, at its discretion.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
22. RCW
9.95.120 and 1981 c 136 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
the board ((of prison terms and paroles)) or a probation and parole
officer of this state has reason to believe a convicted person has breached a
condition of his parole or violated the law of any state where he may then be
or the rules and regulations of the board ((of prison terms and paroles)),
any probation and parole officer of this state may arrest or cause the arrest
and detention and suspension of parole of such convicted person pending a
determination by the board whether the parole of such convicted person shall be
revoked. All facts and circumstances surrounding the violation by such
convicted person shall be reported to the board ((of prison terms and
paroles)) by the probation and parole officer, with recommendations. The
board ((of prison terms and paroles)), after consultation with the
secretary of corrections, shall make all rules and regulations concerning
procedural matters, which shall include the time when state probation and
parole officers shall file with the board reports required by this section,
procedures pertaining thereto and the filing of such information as may be
necessary to enable the board to perform its functions under this section. On
the basis of the report by the probation and parole officer, or at any time
upon its own discretion, the board may revise or modify the conditions of
parole or order the suspension of parole by the issuance of a written order
bearing its seal, which order shall be sufficient warrant for all peace
officers to take into custody any convicted person who may be on parole and
retain such person in their custody until arrangements can be made by the board
((of prison terms and paroles)) for his return to a state correctional
institution for convicted felons. Any such revision or modification of the
conditions of parole or the order suspending parole shall be personally served
upon the parolee.

Any
parolee arrested and detained in physical custody by the authority of a state
probation and parole officer, or upon the written order of the board ((of
prison terms and paroles)), shall not be released from custody on bail or
personal recognizance, except upon approval of the board ((of prison terms
and paroles)) and the issuance by the board of an order of reinstatement on
parole on the same or modified conditions of parole.

All
chiefs of police, marshals of cities and towns, sheriffs of counties, and all
police, prison, and peace officers and constables shall execute any such order
in the same manner as any ordinary criminal process.

Whenever
a paroled prisoner is accused of a violation of his parole, other than the
commission of, and conviction for, a felony or misdemeanor under the laws of
this state or the laws of any state where he may then be, he shall be entitled
to a fair and impartial hearing of such charges within thirty days from the
time that he is served with charges of the violation of conditions of his
parole after his arrest and detention. The hearing shall be held before one or
more members of the ((parole)) board at a place or places, within this
state, reasonably near the site of the alleged violation or violations of
parole.

In
the event that the board ((of prison terms and paroles)) suspends a
parole by reason of an alleged parole violation or in the event that a parole
is suspended pending the disposition of a new criminal charge, the board ((of
prison terms and paroles)) shall have the power to nullify the order of
suspension and reinstate the individual to parole under previous conditions or
any new conditions that the board ((of prison terms and paroles)) may
determine advisable. Before the board ((of prison terms and paroles))
shall nullify an order of suspension and reinstate a parole they shall have
determined that the best interests of society and the individual shall best be
served by such reinstatement rather than a return to a penal institution.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
23. RCW
9.95.122 and 1969 c 98 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

At
any on-site parole revocation hearing the alleged parole violator shall be
entitled to be represented by an attorney of his own choosing and at his own
expense, except, upon the presentation of satisfactory evidence of indigency
and the request for the appointment of an attorney by the alleged parole
violator, the board may cause the appointment of an attorney to represent the
alleged parole violator to be paid for at state expense, and, in addition, the
board may assume all or such other expenses in the presentation of evidence on
behalf of the alleged parole violator as it may have authorized: PROVIDED,
That funds are available for the payment of attorneys' fees and expenses.
Attorneys for the representation of alleged parole violators in on-site
hearings shall be appointed by the superior courts for the counties wherein the
on-site parole revocation hearing is to be held and such attorneys shall be
compensated in such manner and in such amount as shall be fixed in a schedule
of fees adopted by rule of the board ((of prison terms and paroles)).

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
24. RCW
9.95.123 and 1969 c 98 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In
conducting on-site parole revocation hearings, the board ((of prison terms
and paroles)) shall have the authority to administer oaths and
affirmations, examine witnesses, receive evidence, and issue subpoenas
for the compulsory attendance of witnesses and the production of evidence for
presentation at such hearings. Subpoenas issued by the board shall be
effective throughout the state. Witnesses in attendance at any on-site parole
revocation hearing shall be paid the same fees and allowances, in the same
manner and under the same conditions as provided for witnesses in the courts of
the state in accordance with chapter 2.40 RCW as now or hereafter amended. If
any person fails or refuses to obey a subpoena issued by the board, or obeys
the subpoena but refuses to testify concerning any matter under examination at
the hearing, the board ((of prison terms and paroles)) may petition the
superior court of the county where the hearing is being conducted for
enforcement of the subpoena: PROVIDED, That an offer to pay statutory fees and
mileage has been made to the witness at the time of the service of the
subpoena. The petition shall be accompanied by a copy of the subpoena and
proof of service, and shall set forth in what specific manner the subpoena has
not been complied with, and shall ask an order of the court to compel the
witness to appear and testify before the board. The court, upon such petition,
shall enter an order directing the witness to appear before the court at a time
and place to be fixed in such order and then and there to show cause why he has
not responded to the subpoena or has refused to testify. A copy of the order
shall be served upon the witness. If it appears to the court that the subpoena
was properly issued and that the particular questions which the witness refuses
to answer are reasonable and relevant, the court shall enter an order that the
witness appear at the time and place fixed in the order and testify or produce
the required papers, and on failing to obey said order, the witness shall be
dealt with as for contempt of court.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
25. RCW
9.95.124 and 1983 c 196 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

At
all on‑site parole revocation hearings the probation and parole officers
of the department of corrections, having made the allegations of the violations
of the conditions of parole, may be represented by the attorney general. The
attorney general may make independent recommendations to the board about
whether the violations constitute sufficient cause for the revocation of the
parole and the return of the parolee to a state correctional institution for
convicted felons. The hearings shall be open to the public unless the board
for specifically stated reasons closes the hearing in whole or in part. The
hearings shall be recorded either manually or by a mechanical recording
device. An alleged parole violator may be requested to testify and any such
testimony shall not be used against him in any criminal prosecution. The board
((of prison terms and paroles)) shall adopt rules governing the formal
and informal procedures authorized by this chapter and make rules of practice
before the board in on‑site parole revocation hearings, together with
forms and instructions.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
26. RCW
9.95.150 and 1955 c 133 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board ((of prison terms and paroles)) shall make all necessary rules and
regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter not inconsistent
therewith, and may provide the forms of all documents necessary therefor.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
27. RCW
9.95.160 and 1955 c 133 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall not limit or circumscribe the powers of the governor to commute
the sentence of, or grant a pardon to, any convicted person, and the governor
may cancel or revoke the parole granted to any convicted person by the board ((of
prison terms and paroles)). The written order of the governor canceling or
revoking such parole shall have the same force and effect and be executed in
like manner as an order of the board ((of prison terms and paroles)).

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
28. RCW
9.95.170 and 1981 c 136 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

To
assist it in fixing the duration of a convicted person's term of confinement,
and in fixing the condition for release from custody on parole, it shall not
only be the duty of the board ((of prison terms and paroles)) to
thoroughly inform itself as to the facts of such convicted person's crime but
also to inform itself as thoroughly as possible as to such convict as a
personality. The department of corrections and the institutions under its
control shall make available to the board ((of prison terms and paroles))
on request its case investigations, any file or other record, in order to
assist the board in developing information for carrying out the purpose of this
section.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
29. RCW
9.95.260 and 1981 c 136 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

((It
shall be the duty of)) The board ((of prison terms and paroles))
shall, when requested by the governor, ((to)) pass on the
representations made in support of applications for pardons for convicted
persons and ((to)) make recommendations thereon to the governor.

It
will be the duty of the secretary of corrections to exercise supervision over
such convicted persons as have been conditionally pardoned by the governor, to
the end that such persons shall faithfully comply with the conditions of such
pardons. The board ((of prison terms and paroles)) shall also pass on
any representations made in support of applications for restoration of civil
rights of convicted persons, and make recommendations to the governor. The
department of corrections shall prepare materials and make investigations
requested by the board ((of prison terms and paroles)) in order to
assist the board in passing on the representations made in support of
applications for pardon or for the restoration of civil rights.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
30. RCW
9.95.265 and 1977 c 75 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board ((of prison terms and paroles)) shall transmit to the governor and
to the legislature, as often as the governor may require it, a report of its
work, in which shall be given such information as may be relevant.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
31. RCW
9.95.280 and 1955 c 183 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board ((of prison terms and paroles is hereby authorized and empowered to))
may deputize any person (regularly employed by another state) to act as
an officer and agent of this state in effecting the return of any person who
has violated the terms and conditions of parole or probation as granted by this
state. In any matter relating to the return of such a person, any agent so
deputized shall have all the powers of a police officer of this state.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
32. RCW
9.95.300 and 1955 c 183 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board ((of prison terms and paroles is hereby authorized to)) may
enter into contracts with similar officials of any other state or states for
the purpose of sharing an equitable portion of the cost of effecting the return
of any person who has violated the terms and conditions of parole or probation
as granted by this state.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

Sec.
33. RCW
9.98.010 and 1959 c 56 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a person has entered upon a term of imprisonment in a penal or
correctional institution of this state, and whenever during the continuance of
the term of imprisonment there is pending in this state any untried indictment,
information, or complaint against the prisoner, he shall be brought to
trial within one hundred twenty days after he shall have caused to be delivered
to the prosecuting attorney and the superior court of the county in which the
indictment, information, or complaint is pending written notice of the
place of his imprisonment and his request for a final disposition to be made of
the indictment, information, or complaint: PROVIDED, That for good
cause shown in open court, the prisoner or his counsel shall have the right to
be present, the court having jurisdiction of the matter may grant any necessary
or reasonable continuance. The request of the prisoner shall be accompanied by
a certificate of the superintendent having custody of the prisoner, stating the
term of commitment under which the prisoner is being held, the time already
served, the time remaining to be served on the sentence, the amount of good
time earned, the time of parole eligibility of the prisoner, and any decisions
of the indeterminate sentence review board ((of prison terms and
paroles)) relating to the prisoner.

(2)
The written notice and request for final disposition referred to in subsection
(1) hereof shall be given or sent by the prisoner to the superintendent having
custody of him, who shall promptly forward it together with the certificate to
the appropriate prosecuting attorney and superior court by ((registered))
certified mail, return receipt requested.

(3)
The superintendent having custody of the prisoner shall promptly inform him in
writing of the source and contents of any untried indictment, information,
or complaint against him concerning which the superintendent has knowledge and
of his right to make a request for final disposition thereof.

(4)
Escape from custody by the prisoner subsequent to his execution of the request
for final disposition referred to in subsection (1) hereof shall void the
request.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
"board of prison terms and paroles" was redesignated the
"indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224, effective July
1, 1986.

RCW
1.12.060 provides that whenever the use of registered mail is authorized,
certified mail may be used instead.

Sec.
34. RCW
9A.44.060 and 1979 ex.s. c 244 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of rape in the third degree when, under circumstances not
constituting rape in the first or second degrees, such person engages in sexual
intercourse with another person, not married to the perpetrator:

(a)
Where the victim did not consent as defined in RCW 9A.44.010(((6))) (7),
to sexual intercourse with the perpetrator and such lack of consent was clearly
expressed by the victim's words or conduct, or

(b)
Where there is threat of substantial unlawful harm to property rights of the
victim.

(2)
Rape in the third degree is a class C felony.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
reference to subsection (6) of RCW 9A.44.010 is erroneous. As a result of the
amendment by 1988 c 146 s 3, "consent" is defined in subsection (7)
of that section.

Sec.
35. RCW
9A.46.110 and 1994 c 271 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person commits the crime of stalking if, without lawful authority and under
circumstances not amounting to a felony attempt of another crime:

(a)
He or she intentionally and repeatedly harasses or repeatedly follows another
person; and

(b)
The person being harassed or followed is placed in fear that the stalker
intends to injure the person, another person, or property of the person or of
another person. The feeling of fear must be one that a reasonable person in
the same situation would experience under all the circumstances; and

(c)
The stalker either:

(i)
Intends to frighten, intimidate, or harass the person; or

(ii)
Knows or reasonably should know that the person is afraid, intimidated, or
harassed even if the stalker did not intend to place the person in fear or
intimidate or harass the person.

(2)(a)
It is not a defense to the crime of stalking under subsection (1)(c)(i) of this
section that the stalker was not given actual notice that the person did not
want the stalker to contact or follow the person; and

(b)
It is not a defense to the crime of stalking under subsection (1)(c)(ii) of
this section that the stalker did not intend to frighten, intimidate, or harass
the person.

(3)
It shall be a defense to the crime of stalking that the defendant is a licensed
private ((detective)) investigator acting within the capacity of
his or her license as provided by chapter 18.165 RCW.

(4)
Attempts to contact or follow the person after being given actual notice that
the person does not want to be contacted or followed constitutes prima facie
evidence that the stalker intends to intimidate or harass the person.

(5)
A person who stalks another person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor except that
the person is guilty of a class C felony if any of the following applies: (a)
The stalker has previously been convicted in this state or any other state of
any crime of harassment, as defined in RCW 9A.46.060, of the same victim or
members of the victim's family or household or any person specifically named in
a protective order; (b) the stalking violates any protective order protecting
the person being stalked; (c) the stalker has previously been convicted of a
gross misdemeanor or felony stalking offense under this section for stalking
another person; (d) the stalker was armed with a deadly weapon, as defined in
RCW 9.94A.125, while stalking the person; (e) the stalker's victim is or was a
law enforcement officer, judge, juror, attorney, victim advocate, legislator,
or community correction's officer, and the stalker stalked the victim to
retaliate against the victim for an act the victim performed during the course
of official duties or to influence the victim's performance of official duties;
or (f) the stalker's victim is a current, former, or prospective witness in an
adjudicative proceeding, and the stalker stalked the victim to retaliate
against the victim as a result of the victim's testimony or potential
testimony.

(6)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Follows" means deliberately maintaining visual or physical proximity
to a specific person over a period of time. A finding that the alleged stalker
repeatedly and deliberately appears at the person's home, school, place of
employment, business, or any other location to maintain visual or physical
proximity to the person is sufficient to find that the alleged stalker follows
the person. It is not necessary to establish that the alleged stalker follows
the person while in transit from one location to another.

(b)
"Harasses" means unlawful harassment as defined in RCW 10.14.020.

(c)
"Protective order" means any temporary or permanent court order
prohibiting or limiting violence against, harassment of, contact or
communication with, or physical proximity to another person.

(d)
"Repeatedly" means on two or more separate occasions.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

"Private detective" redesignated "private
investigator" by 1995 c 277.

Sec.
36. RCW
9A.56.010 and 1998 c 236 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following definitions are applicable in this chapter unless the context
otherwise requires:

(1)
"Access device" means any card, plate, code, account number, or
other means of account access that can be used alone or in conjunction with
another access device to obtain money, goods, services, or anything else of
value, or that can be used to initiate a transfer of funds, other than a
transfer originated solely by paper instrument;

(2)
"Appropriate lost or misdelivered property or services" means
obtaining or exerting control over the property or services of another which
the actor knows to have been lost or mislaid, or to have been delivered under a
mistake as to identity of the recipient or as to the nature or amount of the
property;

(((2)))
(3) "Beverage crate" means a plastic or metal box-like container
used by a manufacturer or distributor in the transportation or distribution of
individually packaged beverages to retail outlets, and affixed with language
stating "property of . . . . .," "owned by
. . . . .," or other markings or words identifying
ownership;

(4)
"By color or aid of deception" means that the deception operated to
bring about the obtaining of the property or services; it is not necessary that
deception be the sole means of obtaining the property or services;

(((3)
"Access device" means any card, plate, code, account number, or other
means of account access that can be used alone or in conjunction with another
access device to obtain money, goods, services, or anything else of value, or
that can be used to initiate a transfer of funds, other than a transfer
originated solely by paper instrument;

(4))) (5)
"Deception" occurs when an actor knowingly:

(a)
Creates or confirms another's false impression which the actor knows to be
false; or

(b)
Fails to correct another's impression which the actor previously has created or
confirmed; or

(c)
Prevents another from acquiring information material to the disposition of the
property involved; or

(d)
Transfers or encumbers property without disclosing a lien, adverse claim, or
other legal impediment to the enjoyment of the property, whether that
impediment is or is not valid, or is or is not a matter of official record; or

(e)
Promises performance which the actor does not intend to perform or knows will
not be performed.

(((5)))
(6) "Deprive" in addition to its common meaning means to make
unauthorized use or an unauthorized copy of records, information, data, trade
secrets, or computer programs;

(((6)))
(7) "Merchandise pallet" means a wood or plastic carrier designed
and manufactured as an item on which products can be placed before or during
transport to retail outlets, manufacturers, or contractors, and affixed with
language stating "property of . . .," "owned by . . .,"
or other markings or words identifying ownership;

(8)
"Obtain control over" in addition to its common meaning, means:

(a)
In relation to property, to bring about a transfer or purported transfer to the
obtainer or another of a legally recognized interest in the property; or

(b)
In relation to labor or service, to secure performance thereof for the benefits
of the obtainer or another;

(((7)
"Wrongfully obtains" or "exerts unauthorized control"
means:

(a)
To take the property or services of another;

(b)
Having any property or services in one's possession, custody or control as
bailee, factor, lessee, pledgee, renter, servant, attorney, agent, employee,
trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, or officer of any person, estate,
association, or corporation, or as a public officer, or person authorized by
agreement or competent authority to take or hold such possession, custody, or
control, to secrete, withhold, or appropriate the same to his or her own use or
to the use of any person other than the true owner or person entitled thereto;
or

(c)
Having any property or services in one's possession, custody, or control as
partner, to secrete, withhold, or appropriate the same to his or her use or to
the use of any person other than the true owner or person entitled thereto,
where such use is unauthorized by the partnership agreement;

(8)
"Merchandise pallet" means a wood or plastic carrier designed and
manufactured as an item on which products can be placed prior to or during
transport to retail outlets, manufacturers, or contractors, and affixed with
language stating "property of . . .," "owned
by . . .," or other markings or words identifying
ownership;

(9)
"Beverage crate" means a plastic or metal box-like container used by
a manufacturer or distributor in the transportation or distribution of
individually packaged beverages to retail outlets, and affixed with language
stating "property of . . . . .," "owned by
. . . . .," or other markings or words identifying
ownership;

(10))) (9)
"Owner" means a person, other than the actor, who has possession of
or any other interest in the property or services involved, and without whose
consent the actor has no authority to exert control over the property or
services;

(10)
"Parking area" means a parking lot or other property provided by retailers
for use by a customer for parking an automobile or other vehicle;

(11)
"Receive" includes, but is not limited to, acquiring title,
possession, control, or a security interest, or any other interest in the
property;

(12)
"Services" includes, but is not limited to, labor, professional
services, transportation services, electronic computer services, the supplying
of hotel accommodations, restaurant services, entertainment, the supplying of
equipment for use, and the supplying of commodities of a public utility nature
such as gas, electricity, steam, and water;

(13)
"Shopping cart" means a basket mounted on wheels or similar
container generally used in a retail establishment by a customer for the
purpose of transporting goods of any kind;

(14)
"Stolen" means obtained by theft, robbery, or extortion;

(((14)))
(15) "Subscription television service" means cable or
encrypted video and related audio and data services intended for viewing on a
home television by authorized members of the public only, who have agreed to
pay a fee for the service. Subscription services include but are not limited
to those video services presently delivered by coaxial cable, fiber optic
cable, terrestrial microwave, television broadcast, and satellite transmission;

(((15)))
(16) "Telecommunication device" means (a) any type of
instrument, device, machine, or equipment that is capable of transmitting or
receiving telephonic or electronic communications; or (b) any part of such an
instrument, device, machine, or equipment, or any computer circuit, computer
chip, electronic mechanism, or other component, that is capable of facilitating
the transmission or reception of telephonic or electronic communications;

(((16)))
(17) "Telecommunication service" includes any service other
than subscription television service provided for a charge or compensation to
facilitate the transmission, transfer, or reception of a telephonic
communication or an electronic communication;

(((17)))
(18) Value. (a) "Value" means the market value of the
property or services at the time and in the approximate area of the criminal
act.

(b)
Whether or not they have been issued or delivered, written instruments, except
those having a readily ascertained market value, shall be evaluated as follows:

(i)
The value of an instrument constituting an evidence of debt, such as a check,
draft, or promissory note, shall be deemed the amount due or collectible
thereon or thereby, that figure ordinarily being the face amount of the
indebtedness less any portion thereof which has been satisfied;

(ii)
The value of a ticket or equivalent instrument which evidences a right to
receive transportation, entertainment, or other service shall be deemed the
price stated thereon, if any; and if no price is stated thereon, the value
shall be deemed the price of such ticket or equivalent instrument which the
issuer charged the general public;

(iii)
The value of any other instrument that creates, releases, discharges, or
otherwise affects any valuable legal right, privilege, or obligation shall be
deemed the greatest amount of economic loss which the owner of the instrument
might reasonably suffer by virtue of the loss of the instrument.

(c)
Whenever any series of transactions which constitute theft, would, when
considered separately, constitute theft in the third degree because of value,
and said series of transactions are a part of a common scheme or plan, then the
transactions may be aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of all
said transactions shall be the value considered in determining the degree of
theft involved.

(d)
Whenever any person is charged with possessing stolen property and such person
has unlawfully in his possession at the same time the stolen property of more
than one person, then the stolen property possessed may be aggregated in one
count and the sum of the value of all said stolen property shall be the value
considered in determining the degree of theft involved.

(e)
Property or services having value that cannot be ascertained pursuant to the
standards set forth above shall be deemed to be of a value not exceeding two
hundred and fifty dollars;

(((18)
"Shopping cart" means a basket mounted on wheels or similar container
generally used in a retail establishment by a customer for the purpose of
transporting goods of any kind;

(19)
"Parking area" means a parking lot or other property provided by
retailers for use by a customer for parking an automobile or other vehicle.))

(19)
"Wrongfully obtains" or "exerts unauthorized control"
means:

(a)
To take the property or services of another;

(b)
Having any property or services in one's possession, custody or control as
bailee, factor, lessee, pledgee, renter, servant, attorney, agent, employee,
trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, or officer of any person, estate,
association, or corporation, or as a public officer, or person authorized by
agreement or competent authority to take or hold such possession, custody, or
control, to secrete, withhold, or appropriate the same to his or her own use or
to the use of any person other than the true owner or person entitled thereto;
or

(c)
Having any property or services in one's possession, custody, or control as
partner, to secrete, withhold, or appropriate the same to his or her use or to
the use of any person other than the true owner or person entitled thereto,
where the use is unauthorized by the partnership agreement.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

Arranges
the definitions in alphabetical order to facilitate their future usage.

Sec.
37. RCW
9A.56.110 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 4 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

"Extortion"
means knowingly to obtain or attempt to obtain by threat property or services
of the owner, ((as defined in RCW 9A.56.010(8))) and specifically
includes sexual favors.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
reference to the definition of "owner" is outdated and unnecessary,
since the definitions in RCW 9A.56.110 apply throughout chapter 9A.56 RCW.

Sec.
38. RCW
9A.60.010 and 1987 c 140 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following definitions and the definitions of RCW 9A.56.010 are applicable in
this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)
"Written instrument" means: (a) Any paper, document, or other
instrument containing written or printed matter or its equivalent; or (b) any
access device, ((as defined in RCW 9A.56.010(3),)) token, stamp, seal,
badge, trademark, or other evidence or symbol of value, right, privilege, or
identification;

(2)
"Complete written instrument" means one which is fully drawn with
respect to every essential feature thereof;

(3)
"Incomplete written instrument" means one which contains some matter
by way of content or authentication but which requires additional matter in
order to render it a complete written instrument;

(4)
To "falsely make" a written instrument means to make or draw a
complete or incomplete written instrument which purports to be authentic, but
which is not authentic either because the ostensible maker is fictitious or
because, if real, he did not authorize the making or drawing thereof;

(5)
To "falsely complete" a written instrument means to transform an
incomplete written instrument into a complete one by adding or inserting
matter, without the authority of anyone entitled to grant it;

(6)
To "falsely alter" a written instrument means to change, without
authorization by anyone entitled to grant it, a written instrument, whether
complete or incomplete, by means of erasure, obliteration, deletion, insertion
of new matter, transposition of matter, or in any other manner;

(7)
"Forged instrument" means a written instrument which has been falsely
made, completed, or altered.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
reference to the definition of "access device" is outdated and
unnecessary.

Sec.
39. RCW
9A.64.020 and 1985 c 53 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of incest in the first degree if he engages in sexual
intercourse with a person whom he knows to be related to him, either
legitimately or illegitimately, as an ancestor, descendant, brother, or sister
of either the whole or the half blood.

(2)
A person is guilty of incest in the second degree if he engages in sexual
contact with a person whom he knows to be related to him, either legitimately
or illegitimately, as an ancestor, descendant, brother, or sister of either the
whole or the half blood.

(3)
As used in this section, "descendant" includes stepchildren and
adopted children under eighteen years of age.

(4)
As used in this section, "sexual contact" has the same meaning as in
RCW ((9A.44.100(2))) 9A.44.010.

(5)
As used in this section, "sexual intercourse" has the same meaning as
in RCW 9A.44.010(((1))).

(6)
Incest in the first degree is a class B felony.

(7)
Incest in the second degree is a class C felony.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

Corrects
outdated definition reference; removes unnecessary subsection reference.

Sec.
40. RCW
9A.82.010 and 1995 c 285 s 34 and 1995 c 92 s 5 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Unless
the context requires the contrary, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)(a)
"Beneficial interest" means:

(i)
The interest of a person as a beneficiary under a trust established under Title
11 RCW in which the trustee for the trust holds legal or record title to real
property;

(ii)
The interest of a person as a beneficiary under any other trust arrangement
under which a trustee holds legal or record title to real property for the
benefit of the beneficiary; or

(iii)
The interest of a person under any other form of express fiduciary arrangement
under which one person holds legal or record title to real property for the
benefit of the other person.

(b)
"Beneficial interest" does not include the interest of a stockholder
in a corporation or the interest of a partner in a general partnership or
limited partnership.

(c)
A beneficial interest is considered to be located where the real property owned
by the trustee is located.

(2)
"Control" means the possession of a sufficient interest to permit
substantial direction over the affairs of an enterprise.

(3)
"Creditor" means a person making an extension of credit or a person
claiming by, under, or through a person making an extension of credit.

(((2)))
(4) "Criminal profiteering" means any act, including any
anticipatory or completed offense, committed for financial gain, that is
chargeable or indictable under the laws of the state in which the act occurred
and, if the act occurred in a state other than this state, would be chargeable
or indictable under the laws of this state had the act occurred in this state
and punishable as a felony and by imprisonment for more than one year,
regardless of whether the act is charged or indicted, as any of the following:

(a)
Murder, as defined in RCW 9A.32.030 and 9A.32.050;

(b)
Robbery, as defined in RCW 9A.56.200 and 9A.56.210;

(c)
Kidnapping, as defined in RCW 9A.40.020 and 9A.40.030;

(d)
Forgery, as defined in RCW 9A.60.020 and 9A.60.030;

(e)
Theft, as defined in RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, 9A.56.060, and 9A.56.080;

(f)
Unlawful sale of subscription television services, as defined in RCW 9A.56.230;

(g)
Theft of telecommunication services or unlawful manufacture of a
telecommunication device, as defined in RCW 9A.56.262 and 9A.56.264;

(h)
Child selling or child buying, as defined in RCW 9A.64.030;

(i)
Bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.010, 9A.68.020, 9A.68.040, and 9A.68.050;

(j)
Gambling, as defined in RCW 9.46.220 and 9.46.215 and 9.46.217;

(k)
Extortion, as defined in RCW 9A.56.120 and 9A.56.130;

(l)
Extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.020;

(m)
Advancing money for use in an extortionate extension of credit, as defined in
RCW 9A.82.030;

(n)
Collection of an extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.040;

(o)
Collection of an unlawful debt, as defined in RCW 9A.82.045;

(p)
Delivery or manufacture of controlled substances or possession with intent to
deliver or manufacture controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(q)
Trafficking in stolen property, as defined in RCW 9A.82.050;

(r)
Leading organized crime, as defined in RCW 9A.82.060;

(s)
Money laundering, as defined in RCW 9A.83.020;

(t)
Obstructing criminal investigations or prosecutions in violation of RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100, 9A.72.110, 9A.72.120, 9A.72.130, 9A.76.070, or 9A.76.180;

(u)
Fraud in the purchase or sale of securities, as defined in RCW 21.20.010;

(v)
Promoting pornography, as defined in RCW 9.68.140;

(w)
Sexual exploitation of children, as defined in RCW 9.68A.040, 9.68A.050, and
9.68A.060;

(x)
Promoting prostitution, as defined in RCW 9A.88.070 and 9A.88.080;

(y)
Arson, as defined in RCW 9A.48.020 and 9A.48.030;

(z)
Assault, as defined in RCW 9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021;

(aa)
Assault of a child, as defined in RCW 9A.36.120 and 9A.36.130;

(bb)
A pattern of equity skimming, as defined in RCW 61.34.020;

(cc)
Commercial telephone solicitation in violation of RCW 19.158.040(1);

(dd)
Trafficking in insurance claims, as defined in RCW 48.30A.015;

(ee)
Unlawful practice of law, as defined in RCW 2.48.180;

(ff)
Commercial bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.060;

(gg)
Health care false claims, as defined in RCW 48.80.030; or

(hh)
Unlicensed practice of a profession or business, as defined in RCW
18.130.190(7).

(5)
"Dealer in property" means a person who buys and sells property as a
business.

(6)
"Debtor" means a person to whom an extension of credit is made or a
person who guarantees the repayment of an extension of credit or in any manner
undertakes to indemnify the creditor against loss resulting from the failure of
a person to whom an extension is made to repay the same.

(((3)))
(7) "Documentary material" means any book, paper, document,
writing, drawing, graph, chart, photograph, phonograph record, magnetic tape,
computer printout, other data compilation from which information can be
obtained or from which information can be translated into usable form, or other
tangible item.

(8)
"Enterprise" includes any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, business trust, or other profit or nonprofit legal
entity, and includes any union, association, or group of individuals associated
in fact although not a legal entity, and both illicit and licit enterprises and
governmental and nongovernmental entities.

(9)
"Extortionate extension of credit" means an extension of credit with
respect to which it is the understanding of the creditor and the debtor at the
time the extension is made that delay in making repayment or failure to make
repayment could result in the use of violence or other criminal means to cause
harm to the person, reputation, or property of any person.

(((4)))
(10) "Extortionate means" means the use, or an express or
implicit threat of use, of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to
the person, reputation, or property of any person.

(((5)))
(11) "Financial institution" means any bank, trust company,
savings and loan association, savings bank, mutual savings bank, credit union,
or loan company under the jurisdiction of the state or an agency of the United
States.

(12)
"Pattern of criminal profiteering activity" means engaging in at
least three acts of criminal profiteering, one of which occurred after July 1,
1985, and the last of which occurred within five years, excluding any period of
imprisonment, after the commission of the earliest act of criminal
profiteering. In order to constitute a pattern, the three acts must have the
same or similar intent, results, accomplices, principals, victims, or methods
of commission, or be otherwise interrelated by distinguishing characteristics
including a nexus to the same enterprise, and must not be isolated events.
However, in any civil proceedings brought pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 by any
person other than the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney in which
one or more acts of fraud in the purchase or sale of securities are asserted as
acts of criminal profiteering activity, it is a condition to civil liability
under RCW 9A.82.100 that the defendant has been convicted in a criminal
proceeding of fraud in the purchase or sale of securities under RCW 21.20.400
or under the laws of another state or of the United States requiring the same
elements of proof, but such conviction need not relate to any act or acts
asserted as acts of criminal profiteering activity in such civil action under
RCW 9A.82.100.

(13)
"Real property" means any real property or interest in real property,
including but not limited to a land sale contract, lease, or mortgage of real
property.

(14)
"Records" means any book, paper, writing, record, computer program,
or other material.

(15)
"Repayment of an extension of credit" means the repayment,
satisfaction, or discharge in whole or in part of a debt or claim, acknowledged
or disputed, valid or invalid, resulting from or in connection with that
extension of credit.

(16)
"Stolen property" means property that has been obtained by theft,
robbery, or extortion.

(17)
"To collect an extension of credit" means to induce in any way a
person to make repayment thereof.

(((6)))
(18) "To extend credit" means to make or renew a loan or to
enter into an agreement, tacit or express, whereby the repayment or
satisfaction of a debt or claim, whether acknowledged or disputed, valid or
invalid, and however arising, may or shall be deferred.

(((7)
"Repayment of an extension of credit" means the repayment,
satisfaction, or discharge in whole or in part of a debt or claim, acknowledged
or disputed, valid or invalid, resulting from or in connection with that
extension of credit.

(8)
"Dealer in property" means a person who buys and sells property as a
business.

(9)
"Stolen property" means property that has been obtained by theft,
robbery, or extortion.

(10))) (19)
"Traffic" means to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise
dispose of stolen property to another person, or to buy, receive, possess, or
obtain control of stolen property, with intent to sell, transfer, distribute,
dispense, or otherwise dispose of the property to another person.

(((11)
"Control" means the possession of a sufficient interest to permit
substantial direction over the affairs of an enterprise.

(12)
"Enterprise" includes any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, business trust, or other profit or nonprofit legal
entity, and includes any union, association, or group of individuals associated
in fact although not a legal entity, and both illicit and licit enterprises and
governmental and nongovernmental entities.

(13)
"Financial institution" means any bank, trust company, savings and
loan association, savings bank, mutual savings bank, credit union, or loan
company under the jurisdiction of the state or an agency of the United States.

(14)
"Criminal profiteering" means any act, including any anticipatory or
completed offense, committed for financial gain, that is chargeable or
indictable under the laws of the state in which the act occurred and, if the
act occurred in a state other than this state, would be chargeable or
indictable under the laws of this state had the act occurred in this state and
punishable as a felony and by imprisonment for more than one year, regardless
of whether the act is charged or indicted, as any of the following:

(a)
Murder, as defined in RCW 9A.32.030 and 9A.32.050;

(b)
Robbery, as defined in RCW 9A.56.200 and 9A.56.210;

(c)
Kidnapping, as defined in RCW 9A.40.020 and 9A.40.030;

(d)
Forgery, as defined in RCW 9A.60.020 and 9A.60.030;

(e)
Theft, as defined in RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, 9A.56.060, and 9A.56.080;

(f)
Unlawful sale of subscription television services, as defined in RCW 9A.56.230;

(g)
Theft of telecommunication services or unlawful manufacture of a
telecommunication device, as defined in RCW 9A.56.262 and 9A.56.264;

(h)
Child selling or child buying, as defined in RCW 9A.64.030;

(i)
Bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.010, 9A.68.020, 9A.68.040, and 9A.68.050;

(j)
Gambling, as defined in RCW 9.46.220 and 9.46.215 and 9.46.217;

(k)
Extortion, as defined in RCW 9A.56.120 and 9A.56.130;

(l)
Extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.020;

(m)
Advancing money for use in an extortionate extension of credit, as defined in
RCW 9A.82.030;

(n)
Collection of an extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.040;

(o)
Collection of an unlawful debt, as defined in RCW 9A.82.045;

(p)
Delivery or manufacture of controlled substances or possession with intent to
deliver or manufacture controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(q)
Trafficking in stolen property, as defined in RCW 9A.82.050;

(r)
Leading organized crime, as defined in RCW 9A.82.060;

(s)
Money laundering, as defined in RCW 9A.83.020;

(t)
Obstructing criminal investigations or prosecutions in violation of RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100, 9A.72.110, 9A.72.120, 9A.72.130, 9A.76.070, or 9A.76.180;

(u)
Fraud in the purchase or sale of securities, as defined in RCW 21.20.010;

(v)
Promoting pornography, as defined in RCW 9.68.140;

(w)
Sexual exploitation of children, as defined in RCW 9.68A.040, 9.68A.050, and
9.68A.060;

(x)
Promoting prostitution, as defined in RCW 9A.88.070 and 9A.88.080;

(y)
Arson, as defined in RCW 9A.48.020 and 9A.48.030;

(z)
Assault, as defined in RCW 9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021;

(aa)
Assault of a child, as defined in RCW 9A.36.120 and 9A.36.130;

(bb)
A pattern of equity skimming, as defined in RCW 61.34.020;

(cc)
Commercial telephone solicitation in violation of RCW 19.158.040(1);

(dd)
Trafficking in insurance claims, as defined in RCW 48.30A.015;

(ee)
Unlawful practice of law, as defined in RCW 2.48.180;

(ff)
Commercial bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.060;

(gg)
Health care false claims, as defined in RCW 48.80.030; or

(hh)
Unlicensed practice of a profession or business, as defined in RCW
18.130.190(7).

(15)
"Pattern of criminal profiteering activity" means engaging in at
least three acts of criminal profiteering, one of which occurred after July 1,
1985, and the last of which occurred within five years, excluding any period of
imprisonment, after the commission of the earliest act of criminal
profiteering. In order to constitute a pattern, the three acts must have the
same or similar intent, results, accomplices, principals, victims, or methods
of commission, or be otherwise interrelated by distinguishing characteristics
including a nexus to the same enterprise, and must not be isolated events.
However, in any civil proceedings brought pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 by any
person other than the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney in which
one or more acts of fraud in the purchase or sale of securities are asserted as
acts of criminal profiteering activity, it is a condition to civil liability
under RCW 9A.82.100 that the defendant has been convicted in a criminal
proceeding of fraud in the purchase or sale of securities under RCW 21.20.400
or under the laws of another state or of the United States requiring the same
elements of proof, but such conviction need not relate to any act or acts
asserted as acts of criminal profiteering activity in such civil action under
RCW 9A.82.100.

(16)
"Records" means any book, paper, writing, record, computer program,
or other material.

(17)
"Documentary material" means any book, paper, document, writing,
drawing, graph, chart, photograph, phonograph record, magnetic tape, computer
printout, other data compilation from which information can be obtained or from
which information can be translated into usable form, or other tangible item.

(18))) (20)(a)
"Trustee" means:

(i)
A person acting as a trustee under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in
which the trustee holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii)
A person who holds legal or record title to real property in which another
person has a beneficial interest; or

(iii)
A successor trustee to a person who is a trustee under (a)(i) or (ii) of this
subsection.

(b)
"Trustee" does not mean a person appointed or acting as:

(i)
A personal representative under Title 11 RCW;

(ii)
A trustee of any testamentary trust;

(iii)
A trustee of any indenture of trust under which a bond is issued; or

(iv)
A trustee under a deed of trust.

(21)
"Unlawful debt" means any money or other thing of value constituting
principal or interest of a debt that is legally unenforceable in the state in
full or in part because the debt was incurred or contracted:

(a)
In violation of any one of the following:

(i)
Chapter 67.16 RCW relating to horse racing;

(ii)
Chapter 9.46 RCW relating to gambling;

(b)
In a gambling activity in violation of federal law; or

(c)
In connection with the business of lending money or a thing of value at a rate
that is at least twice the permitted rate under the applicable state or federal
law relating to usury.

(((19)(a)
"Beneficial interest" means:

(i)
The interest of a person as a beneficiary under a trust established under Title
11 RCW in which the trustee for the trust holds legal or record title to real
property;

(ii)
The interest of a person as a beneficiary under any other trust arrangement
under which a trustee holds legal or record title to real property for the
benefit of the beneficiary; or

(iii)
The interest of a person under any other form of express fiduciary arrangement
under which one person holds legal or record title to real property for the
benefit of the other person.

(b)
"Beneficial interest" does not include the interest of a stockholder
in a corporation or the interest of a partner in a general partnership or
limited partnership.

(c)
A beneficial interest shall be considered to be located where the real property
owned by the trustee is located.

(20)
"Real property" means any real property or interest in real property,
including but not limited to a land sale contract, lease, or mortgage of real
property.

(21)(a)
"Trustee" means:

(i)
A person acting as a trustee under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in
which the trustee holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii)
A person who holds legal or record title to real property in which another
person has a beneficial interest; or

(iii)
A successor trustee to a person who is a trustee under subsection (21)(a)(i) or
(ii) of this section.

(b)
"Trustee" does not mean a person appointed or acting as:

(i)
A personal representative under Title 11 RCW;

(ii)
A trustee of any testamentary trust;

(iii)
A trustee of any indenture of trust under which a bond is issued; or

(iv)
A trustee under a deed of trust.))

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

Puts
twenty-one definitions in alphabetical order.

Sec.
41. RCW
9A.83.010 and 1992 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Conducts a financial transaction" includes initiating, concluding,
or participating in a financial transaction.

(2)
"Financial institution" means a bank, savings bank, credit union, or
savings and loan institution.

(3)
"Financial transaction" means a purchase, sale, loan, pledge, gift,
transfer, transmission, delivery, trade, deposit, withdrawal, payment, transfer
between accounts, exchange of currency, extension of credit, or any other
acquisition or disposition of property, by whatever means effected.

(4)
"Knows the property is proceeds of specified unlawful activity" means
believing based upon the representation of a law enforcement officer or his or
her agent, or knowing that the property is proceeds from some form, though not
necessarily which form, of specified unlawful activity.

(5)
"Proceeds" means any interest in property directly or indirectly
acquired through or derived from an act or omission, and any fruits of this
interest, in whatever form.

(6)
"Property" means anything of value, whether real or personal,
tangible or intangible.

(7)
"Specified unlawful activity" means an offense committed in this
state that is a class A or B felony under Washington law or that is listed as
"criminal profiteering" in RCW 9A.82.010(((14))), or an
offense committed in any other state that is punishable under the laws of that
state by more than one year in prison, or an offense that is punishable under
federal law by more than one year in prison.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

To
conform to rearrangement of RCW 9A.82.010 in alphabetical order; avoids problem
of future rearrangement.

Sec.
42. RCW
10.05.030 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 244 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
arraigning judge upon consideration of the petition and with the concurrence of
the prosecuting attorney may continue the arraignment and refer such person for
a diagnostic investigation and evaluation to an approved alcoholism treatment
((facility)) program as designated in chapter 70.96A RCW, if the
petition alleges an alcohol problem, an approved drug treatment center as
designated in chapter 71.24 RCW, if the petition alleges a drug problem, or to
an approved mental health center, if the petition alleges a mental problem.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

Chapter 70.96A RCW was amended by 1990 c 151, changing
"treatment facility" to "treatment program."

Sec.
43. RCW
10.05.150 and 1985 c 352 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

A
deferred prosecution program for alcoholism shall be for a two-year period and
shall include, but not be limited to, the following requirements:

(1)
Total abstinence from alcohol and all other nonprescribed mind-altering drugs;

(2)
Participation in an intensive inpatient or intensive outpatient program in a
state-approved alcoholism treatment ((facility)) program;

(3)
Participation in a minimum of two meetings per week of an alcoholism self-help
recovery support group, as determined by the assessing agency, for the duration
of the treatment program;

(4)
Participation in an alcoholism self-help recovery support group, as determined
by the assessing agency, from the date of court approval of the plan to entry
into intensive treatment;

(5)
Not less than weekly approved outpatient counseling, group or individual, for a
minimum of six months following the intensive phase of treatment;

(6)
Not less than monthly outpatient contact, group or individual, for the
remainder of the two-year deferred prosecution period;

(7)
The decision to include the use of prescribed drugs, including disulfiram, as a
condition of treatment shall be reserved to the treating facility and the
petitioner's physician;

(8)
All treatment within the purview of this section shall occur within or be
approved by a state-approved alcoholism treatment ((facility)) program
as described in chapter 70.96A RCW;

(9)
Signature of the petitioner agreeing to the terms and conditions of the
treatment program.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

Chapter 70.96A RCW was amended by 1990 c 151, changing
"treatment facility" to "treatment program."

Sec.
44. RCW
10.05.160 and 1998 c 208 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
prosecutor may appeal an order granting deferred prosecution on any or all of
the following grounds:

(1)
Prior deferred prosecution has been granted to the defendant;

(2)
Failure of the court to obtain proof of insurance or a treatment plan
conforming to the requirements of this chapter;

(3)
Failure of the court to comply with the requirements of RCW 10.05.100;

(4)
Failure of the evaluation facility to provide the information required in RCW
10.05.040 and 10.05.050, if the defendant has been referred to the facility for
treatment. If an appeal on such basis is successful, the trial court may
consider the use of another treatment ((facility)) program.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

Chapter 70.96A RCW was amended by 1990 c 151, changing
"treatment facility" to "treatment program."

Sec.
45. RCW
10.22.010 and 1989 c 411 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

When
a defendant is prosecuted in a criminal action for a misdemeanor, for which the
person injured by the act constituting the offense has a remedy by a civil
action, the offense may be compromised as provided in RCW 10.22.020, except
when it was committed:

(1)
By or upon an officer while in the execution of the duties of his office.

(2)
Riotously;

(3)
With an intent to commit a felony; or

(4)
By one family or household member against another as defined in RCW 10.99.020(((1)))
and was a crime of domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020(((2))).

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

Removes
outdated and unnecessary subsection references.

Sec.
46. RCW
10.66.050 and 1989 c 271 s 218 are each amended to read as follows:

In
granting a temporary off-limits order or a one-year off-limits order, the court
shall have discretion to grant additional relief as the court considers proper
to achieve the purposes of this chapter. The PADT area defined in any
off-limits order must be reasonably related to the area or areas impacted by
the unlawful drug activity as described by the applicant in any civil action
under RCW 10.66.020 (1), (2), or (3). The court in its discretion may allow a
respondent, who is the subject of any order issued under ((section 214 of
this act)) RCW 10.66.020 as part of a civil or criminal proceeding,
to enter an off-limits area or areas for health or employment reasons, subject
to conditions prescribed by the court. Upon request, a certified copy of the
order shall be provided to the applicant by the clerk of the court.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
reference to "section 214 of this act" appears to be erroneous, as
section 214 is a definition section. Section 215, codified as RCW 10.66.020,
relates to the issuance of off-limits orders.

Sec.
47. RCW
10.66.100 and 1989 c 271 s 222 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person who willfully disobeys an off-limits order issued under this chapter
shall be subject to criminal penalties as provided in this chapter and may also
be found in contempt of court and subject to penalties under chapter ((7.20))
7.21 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

Chapter 7.20 RCW was repealed by 1989 c 373 s 28. For
later enactment, see chapter 7.21 RCW.

Sec.
48. RCW
10.73.040 and 1893 c 61 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

In
all criminal actions, except capital cases in which the proof of guilt is clear
or the presumption great, upon an appeal being taken from a judgment of
conviction, the court in which the judgment was rendered, or a judge thereof,
must, by an order entered in the journal or filed with the clerk, fix and
determine the amount of bail to be required of the appellant; and the appellant
shall be committed until a bond to the state of Washington in the sum so fixed
be executed on his behalf by at least two sureties possessing the
qualifications required for sureties on appeal bonds ((by section ten of
this act)), such bond to be conditioned that the appellant shall appear
whenever required, and stand to and abide by the judgment or orders of the appellate
court, and any judgment and order of the superior court that may be rendered or
made in pursuance thereof. If the appellant be already at large on bail, his
sureties shall be liable to the amount of their bond, in the same manner and
upon the same conditions as if they had executed the bond prescribed by this
section; but the court may by order require a new bond in a larger amount or
with new sureties, and may commit the appellant until the order be complied
with.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The
term "section ten of this act," refers to 1893 c 61 s 10, which was
repealed by 1957 c 7 s 10. The requirements for sureties on appeal bonds are
now set by court rule.

Sec.
49. RCW
10.77.010 and 1998 c 297 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"County designated mental health professional" has the same meaning
as provided in RCW 71.05.020.

(2)
A "criminally insane" person means any person who has been acquitted
of a crime charged by reason of insanity, and thereupon found to be a
substantial danger to other persons or to present a substantial likelihood of
committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security unless kept
under further control by the court or other persons or institutions.

(3)
"Department" means the state department of social and health
services.

(4)
"Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized
training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with
persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist or psychologist,
or a social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as
may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary.

(5)
"Developmental disability" means the condition as defined in
RCW 71A.10.020(((2))).

(6)
"Expert or professional person" means:

(a)
A psychiatrist licensed as a physician and surgeon in this state who has, in addition,
completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved
by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and
is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry
and neurology;

(b)
A psychologist licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW; or

(c)
A social worker with a master's or further advanced degree from an accredited
school of social work or a degree deemed equivalent under rules adopted by the
secretary.

(7)
"Furlough" means an authorized leave of absence for a resident of a
state institution operated by the department designated for the custody, care,
and treatment of the criminally insane, consistent with an order of conditional
release from the court under this chapter, without any requirement that the
resident be accompanied by, or be in the custody of, any law enforcement or
institutional staff, while on such unescorted leave.

(8)
"Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel
to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their
levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative
services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The
habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the
public safety presented by the individual being assisted as manifested by prior
charged criminal conduct.

(9)
"History of one or more violent acts" means violent acts committed
during: (a) The ten-year period of time prior to the filing of criminal
charges; plus (b) the amount of time equal to time spent during the ten-year
period in a mental health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal
conviction.

(10)
"Incompetency" means a person lacks the capacity to understand the
nature of the proceedings against him or her or to assist in his or her own
defense as a result of mental disease or defect.

(11)
"Indigent" means any person who is financially unable to obtain
counsel or other necessary expert or professional services without causing
substantial hardship to the person or his or her family.

(12)
"Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a
developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for
an individual with developmental disabilities, which shall state:

(a)
The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior,
and habilitation needs;

(b)
The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of
habilitation;

(c)
The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a
projected timetable for the attainment;

(d)
The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate
and long-range goals;

(e)
The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f)
Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for
public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings,
criteria for proposed eventual discharge from involuntary confinement, and a
projected possible date for discharge from involuntary confinement; and

(g)
The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible
future types of residences.

(13)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services or his or her designee.

(14)
"Treatment" means any currently standardized medical or mental health
procedure including medication.

(15)
"Violent act" means behavior that: (a)(i) Resulted in; (ii) if
completed as intended would have resulted in; or (iii) was threatened to be
carried out by a person who had the intent and opportunity to carry out the
threat and would have resulted in, homicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial
damage to property; or (b) recklessly creates an immediate risk of serious
physical injury to another person.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

RCW
71A.10.020 was amended by 1998 c 216 s 2, changing subsection (2) to subsection
(3). The amendment by this section will obviate the necessity of similar corrections
in the future.

Sec.
50. RCW
10.98.030 and 1984 c 17 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington state patrol identification, child abuse, and criminal
history section as established in RCW 43.43.700 shall be the primary source of
felony conviction histories for filings, plea agreements, and sentencing on
felony cases.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

Reflects
current name. See RCW 43.43.700.

Sec.
51. RCW
10.98.040 and 1985 c 201 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Arrest and fingerprint form" means the reporting form prescribed by
the identification, child abuse, and criminal history section to
initiate compiling arrest and identification information.

(2)
"Chief law enforcement officer" includes the sheriff or director of
public safety of a county, the chief of police of a city or town, and chief
officers of other law enforcement agencies operating within the state.

(3)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(4)
"Disposition" means the conclusion of a criminal proceeding at any
stage it occurs in the criminal justice system. Disposition includes but is
not limited to temporary or permanent outcomes such as charges dropped by
police, charges not filed by the prosecuting attorney, deferred prosecution,
defendant absconded, charges filed by the prosecuting attorney pending court
findings such as not guilty, dismissed, guilty, or guilty‑-case appealed
to higher court.

(5)
"Disposition report" means the reporting form prescribed by the
identification, child abuse, and criminal history section to report the
legal procedures taken after completing an arrest and fingerprint form. The
disposition report shall include but not be limited to the following types of
information:

(a)
The type of disposition;

(b)
The statutory citation for the arrests;

(c)
The sentence structure if the defendant was convicted of a felony;

(d)
The state identification number; and

(e)
Identification information and other information that is prescribed by the
identification, child abuse, and criminal history section.

(6)
"Fingerprints" means the fingerprints taken from arrested or charged
persons under the procedures prescribed by the Washington state patrol
identification, child abuse, and criminal history section.

(7)
"Prosecuting attorney" means the public or private attorney
prosecuting a criminal case.

(8)
"Section" refers to the Washington state patrol section on
identification, child abuse, and criminal history.

(9)
"Sentence structure" means itemizing the components of the felony
sentence. The sentence structure shall include but not be limited to the total
or partial confinement sentenced, and whether the sentence is prison or jail,
community supervision, fines, restitution, or community service.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

Reflects
current name. See RCW 43.43.700.

Sec.
52. RCW
10.98.110 and 1993 c 31 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall maintain records to track felony cases for convicted
felons sentenced either to a term of confinement exceeding one year or ordered
under the supervision of the department and felony cases under the jurisdiction
of the department pursuant to interstate compact agreements.

(2)
Tracking shall begin at the time the department receives a judgment and
sentence form from a prosecuting attorney and shall include the collection and
updating of felons' criminal records from the time of sentencing through
discharge.

(3)
The department of corrections shall collect information for tracking felons
from its offices and from information provided by county clerks, the Washington
state patrol identification, child abuse, and criminal history section,
the office of financial management, and any other public or private agency that
provides services to help individuals complete their felony sentences.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

Reflects
current name. See RCW 43.43.700.

Sec.
53. RCW
10.98.160 and 1987 c 462 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In
the development and modification of the procedures, definitions, and reporting
capabilities of the section, the department, the office of financial
management, and the responsible agencies and persons shall consider the needs
of other criminal justice agencies such as the administrator for the courts,
local law enforcement agencies, jailers, the sentencing guidelines commission,
the indeterminate sentence review board ((of prison terms and paroles)),
the clemency board, prosecuting attorneys, and affected state agencies such as
the office of financial management and legislative committees dealing with
criminal justice issues. An executive committee appointed by the heads of the
department, the Washington state patrol, and the office of financial management
shall review and provide recommendations for development and modification of
the section, the department, and the office of financial management's felony
criminal information systems.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE:

The "board of prison terms and paroles" was
redesignated the "indeterminate sentence review board" by 1986 c 224,
effective July 1, 1986.

---
END ---