BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
72.09.480 and 1998 c 261 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply to this section.

(a)
"Cost of incarceration" means the cost of providing an inmate with
shelter, food, clothing, transportation, supervision, and other services and
supplies as may be necessary for the maintenance and support of the inmate
while in the custody of the department, based on the average per inmate costs
established by the department and the office of financial management.

(b)
"Minimum term of confinement" means the minimum amount of time an
inmate will be confined in the custody of the department, considering the
sentence imposed and adjusted for the total potential earned early release time
available to the inmate.

(2)
When an inmate, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section,
receives any funds in addition to his or her wages or gratuities, the
additional funds shall be subject to the deductions in RCW 72.09.111(1)(a) and
the priorities established in chapter 72.11 RCW.

(3)
The amount deducted from an inmate's funds under subsection (2) of this section
shall not exceed the department's total cost of incarceration for the inmate
incurred during the inmate's minimum or actual term of confinement, whichever
is longer.

(4)
The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to
((funds received)) the first one hundred dollars received each month
by the department on behalf of an offender for payment of ((one))
fee-based education or vocational ((program that is)) programs or
related educational materials that are associated with an inmate's work
program or a placement decision made by the department under RCW 72.09.460 to
prepare an inmate for work upon release. Any funds received by the
department on behalf of an offender's education that are requested by that
offender to be used for purposes other than education or vocational programming
shall be subject to the deductions in subsection (2) of this section.

(5)
The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to
the first one hundred dollars received each month by the department from family
or other outside sources for the payment of expenses for elective, offender
paid health care, as defined by department policy. In order for these
deductions not to apply, the offender must have already received department
approval of a formal request for offender paid health care. The funds for
which deductions shall not apply under this provision can be used only in
payment for the elective, offender paid health care and for related expenses
including, but not limited to, transportation and custody escorting of the
offender. Any funds received by the department on behalf of an offender for
his or her elective, offender paid health care that are requested by that
offender to be used for purposes other than the offender's elective, offender
paid health care shall be subject to the deductions in subsection (2) of this
section.

(6)
When an inmate sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility of release or
parole, or to death under chapter 10.95 RCW, receives any funds in addition to
his or her gratuities, the additional funds shall be subject to: Deductions of
five percent to the public safety and education account for the purpose of crime
victims' compensation and twenty percent to the department to contribute to the
cost of incarceration.

Sec.
2. RCW
72.09.111 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 534 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary shall deduct from the gross wages or gratuities of each inmate
working in correctional industries work programs, taxes and legal financial
obligations. The secretary shall develop a formula for the distribution of
offender wages and gratuities.

(a)
The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from class I gross
wages and from all others earning at least minimum wage:

(i)
Five percent to the public safety and education account for the purpose of
crime victims' compensation;

(ii)
Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account; and

(iii)
Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration.

(b)
The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from class II gross
gratuities:

(i)
Five percent to the public safety and education account for the purpose of
crime victims' compensation;

(ii)
Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account; and

(iii)
Fifteen percent to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration.

(c)
The formula shall include the following minimum deduction from class IV gross
gratuities: Five percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration.

(d)
The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from class III
gratuities: Five percent for the purpose of crime victims' compensation.

Any
person sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility of release or parole
under chapter 10.95 RCW shall be exempt from the requirement under (a)(ii) or
(b)(ii) of this subsection.

The
department personal inmate savings account, together with any accrued interest,
shall only be available to an inmate at the time of his or her release from
confinement, unless the secretary determines that an emergency exists for the
inmate, at which time the funds can be made available to the inmate in an
amount determined by the secretary. The management of classes I, II, and IV
correctional industries may establish an incentive payment for offender workers
based on productivity criteria. This incentive shall be paid separately from
the hourly wage/gratuity rate and shall not be subject to the specified
deduction for cost of incarceration.

In
the event that the offender worker's wages or gratuity is subject to
garnishment for support enforcement, the crime victims' compensation, savings,
and cost of incarceration deductions shall be calculated on the net wages after
taxes, legal financial obligations, and garnishment.

(2)
The department shall explore other methods of recovering a portion of the cost
of the inmate's incarceration and for encouraging participation in work
programs, including development of incentive programs that offer inmates
benefits and amenities paid for only from wages earned while working in a
correctional industries work program.

(3)
The department shall develop the necessary administrative structure to recover
inmates' wages and keep records of the amount inmates pay for the costs of
incarceration and amenities. All funds deducted from inmate wages under
subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of contributions to the cost of
incarceration shall be deposited in a dedicated fund with the department and
shall be used only for the purpose of enhancing and maintaining correctional
industries work programs ((until December 31, 2000, and thereafter all such
funds shall be deposited in the general fund)).

(4)
The expansion of inmate employment in class I and class II correctional
industries shall be implemented according to the following schedule:

(a)
Not later than June 30, 1995, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at
least two hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994;

(b)
Not later than June 30, 1996, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at
least four hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994;

(c)
Not later than June 30, 1997, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at
least six hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994;

(d)
Not later than June 30, 1998, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at
least nine hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994;

(e)
Not later than June 30, 1999, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at
least one thousand two hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or
class II correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on
June 30, 1994;

(f)
Not later than June 30, 2000, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at
least one thousand five hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or
class II correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on
June 30, 1994.

(5) It shall be in the discretion of the secretary to apportion the
inmates between class I and class II depending on available contracts and
resources.

---
END ---