BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 15.76 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that agricultural fairs benefit the state of Washington by
bringing together all sectors of the community in a positive, educational, and
interactive environment. The legislature further finds that agricultural fairs
provide opportunities for youth development by demonstrating life skills
including leadership, responsibility, and decision making and that these
opportunities are of benefit to the community as a whole.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.08.020 and 1998 c 321 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this
state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price.

(2)
There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal
to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected
under this subsection shall be deposited and distributed in the same manner as
motor vehicle excise tax revenue collected under RCW 82.44.020(1).

(3)
There shall be collected a tax on each retail sale of 0.25 percent on the
sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging by a hotel, rooming house,
tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to
use real property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real
property: PROVIDED, That it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real
property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or to enjoy the same. The
tax collected under this subsection shall be credited against the tax otherwise
due from those same taxpayers under subsection (1) of this section. The
revenue collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the fair fund
under chapter 15.76 RCW.

(4)
The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive retail sales of
the same property.

(((4))) (5) The rates provided in this section apply
to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

---
END ---