BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The office of financial management, in consultation with the department of
personnel, shall approve higher education administrators' professional leave
agreements, severance packages, or contract settlements that exceed fifty
percent of the administrator's base salary, unless the monetary amount is
otherwise provided for in the omnibus appropriations act.

(2) This section applies prospectively only and not retroactively.
It applies only to professional leave agreements, contract settlements, or
severance packages that arise on or after the effective date of this section.

---
END ---