BE IT ENACTED BY
THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.100 and 1999 c 274 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Application. The application of a person under the age of eighteen
years for a driver's license or a motorcycle endorsement must be signed by a
parent or guardian with custody of the minor. If the person under the age of
eighteen has no father, mother, or guardian, then the application must be
signed by the minor's employer.

Beginning
January 1, 2000, the minor's father, mother, or guardian must attest in writing
that the minor has completed the supervised driving practice as required under
section 2 of this act. If the minor has no father, mother, or guardian, the
minor's employer must make the attestation.

(2)
Traffic safety education requirement. For a person under the age of
eighteen years to obtain a driver's license he or she must meet the traffic
safety education requirements of this subsection.

(a)
To meet the traffic safety education requirement for a driver's license the
applicant must satisfactorily complete a traffic safety education course as
defined in RCW 28A.220.020. The course must meet the standards established by
the office of the state superintendent of public instruction. The traffic
safety education course may be provided by:

(i)
A recognized secondary school; or

(ii)
A commercial driving enterprise that is annually approved by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

(b)
To meet the traffic safety education requirement for a motorcycle endorsement,
the applicant must successfully complete a motorcycle safety education course
that meets the standards established by the department of licensing.

(c)
The department may waive the traffic safety education requirement for a
driver's license if the applicant demonstrates to the department's satisfaction
that:

(i)
He or she was unable to take or complete a traffic safety education course;

(ii)
A need exists for the applicant to operate a motor vehicle; and

(iii)
He or she has the ability to operate a motor vehicle in such a manner as not to
jeopardize the safety of persons or property.

The
department may adopt rules to implement this subsection (2)(c) in concert with
the supervisor of the traffic safety education section of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

(d)
The department may waive the traffic safety education requirement if the
applicant was licensed to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle outside this
state and provides proof that he or she has had education equivalent to that
required under this subsection.

(3)
Rescission. Until the minor turns eighteen years of age, the parent or
guardian who signed the application may rescind his or her signature and
terminate the driving privilege upon payment of a five-dollar fee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.220 RCW to read as follows:

The
superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the department of
licensing, shall adopt rules that establish a supervised driving practice
requirement that a minor under the age of eighteen must satisfy in order to
qualify for a driver's license. This requirement is in addition to the
behind-the-wheel training required under RCW 28A.220.030 or 46.82.290.

(1)
The rules must prescribe a required number of hours of practice in operating a
motor vehicle. The required number of hours must be no less than fifteen hours
and no more than fifty. The rules may require that the required hours include
nighttime driving.

(2)
In order for practice hours to count towards the requirement, the minor must
hold a valid Washington learner's permit and must be accompanied by a licensed
driver who has at least five years of driving experience and is occupying a
seat beside the driver.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.220.030 and 1979 c 158 s 196 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent of public instruction ((is authorized to)) shall
establish a section of traffic safety education, and through such section
shall: Define a "realistic level of effort" required to provide an
effective traffic safety education course, establish a level of driving
competency required of each student to successfully complete the course, and
ensure that an effective state-wide program is implemented and sustained,
administer, supervise, and develop the traffic safety education program and
shall assist local school districts in the conduct of their traffic safety
education programs. The superintendent shall adopt necessary rules and
regulations governing the operation and scope of the traffic safety education
program; and each school district shall submit a report to the superintendent
on the condition of its traffic safety education program((: PROVIDED, That)).
The superintendent shall monitor the quality of the program and carry out
the purposes of this chapter.

(2)
Effective September 1, 1999, the traffic safety education curriculum
established by the superintendent under subsection (1) of this section must
include a mandatory minimum of five hours of behind-the-wheel training for each
student. The training must include a comprehensive driving skills test and
individual knowledge test that a student must pass in order to receive a
passing grade from a traffic safety education class.

(3)
Effective September 1, 2000, the required curriculum must include a mandatory
minimum of six hours of behind-the-wheel training for each student. In
addition to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, the training
must include one training session for each student where the student drives a
vehicle equipped with a device that simulates the loss of vehicular control
that can occur when a vehicle skids from loss of traction. If a school is
unable to provide training with the device, the six-hour training requirement
is reduced to five and one-half hours. The superintendent may authorize the
use of another training device in lieu of the device described in this section
if the superintendent concludes that the alternative device is as effective.

(4)
The superintendent's curriculum must include a provision that the additional
two hours of behind-the-wheel training required under subsections (2) and (3)
of this section are not required of students who demonstrate to the instructor
of the traffic safety education course that the student possesses the driving
skills necessary to safely operate a motor vehicle upon a highway and:

(a)
Have held a juvenile agricultural driving permit under RCW 46.20.070 before
enrolling in a traffic safety education course; or

(b)
Previously held a driver's license in another state.

(5)
The superintendent shall establish a required minimum number of hours of
continuing traffic safety education for traffic safety education instructors.
The superintendent may phase in the requirement over not more than five years.

(6)
The board of directors of any school district maintaining a secondary school
which includes any of the grades 10 to 12, inclusive, may establish and
maintain a traffic safety education course. If a school district elects to
offer a traffic safety education course and has within its boundaries a private
accredited secondary school which includes any of the grades 10 to 12,
inclusive, at least one class in traffic safety education shall be given at
times other than regular school hours if there is sufficient demand therefor.

(((3)))
(7) The board of directors of a school district, or combination of
school districts, may contract with any drivers' school licensed under the
provisions of chapter 46.82 RCW to teach the laboratory phase of the traffic
safety education course. Instructors provided by any such contracting drivers'
school must be properly qualified teachers of traffic safety education under
the joint qualification requirements adopted by the superintendent of public
instruction and the director of licensing.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.82.290 and 1979 ex.s. c 51 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director ((shall be)) is responsible for the administration
and enforcement of the law pertaining to driver training schools as set forth
in this chapter.

(2)
The director ((is authorized to)) may adopt and enforce such
reasonable rules as may be consistent with and necessary to carry out this
chapter.

(3)
The director shall adopt a driver training curriculum established by the
superintendent of public instruction. The curriculum must include a mandatory
minimum of six hours of behind-the-wheel training and an individual knowledge
test for each student. The six hours of training must include a comprehensive
driving skills test that a student must pass in order to receive a certificate of
completion from a driver training school.

Sec.
5. RCW
28A.220.040 and 1984 c 258 s 331 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each school district shall be reimbursed from funds appropriated for traffic
safety education((: PROVIDED, That)).

(a)
The state superintendent shall determine the per-pupil reimbursement
amount for the traffic safety education course to be funded by the state. Each
school district offering an approved standard traffic safety education course
shall be reimbursed or granted an amount up to the level established by the
superintendent of public instruction as may be appropriated.

(b)
The state superintendent shall only provide per-pupil reimbursements to school
districts where all the traffic educators have satisfied the continuing
education requirement of RCW 28A.220.030(5).

(c)
If a school district is unable to provide the training required by RCW 28A.220.030(3),
the district reimbursement is reduced by the amount necessary to fund one-half
hour of behind-the-wheel training.

(2)
The board of directors of any school district or combination of school
districts may establish a traffic safety education fee, which fee when imposed
shall be required to be paid by any duly enrolled student in any such school
district prior to or while enrolled in a traffic safety education course.
Traffic safety education fees collected by a school district shall be deposited
with the county treasurer to the credit of such school district, to be used to
pay costs of the traffic safety education course.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.20.091 and 1999 c 6 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Application. In order to apply for a driver's license or instruction
permit the applicant must provide his or her:

(a)
Name of record, as established by documentation required under RCW 46.20.035;

(b)
Date of birth, as established by satisfactory evidence of age;

(c)
Sex;

(d)
Washington residence address;

(e)
Description;

(f)
Driving licensing history, including:

(i)
Whether the applicant has ever been licensed as a driver or chauffeur and, if
so, (A) when and by what state or country; (B) whether the license has ever
been suspended or revoked; and (C) the date of and reason for the suspension or
revocation; or

(ii)
Whether the applicant's application to another state or country for a driver's
license has ever been refused and, if so, the date of and reason for the
refusal; ((and))

(g)
Driver training history and, if received, where; and

(h)
Any additional information required by the department.

(2)
Sworn statement. An application for an instruction permit or for an
original driver's license must be made upon a form provided by the department.
The identifying documentation verifying the name of record must be accompanied
by the applicant's written statement that it is valid. The information
provided on the form must be sworn to and signed by the applicant before a
person authorized to administer oaths. An applicant who makes a false
statement on an application for a driver's license or instruction permit is guilty
of false swearing, a gross misdemeanor, under RCW 9A.72.040.

(3)
Driving records from other jurisdictions. If a person previously
licensed in another jurisdiction applies for a Washington driver's license, the
department shall request a copy of the applicant's driver's record from the
other jurisdiction. The driving record from the other jurisdiction becomes a
part of the driver's record in this state.

(4)
Driving records to other jurisdictions. If another jurisdiction
requests a copy of a person's Washington driver's record, the department shall
provide a copy of the record. The department shall forward the record without
charge if the other jurisdiction extends the same privilege to the state of
Washington. Otherwise the department shall charge a reasonable fee for
transmittal of the record.

Sec.
7. RCW
46.20.120 and 1999 c . . . (HB 2259) s 1, 1999 c 199 s 3, and 1999 c
6 s 19 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

An
applicant for a new or renewed driver's license must successfully pass a driver
licensing examination to qualify for a driver's license. The department shall
give examinations at places and times reasonably available to the people of
this state.

(1)
Waiver. The department may waive:

(a)
All or any part of the examination of any person applying for the renewal of a
driver's license unless the department determines that the applicant is not
qualified to hold a driver's license under this title; ((or))

(b)
The actual demonstration of the ability to operate a motor vehicle if the
applicant:

(i)
Surrenders a valid driver's license issued by the person's previous home state;
and

(ii)
Is otherwise qualified to be licensed; or

(c)
The written examination and the actual demonstration of the ability to operate
a motor vehicle for a driver who passed a traffic safety education class
offered by a Washington state school district within one year of the date he or
she applies for a license if the driver earned at least ninety-five percent of
the total points available, as measured by numerical scoring.

(2)
Fee. Each applicant for a new license must pay an examination fee of
seven dollars.

(a)
The examination fee is in addition to the fee charged for issuance of the
license.

(b)
"New license" means a license issued to a driver:

(i)
Who has not been previously licensed in this state; or

(ii)
Whose last previous Washington license has been expired for more than five
years.

(3)
A person whose license expired or will expire on or after January 1, 1998,
while he or she was or is living outside the state may:

(a)
Apply to the department to extend the validity of his or her license for no
more than twelve months. If the person establishes to the department's
satisfaction that he or she is unable to return to Washington before the date
his or her license expires, the department shall extend the person's license.
The department may grant consecutive extensions, but in no event may the
cumulative total of extensions exceed twelve months. An extension granted
under this section does not change the expiration date of the license for
purposes of RCW 46.20.181. The department shall charge a fee of five dollars
for each license extension;

(b)
Apply to the department to renew his or her license by mail. If the person
establishes to the department's satisfaction that he or she is unable to return
to Washington within twelve months of the date that his or her license expires,
the department shall renew the person's license by mail. If a person qualifies
for a mail-in renewal he or she is not required to pass an examination nor
provide an updated photograph. He or she must, however, pay the fee required
by RCW 46.20.181 plus an additional five-dollar mail-in renewal fee. A license
renewed by mail that does not include a photograph of the licensee must be
labeled "not valid for identification purposes."

(4)
If a person's driver's license is extended or renewed under subsection (3) of
this section while he or she is outside the state, he or she must submit to the
examination required under this section within sixty days of returning to this
state. The department will not assess a penalty or examination fee for the
examination.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

If
a novice driver is convicted of or found to have committed one or more of the
traffic offenses listed in subsection (2) or (4) of this section or two or more
of the traffic offenses listed in subsection (3) of this section, his or her
driving privilege is subject to the restrictions detailed in subsection (1) of
this section. For purposes of this section "novice driver" means a
driver who is within two years of the date he or she was licensed to drive.

(1)
The department shall restrict the driving privilege of a novice driver who
commits the violations described in subsection (2), (3), or (4) of this section
as follows:

(a)
The novice driver may only drive unsupervised between the hours of five a.m.
and ten p.m. At all other times the novice driver must be supervised. While
being supervised, the novice driver must be accompanied by a parent, guardian,
or other person twenty-one years of age or older with at least five years of
driving experience. The supervisor must possess a valid driver's license. The
supervisor must be the only other occupant of the front passenger section of
the vehicle.

(b)
The department shall impose the restrictions of this section for one year. The
department shall extend the restrictions for one additional year if the driver
drives a motor vehicle in violation of law while the restrictions are in place.

(c)
In addition to the mandatory restrictions of this subsection (1), a judge may
restrict the number of passengers under the age of twenty-one who a novice
driver under the age of twenty-one may transport while driving with a
restricted license under this section.

(d)
Operating a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions of this section is a
traffic infraction.

(2)
If a novice driver is convicted of one or more of the traffic offenses listed
in this subsection, the department shall restrict his or her license as
described in subsection (1) of this section:

(a)
RCW 46.30.040: False insurance evidence;

(b)
RCW 46.61.015, 46.61.020, or 46.61.021: Failure to respond or comply with
officer;

(c)
RCW 46.61.050 or 46.61.340 through 46.61.385: Failure to stop;

(d)
RCW 46.61.070: Wrong way in reversible lane;

(e)
RCW 46.61.100, 46.61.105, 46.61.110, 46.61.120, 46.61.125, 46.61.130, or
46.61.140: Driving on wrong side of road/failure to stay in lane;

(f)
RCW 46.61.105 or 46.61.120: Illegal overtaking or passing;

(g)
RCW 46.61.135: Wrong way on a one-way street;

(h)
RCW 46.61.145: Following too closely;

(i)
RCW 46.61.150: Improperly crossing median;

(j)
RCW 46.61.180 through 46.61.220: Failure to yield right-of-way;

(k)
RCW 46.61.245 or 46.61.445: Failure to use due care;

(l)
RCW 46.61.260: Driving in safety zone;

(m)
RCW 46.61.370: Passing stopped school bus;

(n)
RCW 46.61.400 or 46.61.440: Driving ten miles or more over the speed limit;

(o)
RCW 46.61.400: Driving too fast for conditions;

(p)
RCW 46.61.519: Open container violation;

(q)
RCW 46.61.5195: Disguising an alcoholic beverage container;

(r)
RCW 46.61.5249 and 46.61.525: Negligent driving;

(s)
RCW 46.61.608: Failure to give motorcycle full use of lane;

(t)
RCW 46.61.385: Failure to stop for school patrol;

(u)
RCW 46.61.660: Carrying persons outside vehicle;

(v)
RCW 46.61.665: Embracing while driving;

(w)
RCW 46.61.675: Permitting illegal vehicle operation; and

(x)
RCW 46.61.685: Unattended child in running vehicle.

(3)
If a novice driver is convicted of two or more of the traffic offenses listed
in this subsection, the department must restrict his or her license as
described in subsection (1) of this section:

(a)
RCW 46.20.017: No license on person;

(b)
RCW 46.29.605: Driving with suspended registration;

(c)
RCW 46.30.020: Driving without liability insurance;

(d)
RCW 46.37.010: Defective equipment;

(e)
RCW 46.37.010: Illegal lights or other equipment;

(f)
RCW 46.37.020: Driving without lights;

(g)
RCW 46.61.015 or 46.61.050: Disobeying road sign other than a stop or yield
sign or signaler or officer;

(h)
RCW 46.61.100: Improper lane change;

(i)
RCW 46.61.100 (3) or (4) or 46.61.425: Impeding traffic;

(j)
RCW 46.61.155: Improper access to limited access highway;

(k)
RCW 46.61.235: Failure to stop for pedestrian;

(l)
RCW 46.61.261, 46.61.428, or 46.61.606: Driving on shoulder or sidewalk;

(m)
RCW 46.61.290 through 46.61.305: Improper or prohibited turn;

(n)
RCW 46.61.295: Improper U-turn;

(o)
RCW 46.61.300: Starting vehicle illegally;

(p)
RCW 46.61.305: Failure to use or improper signal;

(q)
RCW 46.61.400: Speeding less than ten miles over limit;

(r)
RCW 46.61.600: Improperly secured vehicle;

(s)
RCW 46.61.605: Improper backing;

(t)
RCW 46.61.615: Obstructed vision or control;

(u)
RCW 46.61.630: Coasting on downgrade;

(v)
RCW 46.61.635: Following emergency vehicles;

(w)
RCW 46.61.640: Crossing fire hose;

(x)
RCW 46.61.645: Throwing dangerous material on roadway;

(y)
RCW 46.61.655: Improperly secured or covered load;

(z)
RCW 46.61.670: Wheels off roadway;

(aa)
RCW 46.61.680: Lowering vehicle below legal clearance;

(bb)
RCW 46.61.687: Child restraint violation; and

(cc)
RCW 46.61.688: Seat belt violation.

(4)
If a novice driver's driving privilege is withheld under any of the sections
listed in this subsection, his or her license is subject to the restrictions in
subsection (1) of this section if and when the driving privilege is reinstated.

(a)
RCW 46.20.041: Violating driver's license restrictions;

(b)
RCW 46.20.265: Minor in possession of alcohol or drugs;

(c)
RCW 46.20.265: Minor in possession of a firearm;

(d)
RCW 46.20.285: Conviction of a felony involving a motor vehicle;

(e)
RCW 46.20.289: Failure to appear/unpaid traffic ticket;

(f)
RCW 46.20.291: Multiple violations within a specified time period;

(g)
RCW 46.20.3101: Refusal to submit to breath or blood alcohol test;

(h)
RCW 46.20.336 (as recodified by 1999 c 6 s 28): Fraudulent application,
alteration, or display of driver's license;

(i)
RCW 46.20.342: Driving while license is suspended or revoked;

(j)
Chapter 46.29 RCW other than RCW 46.29.605: Violation of financial
responsibility laws;

(k)
RCW 46.52.020: Hit and run, vehicle attended;

(l)
RCW 46.61.024: Eluding police;

(m)
RCW 46.61.500: Reckless driving;

(n)
RCW 46.61.502: Driving under the influence;

(o)
RCW 46.61.504: Physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence;

(p)
RCW 46.61.5055: Violating probation for DUI conviction;

(q)
RCW 46.61.5056: Failure to meet requirements of court-ordered drug or alcohol
treatment program, e.g., failure to submit alcohol report, failure to comply
with treatment program, relapse;

(r)
RCW 46.61.520: Vehicular homicide;

(s)
RCW 46.61.522: Vehicular assault;

(t)
RCW 46.61.527: Reckless endangerment in a construction zone;

(u)
RCW 46.61.530: Racing; and

(v)
Chapter 46.65 RCW: Habitual traffic offender, twenty moving violations in five
years.

(5)
If the driving privilege of a novice driver under the age of eighteen is
restricted under this section, the department shall send a written notification
of the restriction within three days to the person who gave written permission
for the minor to obtain a driver's license under RCW 46.20.100.

Sec.
9. RCW
46.68.041 and 1998 c 212 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall
forward all funds accruing under the provisions of chapter 46.20 RCW together
with a proper identifying, detailed report to the state treasurer who shall
deposit such moneys to the credit of the highway safety fund.

(2)
Sixty-three percent of each fee collected by the department under RCW 46.20.311
(1)(b)(ii), (2)(b)(ii), and (3)(b) shall be deposited in the impaired driving
safety account.

(3)
Five dollars of each fee for an instruction permit collected under RCW
46.20.055 is for traffic safety education funding to implement section 2 of
this act and RCW 28A.220.030 (2) through (5).

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.055 and 1999 c 274 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Driver's instruction permit. The department may issue a driver's
instruction permit with a photograph to an applicant who has successfully
passed all parts of the examination other than the driving test, provided the
information required by RCW 46.20.091, paid a ((five-dollar)) fee of
ten dollars, and meets the following requirements:

(a)
Is at least fifteen and one-half years of age; or

(b)
Is at least fifteen years of age and:

(i)
Has submitted a proper application; and

(ii)
Is enrolled in a traffic safety education program approved and accredited by
the superintendent of public instruction that includes practice driving.

(2)
Nonphoto permit fee. An applicant who meets the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section other than payment of the ((five-dollar))
fee specified in that subsection, may obtain a driver's instruction
permit without a photograph by paying a fee of ((four)) nine
dollars.

(3)
Waiver of written examination for instruction permit. The department
may waive the written examination, if, at the time of application, an applicant
is enrolled in:

(a)
A traffic safety education course as defined by RCW 28A.220.020(2); or

(b)
A course of instruction offered by a licensed driver training school as defined
by RCW 46.82.280(1).

The
department may require proof of registration in such a course as it deems
necessary.

(4)
Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's instruction
permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, upon the public
highways if:

(a)
The person has immediate possession of the permit; and

(b)
An approved instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five years of
driving experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.

(5)
Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is valid for
one year from the date of issue.

(a)
The department may issue one additional one-year permit.

(b)
The department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds after an
investigation that the permittee is diligently seeking to improve driving
proficiency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of three million eight hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction from the highway safety fund for the fiscal biennium ending June
30, 2001, solely to provide behind-the-wheel driver training required under RCW
28A.220.030 and to provide additional staff to the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to coordinate traffic safety education in Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
the legislature does not provide specific funding for the purposes of this act
by June 30, 1999, subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 3 of this act,
section 4 of this act, subsection (1)(c) of section 5 of this act, and sections
8, 9, and 10 of this act are null and void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Specified portions of this act are subject to the following effective dates:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, section 8 of this act is
effective September 1, 1999;

(2)
Section 1, subsection (3) of this act is effective April 1, 2000;

(3)
Section 6 of this act is effective September 1, 1999; and

(4) For licensed drivers who move to this state and obtain a Washington
driver's license, the department of licensing shall begin tracking the date
when the new Washington resident first obtained his or her original license to
drive no later than April 1, 2000.

---
END ---